
 
 
 
 Produced by Audrey Longhurst, Joel Schlosberg and the PG Online
 Distributed Proofreading Team.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 NERVOUS AND MENTAL DISEASE MONOGRAPH SERIES NO. 7
 
 THREE CONTRIBUTIONS TO THE THEORY OF SEX
 
 _SECOND EDITION_
 _SECOND REPRINTING_
 
 BY
 
 PROF. SIGMUND FREUD, LL.D.
 VIENNA
 
 AUTHORIZED TRANSLATION BY
 
 A.A. BRILL, PH.B., M.D.
 CLINICAL ASSISTANT, DEPARTMENT OF PSYCHIATRY AND NEUROLOGY, COLUMBIA
 UNIVERSITY; ASSISTANT IN MENTAL DISEASES, BELLEVUE HOSPITAL; ASSISTANT
 VISITING PHYSICIAN, HOSPITAL FOR NERVOUS DISEASES
 
 WITH INTRODUCTION BY
 
 JAMES J. PUTNAM, M.D.
 
 NERVOUS AND MENTAL DISEASE PUBLISHING CO.
 NEW YORK AND WASHINGTON
 1920
 
 
 
 
 NERVOUS AND MENTAL DISEASE MONOGRAPH SERIES
 
 Edited by
 
 Drs. SMITH ELY JELLIFFE and WM. A. WHITE
 
 Numbers Issued
 
 1. Outlines of Psychiatry. (7th Edition.) $3.00. By Dr. William A.
      White.
 2. Studies in Paranoia. (Out of Print.) By Drs. N. Gierlich and M.
      Friedman.
 3. The Psychology of Dementia Praecox. (Out of Print.) By Dr. C.G. Jung.
 4. Selected Papers on Hysteria and other Psychoneuroses. (3d Edition.)
      $3.00. By Prof. Sigmund Freud.
 5. The Wassermann Serum Diagnosis in Psychiatry. $2.00. By Dr. Felix
      Plaut.
 6. Epidemic Poliomyelitis. New York, 1907. (Out of Print.)
 7. Three Contributions to Sexual Theory. (3d Edition.) $2.00. By Prof.
      Sigmund Freud.
 8. Mental Mechanisms. (Out of Print.) $2.00. By Dr. Wm. A. White.
 9. Studies in Psychiatry. $2.00. New York Psychiatrical Society.
 10. Handbook of Mental Examination Methods. $2.00. (Out of Print.) By
      Shepherd Ivory Franz.
 11. The Theory of Schizophrenic Negativism. $1.00. By Professor E.
      Bleuler.
 12. Cerebellar Functions. $3.00. By Dr. Andre-Thomas.
 13. History of Prison Psychoses. $1.25. By Drs. P. Nitsche and K.
      Wilmanns.
 14. General Paresis. $3.00. By Prof. E. Kraepelin.
 15. Dreams and Myths. $1.00. By Dr. Karl Abraham.
 16. Poliomyelitis. $3.00. By Dr. I. Wickmann.
 17. Freud's Theories of the Neuroses. $2.00. By Dr. E. Hitschmann.
 18. The Myth of the Birth of the Hero. $1.00. By Dr. Otto Rank.
 19. The Theory of Psychoanalysis. $1.50. (Out of Print.) By Dr. C.G.
      Jung.
 20. Vagotonia. $1.00. (3d Edition.) By Drs. Eppinger and Hess.
 21. Wishfulfillment and Symbolism in Fairy Tales. $1.00. By Dr. Ricklin.
 22. The Dream Problem. $1.00. By Dr. A.E. Maeder.
 23. The Significance of Psychoanalysis for the Mental Sciences. $1.50.
      By Drs. O. Rank and D.H. Sachs.
 24. Organ Inferiority and its Psychical Compensation. $1.50. By Dr.
      Alfred Adler.
 25. The History of the Psychoanalytic Movement. $1.00. By Prof. S.
      Freud.
 26. Technique of Psychoanalysis. $2.00. By Dr. Smith Ely Jelliffe.
 27. Vegetative Neurology. $2.00. By Dr. H. Higier.
 28. The Autonomic Functions and the Personality. $2.00. By Dr. Edward J.
      Kemp.
 29. A Study of the Mental Life of the Child, $2.00. By Dr. H. Von
      Hug-Hellmuth.
 30. Internal Secretions and the Nervous System. $1.00. By Dr. M. Laignel
      Lavastine.
 31. Sleep Walking and Moon Walking. $2.00. By Dr. J. Sadger.
 
 NERVOUS AND MENTAL DISEASE PUBLISHING COMPANY 3617 10th St. N.W.,
 Washington, D.C.
 
 
 
 
 TABLE OF CONTENTS
 
                                                              PAGE
 INTRODUCTION TO TRANSLATION                                     v
 AUTHOR'S PREFACE TO THE SECOND EDITION                         ix
 AUTHOR'S PREFACE TO THE THIRD EDITION                           x
   I. THE SEXUAL ABERRATIONS                                     1
  II. THE INFANTILE SEXUALITY                                   36
 III. THE TRANSFORMATION OF PUBERTY                             68
 
 
 
 
 INTRODUCTION TO TRANSLATION
 
 
 The somewhat famous "Three Essays," which Dr. Brill is here bringing to
 the attention of an English-reading public, occupy--brief as they
 are--an important position among the achievements of their author, a
 great investigator and pioneer in an important line. It is not claimed
 that the facts here gathered are altogether new. The subject of the
 sexual instinct and its aberrations has long been before the scientific
 world and the names of many effective toilers in this vast field are
 known to every student. When one passes beyond the strict domains of
 science and considers what is reported of the sexual life in folkways
 and art-lore and the history of primitive culture and in romance, the
 sources of information are immense. Freud has made considerable
 additions to this stock of knowledge, but he has done also something of
 far greater consequence than this. He has worked out, with incredible
 penetration, the part which this instinct plays in every phase of human
 life and in the development of human character, and has been able to
 establish on a firm footing the remarkable thesis that psychoneurotic
 illnesses never occur with a perfectly normal sexual life. Other sorts
 of emotions contribute to the result, but some aberration of the sexual
 life is always present, as the cause of especially insistent emotions
 and repressions.
 
 The instincts with which every child is born furnish desires or cravings
 which must be dealt with in some fashion. They may be refined
 ("sublimated"), so far as is necessary and desirable, into energies of
 other sorts--as happens readily with the play-instinct--or they may
 remain as the source of perversions and inversions, and of cravings of
 new sorts substituted for those of the more primitive kinds under the
 pressure of a conventional civilization. The symptoms of the functional
 psychoneuroses represent, after a fashion, some of these distorted
 attempts to find a substitute for the imperative cravings born of the
 sexual instincts, and their form often depends, in part at least, on the
 peculiarities of the sexual life in infancy and early childhood. It is
 Freud's service to have investigated this inadequately chronicled period
 of existence with extraordinary acumen. In so doing he made it plain
 that the "perversions" and "inversions," which reappear later under such
 striking shapes, belong to the normal sexual life of the young child and
 are seen, in veiled forms, in almost every case of nervous illness.
 
 It cannot too often be repeated that these discoveries represent no
 fanciful deductions, but are the outcome of rigidly careful observations
 which any one who will sufficiently prepare himself can verify. Critics
 fret over the amount of "sexuality" that Freud finds evidence of in the
 histories of his patients, and assume that he puts it there. But such
 criticisms are evidences of misunderstandings and proofs of ignorance.
 
 Freud had learned that the amnesias of hypnosis and of hysteria were not
 absolute but relative and that in covering the lost memories, much more,
 of unexpected sort, was often found. Others, too, had gone as far as
 this, and stopped. But this investigator determined that nothing but the
 absolute impossibility of going further should make him cease from
 urging his patients into an inexorable scrutiny of the unconscious
 regions of their memories and thoughts, such as never had been made
 before. Every species of forgetfulness, even the forgetfulness of
 childhood's years, was made to yield its hidden stores of knowledge;
 dreams, even though apparently absurd, were found to be interpreters of
 a varied class of thoughts, active, although repressed as out of harmony
 with the selected life of consciousness; layer after layer, new sets of
 motives underlying motives were laid bare, and each patient's interest
 was strongly enlisted in the task of learning to know himself in order
 more truly and wisely to "sublimate" himself. Gradually other workers
 joined patiently in this laborious undertaking, which now stands, for
 those who have taken pains to comprehend it, as by far the most
 important movement in psychopathology.
 
 It must, however, be recognized that these essays, of which Dr. Brill
 has given a translation that cannot but be timely, concern a subject
 which is not only important but unpopular. Few physicians read the works
 of v. Krafft-Ebing, Magnus Hirschfeld, Moll, and others of like sort.
 The remarkable volumes of Havelock Ellis were refused publication in his
 native England. The sentiments which inspired this hostile attitude
 towards the study of the sexual life are still active, though growing
 steadily less common. One may easily believe that if the facts which
 Freud's truth-seeking researches forced him to recognize and to publish
 had not been of an unpopular sort, his rich and abundant contributions
 to observational psychology, to the significance of dreams, to the
 etiology and therapeutics of the psychoneuroses, to the interpretation
 of mythology, would have won for him, by universal acclaim, the same
 recognition among all physicians that he has received from a rapidly
 increasing band of followers and colleagues.
 
 May Dr. Brill's translation help toward this end.
 
 There are two further points on which some comments should be made. The
 first is this, that those who conscientiously desire to learn all that
 they can from Freud's remarkable contributions should not be content to
 read any one of them alone. His various publications, such as "The
 Selected Papers on Hysteria and Other Psychoneuroses,"[1] "The
 Interpretation of Dreams,"[2] "The Psychopathology of Everyday Life,"[3]
 "Wit and its Relation to the Unconscious,"[4] the analysis of the case
 of the little boy called Hans, the study of Leonardo da Vinci,[4a] and
 the various short essays in the four Sammlungen kleiner Schriften, not
 only all hang together, but supplement each other to a remarkable
 extent. Unless a course of study such as this is undertaken many critics
 may think various statements and inferences in this volume to be far
 fetched or find them too obscure for comprehension.
 
 The other point is the following: One frequently hears the
 psychoanalytic method referred to as if it was customary for those
 practicing it to exploit the sexual experiences of their patients and
 nothing more, and the insistence on the details of the sexual life,
 presented in this book, is likely to emphasize that notion. But the fact
 is, as every thoughtful inquirer is aware, that the whole progress of
 civilization, whether in the individual or the race, consists largely in
 a "sublimation" of infantile instincts, and especially certain portions
 of the sexual instinct, to other ends than those which they seemed
 designed to serve. Art and poetry are fed on this fuel and the evolution
 of character and mental force is largely of the same origin. All the
 forms which this sublimation, or the abortive attempts at sublimation,
 may take in any given case, should come out in the course of a thorough
 psychoanalysis. It is not the sexual life alone, but every interest and
 every motive, that must be inquired into by the physician who is seeking
 to obtain all the data about the patient, necessary for his reeducation
 and his cure. But all the thoughts and emotions and desires and motives
 which appear in the man or woman of adult years were once crudely
 represented in the obscure instincts of the infant, and among these
 instincts those which were concerned directly or indirectly with the
 sexual emotions, in a wide sense, are certain to be found in every case
 to have been the most important for the end-result.
 
                                                       JAMES J. PUTNAM.
 
 BOSTON, August 23, 1910.
 
 [1] Translated by A.A. Brill, NERVOUS AND MENTAL DISEASE MONOGRAPH
 SERIES, NO. 4.
 
 [2] Translated by A.A. Brill, The Macmillan Co., New York, and Allen &
 Unwin, London.
 
 [3] Translated by A.A. Brill, The Macmillan Co., New York.
 
 [4] Translated by A.A. Brill, Moffatt, Yard & Co., New York.
 
 [4a] Translated by A.A. Brill, Moffatt, Yard & Co., New York.
 
 
 
 
 AUTHOR'S PREFACE TO THE SECOND EDITION
 
 
 Although the author is fully aware of the gaps and obscurities contained
 in this small volume, he has, nevertheless, resisted a temptation to add
 to it the results obtained from the investigations of the last five
 years, fearing that thus its unified and documentary character would be
 destroyed. He accordingly reproduces the original text with but slight
 modifications, contenting himself with the addition of a few footnotes.
 For the rest, it is his ardent wish that this book may speedily become
 antiquated--to the end that the new material brought forward in it may
 be universally accepted, while the shortcomings it displays may give
 place to juster views.
 
 VIENNA, December, 1909.
 
 
 
 
 AUTHOR'S PREFACE TO THE THIRD EDITION
 
 
 After watching for ten years the reception accorded to this book and the
 effect it has produced, I wish to provide the third edition of it with
 some prefatory remarks dealing with the misunderstandings of the book
 and the demands, insusceptible of fulfillment, made against it. Let me
 emphasize in the first place that whatever is here presented is derived
 entirely from every-day medical experience which is to be made more
 profound and scientifically important through the results of
 psychoanalytic investigation. The "Three Contributions to the Theory of
 Sex" can contain nothing except what psychoanalysis obliges them to
 accept or what it succeeds in corroborating. It is therefore excluded
 that they should ever be developed into a "theory of sex," and it is
 also quite intelligible that they will assume no attitude at all towards
 some important problems of the sexual life. This should not however give
 the impression that these omitted chapters of the great theme were
 unfamiliar to the author, or that they were neglected by him as
 something of secondary importance.
 
 The dependence of this work on the psychoanalytic experiences which have
 determined the writing of it, shows itself not only in the selection but
 also in the arrangement of the material. A certain succession of stages
 was observed, the occasional factors are rendered prominent, the
 constitutional ones are left in the background, and the ontogenetic
 development receives greater consideration than the phylogenetic. For
 the occasional factors play the principal role in analysis, and are
 almost completely worked up in it, while the constitutional factors only
 become evident from behind as elements which have been made functional
 through experience, and a discussion of these would lead far beyond the
 working sphere of psychoanalysis.
 
 A similar connection determines the relation between ontogenesis and
 phylogenesis. Ontogenesis may be considered as a repetition of
 phylogenesis insofar as the latter has not been varied by a more recent
 experience. The phylogenetic disposition makes itself visible behind the
 ontogenetic process. But fundamentally the constitution is really the
 precipitate of a former experience of the species to which the newer
 experience of the individual being is added as the sum of the occasional
 factors.
 
 Beside its thoroughgoing dependence on psychoanalytic investigation I
 must emphasize as a character of this work of mine its intentional
 independence of biological investigation. I have carefully avoided the
 inclusion of the results of scientific investigation in general sex
 biology or of particular species of animals in this study of human
 sexual functions which is made possible by the technique of
 psychoanalysis. My aim was indeed to find out how much of the biology of
 the sexual life of man can be discovered by means of psychological
 investigation; I was able to point to additions and agreements which
 resulted from this examination, but I did not have to become confused if
 the psychoanalytic methods led in some points to views and results which
 deviated considerably from those merely based on biology.
 
 I have added many passages in this edition, but I have abstained from
 calling attention to them, as in former editions, by special marks. The
 scientific work in our sphere has at present been retarded in its
 progress, nevertheless some supplements to this work were indispensable
 if it was to remain in touch with our newer psychoanalytic literature.
 
 VIENNA, October, 1914.
 
 
 
 
 I
 
 THE SEXUAL ABERRATIONS[1]
 
 
 The fact of sexual need in man and animal is expressed in biology by the
 assumption of a "sexual impulse." This impulse is made analogous to the
 impulse of taking nourishment, and to hunger. The sexual expression
 corresponding to hunger not being found colloquilly, science uses the
 expression "libido."[2]
 
 Popular conception makes definite assumptions concerning the nature and
 qualities of this sexual impulse. It is supposed to be absent during
 childhood and to commence about the time of and in connection with the
 maturing process of puberty; it is supposed that it manifests itself in
 irresistible attractions exerted by one sex upon the other, and that its
 aim is sexual union or at least such actions as would lead to union.
 
 But we have every reason to see in these assumptions a very
 untrustworthy picture of reality. On closer examination they are found
 to abound in errors, inaccuracies and hasty conclusions.
 
 If we introduce two terms and call the person from whom the sexual
 attraction emanates the _sexual object_, and the action towards which
 the impulse strives the _sexual aim_, then the scientifically examined
 experience shows us many deviations in reference to both sexual object
 and sexual aim, the relations of which to the accepted standard require
 thorough investigation.
 
 
 1. DEVIATION IN REFERENCE TO THE SEXUAL OBJECT
 
 The popular theory of the sexual impulse corresponds closely to the
 poetic fable of dividing the person into two halves--man and woman--who
 strive to become reunited through love. It is therefore very surprising
 to hear that there are men for whom the sexual object is not woman but
 man, and that there are women for whom it is not man but woman. Such
 _persons_ are called contrary sexuals, or better, inverts; the
 _condition_, that of inversion. The number of such individuals is
 considerable though difficult of accurate determination.[3]
 
 
 A. _Inversion_
 
 *The Behavior of Inverts.*--The above-mentioned persons behave in many
 ways quite differently.
 
 (_a_) They are absolutely inverted; _i.e._, their sexual object must be
 always of the same sex, while the opposite sex can never be to them an
 object of sexual longing, but leaves them indifferent or may even evoke
 sexual repugnance. As men they are unable, on account of this
 repugnance, to perform the normal sexual act or miss all pleasure in its
 performance.
 
 (_b_) They are amphigenously inverted (psychosexually hermaphroditic);
 _i.e._, their sexual object may belong indifferently to either the same
 or to the other sex. The inversion lacks the character of exclusiveness.
 
 (_c_) They are occasionally inverted; _i.e._, under certain external
 conditions, chief among which are the inaccessibility of the normal
 sexual object and initiation, they are able to take as the sexual
 object a person of the same sex and thus find sexual gratification.
 
 The inverted also manifest a manifold behavior in their judgment about
 the peculiarities of their sexual impulse. Some take the inversion as a
 matter of course, just as the normal person does regarding his libido,
 firmly demanding the same rights as the normal. Others, however, strive
 against the fact of their inversion and perceive in it a morbid
 compulsion.[4]
 
 Other variations concern the relations of time. The characteristics of
 the inversion in any individual may date back as far as his memory goes,
 or they may become manifest to him at a definite period before or after
 puberty.[5] The character is either retained throughout life, or it
 occasionally recedes or represents an episode on the road to normal
 development. A periodical fluctuation between the normal and the
 inverted sexual object has also been observed. Of special interest are
 those cases in which the libido changes, taking on the character of
 inversion after a painful experience with the normal sexual object.
 
 These different categories of variation generally exist independently of
 one another. In the most extreme cases it can regularly be assumed that
 the inversion has existed at all times and that the person feels
 contented with his peculiar state.
 
 Many authors will hesitate to gather into a unit all the cases
 enumerated here and will prefer to emphasize the differences rather than
 the common characters of these groups, a view which corresponds with
 their preferred judgment of inversions. But no matter what divisions may
 be set up, it cannot be overlooked that all transitions are abundantly
 met with, so that the formation of a series would seem to impose itself.
 
 *Conception of Inversion.*--The first attention bestowed upon inversion
 gave rise to the conception that it was a congenital sign of nervous
 degeneration. This harmonized with the fact that doctors first met it
 among the nervous, or among persons giving such an impression. There are
 two elements which should be considered independently in this
 conception: the congenitality, and the degeneration.
 
 *Degeneration.*--This term _degeneration_ is open to the objections
 which may be urged against the promiscuous use of this word in general.
 It has in fact become customary to designate all morbid manifestations
 not of traumatic or infectious origin as degenerative. Indeed, Magnan's
 classification of degenerates makes it possible that the highest general
 configuration of nervous accomplishment need not exclude the application
 of the concept of degeneration. Under the circumstances, it is a
 question what use and what new content the judgment of "degeneration"
 still possesses. It would seem more appropriate not to speak of
 degeneration: (1) Where there are not many marked deviations from the
 normal; (2) where the capacity for working and living do not in general
 appear markedly impaired.[6]
 
 That the inverted are not degenerates in this qualified sense can be
 seen from the following facts:
 
 1. The inversion is found among persons who otherwise show no marked
 deviation from the normal.
 
 2. It is found also among persons whose capabilities are not disturbed,
 who on the contrary are distinguished by especially high intellectual
 development and ethical culture.[7]
 
 3. If one disregards the patients of one's own practice and strives to
 comprehend a wider field of experience, he will in two directions
 encounter facts which will prevent him from assuming inversions as a
 degenerative sign.
 
 (_a_) It must be considered that inversion was a frequent manifestation
 among the ancient nations at the height of their culture. It was an
 institution endowed with important functions. (_b_) It is found to be
 unusually prevalent among savages and primitive races, whereas the term
 degeneration is generally limited to higher civilization (I. Bloch).
 Even among the most civilized nations of Europe, climate and race have a
 most powerful influence on the distribution of, and attitude toward,
 inversion.[8]
 
 *Innateness.*--Only for the first and most extreme class of inverts, as
 can be imagined, has innateness been claimed, and this from their own
 assurance that at no time in their life has their sexual impulse
 followed a different course. The fact of the existence of two other
 classes, especially of the third, is difficult to reconcile with the
 assumption of its being congenital. Hence, the propensity of those
 holding this view to separate the group of absolute inverts from the
 others results in the abandonment of the general conception of
 inversion. Accordingly in a number of cases the inversion would be of a
 congenital character, while in others it might originate from other
 causes.
 
 In contradistinction to this conception is that which assumes inversion
 to be an _acquired_ character of the sexual impulse. It is based on the
 following facts. (1) In many inverts (even absolute ones) an early
 affective sexual impression can be demonstrated, as a result of which
 the homosexual inclination developed. (2) In many others outer
 influences of a promoting and inhibiting nature can be demonstrated,
 which in earlier or later life led to a fixation of the inversion--among
 which are exclusive relations with the same sex, companionship in war,
 detention in prison, dangers of hetero-sexual intercourse, celibacy,
 sexual weakness, etc. (3) Hypnotic suggestion may remove the inversion,
 which would be surprising in that of a congenital character.
 
 In view of all this, the existence of congenital inversion can certainly
 be questioned. The objection may be made to it that a more accurate
 examination of those claimed to be congenitally inverted will probably
 show that the direction of the libido was determined by a definite
 experience of early childhood, which has not been retained in the
 conscious memory of the person, but which can be brought back to memory
 by proper influences (Havelock Ellis). According to that author
 inversion can be designated only as a frequent variation of the sexual
 impulse which may be determined by a number of external circumstances of
 life.
 
 The apparent certainty thus reached is, however, overthrown by the
 retort that manifestly there are many persons who have experienced even
 in their early youth those very sexual influences, such as seduction,
 mutual onanism, without becoming inverts, or without constantly
 remaining so. Hence, one is forced to assume that the alternatives
 congenital and acquired are either incomplete or do not cover the
 circumstances present in inversions.
 
 *Explanation of Inversion.*--The nature of inversion is explained
 neither by the assumption that it is congenital nor that it is acquired.
 In the first case, we need to be told what there is in it of the
 congenital, unless we are satisfied with the roughest explanation,
 namely, that a person brings along a congenital sexual impulse connected
 with a definite sexual object. In the second case it is a question
 whether the manifold accidental influences suffice to explain the
 acquisition unless there is something in the individual to meet them
 half way. The negation of this last factor is inadmissible according to
 our former conclusions.
 
 *The Relation of Bisexuality.*--Since the time of Frank Lydston,
 Kiernan, and Chevalier, a new series of ideas has been introduced for
 the explanation of the possibility of sexual inversion. This contains a
 new contradiction to the popular belief which assumes that a human being
 is either a man or a woman. Science shows cases in which the sexual
 characteristics appear blurred and thus the sexual distinction is made
 difficult, especially on an anatomical basis. The genitals of such
 persons unite the male and female characteristics (hermaphroditism). In
 rare cases both parts of the sexual apparatus are well developed (true
 hermaphroditism), but usually both are stunted.[9]
 
 The importance of these abnormalities lies in the fact that they
 unexpectedly facilitate the understanding of the normal formation. A
 certain degree of anatomical hermaphroditism really belongs to the
 normal. In no normally formed male or female are traces of the apparatus
 of the other sex lacking; these either continue functionless as
 rudimentary organs, or they are transformed for the purpose of assuming
 other functions.
 
 The conception which we gather from this long known anatomical fact is
 the original predisposition to bisexuality, which in the course of
 development has changed to monosexuality, leaving slight remnants of the
 stunted sex.
 
 It was natural to transfer this conception to the psychic sphere and to
 conceive the inversion in its aberrations as an expression of psychic
 hermaphroditism. In order to bring the question to a decision, it was
 only necessary to have one other circumstance, viz., a regular
 concurrence of the inversion with the psychic and somatic signs of
 hermaphroditism.
 
 But this second expectation was not realized. The relations between the
 assumed psychical and the demonstrable anatomical androgyny should never
 be conceived as being so close. There is frequently found in the
 inverted a diminution of the sexual impulse (H. Ellis) and a slight
 anatomical stunting of the organs. This, however, is found frequently
 but by no means regularly or preponderately. Thus we must recognize that
 inversion and somatic hermaphroditism are totally independent of each
 other.
 
 Great importance has also been attached to the so-called secondary and
 tertiary sex characters and their aggregate occurrence in the inverted
 has been emphasized (H. Ellis). There is much truth in this but it
 should not be forgotten that the secondary and tertiary sex
 characteristics very frequently manifest themselves in the other sex,
 thus indicating androgyny without, however, involving changes in the
 sexual object in the sense of an inversion.
 
 Psychic hermaphroditism would gain in substantiality if parallel with
 the inversion of the sexual object there should be at least a change in
 the other psychic qualities, such as in the impulses and distinguishing
 traits characteristic of the other sex. But such inversion of character
 can be expected with some regularity only in inverted women; in men the
 most perfect psychic manliness may be united with the inversion. If one
 firmly adheres to the hypothesis of a psychic hermaphroditism, one must
 add that in certain spheres its manifestations allow the recognition of
 only a very slight contrary determination. The same also holds true in
 the somatic androgyny. According to Halban, the appearance of individual
 stunted organs and secondary sex characters are quite independent of
 each other.[10]
 
 A spokesman of the masculine inverts stated the bisexual theory in its
 crudest form in the following words: "It is a female brain in a male
 body." But we do not know the characteristics of a "female brain." The
 substitution of the anatomical for the psychological is as frivolous as
 it is unjustified. The tentative explanation by v. Krafft-Ebing seems to
 be more precisely formulated than that of Ulrich but does not
 essentially differ from it. v. Krafft-Ebing thinks that the bisexual
 predisposition gives to the individual male and female brain centers as
 well as somatic sexual organs. These centers develop first towards
 puberty mostly under the influence of the independent sex glands. We
 can, however, say the same of the male and female "centers" as of the
 male and female brains; and, moreover, we do not even know whether we
 can assume for the sexual functions separate brain locations ("centers")
 such as we may assume for language.
 
 After this discussion, two notions, at all events, persist; first, that
 a bisexual predisposition is to be presumed for the inversion also, only
 we do not know of what it consists beyond the anatomical formations;
 and, second, that we are dealing with disturbances which are experienced
 by the sexual impulse during its development.[11]
 
 *The Sexual Object of Inverts.*--The theory of psychic hermaphroditism
 presupposed that the sexual object of the inverted is the reverse of the
 normal. The inverted man, like the woman, succumbs to the charms
 emanating from manly qualities of body and mind; he feels himself like a
 woman and seeks a man.
 
 But however true this may be for a great number of inverts, it by no
 means indicates the general character of inversion. There is no doubt
 that a great part of the male inverted have retained the psychic
 character of virility, that proportionately they show but little of the
 secondary characters of the other sex, and that they really look for
 real feminine psychic features in their sexual object. If that were not
 so it would be incomprehensible why masculine prostitution, in offering
 itself to inverts, copies in all its exterior, to-day as in antiquity,
 the dress and attitudes of woman. This imitation would otherwise be an
 insult to the ideal of the inverts. Among the Greeks, where the most
 manly men were found among inverts, it is quite obvious that it was not
 the masculine character of the boy which kindled the love of man, but it
 was his physical resemblance to woman as well as his feminine psychic
 qualities, such as shyness, demureness, and the need of instruction and
 help. As soon as the boy himself became a man he ceased to be a sexual
 object for men and in turn became a lover of boys. The sexual object in
 this case as in many others is therefore not of the like sex, but it
 unites both sex characters, a compromise between the impulses striving
 for the man and for the woman, but firmly conditioned by the masculinity
 of body (the genitals).[12]
 
 The conditions in the woman are more definite; here the active inverts,
 with special frequency, show the somatic and psychic characters of man
 and desire femininity in their sexual object; though even here greater
 variation will be found on more intimate investigation.
 
 *The Sexual Aim of Inverts.*--The important fact to bear in mind is that
 no uniformity of the sexual aim can be attributed to inversion.
 Intercourse per anum in men by no means goes with inversion;
 masturbation is just as frequently the exclusive aim; and the limitation
 of the sexual aim to mere effusion of feelings is here even more
 frequent than in hetero-sexual love. In women, too, the sexual aims of
 the inverted are manifold, among which contact with the mucous membrane
 of the mouth seems to be preferred.
 
 *Conclusion.*--Though from the material on hand we are by no means in a
 position satisfactorily to explain the origin of inversion, we can say
 that through this investigation we have obtained an insight which can
 become of greater significance to us than the solution of the above
 problem. Our attention is called to the fact that we have assumed a too
 close connection between the sexual impulse and the sexual object. The
 experience gained from the so called abnormal cases teaches us that a
 connection exists between the sexual impulse and the sexual object which
 we are in danger of overlooking in the uniformity of normal states where
 the impulse seems to bring with it the object. We are thus instructed to
 separate this connection between the impulse and the object. The sexual
 impulse is probably entirely independent of its object and is not
 originated by the stimuli proceeding from the object.
 
 
 B. _The Sexually Immature and Animals as Sexual Objects_
 
 Whereas those sexual inverts whose sexual object does not belong to the
 normally adapted sex, appear to the observer as a collective number of
 perhaps otherwise normal individuals, the persons who choose for their
 sexual object the sexually immature (children) are apparently from the
 first sporadic aberrations. Only exceptionally are children the
 exclusive sexual objects. They are mostly drawn into this role by a
 faint-hearted and impotent individual who makes use of such substitutes,
 or when an impulsive urgent desire cannot at the time secure the proper
 object. Still it throws some light on the nature of the sexual impulse,
 that it should suffer such great variation and depreciation of its
 object, a thing which hunger, adhering more energetically to its object,
 would allow only in the most extreme cases. The same may be said of
 sexual relations with animals--a thing not at all rare among
 farmers--where the sexual attraction goes beyond the limits of the
 species.
 
 For esthetic reasons one would fain attribute this and other excessive
 aberrations of the sexual impulse to the insane, but this cannot be
 done. Experience teaches that among the latter no disturbances of the
 sexual impulse can be found other than those observed among the sane, or
 among whole races and classes. Thus we find with gruesome frequency
 sexual abuse of children by teachers and servants merely because they
 have the best opportunities for it. The insane present the aforesaid
 aberration only in a somewhat intensified form; or what is of special
 significance is the fact that the aberration becomes exclusive and takes
 the place of the normal sexual gratification.
 
 This very remarkable relation of sexual variations ranging from the
 normal to the insane gives material for reflection. It seems to me that
 the fact to be explained would show that the impulses of the sexual life
 belong to those which even normally are most poorly controlled by the
 higher psychic activities. He who is in any way psychically abnormal, be
 it in social or ethical conditions, is, according to my experience,
 regularly so in his sexual life. But many are abnormal in their sexual
 life who in every other respect correspond to the average; they have
 followed the human cultural development, but sexuality remained as their
 weak point.
 
 As a general result of these discussions we come to see that, under
 numerous conditions and among a surprising number of individuals, the
 nature and value of the sexual object steps into the background. There
 is something else in the sexual impulse which is the essential and
 constant.[13]
 
 
 2. DEVIATION IN REFERENCE TO THE SEXUAL AIM
 
 The union of the genitals in the characteristic act of copulation is
 taken as the normal sexual aim. It serves to loosen the sexual tension
 and temporarily to quench the sexual desire (gratification analogous to
 satisfaction of hunger). Yet even in the most normal sexual process
 those additions are distinguishable, the development of which leads to
 the aberrations described as _perversions_. Thus certain intermediary
 relations to the sexual object connected with copulation, such as
 touching and looking, are recognized as preliminary to the sexual aim.
 These activities are on the one hand themselves connected with pleasure
 and on the other hand they enhance the excitement which persists until
 the definite sexual aim is reached. One definite kind of contiguity,
 consisting of mutual approximation of the mucous membranes of the lips
 in the form of a kiss, has received among the most civilized nations a
 sexual value, though the parts of the body concerned do not belong to
 the sexual apparatus but form the entrance to the digestive tract. This
 therefore supplies the factors which allow us to bring the perversions
 into relation with the normal sexual life, and which are available also
 for their classification. The perversions are either (_a_) anatomical
 _transgressions_ of the bodily regions destined for sexual union, or (_b_)
 a _lingering_ at the intermediary relations to the sexual object which
 should normally be rapidly passed on the way to the definite sexual aim.
 
 
 (_a_) _Anatomical Transgression_
 
 *Overestimation of the Sexual Object.*--The psychic estimation in which
 the sexual object as a goal of the sexual impulse shares is only in the
 rarest cases limited to the genitals; generally it embraces the whole
 body and tends to include all sensations emanating from the sexual
 object. The same overestimation spreads over the psychic sphere and
 manifests itself as a logical blinding (diminished judgment) in the face
 of the psychic attainments and perfections of the sexual object, as well
 as a blind obedience to the judgments issuing from the latter. The full
 faith of love thus becomes an important, if not the primordial source of
 authority.[14]
 
 It is this sexual overvaluation, which so ill agrees with the
 restriction of the sexual aim to the union of the genitals only, that
 assists other parts of the body to participate as sexual aims.[15] In
 the development of this most manifold anatomical overestimation there is
 an unmistakable desire towards variation, a thing denominated by Hoche
 as "excitement-hunger" (Reiz-hunger).[16]
 
 *Sexual Utilization of the Mucous Membrane of the Lips and Mouth.*--The
 significance of the factor of sexual overestimation can be best studied
 in the man, in whom alone the sexual life is accessible to
 investigation, whereas in the woman it is veiled in impenetrable
 darkness, partly in consequence of cultural stunting and partly on
 account of the conventional reticence and dishonesty of women.
 
 The employment of the mouth as a sexual organ is considered as a
 perversion if the lips (tongue) of the one are brought into contact with
 the genitals of the other, but not when the mucous membrane of the lips
 of both touch each other. In the latter exception we find the connection
 with the normal. He who abhors the former as perversions, though these
 since antiquity have been common practices among mankind, yields to a
 distinct _feeling of loathing_ which protects him from adopting such
 sexual aims. The limit of such loathing is frequently purely
 conventional; he who kisses fervently the lips of a pretty girl will
 perhaps be able to use her tooth brush only with a sense of loathing,
 though there is no reason to assume that his own oral cavity for which
 he entertains no loathing is cleaner than that of the girl. Our
 attention is here called to the factor of loathing which stands in the
 way of the libidinous overestimation of the sexual aim, but which may
 in turn be vanquished by the libido. In the loathing we may observe one
 of the forces which have brought about the restrictions of the sexual
 aim. As a rule these forces halt at the genitals; there is, however, no
 doubt that even the genitals of the other sex themselves may be an
 object of loathing. Such behavior is characteristic of all hysterics,
 especially women. The force of the sexual impulse prefers to occupy
 itself with the overcoming of this loathing (see below).
 
 *Sexual Utilization of the Anal Opening.*--It is even more obvious than
 in the former case that it is the loathing which stamps as a perversion
 the use of the anus as a sexual aim. But it should not be interpreted as
 espousing a cause when I observe that the basis of this
 loathing--namely, that this part of the body serves for the excretion
 and comes in contact with the loathsome excrement--is not more plausible
 than the basis which hysterical girls have for the disgust which they
 entertain for the male genital because it serves for urination.
 
 The sexual role of the mucous membrane of the anus is by no means
 limited to intercourse between men; its preference has nothing
 characteristic of the inverted feeling. On the contrary, it seems that
 the _pedicatio_ of the man owes its role to the analogy with the act in
 the woman, whereas among inverts it is mutual masturbation which is the
 most common sexual aim.
 
 *The Significance of Other Parts of the Body.*--Sexual infringement on
 the other parts of the body, in all its variations, offers nothing new;
 it adds nothing to our knowledge of the sexual impulse which herein only
 announces its intention to dominate the sexual object in every way.
 Besides the sexual overvaluation, a second and generally unknown factor
 may be mentioned among the anatomical transgressions. Certain parts of
 the body, like the mucous membrane of the mouth and anus, which
 repeatedly appear in such practices, lay claim as it were to be
 considered and treated as genitals. We shall hear how this claim is
 justified by the development of the sexual impulse, and how it is
 fulfilled in the symptomatology of certain morbid conditions.
 
 *Unfit Substitutes for the Sexual Object. Fetichism.*--We are especially
 impressed by those cases in which for the normal sexual object another
 is substituted which is related to it but which is totally unfit for the
 normal sexual aim. According to the scheme of the introduction we should
 have done better to mention this most interesting group of aberrations
 of the sexual impulse among the deviations in reference to the sexual
 object, but we have deferred mention of these until we became acquainted
 with the factor of sexual overestimation, upon which these
 manifestations, connected with the relinquishing of the sexual aim,
 depend.
 
 The substitute for the sexual object is generally a part of the body but
 little adapted for sexual purposes, such as the foot, or hair, or an
 inanimate object which is in demonstrable relation with the sexual
 person, and preferably with the sexuality of the same (fragments of
 clothing, white underwear). This substitution is not unjustly compared
 with the fetich in which the savage sees the embodiment of his god.
 
 The transition to the cases of fetichism, with a renunciation of a
 normal or of a perverted sexual aim, is formed by cases in which a
 fetichistic determination is demanded in the sexual object if the sexual
 aim is to be attained (definite color of hair, clothing, even physical
 blemishes). No other variation of the sexual impulse verging on the
 pathological claims our interest as much as this one, owing to the
 peculiarity occasioned by its manifestations. A certain diminution in
 the striving for the normal sexual aim may be presupposed in all these
 cases (executive weakness of the sexual apparatus).[17] The connection
 with the normal is occasioned by the psychologically necessary
 overestimation of the sexual object, which inevitably encroaches upon
 everything associatively related to it (sexual object). A certain degree
 of such fetichism therefore regularly belong to the normal, especially
 during those stages of wooing when the normal sexual aim seems
 inaccessible or its realization deferred.
 
      "Get me a handkerchief from her bosom--a garter of my love."
                                                         --FAUST.
 
 The case becomes pathological only when the striving for the fetich
 fixes itself beyond such determinations and takes the place of the
 normal sexual aim; or again, when the fetich disengages itself from the
 person concerned and itself becomes a sexual object. These are the
 general determinations for the transition of mere variations of the
 sexual impulse into pathological aberrations.
 
 The persistent influence of a sexual impress mostly received in early
 childhood often shows itself in the selection of a fetich, as Binet
 first asserted, and as was later proven by many illustrations,--a thing
 which may be placed parallel to the proverbial attachment to a first
 love in the normal ("On revient toujours a ses premiers amours"). Such a
 connection is especially seen in cases with only fetichistic
 determinations of the sexual object. The significance of early sexual
 impressions will be met again in other places.
 
 In other cases it was mostly a symbolic thought association, unconscious
 to the person concerned, which led to the replacing of the object by
 means of a fetich. The paths of these connections can not always be
 definitely demonstrated. The foot is a very primitive sexual symbol
 already found in myths.[18] Fur is used as a fetich probably on account
 of its association with the hairiness of the mons veneris. Such
 symbolism seems often to depend on sexual experiences in childhood.[19]
 
 
 (_b_) _Fixation of Precursory Sexual Aims_
 
 *The Appearance of New Intentions.*--All the outer and inner
 determinations which impede or hold at a distance the attainment of the
 normal sexual aim, such as impotence, costliness of the sexual object,
 and dangers of the sexual act, will conceivably strengthen the
 inclination to linger at the preparatory acts and to form them into new
 sexual aims which may take the place of the normal. On closer
 investigation it is always seen that the ostensibly most peculiar of
 these new intentions have already been indicated in the normal sexual
 act.
 
 *Touching and Looking.*--At least a certain amount of touching is
 indispensable for a person in order to attain the normal sexual aim. It
 is also generally known that the touching of the skin of the sexual
 object causes much pleasure and produces a supply of new excitement.
 Hence, the lingering at the touching can hardly be considered a
 perversion if the sexual act is proceeded with.
 
 The same holds true in the end with looking which is analogous to
 touching. The manner in which the libidinous excitement is frequently
 awakened is by the optical impression, and selection takes account of
 this circumstance--if this teleological mode of thinking be
 permitted--by making the sexual object a thing of beauty. The covering
 of the body, which keeps abreast with civilization, serves to arouse
 sexual inquisitiveness, which always strives to restore for itself the
 sexual object by uncovering the hidden parts. This can be turned into
 the artistic ("sublimation") if the interest is turned from the genitals
 to the form of the body.[20] The tendency to linger at this intermediary
 sexual aim of the sexually accentuated looking is found to a certain
 degree in most normals; indeed it gives them the possibility of
 directing a certain amount of their libido to a higher artistic aim. On
 the other hand, the fondness for looking becomes a perversion (_a_) when
 it limits itself entirely to the genitals; (_b_) when it becomes connected
 with the overcoming of loathing (voyeurs and onlookers at the functions
 of excretion); and (_c_) when instead of preparing for the normal sexual
 aim it suppresses it. The latter, if I may draw conclusions from a
 single analysis, is in a most pronounced way true of exhibitionists, who
 expose their genitals so as in turn to bring to view the genitals of
 others.
 
 In the perversion which consists in striving to look and be looked at we
 are confronted with a very remarkable character which will occupy us
 even more intensively in the following aberration. The sexual aim is
 here present in twofold formation, in an _active_ and a _passive_ form.
 
 The force which is opposed to the peeping mania and through which it is
 eventually abolished is _shame_ (like the former loathing).
 
 *Sadism and Masochism.*--The desire to cause pain to the sexual object
 and its opposite, the most frequent and most significant of all
 perversions, was designated in its two forms by v. Krafft-Ebing as
 sadism or the active form, and masochism or the passive form. Other
 authors prefer the narrower term algolagnia which emphasizes the
 pleasure in pain and cruelty, whereas the terms selected by v.
 Krafft-Ebing place the pleasure secured in all kinds of humility and
 submission in the foreground.
 
 The roots of active algolagnia, sadism, can be readily demonstrable in
 the normal. The sexuality of most men shows a taint of _aggression_, it
 is a propensity to subdue, the biological significance of which lies in
 the necessity of overcoming the resistance of the sexual object by
 actions other than mere _courting_. Sadism would then correspond to an
 aggressive component of the sexual impulse which has become independent
 and exaggerated and has been brought to the foreground by displacement.
 
 The conception of sadism fluctuates in the usage of language from a mere
 active or impetuous attitude towards the sexual object to the exclusive
 attachment of the gratification to the subjection and maltreatment of
 the object. Strictly speaking only the last extreme case has a claim to
 the name of perversion.
 
 Similarly, the designation of masochism comprises all passive attitude
 to the sexual life and to the sexual object; in its most extreme form
 the gratification is connected with suffering of physical or mental pain
 at the hands of the sexual object. Masochism as a perversion seems to be
 still more remote from the normal sexual life by forming a contrast to
 it; it may be doubted whether it ever appears as a primary form or
 whether it does not more regularly originate through transformation from
 sadism. It can often be recognized that the masochism is nothing but a
 continuation of the sadism turning against one's own person in which the
 latter at first takes the place of the sexual object. Analysis of
 extreme cases of masochistic perversions show that there is a
 cooeperation of a large series of factors which exaggerate and fix the
 original passive sexual attitude (castration complex, conscience).
 
 The pain which is here overcome ranks with the loathing and shame which
 were the resistances opposed to the libido.
 
 Sadism and masochism occupy a special place among the perversions, for
 the contrast of activity and passivity lying at their bases belong to
 the common traits of the sexual life.
 
 That cruelty and sexual impulse are most intimately connected is beyond
 doubt taught by the history of civilization, but in the explanation of
 this connection no one has gone beyond the accentuation of the
 aggressive factors of the libido. The aggression which is mixed with the
 sexual impulse is according to some authors a remnant of cannibalistic
 lust, a participation on the part of the domination apparatus
 (Bemaechtigungsapparatus), which served also for the gratification of the
 great wants of the other, ontogenetically the older impulse.[21] It has
 also been claimed that every pain contains in itself the possibility of
 a pleasurable sensation. Let us be satisfied with the impression that
 the explanation of this perversion is by no means satisfactory and that
 it is possible that many psychic efforts unite themselves into one
 effect.
 
 The most striking peculiarity of this perversion lies in the fact that
 its active and passive forms are regularly encountered together in the
 same person. He who experiences pleasure by causing pain to others in
 sexual relations is also able to experience the pain emanating from
 sexual relations as pleasure. A sadist is simultaneously a masochist,
 though either the active or the passive side of the perversion may be
 more strongly developed and thus represent his preponderate sexual
 activity.[22]
 
 We thus see that certain perverted propensities regularly appear in
 _contrasting pairs_, a thing which, in view of the material to be
 produced later, must claim great theoretical value. It is furthermore
 clear that the existence of the contrast, sadism and masochism, can not
 readily be attributed to the mixture of aggression. On the other hand
 one may be tempted to connect such simultaneously existing contrasts
 with the united contrast of male and female in bisexuality, the
 significance of which is reduced in psychoanalysis to the contrast of
 activity and passivity.
 
 
 3. GENERAL STATEMENTS APPLICABLE TO ALL PERVERSIONS
 
 *Variation and Disease.*--The physicians who at first studied the
 _perversions_ in pronounced cases and under peculiar conditions were
 naturally inclined to attribute to them the character of a morbid or
 degenerative sign similar to the _inversions_. This view, however, is
 easier to refute in this than in the former case. Everyday experience
 has shown that most of these transgressions, at least the milder ones,
 are seldom wanting as components in the sexual life of normals who look
 upon them as upon other intimacies. Wherever the conditions are
 favorable such a perversion may for a long time be substituted by a
 normal person for the normal sexual aim or it may be placed near it. In
 no normal person does the normal sexual aim lack some designable
 perverse element, and this universality suffices in itself to prove the
 inexpediency of an opprobrious application of the name perversion. In
 the realm of the sexual life one is sure to meet with exceptional
 difficulties which are at present really unsolvable, if one wishes to
 draw a sharp line between the mere variations within physiological
 limits and morbid symptoms.
 
 Nevertheless, the quality of the new sexual aim in some of these
 perversions is such as to require special notice. Some of the
 perversions are in content so distant from the normal that we cannot
 help calling them "morbid," especially those in which the sexual
 impulse, in overcoming the resistances (shame, loathing, fear, and pain)
 has brought about surprising results (licking of feces and violation of
 cadavers). Yet even in these cases one ought not to feel certain of
 regularly finding among the perpetrators persons of pronounced
 abnormalities or insane minds. We can not lose sight of the fact that
 persons who otherwise behave normally are recorded as sick in the realm
 of the sexual life where they are dominated by the most unbridled of all
 impulses. On the other hand, a manifest abnormality in any other
 relation in life generally shows an undercurrent of abnormal sexual
 behavior.
 
 In the majority of cases we are able to find the morbid character of the
 perversion not in the content of the new sexual aim but in its relation
 to the normal. It is morbid if the perversion does not appear beside the
 normal (sexual aim and sexual object), where favorable circumstances
 promote it and unfavorable impede the normal, or if it has under all
 circumstances repressed and supplanted the normal; _the exclusiveness_
 and _fixation_ of the perversion justifies us in considering it a morbid
 symptom.
 
 *The Psychic Participation in the Perversions.*--Perhaps it is precisely
 in the most abominable perversions that we must recognize the most
 prolific psychic participation for the transformation of the sexual
 impulse. In these cases a piece of psychic work has been accomplished in
 which, in spite of its gruesome success, the value of an idealization of
 the impulse can not be disputed. The omnipotence of love nowhere perhaps
 shows itself stronger than in this one of her aberrations. The highest
 and the lowest everywhere in sexuality hang most intimately together.
 ("From heaven through the world to hell.")
 
 *Two Results.*--In the study of perversions we have gained an insight
 into the fact that the sexual impulse has to struggle against certain
 psychic forces, resistances, among which shame and loathing are most
 prominent. We may presume that these forces are employed to confine the
 impulse within the accepted normal limits, and if they have become
 developed in the individual before the sexual impulse has attained its
 full strength, it is really they which have directed it in the course of
 development.[23]
 
 We have furthermore remarked that some of the examined perversions can
 be comprehended only by assuming the union of many motives. If they are
 amenable to analysis--disintegration--they must be of a composite
 nature. This may give us a hint that the sexual impulse itself may not
 be something simple, that it may on the contrary be composed of many
 components which detach themselves to form perversions. Our clinical
 observation thus calls our attention to _fusions_ which have lost their
 expression in the uniform normal behavior.
 
 
 4. THE SEXUAL IMPULSE IN NEUROTICS
 
 *Psychoanalysis.*--A proper contribution to the knowledge of the sexual
 impulse in persons who are at least related to the normal can be gained
 only from one source, and is accessible only by one definite path. There
 is only one way to obtain a thorough and unerring solution of problems
 in the sexual life of so-called psychoneurotics (hysteria, obsessions,
 the wrongly-named neurasthenia, and surely also dementia praecox, and
 paranoia), and that is by subjecting them to the psychoanalytic
 investigations propounded by J. Breuer and myself in 1893, which we
 called the "cathartic" treatment.
 
 I must repeat what I have said in my published work, that these
 psychoneuroses, as far as my experience goes, are based on sexual motive
 powers. I do not mean that the energy of the sexual impulse merely
 contributes to the forces supporting the morbid manifestations
 (symptoms), but I wish distinctly to maintain that this supplies the
 only constant and the most important source of energy in the neurosis,
 so that the sexual life of such persons manifests itself either
 exclusively, preponderately, or partially in these symptoms. As I have
 already stated in different places, the symptoms are the sexual
 activities of the patient. The proof for this assertion I have obtained
 from the psychoanalysis of hysterics and other neurotics during a period
 of twenty years, the results of which I hope to give later in a detailed
 account.
 
 Psychoanalysis removes the symptoms of hysteria on the supposition that
 they are the substitutes--the transcriptions as it were--for a series of
 emotionally accentuated psychic processes, wishes, and desires, to which
 a passage for their discharge through the conscious psychic activities
 has been cut off by a special process (repression). These thought
 formations which are restrained in the state of the unconscious strive
 for expression, that is, for _discharge_, in conformity to their
 affective value, and find such in hysteria through a process of
 _conversion_ into somatic phenomena--the hysterical symptoms. If, _lege
 artis_, and with the aid of a special technique, retrogressive
 transformations of the symptoms into the affectful and conscious
 thoughts can be effected, it then becomes possible to get the most
 accurate information about the nature and origin of these previously
 unconscious psychic formations.
 
 *Results of Psychoanalysis.*--In this manner it has been discovered that
 the symptoms represent the equivalent for the strivings which received
 their strength from the source of the sexual impulse. This fully concurs
 with what we know of the character of hysterics, which we have taken as
 models for all psycho-neurotics, before they have become diseased, and
 with what we know concerning the causes of the disease. The hysterical
 character evinces a part of sexual repression which reaches beyond the
 normal limits, an exaggeration of the resistances against the sexual
 impulse which we know as shame and loathing. It is an instinctive flight
 from intellectual occupation with the sexual problem, the consequence of
 which in pronounced cases is a complete sexual ignorance, which is
 preserved till the age of sexual maturity is attained.[24]
 
 This feature, so characteristic of hysteria, is not seldom concealed in
 crude observation by the existence of the second constitutional factor
 of hysteria, namely, the enormous development of the sexual craving. But
 the psychological analysis will always reveal it and solves the very
 contradictory enigma of hysteria by proving the existence of the
 contrasting pair, an immense sexual desire and a very exaggerated sexual
 rejection.
 
 The provocation of the disease in hysterically predisposed persons is
 brought about if in consequence of their progressive maturity or
 external conditions of life they are earnestly confronted with the real
 sexual demand. Between the pressure of the craving and the opposition of
 the sexual rejection an outlet for the disease results, which does not
 remove the conflict but seeks to elude it by transforming the libidinous
 strivings into symptoms. It is an exception only in appearance if a
 hysterical person, say a man, becomes subject to some banal emotional
 disturbance, to a conflict in the center of which there is no sexual
 interest. Psychoanalysis will regularly show that it is the sexual
 components of the conflict which make the disease possible by
 withdrawing the psychic processes from normal adjustment.
 
 *Neurosis and Perversion.*--A great part of the opposition to my
 assertion is explained by the fact that the sexuality from which I
 deduce the psychoneurotic symptoms is thought of as coincident with the
 normal sexual impulse. But psychoanalysis teaches us better than this.
 It shows that the symptoms do not by any means result at the expense
 only of the so called normal sexual impulse (at least not exclusively or
 preponderately), but they represent the converted expression of impulses
 which in a broader sense might be designated as _perverse_ if they could
 manifest themselves directly in phantasies and acts without deviating
 from consciousness. The symptoms are therefore partially formed at the
 cost of abnormal sexuality. _The neurosis is, so to say, the negative of
 the perversion._[25]
 
 The sexual impulse of the psychoneurotic shows all the aberrations which
 we have studied as variations of the normal and as manifestations of
 morbid sexual life.
 
 (_a_) In all the neurotics without exception we find feelings of inversion
 in the unconscious psychic life, fixation of libido on persons of the
 same sex. It is impossible, without a deep and searching discussion,
 adequately to appreciate the significance of this factor for the
 formation of the picture of the disease; I can only assert that the
 unconscious propensity to inversion is never wanting and is particularly
 of immense service in explaining male hysteria.[26]
 
 (_b_) All the inclinations to anatomical transgression can be demonstrated
 in psychoneurotics in the unconscious and as symptom-creators. Of
 special frequency and intensity are those which impart to the mouth and
 the mucous membrane of the anus the role of genitals.
 
 (_c_) The partial desires which usually appear in contrasting pairs play
 a very prominent role among the symptom-creators in the psychoneuroses.
 We have learned to know them as carriers of new sexual aims, such as
 peeping mania, exhibitionism, and the actively and passively formed
 impulses of cruelty. The contribution of the last is indispensable for
 the understanding of the morbid nature of the symptoms; it almost
 regularly controls some portion of the social behavior of the patient.
 The transformation of love into hatred, of tenderness into hostility,
 which is characteristic of a large number of neurotic cases and
 apparently of all cases of paranoia, takes place by means of the union
 of cruelty with the libido.
 
 The interest in these deductions will be more heightened by certain
 peculiarities of the diagnosis of facts.
 
 Alpha. There is nothing in the unconscious streams of thought of
 the neuroses which would correspond to an inclination towards fetichism;
 a circumstance which throws light on the psychological peculiarity of
 this well understood perversion.
 
 Beta. Wherever any such impulse is found in the unconscious which
 can be paired with a contrasting one, it can regularly be demonstrated
 that the latter, too, is effective. Every active perversion is here
 accompanied by its passive counterpart. He who in the unconscious is an
 exhibitionist is at the same time a voyeur, he who suffers from sadistic
 feelings as a result of repression will also show another reinforcement
 of the symptoms from the source of masochistic tendencies. The perfect
 concurrence with the behavior of the corresponding positive perversions
 is certainly very noteworthy. In the picture of the disease, however,
 the preponderant role is played by either one or the other of the
 opposing tendencies.
 
 Gamma. In a pronounced case of psychoneurosis we seldom find the
 development of one single perverted impulse; usually there are many and
 regularly there are traces of all perversions. The individual impulse,
 however, on account of its intensity, is independent of the development
 of the others, but the study of the positive perversions gives us the
 accurate counterpart to it.
 
 
 PARTIAL IMPULSES AND EROGENOUS ZONES
 
 Keeping in mind what we have learned from the examination of the
 positive and negative perversions, it becomes quite obvious that they
 can be referred to a number of "partial impulses," which are not,
 however, primary but are subject to further analysis. By an "impulse" we
 can understand in the first place nothing but the psychic representative
 of a continually flowing internal somatic source of excitement, in
 contradistinction to the "stimulus" which is produced by isolated
 excitements coming from without. The impulse is thus one of the concepts
 marking the limits between the psychic and the physical. The simplest
 and most obvious assumption concerning the nature of the impulses would
 be that in themselves they possess no quality but are only taken into
 account as a measure of the demand for effort in the psychic life. What
 distinguishes the impulses from one another and furnishes them with
 specific attributes is their relation to their somatic _sources_ and to
 their _aims_. The source of the impulse is an exciting process in an
 organ, and the immediate aim of the impulse lies in the elimination of
 this organic stimulus.
 
 Another preliminary assumption in the theory of the impulse which we
 cannot relinquish, states that the bodily organs furnish two kinds of
 excitements which are determined by differences of a chemical nature.
 One of these forms of excitement we designate as the specifically sexual
 and the concerned organ as the _erogenous zone_, while the sexual
 element emanating from it is the partial impulse.[27]
 
 In the perversions which claim sexual significance for the oral cavity
 and the anal opening the part played by the erogenous zone is quite
 obvious. It behaves in every way like a part of the sexual apparatus. In
 hysteria these parts of the body, as well as the tracts of mucous
 membrane proceeding from them, become the seat of new sensations and
 innervating changes in a manner similar to the real genitals when under
 the excitement of normal sexual processes.
 
 The significance of the erogenous zones in the psychoneuroses, as
 additional apparatus and substitutes for the genitals, appears to be
 most prominent in hysteria though that does not signify that it is of
 lesser validity in the other morbid forms. It is not so recognizable in
 compulsion neurosis and paranoia because here the symptom formation
 takes place in regions of the psychic apparatus which lie at a great
 distance from the central locations for bodily control. The more
 remarkable thing in the compulsion neurosis is the significance of the
 impulses which create new sexual aims and appear independently of the
 erogenous zones. Nevertheless, the eye corresponds to an erogenous zone
 in the looking and exhibition mania, while the skin takes on the same
 part in the pain and cruelty components of the sexual impulse. The skin,
 which in special parts of the body becomes differentiated as sensory
 organs and modified by the mucous membrane, is the erogenous zone,
 [Greek: kat] ex ogen.[28]
 
 
 EXPLANATION OF THE MANIFEST PREPONDERANCE OF SEXUAL PERVERSIONS IN THE
 PSYCHONEUROSES
 
 The sexuality of psychoneurotics has perhaps been placed in a false
 light by the above discussions. It appears that the sexual behavior of
 the psychoneurotic approaches in predisposition to the pervert and
 deviates by just so much from the normal. Nevertheless, it is very
 possible that the constitutional disposition of these patients besides
 containing an immense amount of sexual repression and a predominant
 force of sexual impulse also possesses an unusual tendency to
 perversions in the broadest sense. However, an examination of milder
 cases shows that the last assumption is not an absolute requisite, or at
 least that in pronouncing judgment on the morbid effects one ought to
 discount the effect of one of the factors. In most psychoneurotics the
 disease first appears after puberty following the demands of the normal
 sexual life. Against these the repression above all directs itself. Or
 the disease comes on later, owing to the fact that the libido is unable
 to attain normal sexual gratification. In both cases the libido behaves
 like a stream the principal bed of which is dammed; it fills the
 collateral roads which until now perhaps have been empty. Thus the
 manifestly great (though to be sure negative) tendency to perversion in
 psychoneurotics may be collaterally conditioned; at any rate, it is
 certainly collaterally increased. The fact of the matter is that the
 sexual repression has to be added as an inner factor to such external
 ones as restriction of freedom, inaccessibility to the normal sexual
 object, dangers of the normal sexual act, etc., which cause the origin
 of perversions in individuals who might have otherwise remained normal.
 
 In individual cases of neurosis the behavior may be different; now the
 congenital force of the tendency to perversion may be more decisive and
 at other times more influence may be exerted by the collateral increase
 of the same through the deviation of the libido from the normal sexual
 aim and object. It would be unjust to construe a contrast where a
 cooperation exists. The greatest results will always be brought about by
 a neurosis if constitution and experience cooperate in the same
 direction. A pronounced constitution may perhaps be able to dispense
 with the assistance of daily impressions, while a profound disturbance
 in life may perhaps bring on a neurosis even in an average constitution.
 These views similarly hold true in the etiological significance
 of the congenital and the accidental experiences in other spheres.
 
 If, however, preference is given to the assumption that an especially
 formed tendency to perversions is characteristic of the psychoneurotic
 constitution, there is a prospect of being able to distinguish a
 multiformity of such constitutions in accordance with the congenital
 preponderance of this or that erogenous zone, or of this or that partial
 impulse. Whether there is a special relationship between the
 predisposition to perversions and the selection of the morbid picture
 has not, like many other things in this realm, been investigated.
 
 
 REFERENCE TO THE INFANTILISM OF SEXUALITY
 
 By demonstrating the perverted feelings as symptomatic formations in
 psychoneurotics, we have enormously increased the number of persons who
 can be added to the perverts. This is not only because neurotics
 represent a very large proportion of humanity, but we must consider also
 that the neuroses in all their gradations run in an uninterrupted series
 to the normal state. Moebius was quite justified in saying that we are
 all somewhat hysterical. Hence, the very wide dissemination of
 perversions urged us to assume that the predisposition to perversions is
 no rare peculiarity but must form a part of the normally accepted
 constitution.
 
 We have heard that it is a question whether perversions should be
 referred to congenital determinations or whether they originate from
 accidental experiences, just as Binet showed in fetichisms. Now we are
 forced to the conclusion that there is indeed something congenital at
 the basis of perversions, but it is something _which is congenital in
 all persons_, which as a predisposition may fluctuate in intensity and
 is brought into prominence by influences of life. We deal here with
 congenital roots in the constitution of the sexual impulse which in one
 series of cases develop into real carriers of sexual activity
 (perverts); while in other cases they undergo an insufficient
 suppression (repression), so that as morbid symptoms they are enabled to
 attract to themselves in a round-about way a considerable part of the
 sexual energy; while again in favorable cases between the two extremes
 they originate the normal sexual life through effective restrictions and
 other elaborations.
 
 But we must also remember that the assumed constitution which shows the
 roots of all perversions will be demonstrable only in the child, though
 all impulses can be manifested in it only in moderate intensity. If we
 are led to suppose that neurotics conserve the infantile state of their
 sexuality or return to it, our interest must then turn to the sexual
 life of the child, and we will then follow the play of influences which
 control the processes of development of the infantile sexuality up to
 its termination in a perversion, a neurosis or a normal sexual life.
 
 [1] The facts contained in the first "Contribution" have been gathered
 from the familiar publications of Krafft-Ebing, Moll, Moebius, Havelock
 Ellis, Schrenk-Notzing, Loewenfeld, Eulenberg, J. Bloch, and M.
 Hirschfeld, and from the later works published in the "Jahrbuch fuer
 sexuelle Zwischenstufen." As these publications also mention the other
 literature bearing on this subject I may forbear giving detailed
 references.
 
 The conclusions reached through the investigation of sexual inverts are
 all based on the reports of J. Sadger and on my own experience.
 
 [2] For general use the word "libido" is best translated by "craving."
 (Prof. James J. Putnam, Journal of Abnormal Psychology, Vol. IV, 6.)
 
 [3] For the difficulties entailed in the attempt to ascertain the
 proportional number of inverts compare the work of M. Hirschfeld in the
 Jahrbuch fuer sexuelle Zwischenstufen, 1904. Cf. also Brill, The
 Conception of Homosexuality, Journal of the A.M.A., August 2, 1913.
 
 [4] Such a striving against the compulsion to inversion favors cures by
 suggestion of psychoanalysis.
 
 [5] Many have justly emphasized the fact that the autobiographic
 statements of inverts, as to the time of the appearance of their
 tendency to inversion, are untrustworthy as they may have repressed from
 memory any evidences of heterosexual feelings.
 
 Psychoanalysis has confirmed this suspicion in all cases of inversion
 accessible, and has decidedly changed their anamnesis by filling up the
 infantile amnesias.
 
 [6] With what reserve the diagnosis of degeneration should be made and
 what slight practical significance can be attributed to it can be
 gathered from the discussions of Moebius (Ueber Entartung; Grenzfragen
 des Nerven- und Seelenlebens, No. III, 1900). He says: "If we review the
 wide sphere of degeneration upon which we have here turned some light we
 can conclude without further ado that it is really of little value to
 diagnose degeneration."
 
 [7] We must agree with the spokesman of "Uranism" that some of the most
 prominent men known have been inverts and perhaps absolute inverts.
 
 [8] In the conception of inversion the pathological features have been
 Separated from the anthropological. For this credit is due to I. Bloch
 (Beitraege zur Aetiologie der Psychopathia Sexualis, 2 Teile, 1902-3), who
 has also brought into prominence the existence of inversion in the old
 civilized nations.
 
 [9] Compare the last detailed discussion of somatic hermaphroditism
 (Taruffi, Hermaphroditismus und Zeugungsunfaehigkeit, German edit. by R.
 Teuscher, 1903), and the works of Neugebauer in many volumes of the
 Jahrbuch fuer sexuelle Zwischenstufen.
 
 [10] J. Halban, "Die Entstehung der Geschlechtscharaktere," Arch. fuer
 Gynaekologie, Bd. 70, 1903. See also there the literature on the subject.
 
 [11] According to a report in Vol. 6 of the Jahrbuch f. sexuelle
 Zwischenstufen, E. Gley is supposed to have been the first to mention
 bisexuality as an explanation of inversion. He published a paper (Les
 Aberrations de l'instinct Sexuel) in the Revue Philosophique as early as
 January, 1884. It is moreover noteworthy that the majority of authors
 who trace the inversion to bisexuality assume this factor not only for
 the inverts but also for those who have developed normally, and justly
 interpret the inversion as a result of a disturbance in development.
 Among these authors are Chevalier (Inversion Sexuelle, 1893), and v.
 Krafft-Ebing ("Zur Erklaerung der kontraeren Sexualempfindung," Jahrbuecher
 f. Psychiatrie u. Nervenheilkunde, XIII), who states that there are a
 number of observations "from which at least the virtual and continued
 existence of this second center (of the underlying sex) results." A Dr.
 Arduin (Die Frauenfrage und die sexuellen Zwischenstufen, 2d vol. of the
 Jahrbuch f. sexuelle Zwischenstufen, 1900) states that "in every man
 there exist male and female elements." See also the same Jahrbuch, Bd.
 I, 1899 ("Die objektive Diagnose der Homosexualitat," by M. Hirschfeld,
 pp. 8-9). In the determination of sex, as far as heterosexual persons
 are concerned, some are disproportionately more strongly developed than
 others. G. Herman is firm in his belief "that in every woman there are
 male, and in every man there are female germs and qualities" (Genesis,
 das Gesetz der Zeugung, 9 Bd., Libido und Manie, 1903). As recently as
 1906 W. Fliess (Der Ablauf des Lebens) has claimed ownership of the idea
 of bisexuality (in the sense of double sex). Psychoanalytic
 investigation very strongly opposes the attempt to separate homosexuals
 from other persons as a group of a special nature. By also studying
 sexual excitations other than the manifestly open ones it discovers that
 all men are capable of homosexual object selection and actually
 accomplish this in the unconscious. Indeed the attachments of libidinous
 feelings to persons of the same sex play no small role as factors in
 normal psychic life, and as causative factors of disease they play a
 greater role than those belonging to the opposite sex. According to
 psychoanalysis, it rather seems that it is the independence of the
 object, selection of the sex of the object, the same free disposal over
 male and female objects, as observed in childhood, in primitive states
 and in prehistoric times, which forms the origin from which the normal
 as well as the inversion types developed, following restrictions in this
 or that direction. In the psychoanalytic sense the exclusive sexual
 interest of the man for the woman is also a problem requiring an
 explanation, and is not something that is self-evident and explainable
 on the basis of chemical attraction. The determination as to the
 definite sexual behavior does not occur until after puberty and is the
 result of a series of as yet not observable factors, some of which are
 of a constitutional, while some are of an accidental nature. Certainly
 some of these factors can turn out to be so enormous that by their
 character they influence the result. In general, however, the
 multiplicity of the determining factors is reflected by the manifoldness
 of the outcomes in the manifest sexual behavior of the person. In the
 inversion types it can be ascertained that they are altogether
 controlled by an archaic constitution and by primitive psychic
 mechanisms. The importance of the _narcissistic object selection_ and
 the _clinging_ to the erotic significance of the _anal_ zone seem to be
 their most essential characteristics. But one gains nothing by
 separating the most extreme inversion types from the others on the basis
 of such constitutional peculiarities. What is found in the latter as
 seemingly an adequate determinant can also be demonstrated only in
 lesser force in the constitution of transitional types and in manifestly
 normal persons. The differences in the results may be of a qualitative
 nature, but analysis shows that the differences in the determinants are
 only quantitative. As a remarkable factor among the accidental
 influences of the object selection, we found the sexual rejection or the
 early sexual intimidation, and our attention was also called to the fact
 that the existence of both parents plays an important role in the
 child's life. The disappearance of a strong father in childhood not
 infrequently favors the inversion. Finally, one might demand that the
 inversion of the sexual object should notionally be strictly separated
 from the mixing of the sex characteristics in the subject. A certain
 amount of independence is unmistakable also in this relation.
 
 [12] Although psychoanalysis has not yet given us a full explanation for
 the origin of inversion, it has revealed the psychic mechanism of its
 genesis and has essentially enriched the problems in question. In all
 the cases examined we have ascertained that the later inverts go through
 in their childhood a phase of very intense but short-lived fixation on
 the woman (usually on the mother) and after overcoming it they identify
 themselves with the woman and take themselves as the sexual object; that
 is, proceeding on a narcissistic basis, they look for young men
 resembling themselves in persons whom they wish to love as their mother
 has loved them. We have, moreover, frequently found that alleged inverts
 are by no means indifferent to the charms of women, but the excitation
 evoked by the woman is always transferred to a male object. They thus
 repeat through life the mechanism which gave origin to their inversion.
 Their obsessive striving for the man proves to be determined by their
 restless flight from the woman.
 
 [13] The most pronounced difference between the sexual life
 (Liebesleben) of antiquity and ours lies in the fact that the ancients
 placed the emphasis on the impulse itself, while we put it on its
 object. The ancients extolled the impulse and were ready to ennoble
 through it even an inferior object, while we disparage the activity of
 the impulse as such and only countenance it on account of the merits of
 the object.
 
 [14] I must mention here that the blind obedience evinced by the
 hypnotized subject to the hypnotist causes me to think that the nature
 of hypnosis is to be found in the unconscious fixation of the libido on
 the person of the hypnotizer (by means of the masochistic component of
 the sexual impulse).
 
 Ferenczi connects this character of suggestibility with the "parent
 complex" (Jahrbuch fuer Psychoanalytische und psychopathologische
 Forschungen, I, 1909).
 
 [15] Moreover, it is to be noted that sexual overvaluation does not
 become pronounced in all mechanisms of object selection, and that we
 shall later learn to know another and more direct explanation for the
 sexual role of the other parts of the body.
 
 [16] Further investigations lead to the conclusion that I. Bloch has
 overestimated the factor of excitement-hunger (Reizhunger). The various
 roads upon which the libido moves behave to each other from the very
 beginning like communicating pipes; the factor of collateral streaming
 must also be considered.
 
 [17] This weakness corresponds to the constitutional predisposition. The
 early sexual intimidation which pushes the person away from the normal
 sexual aim and urges him to seek a substitute, has been demonstrated by
 psychoanalysis, as an accidental determinant.
 
 [18] The shoe or slipper is accordingly a symbol for the female
 genitals.
 
 [19] Psychoanalysis has filled up the gap in the understanding of
 fetichisms by showing that the selection of the fetich depends on a
 coprophilic smell-desire which has been lost by repression. Feet and
 hair are strong smelling objects which are raised to fetiches after the
 renouncing of the now unpleasant sensation of smell. Accordingly, only
 the filthy and ill-smelling foot is the sexual object in the perversion
 which corresponds to the foot fetichism. Another contribution to the
 explanation of the fetichistic preference of the foot is found in the
 Infantile Sexual Theories (see later). The foot replaces the penis which
 is so much missed in the woman. In some cases of foot fetichism it could
 be shown that the desire for looking originally directed to the
 genitals, which wished to reach its object from below, was stopped on
 the way by prohibition and repression, and therefore adhered to the foot
 or shoe as a fetich. In conformity with infantile expectation, the
 female genital was hereby imagined as a male genital.
 
 [20] I have no doubt that the conception of the "beautiful" is rooted in
 the soil of sexual excitement and originally signified the sexual
 excitant. The more remarkable, therefore, is the fact that the genitals,
 the sight of which provokes the greatest sexual excitement, can really
 never be considered "beautiful."
 
 [21] Cf. here the later communication on the pregenital phases of the
 sexual development, in which this view is confirmed. See below,
 "Ambivalence."
 
 [22] Instead of substantiating this statement by many examples I will
 merely cite Havelock Ellis (The Sexual Impulse, 1903): "All known cases
 of sadism and masochism, even those cited by v. Krafft-Ebing, always
 show (as has already been shown by Colin, Scott, and Fere) traces of
 both groups of manifestations in the same individual."
 
 [23] On the other hand the restricting forces of the sexual
 evolution--disgust, shame, morality--must also be looked upon as
 historic precipitates of the outer inhibitions which the sexual impulse
 experienced in the psychogenesis of humanity. One can observe that they
 appear in their time during the development of the individual almost
 spontaneously at the call of education and influence.
 
 [24] Studien ueber Hysterie, 1895, J. Breuer tells of the patient on whom
 he first practiced the cathartic method: "The sexual factor was
 surprisingly undeveloped."
 
 [25] The well-known fancies of perverts which under favorable conditions
 are changed into contrivances, the delusional fears of paranoiacs which
 are in a hostile manner projected on others, and the unconscious fancies
 of hysterics which are discovered in their symptoms by psychoanalysis,
 agree as to content in the minutest details.
 
 [26] A psychoneurosis very often associates itself with a manifest
 inversion in which the heterosexual feeling becomes subjected to
 complete repression.--It is but just to state that the necessity of a
 general recognition of the tendency to inversion in psychoneurotics was
 first imparted to me personally by Wilh. Fliess, of Berlin, after I had
 myself discovered it in some cases.
 
 [27] It is not easy to justify here this assumption which was taken from
 a definite class of neurotic diseases. On the other hand, it would be
 impossible to assert anything definite concerning the impulses if one
 did not take the trouble of mentioning these presuppositions.
 
 [28] One should here think of Moll's assertion, who divides the sexual
 impulse into the impulses of contrectation and detumescence.
 Contrectation signifies a desire to touch the skin.
 
 
 
 
 II
 
 THE INFANTILE SEXUALITY
 
 
 It is a part of popular belief about the sexual impulse that it is
 absent in childhood and that it first appears in the period of life
 known as puberty. This, though a common error, is serious in its
 consequences and is chiefly due to our present ignorance of the
 fundamental principles of the sexual life. A comprehensive study of the
 sexual manifestations of childhood would probably reveal to us the
 existence of the essential features of the sexual impulse, and would
 make us acquainted with its development and its composition from various
 sources.
 
 *The Neglect of the Infantile.*--It is remarkable that those writers who
 endeavor to explain the qualities and reactions of the adult individual
 have given so much more attention to the ancestral period than to the
 period of the individual's own existence--that is, they have attributed
 more influence to heredity than to childhood. As a matter of fact, it
 might well be supposed that the influence of the latter period would be
 easier to understand, and that it would be entitled to more
 consideration than heredity.[1] To be sure, one occasionally finds in
 medical literature notes on the premature sexual activities of small
 children, about erections and masturbation and even actions resembling
 coitus, but these are referred to merely as exceptional occurrences, as
 curiosities, or as deterring examples of premature perversity. No author
 has to my knowledge recognized the normality of the sexual impulse in
 childhood, and in the numerous writings on the development of the child
 the chapter on "Sexual Development" is usually passed over.[2]
 
 *Infantile Amnesia.*--This remarkable negligence is due partly to
 conventional considerations, which influence the writers on account of
 their own bringing up, and partly to a psychic phenomenon which has thus
 far remained unexplained. I refer to the peculiar amnesia which veils
 from most people (not from all!) the first years of their childhood,
 usually the first six or eight years. So far it has not occurred to us
 that this amnesia ought to surprise us, though we have good reasons for
 surprise. For we are informed that in those years from which we later
 obtain nothing except a few incomprehensible memory fragments, we have
 vividly reacted to impressions, that we have manifested pain and
 pleasure like any human being, that we have evinced love, jealousy, and
 other passions as they then affected us; indeed we are told that we have
 uttered remarks which proved to grown-ups that we possessed
 understanding and a budding power of judgment. Still we know nothing of
 all this when we become older. Why does our memory lag behind all our
 other psychic activities? We really have reason to believe that at no
 time of life are we more capable of impressions and reproductions than
 during the years of childhood.[3]
 
 On the other hand we must assume, or we may convince ourselves through
 psychological observations on others, that the very impressions which we
 have forgotten have nevertheless left the deepest traces in our psychic
 life, and acted as determinants for our whole future development. We
 conclude therefore that we do not deal with a real forgetting of
 infantile impressions but rather with an amnesia similar to that
 observed in neurotics for later experiences, the nature of which
 consists in their being detained from consciousness (repression). But
 what forces bring about this repression of the infantile impressions? He
 who can solve this riddle will also explain hysterical amnesia.
 
 We shall not, however, hesitate to assert that the existence of the
 infantile amnesia gives us a new point of comparison between the psychic
 states of the child and those of the psychoneurotic. We have already
 encountered another point of comparison when confronted by the fact that
 the sexuality of the psychoneurotic preserves the infantile character or
 has returned to it. May there not be an ultimate connection between the
 infantile and the hysterical amnesias?
 
 The connection between the infantile and the hysterical amnesias is
 really more than a mere play of wit. The hysterical amnesia which serves
 the repression can only be explained by the fact that the individual
 already possesses a sum of recollections which have been withdrawn from
 conscious disposal and which by associative connection now seize that
 which is acted upon by the repelling forces of the repression emanating
 from consciousness.[4] We may say that without infantile amnesia there
 would be no hysterical amnesia.
 
 I believe that the infantile amnesia which causes the individual to look
 upon his childhood as if it were a _prehistoric_ time and conceals from
 him the beginning of his own sexual life--that this amnesia is
 responsible for the fact that one does not usually attribute any value
 to the infantile period in the development of the sexual life. One
 single observer cannot fill the gap which has been thus produced in our
 knowledge. As early as 1896 I had already emphasized the significance of
 childhood for the origin of certain important phenomena connected with
 the sexual life, and since then I have not ceased to put into the
 foreground the importance of the infantile factor for sexuality.
 
 
 THE SEXUAL LATENCY PERIOD OF CHILDHOOD AND ITS INTERRUPTIONS
 
 The extraordinary frequent discoveries of apparently abnormal and
 exceptional sexual manifestations in childhood, as well as the
 discovery of infantile reminiscences in neurotics, which were hitherto
 unconscious, allow us to sketch the following picture of the sexual
 behavior of childhood.[5]
 
 It seems certain that the newborn child brings with it the germs of
 sexual feelings which continue to develop for some time and then succumb
 to a progressive suppression, which is in turn broken through by the
 proper advances of the sexual development and which can be checked by
 individual idiosyncrasies. Nothing is known concerning the laws and
 periodicity of this oscillating course of development. It seems,
 however, that the sexual life of the child mostly manifests itself in
 the third or fourth year in some form accessible to observation.[6]
 
 *The Sexual Inhibition.*--It is during this period of total or at least
 partial latency that the psychic forces develop which later act as
 inhibitions on the sexual life, and narrow its direction like dams.
 These psychic forces are loathing, shame, and moral and esthetic ideal
 demands. We may gain the impression that the erection of these dams in
 the civilized child is the work of education; and surely education
 contributes much to it. In reality, however, this development is
 organically determined and can occasionally be produced without the help
 of education. Indeed education remains properly within its assigned
 realm only if it strictly follows the path of the organic determinant
 and impresses it somewhat cleaner and deeper.
 
 *Reaction Formation and Sublimation.*--What are the means that
 accomplish these very important constructions so significant for the
 later personal culture and normality? They are probably brought about at
 the cost of the infantile sexuality itself, the influx of which has not
 stopped even in this latency period--the energy of which indeed has been
 turned away either wholly or partially from sexual utilization and
 conducted to other aims. The historians of civilization seem to be
 unanimous in the opinion that such deviation of sexual motive powers
 from sexual aims to new aims, a process which merits the name of
 _sublimation_, has furnished powerful components for all cultural
 accomplishments. We will therefore add that the same process acts in the
 development of every individual, and that it begins to act in the sexual
 latency period.[7]
 
 We can also venture an opinion about the mechanisms of such sublimation.
 The sexual feelings of these infantile years on the one hand could not
 be utilizable, since the procreating functions are postponed,--this is
 the chief character of the latency period; on the other hand, they would
 in themselves be perverse, as they would emanate from erogenous zones
 and would be born of impulses which in the individual's course of
 development could only evoke a feeling of displeasure. They therefore
 awaken contrary forces (feelings of reaction), which in order to
 suppress such displeasure, build up the above mentioned psychic dams:
 loathing, shame, and morality.[8]
 
 *The Interruptions of the Latency Period.*--Without deluding ourselves
 as to the hypothetical nature and deficient clearness of our
 understanding regarding the infantile period of latency and delay, we
 will return to reality and state that such a utilization of the
 infantile sexuality represents an ideal bringing up from which the
 development of the individual usually deviates in some measure and often
 very considerably. A portion of the sexual manifestation which has
 withdrawn from sublimation occasionally breaks through, or a sexual
 activity remains throughout the whole duration of the latency period
 until the reinforced breaking through of the sexual impulse in puberty.
 In so far as they have paid any attention to infantile sexuality the
 educators behave as if they shared our views concerning the formation of
 the moral forces of defence at the cost of sexuality, and as if they
 knew that sexual activity makes the child uneducable; for the educators
 consider all sexual manifestations of the child as an "evil" in the face
 of which little can be accomplished. We have, however, every reason for
 directing our attention to those phenomena so much feared by the
 educators, for we expect to find in them the solution of the primitive
 formation of the sexual impulse.
 
 
 THE MANIFESTATIONS OF THE INFANTILE SEXUALITY
 
 For reasons which we shall discuss later we will take as a model of the
 infantile sexual manifestations thumbsucking (pleasure-sucking), to
 which the Hungarian pediatrist, Lindner, has devoted an excellent
 essay.[9]
 
 *Thumbsucking.*--Thumbsucking, which manifests itself in the nursing
 baby and which may be continued till maturity or throughout life,
 consists in a rhythmic repetition of sucking contact with the mouth (the
 lips), wherein the purpose of taking nourishment is excluded. A part of
 the lip itself, the tongue, which is another preferable skin region
 within reach, and even the big toe--may be taken as objects for sucking.
 Simultaneously, there is also a desire to grasp things, which manifests
 itself in a rhythmical pulling of the ear lobe and which may cause the
 child to grasp a part of another person (generally the ear) for the same
 purpose. The pleasure-sucking is connected with an entire exhaustion of
 attention and leads to sleep or even to a motor reaction in the form of
 an orgasm.[10] Pleasure-sucking is often combined with a rubbing contact
 with certain sensitive parts of the body, such as the breast and
 external genitals. It is by this road that many children go from
 thumb-sucking to masturbation.
 
 Lindner himself has recognized the sexual nature of this action and
 openly emphasized it. In the nursery thumbsucking is often treated in
 the same way as any other sexual "naughtiness" of the child. A very
 strong objection was raised against this view by many pediatrists and
 neurologists which in part is certainly due to the confusion of the
 terms "sexual" and "genital." This contradiction raises the difficult
 question, which cannot be rejected, namely, in what general traits do we
 wish to recognize the sexual manifestations of the child. I believe that
 the association of the manifestations into which we gained an insight
 through psychoanalytic investigation justify us in claiming thumbsucking
 as a sexual activity and in studying through it the essential features
 of the infantile sexual activity.
 
 *Autoerotism.*--It is our duty here to arrange this state of affairs
 differently. Let us insist that the most striking character of this
 sexual activity is that the impulse is not directed against other
 persons but that it gratifies itself on its own body; to use the happy
 term invented by Havelock Ellis, we will say that it is autoerotic.[11]
 
 It is, moreover, clear that the action of the thumbsucking child is
 determined by the fact that it seeks a pleasure which has already been
 experienced and is now remembered. Through the rhythmic sucking on a
 portion of the skin or mucous membrane it finds the gratification in the
 simplest way. It is also easy to conjecture on what occasions the child
 first experienced this pleasure which it now strives to renew. The first
 and most important activity in the child's life, the sucking from the
 mother's breast (or its substitute), must have acquainted it with this
 pleasure. We would say that the child's lips behaved like an _erogenous
 zone_, and that the excitement through the warm stream of milk was
 really the cause of the pleasurable sensation. To be sure, the
 gratification of the erogenous zone was at first united with the
 gratification of taking nourishment. He who sees a satiated child sink
 back from the mother's breast, and fall asleep with reddened cheeks and
 blissful smile, will have to admit that this picture remains as typical
 of the expression of sexual gratification in later life. But the desire
 for repetition of the sexual gratification is separated from the desire
 for taking nourishment; a separation which becomes unavoidable with the
 appearance of the teeth when the nourishment is no longer sucked in but
 chewed. The child does not make use of a strange object for sucking but
 prefers its own skin because it is more convenient, because it thus
 makes itself independent of the outer world which it cannot yet control,
 and because in this way it creates for itself, as it were, a second,
 even if an inferior, erogenous zone. The inferiority of this second
 region urges it later to seek the same parts, the lips of another
 person. ("It is a pity that I cannot kiss myself," might be attributed
 to it.)
 
 Not all children suck their thumbs. It may be assumed that it is found
 only in children in whom the erogenous significance of the lip-zone is
 constitutionally reenforced. Children in whom this is retained are
 habitual kissers as adults and show a tendency to perverse kissing, or
 as men they have a marked desire for drinking and smoking. But if
 repression comes into play they experience disgust for eating and evince
 hysterical vomiting. By virtue of the community of the lip-zone the
 repression encroaches upon the impulse of nourishment. Many of my female
 patients showing disturbances in eating, such as hysterical globus,
 choking sensations, and vomiting, have been energetic thumbsuckers
 during infancy.
 
 In the thumbsucking or pleasure-sucking we have already been able to
 observe the three essential characters of an infantile sexual
 manifestation. The latter has its origin in conjunction with a bodily
 function which is very important for life, it does not yet know any
 sexual object, it is _autoerotic_ and its sexual aim is under the
 control of an _erogenous zone_. Let us assume for the present that these
 characters also hold true for most of the other activities of the
 infantile sexual impulse.
 
 
 THE SEXUAL AIM OF THE INFANTILE SEXUALITY
 
 *The Characters of the Erogenous Zones.*--From the example of
 thumbsucking we may gather a great many points useful for the
 distinguishing of an erogenous zone. It is a portion of skin or mucous
 membrane in which the stimuli produce a feeling of pleasure of definite
 quality. There is no doubt that the pleasure-producing stimuli are
 governed by special determinants which we do not know. The rhythmic
 characters must play some part in them and this strongly suggests an
 analogy to tickling. It does not, however, appear so certain whether the
 character of the pleasurable feeling evoked by the stimulus can be
 designated as "peculiar," and in what part of this peculiarity the
 sexual factor exists. Psychology is still groping in the dark when it
 concerns matters of pleasure and pain, and the most cautious assumption
 is therefore the most advisable. We may perhaps later come upon reasons
 which seem to support the peculiar quality of the sensation of pleasure.
 
 The erogenous quality may adhere most notably to definite regions of the
 body. As is shown by the example of thumbsucking, there are predestined
 erogenous zones. But the same example also shows that any other region
 of skin or mucous membrane may assume the function of an erogenous zone;
 it must therefore carry along a certain adaptability. The production of
 the sensation of pleasure therefore depends more on the quality of the
 stimulus than on the nature of the bodily region. The thumbsucking child
 looks around on his body and selects any portion of it for
 pleasure-sucking, and becoming accustomed to it, he then prefers it. If
 he accidentally strikes upon a predestined region, such as breast,
 nipple or genitals, it naturally has the preference. A quite analogous
 tendency to displacement is again found in the symptomatology of
 hysteria. In this neurosis the repression mostly concerns the genital
 zones proper; these in turn transmit their excitation to the other
 erogenous zones, usually dormant in mature life, which then behave
 exactly like genitals. But besides this, just as in thumbsucking, any
 other region of the body may become endowed with the excitation of the
 genitals and raised to an erogenous zone. Erogenous and hysterogenous
 zones show the same characters.[12]
 
 *The Infantile Sexual Aim.*--The sexual aim of the infantile impulse
 consists in the production of gratification through the proper
 excitation of this or that selected erogenous zone. In order to leave a
 desire for its repetition this gratification must have been previously
 experienced, and we may be sure that nature has devised definite means
 so as not to leave this occurrence to mere chance. The arrangement which
 has fulfilled this purpose for the lip-zone we have already discussed;
 it is the simultaneous connection of this part of the body with the
 taking of nourishment. We shall also meet other similar mechanisms as
 sources of sexuality. The state of desire for repetition of
 gratification can be recognized through a peculiar feeling of tension
 which in itself is rather of a painful character, and through a
 centrally-determined feeling of itching or sensitiveness which is
 projected into the peripheral erogenous zone. The sexual aim may
 therefore be formulated as follows: the chief object is to substitute
 for the projected feeling of sensitiveness in the erogenous zone that
 outer stimulus which removes the feeling of sensitiveness by evoking the
 feeling of gratification. This external stimulus consists usually in a
 manipulation which is analogous to sucking.
 
 It is in full accord with our physiological knowledge if the desire
 happens to be awakened also peripherally through an actual change in the
 erogenous zone. The action is puzzling only to some extent as one
 stimulus for its suppression seems to want another applied to the same
 place.
 
 
 THE MASTURBATIC SEXUAL MANIFESTATIONS[13]
 
 It is a matter of great satisfaction to know that there is nothing
 further of greater importance to learn about the sexual activity of the
 child after the impulse of one erogenous zone has become comprehensible
 to us. The most pronounced differences are found in the action necessary
 for the gratification, which consists in sucking for the lip zone and
 which must be replaced by other muscular actions according to the
 situation and nature of the other zones.
 
 *The Activity of the Anal Zone.*--Like the lip zone the anal zone is,
 through its position, adapted to conduct the sexuality to the other
 functions of the body. It should be assumed that the erogenous
 significance of this region of the body was originally very large.
 Through psychoanalysis one finds, not without surprise, the many
 transformations that are normally undertaken with the usual excitations
 emanating from here, and that this zone often retains for life a
 considerable fragment of genital irritability.[14] The intestinal
 catarrhs so frequent during infancy produce intensive irritations in
 this zone, and we often hear it said that intestinal catarrh at this
 delicate age causes "nervousness." In later neurotic diseases they exert
 a definite influence on the symptomatic expression of the neurosis,
 placing at its disposal the whole sum of intestinal disturbances.
 Considering the erogenous significance of the anal zone which has been
 retained at least in transformation, one should not laugh at the
 hemorrhoidal influences to which the old medical literature attached so
 much weight in the explanation of neurotic states.
 
 Children utilizing the erogenous sensitiveness of the anal zone can be
 recognized by their holding back of fecal masses until through
 accumulation there result violent muscular contractions; the passage of
 these masses through the anus is apt to produce a marked irritation of
 the mucus membrane. Besides the pain this must produce also a sensation
 of pleasure. One of the surest premonitions of later eccentricity or
 nervousness is when an infant obstinately refuses to empty his bowel
 when placed on the chamber by the nurse and reserves this function at
 its own pleasure. It does not concern him that he will soil his bed; all
 he cares for is not to lose the subsidiary pleasure while defecating.
 The educators have again the right inkling when they designate children
 who withhold these functions as bad. The content of the bowel which is
 an exciting object to the sexually sensitive surface of mucous membrane
 behaves like the precursor of another organ which does not become active
 until after the phase of childhood. In addition it has other important
 meanings to the nursling. It is evidently treated as an additional part
 of the body, it represents the first "donation," the disposal of which
 expresses the pliability while the retention of it can express the
 spite of the little being towards its environment. From the idea of
 "donation" he later gains the meaning of the "babe" which according to
 one of the infantile sexual theories is acquired through eating and is
 born through the bowel.
 
 The retention of fecal masses, which is at first intentional in order to
 utilize them, as it were, for masturbatic excitation of the anal zone,
 is at least one of the roots of constipation so frequent in neuropaths.
 The whole significance of the anal zone is mirrored in the fact that
 there are but few neurotics who have not their special scatologic
 customs, ceremonies, etc., which they retain with cautious secrecy.
 
 Real masturbatic irritation of the anal zone by means of the fingers,
 evoked through either centrally or peripherally supported itching, is
 not at all rare in older children.
 
 *The Activity of the Genital Zone.*--Among the erogenous zones of the
 child's body there is one which certainly does not play the main role,
 and which cannot be the carrier of earliest sexual feeling--which,
 however, is destined for great things in later life. In both male and
 female it is connected with the voiding of urine (penis, clitoris), and
 in the former it is enclosed in a sack of mucous membrane, probably in
 order not to miss the irritations caused by the secretions which may
 arouse the sexual excitement at an early age. The sexual activities of
 this erogenous zone, which belongs to the real genitals, are the
 beginning of the later normal sexual life.
 
 Owing to the anatomical position, the overflowing of secretions, the
 washing and rubbing of the body, and to certain accidental excitements
 (the wandering of intestinal worms in the girl), it happens that the
 pleasurable feeling which these parts of the body are capable of
 producing makes itself noticeable to the child even during the sucking
 age, and thus awakens desire for its repetition. When we review all the
 actual arrangements, and bear in mind that the measures for cleanliness
 have the same effect as the uncleanliness itself, we can then scarcely
 mistake nature's intention, which is to establish the future primacy of
 these erogenous zones for the sexual activity through the infantile
 onanism from which hardly an individual escapes. The action of removing
 the stimulus and setting free the gratification consists in a rubbing
 contiguity with the hand or in a certain previously-formed pressure
 reflex effected by the closure of the thighs. The latter procedure seems
 to be the more primitive and is by far the more common in girls. The
 preference for the hand in boys already indicates what an important part
 of the male sexual activity will be accomplished in the future by the
 impulse to mastery (Bemaechtigungstrieb).[15] It can only help towards
 clearness if I state that the infantile masturbation should be divided
 into three phases. The first phase belongs to the nursing period, the
 second to the short flourishing period of sexual activity at about the
 fourth year, only the third corresponds to the one which is often
 considered exclusively as onanism of puberty.
 
 The infantile onanism seems to disappear after a brief time, but it may
 continue uninterruptedly till puberty and thus represent the first
 marked deviation from the development desirable for civilized man. At
 some time during childhood after the nursing period, the sexual impulse
 of the genitals reawakens and continues active for some time until it is
 again suppressed, or it may continue without interruption. The possible
 relations are very diverse and can only be elucidated through a more
 precise analysis of individual cases. The details, however, of this
 _second_ infantile sexual activity leave behind the profoundest
 (unconscious) impressions in the persons's memory; if the individual
 remains healthy they determine his character and if he becomes sick
 after puberty they determine the symptomatology of his neurosis.[16] In
 the latter case it is found that this sexual period is forgotten and the
 conscious reminiscences pointing to them are displaced; I have already
 mentioned that I would like to connect the normal infantile amnesia with
 this infantile sexual activity. By psychoanalytic investigation it is
 possible to bring to consciousness the forgotten material, and thereby
 to remove a compulsion which emanates from the unconscious psychic
 material.
 
 *The Return of the Infantile Masturbation.*--The sexual excitation of
 the nursing period returns during the designated years of childhood as a
 centrally determined tickling sensation demanding onanistic
 gratification, or as a pollution-like process which, analogous to the
 pollution of maturity, may attain gratification without the aid of any
 action. The latter case is more frequent in girls and in the second half
 of childhood; its determinants are not well understood, but it often,
 though not regularly, seems to have as a basis a period of early active
 onanism. The symptomatology of this sexual manifestation is poor; the
 genital apparatus is still undeveloped and all signs are therefore
 displayed by the urinary apparatus which is, so to say, the guardian of
 the genital apparatus. Most of the so-called bladder disturbances of
 this period are of a sexual nature; whenever the enuresis nocturna does
 not represent an epileptic attack it corresponds to a pollution.
 
 The return of the sexual activity is determined by inner and outer
 causes which can be conjectured from the formation of the symptoms of
 neurotic diseases and definitely revealed by psychoanalytic
 investigations. The internal causes will be discussed later, the
 accidental outer causes attain at this time a great and permanent
 significance. As the first outer cause we have the influence of
 seduction which prematurely treats the child as a sexual object; under
 conditions favoring impressions this teaches the child the gratification
 of the genital zones, and thus usually forces it to repeat this
 gratification in onanism. Such influences can come from adults or other
 children. I cannot admit that I overestimated its frequency or its
 significance in my contributions to the etiology of hysteria,[17] though
 I did not know then that normal individuals may have the same
 experiences in their childhood, and hence placed a higher value on
 seductions than on the factors found in the sexual constitution and
 development.[18] It is quite obvious that no seduction is necessary to
 awaken the sexual life of the child, that such an awakening may come on
 spontaneously from inner sources.
 
 *Polymorphous-perverse Disposition.*--It is instructive to know that
 under the influence of seduction the child may become
 polymorphous-perverse and may be misled into all sorts of
 transgressions. This goes to show that it carries along the adaptation
 for them in its disposition. The formation of such perversions meets but
 slight resistance because the psychic dams against sexual
 transgressions, such as shame, loathing and morality--which depend on
 the age of the child--are not yet erected or are only in the process of
 formation. In this respect the child perhaps does not behave differently
 from the average uncultured woman in whom the same polymorphous-perverse
 disposition exists. Such a woman may remain sexually normal under usual
 conditions, but under the guidance of a clever seducer she will find
 pleasure in every perversion and will retain the same as her sexual
 activity. The same polymorphous or infantile disposition fits the
 prostitute for her professional activity, and in the enormous number of
 prostitutes and of women to whom we must attribute an adaptation for
 prostitution, even if they do not follow this calling, it is absolutely
 impossible not to recognize in their uniform disposition for all
 perversions the universal and primitive human.
 
 *Partial Impulses.*--For the rest, the influence of seduction does not
 aid us in unravelling the original relations of the sexual impulse, but
 rather confuses our understanding of the same, inasmuch as it
 prematurely supplies the child with the sexual object at a time when the
 infantile sexual impulse does not yet evince any desire for it. We must
 admit, however, that the infantile sexual life, though mainly under the
 control of erogenous zones, also shows components in which from the very
 beginning other persons are regarded as sexual objects. Among these we
 have the impulses for looking and showing off, and for cruelty, which
 manifest themselves somewhat independently of the erogenous zones and
 which only later enter into intimate relationship with the sexual life;
 but along with the erogenous sexual activity they are noticeable even in
 the infantile years as separate and independent strivings. The little
 child is above all shameless, and during its early years it evinces
 definite pleasure in displaying its body and especially its sexual
 organs. A counterpart to this desire which is to be considered as
 perverse, the curiosity to see other persons' genitals, probably appears
 first in the later years of childhood when the hindrance of the feeling
 of shame has already reached a certain development. Under the influence
 of seduction the looking perversion may attain great importance for the
 sexual life of the child. Still, from my investigations of the childhood
 years of normal and neurotic patients, I must conclude that the impulse
 for looking can appear in the child as a spontaneous sexual
 manifestation. Small children, whose attention has once been directed to
 their own genitals--usually by masturbation--are wont to progress in
 this direction without outside interference, and to develop a vivid
 interest in the genitals of their playmates. As the occasion for the
 gratification of such curiosity is generally afforded during the
 gratification of both excrementitious needs, such children become
 _voyeurs_ and are zealous spectators at the voiding of urine and feces
 of others, After this tendency has been repressed, the curiosity to see
 the genitals of others (one's own or those of the other sex) remains as
 a tormenting desire which in some neurotic cases furnishes the strongest
 motive power for the formation of symptoms.
 
 The cruelty component of the sexual impulse develops in the child with
 still greater independence of those sexual activities which are
 connected with erogenous zones. Cruelty is especially near the childish
 character, since the inhibition which restrains the impulse to mastery
 before it causes pain to others--that is, the capacity for
 sympathy--develops comparatively late. As we know, a thorough
 psychological analysis of this impulse has not as yet been successfully
 accomplished; we may assume that the cruel feelings emanate from the
 impulse to mastery and appear at a period in the sexual life before the
 genitals have taken on their later role. It then dominates a phase of
 the sexual life, which we shall later describe as the pregenital
 organization. Children who are distinguished for evincing especial
 cruelty to animals and playmates may be justly suspected of intensive
 and premature sexual activity in the erogenous zones; and in a
 simultaneous prematurity of all sexual impulses, the erogenous sexual
 activity surely seems to be primary. The absence of the barrier of
 sympathy carries with it the danger that the connections between cruelty
 and the erogenous impulses formed in childhood cannot be broken in later
 life.
 
 An erogenous source of the passive impulse for cruelty (masochism) is
 found in the painful irritation of the gluteal region which is familiar
 to all educators since the confessions of J.J. Rousseau. This has justly
 caused them to demand that physical punishment, which usually concerns
 this part of the body, should be withheld from all children in whom the
 libido might be forced into collateral roads by the later demands of
 cultural education.[19]
 
 
 THE INFANTILE SEXUAL INVESTIGATION
 
 *Inquisitiveness.*--At the same time when the sexual life of the child
 reaches its first bloom, from the age of three to the age of five, it
 also evinces the beginning of that activity which is ascribed to the
 impulse for knowledge and investigation. The desire for knowledge can
 neither be added to the elementary components of the impulses nor can it
 be altogether subordinated under sexuality. Its activity corresponds on
 the one hand to a sublimating mode of acquisition and on the other hand
 it labors with the energy of the desire for looking. Its relations to
 the sexual life, however, are of particular importance, for we have
 learned from psychoanalysis that the inquisitiveness of children is
 attracted to the sexual problems unusually early and in an unexpectedly
 intensive manner, indeed it perhaps may first be awakened by the sexual
 problems.
 
 *The Riddle of the Sphinx.*--It is not theoretical but practical
 interests which start the work of the investigation activity in the
 child. The threat to the conditions of his existence through the actual
 or expected arrival of a new child, the fear of the loss in care and
 love which is connected with this event, cause the child to become
 thoughtful and sagacious. Corresponding with the history of this
 awakening, the first problem with which it occupies itself is not the
 question as to the difference between the sexes, but the riddle: from
 where do children come? In a distorted form, which can easily be
 unraveled, this is the same riddle which was given by the Theban Sphinx.
 The fact of the two sexes is usually first accepted by the child without
 struggle and hesitation. It is quite natural for the male child to
 presuppose in all persons it knows a genital like his own, and to find
 it impossible to harmonize the lack of it with his conception of others.
 
 *The Castration Complex.*--This conviction is energetically adhered to
 by the boy and tenaciously defended against the contradictions which
 soon result, and are only given up after severe internal struggles
 (castration complex). The substitutive formations of this lost penis of
 the woman play a great part in the formation of many perversions.
 
 The assumption of the same (male) genital in all persons is the first of
 the remarkable and consequential infantile sexual theories. It is of
 little help to the child when biological science agrees with his
 preconceptions and recognizes the feminine clitoris as the real
 substitute for the penis. The little girl does not react with similar
 refusals when she sees the differently formed genital of the boy. She
 is immediately prepared to recognize it, and soon becomes envious of the
 penis; this envy reaches its highest point in the consequentially
 important wish that she also should be a boy.
 
 *Birth Theories.*--Many people can remember distinctly how intensely
 they interested themselves, in the prepubescent period, in the question
 where children came from. The anatomical solutions at that time read
 very differently; the children come out of the breast or are cut out of
 the body, or the navel opens itself to let them out. Outside of analysis
 one only seldom remembers the investigation corresponding to the early
 childhood years; it had long merged into repression but its results were
 thoroughly uniform. One gets children by eating something special (as in
 the fairy tale) and they are born through the bowel like a passage.
 These infantile theories recall the structures in the animal kingdom,
 especially do they recall the cloaca of the types which stand lower than
 the mammals.
 
 *Sadistic Conception of the Sexual Act.*--If children of so delicate an
 age become spectators of the sexual act between grown-ups, for which an
 occasion is furnished by the conviction of the grown-ups that little
 children cannot understand anything sexual, they cannot help conceiving
 the sexual act as a kind of maltreating or overpowering, that is, it
 impresses them in a sadistic sense. Psychoanalysis also teaches us that
 such an early childhood impression contributes much to the disposition
 for a later sadistic displacement of the sexual aim. Besides this
 children also occupy themselves with the problem of what the sexual act
 consists in or, as they grasp it, of what marriage consists, and seek
 the solution of the mystery mostly in an association to which the
 functions of urination and defecation give occasion.
 
 *The Typical Failure of the Infantile Sexual Investigation.*--It can be
 stated in general about the infantile sexual theories that they are
 reproductions of the child's own sexual constitution, and that despite
 their grotesque mistakes they evince more understanding of the sexual
 processes than is credited to their creators. Children also perceive the
 pregnancy of the mother and know how to interpret it correctly; the
 stork fable is very often related before auditors who confront it with a
 deep, but mostly mute suspicion. But as two elements remain unknown to
 the infantile sexual investigation, namely, the role of the propagating
 semen and the female genital opening--precisely the same points in which
 the infantile organization is still backward--the effort of the
 infantile investigator regularly remains fruitless, and ends in a
 renunciation which not infrequently leaves a lasting injury to the
 desire for knowledge. The sexual investigation of these early childhood
 years is always conducted alone, it signifies the first step towards
 independent orientation in the world, and causes a marked estrangement
 between the child and the persons of his environment who formerly
 enjoyed its full confidence.
 
 *The Phases of Development of the Sexual Organization.*--As
 characteristics of the infantile sexuality we have hitherto emphasized
 the fact that it is essentially autoerotic (it finds its object in its
 own body), and that its individual partial impulses, which on the whole
 are unconnected and independent of one another, are striving for the
 acquisition of pleasure. The end of this development forms the so-called
 normal sexual life of the adult in which the acquisition of pleasure has
 been put into the service of the function of propagation, and the
 partial impulses, under the primacy of one single erogenous zone, have
 formed a firm organization for the attainment of the sexual aim in a
 strange sexual object.
 
 *Pregenital Organizations.*--The study, with the help of
 psychoanalysis, of the inhibitions and disturbances in this course of
 development now permits us to recognize additions and primary stages of
 such organization of the partial impulses which likewise furnish a sort
 of sexual regime. These phases of the sexual organization normally will
 pass over smoothly and will only be recognizable by slight indications.
 Only in pathological cases do they become active and discernible to
 coarse observation.
 
 Organizations of the sexual life in which the genital zones have not yet
 assumed the dominating role we would call the _pregenital_ phase. So far
 we have become acquainted with two of them which recall reversions to
 early animal states.
 
 One of the first of such pregenital sexual organizations is the _oral_,
 or if we wish, the cannibalistic. Here the sexual activity is not yet
 separated from the taking of nourishment, and the contrasts within the
 same not yet differentiated. The object of the one activity is also that
 of the other, the sexual aim consists in the _incorporating_ into one's
 own body of the object, it is the prototype of that which later plays
 such an important psychic role as _identification_. As a remnant of this
 fictitious phase of organization forced on us by pathology we can
 consider thumbsucking. Here the sexual activity became separated from
 the nourishment activity and the strange object was given up in favor of
 one from his own body.
 
 A second pregenital phase is the sadistic-anal organization. Here the
 contrasts which run through the whole sexual life are already developed,
 but cannot yet be designated as _masculine_ and _feminine_, but must be
 called _active_ and _passive_. The activity is supplied by the
 musculature of the body through the mastery impulse; the erogenous
 mucous membrane of the bowel manifests itself above all as an organ with
 a passive sexual aim, for both strivings there are objects present,
 which however do not merge together. Besides them there are other
 partial impulses which are active in an autoerotic manner. The sexual
 polarity and the strange object can thus already be demonstrated in this
 phase. The organization and subordination under the function of
 propagation are still lacking.
 
 *Ambivalence.*--This form of the sexual organization could be retained
 throughout life and continue to draw to itself a large part of the
 sexual activity. The prevalence of sadism and the role of the cloaca of
 the anal zone stamps it with an exquisitely archaic impression. As
 another characteristic belonging to it we can mention the fact that the
 contrasting pair of impulses are developed in almost the same manner, a
 behavior which was designated by Bleuler with the happy name of
 _ambivalence_.
 
 The assumption of the pregenital organizations of the sexual life is
 based on the analysis of the neuroses and hardly deserves any
 consideration without a knowledge of the same. We may expect that
 continued analytic efforts will furnish us with still more disclosures
 concerning the structure and development of the normal sexual function.
 
 To complete the picture of the infantile sexual life one must add that
 frequently or regularly an object selection takes place even in
 childhood which is as characteristic as the one we have represented for
 the phase of development of puberty. This object selection proceeds in
 such a manner that all the sexual strivings proceed in the direction of
 one person in whom they wish to attain their aim. This is then the
 nearest approach to the definitive formation of the sexual life after
 puberty, that is possible in childhood. It differs from the latter only
 in the fact that the collection of the partial impulses and their
 subordination to the primacy of the genitals is very imperfectly or not
 at all accomplished in childhood. The establishment of this primacy in
 the service of propagation is therefore the last phase through which the
 sexual organization passes.
 
 *The Two Periods of Object Selection.*--That the object selection takes
 place in two periods, or in two shifts, can be spoken of as a typical
 occurrence. The first shift has its origin between the age of three and
 five years, and is brought to a stop or to retrogression by the latency
 period; it is characterized by the infantile nature of its sexual aims.
 The second shift starts with puberty and determines the definitive
 formation of the sexual life.
 
 The fact of the double object selection which is essentially due to the
 effect of the latency period, becomes most significant for the
 disturbance of this terminal state. The results of the infantile object
 selection reach into the later period; they are either preserved as such
 or are even refreshed at the time of puberty. But due to the development
 of the repression which takes place between the two phases they turn out
 as unutilizable. The sexual aims have become softened and now represent
 what we can designate as the _tender_ streams of the sexual life. Only
 psychoanalytic investigation can demonstrate that behind this
 tenderness, such as honoring and esteeming, there is concealed the old
 sexual strivings of the infantile partial impulses which have now become
 useless. The object selection of the pubescent period must renounce the
 infantile objects and begin anew as a sensuous stream. The fact that the
 two streams do not meet often enough has as a result that one of the
 ideals of the sexual life, namely, the union of all desires in one
 object, can not be attained.
 
 
 THE SOURCES OF THE INFANTILE SEXUALITY
 
 In our effort to follow up the origins of the sexual impulse, we have
 thus far found that the sexual excitement originates (_a_) as an imitation
 of a gratification which has been experienced in conjunction with other
 organic processes; (_b_) through the appropriate peripheral stimulation of
 erogenous zones; (_c_) and as an expression of some "impulse," like the
 looking and cruelty impulses, the origin of which we do not yet fully
 understand. The psychoanalytic investigation of later life which leads
 back to childhood and the contemporary observation of the child itself
 cooeperate to reveal to us still other regularly-flowing sources of the
 sexual excitement. The observation of childhood has the disadvantage of
 treating easily misunderstood material, while psychoanalysis is made
 difficult by the fact that it can reach its objects and conclusions only
 by great detours; still the united efforts of both methods achieve a
 sufficient degree of positive understanding.
 
 In investigating the erogenous zones we have already found that these
 skin regions merely show the special exaggeration of a form of
 sensitiveness which is to a certain degree found over the whole surface
 of the skin. It will therefore not surprise us to learn that certain
 forms of general sensitiveness in the skin can be ascribed to very
 distinct erogenous action. Among these we will above all mention the
 temperature sensitiveness; this will perhaps prepare us for the
 understanding of the therapeutic effects of warm baths.
 
 *Mechanical Excitation.*--We must, moreover, describe here the
 production of sexual excitation by means of rhythmic mechanical shaking
 of the body. There are three kinds of exciting influences: those acting
 on the sensory apparatus of the vestibular nerves, those acting on the
 skin, and those acting on the deep parts, such as the muscles and
 joints. The sexual excitation produced by these influences seems to be
 of a pleasurable nature--it is worth emphasizing that for some time we
 shall continue to use indiscriminately the terms "sexual excitement" and
 "gratification" leaving the search for an explanation of the terms to a
 later time--and that the pleasure is produced by mechanical stimulation
 is proved by the fact that children are so fond of play involving
 passive motion, like swinging or flying in the air, and repeatedly
 demand its repetition.[20] As we know, rocking is regularly used in
 putting restless children to sleep. The shaking sensation experienced in
 wagons and railroad trains exerts such a fascinating influence on older
 children, that all boys, at least at one time in their lives, want to
 become conductors and drivers. They are wont to ascribe to railroad
 activities an extraordinary and mysterious interest, and during the age
 of phantastic activity (shortly before puberty) they utilize these as a
 nucleus for exquisite sexual symbolisms. The desire to connect railroad
 travelling with sexuality apparently originates from the pleasurable
 character of the sensation of motion. When the repression later sets in
 and changes so many of the childish likes into their opposites, these
 same persons as adolescents and adults then react to the rocking and
 rolling with nausea and become terribly exhausted by a railroad journey,
 or they show a tendency to attacks of anxiety during the journey, and by
 becoming obsessed with railroad phobia they protect themselves against a
 repetition of the painful experiences.
 
 This also fits in with the not as yet understood fact that the
 concurrence of fear with mechanical shaking produces the severest
 hysterical forms of traumatic neurosis. It may at least be assumed that
 inasmuch as even a slight intensity of these influences becomes a source
 of sexual excitement, the action of an excessive amount of the same will
 produce a profound disorder in the sexual mechanism.
 
 *Muscular Activity.*--It is well known that the child has need for
 strong muscular activity, from the gratification of which it draws
 extraordinary pleasure. Whether this pleasure has anything to do with
 sexuality, whether it includes in itself sexual satisfaction? or can be
 the occasion of sexual excitement; all this may be refuted by critical
 consideration, which will probably be directed also to the position
 taken above that the pleasure in the sensations of passive movement are
 of sexual character or that they are sexually exciting. The fact
 remains, however, that a number of persons report that they experienced
 the first signs of excitement in their genitals during fighting or
 wrestling with playmates, in which situation, besides the general
 muscular exertion, there is an intensive contact with the opponent's
 skin which also becomes effective. The desire for muscular contest with
 a definite person, like the desire for word contest in later years, is a
 good sign that the object selection has been directed toward this
 person. "Was sich liebt, das neckt sich."[21] In the promotion of sexual
 excitement through muscular activity we might recognize one of the
 sources of the sadistic impulse. The infantile connection between
 fighting and sexual excitement acts in many persons as a determinant for
 the future preferred course of their sexual impulse.[22]
 
 *Affective Processes.*--The other sources of sexual excitement in the
 child are open to less doubt. Through contemporary observations, as well
 as through later investigations, it is easy to ascertain that all more
 intensive affective processes, even excitements of a terrifying nature,
 encroach upon sexuality; this can at all events furnish us with a
 contribution to the understanding of the pathogenic action of such
 emotions. In the school child, fear of a coming examination or exertion
 expended in the solution of a difficult task can become significant for
 the breaking through of sexual manifestations as well as for his
 relations to the school, inasmuch as under such excitements a sensation
 often occurs urging him to touch the genitals, or leading to a
 pollution-like process with all its disagreeable consequences. The
 behavior of children at school, which is so often mysterious to the
 teacher, ought surely to be considered in relation with their
 germinating sexuality. The sexually-exciting influence of some painful
 affects, such as fear, shuddering, and horror, is felt by a great many
 people throughout life and readily explains why so many seek
 opportunities to experience such sensations, provided that certain
 accessory circumstances (as under imaginary circumstances in reading, or
 in the theater) suppress the earnestness of the painful feeling.
 
 If we might assume that the same erogenous action also reaches the
 intensive painful feelings, especially if the pain be toned down or held
 at a distance by a subsidiary determination, this relation would then
 contain the main roots of the masochistic-sadistic impulse, into the
 manifold composition of which we are gaining a gradual insight.
 
 *Intellectual Work.*--Finally, is is evident that mental application or
 the concentration of attention on an intellectual accomplishment will
 result, especially often in youthful persons, but in older persons as
 well, in a simultaneous sexual excitement, which may be looked upon as
 the only justified basis for the otherwise so doubtful etiology of
 nervous disturbances from mental "overwork."
 
 If we now, in conclusion, review the evidences and indications of the
 sources of the infantile sexual excitement, which have been reported
 neither completely nor exhaustively, we may lay down the following
 general laws as suggested or established. It seems to be provided in the
 most generous manner that the process of sexual excitement--the nature
 of which certainly remains quite mysterious to us--should be set in
 motion. The factor making this provision in a more or less direct way is
 the excitation of the sensible surfaces of the skin and sensory organs,
 while the most immediate exciting influences are exerted on certain
 parts which are designated as erogenous zones. The criterion in all
 these sources of sexual excitement is really the quality of the stimuli,
 though the factor of intensity (in pain) is not entirely unimportant.
 But in addition to this there are arrangements in the organism which
 induce sexual excitement as a subsidiary action in a large number of
 inner processes as soon as the intensity of these processes has risen
 above certain quantitative limits. What we have designated as the
 partial impulses of sexuality are either directly derived from these
 inner sources of sexual excitation or composed of contributions from
 such sources and from erogenous zones. It is possible that nothing of
 any considerable significance occurs in the organism that does not
 contribute its components to the excitement of the sexual impulse.
 
 It seems to me at present impossible to shed more light and certainty on
 these general propositions, and for this I hold two factors responsible;
 first, the novelty of this manner of investigation, and secondly, the
 fact that the nature of the sexual excitement is entirely unfamiliar to
 us. Nevertheless, I will not forbear speaking about two points which
 promise to open wide prospects in the future.
 
 *Diverse Sexual Constitutions.*--(_a_) We have considered above the
 possibility of establishing the manifold character of congenital sexual
 constitutions through the diverse formation of the erogenous zones; we
 may now attempt to do the same in dealing with the indirect sources of
 sexual excitement. We may assume that, although these different sources
 furnish contributions in all individuals, they are not all equally
 strong in all persons; and that a further contribution to the
 differentiation of the diverse sexual constitution will be found in the
 preferred developments of the individual sources of sexual excitement.
 
 *The Paths of Opposite Influences.*--(_b_) Since we are now dropping the
 figurative manner of expression hitherto employed, by which we spoke of
 _sources_ of sexual excitement, we may now assume that all the
 connecting ways leading from other functions to sexuality must also be
 passable in the reverse direction. For example, if the lip zone, the
 common possession of both functions, is responsible for the fact that
 the sexual gratification originates during the taking of nourishment,
 the same factor offers also an explanation for the disturbances in the
 taking of nourishment if the erogenous functions of the common zone are
 disturbed. As soon as we know that concentration of attention may
 produce sexual excitement, it is quite natural to assume that acting on
 the same path, but in a contrary direction, the state of sexual
 excitement will be able to influence the availability of the voluntary
 attention. A good part of the symptomatology of the neuroses which I
 trace to disturbance of sexual processes manifests itself in
 disturbances of the other non-sexual bodily functions, and this hitherto
 incomprehensible action becomes less mysterious if it only represents
 the counterpart of the influences controlling the production of the
 sexual excitement.
 
 However the same paths through which sexual disturbances encroach upon
 the other functions of the body must in health be supposed to serve
 another important function. It must be through these paths that the
 attraction of the sexual motive-powers to other than sexual aims, the
 sublimation of sexuality, is accomplished. We must conclude with the
 admission that very little is definitely known concerning the paths
 beyond the fact that they exist, and that they are probably passable in
 both directions.
 
 [1] For it is really impossible to have a correct knowledge of the part
 belonging to heredity without first understanding the part belonging to
 the infantile.
 
 [2] This assertion on revision seemed even to myself so bold that I
 decided to test its correctness by again reviewing the literature. The
 result of this second review did not warrant any change in my original
 statement. The scientific elaboration of the physical as well as the
 psychic phenomena of the infantile sexuality is still in its initial
 stages. One author (S. Bell, "A Preliminary Study of the Emotions of
 Love Between the Sexes," American Journal of Psychology, XIII, 1902)
 says: "I know of no scientist who has given a careful analysis of the
 emotion as it is seen in the adolescent." The only attention given to
 somatic sexual manifestations occurring before the age of puberty was in
 connection with degenerative manifestations, and these were referred to
 as a sign of degeneration. A chapter on the sexual life of children is
 not to be found in all the representative psychologies of this age which
 I have read. Among these works I can mention the following: Preyer;
 Baldwin (The Development of the Mind in the Child and in the Race,
 1898); Perez (L'enfant de 3-7 ans, 1894); Struempel (Die paedagogische
 Pathologie, 1899); Karl Groos (Das Seelenleben des Kindes, 1904); Th.
 Heller (Grundriss der Heilpaedagogic, 1904); Sully (Observations
 Concerning Childhood, 1897). The best impression of the present
 situation of this sphere can be obtained from the journal Die
 Kinderfehler (issued since 1896). On the other hand one gains the
 impression that the existence of love in childhood is in no need of
 demonstration. Perez (l.c.) speaks for it; K. Groos (Die Spiele der
 Menschen, 1899) states that some children are very early subject to
 sexual emotions, and show a desire to touch the other sex (p. 336); S.
 Bell observed the earliest appearance of sex-love in a child during the
 middle part of its third year. See also Havelock Ellis, The Sexual
 Impulse, Appendix II.
 
 The above-mentioned judgment concerning the literature of infantile
 sexuality no longer holds true since the appearance of the great and
 important work of G. Stanley Hall (Adolescence, Its Psychology and its
 Relation to Physiology, Anthropology, Sociology, Sex, Crime, Religion,
 and Education, 2 vols., New York, 1908). The recent book of A. Moll, Das
 Sexualleben des Kindes, Berlin, 1909, offers no occasion for such a
 modification. See, on the other hand, Bleuler, Sexuelle abnormitaeten der
 Kinder (Jahrbuch der Schweizerischen Gesellschaft fuer
 Schulgesundheitspflege, IX, 1908). A book by Mrs. Dr. H.v. Hug-Hellmuth,
 Aus dem Seelenleben des Kindes (1913), has taken full account of the
 neglected sexual factors. [Translated in Monograph Series.]
 
 [3] I have attempted to solve the problems presented by the earliest
 infantile recollections in a paper, "Ueber Deckerinnerungen"
 (Monatsschrift fuer Psychiatrie und Neurologie, VI, 1899). Cf. also The
 Psychopathology of Everyday Life, The Macmillan Co., New York, and
 Unwin, London.
 
 [4] One cannot understand the mechanism of repression when one takes
 into consideration only one of the two cooperating processes. As a
 comparison one may think of the way the tourist is despatched to the top
 of the great pyramid of Gizeh; he is pushed from one side and pulled
 from the other.
 
 [5] The use of the latter material is justified by the fact that the
 years of childhood of those who are later neurotics need not necessarily
 differ from those who are later normal except in intensity and
 distinctness.
 
 [6] An anatomic analogy to the behavior of the infantile sexual function
 formulated by me is perhaps given by Bayer (Deutsches Archiv fuer
 klinische Medizin, Bd. 73) who claims that the internal genitals
 (uterus) are regularly larger in newborn than in older children.
 However, Halban's conception, that after birth there is also an
 involution of the other parts of the sexual apparatus, has not been
 verified. According to Halban (Zeitschrift fuer Geburtshilfe u.
 Gynaekologie, LIII, 1904) this process of involution ends after a few
 weeks of extra-uterine life.
 
 [7] The expression "sexual latency period" (sexuelle latenz-periode) I
 have borrowed from W. Fliess.
 
 [8] In the case here discussed the sublimation of the sexual motive
 powers proceed on the road of reaction formations. But in general it is
 necessary to separate from each other sublimation and reaction formation
 as two diverse processes. Sublimation may also result through other and
 simpler mechanisms.
 
 [9] Jahrbuch fuer Kinderheilkunde, N.F., XIV, 1879.
 
 [10] This already shows what holds true for the whole life, namely, that
 sexual gratification is the best hypnotic. Most nervous insomnias are
 traced to lack of sexual gratification. It is also known that
 unscrupulous nurses calm crying children to sleep by stroking their
 genitals.
 
 [11] Ellis spoils, however, the sense of his invented term by comprising
 under the phenomena of autoerotism the whole of hysteria and
 masturbation in its full extent.
 
 [12] Further reflection and observation lead me to attribute the quality
 of erogenity to all parts of the body and inner organs. See later on
 narcism.
 
 [13] Compare here the very comprehensive but confusing literature on
 onanism, _e.g._, Rohleder, Die Masturbation, 1899. Cf. also the
 pamphlet, "Die Onanie," which contains the discussion of the Vienna
 Psychoanalytic Society, Wiesbaden, 1912.
 
 [14] Compare here the essay on "Charakter und Analerotic" in the
 Sammlung kleiner Schriften zur Neurosenlehre, Zweite Folge, 1909. Cf.
 also Brill, Psychanalysis, Chap. XIII, Anal Eroticism and Character,
 W.B. Saunders, Philadelphia.
 
 [15] Unusual techniques in the performance of onanism seem to point to
 the influence of a prohibition against onanism which has been overcome.
 
 [16] Why neurotics, when conscience stricken, regularly connect it with
 their onanistic activity, as was only recently recognized by Bleuler, is
 a problem which still awaits an exhaustive analysis.
 
 [17] Freud, Selected Papers on Hysteria and Other Psychoneuroses, 3d
 edition, translated by A.A. Brill, N.Y. Nerv. and Ment. Dis. Pub. Co.
 Nervous and Mental Disease Monograph, Series No. 4.
 
 [18] Havelock Ellis, in an appendix to his study on the Sexual Impulse,
 1903, gives a number of autobiographic reports of normal persons
 treating their first sexual feelings in childhood and the causes of the
 same. These reports naturally show the deficiency due to infantile
 amnesia; they do not cover the prehistoric time in the sexual life and
 therefore must be supplemented by psychoanalysis of individuals who
 became neurotic. Notwithstanding this these reports are valuable in more
 than one respect, and information of a similar nature has urged me to
 modify my etiological assumption as mentioned in the text.
 
 [19] The above-mentioned assertions concerning the infantile sexuality
 were justified in 1905, in the main through the results of
 psychoanalytic investigations in adults. Direct observation of the child
 could not at the time be utilized to its full extent and resulted only
 in individual indications and valuable confirmations. Since then it has
 become possible through the analysis of some cases of nervous disease in
 the delicate age of childhood to gain a direct understanding of the
 infantile psychosexuality (Jahrbuch fuer psychoanalytische und
 psychopathologische Forschungen, Bd. 1, 2, 1909). I can point with
 satisfaction to the fact that direct observation has fully confirmed the
 conclusion drawn from psychoanalysis, and thus furnishes good evidence
 for the reliability of the latter method of investigation.
 
 Moreover, the "Analysis of a Phobia in a Five-year-old Boy" (Jahrbuch,
 Bd. 1) has taught us something new for which psychoanalysis had not
 prepared us, to wit, that sexual symbolism, the representation of the
 sexual by non-sexual objects and relations--reaches back into the years
 when the child is first learning to master the language. My attention
 has also been directed to a deficiency in the above-cited statement
 which for the sake of clearness described any conceivable separation
 between the two phases of autoerotism and object love as a temporal
 separation. From the cited analysis (as well as from the above-mentioned
 work of Bell) we learn that children from three to five are capable of
 evincing a very strong object-selection which is accompanied by strong
 affects.
 
 [20] Some persons can recall that the contact of the moving air in
 swinging caused them direct sexual pleasure in the genitals.
 
 [21] "Those who love each other tease each other."
 
 [22] The analyses of neurotic disturbances of walking and of agoraphobia
 remove all doubt as to the sexual nature of the pleasure of motion. As
 everybody knows modern cultural education utilizes sports to a great
 extent in order to turn away the youth from sexual activity; it would be
 more proper to say that it replaces the sexual pleasure by motion
 pleasure, and forces the sexual activity back upon one of its autoerotic
 components.
 
 
 
 
 III
 
 THE TRANSFORMATION OF PUBERTY
 
 
 With the beginning of puberty the changes set in which transform the
 infantile sexual life into its definite normal form. Hitherto the sexual
 impulse has been preponderantly autoerotic; it now finds the sexual
 object. Thus far it has manifested itself in single impulses and in
 erogenous zones seeking a certain pleasure as a single sexual aim. A new
 sexual aim now appears for the production of which all partial impulses
 cooeperate, while the erogenous zones subordinate themselves to the
 primacy of the genital zone.[1] As the new sexual aim assigns very
 different functions to the two sexes their sexual developments now part
 company. The sexual development of the man is more consistent and easier
 to understand, while in the woman there even appears a form of
 regression. The normality of the sexual life is guaranteed only by the
 exact concurrence of the two streams directed to the sexual object and
 sexual aim. It is like the piercing of a tunnel from opposite sides.
 
 The new sexual aim in the man consists in the discharging of the sexual
 products; it is not contradictory to the former sexual aim, that of
 obtaining pleasure; on the contrary, the highest amount of pleasure is
 connected with this final act in the sexual process. The sexual impulse
 now enters into the service of the function of propagation; it becomes,
 so to say, altruistic. If this transformation is to succeed its process
 must be adjusted to the original dispositions and all the peculiarities
 of the impulses.
 
 Just as on every other occasion where new connections and compositions
 are to be formed in complicated mechanisms, here, too, there is a
 possibility for morbid disturbance if the new order of things does not
 get itself established. All morbid disturbances of the sexual life may
 justly be considered as inhibitions of development.
 
 
 THE PRIMACY OF THE GENITAL ZONES AND THE FORE-PLEASURE
 
 From the course of development as described we can clearly see the issue
 and the end aim. The intermediary transitions are still quite obscure
 and many a riddle will have to be solved in them.
 
 The most striking process of puberty has been selected as its most
 characteristic; it is the manifest growth of the external genitals which
 have shown a relative inhibition of growth during the latency period of
 childhood. Simultaneously the inner genitals develop to such an extent
 as to be able to furnish sexual products or to receive them for the
 purpose of forming a new living being. A most complicated apparatus is
 thus formed which waits to be claimed.
 
 This apparatus can be set in motion by stimuli, and observation teaches
 that the stimuli can affect it in three ways: from the outer world
 through the familiar erogenous zones; from the inner organic world by
 ways still to be investigated; and from the psychic life, which merely
 represents a depository of external impressions and a receptacle of
 inner excitations. The same result follows in all three cases, namely, a
 state which can be designated as "sexual excitation" and which manifests
 itself in psychic and somatic signs. The psychic sign consists in a
 peculiar feeling of tension of a most urgent character, and among the
 manifold somatic signs the many changes in the genitals stand first.
 They have a definite meaning, that of readiness; they constitute a
 preparation for the sexual act (the erection of the penis and the
 glandular activity of the vagina).
 
 *The Sexual Tension*--The character of the tension of sexual excitation
 is connected with a problem the solution of which is as difficult as it
 would be important for the conception of the sexual process. Despite all
 divergence of opinion regarding it in psychology, I must firmly maintain
 that a feeling of tension must carry with it the character of
 displeasure. For me it is conclusive that such a feeling carries with it
 the impulse to alter the psychic situation, and acts incitingly, which
 is quite contrary to the nature of perceived pleasure. But if we ascribe
 the tension of the sexual excitation to the feelings of displeasure we
 encounter the fact that it is undoubtedly pleasurably perceived. The
 tension produced by sexual excitation is everywhere accompanied by
 pleasure; even in the preparatory changes of the genitals there is a
 distinct feeling of satisfaction. What relation is there between this
 unpleasant tension and this feeling of pleasure?
 
 Everything relating to the problem of pleasure and pain touches one of
 the weakest spots of present-day psychology. We shall try if possible to
 learn something from the determinations of the case in question and to
 avoid encroaching on the problem as a whole. Let us first glance at the
 manner in which the erogenous zones adjust themselves to the new order
 of things. An important role devolves upon them in the preparation of
 the sexual excitation. The eye which is very remote from the sexual
 object is most often in position, during the relations of object wooing,
 to become attracted by that particular quality of excitation, the motive
 of which we designate as beauty in the sexual object. The excellencies
 of the sexual object are therefore also called "attractions." This
 attraction is on the one hand already connected with pleasure, and on
 the other hand it either results in an increase of the sexual excitation
 or in an evocation of the same where it is still wanting. The effect is
 the same if the excitation of another erogenous zone, _e.g._, the
 touching hand, is added to it. There is on the one hand the feeling of
 pleasure which soon becomes enhanced by the pleasure from the
 preparatory changes, and on the other hand there is a further increase
 of the sexual tension which soon changes into a most distinct feeling of
 displeasure if it cannot proceed to more pleasure. Another case will
 perhaps be clearer; let us, for example, take the case where an
 erogenous zone, like a woman's breast, is excited by touching in a
 person who is not sexually excited at the time. This touching in itself
 evokes a feeling of pleasure, but it is also best adapted to awaken
 sexual excitement which demands still more pleasure. How it happens that
 the perceived pleasure evokes the desire for greater pleasure, that is
 the real problem.
 
 *Fore-pleasure Mechanism.*--But the role which devolves upon the
 erogenous zones is clear. What applies to one applies to all. They are
 all utilized to furnish a certain amount of pleasure through their own
 proper excitation, which increases the tension, and which is in turn
 destined to produce the necessary motor energy in order to bring to a
 conclusion the sexual act. The last part but one of this act is again a
 suitable excitation of an erogenous zone; _i.e._, the genital zone
 proper of the glans penis is excited by the object most fit for it, the
 mucous membrane of the vagina, and through the pleasure furnished by
 this excitation it now produces reflexly the motor energy which conveys
 to the surface the sexual substance. This last pleasure is highest in
 its intensity, and differs from the earliest ones in its mechanism. It
 is altogether produced through discharge, it is altogether gratification
 pleasure and the tension of the libido temporarily dies away with it.
 
 It does not seem to me unjustified to fix by name the distinction in the
 nature of these pleasures, the one through the excitation of the
 erogenous zones, and the other through the discharge of the sexual
 substance. In contradistinction to the end-pleasure, or pleasure of
 gratification of sexual activity, we can properly designate the first as
 _fore-pleasure_. The fore-pleasure is then the same as that furnished by
 the infantile sexual impulse, though on a reduced scale; while the
 _end-pleasure_ is new and is probably connected with determinations
 which first appear at puberty. The formula for the new function of the
 erogenous zones reads as follows: they are utilized for the purpose of
 making possible the production of the greater pleasure of gratification
 by means of the fore-pleasure which is gained from them as in infantile
 life.
 
 I have recently been able to elucidate another example from a quite
 different realm of the psychic life, in which likewise a greater feeling
 of pleasure is achieved by means of a lesser feeling of pleasure which
 thereby acts as an alluring premium. We had there also the opportunity
 of entering more deeply into the nature of pleasure.[2]
 
 *Dangers of the Fore-pleasure.*--However the connection of fore-pleasure
 with the infantile life is strengthened by the pathogenic role which may
 devolve upon it. In the mechanism through which the fore-pleasure is
 expressed there exists an obvious danger to the attainment of the normal
 sexual aim. This occurs if it happens that there is too much
 fore-pleasure and too little tension in any part of the preparatory
 sexual process. The motive power for the further continuation of the
 sexual process then escapes, the whole road becomes shortened, and the
 preparatory action in question takes the place of the normal sexual aim.
 Experience shows that such a hurtful condition is determined by the fact
 that the erogenous zone concerned or the corresponding partial impulse
 has already contributed an unusual amount of pleasure in infantile life.
 If other factors favoring fixation are added a compulsion readily
 results for the later life which prevents the fore-pleasure from
 arranging itself into a new combination. Indeed, the mechanism of many
 perversions is of such a nature; they merely represent a lingering at a
 preparatory act of the sexual process.
 
 The failure of the function of the sexual mechanism through the fault of
 the fore-pleasure is generally avoided if the primacy of the genital
 zones has also already been sketched out in infantile life. The
 preparations of the second half of childhood (from the eighth year to
 puberty) really seem to favor this. During these years the genital zones
 behave almost as at the age of maturity; they are the seat of exciting
 sensations and of preparatory changes if any kind of pleasure is
 experienced through the gratification of other erogenous zones; although
 this effect remains aimless, _i.e._, it contributes nothing towards the
 continuation of the sexual process. Besides the pleasure of
 gratification a certain amount of sexual tension appears even in
 infancy, though it is less constant and less abundant. We can now
 understand also why in the discussion of the sources of sexuality we had
 a perfectly good reason for saying that the process in question acts as
 sexual gratification as well as sexual excitement. We note that on our
 way towards the truth we have at first enormously exaggerated the
 distinctions between the infantile and the mature sexual life, and we
 therefore supplement what has been said with a correction. The infantile
 manifestations of sexuality determine not only the deviations from the
 normal sexual life but also the normal formations of the same.
 
 
 THE PROBLEM OF SEXUAL EXCITEMENT
 
 It remains entirely unexplained whence the sexual tension comes which
 originates simultaneously with the gratification of erogenous zones and
 what is its nature. The obvious supposition that this tension originates
 in some way from the pleasure itself is not only improbable in itself
 but untenable, inasmuch as during the greatest pleasure which is
 connected with the voiding of sexual substance there is no production of
 tension but rather a removal of all tension. Hence, pleasure and sexual
 tension can be only indirectly connected.
 
 *The Role of the Sexual Substance.*--Aside from the fact that only the
 discharge of the sexual substance can normally put an end to the sexual
 excitement, there are other essential facts which bring the sexual
 tension into relation with the sexual products. In a life of continence
 the sexual activity is wont to discharge the sexual substance at night
 during pleasurable dream hallucinations of a sexual act, this discharge
 coming at changing but not at entirely capricious intervals; and the
 following interpretation of this process--the nocturnal pollution--can
 hardly be rejected, viz., that the sexual tension which brings about a
 substitute for the sexual act by the short hallucinatory road is a
 function of the accumulated semen in the reservoirs for the sexual
 products. Experiences with the exhaustibility of the sexual mechanism
 speak for the same thing. Where there is no stock of semen it is not
 only impossible to accomplish the sexual act, but there is also a lack
 of excitability in the erogenous zones, the suitable excitation of which
 can evoke no pleasure. We thus discover incidentally that a certain
 amount of sexual tension is itself necessary for the excitability of the
 erogenous zones.
 
 One would thus be forced to the assumption, which if I am not mistaken
 is quite generally adopted, that the accumulation of sexual substance
 produces and maintains the sexual tension. The pressure of these
 products on the walls of their receptacles acts as an excitant on the
 spinal center, the state of which is then perceived by the higher
 centers which then produce in consciousness the familiar feeling of
 tension. If the excitation of erogenous zones increases the sexual
 tension, it can only be due to the fact that the erogenous zones are
 connected with these centers by previously formed anatomical
 connections. They increase there the tone of the excitation, and with
 sufficient sexual tension they set in motion the sexual act, and with
 insufficient tension they merely stimulate a production of the sexual
 substance.
 
 The weakness of the theory which one finds adopted, _e.g._, in v.
 Krafft-Ebing's description of the sexual process, lies in the fact that
 it has been formed for the sexual activity of the mature man and pays
 too little heed to three kinds of relations which should also have been
 elucidated. We refer to the relations as found in the child, in the
 woman, and in the castrated male. In none of the three cases can we
 speak of an accumulation of sexual products in the same sense as in the
 man, which naturally renders difficult the general application of this
 scheme; still it may be admitted without any further ado that ways can
 be found to justify the subordination of even these cases. Nevertheless
 one should be cautious about burdening the factor of accumulation of
 sexual products with actions which it seems incapable of supporting.
 
 *Overestimation of the Internal Genitals.*--That sexual excitement can
 be independent to a considerable extent of the production of sexual
 substance seems to be shown by observations on castrated males, in whom
 the libido sometimes escapes the injury caused by the operation,
 although the opposite behavior, which is really the motive for the
 operation, is usually the rule. It is therefore not at all surprising,
 as C. Rieger puts it, that the loss of the male germ glands in maturer
 age should exert no new influence on the psychic life of the individual.
 The germ glands are really not the sexuality, and the experience with
 castrated males only verifies what we had long before learned from the
 removal of the ovaries, namely that it is impossible to do away with the
 sexual character by removing the germ glands. To be sure, castration
 performed at a tender age, before puberty, comes nearer to this aim, but
 it would seem in this case that besides the loss of the sexual glands we
 must also consider the inhibition of development and other factors
 which are connected with that loss.
 
 *Chemical Theories.*--The truth remains, however, that we are unable to
 give any information about the nature of the sexual excitement for the
 reason that we do not know with what organ or organs sexuality is
 connected, since we have seen that the sexual glands have been
 overestimated in this significance. Since surprising discoveries have
 taught us the important role of the thyroid gland in sexuality, we may
 assume that the knowledge of the essential factors of sexuality are
 still withheld from us. One who feels the need of filling up the large
 gap in our knowledge with a preliminary assumption may formulate for
 himself the following theory based on the active substances found in the
 thyroid. Through the appropriate excitement of erogenous zones, as well
 as through other conditions under which sexual excitement originates, a
 material which is universally distributed in the organism becomes
 disintegrated, the decomposing products of which supply a specific
 stimulus to the organs of reproduction or to the spinal center connected
 with them. Such a transformation of a toxic stimulus in a particular
 organic stimulus we are already familiar with from other toxic products
 introduced into the body from without. To treat, if only hypothetically,
 the complexities of the pure toxic and the physiologic stimulations
 which result in the sexual processes is not now our appropriate task. To
 be sure, I attach no value to this special assumption and I shall be
 quite ready to give it up in favor of another, provided its original
 character, the emphasis on the sexual chemism, were preserved. For this
 apparently arbitrary statement is supported by a fact which, though
 little heeded, is most noteworthy. The neuroses which can be traced only
 to disturbances of the sexual life show the greatest clinical
 resemblance to the phenomena of intoxication and abstinence which result
 from the habitual introduction of pleasure-producing poisonous
 substances (alkaloids.)
 
 
 THE THEORY OF THE LIBIDO
 
 These assumptions concerning the chemical basis of the sexual excitement
 are in full accord with the auxiliary conception which we formed for the
 purpose of mastering the psychic manifestations of the sexual life. We
 have determined the concept of _libido_ as that of a force of variable
 quantity which has the capacity of measuring processes and
 transformations in the spheres of sexual excitement. This libido we
 distinguished from the energy which is to be generally adjudged to the
 psychic processes with reference to its special origin and thus we
 attribute to it also a qualitative character. In separating libidinous
 from other psychic energy we give expression to the assumption that the
 sexual processes of the organism are differentiated from the nutritional
 processes through a special chemism. The analyses of perversions and
 psychoneuroses have taught us that this sexual excitement is furnished
 not only from the so-called sexual parts alone but from all organs of
 the body. We thus formulate for ourselves the concept of a
 libido-quantum whose psychic representative we designate as the
 ego-libido; the production, increase, distribution and displacement of
 this ego-libido will offer the possible explanation for the observed
 psycho-sexual phenomena.
 
 But this ego-libido becomes conveniently accessible to psychoanalytic
 study only when the psychic energy is employed on sexual objects, that
 is when it becomes object libido. Then we see it as it concentrates and
 fixes itself on objects, or as it leaves those objects and passes over
 to others from which positions it directs the individual's sexual
 activity, that is, it leads to partial and temporary extinction of the
 libido. Psychoanalysis of the so-called transference neuroses (hysteria
 and compulsion neurosis) offers us here a reliable insight.
 
 Concerning the fates of the object libido we also state that it is
 withdrawn from the object, that it is preserved floating in special
 states of tension and is finally taken back into the ego, so that it
 again becomes ego-libido. In contradistinction to the object-libido we
 also call the ego-libido narcissistic libido. From psychoanalysis we
 look over the boundary which we are not permitted to pass into the
 activity of the narcissistic libido and thus form an idea of the
 relations between the two. The narcissistic or ego-libido appears to us
 as the great reservoir from which the energy for the investment of the
 object is sent out and into which it is drawn back again, while the
 narcissistic libido investment of the ego appears to us as the realized
 primitive state in the first childhood, which only becomes hidden by the
 later emissions of the libido, and is retained at the bottom behind
 them.
 
 The task of a theory of libido of neurotic and psychotic disturbances
 would have for its object to express in terms of the libido-economy all
 observed phenomena and disclosed processes. It is easy to divine that
 the greater significance would attach thereby to the destinies of the
 ego-libido, especially where it would be the question of explaining the
 deeper psychotic disturbances. The difficulty then lies in the fact that
 the means of our investigation, psychoanalysis, at present gives us
 definite information only concerning the transformation of the
 object-libido, but cannot distinguish without further study the
 ego-libido from the other effective energies in the ego.[3]
 
 
 DIFFERENTIATION BETWEEN MAN AND WOMAN
 
 It is known that the sharp differentiation of the male and female
 character originates at puberty, and it is the resulting difference
 which, more than any other factor, decisively influences the later
 development of personality. To be sure, the male and female dispositions
 are easily recognizable even in infantile life; thus the development of
 sexual inhibitions (shame, loathing, sympathy, etc.) ensues earlier and
 with less resistance in the little girl than in the little boy. The
 tendency to sexual repression certainly seems much greater, and where
 partial impulses of sexuality are noticed they show a preference for the
 passive form. But, the autoerotic activity of the erogenous zones is the
 same in both sexes, and it is this agreement that removes the
 possibility of a sex differentiation in childhood as it appears after
 puberty. In respect to the autoerotic and masturbatic sexual
 manifestations, it may be asserted that the sexuality of the little girl
 has entirely a male character. Indeed, if one could give a more definite
 content to the terms "masculine and feminine," one might advance the
 opinion that _the libido is regularly and lawfully of a masculine
 nature, whether in the man or in the woman; and if we consider its
 object, this may be either the man or the woman_.[4]
 
 Since becoming acquainted with the aspect of bisexuality I hold this
 factor as here decisive, and I believe that without taking into account
 the factor of bisexuality it will hardly be possible to understand the
 actually observed sexual manifestations in man and woman.
 
 *The Leading Zones in Man and Woman.*--Further than this I can only add
 the following. The chief erogenous zone in the female child is the
 clitoris, which is homologous to the male penis. All I have been able to
 discover concerning masturbation in little girls concerned the clitoris
 and not those other external genitals which are so important for the
 later sexual functions. With few exceptions I myself doubt whether the
 female child can be seduced to anything but clitoris masturbation. The
 frequent spontaneous discharges of sexual excitement in little girls
 manifest themselves in a twitching of the clitoris, and its frequent
 erections enable the girl to understand correctly even without any
 instruction the sexual manifestations of the other sex; they simply
 transfer to the boys the sensations of their own sexual processes.
 
 If one wishes to understand how the little girl becomes a woman, he must
 follow up the further destinies of this clitoris excitation. Puberty,
 which brings to the boy a great advance of libido, distinguishes itself
 in the girl by a new wave of repression which especially concerns the
 clitoris sexuality. It is a part of the male sexual life that sinks into
 repression. The reenforcement of the sexual inhibitions produced in the
 woman by the repression of puberty causes a stimulus in the libido of
 the man and forces it to increase its capacity; with the height of the
 libido there is a rise in the overestimation of the sexual, which can be
 present in its full force only when the woman refuses and denies her
 sexuality. If the sexual act is finally submitted to and the clitoris
 becomes excited its role is then to conduct the excitement to the
 adjacent female parts, and in this it acts like a chip of pine wood
 which is utilized to set fire to the harder wood. It often takes some
 time for this transference to be accomplished; during which the young
 wife remains anesthetic. This anesthesia may become permanent if the
 clitoris zone refuses to give up its excitability; a condition brought
 on by abundant activities in infantile life. It is known that anesthesia
 in women is often only apparent and local. They are anesthetic at the
 vaginal entrance but not at all unexcitable through the clitoris or even
 through other zones. Besides these erogenous causes of anesthesia there
 are also psychic causes likewise determined by the repression.
 
 If the transference of the erogenous excitability from the clitoris to
 the vagina has succeeded, the woman has thus changed her leading zone
 for the future sexual activity; the man on the other hand retains his
 from childhood. The main determinants for the woman's preference for the
 neuroses, especially for hysteria, lie in this change of the leading
 zone as well as in the repression of puberty. These determinants are
 therefore most intimately connected with the nature of femininity.
 
 
 THE OBJECT-FINDING
 
 While the primacy of the genital zones is being established through the
 processes of puberty, and the erected penis in the man imperiously
 points towards the new sexual aim, _i.e._, towards the penetration of a
 cavity which excites the genital zone, the object-finding, for which
 also preparations have been made since early childhood, becomes
 consummated on the psychic side. While the very incipient sexual
 gratifications are still connected with the taking of nourishment, the
 sexual impulse has a sexual object outside its own body in his mother's
 breast. This object it loses later, perhaps at the very time when it
 becomes possible for the child to form a general picture of the person
 to whom the organ granting him the gratification belongs. The sexual
 impulse later regularly becomes autoerotic, and only after overcoming
 the latency period is there a resumption of the original relation. It is
 not without good reason that the suckling of the child at its mother's
 breast has become a model for every amour. The object-finding is really
 a re-finding.[5]
 
 *The Sexual Object of the Nursing Period.*--However, even after the
 separation of the sexual activity from the taking of nourishment, there
 still remains from this first and most important of all sexual relations
 an important share, which prepares the object selection and assists in
 reestablishing the lost happiness. Throughout the latency period the
 child learns to love other persons who assist it in its helplessness and
 gratify its wants; all this follows the model and is a continuation of
 the child's infantile relations to his wet nurse. One may perhaps
 hesitate to identify the tender feelings and esteem of the child for his
 foster-parents with sexual love; I believe, however, that a more
 thorough psychological investigation will establish this identity beyond
 any doubt. The intercourse between the child and its foster-parents is
 for the former an inexhaustible source of sexual excitation and
 gratification of erogenous zones, especially since the parents--or as a
 rule the mother--supplies the child with feelings which originate from
 her own sexual life; she pats it, kisses it, and rocks it, plainly
 taking it as a substitute for a full-valued sexual object.[6] The mother
 would probably be terrified if it were explained to her that all her
 tenderness awakens the sexual impulse of her child and prepares its
 future intensity. She considers her actions as asexually "pure" love,
 for she carefully avoids causing more irritation to the genitals of the
 child than is indispensable in caring for the body. But as we know the
 sexual impulse is not awakened by the excitation of genital zones alone.
 What we call tenderness will some day surely manifest its influence on
 the genital zones also. If the mother better understood the high
 significance of the sexual impulse for the whole psychic life and for
 all ethical and psychic activities, the enlightenment would spare her
 all reproaches. By teaching the child to love she only fulfills her
 function; for the child should become a fit man with energetic sexual
 needs, and accomplish in life all that the impulse urges the man to do.
 Of course, too much parental tenderness becomes harmful because it
 accelerates the sexual maturity, and also because it "spoils" the child
 and makes it unfit to temporarily renounce love or be satisfied with a
 smaller amount of love in later life. One of the surest premonitions of
 later nervousness is the fact that the child shows itself insatiable in
 its demands for parental tenderness; on the other hand, neuropathic
 parents, who usually display a boundless tenderness, often with their
 caressing awaken in the child a disposition for neurotic diseases. This
 example at least shows that neuropathic parents have nearer ways than
 inheritance by which they can transfer their disturbances to their
 children.
 
 *Infantile Fear.*--The children themselves behave from their early
 childhood as if their attachment to their foster-parents were of the
 nature of sexual love. The fear of children is originally nothing but an
 expression for the fact that they miss the beloved person. They
 therefore meet every stranger with fear, they are afraid of the dark
 because they cannot see the beloved person, and are calmed if they can
 grasp that person's hand. The effect of childish fears and of the
 terrifying stories told by nurses is overestimated if one blames the
 latter for producing the fear in children. Children who are predisposed
 to fear absorb these stories, which make no impression whatever upon
 others; and only such children are predisposed to fear whose sexual
 impulse is excessive or prematurely developed, or has become exigent
 through pampering. The child behaves here like the adult, that is, it
 changes its libido into fear when it cannot bring it to gratification,
 and the grown-up who becomes neurotic on account of ungratified libido
 behaves in his anxiety like a child; he fears when he is alone, _i.e._,
 without a person of whose love he believes himself sure, and who can
 calm his fears by means of the most childish measures.[7]
 
 *Incest Barriers.*--If the tenderness of the parents for the child has
 luckily failed to awaken the sexual impulse of the child prematurely,
 _i.e._, before the physical determinations for puberty appear, and if
 that awakening has not gone so far as to cause an unmistakable breaking
 through of the psychic excitement into the genital system, it can then
 fulfill its task and direct the child at the age of maturity in the
 selection of the sexual object. It would, of course, be most natural for
 the child to select as the sexual object that person whom it has loved
 since childhood with, so to speak, a suppressed libido.[8] But owing to
 the delay of sexual maturity time has been gained for the erection
 beside the sexual inhibitions of the incest barrier, that moral
 prescription which explicitly excludes from the object selection the
 beloved person of infancy or blood relation. The observance of this
 barrier is above all a demand of cultural society which must guard
 against the absorption by the family of those interests which it needs
 for the production of higher social units. Society, therefore, uses
 every means to loosen those family ties in every individual, especially
 in the boy, which are authoritative in childhood only.[9]
 
 The object selection, however, is first accomplished in the imagination,
 and the sexual life of the maturing youth has hardly any escape except
 indulgence in phantasies or ideas which are not destined to be brought
 to execution. In the phantasies of all persons the infantile
 inclinations, now reenforced by somatic emphasis, reappear, and among
 them one finds in regular frequency and in the first place the sexual
 feeling of the child for the parents. This has usually already been
 differentiated by the sexual attraction, the attraction of the son for
 the mother and of the daughter for the father.[10] Simultaneously with
 the overcoming and rejection of these distinctly incestuous phantasies
 there occurs one of the most important as well as one of the most
 painful psychic accomplishments of puberty; it is the breaking away from
 the parental authority, through which alone is formed that opposition
 between the new and old generations which is so important for cultural
 progress. Many persons are detained at each of the stations in the
 course of development through which the individual must pass; and
 accordingly there are persons who never overcome the parental authority
 and never, or very imperfectly, withdraw their affection from their
 parents. They are mostly girls, who, to the delight of their parents,
 retain their full infantile love far beyond puberty, and it is
 instructive to find that in their married life these girls are incapable
 of fulfilling their duties to their husbands. They make cold wives and
 remain sexually anesthetic. This shows that the apparently non-sexual
 love for the parents and the sexual love are nourished from the same
 source, _i.e._, that the first merely corresponds to an infantile
 fixation of the libido.
 
 The nearer we come to the deeper disturbances of the psychosexual
 development the more easily we can recognize the evident significance of
 the incestuous object-selection. As a result of sexual rejection there
 remains in the unconscious of the psychoneurotic a great part or the
 whole of the psychosexual activity for object finding. Girls with an
 excessive need for affection and an equal horror for the real demands of
 the sexual life experience an uncontrollable temptation on the one hand
 to realize in life the ideal of the asexual love and on the other hand
 to conceal their libido under an affection which they may manifest
 without self reproach; this they do by clinging for life to the
 infantile attraction for their parents or brothers or sisters which has
 been repressed in puberty. With the help of the symptoms and other
 morbid manifestations, psychoanalysis can trace their unconscious
 thoughts and translate them into the conscious, and thus easily show to
 such persons that they are in love with their consanguinous relations in
 the popular meaning of the term. Likewise when a once healthy person
 falls sick after an unhappy love affair, the mechanism of the disease
 can distinctly be explained as a return of his libido to the persons
 preferred in his infancy.
 
 *The After Effects of the Infantile Object Selection.*--Even those who
 have happily eluded the incestuous fixation of their libido have not
 completely escaped its influence. It is a distinct echo of this phase of
 development that the first serious love of the young man is often for a
 mature woman and that of the girl for an older man equipped with
 authority--_i.e._, for persons who can revive in them the picture of the
 mother and father. Generally speaking object selection unquestionably
 takes place by following more freely these prototypes. The man seeks
 above all the memory picture of his mother as it has dominated him since
 the beginning of childhood; this is quite consistent with the fact that
 the mother, if still living, strives against this, her renewal, and
 meets it with hostility. In view of this significance of the infantile
 relation to the parents for the later selection of the sexual object, it
 is easy to understand that every disturbance of this infantile relation
 brings to a head the most serious results for the sexual life after
 puberty. Jealousy of the lover, too, never lacks the infantile sources
 or at least the infantile reinforcement. Quarrels between parents and
 unhappy marital relations between the same determine the severest
 predispositions for disturbed sexual development or neurotic diseases in
 the children.
 
 The infantile desire for the parents is, to be sure, the most important,
 but not the only trace revived in puberty which points the way to the
 object selection. Other dispositions of the same origin permit the man,
 still supported by his infancy, to develop more than one single sexual
 series and to form different determinations for the object
 selection.[11]
 
 *Prevention of Inversion.*--One of the tasks imposed in the object
 selection consists in not missing the opposite sex. This, as we know, is
 not solved without some difficulty. The first feelings after puberty
 often enough go astray, though not with any permanent injury. Dessoir
 has called attention to the normality of the enthusiastic friendships
 formed by boys and girls with their own sex. The greatest force which
 guards against a permanent inversion of the sexual object is surely the
 attraction exerted by the opposite sex characters on each other. For
 this we can give no explanation in connection with this discussion. This
 factor, however, does not in itself suffice to exclude the inversion;
 besides this there are surely many other supporting factors. Above all,
 there is the authoritative inhibition of society; experience shows that
 where the inversion is not considered a crime it fully corresponds to
 the sexual inclinations of many persons. Moreover, it may be assumed
 that in the man the infantile memories of the mother's tenderness, as
 well as that of other females who cared for him as a child,
 energetically assist in directing his selection to the woman, while the
 early sexual intimidation experienced through the father and the
 attitude of rivalry existing between them deflects the boy from the same
 sex. Both factors also hold true in the case of the girl whose sexual
 activity is under the special care of the mother. This results in a
 hostile relation to the same sex which decisively influences the object
 selection in the normal sense. The bringing up of boys by male persons
 (slaves in the ancient times) seems to favor homosexuality; the
 frequency of inversion in the present day nobility is probably explained
 by their employment of male servants, and by the scant care that mothers
 of that class give to their children. It happens in some hysterics that
 one of the parents has disappeared (through death, divorce, or
 estrangement), thus permitting the remaining parent to absorb all the
 love of the child, and in this way establishing the determinations for
 the sex of the person to be selected later as the sexual object; thus a
 permanent inversion is made possible.
 
 
 SUMMARY
 
 It is now time to attempt a summing-up. We have started from the
 aberrations of the sexual impulse in reference to its object and aim and
 have encountered the question whether these originate from a congenital
 predisposition, or whether they are acquired in consequence of
 influences from life. The answer to this question was reached through an
 examination of the relations of the sexual life of psychoneurotics, a
 numerous group not very remote from the normal. This examination has
 been made through psychoanalytic investigations. We have thus found that
 a tendency to all perversions might be demonstrated in these persons in
 the form of unconscious forces revealing themselves as symptom creators
 and we could say that the neurosis is, as it were, the negative of the
 perversion. In view of the now recognized great diffusion of tendencies
 to perversion the idea forced itself upon us that the disposition to
 perversions is the primitive and universal disposition of the human
 sexual impulse, from which the normal sexual behavior develops in
 consequence of organic changes and psychic inhibitions in the course of
 maturity. We hoped to be able to demonstrate the original disposition in
 the infantile life; among the forces restraining the direction of the
 sexual impulse we have mentioned shame, loathing and sympathy, and the
 social constructions of morality and authority. We have thus been forced
 to perceive in every fixed aberration from the normal sexual life a
 fragment of inhibited development and infantilism. The significance of
 the variations of the original dispositions had to be put into the
 foreground, but between them and the influences of life we had to assume
 a relation of cooeperation and not of opposition. On the other hand, as
 the original disposition must have been a complex one, the sexual
 impulse itself appeared to us as something composed of many factors,
 which in the perversions becomes separated, as it were, into its
 components. The perversions, thus prove themselves to be on the one hand
 inhibitions, and on the other dissociations from the normal development.
 Both conceptions became united in the assumption that the sexual impulse
 of the adult due to the composition of the diverse feelings of the
 infantile life became formed into one unit, one striving, with one
 single aim.
 
 We also added an explanation for the preponderance of perversive
 tendencies in the psychoneurotics by recognizing in these tendencies
 collateral fillings of side branches caused by the shifting of the main
 river bed through repression, and we then turned our examination to the
 sexual life of the infantile period.[12] We found it regrettable that
 the existence of a sexual life in infancy has been disputed, and that
 the sexual manifestations which have been often observed in children
 have been described as abnormal occurrences. It rather seemed to us that
 the child brings along into the world germs of sexual activity and that
 even while taking nourishment it at the same time also enjoys a sexual
 gratification which it then seeks again to procure for itself through
 the familiar activity of "thumbsucking." The sexual activity of the
 child, however, does not develop in the same measure as its other
 functions, but merges first into the so-called latency period from the
 age of three to the age of five years. The production of sexual
 excitation by no means ceases at this period but continues and furnishes
 a stock of energy, the greater part of which is utilized for aims other
 than sexual; namely, on the one hand for the delivery of sexual
 components for social feelings, and on the other hand (by means of
 repression and reaction formation) for the erection of the future sexual
 barriers. Accordingly, the forces which are destined to hold the sexual
 impulse in certain tracks are built up in infancy at the expense of the
 greater part of the perverse sexual feelings and with the assistance of
 education. Another part of the infantile sexual manifestations escapes
 this utilization and may manifest itself as sexual activity. It can then
 be discovered that the sexual excitation of the child flows from diverse
 sources. Above all gratifications originate through the adapted sensible
 excitation of so-called erogenous zones. For these probably any skin
 region or sensory organ may serve; but there are certain distinguished
 erogenous zones the excitation of which by certain organic mechanisms is
 assured from the beginning. Moreover, sexual excitation originates in
 the organism, as it were, as a by-product in a great number of
 processes, as soon as they attain a certain intensity; this especially
 takes place in all strong emotional excitements even if they be of a
 painful nature. The excitations from all these sources do not yet unite,
 but they pursue their aim individually--this aim consisting merely in
 the gaining of a certain pleasure. The sexual impulse of childhood is
 therefore objectless or _autoerotic_.
 
 Still during infancy the erogenous zone of the genitals begins to make
 itself noticeable, either by the fact that like any other erogenous zone
 it furnishes gratification through a suitable sensible stimulus, or
 because in some incomprehensible way the gratification from other
 sources causes at the same time the sexual excitement which has a
 special connection with the genital zone. We found cause to regret that
 a sufficient explanation of the relations between sexual gratification
 and sexual excitement, as well as between the activity of the genital
 zone and the remaining sources of sexuality, was not to be attained.
 
 We were unable to state what amount of sexual activity in childhood
 might be designated as normal to the extent of being incapable of
 further development. The character of the sexual manifestation showed
 itself to be preponderantly masturbatic. We, moreover, verified from
 experience the belief that the external influences of seduction, might
 produce premature breaches in the latency period leading as far as the
 suppression of the same, and that the sexual impulse of the child really
 shows itself to be polymorphous-perverse; furthermore, that every such
 premature sexual activity impairs the educability of the child.
 
 Despite the incompleteness of our examinations of the infantile sexual
 life we were subsequently forced to attempt to study the serious changes
 produced by the appearance of puberty. We selected two of the same as
 criteria, namely, the subordination of all other sources of the sexual
 feeling to the primacy of the genital zones, and the process of object
 finding. Both of them are already developed in childhood. The first is
 accomplished through the mechanism of utilizing the fore-pleasure,
 whereby all other independent sexual acts which are connected with
 pleasure and excitement become preparatory acts for the new sexual aim,
 the voiding of the sexual products, the attainment of which under
 enormous pleasure puts an end to the sexual feeling. At the same time we
 had to consider the differentiation of the sexual nature of man and
 woman, and we found that in order to become a woman a new repression is
 required which abolishes a piece of infantile masculinity, and prepares
 the woman for the change of the leading genital zones. Lastly, we found
 the object selection, tracing it through infancy to its revival in
 puberty; we also found indications of sexual inclinations on the part of
 the child for the parents and foster-parents, which, however, were
 turned away from these persons to others resembling them by the incest
 barriers which had been erected in the meantime. Let us finally add that
 during the transition period of puberty the somatic and psychic
 processes of development proceed side by side, but separately, until
 with the breaking through of an intense psychic love-stimulus for the
 innervation of the genitals, the normally demanded unification of the
 erotic function is established.
 
 *The Factors Disturbing the Development.*--As we have already shown by
 different examples, every step on this long road of development may
 become a point of fixation and every joint in this complicated structure
 may afford opportunity for a dissociation of the sexual impulse. It
 still remains for us to review the various inner and outer factors which
 disturb the development, and to mention the part of the mechanism
 affected by the disturbance emanating from them. The factors which we
 mention here in a series cannot, of course, all be in themselves of
 equal validity and we must expect to meet with difficulties in the
 assigning to the individual factors their due importance.
 
 *Constitution and Heredity.*--In the first place, we must mention here
 the congenital _variation of the sexual constitution_, upon which the
 greatest weight probably falls, but the existence of which, as may be
 easily understood, can be established only through its later
 manifestations and even then not always with great certainty. We
 understand by it a preponderance of one or another of the manifold
 sources of the sexual excitement, and we believe that such a difference
 of disposition must always come to expression in the final result, even
 if it should remain within normal limits. Of course, we can also imagine
 certain variations of the original disposition that even without further
 aid must necessarily lead to the formation of an abnormal sexual life.
 One can call these "degenerative" and consider them as an expression of
 hereditary deterioration. In this connection I have to report a
 remarkable fact. In more than half of the severe cases of hysteria,
 compulsion neuroses, etc., which I have treated by psychotherapy, I have
 succeeded in positively demonstrating that their fathers have gone
 through an attack of syphilis before marriage; they have either suffered
 from tabes or general paresis, or there was a definite history of lues.
 I expressly add that the children who were later neurotic showed
 absolutely no signs of hereditary lues, so that the abnormal sexual
 constitution was to be considered as the last off-shoot of the luetic
 heredity. As far as it is now from my thoughts to put down a descent
 from syphilitic parents as a regular and indispensable etiological
 determination of the neuropathic constitution, I nevertheless maintain
 that the coincidence observed by me is not accidental and not without
 significance.
 
 The hereditary relations of the positive perverts are not so well known
 because they know how to avoid inquiry. Still there is reason to believe
 that the same holds true in the perversions as in the neuroses. We often
 find perversions and psychoneuroses in the different sexes of the same
 family, so distributed that the male members, or one of them, is a
 positive pervert, while the females, following the repressive tendencies
 of their sex, are negative perverts or hysterics. This is a good example
 of the substantial relations between the two disturbances which I have
 discovered.
 
 *Further Elaboration.*--It cannot, however, be maintained that the
 structure of the sexual life is rendered finally complete by the
 addition of the diverse components of the sexual constitution. On the
 contrary, qualifications continue to appear and new possibilities
 result, depending upon the fate experienced by the sexual streams
 originating from the individual sources. This _further elaboration_ is
 evidently the final and decisive one while the constitution described as
 uniform may lead to three final issues. If all the dispositions assumed
 to be abnormal retain their relative proportion, and are strengthened
 with maturity, the ultimate result can only be a perverse sexual life.
 The analysis of such abnormally constituted dispositions has not yet
 been thoroughly undertaken, but we already know cases that can be
 readily explained in the light of these theories. Authors believe, for
 example, that a whole series of fixation perversions must necessarily
 have had as their basis a congenital weakness of the sexual impulse. The
 statement seems to me untenable in this form, but it becomes ingenious
 if it refers to a constitutional weakness of one factor in the sexual
 impulse, namely, the genital zone, which later in the interests of
 propagation accepts as a function the sum of the individual sexual
 activities. In this case the summation which is demanded in puberty must
 fail and the strongest of the other sexual components continues its
 activity as a perversion.[13]
 
 *Repression.*--Another issue results if in the course of development
 certain powerful components experience a _repression_--which we must
 carefully note is not a suspension. The excitations in question are
 produced as usual but are prevented from attaining their aim by psychic
 hindrances, and are driven off into many other paths until they express
 themselves in a symptom. The result can be an almost normal sexual
 life--usually a limited one--but supplemented by psychoneurotic disease.
 It is these cases that become so familiar to us through the
 psychoanalytic investigation of neurotics. The sexual life of such
 persons begins like that of perverts, a considerable part of their
 childhood is filled up with perverse sexual activity which occasionally
 extends far beyond the period of maturity, but owing to inner reasons a
 repressive change then results--usually before puberty, but now and then
 even much later--and from this point on without any extinction of the
 old feelings there appears a neurosis instead of a perversion. One may
 recall here the saying, "Junge Hure, alte Betschwester,"--only here
 youth has turned out to be much too short. The relieving of the
 perversion by the neurosis in the life of the same person, as well as
 the above mentioned distribution of perversion and hysteria in different
 persons of the same family, must be placed side by side with the fact
 that the neurosis is the negative of the perversion.
 
 *Sublimation.*--The third issue in abnormal constitutional dispositions
 is made possible by the process of "sublimation," through which the
 powerful excitations from individual sources of sexuality are discharged
 and utilized in other spheres, so that a considerable increase of
 psychic capacity results from an, in itself dangerous, predisposition.
 This forms one the sources of artistic activity, and, according as such
 sublimation is complete or incomplete, the analysis of the character of
 highly gifted, especially of artistically disposed persons, will show
 any proportionate, blending between productive ability, perversion, and
 neurosis. A sub-species of sublimation is the suppression through
 _reaction-formation_, which, as we have found, begins even in the
 latency period of infancy, only to continue throughout life in
 favorable cases. What we call the _character_ of a person is built up to
 a great extent from the material of sexual excitations; it is composed
 of impulses fixed since infancy and won through sublimation, and of such
 constructions as are destined to suppress effectually those perverse
 feelings which are recognized as useless. The general perverse sexual
 disposition of childhood can therefore be esteemed as a source of a
 number of our virtues, insofar as it incites their creation through the
 formation of reactions.[14]
 
 *Accidental Experiences.*--All other influences lose in significance
 when compared with the sexual discharges, shifts of repressions, and
 sublimations; the inner determinations for the last two processes are
 totally unknown to us. He who includes repressions and sublimations
 among constitutional predispositions, and considers them as the living
 manifestations of the same, has surely the right to maintain that the
 final structure of the sexual life is above all the result of the
 congenital constitution. No intelligent person, however, will dispute
 that in such a cooeperation of factors there is also room for the
 modifying influences of occasional factors derived from experience in
 childhood and later on.
 
 It is not easy to estimate the effectiveness of the constitutional and
 of the occasional factors in their relation to each other. Theory is
 always inclined to overestimate the first while therapeutic practice
 renders prominent the significance of the latter. By no means should it
 be forgotten that between the two there exists a relation of cooeperation
 and not of exclusion. The constitutional factor must wait for
 experiences which bring it to the surface, while the occasional needs
 the support of the constitutional factor in order to become effective.
 For the majority of cases one can imagine a so-called "etiological
 group" in which the declining intensities of one factor become balanced
 by the rise in the others, but there is no reason to deny the existence
 of extremes at the ends of the group.
 
 It would be still more in harmony with psychoanalytic investigation if
 the experiences of early childhood would get a place of preference among
 the occasional factors. The one etiological group then becomes split up
 into two which may be designated as the dispositional and the definitive
 groups. Constitution and occasional infantile experiences are just as
 cooeperative in the first as disposition and later traumatic experiences
 in the second group. All the factors which injure the sexual development
 show their effect in that they produce a _regression_, or a return to a
 former phase of development.
 
 We may now continue with our task of enumerating the factors which have
 become known to us as influential for the sexual development, whether
 they be active forces or merely manifestations of the same.
 
 *Prematurity.*--Such a factor is the spontaneous sexual _prematurity_
 which can be definitely demonstrated at least in the etiology of the
 neuroses, though in itself it is as little adequate for causation as the
 other factors. It manifests itself in a breaking through, shortening, or
 suspending of the infantile latency period and becomes a cause of
 disturbances inasmuch as it provokes sexual manifestations which, either
 on account of the unready state of the sexual inhibitions or because of
 the undeveloped state of the genital system, can only carry along the
 character of perversions. These tendencies to perversion may either
 remain as such, or after the repression sets in they may become motive
 powers for neurotic symptoms; at all events, the sexual prematurity
 renders difficult the desirable later control of the sexual impulse by
 the higher psychic influences, and enhances the compulsive-like
 character which even without this prematurity would be claimed by the
 psychic representatives of the impulse. Sexual prematurity often runs
 parallel with premature intellectual development; it is found as such in
 the infantile history of the most distinguished and most productive
 individuals, and in such connection it does not seem to act as
 pathogenically as when appearing isolated.
 
 *Temporal Factors.*--Just like prematurity, other factors, which under
 the designation of _temporal_ can be added to prematurity, also demand
 consideration. It seems to be phylogenetically established in what
 sequence the individual impulsive feelings become active, and how long
 they can manifest themselves before they succumb to the influence of a
 newly appearing active impulse or to a typical repression. But both in
 this temporal succession as well as in the duration of the same,
 variations seem to occur, which must exercise a definite influence on
 the experience. It cannot be a matter of indifference whether a certain
 stream appears earlier or later than its counterstream, for the effect
 of a repression cannot be made retrogressive; a temporal deviation in
 the composition of the components regularly produces a change in the
 result. On the other hand impulsive feelings which appear with special
 intensity often come to a surprisingly rapid end, as in the case of the
 heterosexual attachment of the later manifest homosexuals. The strivings
 of childhood which manifest themselves most impetuously do not justify
 the fear that they will lastingly dominate the character of the
 grown-up; one has as much right to expect that they will disappear in
 order to make room for their counterparts. (Harsh masters do not rule
 long.) To what one may attribute such temporal confusions of the
 processes of development we are hardly able to suggest. A view is opened
 here to a deeper phalanx of biological, and perhaps also historical
 problems, which we have not yet approached within fighting distance.
 
 *Adhesion.*--The significance of all premature sexual manifestations is
 enhanced by a psychic factor of unknown origin which at present can be
 put down only as a psychological preliminary. I believe that it is the
 _heightened adhesion_ or _fixedness_ of these impressions of the sexual
 life which in later neurotics, as well as in perverts, must be added for
 the completion of the other facts; for the same premature sexual
 manifestations in other persons cannot impress themselves deeply enough
 to repeat themselves compulsively and to succeed in prescribing the way
 for the sexual impulse throughout later life. Perhaps a part of the
 explanation for this adhesion lies in another psychic factor which we
 cannot miss in the causation of the neuroses, namely, in the
 preponderance which in the psychic life falls to the share of memory
 traces as compared with recent impressions. This factor is apparently
 dependent on the intellectual development and grows with the growth of
 personal culture. In contrast to this the savage has been characterized
 as "the unfortunate child of the moment."[15] Owing to the oppositional
 relation existing between culture and the free development of sexuality,
 the results of which may be traced far into the formation of our life,
 the problem how the sexual life of the child evolves is of very little
 importance for the later life in the lower stages of culture and
 civilization, and of very great importance in the higher.
 
 *Fixation.*--The influence of the psychic factors just mentioned favored
 the development of the accidentally experienced impulses of the
 infantile sexuality. The latter (especially in the form of seductions
 through other children or through adults) produce the material which,
 with the help of the former, may become fixed as a permanent
 disturbance. A considerable number of the deviations from the normal
 sexual life observed later have been thus established in neurotics and
 perverts from the beginning through the impressions received during the
 alleged sexually free period of childhood. The causation is produced by
 the responsiveness of the constitution, the prematurity, the quality of
 heightened adhesion, and the accidental excitement of the sexual impulse
 through outside influence.
 
 The unsatisfactory conclusions which have resulted from this
 investigation of the disturbances of the sexual life is due to the fact
 that we as yet know too little concerning the biological processes in
 which the nature of sexuality consists to form from our isolated
 examinations a satisfactory theory for the explanation of either the
 normal or the pathological.
 
 [1] The differences will be emphasized in the schematic representation
 given in the text. To what extent the infantile sexuality approaches the
 definitive sexual organization through its object selection has been
 discussed before (p. 60).
 
 [2] See my work, Wit and its Relation to the Unconscious, translated by
 A.A. Brill, Moffat Yard Pub. Co., New York: "The fore-pleasure gained by
 the technique of wit is utilized for the purpose of setting free a
 greater pleasure by the removal of inner inhibitions."
 
 [3] Cf. Zur Einfuehrung des Narzismus, Jahrbuch der Psychoanalyse, VI,
 1913.
 
 [4] It is necessary to make clear that the conceptions "masculine" and
 "feminine," whose content seems so unequivocal to the ordinary meaning,
 belong to the most confused terms in science and can be cut up into at
 least three paths. One uses masculine and feminine at times in the sense
 of activity and passivity, again, in the biological sense, and then also
 in the sociological sense. The first of these three meanings is the
 essential one and the only one utilizable in psychoanalysis. It agrees
 with the masculine designation of the libido in the text above, for the
 libido is always active even when it is directed to a passive aim. The
 second, the biological significance of masculine and feminine, is the
 one which permits the clearest determination. Masculine and feminine are
 here characterized by the presence of semen or ovum and through the
 functions emanating from them. The activity and its secondary
 manifestations, like stronger developed muscles, aggression, a greater
 intensity of libido, are as a rule soldered to the biological
 masculinity but not necessarily connected with it, for there are species
 of animals in whom these qualities are attributed to the female. The
 third, the sociological meaning, receives its content through the
 observation of the actual existing male and female individuals. The
 result of this in man is that there is no pure masculinity or feminity
 either in the biological or psychological sense. On the contrary every
 individual person shows a mixture of his own biological sex
 characteristics with the biological traits of the other sex and a union
 of activity and passivity; this is the case whether these psychological
 characteristic features depend on the biological or whether they are
 independent of it.
 
 [5] Psychoanalysis teaches that there are two paths of object-finding;
 the first is the one discussed in the text which is guided by the early
 infantile prototypes. The second is the narcissistic which seeks its own
 ego and finds it in the other. The latter is of particularly great
 significance for the pathological outcomes, but does not fit into the
 connection treated here.
 
 [6] Those to whom this conception appears "wicked" may read Havelock
 Ellis's treatise on the relations between mother and child which
 expresses almost the same ideas (The Sexual Impulse, p. 16).
 
 [7] For the explanation of the origin of the infantile fear I am
 indebted to a three-year-old boy whom I once heard calling from a dark
 room: "Aunt, talk to me, I am afraid because it is dark." "How will that
 help you," answered the aunt; "you cannot see anyhow." "That's nothing,"
 answered the child; "if some one talks then it becomes light."--He was,
 as we see, not afraid of the darkness but he was afraid because he
 missed the person he loved, and he could promise to calm down as soon as
 he was assured of her presence.
 
 [8] Cf. here what was said on page 83 concerning the object selection of
 the child; the "tender stream."
 
 [9] The incest barrier probably belongs to the historical acquisitions
 of humanity and like other moral taboos it must be fixed in many
 individuals through organic heredity. (Cf. my work, Totem and Taboo,
 1913.) Psychoanalytic studies show, however, how intensively the
 individual struggles with the incest temptations during his development
 and how frequently he puts them into phantasies and even into reality.
 
 [10] Compare the description concerning the inevitable relation in the
 Oedipus legend (The Interpretation of Dreams, p. 222, translated by A.A.
 Brill, The Macmillan Co., New York, and Allen & Unwin, London).
 
 [11] Innumerable peculiarities of the human love-life as well as the
 compulsiveness of being in love itself can surely only be understood
 through a reference to childhood or as an effective remnant of the same.
 
 [12] This was true not only of the "negative" tendencies to perversion
 appearing in the neurosis, but also of the so-called positive
 perversions. The latter are not only to be attributed to the fixation of
 the infantile tendencies, but also to regression to these tendencies
 owing to the misplacement of other paths of the sexual stream. Hence the
 positive perversions are also accessible to psychoanalytic therapy. (Cf.
 the works of Sadger, Ferenczi, and Brill.)
 
 [13] Here one often sees that at first a normal sexual stream begins at
 the age of puberty, but owing to its inner weakness it breaks down at
 the first outer hindrance and then changes from regression, to perverse
 fixation.
 
 [14] That keen observer of human nature, E. Zola, describes a girl in
 his book, La Joie de vivre, who in cheerful self renunciation offers all
 she has in possession or expectation, her fortune and her life's hopes
 to those she loves without thought of return. The childhood of this girl
 was dominated by an insatiable desire for love which whenever she was
 depreciated caused her to merge into a fit of cruelty.
 
 [15] It is possible that the heightened adhesion is only the result of a
 special intensive somatic sexual manifestation of former years.
 
 
 
 
 INDEX
 
 
 Aberrations (see Perversions)
   a fragment of inhibited development, 89
   Sexual, 1, 13, 14
   shown by the psychoneurotic, 29
   with animals, 13
 
 Absolute Inversion (sexual object of the same sex), 2
 
 Activity and Passivity in sexual aim in exhibitionism, 21
   of Sadism and Masochism, 23
   precursors and masculine and feminine, 59
 
 Activity, Muscular, 63
 
 Adhesion, heightened, or fixedness of impressions of sexual life, 99
   may be only result of a special intensive somatic sexual manifestation of former years, 99
 
 Affective Processes, 64
   pathogenic action of, 64
   value of unconscious thought formation, 27
 
 Aggression, Sadism and Masochism not attributable to mixture of, 24
   taint of, shown by sexuality of most men, 22
 
 Agoraphobia and neurotic disturbances of walking, 64, note 22
 
 Aims of impulses distinguish them from one another, 31
 
 Algolagnia, 22
 
 Alkaloids, introduction of, analogous in neuroses and phenomena of intoxication and abstinence, 76
 
 Ambivalence, 59
 
 Amnesia, Infantile, 37
   connected with infantile sexual activity, 51
   and hysterical compared, 39
 
 Amphigenous inversion, 2
 
 Anal Erotic, 10, note 11
   Zone, activity of, 47
     erogenous significance of, 48
     masturbatic irritation of, 49
 
 Androgyny, 8
 
 Anesthesia, causes of, are partly psychic, 81
   continuance of, caused by retention of clitoris excitability, 81
   of newly married women, 80
   of wives due to parent complex, 85
   of women often only apparent and local, 81
   of women only at vaginal entrance, 81
 
 Animals as sexual objects, 13
 
 Anus (see also Anal)
   as aim of inverts, 12; 17
   especially frequent example of transgression, 29
   part played by erogenous zone in, 32
 
 Anxiety on railroads, 63
 
 Archaic constitution, 10, note 11
 
 Arduin, Dr., 9, note 11
 
 Attractions connected with pleasure, 70
 
 Autoerotism, the gratification of sexual impulse on own body, 43
   separation of, from object love, not temporal, 55, note 19
   essential, of infantile sexuality, 58
   of erogenous zones, same in boy and girl, 79
   regular, of sexual impulse, 81
 
 
 Baths, warm, therapeutic effects of, 62
 
 Bayer, 40, note 6
 
 Beautiful, concept of, 21
   a quality of excitation, 70
 
 Bell, S., 37,
   note 2; 55,
   note 19
 
 Binet; 19; 34
 
 Birth theories, 57
 
 Bisexuality, Relation of, 7
   as explanation of inversion, 9, note 11
     Sadism and Masochism, 24
   necessary to understanding of sexual in man and woman, 80
 
 Bladder, disturbances of childhood sexual in nature, 51
 
 Bleuler, 37, note 2; 60
 
 Bloch, I., 1, note 1; 5; 16
 
 Breast, rubbing of, 43
   woman's, as erogenous zone, 71
 
 
 Cadavers, 25
 
 Cannibalistic pregenital phase, 59
 
 Castration complex, 22; 56
   of males does not always injure sexual libido, 75
 
 Catarrh, intestinal, produces irritations in anal zone, 48
 
 Cathartic treatment, 26
 
 Character built up from the material of sexual excitations, 96
   composed of impulses fixed since infancy and won through sublimation, 96
   of individual determined by infantile sexual activity, 50
 
 Chemical theories of sexual excitement, 76
 
 Chevalier, 7; 9, note 11
 
 Childish, see Infantile
 
 Children and neurotics compared, 38
   as sexual objects, 13
   cruelty especially characteristic of, 30
   educability of, impaired by premature sexual activity, 91
   impressionability of, 38
   in school, behavior of and germinating sexuality, 64
   sexual life of, 40
 
 Clitoris, chief erogenous zone in female child, 80
   erection of, in little girls, 80
   excitability retained causes continuance of anesthesia, 81
   excitation, destinies of, 80
     conducts excitement to adjacent female parts, 80
     transfer of, to other parts, takes time, 80
   sexuality is a part of male sexual life, 80
   sexuality repressed in girl at puberty, 80
 
 Coitus, 36
 
 Colin, 23
 
 Complex, castration, 22; 56
   Oedipus, 85
   parent, 15, note 14
     strongest in girls, 85
 
 Compulsion emanating from unconscious psychic material, 51
   inversion is perceived as a morbid, 3
   neurosis, 32
   psychoanalysis enlightens ego libido, 77
   from fixation on erogenous zones in infancy, 77
 
 Congeniality in inversions, 4
   of perversions in all persons, 34
 
 Conscience, 22
 
 Constitutional factor, relation of, to occasional 96
 
 Contrary Sexuals, 2
 
 Conversion, 27
 
 Coprophilic smell desire, 20, note 19
 
 Copulation, 14
 
 Courting, 22
 
 Craving, best English word for libido, 1, note 2
 
 Cruelty and sexual impulse most intimately connected, 23
   as component of infantile sexual life regarding others as sexual objects, 53
   especially near the childish character, 54
   partial desires as carriers of impulses of, 30
 
 Culture and sex, 41
 
 
 Dangers of fore-pleasure, 72
 
 Degeneration, nervous, 4
   high ethical culture in, 5
 
 Dementia praecox, 26
 
 Desire, coprophilic smell, 20, note 19
   for knowledge, 55
   immense sexual, in hysteria, 28
   partial, 29
 
 Dessoir, 87
 
 Donation, idea of, 48; 49
 
 Drinking, desire for, in former thumbsuckers, 44
 
 
 Ear lobe pulling, 42
 
 Eating, sexuality of, 66
 
 Ego-Libido (see Libido)
 
 Ellis, H., 1, note 1; 6; 8; 23; 43; 52, note 18
 
 End Pleasure (see Gratification, Orgasm, Pleasure)
   new to age after puberty, 72
 
 Enuresis nocturna corresponds to a pollution, 51
 
 Erection of clitoris in little girls, 80
   of penis, a somatic sign of sexual excitation, 69
 
 Erogenous action of pain, 65
   functions, disturbance of, in lip zone, 66
   significance of anal zone, 48
   zones, partial impulses and, 31
     significance of in psychoneuroses, 32
     preponderance of special, in psychoneuroses, 34
     source of sexual feelings of infantile years, 41
     lips as, 44
     characters of, 45
     predestined, 46
     show same characters as hysterogenous, 46
     any part of body may become, 46, note 12
     significance of anal zone, 48
     premature activity in, indicated by cruelty, 54
     parts of skin called, 65
     one of three ways of stimulation of sexual apparatus, 69
     their manner of adjustment to new order, 70
     role of, in preparing sexual excitation, 70
     increase tension, 71
     make possible the gratification pleasure, 72
     contribute unusual pleasure in infantile life, 72
     connected anatomically with centers producing tension, 74
     autoerotism of, same in boy and girl, 79
     chief, in female child is the clitoris, 80
     changed from clitoris to vagina, mark of womanhood, 81
     change of leading, determines woman's preference for neuroses, 81
     gratified by intercourse between child and foster parents, 82
 
 Etiological group, 97
   composed of dispositional and definitive groups, 97
 
 Eulenberg, 1, note 1
 
 Excitement enhanced by preliminary activities, 14
     hunger, 16
   influences, three kinds of, 62
   sexual, nature of, entirely unfamiliar, 66
     prepared by erogenous zones, 70
     result of any of three kinds of stimuli, 69
 
 Exhibitionism (see Looking, Peeping, Voyeur)
   as a perversion, 21
   partial desires as carriers of, 30
   the eye as erogenous zone in, 32
   as component of infantile sexual life, 53
 
 Eye as erogenous zone, 32; 70
 
 
 Faith, 15
 
 Father, sexual intimidation experienced through, averts inversion, 88
 
 Fear, infantile, 83
     only expresses child's missing beloved person, 83
   influence of, sexually exciting, 64
   of being alone alike in child and neurotic, 84
   of dark, infantile, 83
   of grown up neurotic like that of children, 84
   only children with excessive sexual impulse disposed to, 83
   sought as sexual excitement, 64
 
 Feces, licking of, 25
   retention of, a source of pleasure, 48
     a cause of constipation, 49
 
 Feelings, perverted, 34
 
 Female (see Masculine and Feminine)
 
 Female child, entirely made character of in autoerotism and masturbation, 79
 
 Fere, 23
 
 Ferenczi, 15, note 14
 
 Fetichism, 18
   Binet's findings in, 34
   nothing in unconscious streams of thought inclining to, 30
   of foot, 20, note 19
 
 Fixation, 99
   of impulses accidentally experienced, 99
 
 Fliess, W., 10, note 11; 29, note 26; 41, note 7
 
 Foot, as unfit substitute for sexual object, 18
   fetichism of, 20, note 19
 
 Fore-Pleasure, connection of, with infantile life strengthened by pathogenic role, 72
   dangers of, 72
   is that of excitation of erogenous zones, 72
   mechanism contains danger to attainment of normal sexual aim, 72
   primacy of genital zones and the, 69
   same as that furnished by infantile sexual impulse, 72
   too much endangers attainment of normal sexual aim, 72
 
 Fur, 19
 
 Fusions, 26
   activity of, 49
 
 
 Genital zone, primacy of, 69
   external, in woman, so important for later sexual functions, 80
   overestimation of internal, 75
   gratification of, 52
 
 Genitals, erogenous zones behave like real, in hysteria, 32
   looking only at, becomes a perversion, 21
   male, in all persons, the infantile sexual theory, 56
   mouth and anus playing role of, 29
   opening of female, unknown to children, 58
   primacy of, intended by nature, 50
   rubbed by children while pleasure sucking, 43
   sexual impulse of reawakens, 50
   touching of, caused by strong excitements in children, 64
 
 Gley, E., 9, note 11
 
 Globus, hysterical, in former thumbsuckers, 45
 
 Gratification pleasure of orgasm, 71
   sexual, 3; 14
   picture of, in suckling, 44
   relation of, to sexual excitement not explained, 91
   the best hypnotic, 43
 
 Groos, K., 37, note 2
 
 
 Hair, 18
 
 Halban, 8
 
 Hall, G.S., 37, note 2
 
 Hemorrhoids and neurotic states, 48
 
 Heredity, 36
 
 Herman, G., 10, note 11
 
 Hermaphrodites, psychosexual, 2; 7
   anatomical, 7
 
 Hetero-sexual feelings, 3, note 5; 29, note 26
   intercourse, dangers of, fix inversions, 6
 
 Hirschfeld, M., 1, note 1; 9, note 11
 
 Hoche, 16
 
 Homosexual, 2
   among Greeks, 11
   favored by bringing up of boys by men, 88
   inclination resulting in inversion, 6
   in men, 11
   in women, 12
   object selection accomplished by all men in the unconscious, 10, note 11
 
 Hug-Hellmuth, Mrs. Dr. H., 37, note 2
 
 Hunger and sex compared, 1
   excitement, 16
 
 Hypnosis (suggestion), 3, note 4
   obedience in, shows nature of, to be fixation on hypnotizer, 15, note 14
   removes inversion, 6
 
 Hysteria, immense sexual desire in, 28
   male, explained by propensity to inversion, 29
   many cases of have syphilitic fathers, 93
   preference for, in women determined by change of leading erogenous zone, 81
     determined by repression of puberty, 81
   psychoanalysis in, 26
   of, enlightens the ego-libido, 77
     removes symptoms of, 27
   seduction as frequent cause of, 52
   some cases of, conditioned by disappearance of one parent, 88
   symptomatology of, tendency to displacement in, 46
 
 Hysterical globus, 45
   vomiting, 44; 45
 
 Hysterogenous zones show same characteristics as erogenous, 46
 
 
 Ideal of sexual life, the union of all desires in one object, 61
 
 Identification as development out of oral pregenital sexual organization, 59
 
 Immature as sexual objects, 13
 
 Impotence, 20
 
 Impulse development, 9
   partial, 31
     independent of each other, strive for pleasure, 58
   sexual, 1
     acquired, 5
   to mastery, foreshadowed in boys' masturbation, 50
 
 Incest barriers, 84
   object selection significant in psychosexual disturbances, 86
   phantasies rejected, 85
   temptations, struggle of the individual with, 85, note 9
 
 Infantile amnesia, 37
     and infantile sexual activity, 51
   attraction for parents, etc., repressed in puberty, 86
   desire for parents, 87
   factor for sexuality, 39
   fear, 83; 84, note 7
   fixation of libido, 86
   in sexuality, 34
     conserved by neurotics, 35
   masturbation, 51
   neglect of the, 36
   object selection, after effects of, 86
   onanism almost universal, 50
   relations to parents, produces serious results to sexual life, 87
       cause of jealousy of lover, 87
     wet nurse, 82
   reminiscences in neurotics, 40
   sexual activity, 50
     aim, 45; 46
     excitement generously provided for, 65
     impulse same as adult fore-pleasure, 72
     investigation, failure of, 57
   sexuality, 36
     manifestations of, 42
     determines normal, 73
     source of, 61
   sexual life, 53
 
 Influences, opposite, paths of, 66
 
 Inhibitions (see Shame, Loathing, Sympathy) 26, note 23
   sexual, 40
     develop earlier in girl, 78
   study of, 58
 
 Innateness, 5
 
 Inner organic world, one of three stimulants of sexual apparatus, 69
 
 Inquisitiveness, 55
   of children attracted to sexual problems, 56
 
 Intentions, Appearance of New, 20
 
 Intellectual work, 65
 
 Intensity of stimulus, a factor in sexual excitement, 65
 
 Intestinal catarrh in neurosis, 48
 
 Inversion, amphigenous, 2
   influence of climate and race on, 5
   conception of, 4
   congeniality of, 4
   corresponds to sexual inclinations of many persons, 88
   effect of father on, 11, note 11
   explanation of, 6; 10, note 11
   extreme cases of, 3
   feelings of, in all neurotics, 29
   frequent in ancient times, 5
   permanent, made possible by a disappearance of one parent, 88
   prevention of, 87
   time of, 3
 
 Inverts, behavior of, 2; 3
   psychic manliness in, 8
   sexual object of, 10
   aim of, 12
 
 Investigation, infantile sexual, 55
   conducted alone, 58
   is first step at independent orientation, 58
   causes estrangement from persons, 58
 
 Itching, feeling of, projected into peripheral erogenous zone, 47
 
 
 Kiernan, 7
 
 Kinderfehler, Die (periodical), 37, note 2
 
 Kissing (see Mouth, Oral)
   as perversion, 15
   habitual, in former thumbsuckers, 44
   in female inverts, 12
 
 Knowledge, desire for, cooeperates with energy of desire for looking, 56
   not wholly sexual, 55
   relations to sexual life of particular importance to, 56
 
 Krafft-Ebing, 1, note 1; 9, and note 11; 22; 23
   weakness of his description of sexual process, 75
 
 
 Latency Period, Sexual in Childhood, 39; 40
   interruptions of, 41
 
 Leading Zone in man and woman, 80
   in female child is the clitoris, 80
 
 Libido as term for sexual feeling corresponding to hunger, 1
   of inverts, 3
   direction of, determined by experience in early childhood, 6
   attachment of, to persons of same sex, 10, note 11
   fixation of, on hypnotizer, 15, note 14
   amount of directed to artistic aim, 21
   aggressive factor of, in sadism, 23
   strivings of, transformed into symptoms, 28
   fixation of, on persons of same sex, 29
   union of cruelty with, in neurotics and paranoiacs, 30
   of psychoneurotics unable to obtain normal sexual gratification, 33
   of children in corporal punishment, 55
   tension of, dies away at orgasm, 71
   sometimes escapes injury in castration, 75
   Theory of, 77
   a force of variable quantity capable of measuring sexual processes, 77
   a concept auxiliary to chemical theory, 77
   energy has a qualitative character, 77
     has special chemism different from nutritional processes, 77
   quantum psychically represented by ego-libido, 77
   production, increase, distribution and displacement of the Ego-, explains psychosexual phenomena, 77
   accessibility of the Ego- to psychoanalysis, 77
   the Ego- becomes Object-Libido, 77
   fate of the Object- is to be withdrawn from the object, 77
     is to be preserved floating in special states of tension, 77
     is to be finally taken back into the Ego, 77
   The Ego- is called the narcissistic Libido, 78
     greater significance of, in psychotic disturbances, 78
   is regularly of a masculine character in man and woman, 79
   the object of may be either man or woman, 79
   of child, when ungratified is changed into fear, 84
   suppressed, of love of child to parents, 84
   infantile fixation of, causes sexual love for parents, 86
   girls conceal, under affection for family, 86
   return of, to persons preferred in infancy, 86
   incestuous fixation of, not completely escaped, 86
 
 Lindner, 42; 43
 
 Lingering at intermediary relations, 15; 20
   at preparatory act of sexual process is mechanism of many perversions, 73
 
 Lip as erogenous zone, 44
   sexual utilization of mucous membrane of, 16
   sucking of, 42
   zone is responsible for sexual gratification during eating, 66
 
 Loathing, feeling of, protects individual from improper sexual aims, 16; 17
   overcoming of, at sight of excretion, produces voyeurs, 21
   and Shame in Masochism, 23
     in Inversions, 25
   as psychic force inhibiting sexual life, 40
 
 Looking (see Peeping, Voyeurs)
   as addition to normal sexual process, 14
   Lingering at Touching and, 20
   as a perversion, 21
   and exhibition mania, the eye an erogenous zone in, 32
   as component of infantile sexual life with others as object, 53
 
 Love, omnipotence of, 25
   and hate, 30
   temporary renouncement of, in child, 83
   smaller amount of, than mother love to satisfy individual in later life, 83
   non-sexual and sexual, for parents, nourished from same source, 86
   sexual, corresponds to an infantile fixation of the Libido, 86
   -life, peculiarities of, understood only through childhood, 87, note 11
 
 Loewenfeld, 1, note 1
 
 Lydston, F., 7
 
 
 Magnan's classification, 4
 
 Man (see Bisexuality, Masculine and Feminine)
   sexual development of, more consistent and easier to understand, 68
   differentiation between, and woman, 78
 
 Masculine and feminine, 79
   as activity and passivity, 79, note 4
   biological significance of, permits clearest determination, 79 note 4
   in sociological sense, 79, note 4
     no pure, in either biological or sociological sense, 79, note 4
 
 Masochism, in relation between hypnotized and hypnotist, 15, note 14
   and Sadism, 21
   originates through transformation from Sadism, 22
   and Sadism occupy special place among perversions, 23
   reinforced by Sadism in exhibitionism, 30
   source of, in painful irritation of gluteal region, 55
   -Sadism impulse rooted in erogenous action of pain, 65
 
 Mastery, impulse to, foreshadowed in boys' masturbation, 50
   source of cruelty in children, 54
   supplies activity, 59
 
 Masturbatic sexual manifestations, 47
   excitation of anal zone, 49
   irritation of anal zone, 49
   sexual manifestations have same male character in boy and girl, 79
 
 Masturbation frequently the exclusive aim in inversion, 12
   in small children, 36
   thumb-sucking and, 43
   infantile, has three phases, 50
     return of, 51
   in little girls concerns clitoris only, 80
 
 Mechanical excitation, 62
 
 Memory traces preponderate over recent impressions in causation of neuroses, 99
 
 Moebius, 1, note 1; 4, note 6; 34
 
 Moll, 1, note 1; 32; 37, note 1
 
 Morality as a psychic dam, 41
 
 Mother, fixation on, in inverts, 11, note 12
   image helps males avert inversions, 88
   image helps females avert inversions, 88
 
 Motion, pleasure of, sexual in nature, 64, note 22
 
 Mouth (see Lip, Oral)
   Sexual Utilization of Mucous Membrane of Lips and, 16
   as a frequent example of transgression, 29
   as an erogenous zone, 31
 
 Muscular activity, pleasure from, 63
 
 
 Narcissism in object selection, 10, note 11
   as identification with mother, 12, note 12
 
 Narcissistic Libido a name for Ego-Libido, 78
   a reservoir of energy for investment of object, 78
   investment of ego a realized primitive state, 78
 
 Nausea on railroads, 63
 
 Neurosis and perversion, 28
   the negative of a perversion, 29; 89
   intestinal catarrh in, 48
   symptomatology of, traced to disturbance of sexual processes, 67
   a factor in the causation of, is preponderance of memory traces, 99
 
 Neurotics and children compared, 38
   infantile reminiscences in, 40
   scatologic customs of, 49
   diseases, disposition for, awakened by over tender parents, 83
   have nearer ways than tenderness to transfer their disturbances to their children, 38
   fixedness of impressions of sexual life in, 99
 
 Nursing Period, Sexual Object of, 82
 
 
 Object finding, 81
     is consummated on psychic side at anatomical puberty, 81
     is really a re-finding (of the mother), 82
     two paths of, shown by psychoanalysis, 82, note 5
   selection must avoid beloved person of infancy, 84
     first accomplished in imagination, 85
     incestuous, significant in psychosexual disturbances, 86
     after effects of infantile, 86
     follows prototypes of parents, 86
 
 Obsessions explained only through psychoanalysis, 26
 
 Occasional inversion, 2
 
 Oedipus Complex, 85
 
 Onanism (see Masturbation)
   mutual, not producing inversion, 6
   infantile, almost universal, 50
   unusual techniques in, show prohibition overcome, 50, note 15
   infantile, disappears soon, 50
   connected by conscience-stricken neurotics with their neurosis, 51, note 16
   gratification in infantile masturbation, 51
   early active, as determinant of pollution-like process, 51
 
 Opposite Influences, Paths of, 66
 
 Oral (see Lip, Mouth)
   pregenital sexual organization, 59
 
 Organizations, Pregenital, 54; 58
 
 Orgasm, thumb-sucking leading to, 43
 
 Overestimation of the Sexual Object, 15
 
 Overwork, nervous disturbances of mental, caused by simultaneous sexual excitement, 65
 
 
 Pain ranks with loathing and shame, 23
 
 Pain sought by many persons, 64
   toned down has erogenous action, 65
   a factor in sexual excitement, 65
 
 Paranoia, knowledge of sexual impulse in, gained only through psychoanalysis, 26
   delusional fears in, based on perversions, 29, note 25
   union of cruelty with libido in, 30
   significance of erogenous zones in, 32
 
 Parent complex, 15, note 14
   strongest in girls, 85
   result of boundless tenderness of parents, 83
 
 Partial desires, 29
   impulses and erogenous zones, 31; 34; 53; 59
     show passive form in girls, 79
 
 Passivity (see Activity)
   sexual aim present in exhibitionism in active and passive form, 21
   active and passive forms of Sadism-Masochism, 23
 
 Pedicatio, 17
 
 Peeping (see Exhibitionism, Looking, Voyeurs)
   as perversion, 21
   force opposed to, is shame, 21
   mania, partial desires as carriers of, 30
   as strongest motive power for formation of neurotic symptoms, 54
 
 Penis, envy of in girls, 37
   erection of, the somatic sign of sexual excitation, 69
 
 Perez, 37, note 2
 
 Perversions, as additions to normal sexual processes, 14
   brought into relation with normal sexual life, 15
   mouth as sexual organ in, 16
   Sadism-Masochism the most significant of, 22
   general statements applicable to, 24
   exclusiveness and fixation of, 25
   psychic participation in, 25
   and neurosis, 28; 29
   fetichisms as, 30
   positive, 31
   preponderance of sexual, in psychoneuroses, 32
   sexual impulse of psychoneurotics possesses unusual tendency to, 33
   relation of predisposition to, and morbid picture, 34
   formation of, 52
   of prostitutes, 53
   part played in, by castration complex, 22
   mechanism of many, represents a lingering at a preparatory act, 73
   the neuroses the negative of the, 89
   disposition to, universal, 89
   as inhibitions and dissociations from normal development, 89
   negative appearing in neurosis, 89, note 12
   positive and negative in the same family, 94
   resulting from the strongest of other sexual components, 94
   of childhood as source of some virtues, 96
 
 Phantasies the only escape of the maturing youth, 85
   of the individual in struggle with incest temptation, 85, note 9
   of all persons contain infantile inclinations, 85
   distinctly incestuous, rejected, 85
 
 Pleasure sucking, 42; 43
   relation of feeling of, to unpleasant tension, 70
   relations of, the weakest spot in present day psychology, 70
   the last, of sexual acts differs earlier pleasures, 71
     produced through discharge, 71
     is altogether gratification pleasure, 71
   nature of, more deeply entered into in the study of wit, 72
 
 Pollution, process similar to, in infancy, 51
     caused by strong excitements in children, 64
   nocturnal, due to accumulation of semen, 74
 
 Polymorphous-perverse disposition, 52
 
 Precursory Sexual Aims, 20
 
 Predisposition, bisexual, 9
 
 Pregenital organization as phase of sexual life, 54; 58
   phase of organization of sexual life, 59
     sadistic-anal, 59
   organizations, assumption of, based on analysis of neuroses, 60
 
 Prematurity, spontaneous sexual, a factor influential for sexual development, 97
   shown in breaking through, shortening or suspending of infantile latency period, 97
   becomes cause of disturbances in provoking sexual manifestations having character of perversions, 97
   sexual, runs parallel with intellectual prematurity, 98
 
 Prevention of inversion, 87
 
 Primacy of the Genitals, 50; 69
   attained at puberty, 68
   already sketched out in infantile life, 73
   for propagation, the last phase of sexual organization, 60
 
 Primitive Psychic Mechanisms, 10, note 11
 
 Prostitute fitted for her activity by polymorphous-perverse disposition, 53
 
 Psychic participation in perversions, 25
   life one of three stimuli of sexual apparatus, 69
   sign of sexual excitation a feeling of tension, 69
   accomplishment of puberty is breaking away from parental authority, 85
 
 Psychoanalysis, cures by, 3
   of homosexuals, 10, note 11
   reveals psychic mechanism of genesis of inversion, 11, note 12
 
 Psychoanalysis, 26
   shows early intimidation from normal sexual aims, 18, note 17
   explains fetichism, 20, note 19
   reduces bisexuality to activity and passivity, 24
   reduces symptoms of hysteria, 27
   unconscious phantasies revealed by, 29, note 25
   of thumb-sucking, 43
   of anal zone, 47
   brings forgotten material to consciousness, 51
   of infantile sexuality, 55, note 19
   and inquisitiveness of children, 56
   and pregenital organizations, 58
   and tenderness of sexual life, 61
   novelty of, 66
   of transference psychoses, 77
   gives at present definite information only about transformations of object-libido, 78
   cannot distinguish ego-libido from other effective energies, 78
   shows two paths of object finding, 82, note 5
   shows individual struggle with incest temptations, 85, note 9
   positive perversions accessible to therapy of, 90, note 12
 
 Psychoneuroses based on sexual motive powers, 26
   associated with manifest inversions, 29, note 26
   traces of all perversions in, 30
   significance of erogenous zones in, 32
   preponderance of special erogenous zones in, 34
 
 Psychoneurotics, sexual life of, explained only through psychoanalysis, 26
   Sexual Activities of, 27
   disease of, appears after puberty, 33
   constitution of, tendency to inversions in, 34
   sexuality of preserves infantile character, 39
 
 Psychosexual hermaphrodites show indifference to which sex their object belongs, 2
   not paralleled by other psychic qualities, 8
   phenomena explained by nature of ego-libido, 77
   development, disturbances of, show incestuous object selection, 86
 
 Puberty not the time of the beginning of the sexual impulse, 1; 36
   relation of, to inversion, 3
   definite sexual behavior not determined till after, 10, note 11
   Transformations of, 68
   most striking process of, the growth of the genitals, 69
 
 
 Railroad activities, sexual element in, 62
 
 Reaction formation, 40
     and sublimation two diverse processes, 41
   feelings of, 41
   formation begins in latency period, 95
 
 Reading as source of sexual excitement through fear, 64
 
 Regression appears in sex development of woman, 68
   produced by factors injuring sexual development, 97
 
 Repression of certain powerful components, 94
   not a suspension, 95
   result of, an almost normal sexual life, 95
 
 Repression, inner determinations of, unknown, 96
   effect of, cannot be made retrogressive, 98
   a special process cutting off conscious discharge of wishes, 27
 
 Repression of heterosexual feeling in psychoneurosis, 29, note 26
   Sadism resulting from shows masochistic tendencies, 30
   immense amount, in inverts, 33
   congenital roots of sexual impulse undergo insufficient, 35
   of impressions of childhood, 38
   sexual, greater in girl, 79
   new wave of, distinguishes puberty of girl, 80
   determines psychic causes of anesthesia, 81
   of puberty determines woman's preference for neuroses, 81
   a new, required, abolishing a piece of infantile masculinity, 92
 
 Resistances, shame, loathing, fear and pain as, 25
 
 Rhythm in sucking analogous to tickling, 45
   of mechanical shaking of the body produces sexual excitation, 62
 
 Riddle of the Sphinx, 56
 
 Rieger, C., 75
 
 Rohleder, 47, note 13
 
 Rousseau, J.J., 55
 
 
 Sadger, J., 1
 
 Sadism (see Masochism)
   and Masochism, 21
     occupy special place among perversions, 23
   conception of, fluctuates, 22
   attributable to bisexuality, 24
   resulting from repression paralleled by Masochism, 30
   attributed by children to sexual act, 57
   prevalence of, 60
   -Masochism impulse, rooted in erogenous action of pain, 65
 
 Sadistic-anal pregenital sexual organization, 59
 
 Sadistic impulse from muscular activity, 64
 
 Scatologic customs of neurotics, 49
 
 Schrenk-Notzing, 1, note 1
 
 Scott, 23
 
 Secondary sex characteristics, 8
 
 Seduction does not necessarily produce inverts, 6
   treating child as a sexual object, 51
   as outer cause of return of sexual activity in childhood, 51
   not necessary to awaken sexual life of child, 52
   does not explain original relations of sexual impulse, 53
 
 Semen, role of, unknown to children, 58
 
 Sex characteristics, Secondary and Tertiary, 8
   culture and, 41
 
 Sexual Aberrations, 1
     a transition of variations of sexual impulse to the pathological, 19
   act, theories of children as to, 57
   activities, of psychoneurotics, 27
     premature, of children, impair educability, 91
   activities, infantile leave profoundest impressions, 50
   aim abandoned in childhood, 40
     at puberty different in the two sexes, 68
     Deviation in Reference to, 14
     distinction between, and sexual object, 1
     Fixation of Precursory, 20
     in man the discharge of the sexual products, 68
     of infantile impulse, 46
     of infantile sexuality, 45
     of Inverts, 12
     perversion may be substituted for, by normal person, 24
     should be restricted to union of genitals, 16
   apparatus, weakness of, 18
   constitutions, diverse, 66
     variation of, 93
   contrary, 2
   development of man easier to understand, than woman's, 68
   disturbances, paths of, a means of sublimation, 67
     serviceable in health, 67
   excitation of nursing period, 51
     is one result of three ways of stimulation of the sexual apparatus, 69
   excitement originates
     (_a_) as imitation of a previous gratification, 61
     (_b_) as a stimulation of erogenous zones, 61
     (_c_) as the expression of some impulse, 61
     sources of, tested by quality of stimulus, 65
     inner sources of, 65
     nature of, unfamiliar to us, 66
     indirect source of, not equally strong in all persons, 66
     influences availability of voluntary attention, 67
     problem of, 73
     normally ended only by discharge of semen, 74
     independent of an accumulation of sexual substance, 75
     furnished not only from so-called sexual parts, 77
     intercourse between parents and child an inexhaustible source of, 82
   gratification found by inverts in object of same sex, 3
   impression, 5
   Impulse, 1
     acquired, 5
     too close connection of, with object assumed, 12
     entirely independent of its object, 13
     most poorly controlled of all by higher psychic activities, 14
     alone was extolled by the ancients, 14, note 13
     Masochism in, causes unconscious fixation of libido on the hypnotist, 15, note 14
     closely connected with cruelty, 23
     the source of symptoms of neuroses, 27
     perverse, converted expression of, 29
     in psychoneuroses, 33
     ignorance of essential features of, 36
     becomes altruistic, 68
     regularly becomes autoerotic, 81
     not awakened, 82
     of genitals reawakens, 50
     primitive formation of, 42
   inhibition, 40
   inversion, 2
     presupposes that sexual object is reverse of normal, 10
   inverts, 1, note 1
   investigation, infantile, 55
   latency period, in childhood, 39
   life of children, 40
     shows components regarding others as sexual objects, 53
     tender streams of, 61
     normality of guaranteed by concurrence of two streams, 68
     all disturbances of, as inhibitions of development, 69
     development of, of children unimportant in lower stages of culture and important in higher, 99
   love shown by children towards parents at an early date, 83
   manifestations in childhood, exceptional, 39
     the masturbatic, 47
   object is the person from whom the sexual attraction emanates, 1
     Deviation in Reference to the, 2
     inaccessibility of, leads to occasional inversion, 3
     of inverts, 10
     male inverts look for real feminine psychic features in, 11
     female active inverts look for femininity in, 12
     the sexually immature and animals as, 13
     emphasis placed by moderns on the, 14, note 13
     lingering at intermediary relations to, one of the perversions, 15
   object, overestimation of the, 15
     unfit substitutes for, 18
     selection in very young children, 55, note 19
     found at puberty, 68
     and aim concurrent in normal sexual life, 68
     in mother's breast, 81
     lost when infant forms general picture of person, 81
     of nursing period, 82
   organization, pregenital oral, 59
   overestimation of, rises only when woman refuses, 80
   process, motive power for, escapes in fore-pleasure, 72
   rejection leaves in unconscious of neurotic the psychosexual activity for object finding, 86
   satisfaction from muscular activity, 63
   substance, role of, 74
   symbolism of forms of motion, 63
   tension loosened by copulation, 14
     implies feeling of displeasure, 70
     carries impulse to alter psychic situation, 70
     appears even in infancy, 73
     does not originate in pleasure, 74
     and pleasure only indirectly connected, 74
     a certain amount of, necessary for the excitability of the erogenous zones, 74
   theories, infantile, are reproductions of child's sexual constitution, 57
 
 Sexuality as the weak point of the otherwise normal, 14
   infantilism of, 34
   infantile factor in, 39
   infantile, manifestations of, 42
   sexual aim of infantile, 45
   germinating, affecting children's behavior in school, 64
   encroached upon by all intensive affective processes, 64
   partial impulses of, 65
   of eating, 66
   ways between, and other functions traversible in both directions, 66
   does not consist entirely in male germ glands, 75
   of clitoris repressed in girl at puberty, 80
 
 Sexuals, Contrary, 2
 
 Shame is a force opposed to the peeping mania, 21
   as a resistance opposed to the libido, 23, 25
   as force acting as an inhibition on sexual life, 40
 
 Shoe as a symbol of female genital, 19, note 18
 
 Skin as erogenous zone, 32
   as factor of sexual excitement, 65
 
 Sleep caused by pleasure-sucking, 43
 
 Smell desire, coprophilic, 20, note 19
 
 Smoking, desire for in former thumb-suckers, 44
 
 Sphinx, Riddle of, 56
 
 Sports turn youth away from sexual activity, 64
 
 Stimulus produced by isolated excitements coming from without, 31
   outer, removing sensitiveness with gratification, 47
   quality of, as criterion of sources of sexual excitement, 65
   can set in motion complicated sexual apparatus, 69
   affects the sexual apparatus in three ways, 69
 
 Sublimation, artistic, 21
   Reaction Formation and, 40
   a deviation of sexual motive powers from sexual aims, 41
   and reaction formation two diverse processes, 41, note 8
   desire for knowledge corresponds to, 55
   effected on paths by which sexual disturbances encroach upon other functions of the body, 67
   makes possible a third issue in abnormal constitutional dispositions, 95
   inner processes of, totally unknown, 96
 
 Sucking, see Thumb-sucking,--
 
 Symbolism of fetichism, 19, 20
   sexual, of early childhood, 55, note 19
 
 Symptomatology of neurotic determined by infantile sexual activity, 50
   of pollution-like process, 51
   of neuroses traced to disturbance of the sexual processes, 67
     manifested in disturbances of other non-sexual bodily functions, 67
 
 Symptoms, creators of, are unconscious forces, 89
   of psychoneuroses are the sexual activities of the patient, 27
 
 Syphilis in fathers of more than half the cases of hysteria, compulsion-neurosis, etc., treated by Freud, 93
 
 
 Temperature sensitiveness, as result of distinct erogenous action, 62
 
 Temporal Factors, 98
 
 Tension, sexual, loosened by copulation, 14, 70
     feeling of, 46
       the psychic sign of sexual excitation, 69
   unpleasant, relation of, to feeling of pleasure, 70
   increase in changing to displeasure, 71
   increased by functions of erogenous zones, 71
   of libido dies away at orgasm, 71
   too little, endangers attainment of sexual aim, 72
 
 Tertiary sex characteristics, 8
 
 Theatre as source of sexual excitement through fear, 64
 
 Thumb-sucking as model of infantile sexual manifestations, 42
   a sexual activity, 43
   as remnant of oral phase of pregenital sexual organization, 59
 
 Thyroid gland, role of, in sexuality, 76
 
 Tickling analogous to rhythmic sucking, 45
   demanding onanistic gratification, 51
 
 Toe, sucking of, 42
 
 Tongue, sucking of, 42
 
 Touching as preliminary to sexual aim, 14
   and looking, 20
   hand as addition to attraction of sexual object, 70
 
 Transference neuroses, 77
   of erogenous excitability from clitoris to vagina, 81
 
 Transformation of puberty, 68
   success of, dependent on adjustment to dispositions and impulses, 68
 
 Transgressions, anatomical, 15
   especially frequent, are those to mouth and anus, 29
 
 
 Ulrich, 9
 
 Unconscious, all neurotics have feelings of inversion in, 29
   nothing in, corresponds to fetichism, 30
   psychic material is the source of compulsions, 51
   forces revealing themselves as symptom creators, 89
 
 Uranism, 5, note 7
 
 Urinary apparatus, the guardian of the genital, 51
 
 
 Vagina, glandular activity of, the somatic sign of sexual excitation, 69
 
 Vomiting, hysterical, evinced after repression of thumb-sucking, 44
 
 Voyeurs (see Looking, Peeping, Exhibitionism)
   as examples of overcoming of loathing, 21
   exhibitionists are at the same time, 30
   children become, 54
 
 
 Wishes, symptoms of hysteria are substitutes for, 27
 
 Wit as source of greater knowledge of pleasure, 72
 
 Woman (see Masculine and feminine)
   regression in sex development of, 68
   differentiation between man and, 78
 
 Work, intellectual, as sexual excitement, 65
 
 
 Zola, 96
 
 Zone, chief erogenous, in female child is the clitoris, 80
 
 Zones, erogenous, 31
     characters of, 45
     predestined, 46
   lips as erogenous, 44
   all parts of body may become erogenous, 46
   genital, gratification of, taught by seduction, 52
   erogenous, premature activity of, indicated by cruelty, 54
     parts of skin called, 65
   lip, responsible for sexual gratification during eating, 66
   primacy of genital, 69
   erogenous, prepare sexual excitement, 70
   leading, in man and woman, 80
 
 
 
 
 Volume VII                  July, 1920                  Number 3
 
 The Psychoanalytic Review
 
 A Journal Devoted to an Understanding of Human Conduct
 
 EDITED AND PUBLISHED BY
 
 WILLIAM A. WHITE, M.D., and SMITH ELY JELLIFFE, M.D.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 CONTENTS
 
 ORIGINAL ARTICLES
      *Freud's Concept of the "Censorship".* W.H.R. RIVERS.
      *Psychology of War and Schizophrenia.* E.W. LAZELL.
      *The Paraphrenic's Inaccessibility.* M.K. ISHAM.
 TRANSLATION
      *Psychological Psychiatry.* H.F. DELGADO.
 ABSTRACTS. *Book Reviews*
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 Issued Quarterly: $6.00 per Volume,
 Single Numbers, $1.75
 Foreign, $6.60
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 NERVOUS AND MENTAL DISEASE PUBLISHING COMPANY
 
 41 NORTH QUEEN STREET, LANCASTER, PA.,
 and
 3617 10th ST., N.W., WASHINGTON, D. C.
 
 Serial No. 27
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 Entered as Second-Class Matter October 25, 1913, at the Post Office at
 Lancaster, Pennsylvania under the Act of March 3, 1879.
 
 
 
 
 Publishers of
 
 The Psychoanalytic Review
 
 A Journal Devoted to the Understanding of Human Conduct
 
 Edited by WILLIAM A. WHITE, M.D., and SMITH ELY JELLIFFE, M.D. Leading
 Articles Which Have Appeared in Previous Volumes
 
 VOL. I. (Beginning November, 1913.)
 
 The Theory of Psychoanalysis. C.G. Jung.
 Psychoanalysis of Self-Mutilation. L.E. Emerson.
 Blindness as a Wish. T.H. Ames.
 The Technique of Psychoanalysis. S.E. Jelliffe.
 Wishfulfillment and Symbolism in Fairy Tales. Riklin.
 Character and the Neuroses. Trigant Burrow.
 The Wildisbush Crucified Saint. Theodore Schroeder.
 The Pragmatic Advantage of Freudo-Analysis. Knight Dunlap.
 Moon Myth in Medicine. William A. White.
 The Sadism of Oscar Wilde's "Salome." Isador H. Coriat.
 Psychoanalysis and Hospitals. L.E. Emerson.
 The Dream as a Simple Wishfulfillment in the Negro. John E. Lind.
 
 VOL. II. (Beginning January, 1915.)
 
 The Principles of Pain-Pleasure and Reality. Paul Federn.
 The Unconscious. William A. White.
 A Plea for a Broader Standpoint in Psychoanalysis. Meyer Solomon.
 Contributions to the Pathology of Everyday Life; Their Relation to
      Abnormal Mental Phenomena. Robert Stewart Miller.
 The Integrative Functions of the Nervous System Applied to Some
      Reactions in Human Behavior and their Attending Psychic Functions.
      Edward J. Kempf.
 A Manic-Depressive Upset Presenting Frank Wish-Realization Construction.
      Ralph Reed.
 Psychoanalytic Parallels. William A. White.
 Role of Sexual Complex in Dementia Praecox. James C. Hassall.
 Psycho-Genetics of Androcratic Evolution. Theodore Schroeder.
 Significance of Psychoanalysis for the Mental Sciences. Otto Rank and
      Hans Sachs.
 Some Studies in the Psychopathology of Acute Dissociation of the
      Personality. Edward J. Kempf.
 Psychoanalysis. Arthur H. Ring.
 A Philosophy for Psychoanalysis. L.E. Emerson.
 
 VOL. III. (Beginning January, 1916.)
 
 Symbolism. William A. White.
 The Work of Alfred Adler, Considered with Especial Reference to that of
      Freud. James J. Putnam.
 Art in the Insane. L. Grimberg.
 Retaliation Dreams. Hansell Crenshaw.
 History of the Psychoanalytic Movement. Sigmund Freud.
 Clinical Cases Exhibiting Unconscious Defence Reactions. Francis H.
      Shockley.
 Processes of Recovery in Schizophrenics. H. Bertschinger.
 Freud and Sociology. Ernest R. Groves.
 The Ontogenetic Against the Phylogenetic Elements in the Psychoses of
      the Colored Race. Arrah B. Evarts.
 Discomfiture and Evil Spirits. Elsie Clews Parsons.
 Two Very Definite Wish-Fulfillment Dreams. C.B. Burr.
 
 VOL. IV. (Beginning January, 1917.)
 
 Individuality and Introversion. William A. White.
 A Study of a Severe Case of Compulsion Neurosis. H.W. Frink.
 A Summary of Material on the Topical Community of Primitive and
      Pathological Symbols ("Archeopathic" Symbols), F.L. Wells.
 A Literary Forerunner of Freud. Helen Williston Brown.
 The Technique of Dream Interpretation. Wilhelm Steckel.
 The Social and Sexual Behavior of Infrahuman Primates with some
      Comparable Facts in Human Behavior. Edw. J. Kempf.
 Pain as a Reaction of Defence. H.B. Moyle.
 Some Statistical Results of the Psychoanalytic Treatment of
      Psychoneuroses. Isador H. Coriat. The Role of Animals in the
      Unconscious. S.E. Jelliffe and L. Brink.
 The Genesis and Meaning of Homosexuality. Trigant Burrow.
 Phylogenetic Elements in the Psychoses of the Negro. John E. Lind.
 Freudian Elements in the Animism of the Niger Delta. E.R. Groves.
 The Mechanism of Transference. William A. White.
 The Future of Psychoanalysis. Isador H. Coriat.
 Hermaphroditic Dreams. Isador H. Coriat.
 The Psychology of "The Yellow Jacket." E.J. Kempf.
 Heredity and Self-Conceit. Mabel Stevens.
 The Long Handicap. Helen R. Hull.
 
 VOL. V. (Beginning January, 1918.)
 
 Analysis of a Case of Manic-Depressive Psychosis Showing well-marked
      Regressive Stages. Lucile Dooley.
 Reactions to Personal Names. C.P. Oberndorf.
 A Study of the Mental Life of the Child. H. von Hug-Hellmuth.
 An Interpretation of Certain Symbolisms. J.J. Putnam.
 Charles Darwin--The Affective Source of His Inspiration and Anxiety
      Neurosis. Edw. J. Kempf.
 The Origin of the Incest-Awe. Trigant Burrow.
 Compulsion and Freedom: The Fantasy of the Willow Tree. S.E. Jelliffe
      and L. Brink.
 A Case of Childhood Conflicts with Prominent Reference to the Urinary
      System: with some General Considerations on Urinary Symptoms in the
      Psychoneuroses and Psychoses. C. Macfie Campbell.
 The Hound of Heaven. Thomas Vernon Moore.
 A Lace Creation Revealing an Incest Fantasy. Arrah B. Evarts.
 Nephew and Maternal Uncle: A Motive of Early Literature in the Light of
      Freudian Psychology. Albert K. Weinberg.
 
 All the leading foreign psychoanalytic journals are regularly
 abstracted, and all books dealing with psychoanalysis are reviewed.
 
 Issued Quarterly: $5.00 per Volume.
 
 Single Copies: $1.50                                   Foreign, $5.60.
 
 Nervous and Mental Disease Publishing Company
 
 3617 Tenth Street, N.W.                               WASHINGTON, D.C.
 
 
 
 
 
 End of the Project Gutenberg EBook of Three Contributions to the Theory of

 
 
 
 Produced by David Newman, Joel Schlosberg and the Online Distributed
 Proofreading Team.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 DREAM PSYCHOLOGY
 
 _PSYCHOANALYSIS FOR BEGINNERS_
 
 BY
 PROF. DR. SIGMUND FREUD
 
 AUTHORIZED ENGLISH TRANSLATION
 BY
 M.D. EDER
 
 WITH AN INTRODUCTION BY
 ANDRE TRIDON
 Author of "Psychoanalysis, its History, Theory and Practice."
 "Psychoanalysis and Behavior" and "Psychoanalysis, Sleep and Dreams"
 
 NEW YORK
 THE JAMES A. McCANN COMPANY
 1920
 
 
 
 
 THE JAMES A. McCANN COMPANY
 
 PRINTED IN THE U.S.A.
 
 
 
 
 INTRODUCTION
 
 
 The medical profession is justly conservative. Human life should not be
 considered as the proper material for wild experiments.
 
 Conservatism, however, is too often a welcome excuse for lazy minds,
 loath to adapt themselves to fast changing conditions.
 
 Remember the scornful reception which first was accorded to Freud's
 discoveries in the domain of the unconscious.
 
 When after years of patient observations, he finally decided to appear
 before medical bodies to tell them modestly of some facts which always
 recurred in his dream and his patients' dreams, he was first laughed at
 and then avoided as a crank.
 
 The words "dream interpretation" were and still are indeed fraught with
 unpleasant, unscientific associations. They remind one of all sorts of
 childish, superstitious notions, which make up the thread and woof of
 dream books, read by none but the ignorant and the primitive.
 
 The wealth of detail, the infinite care never to let anything pass
 unexplained, with which he presented to the public the result of his
 investigations, are impressing more and more serious-minded scientists,
 but the examination of his evidential data demands arduous work and
 presupposes an absolutely open mind.
 
 This is why we still encounter men, totally unfamiliar with Freud's
 writings, men who were not even interested enough in the subject to
 attempt an interpretation of their dreams or their patients' dreams,
 deriding Freud's theories and combatting them with the help of
 statements which he never made.
 
 Some of them, like Professor Boris Sidis, reach at times conclusions
 which are strangely similar to Freud's, but in their ignorance of
 psychoanalytic literature, they fail to credit Freud for observations
 antedating theirs.
 
 Besides those who sneer at dream study, because they have never looked
 into the subject, there are those who do not dare to face the facts
 revealed by dream study. Dreams tell us many an unpleasant biological
 truth about ourselves and only very free minds can thrive on such a
 diet. Self-deception is a plant which withers fast in the pellucid
 atmosphere of dream investigation.
 
 The weakling and the neurotic attached to his neurosis are not anxious
 to turn such a powerful searchlight upon the dark corners of their
 psychology.
 
 Freud's theories are anything but theoretical.
 
 He was moved by the fact that there always seemed to be a close
 connection between his patients' dreams and their mental abnormalities,
 to collect thousands of dreams and to compare them with the case
 histories in his possession.
 
 He did not start out with a preconceived bias, hoping to find evidence
 which might support his views. He looked at facts a thousand times
 "until they began to tell him something."
 
 His attitude toward dream study was, in other words, that of a
 statistician who does not know, and has no means of foreseeing, what
 conclusions will be forced on him by the information he is gathering,
 but who is fully prepared to accept those unavoidable conclusions.
 
 This was indeed a novel way in psychology. Psychologists had always been
 wont to build, in what Bleuler calls "autistic ways," that is through
 methods in no wise supported by evidence, some attractive hypothesis,
 which sprung from their brain, like Minerva from Jove's brain, fully
 armed.
 
 After which, they would stretch upon that unyielding frame the hide of a
 reality which they had previously killed.
 
 It is only to minds suffering from the same distortions, to minds also
 autistically inclined, that those empty, artificial structures appear
 acceptable molds for philosophic thinking.
 
 The pragmatic view that "truth is what works" had not been as yet
 expressed when Freud published his revolutionary views on the psychology
 of dreams.
 
 Five facts of first magnitude were made obvious to the world by his
 interpretation of dreams.
 
 First of all, Freud pointed out a constant connection between some part
 of every dream and some detail of the dreamer's life during the previous
 waking state. This positively establishes a relation between sleeping
 states and waking states and disposes of the widely prevalent view that
 dreams are purely nonsensical phenomena coming from nowhere and leading
 nowhere.
 
 Secondly, Freud, after studying the dreamer's life and modes of thought,
 after noting down all his mannerisms and the apparently insignificant
 details of his conduct which reveal his secret thoughts, came to the
 conclusion that there was in every dream the attempted or successful
 gratification of some wish, conscious or unconscious.
 
 Thirdly, he proved that many of our dream visions are symbolical, which
 causes us to consider them as absurd and unintelligible; the
 universality of those symbols, however, makes them very transparent to
 the trained observer.
 
 Fourthly, Freud showed that sexual desires play an enormous part in our
 unconscious, a part which puritanical hypocrisy has always tried to
 minimize, if not to ignore entirely.
 
 Finally, Freud established a direct connection between dreams and
 insanity, between the symbolic visions of our sleep and the symbolic
 actions of the mentally deranged.
 
 There were, of course, many other observations which Freud made while
 dissecting the dreams of his patients, but not all of them present as
 much interest as the foregoing nor were they as revolutionary or likely
 to wield as much influence on modern psychiatry.
 
 Other explorers have struck the path blazed by Freud and leading into
 man's unconscious. Jung of Zurich, Adler of Vienna and Kempf of
 Washington, D.C., have made to the study of the unconscious,
 contributions which have brought that study into fields which Freud
 himself never dreamt of invading.
 
 One fact which cannot be too emphatically stated, however, is that but
 for Freud's wishfulfillment theory of dreams, neither Jung's "energic
 theory," nor Adler's theory of "organ inferiority and compensation,"
 nor Kempf's "dynamic mechanism" might have been formulated.
 
 Freud is the father of modern abnormal psychology and he established the
 psychoanalytical point of view. No one who is not well grounded in
 Freudian lore can hope to achieve any work of value in the field of
 psychoanalysis.
 
 On the other hand, let no one repeat the absurd assertion that Freudism
 is a sort of religion bounded with dogmas and requiring an act of faith.
 Freudism as such was merely a stage in the development of
 psychoanalysis, a stage out of which all but a few bigoted camp
 followers, totally lacking in originality, have evolved. Thousands of
 stones have been added to the structure erected by the Viennese
 physician and many more will be added in the course of time.
 
 But the new additions to that structure would collapse like a house of
 cards but for the original foundations which are as indestructible as
 Harvey's statement as to the circulation of the blood.
 
 Regardless of whatever additions or changes have been made to the
 original structure, the analytic point of view remains unchanged.
 
 That point of view is not only revolutionising all the methods of
 diagnosis and treatment of mental derangements, but compelling the
 intelligent, up-to-date physician to revise entirely his attitude to
 almost every kind of disease.
 
 The insane are no longer absurd and pitiable people, to be herded in
 asylums till nature either cures them or relieves them, through death,
 of their misery. The insane who have not been made so by actual injury
 to their brain or nervous system, are the victims of unconscious forces
 which cause them to do abnormally things which they might be helped to
 do normally.
 
 Insight into one's psychology is replacing victoriously sedatives and
 rest cures.
 
 Physicians dealing with "purely" physical cases have begun to take into
 serious consideration the "mental" factors which have predisposed a
 patient to certain ailments.
 
 Freud's views have also made a revision of all ethical and social values
 unavoidable and have thrown an unexpected flood of light upon literary
 and artistic accomplishment.
 
 But the Freudian point of view, or more broadly speaking, the
 psychoanalytic point of view, shall ever remain a puzzle to those who,
 from laziness or indifference, refuse to survey with the great Viennese
 the field over which he carefully groped his way. We shall never be
 convinced until we repeat under his guidance all his laboratory
 experiments.
 
 We must follow him through the thickets of the unconscious, through the
 land which had never been charted because academic philosophers,
 following the line of least effort, had decided _a priori_ that it could
 not be charted.
 
 Ancient geographers, when exhausting their store of information about
 distant lands, yielded to an unscientific craving for romance and,
 without any evidence to support their day dreams, filled the blank
 spaces left on their maps by unexplored tracts with amusing inserts such
 as "Here there are lions."
 
 Thanks to Freud's interpretation of dreams the "royal road" into the
 unconscious is now open to all explorers. They shall not find lions,
 they shall find man himself, and the record of all his life and of his
 struggle with reality.
 
 And it is only after seeing man as his unconscious, revealed by his
 dreams, presents him to us that we shall understand him fully. For as
 Freud said to Putnam: "We are what we are because we have been what we
 have been."
 
 Not a few serious-minded students, however, have been discouraged from
 attempting a study of Freud's dream psychology.
 
 The book in which he originally offered to the world his interpretation
 of dreams was as circumstantial as a legal record to be pondered over by
 scientists at their leisure, not to be assimilated in a few hours by
 the average alert reader. In those days, Freud could not leave out any
 detail likely to make his extremely novel thesis evidentially acceptable
 to those willing to sift data.
 
 Freud himself, however, realized the magnitude of the task which the
 reading of his _magnum opus_ imposed upon those who have not been
 prepared for it by long psychological and scientific training and he
 abstracted from that gigantic work the parts which constitute the
 essential of his discoveries.
 
 The publishers of the present book deserve credit for presenting to the
 reading public the gist of Freud's psychology in the master's own words,
 and in a form which shall neither discourage beginners, nor appear too
 elementary to those who are more advanced in psychoanalytic study.
 
 Dream psychology is the key to Freud's works and to all modern
 psychology. With a simple, compact manual such as _Dream Psychology_
 there shall be no longer any excuse for ignorance of the most
 revolutionary psychological system of modern times.
 
 ANDRE TRIDON.
   121 Madison Avenue, New York.
     November, 1920.
 
 
 
 
 CONTENTS
 
 
 CHAPTER                                                             PAGE
 
    I  DREAMS HAVE A MEANING                                            1
 
   II  THE DREAM MECHANISM                                             24
 
  III  WHY THE DREAM DISGUISES THE DESIRES                             57
 
   IV  DREAM ANALYSIS                                                  78
 
    V  SEX IN DREAMS                                                  104
 
   VI  THE WISH IN DREAMS                                             135
 
  VII  THE FUNCTION OF THE DREAM                                      164
 
 VIII  THE PRIMARY AND SECONDARY PROCESS--REGRESSION                  186
 
   IX  THE UNCONSCIOUS AND CONSCIOUSNESS--REALITY                     220
 
 
 
 
 DREAM PSYCHOLOGY
 
 
 
 
 I
 
 DREAMS HAVE A MEANING
 
 
 In what we may term "prescientific days" people were in no uncertainty
 about the interpretation of dreams. When they were recalled after
 awakening they were regarded as either the friendly or hostile
 manifestation of some higher powers, demoniacal and Divine. With the
 rise of scientific thought the whole of this expressive mythology was
 transferred to psychology; to-day there is but a small minority among
 educated persons who doubt that the dream is the dreamer's own psychical
 act.
 
 But since the downfall of the mythological hypothesis an interpretation
 of the dream has been wanting. The conditions of its origin; its
 relationship to our psychical life when we are awake; its independence
 of disturbances which, during the state of sleep, seem to compel notice;
 its many peculiarities repugnant to our waking thought; the incongruence
 between its images and the feelings they engender; then the dream's
 evanescence, the way in which, on awakening, our thoughts thrust it
 aside as something bizarre, and our reminiscences mutilating or
 rejecting it--all these and many other problems have for many hundred
 years demanded answers which up till now could never have been
 satisfactory. Before all there is the question as to the meaning of the
 dream, a question which is in itself double-sided. There is, firstly,
 the psychical significance of the dream, its position with regard to the
 psychical processes, as to a possible biological function; secondly, has
 the dream a meaning--can sense be made of each single dream as of other
 mental syntheses?
 
 Three tendencies can be observed in the estimation of dreams. Many
 philosophers have given currency to one of these tendencies, one which
 at the same time preserves something of the dream's former
 over-valuation. The foundation of dream life is for them a peculiar
 state of psychical activity, which they even celebrate as elevation to
 some higher state. Schubert, for instance, claims: "The dream is the
 liberation of the spirit from the pressure of external nature, a
 detachment of the soul from the fetters of matter." Not all go so far as
 this, but many maintain that dreams have their origin in real spiritual
 excitations, and are the outward manifestations of spiritual powers
 whose free movements have been hampered during the day ("Dream
 Phantasies," Scherner, Volkelt). A large number of observers acknowledge
 that dream life is capable of extraordinary achievements--at any rate,
 in certain fields ("Memory").
 
 In striking contradiction with this the majority of medical writers
 hardly admit that the dream is a psychical phenomenon at all. According
 to them dreams are provoked and initiated exclusively by stimuli
 proceeding from the senses or the body, which either reach the sleeper
 from without or are accidental disturbances of his internal organs. The
 dream has no greater claim to meaning and importance than the sound
 called forth by the ten fingers of a person quite unacquainted with
 music running his fingers over the keys of an instrument. The dream is
 to be regarded, says Binz, "as a physical process always useless,
 frequently morbid." All the peculiarities of dream life are explicable
 as the incoherent effort, due to some physiological stimulus, of certain
 organs, or of the cortical elements of a brain otherwise asleep.
 
 But slightly affected by scientific opinion and untroubled as to the
 origin of dreams, the popular view holds firmly to the belief that
 dreams really have got a meaning, in some way they do foretell the
 future, whilst the meaning can be unravelled in some way or other from
 its oft bizarre and enigmatical content. The reading of dreams consists
 in replacing the events of the dream, so far as remembered, by other
 events. This is done either scene by scene, _according to some rigid
 key_, or the dream as a whole is replaced by something else of which it
 was a _symbol_. Serious-minded persons laugh at these efforts--"Dreams
 are but sea-foam!"
 
 One day I discovered to my amazement that the popular view grounded in
 superstition, and not the medical one, comes nearer to the truth about
 dreams. I arrived at new conclusions about dreams by the use of a new
 method of psychological investigation, one which had rendered me good
 service in the investigation of phobias, obsessions, illusions, and the
 like, and which, under the name "psycho-analysis," had found acceptance
 by a whole school of investigators. The manifold analogies of dream life
 with the most diverse conditions of psychical disease in the waking
 state have been rightly insisted upon by a number of medical observers.
 It seemed, therefore, _a priori_, hopeful to apply to the interpretation
 of dreams methods of investigation which had been tested in
 psychopathological processes. Obsessions and those peculiar sensations
 of haunting dread remain as strange to normal consciousness as do
 dreams to our waking consciousness; their origin is as unknown to
 consciousness as is that of dreams. It was practical ends that impelled
 us, in these diseases, to fathom their origin and formation. Experience
 had shown us that a cure and a consequent mastery of the obsessing ideas
 did result when once those thoughts, the connecting links between the
 morbid ideas and the rest of the psychical content, were revealed which
 were heretofore veiled from consciousness. The procedure I employed for
 the interpretation of dreams thus arose from psychotherapy.
 
 This procedure is readily described, although its practice demands
 instruction and experience. Suppose the patient is suffering from
 intense morbid dread. He is requested to direct his attention to the
 idea in question, without, however, as he has so frequently done,
 meditating upon it. Every impression about it, without any exception,
 which occurs to him should be imparted to the doctor. The statement
 which will be perhaps then made, that he cannot concentrate his
 attention upon anything at all, is to be countered by assuring him most
 positively that such a blank state of mind is utterly impossible. As a
 matter of fact, a great number of impressions will soon occur, with
 which others will associate themselves. These will be invariably
 accompanied by the expression of the observer's opinion that they have
 no meaning or are unimportant. It will be at once noticed that it is
 this self-criticism which prevented the patient from imparting the
 ideas, which had indeed already excluded them from consciousness. If the
 patient can be induced to abandon this self-criticism and to pursue the
 trains of thought which are yielded by concentrating the attention, most
 significant matter will be obtained, matter which will be presently seen
 to be clearly linked to the morbid idea in question. Its connection with
 other ideas will be manifest, and later on will permit the replacement
 of the morbid idea by a fresh one, which is perfectly adapted to
 psychical continuity.
 
 This is not the place to examine thoroughly the hypothesis upon which
 this experiment rests, or the deductions which follow from its
 invariable success. It must suffice to state that we obtain matter
 enough for the resolution of every morbid idea if we especially direct
 our attention to the _unbidden_ associations _which disturb our
 thoughts_--those which are otherwise put aside by the critic as
 worthless refuse. If the procedure is exercised on oneself, the best
 plan of helping the experiment is to write down at once all one's first
 indistinct fancies.
 
 I will now point out where this method leads when I apply it to the
 examination of dreams. Any dream could be made use of in this way. From
 certain motives I, however, choose a dream of my own, which appears
 confused and meaningless to my memory, and one which has the advantage
 of brevity. Probably my dream of last night satisfies the requirements.
 Its content, fixed immediately after awakening, runs as follows:
 
 _"Company; at table or table d'hote.... Spinach is served. Mrs. E.L.,
 sitting next to me, gives me her undivided attention, and places her
 hand familiarly upon my knee. In defence I remove her hand. Then she
 says: 'But you have always had such beautiful eyes.'.... I then
 distinctly see something like two eyes as a sketch or as the contour of
 a spectacle lens...."_
 
 This is the whole dream, or, at all events, all that I can remember. It
 appears to me not only obscure and meaningless, but more especially odd.
 Mrs. E.L. is a person with whom I am scarcely on visiting terms, nor to
 my knowledge have I ever desired any more cordial relationship. I have
 not seen her for a long time, and do not think there was any mention of
 her recently. No emotion whatever accompanied the dream process.
 
 Reflecting upon this dream does not make it a bit clearer to my mind. I
 will now, however, present the ideas, without premeditation and without
 criticism, which introspection yielded. I soon notice that it is an
 advantage to break up the dream into its elements, and to search out the
 ideas which link themselves to each fragment.
 
 _Company; at table or table d'hote._ The recollection of the slight
 event with which the evening of yesterday ended is at once called up. I
 left a small party in the company of a friend, who offered to drive me
 home in his cab. "I prefer a taxi," he said; "that gives one such a
 pleasant occupation; there is always something to look at." When we were
 in the cab, and the cab-driver turned the disc so that the first sixty
 hellers were visible, I continued the jest. "We have hardly got in and
 we already owe sixty hellers. The taxi always reminds me of the table
 d'hote. It makes me avaricious and selfish by continuously reminding me
 of my debt. It seems to me to mount up too quickly, and I am always
 afraid that I shall be at a disadvantage, just as I cannot resist at
 table d'hote the comical fear that I am getting too little, that I must
 look after myself." In far-fetched connection with this I quote:
 
   "To earth, this weary earth, ye bring us,
   To guilt ye let us heedless go."
 
 Another idea about the table d'hote. A few weeks ago I was very cross
 with my dear wife at the dinner-table at a Tyrolese health resort,
 because she was not sufficiently reserved with some neighbors with whom
 I wished to have absolutely nothing to do. I begged her to occupy
 herself rather with me than with the strangers. That is just as if I had
 _been at a disadvantage at the table d'hote_. The contrast between the
 behavior of my wife at the table and that of Mrs. E.L. in the dream now
 strikes me: _"Addresses herself entirely to me."_
 
 Further, I now notice that the dream is the reproduction of a little
 scene which transpired between my wife and myself when I was secretly
 courting her. The caressing under cover of the tablecloth was an answer
 to a wooer's passionate letter. In the dream, however, my wife is
 replaced by the unfamiliar E.L.
 
 Mrs. E.L. is the daughter of a man to whom I _owed money_! I cannot help
 noticing that here there is revealed an unsuspected connection between
 the dream content and my thoughts. If the chain of associations be
 followed up which proceeds from one element of the dream one is soon led
 back to another of its elements. The thoughts evoked by the dream stir
 up associations which were not noticeable in the dream itself.
 
 Is it not customary, when some one expects others to look after his
 interests without any advantage to themselves, to ask the innocent
 question satirically: "Do you think this will be done _for the sake of
 your beautiful eyes_?" Hence Mrs. E.L.'s speech in the dream. "You have
 always had such beautiful eyes," means nothing but "people always do
 everything to you for love of you; you have had _everything for
 nothing_." The contrary is, of course, the truth; I have always paid
 dearly for whatever kindness others have shown me. Still, the fact that
 _I had a ride for nothing_ yesterday when my friend drove me home in his
 cab must have made an impression upon me.
 
 In any case, the friend whose guests we were yesterday has often made me
 his debtor. Recently I allowed an opportunity of requiting him to go by.
 He has had only one present from me, an antique shawl, upon which eyes
 are painted all round, a so-called Occhiale, as a _charm_ against the
 _Malocchio_. Moreover, he is an _eye specialist_. That same evening I
 had asked him after a patient whom I had sent to him for _glasses_.
 
 As I remarked, nearly all parts of the dream have been brought into this
 new connection. I still might ask why in the dream it was _spinach_
 that was served up. Because spinach called up a little scene which
 recently occurred at our table. A child, whose _beautiful eyes_ are
 really deserving of praise, refused to eat spinach. As a child I was
 just the same; for a long time I loathed _spinach_, until in later life
 my tastes altered, and it became one of my favorite dishes. The mention
 of this dish brings my own childhood and that of my child's near
 together. "You should be glad that you have some spinach," his mother
 had said to the little gourmet. "Some children would be very glad to get
 spinach." Thus I am reminded of the parents' duties towards their
 children. Goethe's words--
 
   "To earth, this weary earth, ye bring us,
   To guilt ye let us heedless go"--
 
 take on another meaning in this connection.
 
 Here I will stop in order that I may recapitulate the results of the
 analysis of the dream. By following the associations which were linked
 to the single elements of the dream torn from their context, I have been
 led to a series of thoughts and reminiscences where I am bound to
 recognize interesting expressions of my psychical life. The matter
 yielded by an analysis of the dream stands in intimate relationship with
 the dream content, but this relationship is so special that I should
 never have been able to have inferred the new discoveries directly from
 the dream itself. The dream was passionless, disconnected, and
 unintelligible. During the time that I am unfolding the thoughts at the
 back of the dream I feel intense and well-grounded emotions. The
 thoughts themselves fit beautifully together into chains logically bound
 together with certain central ideas which ever repeat themselves. Such
 ideas not represented in the dream itself are in this instance the
 antitheses _selfish, unselfish, to be indebted, to work for nothing_. I
 could draw closer the threads of the web which analysis has disclosed,
 and would then be able to show how they all run together into a single
 knot; I am debarred from making this work public by considerations of a
 private, not of a scientific, nature. After having cleared up many
 things which I do not willingly acknowledge as mine, I should have much
 to reveal which had better remain my secret. Why, then, do not I choose
 another dream whose analysis would be more suitable for publication, so
 that I could awaken a fairer conviction of the sense and cohesion of the
 results disclosed by analysis? The answer is, because every dream which
 I investigate leads to the same difficulties and places me under the
 same need of discretion; nor should I forgo this difficulty any the
 more were I to analyze the dream of some one else. That could only be
 done when opportunity allowed all concealment to be dropped without
 injury to those who trusted me.
 
 The conclusion which is now forced upon me is that the dream is a _sort
 of substitution_ for those emotional and intellectual trains of thought
 which I attained after complete analysis. I do not yet know the process
 by which the dream arose from those thoughts, but I perceive that it is
 wrong to regard the dream as psychically unimportant, a purely physical
 process which has arisen from the activity of isolated cortical elements
 awakened out of sleep.
 
 I must further remark that the dream is far shorter than the thoughts
 which I hold it replaces; whilst analysis discovered that the dream was
 provoked by an unimportant occurrence the evening before the dream.
 
 Naturally, I would not draw such far-reaching conclusions if only one
 analysis were known to me. Experience has shown me that when the
 associations of any dream are honestly followed such a chain of thought
 is revealed, the constituent parts of the dream reappear correctly and
 sensibly linked together; the slight suspicion that this concatenation
 was merely an accident of a single first observation must, therefore,
 be absolutely relinquished. I regard it, therefore, as my right to
 establish this new view by a proper nomenclature. I contrast the dream
 which my memory evokes with the dream and other added matter revealed by
 analysis: the former I call the dream's _manifest content_; the latter,
 without at first further subdivision, its _latent content_. I arrive at
 two new problems hitherto unformulated: (1) What is the psychical
 process which has transformed the latent content of the dream into its
 manifest content? (2) What is the motive or the motives which have made
 such transformation exigent? The process by which the change from latent
 to manifest content is executed I name the _dream-work_. In contrast
 with this is the _work of analysis_, which produces the reverse
 transformation. The other problems of the dream--the inquiry as to its
 stimuli, as to the source of its materials, as to its possible purpose,
 the function of dreaming, the forgetting of dreams--these I will discuss
 in connection with the latent dream-content.
 
 I shall take every care to avoid a confusion between the _manifest_ and
 the _latent content_, for I ascribe all the contradictory as well as the
 incorrect accounts of dream-life to the ignorance of this latent
 content, now first laid bare through analysis.
 
 The conversion of the latent dream thoughts into those manifest deserves
 our close study as the first known example of the transformation of
 psychical stuff from one mode of expression into another. From a mode of
 expression which, moreover, is readily intelligible into another which
 we can only penetrate by effort and with guidance, although this new
 mode must be equally reckoned as an effort of our own psychical
 activity. From the standpoint of the relationship of latent to manifest
 dream-content, dreams can be divided into three classes. We can, in the
 first place, distinguish those dreams which have a _meaning_ and are, at
 the same time, _intelligible_, which allow us to penetrate into our
 psychical life without further ado. Such dreams are numerous; they are
 usually short, and, as a general rule, do not seem very noticeable,
 because everything remarkable or exciting surprise is absent. Their
 occurrence is, moreover, a strong argument against the doctrine which
 derives the dream from the isolated activity of certain cortical
 elements. All signs of a lowered or subdivided psychical activity are
 wanting. Yet we never raise any objection to characterizing them as
 dreams, nor do we confound them with the products of our waking life.
 
 A second group is formed by those dreams which are indeed self-coherent
 and have a distinct meaning, but appear strange because we are unable to
 reconcile their meaning with our mental life. That is the case when we
 dream, for instance, that some dear relative has died of plague when we
 know of no ground for expecting, apprehending, or assuming anything of
 the sort; we can only ask ourself wonderingly: "What brought that into
 my head?" To the third group those dreams belong which are void of both
 meaning and intelligibility; they are _incoherent, complicated, and
 meaningless_. The overwhelming number of our dreams partake of this
 character, and this has given rise to the contemptuous attitude towards
 dreams and the medical theory of their limited psychical activity. It is
 especially in the longer and more complicated dream-plots that signs of
 incoherence are seldom missing.
 
 The contrast between manifest and latent dream-content is clearly only
 of value for the dreams of the second and more especially for those of
 the third class. Here are problems which are only solved when the
 manifest dream is replaced by its latent content; it was an example of
 this kind, a complicated and unintelligible dream, that we subjected to
 analysis. Against our expectation we, however, struck upon reasons which
 prevented a complete cognizance of the latent dream thought. On the
 repetition of this same experience we were forced to the supposition
 that there is an _intimate bond, with laws of its own, between the
 unintelligible and complicated nature of the dream and the difficulties
 attending communication of the thoughts connected with the dream_.
 Before investigating the nature of this bond, it will be advantageous to
 turn our attention to the more readily intelligible dreams of the first
 class where, the manifest and latent content being identical, the dream
 work seems to be omitted.
 
 The investigation of these dreams is also advisable from another
 standpoint. The dreams of _children_ are of this nature; they have a
 meaning, and are not bizarre. This, by the way, is a further objection
 to reducing dreams to a dissociation of cerebral activity in sleep, for
 why should such a lowering of psychical functions belong to the nature
 of sleep in adults, but not in children? We are, however, fully
 justified in expecting that the explanation of psychical processes in
 children, essentially simplified as they may be, should serve as an
 indispensable preparation towards the psychology of the adult.
 
 I shall therefore cite some examples of dreams which I have gathered
 from children. A girl of nineteen months was made to go without food
 for a day because she had been sick in the morning, and, according to
 nurse, had made herself ill through eating strawberries. During the
 night, after her day of fasting, she was heard calling out her name
 during sleep, and adding: "_Tawberry, eggs, pap_." She is dreaming that
 she is eating, and selects out of her menu exactly what she supposes she
 will not get much of just now.
 
 The same kind of dream about a forbidden dish was that of a little boy
 of twenty-two months. The day before he was told to offer his uncle a
 present of a small basket of cherries, of which the child was, of
 course, only allowed one to taste. He woke up with the joyful news:
 "Hermann eaten up all the cherries."
 
 A girl of three and a half years had made during the day a sea trip
 which was too short for her, and she cried when she had to get out of
 the boat. The next morning her story was that during the night she had
 been on the sea, thus continuing the interrupted trip.
 
 A boy of five and a half years was not at all pleased with his party
 during a walk in the Dachstein region. Whenever a new peak came into
 sight he asked if that were the Dachstein, and, finally, refused to
 accompany the party to the waterfall. His behavior was ascribed to
 fatigue; but a better explanation was forthcoming when the next morning
 he told his dream: _he had ascended the Dachstein_. Obviously he
 expected the ascent of the Dachstein to be the object of the excursion,
 and was vexed by not getting a glimpse of the mountain. The dream gave
 him what the day had withheld. The dream of a girl of six was similar;
 her father had cut short the walk before reaching the promised objective
 on account of the lateness of the hour. On the way back she noticed a
 signpost giving the name of another place for excursions; her father
 promised to take her there also some other day. She greeted her father
 next day with the news that she had dreamt that _her father had been
 with her to both places_.
 
 What is common in all these dreams is obvious. They completely satisfy
 wishes excited during the day which remain unrealized. They are simply
 and undisguisedly realizations of wishes.
 
 The following child-dream, not quite understandable at first sight, is
 nothing else than a wish realized. On account of poliomyelitis a girl,
 not quite four years of age, was brought from the country into town, and
 remained over night with a childless aunt in a big--for her, naturally,
 huge--bed. The next morning she stated that she had dreamt that _the
 bed was much too small for her, so that she could find no place in it_.
 To explain this dream as a wish is easy when we remember that to be
 "big" is a frequently expressed wish of all children. The bigness of the
 bed reminded Miss Little-Would-be-Big only too forcibly of her
 smallness. This nasty situation became righted in her dream, and she
 grew so big that the bed now became too small for her.
 
 Even when children's dreams are complicated and polished, their
 comprehension as a realization of desire is fairly evident. A boy of
 eight dreamt that he was being driven with Achilles in a war-chariot,
 guided by Diomedes. The day before he was assiduously reading about
 great heroes. It is easy to show that he took these heroes as his
 models, and regretted that he was not living in those days.
 
 From this short collection a further characteristic of the dreams of
 children is manifest--_their connection with the life of the day_. The
 desires which are realized in these dreams are left over from the day
 or, as a rule, the day previous, and the feeling has become intently
 emphasized and fixed during the day thoughts. Accidental and indifferent
 matters, or what must appear so to the child, find no acceptance in the
 contents of the dream.
 
 Innumerable instances of such dreams of the infantile type can be found
 among adults also, but, as mentioned, these are mostly exactly like the
 manifest content. Thus, a random selection of persons will generally
 respond to thirst at night-time with a dream about drinking, thus
 striving to get rid of the sensation and to let sleep continue. Many
 persons frequently have these comforting _dreams_ before waking, just
 when they are called. They then dream that they are already up, that
 they are washing, or already in school, at the office, etc., where they
 ought to be at a given time. The night before an intended journey one
 not infrequently dreams that one has already arrived at the destination;
 before going to a play or to a party the dream not infrequently
 anticipates, in impatience, as it were, the expected pleasure. At other
 times the dream expresses the realization of the desire somewhat
 indirectly; some connection, some sequel must be known--the first step
 towards recognizing the desire. Thus, when a husband related to me the
 dream of his young wife, that her monthly period had begun, I had to
 bethink myself that the young wife would have expected a pregnancy if
 the period had been absent. The dream is then a sign of pregnancy. Its
 meaning is that it shows the wish realized that pregnancy should not
 occur just yet. Under unusual and extreme circumstances, these dreams
 of the infantile type become very frequent. The leader of a polar
 expedition tells us, for instance, that during the wintering amid the
 ice the crew, with their monotonous diet and slight rations, dreamt
 regularly, like children, of fine meals, of mountains of tobacco, and of
 home.
 
 It is not uncommon that out of some long, complicated and intricate
 dream one specially lucid part stands out containing unmistakably the
 realization of a desire, but bound up with much unintelligible matter.
 On more frequently analyzing the seemingly more transparent dreams of
 adults, it is astonishing to discover that these are rarely as simple as
 the dreams of children, and that they cover another meaning beyond that
 of the realization of a wish.
 
 It would certainly be a simple and convenient solution of the riddle if
 the work of analysis made it at all possible for us to trace the
 meaningless and intricate dreams of adults back to the infantile type,
 to the realization of some intensely experienced desire of the day. But
 there is no warrant for such an expectation. Their dreams are generally
 full of the most indifferent and bizarre matter, and no trace of the
 realization of the wish is to be found in their content.
 
 Before leaving these infantile dreams, which are obviously unrealized
 desires, we must not fail to mention another chief characteristic of
 dreams, one that has been long noticed, and one which stands out most
 clearly in this class. I can replace any of these dreams by a phrase
 expressing a desire. If the sea trip had only lasted longer; if I were
 only washed and dressed; if I had only been allowed to keep the cherries
 instead of giving them to my uncle. But the dream gives something more
 than the choice, for here the desire is already realized; its
 realization is real and actual. The dream presentations consist chiefly,
 if not wholly, of scenes and mainly of visual sense images. Hence a kind
 of transformation is not entirely absent in this class of dreams, and
 this may be fairly designated as the dream work. _An idea merely
 existing in the region of possibility is replaced by a vision of its
 accomplishment._
 
 
 
 
 II
 
 THE DREAM MECHANISM
 
 
 We are compelled to assume that such transformation of scene has also
 taken place in intricate dreams, though we do not know whether it has
 encountered any possible desire. The dream instanced at the
 commencement, which we analyzed somewhat thoroughly, did give us
 occasion in two places to suspect something of the kind. Analysis
 brought out that my wife was occupied with others at table, and that I
 did not like it; in the dream itself _exactly the opposite_ occurs, for
 the person who replaces my wife gives me her undivided attention. But
 can one wish for anything pleasanter after a disagreeable incident than
 that the exact contrary should have occurred, just as the dream has it?
 The stinging thought in the analysis, that I have never had anything for
 nothing, is similarly connected with the woman's remark in the dream:
 "You have always had such beautiful eyes." Some portion of the
 opposition between the latent and manifest content of the dream must be
 therefore derived from the realization of a wish.
 
 Another manifestation of the dream work which all incoherent dreams have
 in common is still more noticeable. Choose any instance, and compare the
 number of separate elements in it, or the extent of the dream, if
 written down, with the dream thoughts yielded by analysis, and of which
 but a trace can be refound in the dream itself. There can be no doubt
 that the dream working has resulted in an extraordinary compression or
 _condensation_. It is not at first easy to form an opinion as to the
 extent of the condensation; the more deeply you go into the analysis,
 the more deeply you are impressed by it. There will be found no factor
 in the dream whence the chains of associations do not lead in two or
 more directions, no scene which has not been pieced together out of two
 or more impressions and events. For instance, I once dreamt about a kind
 of swimming-bath where the bathers suddenly separated in all directions;
 at one place on the edge a person stood bending towards one of the
 bathers as if to drag him out. The scene was a composite one, made up
 out of an event that occurred at the time of puberty, and of two
 pictures, one of which I had seen just shortly before the dream. The two
 pictures were The Surprise in the Bath, from Schwind's Cycle of the
 Melusine (note the bathers suddenly separating), and The Flood, by an
 Italian master. The little incident was that I once witnessed a lady,
 who had tarried in the swimming-bath until the men's hour, being helped
 out of the water by the swimming-master. The scene in the dream which
 was selected for analysis led to a whole group of reminiscences, each
 one of which had contributed to the dream content. First of all came the
 little episode from the time of my courting, of which I have already
 spoken; the pressure of a hand under the table gave rise in the dream to
 the "under the table," which I had subsequently to find a place for in
 my recollection. There was, of course, at the time not a word about
 "undivided attention." Analysis taught me that this factor is the
 realization of a desire through its contradictory and related to the
 behavior of my wife at the table d'hote. An exactly similar and much
 more important episode of our courtship, one which separated us for an
 entire day, lies hidden behind this recent recollection. The intimacy,
 the hand resting upon the knee, refers to a quite different connection
 and to quite other persons. This element in the dream becomes again the
 starting-point of two distinct series of reminiscences, and so on.
 
 The stuff of the dream thoughts which has been accumulated for the
 formation of the dream scene must be naturally fit for this application.
 There must be one or more common factors. The dream work proceeds like
 Francis Galton with his family photographs. The different elements are
 put one on top of the other; what is common to the composite picture
 stands out clearly, the opposing details cancel each other. This process
 of reproduction partly explains the wavering statements, of a peculiar
 vagueness, in so many elements of the dream. For the interpretation of
 dreams this rule holds good: When analysis discloses _uncertainty_, as
 to _either_--_or_ read _and_, _taking_ each section of the apparent
 alternatives as a separate outlet for a series of impressions.
 
 When there is nothing in common between the dream thoughts, the dream
 work takes the trouble to create a something, in order to make a common
 presentation feasible in the dream. The simplest way to approximate two
 dream thoughts, which have as yet nothing in common, consists in making
 such a change in the actual expression of one idea as will meet a slight
 responsive recasting in the form of the other idea. The process is
 analogous to that of rhyme, when consonance supplies the desired common
 factor. A good deal of the dream work consists in the creation of those
 frequently very witty, but often exaggerated, digressions. These vary
 from the common presentation in the dream content to dream thoughts
 which are as varied as are the causes in form and essence which give
 rise to them. In the analysis of our example of a dream, I find a like
 case of the transformation of a thought in order that it might agree
 with another essentially foreign one. In following out the analysis I
 struck upon the thought: _I should like to have something for nothing_.
 But this formula is not serviceable to the dream. Hence it is replaced
 by another one: "I should like to enjoy something free of cost."[1] The
 word "kost" (taste), with its double meaning, is appropriate to a table
 d'hote; it, moreover, is in place through the special sense in the
 dream. At home if there is a dish which the children decline, their
 mother first tries gentle persuasion, with a "Just taste it." That the
 dream work should unhesitatingly use the double meaning of the word is
 certainly remarkable; ample experience has shown, however, that the
 occurrence is quite usual.
 
 Through condensation of the dream certain constituent parts of its
 content are explicable which are peculiar to the dream life alone, and
 which are not found in the waking state. Such are the composite and
 mixed persons, the extraordinary mixed figures, creations comparable
 with the fantastic animal compositions of Orientals; a moment's thought
 and these are reduced to unity, whilst the fancies of the dream are ever
 formed anew in an inexhaustible profusion. Every one knows such images
 in his own dreams; manifold are their origins. I can build up a person
 by borrowing one feature from one person and one from another, or by
 giving to the form of one the name of another in my dream. I can also
 visualize one person, but place him in a position which has occurred to
 another. There is a meaning in all these cases when different persons
 are amalgamated into one substitute. Such cases denote an "and," a "just
 like," a comparison of the original person from a certain point of view,
 a comparison which can be also realized in the dream itself. As a rule,
 however, the identity of the blended persons is only discoverable by
 analysis, and is only indicated in the dream content by the formation of
 the "combined" person.
 
 The same diversity in their ways of formation and the same rules for its
 solution hold good also for the innumerable medley of dream contents,
 examples of which I need scarcely adduce. Their strangeness quite
 disappears when we resolve not to place them on a level with the objects
 of perception as known to us when awake, but to remember that they
 represent the art of dream condensation by an exclusion of unnecessary
 detail. Prominence is given to the common character of the combination.
 Analysis must also generally supply the common features. The dream says
 simply: _All these things have an "x" in common_. The decomposition of
 these mixed images by analysis is often the quickest way to an
 interpretation of the dream. Thus I once dreamt that I was sitting with
 one of my former university tutors on a bench, which was undergoing a
 rapid continuous movement amidst other benches. This was a combination
 of lecture-room and moving staircase. I will not pursue the further
 result of the thought. Another time I was sitting in a carriage, and on
 my lap an object in shape like a top-hat, which, however, was made of
 transparent glass. The scene at once brought to my mind the proverb: "He
 who keeps his hat in his hand will travel safely through the land." By a
 slight turn the _glass hat_ reminded me of _Auer's light_, and I knew
 that I was about to invent something which was to make me as rich and
 independent as his invention had made my countryman, Dr. Auer, of
 Welsbach; then I should be able to travel instead of remaining in
 Vienna. In the dream I was traveling with my invention, with the, it is
 true, rather awkward glass top-hat. The dream work is peculiarly adept
 at representing two contradictory conceptions by means of the same mixed
 image. Thus, for instance, a woman dreamt of herself carrying a tall
 flower-stalk, as in the picture of the Annunciation (Chastity-Mary is
 her own name), but the stalk was bedecked with thick white blossoms
 resembling camellias (contrast with chastity: La dame aux Camelias).
 
 A great deal of what we have called "dream condensation" can be thus
 formulated. Each one of the elements of the dream content is
 _overdetermined_ by the matter of the dream thoughts; it is not derived
 from one element of these thoughts, but from a whole series. These are
 not necessarily interconnected in any way, but may belong to the most
 diverse spheres of thought. The dream element truly represents all this
 disparate matter in the dream content. Analysis, moreover, discloses
 another side of the relationship between dream content and dream
 thoughts. Just as one element of the dream leads to associations with
 several dream thoughts, so, as a rule, the _one dream thought represents
 more than one dream element_. The threads of the association do not
 simply converge from the dream thoughts to the dream content, but on the
 way they overlap and interweave in every way.
 
 Next to the transformation of one thought in the scene (its
 "dramatization"), condensation is the most important and most
 characteristic feature of the dream work. We have as yet no clue as to
 the motive calling for such compression of the content.
 
 In the complicated and intricate dreams with which we are now concerned,
 condensation and dramatization do not wholly account for the difference
 between dream contents and dream thoughts. There is evidence of a third
 factor, which deserves careful consideration.
 
 When I have arrived at an understanding of the dream thoughts by my
 analysis I notice, above all, that the matter of the manifest is very
 different from that of the latent dream content. That is, I admit, only
 an apparent difference which vanishes on closer investigation, for in
 the end I find the whole dream content carried out in the dream
 thoughts, nearly all the dream thoughts again represented in the dream
 content. Nevertheless, there does remain a certain amount of difference.
 
 The essential content which stood out clearly and broadly in the dream
 must, after analysis, rest satisfied with a very subordinate role among
 the dream thoughts. These very dream thoughts which, going by my
 feelings, have a claim to the greatest importance are either not present
 at all in the dream content, or are represented by some remote allusion
 in some obscure region of the dream. I can thus describe these
 phenomena: _During the dream work the psychical intensity of those
 thoughts and conceptions to which it properly pertains flows to others
 which, in my judgment, have no claim to such emphasis_. There is no
 other process which contributes so much to concealment of the dream's
 meaning and to make the connection between the dream content and dream
 ideas irrecognizable. During this process, which I will call _the dream
 displacement_, I notice also the psychical intensity, significance, or
 emotional nature of the thoughts become transposed in sensory vividness.
 What was clearest in the dream seems to me, without further
 consideration, the most important; but often in some obscure element of
 the dream I can recognize the most direct offspring of the principal
 dream thought.
 
 I could only designate this dream displacement as the _transvaluation of
 psychical values_. The phenomena will not have been considered in all
 its bearings unless I add that this displacement or transvaluation is
 shared by different dreams in extremely varying degrees. There are
 dreams which take place almost without any displacement. These have the
 same time, meaning, and intelligibility as we found in the dreams which
 recorded a desire. In other dreams not a bit of the dream idea has
 retained its own psychical value, or everything essential in these dream
 ideas has been replaced by unessentials, whilst every kind of transition
 between these conditions can be found. The more obscure and intricate a
 dream is, the greater is the part to be ascribed to the impetus of
 displacement in its formation.
 
 The example that we chose for analysis shows, at least, this much of
 displacement--that its content has a different center of interest from
 that of the dream ideas. In the forefront of the dream content the main
 scene appears as if a woman wished to make advances to me; in the dream
 idea the chief interest rests on the desire to enjoy disinterested love
 which shall "cost nothing"; this idea lies at the back of the talk about
 the beautiful eyes and the far-fetched allusion to "spinach."
 
 If we abolish the dream displacement, we attain through analysis quite
 certain conclusions regarding two problems of the dream which are most
 disputed--as to what provokes a dream at all, and as to the connection
 of the dream with our waking life. There are dreams which at once expose
 their links with the events of the day; in others no trace of such a
 connection can be found. By the aid of analysis it can be shown that
 every dream, without any exception, is linked up with our impression of
 the day, or perhaps it would be more correct to say of the day previous
 to the dream. The impressions which have incited the dream may be so
 important that we are not surprised at our being occupied with them
 whilst awake; in this case we are right in saying that the dream carries
 on the chief interest of our waking life. More usually, however, when
 the dream contains anything relating to the impressions of the day, it
 is so trivial, unimportant, and so deserving of oblivion, that we can
 only recall it with an effort. The dream content appears, then, even
 when coherent and intelligible, to be concerned with those indifferent
 trifles of thought undeserving of our waking interest. The depreciation
 of dreams is largely due to the predominance of the indifferent and the
 worthless in their content.
 
 Analysis destroys the appearance upon which this derogatory judgment is
 based. When the dream content discloses nothing but some indifferent
 impression as instigating the dream, analysis ever indicates some
 significant event, which has been replaced by something indifferent
 with which it has entered into abundant associations. Where the dream is
 concerned with uninteresting and unimportant conceptions, analysis
 reveals the numerous associative paths which connect the trivial with
 the momentous in the psychical estimation of the individual. _It is only
 the action of displacement if what is indifferent obtains recognition in
 the dream content instead of those impressions which are really the
 stimulus, or instead of the things of real interest_. In answering the
 question as to what provokes the dream, as to the connection of the
 dream, in the daily troubles, we must say, in terms of the insight given
 us by replacing the manifest latent dream content: _The dream does never
 trouble itself about things which are not deserving of our concern
 during the day, and trivialities which do not trouble us during the day
 have no power to pursue us whilst asleep_.
 
 What provoked the dream in the example which we have analyzed? The
 really unimportant event, that a friend invited me to a _free ride in
 his cab_. The table d'hote scene in the dream contains an allusion to
 this indifferent motive, for in conversation I had brought the taxi
 parallel with the table d'hote. But I can indicate the important event
 which has as its substitute the trivial one. A few days before I had
 disbursed a large sum of money for a member of my family who is very
 dear to me. Small wonder, says the dream thought, if this person is
 grateful to me for this--this love is not cost-free. But love that shall
 cost nothing is one of the prime thoughts of the dream. The fact that
 shortly before this I had had several _drives_ with the relative in
 question puts the one drive with my friend in a position to recall the
 connection with the other person. The indifferent impression which, by
 such ramifications, provokes the dream is subservient to another
 condition which is not true of the real source of the dream--the
 impression must be a recent one, everything arising from the day of the
 dream.
 
 I cannot leave the question of dream displacement without the
 consideration of a remarkable process in the formation of dreams in
 which condensation and displacement work together towards one end. In
 condensation we have already considered the case where two conceptions
 in the dream having something in common, some point of contact, are
 replaced in the dream content by a mixed image, where the distinct germ
 corresponds to what is common, and the indistinct secondary
 modifications to what is distinctive. If displacement is added to
 condensation, there is no formation of a mixed image, but a _common
 mean_ which bears the same relationship to the individual elements as
 does the resultant in the parallelogram of forces to its components. In
 one of my dreams, for instance, there is talk of an injection with
 _propyl_. On first analysis I discovered an indifferent but true
 incident where _amyl_ played a part as the excitant of the dream. I
 cannot yet vindicate the exchange of amyl for propyl. To the round of
 ideas of the same dream, however, there belongs the recollection of my
 first visit to Munich, when the _Propyloea_ struck me. The attendant
 circumstances of the analysis render it admissible that the influence of
 this second group of conceptions caused the displacement of amyl to
 propyl. _Propyl_ is, so to say, the mean idea between _amyl_ and
 _propyloea_; it got into the dream as a kind of _compromise_ by
 simultaneous condensation and displacement.
 
 The need of discovering some motive for this bewildering work of the
 dream is even more called for in the case of displacement than in
 condensation.
 
 Although the work of displacement must be held mainly responsible if the
 dream thoughts are not refound or recognized in the dream content
 (unless the motive of the changes be guessed), it is another and milder
 kind of transformation which will be considered with the dream thoughts
 which leads to the discovery of a new but readily understood act of the
 dream work. The first dream thoughts which are unravelled by analysis
 frequently strike one by their unusual wording. They do not appear to be
 expressed in the sober form which our thinking prefers; rather are they
 expressed symbolically by allegories and metaphors like the figurative
 language of the poets. It is not difficult to find the motives for this
 degree of constraint in the expression of dream ideas. The dream content
 consists chiefly of visual scenes; hence the dream ideas must, in the
 first place, be prepared to make use of these forms of presentation.
 Conceive that a political leader's or a barrister's address had to be
 transposed into pantomime, and it will be easy to understand the
 transformations to which the dream work is constrained by regard for
 this _dramatization of the dream content_.
 
 Around the psychical stuff of dream thoughts there are ever found
 reminiscences of impressions, not infrequently of early
 childhood--scenes which, as a rule, have been visually grasped. Whenever
 possible, this portion of the dream ideas exercises a definite influence
 upon the modelling of the dream content; it works like a center of
 crystallization, by attracting and rearranging the stuff of the dream
 thoughts. The scene of the dream is not infrequently nothing but a
 modified repetition, complicated by interpolations of events that have
 left such an impression; the dream but very seldom reproduces accurate
 and unmixed reproductions of real scenes.
 
 The dream content does not, however, consist exclusively of scenes, but
 it also includes scattered fragments of visual images, conversations,
 and even bits of unchanged thoughts. It will be perhaps to the point if
 we instance in the briefest way the means of dramatization which are at
 the disposal of the dream work for the repetition of the dream thoughts
 in the peculiar language of the dream.
 
 The dream thoughts which we learn from the analysis exhibit themselves
 as a psychical complex of the most complicated superstructure. Their
 parts stand in the most diverse relationship to each other; they form
 backgrounds and foregrounds, stipulations, digressions, illustrations,
 demonstrations, and protestations. It may be said to be almost the rule
 that one train of thought is followed by its contradictory. No feature
 known to our reason whilst awake is absent. If a dream is to grow out of
 all this, the psychical matter is submitted to a pressure which
 condenses it extremely, to an inner shrinking and displacement, creating
 at the same time fresh surfaces, to a selective interweaving among the
 constituents best adapted for the construction of these scenes. Having
 regard to the origin of this stuff, the term _regression_ can be fairly
 applied to this process. The logical chains which hitherto held the
 psychical stuff together become lost in this transformation to the dream
 content. The dream work takes on, as it were, only the essential content
 of the dream thoughts for elaboration. It is left to analysis to restore
 the connection which the dream work has destroyed.
 
 The dream's means of expression must therefore be regarded as meager in
 comparison with those of our imagination, though the dream does not
 renounce all claims to the restitution of logical relation to the dream
 thoughts. It rather succeeds with tolerable frequency in replacing these
 by formal characters of its own.
 
 By reason of the undoubted connection existing between all the parts of
 dream thoughts, the dream is able to embody this matter into a single
 scene. It upholds a _logical connection_ as _approximation in time and
 space_, just as the painter, who groups all the poets for his picture of
 Parnassus who, though they have never been all together on a mountain
 peak, yet form ideally a community. The dream continues this method of
 presentation in individual dreams, and often when it displays two
 elements close together in the dream content it warrants some special
 inner connection between what they represent in the dream thoughts. It
 should be, moreover, observed that all the dreams of one night prove on
 analysis to originate from the same sphere of thought.
 
 The causal connection between two ideas is either left without
 presentation, or replaced by two different long portions of dreams one
 after the other. This presentation is frequently a reversed one, the
 beginning of the dream being the deduction, and its end the hypothesis.
 The direct _transformation_ of one thing into another in the dream seems
 to serve the relationship of _cause_ and _effect_.
 
 The dream never utters the _alternative "either-or,"_ but accepts both
 as having equal rights in the same connection. When "either-or" is used
 in the reproduction of dreams, it is, as I have already mentioned, to be
 replaced by "_and_."
 
 Conceptions which stand in opposition to one another are preferably
 expressed in dreams by the same element.[2] There seems no "not" in
 dreams. Opposition between two ideas, the relation of conversion, is
 represented in dreams in a very remarkable way. It is expressed by the
 reversal of another part of the dream content just as if by way of
 appendix. We shall later on deal with another form of expressing
 disagreement. The common dream sensation of _movement checked_ serves
 the purpose of representing disagreement of impulses--a _conflict of the
 will_.
 
 Only one of the logical relationships--that of _similarity, identity,
 agreement_--is found highly developed in the mechanism of dream
 formation. Dream work makes use of these cases as a starting-point for
 condensation, drawing together everything which shows such agreement to
 a _fresh unity_.
 
 These short, crude observations naturally do not suffice as an estimate
 of the abundance of the dream's formal means of presenting the logical
 relationships of the dream thoughts. In this respect, individual dreams
 are worked up more nicely or more carelessly, our text will have been
 followed more or less closely, auxiliaries of the dream work will have
 been taken more or less into consideration. In the latter case they
 appear obscure, intricate, incoherent. When the dream appears openly
 absurd, when it contains an obvious paradox in its content, it is so of
 purpose. Through its apparent disregard of all logical claims, it
 expresses a part of the intellectual content of the dream ideas.
 Absurdity in the dream denotes _disagreement, scorn, disdain_ in the
 dream thoughts. As this explanation is in entire disagreement with the
 view that the dream owes its origin to dissociated, uncritical cerebral
 activity, I will emphasize my view by an example:
 
 _"One of my acquaintances, Mr. M----, has been attacked by no less a
 person than Goethe in an essay with, we all maintain, unwarrantable
 violence. Mr. M---- has naturally been ruined by this attack. He
 complains very bitterly of this at a dinner-party, but his respect for
 Goethe has not diminished through this personal experience. I now
 attempt to clear up the chronological relations which strike me as
 improbable. Goethe died in 1832. As his attack upon Mr. M---- must, of
 course, have taken place before, Mr. M---- must have been then a very
 young man. It seems to me plausible that he was eighteen. I am not
 certain, however, what year we are actually in, and the whole
 calculation falls into obscurity. The attack was, moreover, contained
 in Goethe's well-known essay on 'Nature.'"_
 
 The absurdity of the dream becomes the more glaring when I state that
 Mr. M---- is a young business man without any poetical or literary
 interests. My analysis of the dream will show what method there is in
 this madness. The dream has derived its material from three sources:
 
 1. Mr. M----, to whom I was introduced at a dinner-party, begged me one
 day to examine his elder brother, who showed signs of mental trouble. In
 conversation with the patient, an unpleasant episode occurred. Without
 the slightest occasion he disclosed one of his brother's _youthful
 escapades_. I had asked the patient the _year of his birth_ (_year of
 death_ in dream), and led him to various calculations which might show
 up his want of memory.
 
 2. A medical journal which displayed my name among others on the cover
 had published a _ruinous_ review of a book by my friend F---- of Berlin,
 from the pen of a very _juvenile_ reviewer. I communicated with the
 editor, who, indeed, expressed his regret, but would not promise any
 redress. Thereupon I broke off my connection with the paper; in my
 letter of resignation I expressed the hope that our _personal relations
 would not suffer from this_. Here is the real source of the dream. The
 derogatory reception of my friend's work had made a deep impression upon
 me. In my judgment, it contained a fundamental biological discovery
 which only now, several years later, commences to find favor among the
 professors.
 
 3. A little while before, a patient gave me the medical history of her
 brother, who, exclaiming "_Nature, Nature!_" had gone out of his mind.
 The doctors considered that the exclamation arose from a study of
 _Goethe's_ beautiful essay, and indicated that the patient had been
 overworking. I expressed the opinion that it seemed more _plausible_ to
 me that the exclamation "Nature!" was to be taken in that sexual meaning
 known also to the less educated in our country. It seemed to me that
 this view had something in it, because the unfortunate youth afterwards
 mutilated his genital organs. The patient was eighteen years old when
 the attack occurred.
 
 The first person in the dream-thoughts behind the ego was my friend who
 had been so scandalously treated. _"I now attempted to clear up the
 chronological relation."_ My friend's book deals with the chronological
 relations of life, and, amongst other things, correlates _Goethe's_
 duration of life with a number of days in many ways important to
 biology. The ego is, however, represented as a general paralytic (_"I
 am not certain what year we are actually in"_). The dream exhibits my
 friend as behaving like a general paralytic, and thus riots in
 absurdity. But the dream thoughts run ironically. "Of course he is a
 madman, a fool, and you are the genius who understands all about it. But
 shouldn't it be the _other way round_?" This inversion obviously took
 place in the dream when Goethe attacked the young man, which is absurd,
 whilst any one, however young, can to-day easily attack the great
 Goethe.
 
 I am prepared to maintain that no dream is inspired by other than
 egoistic emotions. The ego in the dream does not, indeed, represent only
 my friend, but stands for myself also. I identify myself with him
 because the fate of his discovery appears to me typical of the
 acceptance of _my own_. If I were to publish my own theory, which gives
 sexuality predominance in the aetiology of psychoneurotic disorders (see
 the allusion to the eighteen-year-old patient--_"Nature, Nature!"_), the
 same criticism would be leveled at me, and it would even now meet with
 the same contempt.
 
 When I follow out the dream thoughts closely, I ever find only _scorn_
 and _contempt_ as _correlated with the dream's absurdity_. It is well
 known that the discovery of a cracked sheep's skull on the Lido in
 Venice gave Goethe the hint for the so-called vertebral theory of the
 skull. My friend plumes himself on having as a student raised a hubbub
 for the resignation of an aged professor who had done good work
 (including some in this very subject of comparative anatomy), but who,
 on account of _decrepitude_, had become quite incapable of teaching. The
 agitation my friend inspired was so successful because in the German
 Universities an _age limit_ is not demanded for academic work. _Age is
 no protection against folly._ In the hospital here I had for years the
 honor to serve under a chief who, long fossilized, was for decades
 notoriously _feebleminded_, and was yet permitted to continue in his
 responsible office. A trait, after the manner of the find in the Lido,
 forces itself upon me here. It was to this man that some youthful
 colleagues in the hospital adapted the then popular slang of that day:
 "No Goethe has written that," "No Schiller composed that," etc.
 
 We have not exhausted our valuation of the dream work. In addition to
 condensation, displacement, and definite arrangement of the psychical
 matter, we must ascribe to it yet another activity--one which is,
 indeed, not shared by every dream. I shall not treat this position of
 the dream work exhaustively; I will only point out that the readiest
 way to arrive at a conception of it is to take for granted, probably
 unfairly, that it _only subsequently influences the dream content which
 has already been built up_. Its mode of action thus consists in so
 cooerdinating the parts of the dream that these coalesce to a coherent
 whole, to a dream composition. The dream gets a kind of facade which, it
 is true, does not conceal the whole of its content. There is a sort of
 preliminary explanation to be strengthened by interpolations and slight
 alterations. Such elaboration of the dream content must not be too
 pronounced; the misconception of the dream thoughts to which it gives
 rise is merely superficial, and our first piece of work in analyzing a
 dream is to get rid of these early attempts at interpretation.
 
 The motives for this part of the dream work are easily gauged. This
 final elaboration of the dream is due to a _regard for
 intelligibility_--a fact at once betraying the origin of an action which
 behaves towards the actual dream content just as our normal psychical
 action behaves towards some proffered perception that is to our liking.
 The dream content is thus secured under the pretense of certain
 expectations, is perceptually classified by the supposition of its
 intelligibility, thereby risking its falsification, whilst, in fact, the
 most extraordinary misconceptions arise if the dream can be correlated
 with nothing familiar. Every one is aware that we are unable to look at
 any series of unfamiliar signs, or to listen to a discussion of unknown
 words, without at once making perpetual changes through _our regard for
 intelligibility_, through our falling back upon what is familiar.
 
 We can call those dreams _properly made up_ which are the result of an
 elaboration in every way analogous to the psychical action of our waking
 life. In other dreams there is no such action; not even an attempt is
 made to bring about order and meaning. We regard the dream as "quite
 mad," because on awaking it is with this last-named part of the dream
 work, the dream elaboration, that we identify ourselves. So far,
 however, as our analysis is concerned, the dream, which resembles a
 medley of disconnected fragments, is of as much value as the one with a
 smooth and beautifully polished surface. In the former case we are
 spared, to some extent, the trouble of breaking down the
 super-elaboration of the dream content.
 
 All the same, it would be an error to see in the dream facade nothing
 but the misunderstood and somewhat arbitrary elaboration of the dream
 carried out at the instance of our psychical life. Wishes and phantasies
 are not infrequently employed in the erection of this facade, which
 were already fashioned in the dream thoughts; they are akin to those of
 our waking life--"day-dreams," as they are very properly called. These
 wishes and phantasies, which analysis discloses in our dreams at night,
 often present themselves as repetitions and refashionings of the scenes
 of infancy. Thus the dream facade may show us directly the true core of
 the dream, distorted through admixture with other matter.
 
 Beyond these four activities there is nothing else to be discovered in
 the dream work. If we keep closely to the definition that dream work
 denotes the transference of dream thoughts to dream content, we are
 compelled to say that the dream work is not creative; it develops no
 fancies of its own, it judges nothing, decides nothing. It does nothing
 but prepare the matter for condensation and displacement, and refashions
 it for dramatization, to which must be added the inconstant last-named
 mechanism--that of explanatory elaboration. It is true that a good deal
 is found in the dream content which might be understood as the result of
 another and more intellectual performance; but analysis shows
 conclusively every time that these _intellectual operations were already
 present in the dream thoughts, and have only been taken over by the
 dream content_. A syllogism in the dream is nothing other than the
 repetition of a syllogism in the dream thoughts; it seems inoffensive if
 it has been transferred to the dream without alteration; it becomes
 absurd if in the dream work it has been transferred to other matter. A
 calculation in the dream content simply means that there was a
 calculation in the dream thoughts; whilst this is always correct, the
 calculation in the dream can furnish the silliest results by the
 condensation of its factors and the displacement of the same operations
 to other things. Even speeches which are found in the dream content are
 not new compositions; they prove to be pieced together out of speeches
 which have been made or heard or read; the words are faithfully copied,
 but the occasion of their utterance is quite overlooked, and their
 meaning is most violently changed.
 
 It is, perhaps, not superfluous to support these assertions by examples:
 
 1. _A seemingly inoffensive, well-made dream of a patient. She was going
 to market with her cook, who carried the basket. The butcher said to her
 when she asked him for something: "That is all gone," and wished to give
 her something else, remarking; "That's very good." She declines, and
 goes to the greengrocer, who wants to sell her a peculiar vegetable
 which is bound up in bundles and of a black color. She says: "I don't
 know that; I won't take it."_
 
 The remark "That is all gone" arose from the treatment. A few days
 before I said myself to the patient that the earliest reminiscences of
 childhood _are all gone_ as such, but are replaced by transferences and
 dreams. Thus I am the butcher.
 
 The second remark, _"I don't know that"_ arose in a very different
 connection. The day before she had herself called out in rebuke to the
 cook (who, moreover, also appears in the dream): "_Behave yourself
 properly_; I don't know _that_"--that is, "I don't know this kind of
 behavior; I won't have it." The more harmless portion of this speech was
 arrived at by a displacement of the dream content; in the dream thoughts
 only the other portion of the speech played a part, because the dream
 work changed an imaginary situation into utter irrecognizability and
 complete inoffensiveness (while in a certain sense I behave in an
 unseemly way to the lady). The situation resulting in this phantasy is,
 however, nothing but a new edition of one that actually took place.
 
 2. A dream apparently meaningless relates to figures. _"She wants to pay
 something; her daughter takes three florins sixty-five kreuzers out of
 her purse; but she says: 'What are you doing? It only cost twenty-one
 kreuzers.'"_
 
 The dreamer was a stranger who had placed her child at school in Vienna,
 and who was able to continue under my treatment so long as her daughter
 remained at Vienna. The day before the dream the directress of the
 school had recommended her to keep the child another year at school. In
 this case she would have been able to prolong her treatment by one year.
 The figures in the dream become important if it be remembered that time
 is money. One year equals 365 days, or, expressed in kreuzers, 365
 kreuzers, which is three florins sixty-five kreuzers. The twenty-one
 kreuzers correspond with the three weeks which remained from the day of
 the dream to the end of the school term, and thus to the end of the
 treatment. It was obviously financial considerations which had moved the
 lady to refuse the proposal of the directress, and which were answerable
 for the triviality of the amount in the dream.
 
 3. A lady, young, but already ten years married, heard that a friend of
 hers, Miss Elise L----, of about the same age, had become engaged. This
 gave rise to the following dream:
 
 _She was sitting with her husband in the theater; the one side of the
 stalls was quite empty. Her husband tells her, Elise L---- and her
 fiance had intended coming, but could only get some cheap seats, three
 for one florin fifty kreuzers, and these they would not take. In her
 opinion, that would not have mattered very much._
 
 The origin of the figures from the matter of the dream thoughts and the
 changes the figures underwent are of interest. Whence came the one
 florin fifty kreuzers? From a trifling occurrence of the previous day.
 Her sister-in-law had received 150 florins as a present from her
 husband, and had quickly got rid of it by buying some ornament. Note
 that 150 florins is one hundred times one florin fifty kreuzers. For the
 _three_ concerned with the tickets, the only link is that Elise L---- is
 exactly three months younger than the dreamer. The scene in the dream is
 the repetition of a little adventure for which she has often been teased
 by her husband. She was once in a great hurry to get tickets in time for
 a piece, and when she came to the theater _one side of the stalls was
 almost empty_. It was therefore quite unnecessary for her to have been
 in _such a hurry_. Nor must we overlook the absurdity of the dream that
 two persons should take three tickets for the theater.
 
 Now for the dream ideas. It was _stupid_ to have married so early; I
 _need not_ have been _in so great a hurry_. Elise L----'s example shows
 me that I should have been able to get a husband later; indeed, one a
 _hundred times better_ if I had but waited. I could have bought _three_
 such men with the money (dowry).
 
 [1] "Ich moechte gerne etwas geniessen ohne 'Kosten' zu haben." A a pun
 upon the word "kosten," which has two meanings--"taste" and "cost." In
 "Die Traumdeutung," third edition, p. 71 footnote, Professor Freud
 remarks that "the finest example of dream interpretation left us by the
 ancients is based upon a pun" (from "The Interpretation of Dreams," by
 Artemidorus Daldianus). "Moreover, dreams are so intimately bound up
 with language that Ferenczi truly points out that every tongue has its
 own language of dreams. A dream is as a rule untranslatable into other
 languages."--TRANSLATOR.
 
 [2] It is worthy of remark that eminent philologists maintain that the
 oldest languages used the same word for expressing quite general
 antitheses. In C. Abel's essay, "Ueber den Gegensinn der Urworter"
 (1884, the following examples of such words in England are given:
 "gleam--gloom"; "to lock--loch"; "down--The Downs"; "to step--to stop."
 In his essay on "The Origin of Language" ("Linguistic Essays," p. 240),
 Abel says: "When the Englishman says 'without,' is not his judgment
 based upon the comparative juxtaposition of two opposites, 'with' and
 'out'; 'with' itself originally meant 'without,' as may still be seen in
 'withdraw.' 'Bid' includes the opposite sense of giving and of
 proffering." Abel, "The English Verbs of Command," "Linguistic Essays,"
 p. 104; see also Freud, "Ueber den Gegensinn der Urworte"; _Jahrbuch fuer
 Psychoanalytische und Psychopathologische Forschungen_, Band II., part
 i., p. 179).--TRANSLATOR.
 
 
 
 
 III
 
 WHY THE DREAM DISGUISES THE DESIRES
 
 
 In the foregoing exposition we have now learnt something of the dream
 work; we must regard it as a quite special psychical process, which, so
 far as we are aware, resembles nothing else. To the dream work has been
 transferred that bewilderment which its product, the dream, has aroused
 in us. In truth, the dream work is only the first recognition of a group
 of psychical processes to which must be referred the origin of
 hysterical symptoms, the ideas of morbid dread, obsession, and illusion.
 Condensation, and especially displacement, are never-failing features in
 these other processes. The regard for appearance remains, on the other
 hand, peculiar to the dream work. If this explanation brings the dream
 into line with the formation of psychical disease, it becomes the more
 important to fathom the essential conditions of processes like dream
 building. It will be probably a surprise to hear that neither the state
 of sleep nor illness is among the indispensable conditions. A whole
 number of phenomena of the everyday life of healthy persons,
 forgetfulness, slips in speaking and in holding things, together with a
 certain class of mistakes, are due to a psychical mechanism analogous to
 that of the dream and the other members of this group.
 
 Displacement is the core of the problem, and the most striking of all
 the dream performances. A thorough investigation of the subject shows
 that the essential condition of displacement is purely psychological; it
 is in the nature of a motive. We get on the track by thrashing out
 experiences which one cannot avoid in the analysis of dreams. I had to
 break off the relations of my dream thoughts in the analysis of my dream
 on p. 8 because I found some experiences which I do not wish strangers
 to know, and which I could not relate without serious damage to
 important considerations. I added, it would be no use were I to select
 another instead of that particular dream; in every dream where the
 content is obscure or intricate, I should hit upon dream thoughts which
 call for secrecy. If, however, I continue the analysis for myself,
 without regard to those others, for whom, indeed, so personal an event
 as my dream cannot matter, I arrive finally at ideas which surprise me,
 which I have not known to be mine, which not only appear _foreign_ to
 me, but which are _unpleasant_, and which I would like to oppose
 vehemently, whilst the chain of ideas running through the analysis
 intrudes upon me inexorably. I can only take these circumstances into
 account by admitting that these thoughts are actually part of my
 psychical life, possessing a certain psychical intensity or energy.
 However, by virtue of a particular psychological condition, the
 _thoughts could not become conscious to me_. I call this particular
 condition "_Repression_." It is therefore impossible for me not to
 recognize some casual relationship between the obscurity of the dream
 content and this state of repression--this _incapacity of
 consciousness_. Whence I conclude that the cause of the obscurity is
 _the desire to conceal these thoughts_. Thus I arrive at the conception
 of the _dream distortion_ as the deed of the dream work, and of
 _displacement_ serving to disguise this object.
 
 I will test this in my own dream, and ask myself, What is the thought
 which, quite innocuous in its distorted form, provokes my liveliest
 opposition in its real form? I remember that the free drive reminded me
 of the last expensive drive with a member of my family, the
 interpretation of the dream being: I should for once like to experience
 affection for which I should not have to pay, and that shortly before
 the dream I had to make a heavy disbursement for this very person. In
 this connection, I cannot get away from the thought _that I regret this
 disbursement_. It is only when I acknowledge this feeling that there is
 any sense in my wishing in the dream for an affection that should entail
 no outlay. And yet I can state on my honor that I did not hesitate for a
 moment when it became necessary to expend that sum. The regret, the
 counter-current, was unconscious to me. Why it was unconscious is quite
 another question which would lead us far away from the answer which,
 though within my knowledge, belongs elsewhere.
 
 If I subject the dream of another person instead of one of my own to
 analysis, the result is the same; the motives for convincing others is,
 however, changed. In the dream of a healthy person the only way for me
 to enable him to accept this repressed idea is the coherence of the
 dream thoughts. He is at liberty to reject this explanation. But if we
 are dealing with a person suffering from any neurosis--say from
 hysteria--the recognition of these repressed ideas is compulsory by
 reason of their connection with the symptoms of his illness and of the
 improvement resulting from exchanging the symptoms for the repressed
 ideas. Take the patient from whom I got the last dream about the three
 tickets for one florin fifty kreuzers. Analysis shows that she does not
 think highly of her husband, that she regrets having married him, that
 she would be glad to change him for some one else. It is true that she
 maintains that she loves her husband, that her emotional life knows
 nothing about this depreciation (a hundred times better!), but all her
 symptoms lead to the same conclusion as this dream. When her repressed
 memories had rewakened a certain period when she was conscious that she
 did not love her husband, her symptoms disappeared, and therewith
 disappeared her resistance to the interpretation of the dream.
 
 This conception of repression once fixed, together with the distortion
 of the dream in relation to repressed psychical matter, we are in a
 position to give a general exposition of the principal results which the
 analysis of dreams supplies. We learnt that the most intelligible and
 meaningful dreams are unrealized desires; the desires they pictured as
 realized are known to consciousness, have been held over from the
 daytime, and are of absorbing interest. The analysis of obscure and
 intricate dreams discloses something very similar; the dream scene again
 pictures as realized some desire which regularly proceeds from the dream
 ideas, but the picture is unrecognizable, and is only cleared up in the
 analysis. The desire itself is either one repressed, foreign to
 consciousness, or it is closely bound up with repressed ideas. The
 formula for these dreams may be thus stated: _They are concealed
 realizations of repressed desires_. It is interesting to note that they
 are right who regard the dream as foretelling the future. Although the
 future which the dream shows us is not that which will occur, but that
 which we would like to occur. Folk psychology proceeds here according to
 its wont; it believes what it wishes to believe.
 
 Dreams can be divided into three classes according to their relation
 towards the realization of desire. Firstly come those which exhibit a
 _non-repressed, non-concealed desire_; these are dreams of the infantile
 type, becoming ever rarer among adults. Secondly, dreams which express
 in _veiled_ form some _repressed desire_; these constitute by far the
 larger number of our dreams, and they require analysis for their
 understanding. Thirdly, these dreams where repression exists, but
 _without_ or with but slight concealment. These dreams are invariably
 accompanied by a feeling of dread which brings the dream to an end. This
 feeling of dread here replaces dream displacement; I regarded the dream
 work as having prevented this in the dream of the second class. It is
 not very difficult to prove that what is now present as intense dread in
 the dream was once desire, and is now secondary to the repression.
 
 There are also definite dreams with a painful content, without the
 presence of any anxiety in the dream. These cannot be reckoned among
 dreams of dread; they have, however, always been used to prove the
 unimportance and the psychical futility of dreams. An analysis of such
 an example will show that it belongs to our second class of dreams--a
 _perfectly concealed_ realization of repressed desires. Analysis will
 demonstrate at the same time how excellently adapted is the work of
 displacement to the concealment of desires.
 
 A girl dreamt that she saw lying dead before her the only surviving
 child of her sister amid the same surroundings as a few years before she
 saw the first child lying dead. She was not sensible of any pain, but
 naturally combatted the view that the scene represented a desire of
 hers. Nor was that view necessary. Years ago it was at the funeral of
 the child that she had last seen and spoken to the man she loved. Were
 the second child to die, she would be sure to meet this man again in her
 sister's house. She is longing to meet him, but struggles against this
 feeling. The day of the dream she had taken a ticket for a lecture,
 which announced the presence of the man she always loved. The dream is
 simply a dream of impatience common to those which happen before a
 journey, theater, or simply anticipated pleasures. The longing is
 concealed by the shifting of the scene to the occasion when any joyous
 feeling were out of place, and yet where it did once exist. Note,
 further, that the emotional behavior in the dream is adapted, not to the
 displaced, but to the real but suppressed dream ideas. The scene
 anticipates the long-hoped-for meeting; there is here no call for
 painful emotions.
 
 There has hitherto been no occasion for philosophers to bestir
 themselves with a psychology of repression. We must be allowed to
 construct some clear conception as to the origin of dreams as the first
 steps in this unknown territory. The scheme which we have formulated not
 only from a study of dreams is, it is true, already somewhat
 complicated, but we cannot find any simpler one that will suffice. We
 hold that our psychical apparatus contains two procedures for the
 construction of thoughts. The second one has the advantage that its
 products find an open path to consciousness, whilst the activity of the
 first procedure is unknown to itself, and can only arrive at
 consciousness through the second one. At the borderland of these two
 procedures, where the first passes over into the second, a censorship
 is established which only passes what pleases it, keeping back
 everything else. That which is rejected by the censorship is, according
 to our definition, in a state of repression. Under certain conditions,
 one of which is the sleeping state, the balance of power between the two
 procedures is so changed that what is repressed can no longer be kept
 back. In the sleeping state this may possibly occur through the
 negligence of the censor; what has been hitherto repressed will now
 succeed in finding its way to consciousness. But as the censorship is
 never absent, but merely off guard, certain alterations must be conceded
 so as to placate it. It is a compromise which becomes conscious in this
 case--a compromise between what one procedure has in view and the
 demands of the other. _Repression, laxity of the censor,
 compromise_--this is the foundation for the origin of many another
 psychological process, just as it is for the dream. In such compromises
 we can observe the processes of condensation, of displacement, the
 acceptance of superficial associations, which we have found in the dream
 work.
 
 It is not for us to deny the demonic element which has played a part in
 constructing our explanation of dream work. The impression left is that
 the formation of obscure dreams proceeds as if a person had something
 to say which must be agreeable for another person upon whom he is
 dependent to hear. It is by the use of this image that we figure to
 ourselves the conception of the _dream distortion_ and of the
 censorship, and ventured to crystallize our impression in a rather
 crude, but at least definite, psychological theory. Whatever explanation
 the future may offer of these first and second procedures, we shall
 expect a confirmation of our correlate that the second procedure
 commands the entrance to consciousness, and can exclude the first from
 consciousness.
 
 Once the sleeping state overcome, the censorship resumes complete sway,
 and is now able to revoke that which was granted in a moment of
 weakness. That the _forgetting_ of dreams explains this in part, at
 least, we are convinced by our experience, confirmed again and again.
 During the relation of a dream, or during analysis of one, it not
 infrequently happens that some fragment of the dream is suddenly
 forgotten. This fragment so forgotten invariably contains the best and
 readiest approach to an understanding of the dream. Probably that is why
 it sinks into oblivion--_i.e._, into a renewed suppression.
 
 Viewing the dream content as the representation of a realized desire,
 and referring its vagueness to the changes made by the censor in the
 repressed matter, it is no longer difficult to grasp the function of
 dreams. In fundamental contrast with those saws which assume that sleep
 is disturbed by dreams, we hold the _dream as the guardian of sleep_. So
 far as children's dreams are concerned, our view should find ready
 acceptance.
 
 The sleeping state or the psychical change to sleep, whatsoever it be,
 is brought about by the child being sent to sleep or compelled thereto
 by fatigue, only assisted by the removal of all stimuli which might open
 other objects to the psychical apparatus. The means which serve to keep
 external stimuli distant are known; but what are the means we can employ
 to depress the internal psychical stimuli which frustrate sleep? Look at
 a mother getting her child to sleep. The child is full of beseeching; he
 wants another kiss; he wants to play yet awhile. His requirements are in
 part met, in part drastically put off till the following day. Clearly
 these desires and needs, which agitate him, are hindrances to sleep.
 Every one knows the charming story of the bad boy (Baldwin Groller's)
 who awoke at night bellowing out, "_I want the rhinoceros_." A really
 good boy, instead of bellowing, would have _dreamt_ that he was playing
 with the rhinoceros. Because the dream which realizes his desire is
 believed during sleep, it removes the desire and makes sleep possible.
 It cannot be denied that this belief accords with the dream image,
 because it is arrayed in the psychical appearance of probability; the
 child is without the capacity which it will acquire later to distinguish
 hallucinations or phantasies from reality.
 
 The adult has learnt this differentiation; he has also learnt the
 futility of desire, and by continuous practice manages to postpone his
 aspirations, until they can be granted in some roundabout method by a
 change in the external world. For this reason it is rare for him to have
 his wishes realized during sleep in the short psychical way. It is even
 possible that this never happens, and that everything which appears to
 us like a child's dream demands a much more elaborate explanation. Thus
 it is that for adults--for every sane person without exception--a
 differentiation of the psychical matter has been fashioned which the
 child knew not. A psychical procedure has been reached which, informed
 by the experience of life, exercises with jealous power a dominating and
 restraining influence upon psychical emotions; by its relation to
 consciousness, and by its spontaneous mobility, it is endowed with the
 greatest means of psychical power. A portion of the infantile emotions
 has been withheld from this procedure as useless to life, and all the
 thoughts which flow from these are found in the state of repression.
 
 Whilst the procedure in which we recognize our normal ego reposes upon
 the desire for sleep, it appears compelled by the psycho-physiological
 conditions of sleep to abandon some of the energy with which it was wont
 during the day to keep down what was repressed. This neglect is really
 harmless; however much the emotions of the child's spirit may be
 stirred, they find the approach to consciousness rendered difficult, and
 that to movement blocked in consequence of the state of sleep. The
 danger of their disturbing sleep must, however, be avoided. Moreover, we
 must admit that even in deep sleep some amount of free attention is
 exerted as a protection against sense-stimuli which might, perchance,
 make an awakening seem wiser than the continuance of sleep. Otherwise we
 could not explain the fact of our being always awakened by stimuli of
 certain quality. As the old physiologist Burdach pointed out, the mother
 is awakened by the whimpering of her child, the miller by the cessation
 of his mill, most people by gently calling out their names. This
 attention, thus on the alert, makes use of the internal stimuli arising
 from repressed desires, and fuses them into the dream, which as a
 compromise satisfies both procedures at the same time. The dream creates
 a form of psychical release for the wish which is either suppressed or
 formed by the aid of repression, inasmuch as it presents it as realized.
 The other procedure is also satisfied, since the continuance of the
 sleep is assured. Our ego here gladly behaves like a child; it makes the
 dream pictures believable, saying, as it were, "Quite right, but let me
 sleep." The contempt which, once awakened, we bear the dream, and which
 rests upon the absurdity and apparent illogicality of the dream, is
 probably nothing but the reasoning of our sleeping ego on the feelings
 about what was repressed; with greater right it should rest upon the
 incompetency of this disturber of our sleep. In sleep we are now and
 then aware of this contempt; the dream content transcends the censorship
 rather too much, we think, "It's only a dream," and sleep on.
 
 It is no objection to this view if there are borderlines for the dream
 where its function, to preserve sleep from interruption, can no longer
 be maintained--as in the dreams of impending dread. It is here changed
 for another function--to suspend the sleep at the proper time. It acts
 like a conscientious night-watchman, who first does his duty by quelling
 disturbances so as not to waken the citizen, but equally does his duty
 quite properly when he awakens the street should the causes of the
 trouble seem to him serious and himself unable to cope with them alone.
 
 This function of dreams becomes especially well marked when there arises
 some incentive for the sense perception. That the senses aroused during
 sleep influence the dream is well known, and can be experimentally
 verified; it is one of the certain but much overestimated results of the
 medical investigation of dreams. Hitherto there has been an insoluble
 riddle connected with this discovery. The stimulus to the sense by which
 the investigator affects the sleeper is not properly recognized in the
 dream, but is intermingled with a number of indefinite interpretations,
 whose determination appears left to psychical free-will. There is, of
 course, no such psychical free-will. To an external sense-stimulus the
 sleeper can react in many ways. Either he awakens or he succeeds in
 sleeping on. In the latter case he can make use of the dream to dismiss
 the external stimulus, and this, again, in more ways than one. For
 instance, he can stay the stimulus by dreaming of a scene which is
 absolutely intolerable to him. This was the means used by one who was
 troubled by a painful perineal abscess. He dreamt that he was on
 horseback, and made use of the poultice, which was intended to
 alleviate his pain, as a saddle, and thus got away from the cause of the
 trouble. Or, as is more frequently the case, the external stimulus
 undergoes a new rendering, which leads him to connect it with a
 repressed desire seeking its realization, and robs him of its reality,
 and is treated as if it were a part of the psychical matter. Thus, some
 one dreamt that he had written a comedy which embodied a definite
 _motif_; it was being performed; the first act was over amid
 enthusiastic applause; there was great clapping. At this moment the
 dreamer must have succeeded in prolonging his sleep despite the
 disturbance, for when he woke he no longer heard the noise; he concluded
 rightly that some one must have been beating a carpet or bed. The dreams
 which come with a loud noise just before waking have all attempted to
 cover the stimulus to waking by some other explanation, and thus to
 prolong the sleep for a little while.
 
 Whosoever has firmly accepted this _censorship_ as the chief motive for
 the distortion of dreams will not be surprised to learn as the result of
 dream interpretation that most of the dreams of adults are traced by
 analysis to erotic desires. This assertion is not drawn from dreams
 obviously of a sexual nature, which are known to all dreamers from their
 own experience, and are the only ones usually described as "sexual
 dreams." These dreams are ever sufficiently mysterious by reason of the
 choice of persons who are made the objects of sex, the removal of all
 the barriers which cry halt to the dreamer's sexual needs in his waking
 state, the many strange reminders as to details of what are called
 perversions. But analysis discovers that, in many other dreams in whose
 manifest content nothing erotic can be found, the work of interpretation
 shows them up as, in reality, realization of sexual desires; whilst, on
 the other hand, that much of the thought-making when awake, the thoughts
 saved us as surplus from the day only, reaches presentation in dreams
 with the help of repressed erotic desires.
 
 Towards the explanation of this statement, which is no theoretical
 postulate, it must be remembered that no other class of instincts has
 required so vast a suppression at the behest of civilization as the
 sexual, whilst their mastery by the highest psychical processes are in
 most persons soonest of all relinquished. Since we have learnt to
 understand _infantile sexuality_, often so vague in its expression, so
 invariably overlooked and misunderstood, we are justified in saying that
 nearly every civilized person has retained at some point or other the
 infantile type of sex life; thus we understand that repressed infantile
 sex desires furnish the most frequent and most powerful impulses for the
 formation of dreams.[1]
 
 If the dream, which is the expression of some erotic desire, succeeds in
 making its manifest content appear innocently asexual, it is only
 possible in one way. The matter of these sexual presentations cannot be
 exhibited as such, but must be replaced by allusions, suggestions, and
 similar indirect means; differing from other cases of indirect
 presentation, those used in dreams must be deprived of direct
 understanding. The means of presentation which answer these requirements
 are commonly termed "symbols." A special interest has been directed
 towards these, since it has been observed that the dreamers of the same
 language use the like symbols--indeed, that in certain cases community
 of symbol is greater than community of speech. Since the dreamers do not
 themselves know the meaning of the symbols they use, it remains a puzzle
 whence arises their relationship with what they replace and denote. The
 fact itself is undoubted, and becomes of importance for the technique of
 the interpretation of dreams, since by the aid of a knowledge of this
 symbolism it is possible to understand the meaning of the elements of a
 dream, or parts of a dream, occasionally even the whole dream itself,
 without having to question the dreamer as to his own ideas. We thus come
 near to the popular idea of an interpretation of dreams, and, on the
 other hand, possess again the technique of the ancients, among whom the
 interpretation of dreams was identical with their explanation through
 symbolism.
 
 Though the study of dream symbolism is far removed from finality, we now
 possess a series of general statements and of particular observations
 which are quite certain. There are symbols which practically always have
 the same meaning: Emperor and Empress (King and Queen) always mean the
 parents; room, a woman[2], and so on. The sexes are represented by a
 great variety of symbols, many of which would be at first quite
 incomprehensible had not the clews to the meaning been often obtained
 through other channels.
 
 There are symbols of universal circulation, found in all dreamers, of
 one range of speech and culture; there are others of the narrowest
 individual significance which an individual has built up out of his own
 material. In the first class those can be differentiated whose claim can
 be at once recognized by the replacement of sexual things in common
 speech (those, for instance, arising from agriculture, as reproduction,
 seed) from others whose sexual references appear to reach back to the
 earliest times and to the obscurest depths of our image-building. The
 power of building symbols in both these special forms of symbols has not
 died out. Recently discovered things, like the airship, are at once
 brought into universal use as sex symbols.
 
 It would be quite an error to suppose that a profounder knowledge of
 dream symbolism (the "Language of Dreams") would make us independent of
 questioning the dreamer regarding his impressions about the dream, and
 would give us back the whole technique of ancient dream interpreters.
 Apart from individual symbols and the variations in the use of what is
 general, one never knows whether an element in the dream is to be
 understood symbolically or in its proper meaning; the whole content of
 the dream is certainly not to be interpreted symbolically. The knowledge
 of dream symbols will only help us in understanding portions of the
 dream content, and does not render the use of the technical rules
 previously given at all superfluous. But it must be of the greatest
 service in interpreting a dream just when the impressions of the dreamer
 are withheld or are insufficient.
 
 Dream symbolism proves also indispensable for understanding the
 so-called "typical" dreams and the dreams that "repeat themselves."
 Dream symbolism leads us far beyond the dream; it does not belong only
 to dreams, but is likewise dominant in legend, myth, and saga, in wit
 and in folklore. It compels us to pursue the inner meaning of the dream
 in these productions. But we must acknowledge that symbolism is not a
 result of the dream work, but is a peculiarity probably of our
 unconscious thinking, which furnishes to the dream work the matter for
 condensation, displacement, and dramatization.
 
 [1] Freud, "Three Contributions to Sexual Theory," translated by A.A.
 Brill (_Journal of Nervous and Mental Disease_ Publishing Company, New
 York).
 
 [2] The words from "and" to "channels" in the next sentence is a short
 summary of the passage in the original. As this book will be read by
 other than professional people the passage has not been translated, in
 deference to English opinion.--TRANSLATOR.
 
 
 
 
 IV
 
 DREAM ANALYSIS
 
 
 Perhaps we shall now begin to suspect that dream interpretation is
 capable of giving us hints about the structure of our psychic apparatus
 which we have thus far expected in vain from philosophy. We shall not,
 however, follow this track, but return to our original problem as soon
 as we have cleared up the subject of dream-disfigurement. The question
 has arisen how dreams with disagreeable content can be analyzed as the
 fulfillment of wishes. We see now that this is possible in case
 dream-disfigurement has taken place, in case the disagreeable content
 serves only as a disguise for what is wished. Keeping in mind our
 assumptions in regard to the two psychic instances, we may now proceed
 to say: disagreeable dreams, as a matter of fact, contain something
 which is disagreeable to the second instance, but which at the same time
 fulfills a wish of the first instance. They are wish dreams in the sense
 that every dream originates in the first instance, while the second
 instance acts towards the dream only in repelling, not in a creative
 manner. If we limit ourselves to a consideration of what the second
 instance contributes to the dream, we can never understand the dream. If
 we do so, all the riddles which the authors have found in the dream
 remain unsolved.
 
 That the dream actually has a secret meaning, which turns out to be the
 fulfillment of a wish, must be proved afresh for every case by means of
 an analysis. I therefore select several dreams which have painful
 contents and attempt an analysis of them. They are partly dreams of
 hysterical subjects, which require long preliminary statements, and now
 and then also an examination of the psychic processes which occur in
 hysteria. I cannot, however, avoid this added difficulty in the
 exposition.
 
 When I give a psychoneurotic patient analytical treatment, dreams are
 always, as I have said, the subject of our discussion. It must,
 therefore, give him all the psychological explanations through whose aid
 I myself have come to an understanding of his symptoms, and here I
 undergo an unsparing criticism, which is perhaps not less keen than that
 I must expect from my colleagues. Contradiction of the thesis that all
 dreams are the fulfillments of wishes is raised by my patients with
 perfect regularity. Here are several examples of the dream material
 which is offered me to refute this position.
 
 "You always tell me that the dream is a wish fulfilled," begins a clever
 lady patient. "Now I shall tell you a dream in which the content is
 quite the opposite, in which a wish of mine is _not_ fulfilled. How do
 you reconcile that with your theory? The dream is as follows:--
 
 _"I want to give a supper, but having nothing at hand except some smoked
 salmon, I think of going marketing, but I remember that it is Sunday
 afternoon, when all the shops are closed. I next try to telephone to
 some caterers, but the telephone is out of order.... Thus I must resign
 my wish to give a supper."_
 
 I answer, of course, that only the analysis can decide the meaning of
 this dream, although I admit that at first sight it seems sensible and
 coherent, and looks like the opposite of a wish-fulfillment. "But what
 occurrence has given rise to this dream?" I ask. "You know that the
 stimulus for a dream always lies among the experiences of the preceding
 day."
 
 _Analysis._--The husband of the patient, an upright and conscientious
 wholesale butcher, had told her the day before that he is growing too
 fat, and that he must, therefore, begin treatment for obesity. He was
 going to get up early, take exercise, keep to a strict diet, and above
 all accept no more invitations to suppers. She proceeds laughingly to
 relate how her husband at an inn table had made the acquaintance of an
 artist, who insisted upon painting his portrait because he, the painter,
 had never found such an expressive head. But her husband had answered in
 his rough way, that he was very thankful for the honor, but that he was
 quite convinced that a portion of the backside of a pretty young girl
 would please the artist better than his whole face[1]. She said that she
 was at the time very much in love with her husband, and teased him a
 good deal. She had also asked him not to send her any caviare. What does
 that mean?
 
 As a matter of fact, she had wanted for a long time to eat a caviare
 sandwich every forenoon, but had grudged herself the expense. Of course,
 she would at once get the caviare from her husband, as soon as she asked
 him for it. But she had begged him, on the contrary, not to send her the
 caviare, in order that she might tease him about it longer.
 
 This explanation seems far-fetched to me. Unadmitted motives are in the
 habit of hiding behind such unsatisfactory explanations. We are reminded
 of subjects hypnotized by Bernheim, who carried out a posthypnotic
 order, and who, upon being asked for their motives, instead of
 answering: "I do not know why I did that," had to invent a reason that
 was obviously inadequate. Something similar is probably the case with
 the caviare of my patient. I see that she is compelled to create an
 unfulfilled wish in life. Her dream also shows the reproduction of the
 wish as accomplished. But why does she need an unfulfilled wish?
 
 The ideas so far produced are insufficient for the interpretation of the
 dream. I beg for more. After a short pause, which corresponds to the
 overcoming of a resistance, she reports further that the day before she
 had made a visit to a friend, of whom she is really jealous, because her
 husband is always praising this woman so much. Fortunately, this friend
 is very lean and thin, and her husband likes well-rounded figures. Now
 of what did this lean friend speak? Naturally of her wish to become
 somewhat stouter. She also asked my patient: "When are you going to
 invite us again? You always have such a good table."
 
 Now the meaning of the dream is clear. I may say to the patient: "It is
 just as though you had thought at the time of the request: 'Of course,
 I'll invite you, so you can eat yourself fat at my house and become
 still more pleasing to my husband. I would rather give no more suppers.'
 The dream then tells you that you cannot give a supper, thereby
 fulfilling your wish not to contribute anything to the rounding out of
 your friend's figure. The resolution of your husband to refuse
 invitations to supper for the sake of getting thin teaches you that one
 grows fat on the things served in company." Now only some conversation
 is necessary to confirm the solution. The smoked salmon in the dream has
 not yet been traced. "How did the salmon mentioned in the dream occur to
 you?" "Smoked salmon is the favorite dish of this friend," she answered.
 I happen to know the lady, and may corroborate this by saying that she
 grudges herself the salmon just as much as my patient grudges herself
 the caviare.
 
 The dream admits of still another and more exact interpretation, which
 is necessitated only by a subordinate circumstance. The two
 interpretations do not contradict one another, but rather cover each
 other and furnish a neat example of the usual ambiguity of dreams as
 well as of all other psychopathological formations. We have seen that at
 the same time that she dreams of the denial of the wish, the patient is
 in reality occupied in securing an unfulfilled wish (the caviare
 sandwiches). Her friend, too, had expressed a wish, namely, to get
 fatter, and it would not surprise us if our lady had dreamt that the
 wish of the friend was not being fulfilled. For it is her own wish that
 a wish of her friend's--for increase in weight--should not be fulfilled.
 Instead of this, however, she dreams that one of her own wishes is not
 fulfilled. The dream becomes capable of a new interpretation, if in the
 dream she does not intend herself, but her friend, if she has put
 herself in the place of her friend, or, as we may say, has identified
 herself with her friend.
 
 I think she has actually done this, and as a sign of this identification
 she has created an unfulfilled wish in reality. But what is the meaning
 of this hysterical identification? To clear this up a thorough
 exposition is necessary. Identification is a highly important factor in
 the mechanism of hysterical symptoms; by this means patients are enabled
 in their symptoms to represent not merely their own experiences, but the
 experiences of a great number of other persons, and can suffer, as it
 were, for a whole mass of people, and fill all the parts of a drama by
 means of their own personalities alone. It will here be objected that
 this is well-known hysterical imitation, the ability of hysteric
 subjects to copy all the symptoms which impress them when they occur in
 others, as though their pity were stimulated to the point of
 reproduction. But this only indicates the way in which the psychic
 process is discharged in hysterical imitation; the way in which a
 psychic act proceeds and the act itself are two different things. The
 latter is slightly more complicated than one is apt to imagine the
 imitation of hysterical subjects to be: it corresponds to an unconscious
 concluded process, as an example will show. The physician who has a
 female patient with a particular kind of twitching, lodged in the
 company of other patients in the same room of the hospital, is not
 surprised when some morning he learns that this peculiar hysterical
 attack has found imitations. He simply says to himself: The others have
 seen her and have done likewise: that is psychic infection. Yes, but
 psychic infection proceeds in somewhat the following manner: As a rule,
 patients know more about one another than the physician knows about each
 of them, and they are concerned about each other when the visit of the
 doctor is over. Some of them have an attack to-day: soon it is known
 among the rest that a letter from home, a return of lovesickness or the
 like, is the cause of it. Their sympathy is aroused, and the following
 syllogism, which does not reach consciousness, is completed in them: "If
 it is possible to have this kind of an attack from such causes, I too
 may have this kind of an attack, for I have the same reasons." If this
 were a cycle capable of becoming conscious, it would perhaps express
 itself in _fear_ of getting the same attack; but it takes place in
 another psychic sphere, and, therefore, ends in the realization of the
 dreaded symptom. Identification is therefore not a simple imitation, but
 a sympathy based upon the same etiological claim; it expresses an "as
 though," and refers to some common quality which has remained in the
 unconscious.
 
 Identification is most often used in hysteria to express sexual
 community. An hysterical woman identifies herself most readily--although
 not exclusively--with persons with whom she has had sexual relations, or
 who have sexual intercourse with the same persons as herself. Language
 takes such a conception into consideration: two lovers are "one." In the
 hysterical phantasy, as well as in the dream, it is sufficient for the
 identification if one thinks of sexual relations, whether or not they
 become real. The patient, then, only follows the rules of the hysterical
 thought processes when she gives expression to her jealousy of her
 friend (which, moreover, she herself admits to be unjustified, in that
 she puts herself in her place and identifies herself with her by
 creating a symptom--the denied wish). I might further clarify the
 process specifically as follows: She puts herself in the place of her
 friend in the dream, because her friend has taken her own place relation
 to her husband, and because she would like to take her friend's place in
 the esteem of her husband[2].
 
 The contradiction to my theory of dreams in the case of another female
 patient, the most witty among all my dreamers, was solved in a simpler
 manner, although according to the scheme that the non-fulfillment of one
 wish signifies the fulfillment of another. I had one day explained to
 her that the dream is a wish of fulfillment. The next day she brought me
 a dream to the effect that she was traveling with her mother-in-law to
 their common summer resort. Now I knew that she had struggled violently
 against spending the summer in the neighborhood of her mother-in-law. I
 also knew that she had luckily avoided her mother-in-law by renting an
 estate in a far-distant country resort. Now the dream reversed this
 wished-for solution; was not this in the flattest contradiction to my
 theory of wish-fulfillment in the dream? Certainly, it was only
 necessary to draw the inferences from this dream in order to get at its
 interpretation. According to this dream, I was in the wrong. _It was
 thus her wish that I should be in the wrong, and this wish the dream
 showed her as fulfilled._ But the wish that I should be in the wrong,
 which was fulfilled in the theme of the country home, referred to a more
 serious matter. At that time I had made up my mind, from the material
 furnished by her analysis, that something of significance for her
 illness must have occurred at a certain time in her life. She had denied
 it because it was not present in her memory. We soon came to see that I
 was in the right. Her wish that I should be in the wrong, which is
 transformed into the dream, thus corresponded to the justifiable wish
 that those things, which at the time had only been suspected, had never
 occurred at all.
 
 Without an analysis, and merely by means of an assumption, I took the
 liberty of interpreting a little occurrence in the case of a friend, who
 had been my colleague through the eight classes of the Gymnasium. He
 once heard a lecture of mine delivered to a small assemblage, on the
 novel subject of the dream as the fulfillment of a wish. He went home,
 dreamt _that he had lost all his suits_--he was a lawyer--and then
 complained to me about it. I took refuge in the evasion: "One can't win
 all one's suits," but I thought to myself: "If for eight years I sat as
 Primus on the first bench, while he moved around somewhere in the middle
 of the class, may he not naturally have had a wish from his boyhood days
 that I, too, might for once completely disgrace myself?"
 
 In the same way another dream of a more gloomy character was offered me
 by a female patient as a contradiction to my theory of the wish-dream.
 The patient, a young girl, began as follows: "You remember that my
 sister has now only one boy, Charles: she lost the elder one, Otto,
 while I was still at her house. Otto was my favorite; it was I who
 really brought him up. I like the other little fellow, too, but of
 course not nearly as much as the dead one. Now I dreamt last night that
 _I saw Charles lying dead before me. He was lying in his little coffin,
 his hands folded: there were candles all about, and, in short, it was
 just like the time of little Otto's death, which shocked me so
 profoundly_. Now tell me, what does this mean? You know me: am I really
 bad enough to wish my sister to lose the only child she has left? Or
 does the dream mean that I wish Charles to be dead rather than Otto,
 whom I like so much better?"
 
 I assured her that this interpretation was impossible. After some
 reflection I was able to give her the interpretation of the dream, which
 I subsequently made her confirm.
 
 Having become an orphan at an early age, the girl had been brought up in
 the house of a much older sister, and had met among the friends and
 visitors who came to the house, a man who made a lasting impression upon
 her heart. It looked for a time as though these barely expressed
 relations were to end in marriage, but this happy culmination was
 frustrated by the sister, whose motives have never found a complete
 explanation. After the break, the man who was loved by our patient
 avoided the house: she herself became independent some time after little
 Otto's death, to whom her affection had now turned. But she did not
 succeed in freeing herself from the inclination for her sister's friend
 in which she had become involved. Her pride commanded her to avoid him;
 but it was impossible for her to transfer her love to the other suitors
 who presented themselves in order. Whenever the man whom she loved, who
 was a member of the literary profession, announced a lecture anywhere,
 she was sure to be found in the audience; she also seized every other
 opportunity to see him from a distance unobserved by him. I remembered
 that on the day before she had told me that the Professor was going to a
 certain concert, and that she was also going there, in order to enjoy
 the sight of him. This was on the day of the dream; and the concert was
 to take place on the day on which she told me the dream. I could now
 easily see the correct interpretation, and I asked her whether she could
 think of any event which had happened after the death of little Otto.
 She answered immediately: "Certainly; at that time the Professor
 returned after a long absence, and I saw him once more beside the coffin
 of little Otto." It was exactly as I had expected. I interpreted the
 dream in the following manner: "If now the other boy were to die, the
 same thing would be repeated. You would spend the day with your sister,
 the Professor would surely come in order to offer condolence, and you
 would see him again under the same circumstances as at that time. The
 dream signifies nothing but this wish of yours to see him again, against
 which you are fighting inwardly. I know that you are carrying the ticket
 for to-day's concert in your bag. Your dream is a dream of impatience;
 it has anticipated the meeting which is to take place to-day by several
 hours."
 
 In order to disguise her wish she had obviously selected a situation in
 which wishes of that sort are commonly suppressed--a situation which is
 so filled with sorrow that love is not thought of. And yet, it is very
 easily probable that even in the actual situation at the bier of the
 second, more dearly loved boy, which the dream copied faithfully, she
 had not been able to suppress her feelings of affection for the visitor
 whom she had missed for so long a time.
 
 A different explanation was found in the case of a similar dream of
 another female patient, who was distinguished in her earlier years by
 her quick wit and her cheerful demeanors and who still showed these
 qualities at least in the notion, which occurred to her in the course of
 treatment. In connection with a longer dream, it seemed to this lady
 that she saw her fifteen-year-old daughter lying dead before her in a
 box. She was strongly inclined to convert this dream-image into an
 objection to the theory of wish-fulfillment, but herself suspected that
 the detail of the box must lead to a different conception of the
 dream.[3] In the course of the analysis it occurred to her that on the
 evening before, the conversation of the company had turned upon the
 English word "box," and upon the numerous translations of it into
 German, such as box, theater box, chest, box on the ear, &c. From other
 components of the same dream it is now possible to add that the lady had
 guessed the relationship between the English word "box" and the German
 _Buechse_, and had then been haunted by the memory that _Buechse_ (as well
 as "box") is used in vulgar speech to designate the female genital
 organ. It was therefore possible, making a certain allowance for her
 notions on the subject of topographical anatomy, to assume that the
 child in the box signified a child in the womb of the mother. At this
 stage of the explanation she no longer denied that the picture of the
 dream really corresponded to one of her wishes. Like so many other young
 women, she was by no means happy when she became pregnant, and admitted
 to me more than once the wish that her child might die before its birth;
 in a fit of anger following a violent scene with her husband she had
 even struck her abdomen with her fists in order to hit the child within.
 The dead child was, therefore, really the fulfillment of a wish, but a
 wish which had been put aside for fifteen years, and it is not
 surprising that the fulfillment of the wish was no longer recognized
 after so long an interval. For there had been many changes meanwhile.
 
 The group of dreams to which the two last mentioned belong, having as
 content the death of beloved relatives, will be considered again under
 the head of "Typical Dreams." I shall there be able to show by new
 examples that in spite of their undesirable content, all these dreams
 must be interpreted as wish-fulfillments. For the following dream, which
 again was told me in order to deter me from a hasty generalization of
 the theory of wishing in dreams, I am indebted, not to a patient, but to
 an intelligent jurist of my acquaintance. "_I dream_," my informant
 tells me, "_that I am walking in front of my house with a lady on my
 arm. Here a closed wagon is waiting, a gentleman steps up to me, gives
 his authority as an agent of the police, and demands that I should
 follow him. I only ask for time in which to arrange my affairs._ Can you
 possibly suppose this is a wish of mine to be arrested?" "Of course
 not," I must admit. "Do you happen to know upon what charge you were
 arrested?" "Yes; I believe for infanticide." "Infanticide? But you know
 that only a mother can commit this crime upon her newly born child?"
 "That is true."[4] "And under what circumstances did you dream; what
 happened on the evening before?" "I would rather not tell you that; it
 is a delicate matter." "But I must have it, otherwise we must forgo the
 interpretation of the dream." "Well, then, I will tell you. I spent the
 night, not at home, but at the house of a lady who means very much to
 me. When we awoke in the morning, something again passed between us.
 Then I went to sleep again, and dreamt what I have told you." "The woman
 is married?" "Yes." "And you do not wish her to conceive a child?" "No;
 that might betray us." "Then you do not practice normal coitus?" "I take
 the precaution to withdraw before ejaculation." "Am I permitted to
 assume that you did this trick several times during the night, and that
 in the morning you were not quite sure whether you had succeeded?" "That
 might be the case." "Then your dream is the fulfillment of a wish. By
 means of it you secure the assurance that you have not begotten a child,
 or, what amounts to the same thing, that you have killed a child. I can
 easily demonstrate the connecting links. Do you remember, a few days ago
 we were talking about the distress of matrimony (Ehenot), and about the
 inconsistency of permitting the practice of coitus as long as no
 impregnation takes place, while every delinquency after the ovum and
 the semen meet and a foetus is formed is punished as a crime? In
 connection with this, we also recalled the mediaeval controversy about
 the moment of time at which the soul is really lodged in the foetus,
 since the concept of murder becomes admissible only from that point on.
 Doubtless you also know the gruesome poem by Lenau, which puts
 infanticide and the prevention of children on the same plane."
 "Strangely enough, I had happened to think of Lenau during the
 afternoon." "Another echo of your dream. And now I shall demonstrate to
 you another subordinate wish-fulfillment in your dream. You walk in
 front of your house with the lady on your arm. So you take her home,
 instead of spending the night at her house, as you do in actuality. The
 fact that the wish-fulfillment, which is the essence of the dream,
 disguises itself in such an unpleasant form, has perhaps more than one
 reason. From my essay on the etiology of anxiety neuroses, you will see
 that I note interrupted coitus as one of the factors which cause the
 development of neurotic fear. It would be consistent with this that if
 after repeated cohabitation of the kind mentioned you should be left in
 an uncomfortable mood, which now becomes an element in the composition
 of your dream. You also make use of this unpleasant state of mind to
 conceal the wish-fulfillment. Furthermore, the mention of infanticide
 has not yet been explained. Why does this crime, which is peculiar to
 females, occur to you?" "I shall confess to you that I was involved in
 such an affair years ago. Through my fault a girl tried to protect
 herself from the consequences of a _liaison_ with me by securing an
 abortion. I had nothing to do with carrying out the plan, but I was
 naturally for a long time worried lest the affair might be discovered."
 "I understand; this recollection furnished a second reason why the
 supposition that you had done your trick badly must have been painful to
 you."
 
 A young physician, who had heard this dream of my colleague when it was
 told, must have felt implicated by it, for he hastened to imitate it in
 a dream of his own, applying its mode of thinking to another subject.
 The day before he had handed in a declaration of his income, which was
 perfectly honest, because he had little to declare. He dreamt that an
 acquaintance of his came from a meeting of the tax commission and
 informed him that all the other declarations of income had passed
 uncontested, but that his own had awakened general suspicion, and that
 he would be punished with a heavy fine. The dream is a poorly-concealed
 fulfillment of the wish to be known as a physician with a large income.
 It likewise recalls the story of the young girl who was advised against
 accepting her suitor because he was a man of quick temper who would
 surely treat her to blows after they were married.
 
 The answer of the girl was: "I wish he _would_ strike me!" Her wish to
 be married is so strong that she takes into the bargain the discomfort
 which is said to be connected with matrimony, and which is predicted for
 her, and even raises it to a wish.
 
 If I group the very frequently occurring dreams of this sort, which seem
 flatly to contradict my theory, in that they contain the denial of a
 wish or some occurrence decidedly unwished for, under the head of
 "counter wish-dreams," I observe that they may all be referred to two
 principles, of which one has not yet been mentioned, although it plays a
 large part in the dreams of human beings. One of the motives inspiring
 these dreams is the wish that I should appear in the wrong. These dreams
 regularly occur in the course of my treatment if the patient shows a
 resistance against me, and I can count with a large degree of certainty
 upon causing such a dream after I have once explained to the patient my
 theory that the dream is a wish-fulfillment.[5] I may even expect this
 to be the case in a dream merely in order to fulfill the wish that I may
 appear in the wrong. The last dream which I shall tell from those
 occurring in the course of treatment again shows this very thing. A
 young girl who has struggled hard to continue my treatment, against the
 will of her relatives and the authorities whom she had consulted, dreams
 as follows: _She is forbidden at home to come to me any more. She then
 reminds me of the promise I made her to treat her for nothing if
 necessary, and I say to her: "I can show no consideration in money
 matters."_
 
 It is not at all easy in this case to demonstrate the fulfillment of a
 wish, but in all cases of this kind there is a second problem, the
 solution of which helps also to solve the first. Where does she get the
 words which she puts into my mouth? Of course I have never told her
 anything like that, but one of her brothers, the very one who has the
 greatest influence over her, has been kind enough to make this remark
 about me. It is then the purpose of the dream that this brother should
 remain in the right; and she does not try to justify this brother merely
 in the dream; it is her purpose in life and the motive for her being
 ill.
 
 The other motive for counter wish-dreams is so clear that there is
 danger of overlooking it, as for some time happened in my own case. In
 the sexual make-up of many people there is a masochistic component,
 which has arisen through the conversion of the aggressive, sadistic
 component into its opposite. Such people are called "ideal" masochists,
 if they seek pleasure not in the bodily pain which may be inflicted upon
 them, but in humiliation and in chastisement of the soul. It is obvious
 that such persons can have counter wish-dreams and disagreeable dreams,
 which, however, for them are nothing but wish-fulfillment, affording
 satisfaction for their masochistic inclinations. Here is such a dream. A
 young man, who has in earlier years tormented his elder brother, towards
 whom he was homosexually inclined, but who had undergone a complete
 change of character, has the following dream, which consists of three
 parts: (1) _He is "insulted" by his brother._ (2) _Two adults are
 caressing each other with homosexual intentions._ (3) _His brother has
 sold the enterprise whose management the young man reserved for his own
 future._ He awakens from the last-mentioned dream with the most
 unpleasant feelings, and yet it is a masochistic wish-dream, which might
 be translated: It would serve me quite right if my brother were to make
 that sale against my interest, as a punishment for all the torments
 which he has suffered at my hands.
 
 I hope that the above discussion and examples will suffice--until
 further objection can be raised--to make it seem credible that even
 dreams with a painful content are to be analyzed as the fulfillments of
 wishes. Nor will it seem a matter of chance that in the course of
 interpretation one always happens upon subjects of which one does not
 like to speak or think. The disagreeable sensation which such dreams
 arouse is simply identical with the antipathy which endeavors--usually
 with success--to restrain us from the treatment or discussion of such
 subjects, and which must be overcome by all of us, if, in spite of its
 unpleasantness, we find it necessary to take the matter in hand. But
 this disagreeable sensation, which occurs also in dreams, does not
 preclude the existence of a wish; every one has wishes which he would
 not like to tell to others, which he does not want to admit even to
 himself. We are, on other grounds, justified in connecting the
 disagreeable character of all these dreams with the fact of dream
 disfigurement, and in concluding that these dreams are distorted, and
 that the wish-fulfillment in them is disguised until recognition is
 impossible for no other reason than that a repugnance, a will to
 suppress, exists in relation to the subject-matter of the dream or in
 relation to the wish which the dream creates. Dream disfigurement,
 then, turns out in reality to be an act of the censor. We shall take
 into consideration everything which the analysis of disagreeable dreams
 has brought to light if we reword our formula as follows: _The dream is
 the (disguised) fulfillment of a (suppressed, repressed) wish_.
 
 Now there still remain as a particular species of dreams with painful
 content, dreams of anxiety, the inclusion of which under dreams of
 wishing will find least acceptance with the uninitiated. But I can
 settle the problem of anxiety dreams in very short order; for what they
 may reveal is not a new aspect of the dream problem; it is a question in
 their case of understanding neurotic anxiety in general. The fear which
 we experience in the dream is only seemingly explained by the dream
 content. If we subject the content of the dream to analysis, we become
 aware that the dream fear is no more justified by the dream content than
 the fear in a phobia is justified by the idea upon which the phobia
 depends. For example, it is true that it is possible to fall out of a
 window, and that some care must be exercised when one is near a window,
 but it is inexplicable why the anxiety in the corresponding phobia is so
 great, and why it follows its victims to an extent so much greater than
 is warranted by its origin. The same explanation, then, which applies to
 the phobia applies also to the dream of anxiety. In both cases the
 anxiety is only superficially attached to the idea which accompanies it
 and comes from another source.
 
 On account of the intimate relation of dream fear to neurotic fear,
 discussion of the former obliges me to refer to the latter. In a little
 essay on "The Anxiety Neurosis,"[6] I maintained that neurotic fear has
 its origin in the sexual life, and corresponds to a libido which has
 been turned away from its object and has not succeeded in being applied.
 From this formula, which has since proved its validity more and more
 clearly, we may deduce the conclusion that the content of anxiety dreams
 is of a sexual nature, the libido belonging to which content has been
 transformed into fear.
 
 [1] To sit for the painter. Goethe: "And if he has no backside, how can
 the nobleman sit?"
 
 [2] I myself regret the introduction of such passages from the
 psychopathology of hysteria, which, because of their fragmentary
 representation and of being torn from all connection with the subject,
 cannot have a very enlightening influence. If these passages are capable
 of throwing light upon the intimate relations between the dream and the
 psychoneuroses, they have served the purpose for which I have taken them
 up.
 
 [3] Something like the smoked salmon in the dream of the deferred
 supper.
 
 [4] It often happens that a dream is told incompletely, and that a
 recollection of the omitted portions appear only in the course of the
 analysis. These portions subsequently fitted in, regularly furnish the
 key to the interpretation. _Cf._ below, about forgetting in dreams.
 
 [5] Similar "counter wish-dreams" have been repeatedly reported to me
 within the last few years by my pupils who thus reacted to their first
 encounter with the "wish theory of the dream."
 
 [6] See _Selected Papers on Hysteria and other Psychoneuroses_, p. 133,
 translated by A.A. Brill, _Journal of Nervous and Mental Diseases_,
 Monograph Series.
 
 
 
 
 V
 
 SEX IN DREAMS
 
 
 The more one is occupied with the solution of dreams, the more willing
 one must become to acknowledge that the majority of the dreams of adults
 treat of sexual material and give expression to erotic wishes. Only one
 who really analyzes dreams, that is to say, who pushes forward from
 their manifest content to the latent dream thoughts, can form an opinion
 on this subject--never the person who is satisfied with registering the
 manifest content (as, for example, Naecke in his works on sexual dreams).
 Let us recognize at once that this fact is not to be wondered at, but
 that it is in complete harmony with the fundamental assumptions of dream
 explanation. No other impulse has had to undergo so much suppression
 from the time of childhood as the sex impulse in its numerous
 components, from no other impulse have survived so many and such intense
 unconscious wishes, which now act in the sleeping state in such a manner
 as to produce dreams. In dream interpretation, this significance of
 sexual complexes must never be forgotten, nor must they, of course, be
 exaggerated to the point of being considered exclusive.
 
 Of many dreams it can be ascertained by a careful interpretation that
 they are even to be taken bisexually, inasmuch as they result in an
 irrefutable secondary interpretation in which they realize homosexual
 feelings--that is, feelings that are common to the normal sexual
 activity of the dreaming person. But that all dreams are to be
 interpreted bisexually, seems to me to be a generalization as
 indemonstrable as it is improbable, which I should not like to support.
 Above all I should not know how to dispose of the apparent fact that
 there are many dreams satisfying other than--in the widest sense--erotic
 needs, as dreams of hunger, thirst, convenience, &c. Likewise the
 similar assertions "that behind every dream one finds the death
 sentence" (Stekel), and that every dream shows "a continuation from the
 feminine to the masculine line" (Adler), seem to me to proceed far
 beyond what is admissible in the interpretation of dreams.
 
 We have already asserted elsewhere that dreams which are conspicuously
 innocent invariably embody coarse erotic wishes, and we might confirm
 this by means of numerous fresh examples. But many dreams which appear
 indifferent, and which would never be suspected of any particular
 significance, can be traced back, after analysis, to unmistakably sexual
 wish-feelings, which are often of an unexpected nature. For example,
 who would suspect a sexual wish in the following dream until the
 interpretation had been worked out? The dreamer relates: _Between two
 stately palaces stands a little house, receding somewhat, whose doors
 are closed. My wife leads me a little way along the street up to the
 little house, and pushes in the door, and then I slip quickly and easily
 into the interior of a courtyard that slants obliquely upwards._
 
 Any one who has had experience in the translating of dreams will, of
 course, immediately perceive that penetrating into narrow spaces, and
 opening locked doors, belong to the commonest sexual symbolism, and will
 easily find in this dream a representation of attempted coition from
 behind (between the two stately buttocks of the female body). The narrow
 slanting passage is of course the vagina; the assistance attributed to
 the wife of the dreamer requires the interpretation that in reality it
 is only consideration for the wife which is responsible for the
 detention from such an attempt. Moreover, inquiry shows that on the
 previous day a young girl had entered the household of the dreamer who
 had pleased him, and who had given him the impression that she would not
 be altogether opposed to an approach of this sort. The little house
 between the two palaces is taken from a reminiscence of the Hradschin
 in Prague, and thus points again to the girl who is a native of that
 city.
 
 If with my patients I emphasize the frequency of the Oedipus dream--of
 having sexual intercourse with one's mother--I get the answer: "I cannot
 remember such a dream." Immediately afterwards, however, there arises
 the recollection of another disguised and indifferent dream, which has
 been dreamed repeatedly by the patient, and the analysis shows it to be
 a dream of this same content--that is, another Oedipus dream. I can
 assure the reader that veiled dreams of sexual intercourse with the
 mother are a great deal more frequent than open ones to the same effect.
 
 There are dreams about landscapes and localities in which emphasis is
 always laid upon the assurance: "I have been there before." In this case
 the locality is always the genital organ of the mother; it can indeed be
 asserted with such certainty of no other locality that one "has been
 there before."
 
 A large number of dreams, often full of fear, which are concerned with
 passing through narrow spaces or with staying, in the water, are based
 upon fancies about the embryonic life, about the sojourn in the mother's
 womb, and about the act of birth. The following is the dream of a young
 man who in his fancy has already while in embryo taken advantage of his
 opportunity to spy upon an act of coition between his parents.
 
 _"He is in a deep shaft, in which there is a window, as in the Semmering
 Tunnel. At first he sees an empty landscape through this window, and
 then he composes a picture into it, which is immediately at hand and
 which fills out the empty space. The picture represents a field which is
 being thoroughly harrowed by an implement, and the delightful air, the
 accompanying idea of hard work, and the bluish-black clods of earth make
 a pleasant impression. He then goes on and sees a primary school opened
 ... and he is surprised that so much attention is devoted in it to the
 sexual feelings of the child, which makes him think of me."_
 
 Here is a pretty water-dream of a female patient, which was turned to
 extraordinary account in the course of treatment.
 
 _At her summer resort at the ... Lake, she hurls herself into the dark
 water at a place where the pale moon is reflected in the water._
 
 Dreams of this sort are parturition dreams; their interpretation is
 accomplished by reversing the fact reported in the manifest dream
 content; thus, instead of "throwing one's self into the water," read
 "coming out of the water," that is, "being born." The place from which
 one is born is recognized if one thinks of the bad sense of the French
 "la lune." The pale moon thus becomes the white "bottom" (Popo), which
 the child soon recognizes as the place from which it came. Now what can
 be the meaning of the patient's wishing to be born at her summer resort?
 I asked the dreamer this, and she answered without hesitation: "Hasn't
 the treatment made me as though I were born again?" Thus the dream
 becomes an invitation to continue the cure at this summer resort, that
 is, to visit her there; perhaps it also contains a very bashful allusion
 to the wish to become a mother herself.[1]
 
 Another dream of parturition, with its interpretation, I take from the
 work of E. Jones. _"She stood at the seashore watching a small boy, who
 seemed to be hers, wading into the water. This he did till the water
 covered him, and she could only see his head bobbing up and down near
 the surface. The scene then changed to the crowded hall of a hotel. Her
 husband left her, and she 'entered into conversation with' a
 stranger."_ The second half of the dream was discovered in the analysis
 to represent a flight from her husband, and the entering into intimate
 relations with a third person, behind whom was plainly indicated Mr.
 X.'s brother mentioned in a former dream. The first part of the dream
 was a fairly evident birth phantasy. In dreams as in mythology, the
 delivery of a child _from_ the uterine waters is commonly presented by
 distortion as the entry of the child _into_ water; among many others,
 the births of Adonis, Osiris, Moses, and Bacchus are well-known
 illustrations of this. The bobbing up and down of the head in the water
 at once recalled to the patient the sensation of quickening she had
 experienced in her only pregnancy. Thinking of the boy going into the
 water induced a reverie in which she saw herself taking him out of the
 water, carrying him into the nursery, washing him and dressing him, and
 installing him in her household.
 
 The second half of the dream, therefore, represents thoughts concerning
 the elopement, which belonged to the first half of the underlying latent
 content; the first half of the dream corresponded with the second half
 of the latent content, the birth phantasy. Besides this inversion in
 order, further inversions took place in each half of the dream. In the
 first half the child _entered_ the water, and then his head bobbed; in
 the underlying dream thoughts first the quickening occurred, and then
 the child left the water (a double inversion). In the second half her
 husband left her; in the dream thoughts she left her husband.
 
 Another parturition dream is related by Abraham of a young woman looking
 forward to her first confinement. From a place in the floor of the house
 a subterranean canal leads directly into the water (parturition path,
 amniotic liquor). She lifts up a trap in the floor, and there
 immediately appears a creature dressed in a brownish fur, which almost
 resembles a seal. This creature changes into the younger brother of the
 dreamer, to whom she has always stood in maternal relationship.
 
 Dreams of "saving" are connected with parturition dreams. To save,
 especially to save from the water, is equivalent to giving birth when
 dreamed by a woman; this sense is, however, modified when the dreamer is
 a man.
 
 Robbers, burglars at night, and ghosts, of which we are afraid before
 going to bed, and which occasionally even disturb our sleep, originate
 in one and the same childish reminiscence. They are the nightly visitors
 who have awakened the child to set it on the chamber so that it may not
 wet the bed, or have lifted the cover in order to see clearly how the
 child is holding its hands while sleeping. I have been able to induce an
 exact recollection of the nocturnal visitor in the analysis of some of
 these anxiety dreams. The robbers were always the father, the ghosts
 more probably corresponded to feminine persons with white night-gowns.
 
 When one has become familiar with the abundant use of symbolism for the
 representation of sexual material in dreams, one naturally raises the
 question whether there are not many of these symbols which appear once
 and for all with a firmly established significance like the signs in
 stenography; and one is tempted to compile a new dream-book according to
 the cipher method. In this connection it may be remarked that this
 symbolism does not belong peculiarly to the dream, but rather to
 unconscious thinking, particularly that of the masses, and it is to be
 found in greater perfection in the folklore, in the myths, legends, and
 manners of speech, in the proverbial sayings, and in the current
 witticisms of a nation than in its dreams.
 
 The dream takes advantage of this symbolism in order to give a disguised
 representation to its latent thoughts. Among the symbols which are used
 in this manner there are of course many which regularly, or almost
 regularly, mean the same thing. Only it is necessary to keep in mind the
 curious plasticity of psychic material. Now and then a symbol in the
 dream content may have to be interpreted not symbolically, but according
 to its real meaning; at another time the dreamer, owing to a peculiar
 set of recollections, may create for himself the right to use anything
 whatever as a sexual symbol, though it is not ordinarily used in that
 way. Nor are the most frequently used sexual symbols unambiguous every
 time.
 
 After these limitations and reservations I may call attention to the
 following: Emperor and Empress (King and Queen) in most cases really
 represent the parents of the dreamer; the dreamer himself or herself is
 the prince or princess. All elongated objects, sticks, tree-trunks, and
 umbrellas (on account of the stretching-up which might be compared to an
 erection! all elongated and sharp weapons, knives, daggers, and pikes,
 are intended to represent the male member. A frequent, not very
 intelligible, symbol for the same is a nail-file (on account of the
 rubbing and scraping?). Little cases, boxes, caskets, closets, and
 stoves correspond to the female part. The symbolism of lock and key has
 been very gracefully employed by Uhland in his song about the "Grafen
 Eberstein," to make a common smutty joke. The dream of walking through a
 row of rooms is a brothel or harem dream. Staircases, ladders, and
 flights of stairs, or climbing on these, either upwards or downwards,
 are symbolic representations of the sexual act. Smooth walls over which
 one is climbing, facades of houses upon which one is letting oneself
 down, frequently under great anxiety, correspond to the erect human
 body, and probably repeat in the dream reminiscences of the upward
 climbing of little children on their parents or foster parents. "Smooth"
 walls are men. Often in a dream of anxiety one is holding on firmly to
 some projection from a house. Tables, set tables, and boards are women,
 perhaps on account of the opposition which does away with the bodily
 contours. Since "bed and board" (_mensa et thorus_) constitute marriage,
 the former are often put for the latter in the dream, and as far as
 practicable the sexual presentation complex is transposed to the eating
 complex. Of articles of dress the woman's hat may frequently be
 definitely interpreted as the male genital. In dreams of men one often
 finds the cravat as a symbol for the penis; this indeed is not only
 because cravats hang down long, and are characteristic of the man, but
 also because one can select them at pleasure, a freedom which is
 prohibited by nature in the original of the symbol. Persons who make use
 of this symbol in the dream are very extravagant with cravats, and
 possess regular collections of them. All complicated machines and
 apparatus in dream are very probably genitals, in the description of
 which dream symbolism shows itself to be as tireless as the activity of
 wit. Likewise many landscapes in dreams, especially with bridges or with
 wooded mountains, can be readily recognized as descriptions of the
 genitals. Finally where one finds incomprehensible neologisms one may
 think of combinations made up of components having a sexual
 significance. Children also in the dream often signify the genitals, as
 men and women are in the habit of fondly referring to their genital
 organ as their "little one." As a very recent symbol of the male genital
 may be mentioned the flying machine, utilization of which is justified
 by its relation to flying as well as occasionally by its form. To play
 with a little child or to beat a little one is often the dream's
 representation of onanism. A number of other symbols, in part not
 sufficiently verified are given by Stekel, who illustrates them with
 examples. Right and left, according to him, are to be conceived in the
 dream in an ethical sense. "The right way always signifies the road to
 righteousness, the left the one to crime. Thus the left may signify
 homosexuality, incest, and perversion, while the right signifies
 marriage, relations with a prostitute, &c. The meaning is always
 determined by the individual moral view-point of the dreamer." Relatives
 in the dream generally play the role of genitals. Not to be able to
 catch up with a wagon is interpreted by Stekel as regret not to be able
 to come up to a difference in age. Baggage with which one travels is the
 burden of sin by which one is oppressed. Also numbers, which frequently
 occur in the dream, are assigned by Stekel a fixed symbolical meaning,
 but these interpretations seem neither sufficiently verified nor of
 general validity, although the interpretation in individual cases can
 generally be recognized as probable. In a recently published book by W.
 Stekel, _Die Sprache des Traumes_, which I was unable to utilize, there
 is a list of the most common sexual symbols, the object of which is to
 prove that all sexual symbols can be bisexually used. He states: "Is
 there a symbol which (if in any way permitted by the phantasy) may not
 be used simultaneously in the masculine and the feminine sense!" To be
 sure the clause in parentheses takes away much of the absoluteness of
 this assertion, for this is not at all permitted by the phantasy. I do
 not, however, think it superfluous to state that in my experience
 Stekel's general statement has to give way to the recognition of a
 greater manifoldness. Besides those symbols, which are just as frequent
 for the male as for the female genitals, there are others which
 preponderately, or almost exclusively, designate one of the sexes, and
 there are still others of which only the male or only the female
 signification is known. To use long, firm objects and weapons as symbols
 of the female genitals, or hollow objects (chests, pouches, &c.), as
 symbols of the male genitals, is indeed not allowed by the fancy.
 
 It is true that the tendency of the dream and the unconscious fancy to
 utilize the sexual symbol bisexually betrays an archaic trend, for in
 childhood a difference in the genitals is unknown, and the same genitals
 are attributed to both sexes.
 
 These very incomplete suggestions may suffice to stimulate others to
 make a more careful collection.
 
 I shall now add a few examples of the application of such symbolisms in
 dreams, which will serve to show how impossible it becomes to interpret
 a dream without taking into account the symbolism of dreams, and how
 imperatively it obtrudes itself in many cases.
 
 
 1. The hat as a symbol of the man (of the male genital): (a fragment
 from the dream of a young woman who suffered from agoraphobia on account
 of a fear of temptation).
 
 "I am walking in the street in summer, I wear a straw hat of peculiar
 shape, the middle piece of which is bent upwards and the side pieces of
 which hang downwards (the description became here obstructed), and in
 such a fashion that one is lower than the other. I am cheerful and in a
 confidential mood, and as I pass a troop of young officers I think to
 myself: None of you can have any designs upon me."
 
 As she could produce no associations to the hat, I said to her: "The hat
 is really a male genital, with its raised middle piece and the two
 downward hanging side pieces." I intentionally refrained from
 interpreting those details concerning the unequal downward hanging of
 the two side pieces, although just such individualities in the
 determinations lead the way to the interpretation. I continued by saying
 that if she only had a man with such a virile genital she would not have
 to fear the officers--that is, she would have nothing to wish from them,
 for she is mainly kept from going without protection and company by her
 fancies of temptation. This last explanation of her fear I had already
 been able to give her repeatedly on the basis of other material.
 
 It is quite remarkable how the dreamer behaved after this
 interpretation. She withdrew her description of the hat, and claimed not
 to have said that the two side pieces were hanging downwards. I was,
 however, too sure of what I had heard to allow myself to be misled, and
 I persisted in it. She was quiet for a while, and then found the courage
 to ask why it was that one of her husband's testicles was lower than the
 other, and whether it was the same in all men. With this the peculiar
 detail of the hat was explained, and the whole interpretation was
 accepted by her. The hat symbol was familiar to me long before the
 patient related this dream. From other but less transparent cases I
 believe that the hat may also be taken as a female genital.
 
 
 2. The little one as the genital--to be run over as a symbol of sexual
 intercourse (another dream of the same agoraphobic patient).
 
 "Her mother sends away her little daughter so that she must go alone.
 She rides with her mother to the railroad and sees her little one
 walking directly upon the tracks, so that she cannot avoid being run
 over. She hears the bones crackle. (From this she experiences a feeling
 of discomfort but no real horror.) She then looks out through the car
 window to see whether the parts cannot be seen behind. She then
 reproaches her mother for allowing the little one to go out alone."
 Analysis. It is not an easy matter to give here a complete
 interpretation of the dream. It forms part of a cycle of dreams, and can
 be fully understood only in connection with the others. For it is not
 easy to get the necessary material sufficiently isolated to prove the
 symbolism. The patient at first finds that the railroad journey is to be
 interpreted historically as an allusion to a departure from a sanatorium
 for nervous diseases, with the superintendent of which she naturally was
 in love. Her mother took her away from this place, and the physician
 came to the railroad station and handed her a bouquet of flowers on
 leaving; she felt uncomfortable because her mother witnessed this
 homage. Here the mother, therefore, appears as a disturber of her love
 affairs, which is the role actually played by this strict woman during
 her daughter's girlhood. The next thought referred to the sentence: "She
 then looks to see whether the parts can be seen behind." In the dream
 facade one would naturally be compelled to think of the parts of the
 little daughter run over and ground up. The thought, however, turns in
 quite a different direction. She recalls that she once saw her father in
 the bath-room naked from behind; she then begins to talk about the sex
 differentiation, and asserts that in the man the genitals can be seen
 from behind, but in the woman they cannot. In this connection she now
 herself offers the interpretation that the little one is the genital,
 her little one (she has a four-year-old daughter) her own genital. She
 reproaches her mother for wanting her to live as though she had no
 genital, and recognizes this reproach in the introductory sentence of
 the dream; the mother sends away her little one so that she must go
 alone. In her phantasy going alone on the street signifies to have no
 man and no sexual relations (coire = to go together), and this she does
 not like. According to all her statements she really suffered as a girl
 on account of the jealousy of her mother, because she showed a
 preference for her father.
 
 The "little one" has been noted as a symbol for the male or the female
 genitals by Stekel, who can refer in this connection to a very
 widespread usage of language.
 
 The deeper interpretation of this dream depends upon another dream of
 the same night in which the dreamer identifies herself with her brother.
 She was a "tomboy," and was always being told that she should have been
 born a boy. This identification with the brother shows with special
 clearness that "the little one" signifies the genital. The mother
 threatened him (her) with castration, which could only be understood as
 a punishment for playing with the parts, and the identification,
 therefore, shows that she herself had masturbated as a child, though
 this fact she now retained only in memory concerning her brother. An
 early knowledge of the male genital which she later lost she must have
 acquired at that time according to the assertions of this second dream.
 Moreover the second dream points to the infantile sexual theory that
 girls originate from boys through castration. After I had told her of
 this childish belief, she at once confirmed it with an anecdote in which
 the boy asks the girl: "Was it cut off?" to which the girl replied, "No,
 it's always been so."
 
 The sending away of the little one, of the genital, in the first dream
 therefore also refers to the threatened castration. Finally she blames
 her mother for not having been born a boy.
 
 That "being run over" symbolizes sexual intercourse would not be evident
 from this dream if we were not sure of it from many other sources.
 
 
 3. Representation of the genital by structures, stairways, and shafts.
 (Dream of a young man inhibited by a father complex.)
 
 "He is taking a walk with his father in a place which is surely the
 Prater, for the _Rotunda_ may be seen in front of which there is a small
 front structure to which is attached a captive balloon; the balloon,
 however, seems quite collapsed. His father asks him what this is all
 for; he is surprised at it, but he explains it to his father. They come
 into a court in which lies a large sheet of tin. His father wants to
 pull off a big piece of this, but first looks around to see if any one
 is watching. He tells his father that all he needs to do is to speak to
 the watchman, and then he can take without any further difficulty as
 much as he wants to. From this court a stairway leads down into a shaft,
 the walls of which are softly upholstered something like a leather
 pocketbook. At the end of this shaft there is a longer platform, and
 then a new shaft begins...."
 
 Analysis. This dream belongs to a type of patient which is not favorable
 from a therapeutic point of view. They follow in the analysis without
 offering any resistances whatever up to a certain point, but from that
 point on they remain almost inaccessible. This dream he almost analyzed
 himself. "The Rotunda," he said, "is my genital, the captive balloon in
 front is my penis, about the weakness of which I have worried." We must,
 however, interpret in greater detail; the Rotunda is the buttock which
 is regularly associated by the child with the genital, the smaller front
 structure is the scrotum. In the dream his father asks him what this is
 all for--that is, he asks him about the purpose and arrangement of the
 genitals. It is quite evident that this state of affairs should be
 turned around, and that he should be the questioner. As such a
 questioning on the side of the father has never taken place in reality,
 we must conceive the dream thought as a wish, or take it conditionally,
 as follows: "If I had only asked my father for sexual enlightenment."
 The continuation of this thought we shall soon find in another place.
 
 The court in which the tin sheet is spread out is not to be conceived
 symbolically in the first instance, but originates from his father's
 place of business. For discretionary reasons I have inserted the tin for
 another material in which the father deals, without, however, changing
 anything in the verbal expression of the dream. The dreamer had entered
 his father's business, and had taken a terrible dislike to the
 questionable practices upon which profit mainly depends. Hence the
 continuation of the above dream thought ("if I had only asked him")
 would be: "He would have deceived me just as he does his customers." For
 the pulling off, which serves to represent commercial dishonesty, the
 dreamer himself gives a second explanation--namely, onanism. This is not
 only entirely familiar to us, but agrees very well with the fact that
 the secrecy of onanism is expressed by its opposite ("Why one can do it
 quite openly"). It, moreover, agrees entirely with our expectations that
 the onanistic activity is again put off on the father, just as was the
 questioning in the first scene of the dream. The shaft he at once
 interprets as the vagina by referring to the soft upholstering of the
 walls. That the act of coition in the vagina is described as a going
 down instead of in the usual way as a going up, I have also found true
 in other instances[2].
 
 The details that at the end of the first shaft there is a longer
 platform and then a new shaft, he himself explains biographically. He
 had for some time consorted with women sexually, but had then given it
 up because of inhibitions and now hopes to be able to take it up again
 with the aid of the treatment. The dream, however, becomes indistinct
 toward the end, and to the experienced interpreter it becomes evident
 that in the second scene of the dream the influence of another subject
 has begun to assert itself; in this his father's business and his
 dishonest practices signify the first vagina represented as a shaft so
 that one might think of a reference to the mother.
 
 
 4. The male genital symbolized by persons and the female by a landscape.
 
 (Dream of a woman of the lower class, whose husband is a policeman,
 reported by B. Dattner.)
 
 ... Then some one broke into the house and anxiously called for a
 policeman. But he went with two tramps by mutual consent into a
 church,[3] to which led a great many stairs;[4] behind the church there
 was a mountain,[5] on top of which a dense forest.[6] The policeman was
 furnished with a helmet, a gorget, and a cloak.[7] The two vagrants, who
 went along with the policeman quite peaceably, had tied to their loins
 sack-like aprons.[8] A road led from the church to the mountain. This
 road was overgrown on each side with grass and brushwood, which became
 thicker and thicker as it reached the height of the mountain, where it
 spread out into quite a forest.
 
 
 5. A stairway dream.
 
 (Reported and interpreted by Otto Rank.)
 
 For the following transparent pollution dream, I am indebted to the
 same colleague who furnished us with the dental-irritation dream.
 
 "I am running down the stairway in the stair-house after a little girl,
 whom I wish to punish because she has done something to me. At the
 bottom of the stairs some one held the child for me. (A grown-up woman?)
 I grasp it, but do not know whether I have hit it, for I suddenly find
 myself in the middle of the stairway where I practice coitus with the
 child (in the air as it were). It is really no coitus, I only rub my
 genital on her external genital, and in doing this I see it very
 distinctly, as distinctly as I see her head which is lying sideways.
 During the sexual act I see hanging to the left and above me (also as if
 in the air) two small pictures, landscapes, representing a house on a
 green. On the smaller one my surname stood in the place where the
 painter's signature should be; it seemed to be intended for my birthday
 present. A small sign hung in front of the pictures to the effect that
 cheaper pictures could also be obtained. I then see myself very
 indistinctly lying in bed, just as I had seen myself at the foot of the
 stairs, and I am awakened by a feeling of dampness which came from the
 pollution."
 
 Interpretation. The dreamer had been in a book-store on the evening of
 the day of the dream, where, while he was waiting, he examined some
 pictures which were exhibited, which represented motives similar to the
 dream pictures. He stepped nearer to a small picture which particularly
 took his fancy in order to see the name of the artist, which, however,
 was quite unknown to him.
 
 Later in the same evening, in company, he heard about a Bohemian
 servant-girl who boasted that her illegitimate child "was made on the
 stairs." The dreamer inquired about the details of this unusual
 occurrence, and learned that the servant-girl went with her lover to the
 home of her parents, where there was no opportunity for sexual
 relations, and that the excited man performed the act on the stairs. In
 witty allusion to the mischievous expression used about wine-adulterers,
 the dreamer remarked, "The child really grew on the cellar steps."
 
 These experiences of the day, which are quite prominent in the dream
 content, were readily reproduced by the dreamer. But he just as readily
 reproduced an old fragment of infantile recollection which was also
 utilized by the dream. The stair-house was the house in which he had
 spent the greatest part of his childhood, and in which he had first
 become acquainted with sexual problems. In this house he used, among
 other things, to slide down the banister astride which caused him to
 become sexually excited. In the dream he also comes down the stairs very
 rapidly--so rapidly that, according to his own distinct assertions, he
 hardly touched the individual stairs, but rather "flew" or "slid down,"
 as we used to say. Upon reference to this infantile experience, the
 beginning of the dream seems to represent the factor of sexual
 excitement. In the same house and in the adjacent residence the dreamer
 used to play pugnacious games with the neighboring children, in which he
 satisfied himself just as he did in the dream.
 
 If one recalls from Freud's investigation of sexual symbolism[9] that in
 the dream stairs or climbing stairs almost regularly symbolizes coitus,
 the dream becomes clear. Its motive power as well as its effect, as is
 shown by the pollution, is of a purely libidinous nature. Sexual
 excitement became aroused during the sleeping state (in the dream this
 is represented by the rapid running or sliding down the stairs) and the
 sadistic thread in this is, on the basis of the pugnacious playing,
 indicated in the pursuing and overcoming of the child. The libidinous
 excitement becomes enhanced and urges to sexual action (represented in
 the dream by the grasping of the child and the conveyance of it to the
 middle of the stairway). Up to this point the dream would be one of
 pure, sexual symbolism, and obscure for the unpracticed dream
 interpreter. But this symbolic gratification, which would have insured
 undisturbed sleep, was not sufficient for the powerful libidinous
 excitement. The excitement leads to an orgasm, and thus the whole
 stairway symbolism is unmasked as a substitute for coitus. Freud lays
 stress on the rhythmical character of both actions as one of the reasons
 for the sexual utilization of the stairway symbolism, and this dream
 especially seems to corroborate this, for, according to the express
 assertion of the dreamer, the rhythm of a sexual act was the most
 pronounced feature in the whole dream.
 
 Still another remark concerning the two pictures, which, aside from
 their real significance, also have the value of "Weibsbilder" (literally
 _woman-pictures_, but idiomatically _women_). This is at once shown by
 the fact that the dream deals with a big and a little picture, just as
 the dream content presents a big (grown up) and a little girl. That
 cheap pictures could also be obtained points to the prostitution
 complex, just as the dreamer's surname on the little picture and the
 thought that it was intended for his birthday, point to the parent
 complex (to be born on the stairway--to be conceived in coitus).
 
 The indistinct final scene, in which the dreamer sees himself on the
 staircase landing lying in bed and feeling wet, seems to go back into
 childhood even beyond the infantile onanism, and manifestly has its
 prototype in similarly pleasurable scenes of bed-wetting.
 
 
 6. A modified stair-dream.
 
 To one of my very nervous patients, who was an abstainer, whose fancy
 was fixed on his mother, and who repeatedly dreamed of climbing stairs
 accompanied by his mother, I once remarked that moderate masturbation
 would be less harmful to him than enforced abstinence. This influence
 provoked the following dream:
 
 "His piano teacher reproaches him for neglecting his piano-playing, and
 for not practicing the _Etudes_ of Moscheles and Clementi's _Gradus ad
 Parnassum_." In relation to this he remarked that the _Gradus_ is only a
 stairway, and that the piano itself is only a stairway as it has a
 scale.
 
 It is correct to say that there is no series of associations which
 cannot be adapted to the representation of sexual facts. I conclude with
 the dream of a chemist, a young man, who has been trying to give up his
 habit of masturbation by replacing it with intercourse with women.
 
 _Preliminary statement._--On the day before the dream he had given a
 student instruction concerning Grignard's reaction, in which magnesium
 is to be dissolved in absolutely pure ether under the catalytic
 influence of iodine. Two days before, there had been an explosion in the
 course of the same reaction, in which the investigator had burned his
 hand.
 
 Dream I. _He is to make phenylmagnesium-bromid; he sees the apparatus
 with particular clearness, but he has substituted himself for the
 magnesium. He is now in a curious swaying attitude. He keeps repeating
 to himself, "This is the right thing, it is working, my feet are
 beginning to dissolve and my knees are getting soft." Then he reaches
 down and feels for his feet, and meanwhile (he does not know how) he
 takes his legs out of the crucible, and then again he says to himself,
 "That cannot be.... Yes, it must be so, it has been done correctly."
 Then he partially awakens, and repeats the dream to himself, because he
 wants to tell it to me. He is distinctly afraid of the analysis of the
 dream. He is much excited during this semi-sleeping state, and repeats
 continually, "Phenyl, phenyl."_
 
 II. _He is in ... ing with his whole family; at half-past eleven. He is
 to be at the Schottenthor for a rendezvous with a certain lady, but he
 does not wake up until half-past eleven. He says to himself, "It is too
 late now; when you get there it will be half-past twelve." The next
 instant he sees the whole family gathered about the table--his mother
 and the servant girl with the soup-tureen with particular clearness.
 Then he says to himself, "Well, if we are eating already, I certainly
 can't get away."_
 
 Analysis: He feels sure that even the first dream contains a reference
 to the lady whom he is to meet at the rendezvous (the dream was dreamed
 during the night before the expected meeting). The student to whom he
 gave the instruction is a particularly unpleasant fellow; he had said to
 the chemist: "That isn't right," because the magnesium was still
 unaffected, and the latter answered as though he did not care anything
 about it: "It certainly isn't right." He himself must be this student;
 he is as indifferent towards his analysis as the student is towards his
 synthesis; the _He_ in the dream, however, who accomplishes the
 operation, is myself. How unpleasant he must seem to me with his
 indifference towards the success achieved!
 
 Moreover, he is the material with which the analysis (synthesis) is
 made. For it is a question of the success of the treatment. The legs in
 the dream recall an impression of the previous evening. He met a lady at
 a dancing lesson whom he wished to conquer; he pressed her to him so
 closely that she once cried out. After he had stopped pressing against
 her legs, he felt her firm responding pressure against his lower thighs
 as far as just above his knees, at the place mentioned in the dream. In
 this situation, then, the woman is the magnesium in the retort, which is
 at last working. He is feminine towards me, as he is masculine towards
 the woman. If it will work with the woman, the treatment will also work.
 Feeling and becoming aware of himself in the region of his knees refers
 to masturbation, and corresponds to his fatigue of the previous day....
 The rendezvous had actually been set for half-past eleven. His wish to
 oversleep and to remain with his usual sexual objects (that is, with
 masturbation) corresponds with his resistance.
 
 [1] It is only of late that I have learned to value the significance of
 fancies and unconscious thoughts about life in the womb. They contain
 the explanation of the curious fear felt by so many people of being
 buried alive, as well as the profoundest unconscious reason for the
 belief in a life after death which represents nothing but a projection
 into the future of this mysterious life before birth. _The act of birth,
 moreover, is the first experience with fear, and is thus the source and
 model of the emotion of fear._
 
 [2] Cf. _Zentralblatt fuer psychoanalyse_, I.
 
 [3] Or chapel--vagina.
 
 [4] Symbol of coitus.
 
 [5] Mons veneris.
 
 [6] Crines pubis.
 
 [7] Demons in cloaks and capucines are, according to the explanation of
 a man versed in the subject, of a phallic nature.
 
 [8] The two halves of the scrotum.
 
 [9] See _Zentralblatt fuer Psychoanalyse_, vol. i., p. 2.
 
 
 
 
 VI
 
 THE WISH IN DREAMS
 
 
 That the dream should be nothing but a wish-fulfillment surely seemed
 strange to us all--and that not alone because of the contradictions
 offered by the anxiety dream.
 
 After learning from the first analytical explanations that the dream
 conceals sense and psychic validity, we could hardly expect so simple a
 determination of this sense. According to the correct but concise
 definition of Aristotle, the dream is a continuation of thinking in
 sleep (in so far as one sleeps). Considering that during the day our
 thoughts produce such a diversity of psychic acts--judgments,
 conclusions, contradictions, expectations, intentions, &c.--why should
 our sleeping thoughts be forced to confine themselves to the production
 of wishes? Are there not, on the contrary, many dreams that present a
 different psychic act in dream form, _e.g._, a solicitude, and is not
 the very transparent father's dream mentioned above of just such a
 nature? From the gleam of light falling into his eyes while asleep the
 father draws the solicitous conclusion that a candle has been upset and
 may have set fire to the corpse; he transforms this conclusion into a
 dream by investing it with a senseful situation enacted in the present
 tense. What part is played in this dream by the wish-fulfillment, and
 which are we to suspect--the predominance of the thought continued from,
 the waking state or of the thought incited by the new sensory
 impression?
 
 All these considerations are just, and force us to enter more deeply
 into the part played by the wish-fulfillment in the dream, and into the
 significance of the waking thoughts continued in sleep.
 
 It is in fact the wish-fulfillment that has already induced us to
 separate dreams into two groups. We have found some dreams that were
 plainly wish-fulfillments; and others in which wish-fulfillment could
 not be recognized, and was frequently concealed by every available
 means. In this latter class of dreams we recognized the influence of the
 dream censor. The undisguised wish dreams were chiefly found in
 children, yet fleeting open-hearted wish dreams _seemed_ (I purposely
 emphasize this word) to occur also in adults.
 
 We may now ask whence the wish fulfilled in the dream originates. But to
 what opposition or to what diversity do we refer this "whence"? I think
 it is to the opposition between conscious daily life and a psychic
 activity remaining unconscious which can only make itself noticeable
 during the night. I thus find a threefold possibility for the origin of
 a wish. Firstly, it may have been incited during the day, and owing to
 external circumstances failed to find gratification, there is thus left
 for the night an acknowledged but unfulfilled wish. Secondly, it may
 come to the surface during the day but be rejected, leaving an
 unfulfilled but suppressed wish. Or, thirdly, it may have no relation to
 daily life, and belong to those wishes that originate during the night
 from the suppression. If we now follow our scheme of the psychic
 apparatus, we can localize a wish of the first order in the system
 Forec. We may assume that a wish of the second order has been forced
 back from the Forec. system into the Unc. system, where alone, if
 anywhere, it can maintain itself; while a wish-feeling of the third
 order we consider altogether incapable of leaving the Unc. system. This
 brings up the question whether wishes arising from these different
 sources possess the same value for the dream, and whether they have the
 same power to incite a dream.
 
 On reviewing the dreams which we have at our disposal for answering this
 question, we are at once moved to add as a fourth source of the
 dream-wish the actual wish incitements arising during the night, such
 as thirst and sexual desire. It then becomes evident that the source of
 the dream-wish does not affect its capacity to incite a dream. That a
 wish suppressed during the day asserts itself in the dream can be shown
 by a great many examples. I shall mention a very simple example of this
 class. A somewhat sarcastic young lady, whose younger friend has become
 engaged to be married, is asked throughout the day by her acquaintances
 whether she knows and what she thinks of the fiance. She answers with
 unqualified praise, thereby silencing her own judgment, as she would
 prefer to tell the truth, namely, that he is an ordinary person. The
 following night she dreams that the same question is put to her, and
 that she replies with the formula: "In case of subsequent orders it will
 suffice to mention the number." Finally, we have learned from numerous
 analyses that the wish in all dreams that have been subject to
 distortion has been derived from the unconscious, and has been unable to
 come to perception in the waking state. Thus it would appear that all
 wishes are of the same value and force for the dream formation.
 
 I am at present unable to prove that the state of affairs is really
 different, but I am strongly inclined to assume a more stringent
 determination of the dream-wish. Children's dreams leave no doubt that
 an unfulfilled wish of the day may be the instigator of the dream. But
 we must not forget that it is, after all, the wish of a child, that it
 is a wish-feeling of infantile strength only. I have a strong doubt
 whether an unfulfilled wish from the day would suffice to create a dream
 in an adult. It would rather seem that as we learn to control our
 impulses by intellectual activity, we more and more reject as vain the
 formation or retention of such intense wishes as are natural to
 childhood. In this, indeed, there may be individual variations; some
 retain the infantile type of psychic processes longer than others. The
 differences are here the same as those found in the gradual decline of
 the originally distinct visual imagination.
 
 In general, however, I am of the opinion that unfulfilled wishes of the
 day are insufficient to produce a dream in adults. I readily admit that
 the wish instigators originating in conscious like contribute towards
 the incitement of dreams, but that is probably all. The dream would not
 originate if the foreconscious wish were not reinforced from another
 source.
 
 That source is the unconscious. I believe that _the conscious wish is a
 dream inciter only if it succeeds in arousing a similar unconscious wish
 which reinforces it_. Following the suggestions obtained through the
 psychoanalysis of the neuroses, I believe that these unconscious wishes
 are always active and ready for expression whenever they find an
 opportunity to unite themselves with an emotion from conscious life, and
 that they transfer their greater intensity to the lesser intensity of
 the latter.[1] It may therefore seem that the conscious wish alone has
 been realized in a dream; but a slight peculiarity in the formation of
 this dream will put us on the track of the powerful helper from the
 unconscious. These ever active and, as it were, immortal wishes from the
 unconscious recall the legendary Titans who from time immemorial have
 borne the ponderous mountains which were once rolled upon them by the
 victorious gods, and which even now quiver from time to time from the
 convulsions of their mighty limbs; I say that these wishes found in the
 repression are of themselves of an infantile origin, as we have learned
 from the psychological investigation of the neuroses. I should like,
 therefore, to withdraw the opinion previously expressed that it is
 unimportant whence the dream-wish originates, and replace it by another,
 as follows: _The wish manifested in the dream must be an infantile one_.
 In the adult it originates in the Unc., while in the child, where no
 separation and censor as yet exist between Forec. and Unc., or where
 these are only in the process of formation, it is an unfulfilled and
 unrepressed wish from the waking state. I am aware that this conception
 cannot be generally demonstrated, but I maintain nevertheless that it
 can be frequently demonstrated, even when it was not suspected, and that
 it cannot be generally refuted.
 
 The wish-feelings which remain from the conscious waking state are,
 therefore, relegated to the background in the dream formation. In the
 dream content I shall attribute to them only the part attributed to the
 material of actual sensations during sleep. If I now take into account
 those other psychic instigations remaining from the waking state which
 are not wishes, I shall only adhere to the line mapped out for me by
 this train of thought. We may succeed in provisionally terminating the
 sum of energy of our waking thoughts by deciding to go to sleep. He is a
 good sleeper who can do this; Napoleon I. is reputed to have been a
 model of this sort. But we do not always succeed in accomplishing it, or
 in accomplishing it perfectly. Unsolved problems, harassing cares,
 overwhelming impressions continue the thinking activity even during
 sleep, maintaining psychic processes in the system which we have termed
 the foreconscious. These mental processes continuing into sleep may be
 divided into the following groups: 1, That which has not been terminated
 during the day owing to casual prevention; 2, that which has been left
 unfinished by temporary paralysis of our mental power, _i.e._ the
 unsolved; 3, that which has been rejected and suppressed during the day.
 This unites with a powerful group (4) formed by that which has been
 excited in our Unc. during the day by the work of the foreconscious.
 Finally, we may add group (5) consisting of the indifferent and hence
 unsettled impressions of the day.
 
 We should not underrate the psychic intensities introduced into sleep by
 these remnants of waking life, especially those emanating from the group
 of the unsolved. These excitations surely continue to strive for
 expression during the night, and we may assume with equal certainty that
 the sleeping state renders impossible the usual continuation of the
 excitement in the foreconscious and the termination of the excitement by
 its becoming conscious. As far as we can normally become conscious of
 our mental processes, even during the night, in so far we are not
 asleep. I shall not venture to state what change is produced in the
 Forec. system by the sleeping state, but there is no doubt that the
 psychological character of sleep is essentially due to the change of
 energy in this very system, which also dominates the approach to
 motility, which is paralyzed during sleep. In contradistinction to this,
 there seems to be nothing in the psychology of the dream to warrant the
 assumption that sleep produces any but secondary changes in the
 conditions of the Unc. system. Hence, for the nocturnal excitation in
 the Force, there remains no other path than that followed by the wish
 excitements from the Unc. This excitation must seek reinforcement from
 the Unc., and follow the detours of the unconscious excitations. But
 what is the relation of the foreconscious day remnants to the dream?
 There is no doubt that they penetrate abundantly into the dream, that
 they utilize the dream content to obtrude themselves upon consciousness
 even during the night; indeed, they occasionally even dominate the dream
 content, and impel it to continue the work of the day; it is also
 certain that the day remnants may just as well have any other character
 as that of wishes; but it is highly instructive and even decisive for
 the theory of wish-fulfillment to see what conditions they must comply
 with in order to be received into the dream.
 
 Let us pick out one of the dreams cited above as examples, _e.g._, the
 dream in which my friend Otto seems to show the symptoms of Basedow's
 disease. My friend Otto's appearance occasioned me some concern during
 the day, and this worry, like everything else referring to this person,
 affected me. I may also assume that these feelings followed me into
 sleep. I was probably bent on finding out what was the matter with him.
 In the night my worry found expression in the dream which I have
 reported, the content of which was not only senseless, but failed to
 show any wish-fulfillment. But I began to investigate for the source of
 this incongruous expression of the solicitude felt during the day, and
 analysis revealed the connection. I identified my friend Otto with a
 certain Baron L. and myself with a Professor R. There was only one
 explanation for my being impelled to select just this substitution for
 the day thought. I must have always been prepared in the Unc. to
 identify myself with Professor R., as it meant the realization of one of
 the immortal infantile wishes, viz. that of becoming great. Repulsive
 ideas respecting my friend, that would certainly have been repudiated
 in a waking state, took advantage of the opportunity to creep into the
 dream, but the worry of the day likewise found some form of expression
 through a substitution in the dream content. The day thought, which was
 no wish in itself but rather a worry, had in some way to find a
 connection with the infantile now unconscious and suppressed wish, which
 then allowed it, though already properly prepared, to "originate" for
 consciousness. The more dominating this worry, the stronger must be the
 connection to be established; between the contents of the wish and that
 of the worry there need be no connection, nor was there one in any of
 our examples.
 
 We can now sharply define the significance of the unconscious wish for
 the dream. It may be admitted that there is a whole class of dreams in
 which the incitement originates preponderatingly or even exclusively
 from the remnants of daily life; and I believe that even my cherished
 desire to become at some future time a "professor extraordinarius" would
 have allowed me to slumber undisturbed that night had not my worry about
 my friend's health been still active. But this worry alone would not
 have produced a dream; the motive power needed by the dream had to be
 contributed by a wish, and it was the affair of the worriment to
 procure for itself such wish as a motive power of the dream. To speak
 figuratively, it is quite possible that a day thought plays the part of
 the contractor (_entrepreneur_) in the dream. But it is known that no
 matter what idea the contractor may have in mind, and how desirous he
 may be of putting it into operation, he can do nothing without capital;
 he must depend upon a capitalist to defray the necessary expenses, and
 this capitalist, who supplies the psychic expenditure for the dream is
 invariably and indisputably _a wish from the unconscious_, no matter
 what the nature of the waking thought may be.
 
 In other cases the capitalist himself is the contractor for the dream;
 this, indeed, seems to be the more usual case. An unconscious wish is
 produced by the day's work, which in turn creates the dream. The dream
 processes, moreover, run parallel with all the other possibilities of
 the economic relationship used here as an illustration. Thus, the
 entrepreneur may contribute some capital himself, or several
 entrepreneurs may seek the aid of the same capitalist, or several
 capitalists may jointly supply the capital required by the entrepreneur.
 Thus there are dreams produced by more than one dream-wish, and many
 similar variations which may readily be passed over and are of no
 further interest to us. What we have left unfinished in this discussion
 of the dream-wish we shall be able to develop later.
 
 The "tertium comparationis" in the comparisons just employed--_i.e._ the
 sum placed at our free disposal in proper allotment--admits of still
 finer application for the illustration of the dream structure. We can
 recognize in most dreams a center especially supplied with perceptible
 intensity. This is regularly the direct representation of the
 wish-fulfillment; for, if we undo the displacements of the dream-work by
 a process of retrogression, we find that the psychic intensity of the
 elements in the dream thoughts is replaced by the perceptible intensity
 of the elements in the dream content. The elements adjoining the
 wish-fulfillment have frequently nothing to do with its sense, but prove
 to be descendants of painful thoughts which oppose the wish. But, owing
 to their frequently artificial connection with the central element, they
 have acquired sufficient intensity to enable them to come to expression.
 Thus, the force of expression of the wish-fulfillment is diffused over a
 certain sphere of association, within which it raises to expression all
 elements, including those that are in themselves impotent. In dreams
 having several strong wishes we can readily separate from one another
 the spheres of the individual wish-fulfillments; the gaps in the dream
 likewise can often be explained as boundary zones.
 
 Although the foregoing remarks have considerably limited the
 significance of the day remnants for the dream, it will nevertheless be
 worth our while to give them some attention. For they must be a
 necessary ingredient in the formation of the dream, inasmuch as
 experience reveals the surprising fact that every dream shows in its
 content a connection with some impression of a recent day, often of the
 most indifferent kind. So far we have failed to see any necessity for
 this addition to the dream mixture. This necessity appears only when we
 follow closely the part played by the unconscious wish, and then seek
 information in the psychology of the neuroses. We thus learn that the
 unconscious idea, as such, is altogether incapable of entering into the
 foreconscious, and that it can exert an influence there only by uniting
 with a harmless idea already belonging to the foreconscious, to which it
 transfers its intensity and under which it allows itself to be
 concealed. This is the fact of transference which furnishes an
 explanation for so many surprising occurrences in the psychic life of
 neurotics.
 
 The idea from the foreconscious which thus obtains an unmerited
 abundance of intensity may be left unchanged by the transference, or it
 may have forced upon it a modification from the content of the
 transferring idea. I trust the reader will pardon my fondness for
 comparisons from daily life, but I feel tempted to say that the
 relations existing for the repressed idea are similar to the situations
 existing in Austria for the American dentist, who is forbidden to
 practise unless he gets permission from a regular physician to use his
 name on the public signboard and thus cover the legal requirements.
 Moreover, just as it is naturally not the busiest physicians who form
 such alliances with dental practitioners, so in the psychic life only
 such foreconscious or conscious ideas are chosen to cover a repressed
 idea as have not themselves attracted much of the attention which is
 operative in the foreconscious. The unconscious entangles with its
 connections preferentially either those impressions and ideas of the
 foreconscious which have been left unnoticed as indifferent, or those
 that have soon been deprived of this attention through rejection. It is
 a familiar fact from the association studies confirmed by every
 experience, that ideas which have formed intimate connections in one
 direction assume an almost negative attitude to whole groups of new
 connections. I once tried from this principle to develop a theory for
 hysterical paralysis.
 
 If we assume that the same need for the transference of the repressed
 ideas which we have learned to know from the analysis of the neuroses
 makes its influence felt in the dream as well, we can at once explain
 two riddles of the dream, viz. that every dream analysis shows an
 interweaving of a recent impression, and that this recent element is
 frequently of the most indifferent character. We may add what we have
 already learned elsewhere, that these recent and indifferent elements
 come so frequently into the dream content as a substitute for the most
 deep-lying of the dream thoughts, for the further reason that they have
 least to fear from the resisting censor. But while this freedom from
 censorship explains only the preference for trivial elements, the
 constant presence of recent elements points to the fact that there is a
 need for transference. Both groups of impressions satisfy the demand of
 the repression for material still free from associations, the
 indifferent ones because they have offered no inducement for extensive
 associations, and the recent ones because they have had insufficient
 time to form such associations.
 
 We thus see that the day remnants, among which we may now include the
 indifferent impressions when they participate in the dream formation,
 not only borrow from the Unc. the motive power at the disposal of the
 repressed wish, but also offer to the unconscious something
 indispensable, namely, the attachment necessary to the transference. If
 we here attempted to penetrate more deeply into the psychic processes,
 we should first have to throw more light on the play of emotions between
 the foreconscious and the unconscious, to which, indeed, we are urged by
 the study of the psychoneuroses, whereas the dream itself offers no
 assistance in this respect.
 
 Just one further remark about the day remnants. There is no doubt that
 they are the actual disturbers of sleep, and not the dream, which, on
 the contrary, strives to guard sleep. But we shall return to this point
 later.
 
 We have so far discussed the dream-wish, we have traced it to the sphere
 of the Unc., and analyzed its relations to the day remnants, which in
 turn may be either wishes, psychic emotions of any other kind, or simply
 recent impressions. We have thus made room for any claims that may be
 made for the importance of conscious thought activity in dream
 formations in all its variations. Relying upon our thought series, it
 would not be at all impossible for us to explain even those extreme
 cases in which the dream as a continuer of the day work brings to a
 happy conclusion and unsolved problem possess an example, the analysis
 of which might reveal the infantile or repressed wish source furnishing
 such alliance and successful strengthening of the efforts of the
 foreconscious activity. But we have not come one step nearer a solution
 of the riddle: Why can the unconscious furnish the motive power for the
 wish-fulfillment only during sleep? The answer to this question must
 throw light on the psychic nature of wishes; and it will be given with
 the aid of the diagram of the psychic apparatus.
 
 We do not doubt that even this apparatus attained its present perfection
 through a long course of development. Let us attempt to restore it as it
 existed in an early phase of its activity. From assumptions, to be
 confirmed elsewhere, we know that at first the apparatus strove to keep
 as free from excitement as possible, and in its first formation,
 therefore, the scheme took the form of a reflex apparatus, which enabled
 it promptly to discharge through the motor tracts any sensible stimulus
 reaching it from without. But this simple function was disturbed by the
 wants of life, which likewise furnish the impulse for the further
 development of the apparatus. The wants of life first manifested
 themselves to it in the form of the great physical needs. The excitement
 aroused by the inner want seeks an outlet in motility, which may be
 designated as "inner changes" or as an "expression of the emotions." The
 hungry child cries or fidgets helplessly, but its situation remains
 unchanged; for the excitation proceeding from an inner want requires,
 not a momentary outbreak, but a force working continuously. A change can
 occur only if in some way a feeling of gratification is
 experienced--which in the case of the child must be through outside
 help--in order to remove the inner excitement. An essential constituent
 of this experience is the appearance of a certain perception (of food in
 our example), the memory picture of which thereafter remains associated
 with the memory trace of the excitation of want.
 
 Thanks to the established connection, there results at the next
 appearance of this want a psychic feeling which revives the memory
 picture of the former perception, and thus recalls the former perception
 itself, _i.e._ it actually re-establishes the situation of the first
 gratification. We call such a feeling a wish; the reappearance of the
 perception constitutes the wish-fulfillment, and the full revival of the
 perception by the want excitement constitutes the shortest road to the
 wish-fulfillment. We may assume a primitive condition of the psychic
 apparatus in which this road is really followed, _i.e._ where the
 wishing merges into an hallucination, This first psychic activity
 therefore aims at an identity of perception, _i.e._ it aims at a
 repetition of that perception which is connected with the fulfillment of
 the want.
 
 This primitive mental activity must have been modified by bitter
 practical experience into a more expedient secondary activity. The
 establishment of the identity perception on the short regressive road
 within the apparatus does not in another respect carry with it the
 result which inevitably follows the revival of the same perception from
 without. The gratification does not take place, and the want continues.
 In order to equalize the internal with the external sum of energy, the
 former must be continually maintained, just as actually happens in the
 hallucinatory psychoses and in the deliriums of hunger which exhaust
 their psychic capacity in clinging to the object desired. In order to
 make more appropriate use of the psychic force, it becomes necessary to
 inhibit the full regression so as to prevent it from extending beyond
 the image of memory, whence it can select other paths leading ultimately
 to the establishment of the desired identity from the outer world. This
 inhibition and consequent deviation from the excitation becomes the
 task of a second system which dominates the voluntary motility, _i.e._
 through whose activity the expenditure of motility is now devoted to
 previously recalled purposes. But this entire complicated mental
 activity which works its way from the memory picture to the
 establishment of the perception identity from the outer world merely
 represents a detour which has been forced upon the wish-fulfillment by
 experience.[2] Thinking is indeed nothing but the equivalent of the
 hallucinatory wish; and if the dream be called a wish-fulfillment this
 becomes self-evident, as nothing but a wish can impel our psychic
 apparatus to activity. The dream, which in fulfilling its wishes follows
 the short regressive path, thereby preserves for us only an example of
 the primary form of the psychic apparatus which has been abandoned as
 inexpedient. What once ruled in the waking state when the psychic life
 was still young and unfit seems to have been banished into the sleeping
 state, just as we see again in the nursery the bow and arrow, the
 discarded primitive weapons of grown-up humanity. _The dream is a
 fragment of the abandoned psychic life of the child._ In the psychoses
 these modes of operation of the psychic apparatus, which are normally
 suppressed in the waking state, reassert themselves, and then betray
 their inability to satisfy our wants in the outer world.
 
 The unconscious wish-feelings evidently strive to assert themselves
 during the day also, and the fact of transference and the psychoses
 teach us that they endeavor to penetrate to consciousness and dominate
 motility by the road leading through the system of the foreconscious. It
 is, therefore, the censor lying between the Unc. and the Forec., the
 assumption of which is forced upon us by the dream, that we have to
 recognize and honor as the guardian of our psychic health. But is it not
 carelessness on the part of this guardian to diminish its vigilance
 during the night and to allow the suppressed emotions of the Unc. to
 come to expression, thus again making possible the hallucinatory
 regression? I think not, for when the critical guardian goes to
 rest--and we have proof that his slumber is not profound--he takes care
 to close the gate to motility. No matter what feelings from the
 otherwise inhibited Unc. may roam about on the scene, they need not be
 interfered with; they remain harmless because they are unable to put in
 motion the motor apparatus which alone can exert a modifying influence
 upon the outer world. Sleep guarantees the security of the fortress
 which is under guard. Conditions are less harmless when a displacement
 of forces is produced, not through a nocturnal diminution in the
 operation of the critical censor, but through pathological enfeeblement
 of the latter or through pathological reinforcement of the unconscious
 excitations, and this while the foreconscious is charged with energy and
 the avenues to motility are open. The guardian is then overpowered, the
 unconscious excitations subdue the Forec.; through it they dominate our
 speech and actions, or they enforce the hallucinatory regression, thus
 governing an apparatus not designed for them by virtue of the attraction
 exerted by the perceptions on the distribution of our psychic energy. We
 call this condition a psychosis.
 
 We are now in the best position to complete our psychological
 construction, which has been interrupted by the introduction of the two
 systems, Unc. and Forec. We have still, however, ample reason for giving
 further consideration to the wish as the sole psychic motive power in
 the dream. We have explained that the reason why the dream is in every
 case a wish realization is because it is a product of the Unc., which
 knows no other aim in its activity but the fulfillment of wishes, and
 which has no other forces at its disposal but wish-feelings. If we
 avail ourselves for a moment longer of the right to elaborate from the
 dream interpretation such far-reaching psychological speculations, we
 are in duty bound to demonstrate that we are thereby bringing the dream
 into a relationship which may also comprise other psychic structures. If
 there exists a system of the Unc.--or something sufficiently analogous
 to it for the purpose of our discussion--the dream cannot be its sole
 manifestation; every dream may be a wish-fulfillment, but there must be
 other forms of abnormal wish-fulfillment beside this of dreams. Indeed,
 the theory of all psychoneurotic symptoms culminates in the proposition
 _that they too must be taken as wish-fulfillments of the unconscious_.
 Our explanation makes the dream only the first member of a group most
 important for the psychiatrist, an understanding of which means the
 solution of the purely psychological part of the psychiatric problem.
 But other members of this group of wish-fulfillments, _e.g._, the
 hysterical symptoms, evince one essential quality which I have so far
 failed to find in the dream. Thus, from the investigations frequently
 referred to in this treatise, I know that the formation of an hysterical
 symptom necessitates the combination of both streams of our psychic
 life. The symptom is not merely the expression of a realized
 unconscious wish, but it must be joined by another wish from the
 foreconscious which is fulfilled by the same symptom; so that the
 symptom is at least doubly determined, once by each one of the
 conflicting systems. Just as in the dream, there is no limit to further
 over-determination. The determination not derived from the Unc. is, as
 far as I can see, invariably a stream of thought in reaction against the
 unconscious wish, _e.g._, a self-punishment. Hence I may say, in
 general, that _an hysterical symptom originates only where two
 contrasting wish-fulfillments, having their source in different psychic
 systems, are able to combine in one expression_. (Compare my latest
 formulation of the origin of the hysterical symptoms in a treatise
 published by the _Zeitschrift fuer Sexualwissenschaft_, by Hirschfeld and
 others, 1908). Examples on this point would prove of little value, as
 nothing but a complete unveiling of the complication in question would
 carry conviction. I therefore content myself with the mere assertion,
 and will cite an example, not for conviction but for explication. The
 hysterical vomiting of a female patient proved, on the one hand, to be
 the realization of an unconscious fancy from the time of puberty, that
 she might be continuously pregnant and have a multitude of children,
 and this was subsequently united with the wish that she might have them
 from as many men as possible. Against this immoderate wish there arose a
 powerful defensive impulse. But as the vomiting might spoil the
 patient's figure and beauty, so that she would not find favor in the
 eyes of mankind, the symptom was therefore in keeping with her punitive
 trend of thought, and, being thus admissible from both sides, it was
 allowed to become a reality. This is the same manner of consenting to a
 wish-fulfillment which the queen of the Parthians chose for the triumvir
 Crassus. Believing that he had undertaken the campaign out of greed for
 gold, she caused molten gold to be poured into the throat of the corpse.
 "Now hast thou what thou hast longed for." As yet we know of the dream
 only that it expresses a wish-fulfillment of the unconscious; and
 apparently the dominating foreconscious permits this only after it has
 subjected the wish to some distortions. We are really in no position to
 demonstrate regularly a stream of thought antagonistic to the dream-wish
 which is realized in the dream as in its counterpart. Only now and then
 have we found in the dream traces of reaction formations, as, for
 instance, the tenderness toward friend R. in the "uncle dream." But the
 contribution from the foreconscious, which is missing here, may be
 found in another place. While the dominating system has withdrawn on
 the wish to sleep, the dream may bring to expression with manifold
 distortions a wish from the Unc., and realize this wish by producing the
 necessary changes of energy in the psychic apparatus, and may finally
 retain it through the entire duration of sleep.[3]
 
 This persistent wish to sleep on the part of the foreconscious in
 general facilitates the formation of the dream. Let us refer to the
 dream of the father who, by the gleam of light from the death chamber,
 was brought to the conclusion that the body has been set on fire. We
 have shown that one of the psychic forces decisive in causing the father
 to form this conclusion, instead of being awakened by the gleam of
 light, was the wish to prolong the life of the child seen in the dream
 by one moment. Other wishes proceeding from the repression probably
 escape us, because we are unable to analyze this dream. But as a second
 motive power of the dream we may mention the father's desire to sleep,
 for, like the life of the child, the sleep of the father is prolonged
 for a moment by the dream. The underlying motive is: "Let the dream go
 on, otherwise I must wake up." As in this dream so also in all other
 dreams, the wish to sleep lends its support to the unconscious wish. We
 reported dreams which were apparently dreams of convenience. But,
 properly speaking, all dreams may claim this designation. The efficacy
 of the wish to continue to sleep is the most easily recognized in the
 waking dreams, which so transform the objective sensory stimulus as to
 render it compatible with the continuance of sleep; they interweave this
 stimulus with the dream in order to rob it of any claims it might make
 as a warning to the outer world. But this wish to continue to sleep must
 also participate in the formation of all other dreams which may disturb
 the sleeping state from within only. "Now, then, sleep on; why, it's but
 a dream"; this is in many cases the suggestion of the Forec. to
 consciousness when the dream goes too far; and this also describes in a
 general way the attitude of our dominating psychic activity toward
 dreaming, though the thought remains tacit. I must draw the conclusion
 that _throughout our entire sleeping state we are just as certain that
 we are dreaming as we are certain that we are sleeping_. We are
 compelled to disregard the objection urged against this conclusion that
 our consciousness is never directed to a knowledge of the former, and
 that it is directed to a knowledge of the latter only on special
 occasions when the censor is unexpectedly surprised. Against this
 objection we may say that there are persons who are entirely conscious
 of their sleeping and dreaming, and who are apparently endowed with the
 conscious faculty of guiding their dream life. Such a dreamer, when
 dissatisfied with the course taken by the dream, breaks it off without
 awakening, and begins it anew in order to continue it with a different
 turn, like the popular author who, on request, gives a happier ending to
 his play. Or, at another time, if placed by the dream in a sexually
 exciting situation, he thinks in his sleep: "I do not care to continue
 this dream and exhaust myself by a pollution; I prefer to defer it in
 favor of a real situation."
 
 [1] They share this character of indestructibility with all psychic acts
 that are really unconscious--that is, with psychic acts belonging to the
 system of the unconscious only. These paths are constantly open and
 never fall into disuse; they conduct the discharge of the exciting
 process as often as it becomes endowed with unconscious excitement To
 speak metaphorically they suffer the same form of annihilation as the
 shades of the lower region in the _Odyssey_, who awoke to new life the
 moment they drank blood. The processes depending on the foreconscious
 system are destructible in a different way. The psychotherapy of the
 neuroses is based on this difference.
 
 [2] Le Lorrain justly extols the wish-fulfilment of the dream: "Sans
 fatigue serieuse, sans etre oblige de recourir a cette lutte opinatre et
 longue qui use et corrode les jouissances poursuivies."
 
 [3] This idea has been borrowed from _The Theory of Sleep_ by Liebault,
 who revived hypnotic investigation in our days. (_Du Sommeil provoque_,
 etc.; Paris, 1889.)
 
 
 
 
 VII
 
 THE FUNCTION OF THE DREAM
 
 
 Since we know that the foreconscious is suspended during the night by
 the wish to sleep, we can proceed to an intelligent investigation of the
 dream process. But let us first sum up the knowledge of this process
 already gained. We have shown that the waking activity leaves day
 remnants from which the sum of energy cannot be entirely removed; or the
 waking activity revives during the day one of the unconscious wishes; or
 both conditions occur simultaneously; we have already discovered the
 many variations that may take place. The unconscious wish has already
 made its way to the day remnants, either during the day or at any rate
 with the beginning of sleep, and has effected a transference to it. This
 produces a wish transferred to the recent material, or the suppressed
 recent wish comes to life again through a reinforcement from the
 unconscious. This wish now endeavors to make its way to consciousness on
 the normal path of the mental processes through the foreconscious, to
 which indeed it belongs through one of its constituent elements. It is
 confronted, however, by the censor, which is still active, and to the
 influence of which it now succumbs. It now takes on the distortion for
 which the way has already been paved by its transference to the recent
 material. Thus far it is in the way of becoming something resembling an
 obsession, delusion, or the like, _i.e._ a thought reinforced by a
 transference and distorted in expression by the censor. But its further
 progress is now checked through the dormant state of the foreconscious;
 this system has apparently protected itself against invasion by
 diminishing its excitements. The dream process, therefore, takes the
 regressive course, which has just been opened by the peculiarity of the
 sleeping state, and thereby follows the attraction exerted on it by the
 memory groups, which themselves exist in part only as visual energy not
 yet translated into terms of the later systems. On its way to regression
 the dream takes on the form of dramatization. The subject of compression
 will be discussed later. The dream process has now terminated the second
 part of its repeatedly impeded course. The first part expended itself
 progressively from the unconscious scenes or phantasies to the
 foreconscious, while the second part gravitates from the advent of the
 censor back to the perceptions. But when the dream process becomes a
 content of perception it has, so to speak, eluded the obstacle set up in
 the Forec. by the censor and by the sleeping state. It succeeds in
 drawing attention to itself and in being noticed by consciousness. For
 consciousness, which means to us a sensory organ for the reception of
 psychic qualities, may receive stimuli from two sources--first, from the
 periphery of the entire apparatus, viz. from the perception system, and,
 secondly, from the pleasure and pain stimuli, which constitute the sole
 psychic quality produced in the transformation of energy within the
 apparatus. All other processes in the system, even those in the
 foreconscious, are devoid of any psychic quality, and are therefore not
 objects of consciousness inasmuch as they do not furnish pleasure or
 pain for perception. We shall have to assume that those liberations of
 pleasure and pain automatically regulate the outlet of the occupation
 processes. But in order to make possible more delicate functions, it was
 later found necessary to render the course of the presentations more
 independent of the manifestations of pain. To accomplish this the Forec.
 system needed some qualities of its own which could attract
 consciousness, and most probably received them through the connection of
 the foreconscious processes with the memory system of the signs of
 speech, which is not devoid of qualities. Through the qualities of this
 system, consciousness, which had hitherto been a sensory organ only for
 the perceptions, now becomes also a sensory organ for a part of our
 mental processes. Thus we have now, as it were, two sensory surfaces,
 one directed to perceptions and the other to the foreconscious mental
 processes.
 
 I must assume that the sensory surface of consciousness devoted to the
 Forec. is rendered less excitable by sleep than that directed to the
 P-systems. The giving up of interest for the nocturnal mental processes
 is indeed purposeful. Nothing is to disturb the mind; the Forec. wants
 to sleep. But once the dream becomes a perception, it is then capable of
 exciting consciousness through the qualities thus gained. The sensory
 stimulus accomplishes what it was really destined for, namely, it
 directs a part of the energy at the disposal of the Forec. in the form
 of attention upon the stimulant. We must, therefore, admit that the
 dream invariably awakens us, that is, it puts into activity a part of
 the dormant force of the Forec. This force imparts to the dream that
 influence which we have designated as secondary elaboration for the sake
 of connection and comprehensibility. This means that the dream is
 treated by it like any other content of perception; it is subjected to
 the same ideas of expectation, as far at least as the material admits.
 As far as the direction is concerned in this third part of the dream, it
 may be said that here again the movement is progressive.
 
 To avoid misunderstanding, it will not be amiss to say a few words about
 the temporal peculiarities of these dream processes. In a very
 interesting discussion, apparently suggested by Maury's puzzling
 guillotine dream, Goblet tries to demonstrate that the dream requires no
 other time than the transition period between sleeping and awakening.
 The awakening requires time, as the dream takes place during that
 period. One is inclined to believe that the final picture of the dream
 is so strong that it forces the dreamer to awaken; but, as a matter of
 fact, this picture is strong only because the dreamer is already very
 near awakening when it appears. "Un reve c'est un reveil qui commence."
 
 It has already been emphasized by Dugas that Goblet was forced to
 repudiate many facts in order to generalize his theory. There are,
 moreover, dreams from which we do not awaken, _e.g._, some dreams in
 which we dream that we dream. From our knowledge of the dream-work, we
 can by no means admit that it extends only over the period of awakening.
 On the contrary, we must consider it probable that the first part of
 the dream-work begins during the day when we are still under the
 domination of the foreconscious. The second phase of the dream-work,
 viz. the modification through the censor, the attraction by the
 unconscious scenes, and the penetration to perception must continue
 throughout the night. And we are probably always right when we assert
 that we feel as though we had been dreaming the whole night, although we
 cannot say what. I do not, however, think it necessary to assume that,
 up to the time of becoming conscious, the dream processes really follow
 the temporal sequence which we have described, viz. that there is first
 the transferred dream-wish, then the distortion of the censor, and
 consequently the change of direction to regression, and so on. We were
 forced to form such a succession for the sake of _description_; in
 reality, however, it is much rather a matter of simultaneously trying
 this path and that, and of emotions fluctuating to and fro, until
 finally, owing to the most expedient distribution, one particular
 grouping is secured which remains. From certain personal experiences, I
 am myself inclined to believe that the dream-work often requires more
 than one day and one night to produce its result; if this be true, the
 extraordinary art manifested in the construction of the dream loses all
 its marvels. In my opinion, even the regard for comprehensibility as an
 occurrence of perception may take effect before the dream attracts
 consciousness to itself. To be sure, from now on the process is
 accelerated, as the dream is henceforth subjected to the same treatment
 as any other perception. It is like fireworks, which require hours of
 preparation and only a moment for ignition.
 
 Through the dream-work the dream process now gains either sufficient
 intensity to attract consciousness to itself and arouse the
 foreconscious, which is quite independent of the time or profundity of
 sleep, or, its intensity being insufficient it must wait until it meets
 the attention which is set in motion immediately before awakening. Most
 dreams seem to operate with relatively slight psychic intensities, for
 they wait for the awakening. This, however, explains the fact that we
 regularly perceive something dreamt on being suddenly aroused from a
 sound sleep. Here, as well as in spontaneous awakening, the first glance
 strikes the perception content created by the dream-work, while the next
 strikes the one produced from without.
 
 But of greater theoretical interest are those dreams which are capable
 of waking us in the midst of sleep. We must bear in mind the expediency
 elsewhere universally demonstrated, and ask ourselves why the dream or
 the unconscious wish has the power to disturb sleep, _i.e._ the
 fulfillment of the foreconscious wish. This is probably due to certain
 relations of energy into which we have no insight. If we possessed such
 insight we should probably find that the freedom given to the dream and
 the expenditure of a certain amount of detached attention represent for
 the dream an economy in energy, keeping in view the fact that the
 unconscious must be held in check at night just as during the day. We
 know from experience that the dream, even if it interrupts sleep,
 repeatedly during the same night, still remains compatible with sleep.
 We wake up for an instant, and immediately resume our sleep. It is like
 driving off a fly during sleep, we awake _ad hoc_, and when we resume
 our sleep we have removed the disturbance. As demonstrated by familiar
 examples from the sleep of wet nurses, &c., the fulfillment of the wish
 to sleep is quite compatible with the retention of a certain amount of
 attention in a given direction.
 
 But we must here take cognizance of an objection that is based on a
 better knowledge of the unconscious processes. Although we have
 ourselves described the unconscious wishes as always active, we have,
 nevertheless, asserted that they are not sufficiently strong during the
 day to make themselves perceptible. But when we sleep, and the
 unconscious wish has shown its power to form a dream, and with it to
 awaken the foreconscious, why, then, does this power become exhausted
 after the dream has been taken cognizance of? Would it not seem more
 probable that the dream should continually renew itself, like the
 troublesome fly which, when driven away, takes pleasure in returning
 again and again? What justifies our assertion that the dream removes the
 disturbance of sleep?
 
 That the unconscious wishes always remain active is quite true. They
 represent paths which are passable whenever a sum of excitement makes
 use of them. Moreover, a remarkable peculiarity of the unconscious
 processes is the fact that they remain indestructible. Nothing can be
 brought to an end in the unconscious; nothing can cease or be forgotten.
 This impression is most strongly gained in the study of the neuroses,
 especially of hysteria. The unconscious stream of thought which leads to
 the discharge through an attack becomes passable again as soon as there
 is an accumulation of a sufficient amount of excitement. The
 mortification brought on thirty years ago, after having gained access to
 the unconscious affective source, operates during all these thirty years
 like a recent one. Whenever its memory is touched, it is revived and
 shows itself to be supplied with the excitement which is discharged in
 a motor attack. It is just here that the office of psychotherapy begins,
 its task being to bring about adjustment and forgetfulness for the
 unconscious processes. Indeed, the fading of memories and the flagging
 of affects, which we are apt to take as self-evident and to explain as a
 primary influence of time on the psychic memories, are in reality
 secondary changes brought about by painstaking work. It is the
 foreconscious that accomplishes this work; and the only course to be
 pursued by psychotherapy is the subjugate the Unc, to the domination of
 the Forec.
 
 There are, therefore, two exits for the individual unconscious emotional
 process. It is either left to itself, in which case it ultimately breaks
 through somewhere and secures for once a discharge for its excitation
 into motility; or it succumbs to the influence of the foreconscious, and
 its excitation becomes confined through this influence instead of being
 discharged. It is the latter process that occurs in the dream. Owing to
 the fact that it is directed by the conscious excitement, the energy
 from the Forec., which confronts the dream when grown to perception,
 restricts the unconscious excitement of the dream and renders it
 harmless as a disturbing factor. When the dreamer wakes up for a moment,
 he has actually chased away the fly that has threatened to disturb his
 sleep. We can now understand that it is really more expedient and
 economical to give full sway to the unconscious wish, and clear its way
 to regression so that it may form a dream, and then restrict and adjust
 this dream by means of a small expenditure of foreconscious labor, than
 to curb the unconscious throughout the entire period of sleep. We
 should, indeed, expect that the dream, even if it was not originally an
 expedient process, would have acquired some function in the play of
 forces of the psychic life. We now see what this function is. The dream
 has taken it upon itself to bring the liberated excitement of the Unc.
 back under the domination of the foreconscious; it thus affords relief
 for the excitement of the Unc. and acts as a safety-valve for the
 latter, and at the same time it insures the sleep of the foreconscious
 at a slight expenditure of the waking state. Like the other psychic
 formations of its group, the dream offers itself as a compromise serving
 simultaneously both systems by fulfilling both wishes in so far as they
 are compatible with each other. A glance at Robert's "elimination
 theory," will show that we must agree with this author in his main
 point, viz. in the determination of the function of the dream, though we
 differ from him in our hypotheses and in our treatment of the dream
 process.
 
 The above qualification--in so far as the two wishes are compatible with
 each other--contains a suggestion that there may be cases in which the
 function of the dream suffers shipwreck. The dream process is in the
 first instance admitted as a wish-fulfillment of the unconscious, but if
 this tentative wish-fulfillment disturbs the foreconscious to such an
 extent that the latter can no longer maintain its rest, the dream then
 breaks the compromise and fails to perform the second part of its task.
 It is then at once broken off, and replaced by complete wakefulness.
 Here, too, it is not really the fault of the dream, if, while ordinarily
 the guardian of sleep, it is here compelled to appear as the disturber
 of sleep, nor should this cause us to entertain any doubts as to its
 efficacy. This is not the only case in the organism in which an
 otherwise efficacious arrangement became inefficacious and disturbing as
 soon as some element is changed in the conditions of its origin; the
 disturbance then serves at least the new purpose of announcing the
 change, and calling into play against it the means of adjustment of the
 organism. In this connection, I naturally bear in mind the case of the
 anxiety dream, and in order not to have the appearance of trying to
 exclude this testimony against the theory of wish-fulfillment wherever
 I encounter it, I will attempt an explanation of the anxiety dream, at
 least offering some suggestions.
 
 That a psychic process developing anxiety may still be a
 wish-fulfillment has long ceased to impress us as a contradiction. We
 may explain this occurrence by the fact that the wish belongs to one
 system (the Unc.), while by the other system (the Forec.), this wish has
 been rejected and suppressed. The subjection of the Unc. by the Forec.
 is not complete even in perfect psychic health; the amount of this
 suppression shows the degree of our psychic normality. Neurotic symptoms
 show that there is a conflict between the two systems; the symptoms are
 the results of a compromise of this conflict, and they temporarily put
 an end to it. On the one hand, they afford the Unc. an outlet for the
 discharge of its excitement, and serve it as a sally port, while, on the
 other hand, they give the Forec. the capability of dominating the Unc.
 to some extent. It is highly instructive to consider, _e.g._, the
 significance of any hysterical phobia or of an agoraphobia. Suppose a
 neurotic incapable of crossing the street alone, which we would justly
 call a "symptom." We attempt to remove this symptom by urging him to the
 action which he deems himself incapable of. The result will be an
 attack of anxiety, just as an attack of anxiety in the street has often
 been the cause of establishing an agoraphobia. We thus learn that the
 symptom has been constituted in order to guard against the outbreak of
 the anxiety. The phobia is thrown before the anxiety like a fortress on
 the frontier.
 
 Unless we enter into the part played by the affects in these processes,
 which can be done here only imperfectly, we cannot continue our
 discussion. Let us therefore advance the proposition that the reason why
 the suppression of the unconscious becomes absolutely necessary is
 because, if the discharge of presentation should be left to itself, it
 would develop an affect in the Unc. which originally bore the character
 of pleasure, but which, since the appearance of the repression, bears
 the character of pain. The aim, as well as the result, of the
 suppression is to stop the development of this pain. The suppression
 extends over the unconscious ideation, because the liberation of pain
 might emanate from the ideation. The foundation is here laid for a very
 definite assumption concerning the nature of the affective development.
 It is regarded as a motor or secondary activity, the key to the
 innervation of which is located in the presentations of the Unc. Through
 the domination of the Forec. these presentations become, as it were,
 throttled and inhibited at the exit of the emotion-developing impulses.
 The danger, which is due to the fact that the Forec. ceases to occupy
 the energy, therefore consists in the fact that the unconscious
 excitations liberate such an affect as--in consequence of the repression
 that has previously taken place--can only be perceived as pain or
 anxiety.
 
 This danger is released through the full sway of the dream process. The
 determinations for its realization consist in the fact that repressions
 have taken place, and that the suppressed emotional wishes shall become
 sufficiently strong. They thus stand entirely without the psychological
 realm of the dream structure. Were it not for the fact that our subject
 is connected through just one factor, namely, the freeing of the Unc.
 during sleep, with the subject of the development of anxiety, I could
 dispense with discussion of the anxiety dream, and thus avoid all
 obscurities connected with it.
 
 As I have often repeated, the theory of the anxiety belongs to the
 psychology of the neuroses. I would say that the anxiety in the dream is
 an anxiety problem and not a dream problem. We have nothing further to
 do with it after having once demonstrated its point of contact with the
 subject of the dream process. There is only one thing left for me to do.
 As I have asserted that the neurotic anxiety originates from sexual
 sources, I can subject anxiety dreams to analysis in order to
 demonstrate the sexual material in their dream thoughts.
 
 For good reasons I refrain from citing here any of the numerous examples
 placed at my disposal by neurotic patients, but prefer to give anxiety
 dreams from young persons.
 
 Personally, I have had no real anxiety dream for decades, but I recall
 one from my seventh or eighth year which I subjected to interpretation
 about thirty years later. The dream was very vivid, and showed me _my
 beloved mother, with peculiarly calm sleeping countenance, carried into
 the room and laid on the bed by two (or three) persons with birds'
 beaks_. I awoke crying and screaming, and disturbed my parents. The very
 tall figures--draped in a peculiar manner--with beaks, I had taken from
 the illustrations of Philippson's bible; I believe they represented
 deities with heads of sparrowhawks from an Egyptian tomb relief. The
 analysis also introduced the reminiscence of a naughty janitor's boy,
 who used to play with us children on the meadow in front of the house; I
 would add that his name was Philip. I feel that I first heard from this
 boy the vulgar word signifying sexual intercourse, which is replaced
 among the educated by the Latin "coitus," but to which the dream
 distinctly alludes by the selection of the birds' heads. I must have
 suspected the sexual significance of the word from the facial expression
 of my worldly-wise teacher. My mother's features in the dream were
 copied from the countenance of my grandfather, whom I had seen a few
 days before his death snoring in the state of coma. The interpretation
 of the secondary elaboration in the dream must therefore have been that
 my mother was dying; the tomb relief, too, agrees with this. In this
 anxiety I awoke, and could not calm myself until I had awakened my
 parents. I remember that I suddenly became calm on coming face to face
 with my mother, as if I needed the assurance that my mother was not
 dead. But this secondary interpretation of the dream had been effected
 only under the influence of the developed anxiety. I was not frightened
 because I dreamed that my mother was dying, but I interpreted the dream
 in this manner in the foreconscious elaboration because I was already
 under the domination of the anxiety. The latter, however, could be
 traced by means of the repression to an obscure obviously sexual desire,
 which had found its satisfying expression in the visual content of the
 dream.
 
 A man twenty-seven years old who had been severely ill for a year had
 had many terrifying dreams between the ages of eleven and thirteen. He
 thought that a man with an ax was running after him; he wished to run,
 but felt paralyzed and could not move from the spot. This may be taken
 as a good example of a very common, and apparently sexually indifferent,
 anxiety dream. In the analysis the dreamer first thought of a story told
 him by his uncle, which chronologically was later than the dream, viz.
 that he was attacked at night by a suspicious-looking individual. This
 occurrence led him to believe that he himself might have already heard
 of a similar episode at the time of the dream. In connection with the ax
 he recalled that during that period of his life he once hurt his hand
 with an ax while chopping wood. This immediately led to his relations
 with his younger brother, whom he used to maltreat and knock down. In
 particular, he recalled an occasion when he struck his brother on the
 head with his boot until he bled, whereupon his mother remarked: "I fear
 he will kill him some day." While he was seemingly thinking of the
 subject of violence, a reminiscence from his ninth year suddenly
 occurred to him. His parents came home late and went to bed while he was
 feigning sleep. He soon heard panting and other noises that appeared
 strange to him, and he could also make out the position of his parents
 in bed. His further associations showed that he had established an
 analogy between this relation between his parents and his own relation
 toward his younger brother. He subsumed what occurred between his
 parents under the conception "violence and wrestling," and thus reached
 a sadistic conception of the coitus act, as often happens among
 children. The fact that he often noticed blood on his mother's bed
 corroborated his conception.
 
 That the sexual intercourse of adults appears strange to children who
 observe it, and arouses fear in them, I dare say is a fact of daily
 experience. I have explained this fear by the fact that sexual
 excitement is not mastered by their understanding, and is probably also
 inacceptable to them because their parents are involved in it. For the
 same son this excitement is converted into fear. At a still earlier
 period of life sexual emotion directed toward the parent of opposite sex
 does not meet with repression but finds free expression, as we have seen
 before.
 
 For the night terrors with hallucinations (_pavor nocturnus_) frequently
 found in children, I would unhesitatingly give the same explanation.
 Here, too, we are certainly dealing with the incomprehensible and
 rejected sexual feelings, which, if noted, would probably show a
 temporal periodicity, for an enhancement of the sexual _libido_ may
 just as well be produced accidentally through emotional impressions as
 through the spontaneous and gradual processes of development.
 
 I lack the necessary material to sustain these explanations from
 observation. On the other hand, the pediatrists seem to lack the point
 of view which alone makes comprehensible the whole series of phenomena,
 on the somatic as well as on the psychic side. To illustrate by a
 comical example how one wearing the blinders of medical mythology may
 miss the understanding of such cases I will relate a case which I found
 in a thesis on _pavor nocturnus_ by _Debacker_, 1881. A
 thirteen-year-old boy of delicate health began to become anxious and
 dreamy; his sleep became restless, and about once a week it was
 interrupted by an acute attack of anxiety with hallucinations. The
 memory of these dreams was invariably very distinct. Thus, he related
 that the _devil_ shouted at him: "Now we have you, now we have you," and
 this was followed by an odor of sulphur; the fire burned his skin. This
 dream aroused him, terror-stricken. He was unable to scream at first;
 then his voice returned, and he was heard to say distinctly: "No, no,
 not me; why, I have done nothing," or, "Please don't, I shall never do
 it again." Occasionally, also, he said: "Albert has not done that."
 Later he avoided undressing, because, as he said, the fire attacked him
 only when he was undressed. From amid these evil dreams, which menaced
 his health, he was sent into the country, where he recovered within a
 year and a half, but at the age of fifteen he once confessed: "Je
 n'osais pas l'avouer, mais j'eprouvais continuellement des picotements
 et des surexcitations aux _parties_; a la fin, cela m'enervait tant que
 plusieurs fois, j'ai pense me jeter par la fenetre au dortoir."
 
 It is certainly not difficult to suspect: 1, that the boy had practiced
 masturbation in former years, that he probably denied it, and was
 threatened with severe punishment for his wrongdoing (his confession: Je
 ne le ferai plus; his denial: Albert n'a jamais fait ca). 2, That under
 the pressure of puberty the temptation to self-abuse through the
 tickling of the genitals was reawakened. 3, That now, however, a
 struggle of repression arose in him, suppressing the _libido_ and
 changing it into fear, which subsequently took the form of the
 punishments with which he was then threatened.
 
 Let us, however, quote the conclusions drawn by our author. This
 observation shows: 1, That the influence of puberty may produce in a
 boy of delicate health a condition of extreme weakness, and that it may
 lead to a _very marked cerebral anaemia_.
 
 2. This cerebral anaemia produces a transformation of character,
 demonomaniacal hallucinations, and very violent nocturnal, perhaps also
 diurnal, states of anxiety.
 
 3. Demonomania and the self-reproaches of the day can be traced to the
 influences of religious education which the subject underwent as a
 child.
 
 4. All manifestations disappeared as a result of a lengthy sojourn in
 the country, bodily exercise, and the return of physical strength after
 the termination of the period of puberty.
 
 5. A predisposing influence for the origin of the cerebral condition of
 the boy may be attributed to heredity and to the father's chronic
 syphilitic state.
 
 The concluding remarks of the author read: "Nous avons fait entrer cette
 observation dans le cadre des delires apyretiques d'inanition, car c'est
 a l'ischemie cerebrale que nous rattachons cet etat particulier."
 
 
 
 
 VIII
 
 THE PRIMARY AND SECONDARY PROCESS--REGRESSION
 
 
 In venturing to attempt to penetrate more deeply into the psychology of
 the dream processes, I have undertaken a difficult task, to which,
 indeed, my power of description is hardly equal. To reproduce in
 description by a succession of words the simultaneousness of so complex
 a chain of events, and in doing so to appear unbiassed throughout the
 exposition, goes fairly beyond my powers. I have now to atone for the
 fact that I have been unable in my description of the dream psychology
 to follow the historic development of my views. The view-points for my
 conception of the dream were reached through earlier investigations in
 the psychology of the neuroses, to which I am not supposed to refer
 here, but to which I am repeatedly forced to refer, whereas I should
 prefer to proceed in the opposite direction, and, starting from the
 dream, to establish a connection with the psychology of the neuroses. I
 am well aware of all the inconveniences arising for the reader from this
 difficulty, but I know of no way to avoid them.
 
 As I am dissatisfied with this state of affairs, I am glad to dwell
 upon another view-point which seems to raise the value of my efforts. As
 has been shown in the introduction to the first chapter, I found myself
 confronted with a theme which had been marked by the sharpest
 contradictions on the part of the authorities. After our elaboration of
 the dream problems we found room for most of these contradictions. We
 have been forced, however, to take decided exception to two of the views
 pronounced, viz. that the dream is a senseless and that it is a somatic
 process; apart from these cases we have had to accept all the
 contradictory views in one place or another of the complicated argument,
 and we have been able to demonstrate that they had discovered something
 that was correct. That the dream continues the impulses and interests of
 the waking state has been quite generally confirmed through the
 discovery of the latent thoughts of the dream. These thoughts concern
 themselves only with things that seem important and of momentous
 interest to us. The dream never occupies itself with trifles. But we
 have also concurred with the contrary view, viz., that the dream gathers
 up the indifferent remnants from the day, and that not until it has in
 some measure withdrawn itself from the waking activity can an important
 event of the day be taken up by the dream. We found this holding true
 for the dream content, which gives the dream thought its changed
 expression by means of disfigurement. We have said that from the nature
 of the association mechanism the dream process more easily takes
 possession of recent or indifferent material which has not yet been
 seized by the waking mental activity; and by reason of the censor it
 transfers the psychic intensity from the important but also disagreeable
 to the indifferent material. The hypermnesia of the dream and the resort
 to infantile material have become main supports in our theory. In our
 theory of the dream we have attributed to the wish originating from the
 infantile the part of an indispensable motor for the formation of the
 dream. We naturally could not think of doubting the experimentally
 demonstrated significance of the objective sensory stimuli during sleep;
 but we have brought this material into the same relation to the
 dream-wish as the thought remnants from the waking activity. There was
 no need of disputing the fact that the dream interprets the objective
 sensory stimuli after the manner of an illusion; but we have supplied
 the motive for this interpretation which has been left undecided by the
 authorities. The interpretation follows in such a manner that the
 perceived object is rendered harmless as a sleep disturber and becomes
 available for the wish-fulfillment. Though we do not admit as special
 sources of the dream the subjective state of excitement of the sensory
 organs during sleep, which seems to have been demonstrated by Trumbull
 Ladd, we are nevertheless able to explain this excitement through the
 regressive revival of active memories behind the dream. A modest part in
 our conception has also been assigned to the inner organic sensations
 which are wont to be taken as the cardinal point in the explanation of
 the dream. These--the sensation of falling, flying, or inhibition--stand
 as an ever ready material to be used by the dream-work to express the
 dream thought as often as need arises.
 
 That the dream process is a rapid and momentary one seems to be true for
 the perception through consciousness of the already prepared dream
 content; the preceding parts of the dream process probably take a slow,
 fluctuating course. We have solved the riddle of the superabundant dream
 content compressed within the briefest moment by explaining that this is
 due to the appropriation of almost fully formed structures from the
 psychic life. That the dream is disfigured and distorted by memory we
 found to be correct, but not troublesome, as this is only the last
 manifest operation in the work of disfigurement which has been active
 from the beginning of the dream-work. In the bitter and seemingly
 irreconcilable controversy as to whether the psychic life sleeps at
 night or can make the same use of all its capabilities as during the
 day, we have been able to agree with both sides, though not fully with
 either. We have found proof that the dream thoughts represent a most
 complicated intellectual activity, employing almost every means
 furnished by the psychic apparatus; still it cannot be denied that these
 dream thoughts have originated during the day, and it is indispensable
 to assume that there is a sleeping state of the psychic life. Thus, even
 the theory of partial sleep has come into play; but the characteristics
 of the sleeping state have been found not in the dilapidation of the
 psychic connections but in the cessation of the psychic system
 dominating the day, arising from its desire to sleep. The withdrawal
 from the outer world retains its significance also for our conception;
 though not the only factor, it nevertheless helps the regression to make
 possible the representation of the dream. That we should reject the
 voluntary guidance of the presentation course is uncontestable; but the
 psychic life does not thereby become aimless, for we have seen that
 after the abandonment of the desired end-presentation undesired ones
 gain the mastery. The loose associative connection in the dream we have
 not only recognized, but we have placed under its control a far greater
 territory than could have been supposed; we have, however, found it
 merely the feigned substitute for another correct and senseful one. To
 be sure we, too, have called the dream absurd; but we have been able to
 learn from examples how wise the dream really is when it simulates
 absurdity. We do not deny any of the functions that have been attributed
 to the dream. That the dream relieves the mind like a valve, and that,
 according to Robert's assertion, all kinds of harmful material are
 rendered harmless through representation in the dream, not only exactly
 coincides with our theory of the twofold wish-fulfillment in the dream,
 but, in his own wording, becomes even more comprehensible for us than
 for Robert himself. The free indulgence of the psychic in the play of
 its faculties finds expression with us in the non-interference with the
 dream on the part of the foreconscious activity. The "return to the
 embryonal state of psychic life in the dream" and the observation of
 Havelock Ellis, "an archaic world of vast emotions and imperfect
 thoughts," appear to us as happy anticipations of our deductions to the
 effect that _primitive_ modes of work suppressed during the day
 participate in the formation of the dream; and with us, as with Delage,
 the _suppressed_ material becomes the mainspring of the dreaming.
 
 We have fully recognized the role which Scherner ascribes to the dream
 phantasy, and even his interpretation; but we have been obliged, so to
 speak, to conduct them to another department in the problem. It is not
 the dream that produces the phantasy but the unconscious phantasy that
 takes the greatest part in the formation of the dream thoughts. We are
 indebted to Scherner for his clew to the source of the dream thoughts,
 but almost everything that he ascribes to the dream-work is attributable
 to the activity of the unconscious, which is at work during the day, and
 which supplies incitements not only for dreams but for neurotic symptoms
 as well. We have had to separate the dream-work from this activity as
 being something entirely different and far more restricted. Finally, we
 have by no means abandoned the relation of the dream to mental
 disturbances, but, on the contrary, we have given it a more solid
 foundation on new ground.
 
 Thus held together by the new material of our theory as by a superior
 unity, we find the most varied and most contradictory conclusions of the
 authorities fitting into our structure; some of them are differently
 disposed, only a few of them are entirely rejected. But our own
 structure is still unfinished. For, disregarding the many obscurities
 which we have necessarily encountered in our advance into the darkness
 of psychology, we are now apparently embarrassed by a new contradiction.
 On the one hand, we have allowed the dream thoughts to proceed from
 perfectly normal mental operations, while, on the other hand, we have
 found among the dream thoughts a number of entirely abnormal mental
 processes which extend likewise to the dream contents. These,
 consequently, we have repeated in the interpretation of the dream. All
 that we have termed the "dream-work" seems so remote from the psychic
 processes recognized by us as correct, that the severest judgments of
 the authors as to the low psychic activity of dreaming seem to us well
 founded.
 
 Perhaps only through still further advance can enlightenment and
 improvement be brought about. I shall pick out one of the constellations
 leading to the formation of dreams.
 
 We have learned that the dream replaces a number of thoughts derived
 from daily life which are perfectly formed logically. We cannot
 therefore doubt that these thoughts originate from our normal mental
 life. All the qualities which we esteem in our mental operations, and
 which distinguish these as complicated activities of a high order, we
 find repeated in the dream thoughts. There is, however, no need of
 assuming that this mental work is performed during sleep, as this would
 materially impair the conception of the psychic state of sleep we have
 hitherto adhered to. These thoughts may just as well have originated
 from the day, and, unnoticed by our consciousness from their inception,
 they may have continued to develop until they stood complete at the
 onset of sleep. If we are to conclude anything from this state of
 affairs, it will at most prove _that the most complex mental operations
 are possible without the cooeperation of consciousness_, which we have
 already learned independently from every psychoanalysis of persons
 suffering from hysteria or obsessions. These dream thoughts are in
 themselves surely not incapable of consciousness; if they have not
 become conscious to us during the day, this may have various reasons.
 The state of becoming conscious depends on the exercise of a certain
 psychic function, viz. attention, which seems to be extended only in a
 definite quantity, and which may have been withdrawn from the stream of
 thought in Question by other aims. Another way in which such mental
 streams are kept from consciousness is the following:--Our conscious
 reflection teaches us that when exercising attention we pursue a
 definite course. But if that course leads us to an idea which does not
 hold its own with the critic, we discontinue and cease to apply our
 attention. Now, apparently, the stream of thought thus started and
 abandoned may spin on without regaining attention unless it reaches a
 spot of especially marked intensity which forces the return of
 attention. An initial rejection, perhaps consciously brought about by
 the judgment on the ground of incorrectness or unfitness for the actual
 purpose of the mental act, may therefore account for the fact that a
 mental process continues until the onset of sleep unnoticed by
 consciousness.
 
 Let us recapitulate by saying that we call such a stream of thought a
 foreconscious one, that we believe it to be perfectly correct, and that
 it may just as well be a more neglected one or an interrupted and
 suppressed one. Let us also state frankly in what manner we conceive
 this presentation course. We believe that a certain sum of excitement,
 which we call occupation energy, is displaced from an end-presentation
 along the association paths selected by that end-presentation. A
 "neglected" stream of thought has received no such occupation, and from
 a "suppressed" or "rejected" one this occupation has been withdrawn;
 both have thus been left to their own emotions. The end-stream of
 thought stocked with energy is under certain conditions able to draw to
 itself the attention of consciousness, through which means it then
 receives a "surplus of energy." We shall be obliged somewhat later to
 elucidate our assumption concerning the nature and activity of
 consciousness.
 
 A train of thought thus incited in the Forec. may either disappear
 spontaneously or continue. The former issue we conceive as follows: It
 diffuses its energy through all the association paths emanating from it,
 and throws the entire chain of ideas into a state of excitement which,
 after lasting for a while, subsides through the transformation of the
 excitement requiring an outlet into dormant energy.[1] If this first
 issue is brought about the process has no further significance for the
 dream formation. But other end-presentations are lurking in our
 foreconscious that originate from the sources of our unconscious and
 from the ever active wishes. These may take possession of the
 excitations in the circle of thought thus left to itself, establish a
 connection between it and the unconscious wish, and transfer to it the
 energy inherent in the unconscious wish. Henceforth the neglected or
 suppressed train of thought is in a position to maintain itself,
 although this reinforcement does not help it to gain access to
 consciousness. We may say that the hitherto foreconscious train of
 thought has been drawn into the unconscious.
 
 Other constellations for the dream formation would result if the
 foreconscious train of thought had from the beginning been connected
 with the unconscious wish, and for that reason met with rejection by the
 dominating end-occupation; or if an unconscious wish were made active
 for other--possibly somatic--reasons and of its own accord sought a
 transference to the psychic remnants not occupied by the Forec. All
 three cases finally combine in one issue, so that there is established
 in the foreconscious a stream of thought which, having been abandoned by
 the foreconscious occupation, receives occupation from the unconscious
 wish.
 
 The stream of thought is henceforth subjected to a series of
 transformations which we no longer recognize as normal psychic processes
 and which give us a surprising result, viz. a psychopathological
 formation. Let us emphasize and group the same.
 
 1. The intensities of the individual ideas become capable of discharge
 in their entirety, and, proceeding from one conception to the other,
 they thus form single presentations endowed with marked intensity.
 Through the repeated recurrence of this process the intensity of an
 entire train of ideas may ultimately be gathered in a single
 presentation element. This is the principle of _compression or
 condensation_. It is condensation that is mainly responsible for the
 strange impression of the dream, for we know of nothing analogous to it
 in the normal psychic life accessible to consciousness. We find here,
 also, presentations which possess great psychic significance as
 junctions or as end-results of whole chains of thought; but this
 validity does not manifest itself in any character conspicuous enough
 for internal perception; hence, what has been presented in it does not
 become in any way more intensive. In the process of condensation the
 entire psychic connection becomes transformed into the intensity of the
 presentation content. It is the same as in a book where we space or
 print in heavy type any word upon which particular stress is laid for
 the understanding of the text. In speech the same word would be
 pronounced loudly and deliberately and with emphasis. The first
 comparison leads us at once to an example taken from the chapter on "The
 Dream-Work" (trimethylamine in the dream of Irma's injection).
 Historians of art call our attention to the fact that the most ancient
 historical sculptures follow a similar principle in expressing the rank
 of the persons represented by the size of the statue. The king is made
 two or three times as large as his retinue or the vanquished enemy. A
 piece of art, however, from the Roman period makes use of more subtle
 means to accomplish the same purpose. The figure of the emperor is
 placed in the center in a firmly erect posture; special care is bestowed
 on the proper modelling of his figure; his enemies are seen cowering at
 his feet; but he is no longer represented a giant among dwarfs. However,
 the bowing of the subordinate to his superior in our own days is only an
 echo of that ancient principle of representation.
 
 The direction taken by the condensations of the dream is prescribed on
 the one hand by the true foreconscious relations of the dream thoughts,
 an the other hand by the attraction of the visual reminiscences in the
 unconscious. The success of the condensation work produces those
 intensities which are required for penetration into the perception
 systems.
 
 2. Through this free transferability of the intensities, moreover, and
 in the service of condensation, _intermediary
 presentations_--compromises, as it were--are formed (_cf._ the numerous
 examples). This, likewise, is something unheard of in the normal
 presentation course, where it is above all a question of selection and
 retention of the "proper" presentation element. On the other hand,
 composite and compromise formations occur with extraordinary frequency
 when we are trying to find the linguistic expression for foreconscious
 thoughts; these are considered "slips of the tongue."
 
 3. The presentations which transfer their intensities to one another are
 _very loosely connected_, and are joined together by such forms of
 association as are spurned in our serious thought and are utilized in
 the production of the effect of wit only. Among these we particularly
 find associations of the sound and consonance types.
 
 4. Contradictory thoughts do not strive to eliminate one another, but
 remain side by side. They often unite to produce condensation _as if no
 contradiction_ existed, or they form compromises for which we should
 never forgive our thoughts, but which we frequently approve of in our
 actions.
 
 These are some of the most conspicuous abnormal processes to which the
 thoughts which have previously been rationally formed are subjected in
 the course of the dream-work. As the main feature of these processes we
 recognize the high importance attached to the fact of rendering the
 occupation energy mobile and capable of discharge; the content and the
 actual significance of the psychic elements, to which these energies
 adhere, become a matter of secondary importance. One might possibly
 think that the condensation and compromise formation is effected only in
 the service of regression, when occasion arises for changing thoughts
 into pictures. But the analysis and--still more distinctly--the
 synthesis of dreams which lack regression toward pictures, _e.g._ the
 dream "Autodidasker--Conversation with Court-Councilor N.," present the
 same processes of displacement and condensation as the others.
 
 Hence we cannot refuse to acknowledge that the two kinds of essentially
 different psychic processes participate in the formation of the dream;
 one forms perfectly correct dream thoughts which are equivalent to
 normal thoughts, while the other treats these ideas in a highly
 surprising and incorrect manner. The latter process we have already set
 apart as the dream-work proper. What have we now to advance concerning
 this latter psychic process?
 
 We should be unable to answer this question here if we had not
 penetrated considerably into the psychology of the neuroses and
 especially of hysteria. From this we learn that the same incorrect
 psychic processes--as well as others that have not been
 enumerated--control the formation of hysterical symptoms. In hysteria,
 too, we at once find a series of perfectly correct thoughts equivalent
 to our conscious thoughts, of whose existence, however, in this form we
 can learn nothing and which we can only subsequently reconstruct. If
 they have forced their way anywhere to our perception, we discover from
 the analysis of the symptom formed that these normal thoughts have been
 subjected to abnormal treatment and _have been transformed into the
 symptom by means of condensation and compromise formation, through
 superficial associations, under cover of contradictions, and eventually
 over the road of regression_. In view of the complete identity found
 between the peculiarities of the dream-work and of the psychic activity
 forming the psychoneurotic symptoms, we shall feel justified in
 transferring to the dream the conclusions urged upon us by hysteria.
 
 From the theory of hysteria we borrow the proposition that _such an
 abnormal psychic elaboration of a normal train of thought takes place
 only when the latter has been used for the transference of an
 unconscious wish which dates from the infantile life and is in a state
 of repression_. In accordance with this proposition we have construed
 the theory of the dream on the assumption that the actuating dream-wish
 invariably originates in the unconscious, which, as we ourselves have
 admitted, cannot be universally demonstrated though it cannot be
 refuted. But in order to explain the real meaning of the term
 _repression_, which we have employed so freely, we shall be obliged to
 make some further addition to our psychological construction.
 
 We have above elaborated the fiction of a primitive psychic apparatus,
 whose work is regulated by the efforts to avoid accumulation of
 excitement and as far as possible to maintain itself free from
 excitement. For this reason it was constructed after the plan of a
 reflex apparatus; the motility, originally the path for the inner bodily
 change, formed a discharging path standing at its disposal. We
 subsequently discussed the psychic results of a feeling of
 gratification, and we might at the same time have introduced the second
 assumption, viz. that accumulation of excitement--following certain
 modalities that do not concern us--is perceived as pain and sets the
 apparatus in motion in order to reproduce a feeling of gratification in
 which the diminution of the excitement is perceived as pleasure. Such a
 current in the apparatus which emanates from pain and strives for
 pleasure we call a wish. We have said that nothing but a wish is capable
 of setting the apparatus in motion, and that the discharge of excitement
 in the apparatus is regulated automatically by the perception of
 pleasure and pain. The first wish must have been an hallucinatory
 occupation of the memory for gratification. But this hallucination,
 unless it were maintained to the point of exhaustion, proved incapable
 of bringing about a cessation of the desire and consequently of securing
 the pleasure connected with gratification.
 
 Thus there was required a second activity--in our terminology the
 activity of a second system--which should not permit the memory
 occupation to advance to perception and therefrom to restrict the
 psychic forces, but should lead the excitement emanating from the
 craving stimulus by a devious path over the spontaneous motility which
 ultimately should so change the outer world as to allow the real
 perception of the object of gratification to take place. Thus far we
 have elaborated the plan of the psychic apparatus; these two systems are
 the germ of the Unc. and Forec, which we include in the fully developed
 apparatus.
 
 In order to be in a position successfully to change the outer world
 through the motility, there is required the accumulation of a large sum
 of experiences in the memory systems as well as a manifold fixation of
 the relations which are evoked in this memory material by different
 end-presentations. We now proceed further with our assumption. The
 manifold activity of the second system, tentatively sending forth and
 retracting energy, must on the one hand have full command over all
 memory material, but on the other hand it would be a superfluous
 expenditure for it to send to the individual mental paths large
 quantities of energy which would thus flow off to no purpose,
 diminishing the quantity available for the transformation of the outer
 world. In the interests of expediency I therefore postulate that the
 second system succeeds in maintaining the greater part of the occupation
 energy in a dormant state and in using but a small portion for the
 purposes of displacement. The mechanism of these processes is entirely
 unknown to me; any one who wishes to follow up these ideas must try to
 find the physical analogies and prepare the way for a demonstration of
 the process of motion in the stimulation of the neuron. I merely hold to
 the idea that the activity of the first [Greek: Psi]-system is directed
 _to the free outflow of the quantities of excitement_, and that the
 second system brings about an inhibition of this outflow through the
 energies emanating from it, _i.e._ it produces a _transformation into
 dormant energy, probably by raising the level_. I therefore assume that
 under the control of the second system as compared with the first, the
 course of the excitement is bound to entirely different mechanical
 conditions. After the second system has finished its tentative mental
 work, it removes the inhibition and congestion of the excitements and
 allows these excitements to flow off to the motility.
 
 An interesting train of thought now presents itself if we consider the
 relations of this inhibition of discharge by the second system to the
 regulation through the principle of pain. Let us now seek the
 counterpart of the primary feeling of gratification, namely, the
 objective feeling of fear. A perceptive stimulus acts on the primitive
 apparatus, becoming the source of a painful emotion. This will then be
 followed by irregular motor manifestations until one of these withdraws
 the apparatus from perception and at the same time from pain, but on the
 reappearance of the perception this manifestation will immediately
 repeat itself (perhaps as a movement of flight) until the perception has
 again disappeared. But there will here remain no tendency again to
 occupy the perception of the source of pain in the form of an
 hallucination or in any other form. On the contrary, there will be a
 tendency in the primary apparatus to abandon the painful memory picture
 as soon as it is in any way awakened, as the overflow of its excitement
 would surely produce (more precisely, begin to produce) pain. The
 deviation from memory, which is but a repetition of the former flight
 from perception, is facilitated also by the fact that, unlike
 perception, memory does not possess sufficient quality to excite
 consciousness and thereby to attract to itself new energy. This easy and
 regularly occurring deviation of the psychic process from the former
 painful memory presents to us the model and the first example of
 _psychic repression_. As is generally known, much of this deviation from
 the painful, much of the behavior of the ostrich, can be readily
 demonstrated even in the normal psychic life of adults.
 
 By virtue of the principle of pain the first system is therefore
 altogether incapable of introducing anything unpleasant into the mental
 associations. The system cannot do anything but wish. If this remained
 so the mental activity of the second system, which should have at its
 disposal all the memories stored up by experiences, would be hindered.
 But two ways are now opened: the work of the second system either frees
 itself completely from the principle of pain and continues its course,
 paying no heed to the painful reminiscence, or it contrives to occupy
 the painful memory in such a manner as to preclude the liberation of
 pain. We may reject the first possibility, as the principle of pain also
 manifests itself as a regulator for the emotional discharge of the
 second system; we are, therefore, directed to the second possibility,
 namely, that this system occupies a reminiscence in such a manner as to
 inhibit its discharge and hence, also, to inhibit the discharge
 comparable to a motor innervation for the development of pain. Thus from
 two starting points we are led to the hypothesis that occupation through
 the second system is at the same time an inhibition for the emotional
 discharge, viz. from a consideration of the principle of pain and from
 the principle of the smallest expenditure of innervation. Let us,
 however, keep to the fact--this is the key to the theory of
 repression--that the second system is capable of occupying an idea only
 when it is in position to check the development of pain emanating from
 it. Whatever withdraws itself from this inhibition also remains
 inaccessible for the second system and would soon be abandoned by virtue
 of the principle of pain. The inhibition of pain, however, need not be
 complete; it must be permitted to begin, as it indicates to the second
 system the nature of the memory and possibly its defective adaptation
 for the purpose sought by the mind.
 
 The psychic process which is admitted by the first system only I shall
 now call the _primary_ process; and the one resulting from the
 inhibition of the second system I shall call the _secondary_ process. I
 show by another point for what purpose the second system is obliged to
 correct the primary process. The primary process strives for a discharge
 of the excitement in order to establish a _perception_ identity with the
 sum of excitement thus gathered; the secondary process has abandoned
 this intention and undertaken instead the task of bringing about a
 _thought identity_. All thinking is only a circuitous path from the
 memory of gratification taken as an end-presentation to the identical
 occupation of the same memory, which is again to be attained on the
 track of the motor experiences. The state of thinking must take an
 interest in the connecting paths between the presentations without
 allowing itself to be misled by their intensities. But it is obvious
 that condensations and intermediate or compromise formations occurring
 in the presentations impede the attainment of this end-identity; by
 substituting one idea for the other they deviate from the path which
 otherwise would have been continued from the original idea. Such
 processes are therefore carefully avoided in the secondary thinking. Nor
 is it difficult to understand that the principle of pain also impedes
 the progress of the mental stream in its pursuit of the thought
 identity, though, indeed, it offers to the mental stream the most
 important points of departure. Hence the tendency of the thinking
 process must be to free itself more and more from exclusive adjustment
 by the principle of pain, and through the working of the mind to
 restrict the affective development to that minimum which is necessary as
 a signal. This refinement of the activity must have been attained
 through a recent over-occupation of energy brought about by
 consciousness. But we are aware that this refinement is seldom
 completely successful even in the most normal psychic life and that our
 thoughts ever remain accessible to falsification through the
 interference of the principle of pain.
 
 This, however, is not the breach in the functional efficiency of our
 psychic apparatus through which the thoughts forming the material of the
 secondary mental work are enabled to make their way into the primary
 psychic process--with which formula we may now describe the work leading
 to the dream and to the hysterical symptoms. This case of insufficiency
 results from the union of the two factors from the history of our
 evolution; one of which belongs solely to the psychic apparatus and has
 exerted a determining influence on the relation of the two systems,
 while the other operates fluctuatingly and introduces motive forces of
 organic origin into the psychic life. Both originate in the infantile
 life and result from the transformation which our psychic and somatic
 organism has undergone since the infantile period.
 
 When I termed one of the psychic processes in the psychic apparatus the
 primary process, I did so not only in consideration of the order of
 precedence and capability, but also as admitting the temporal relations
 to a share in the nomenclature. As far as our knowledge goes there is no
 psychic apparatus possessing only the primary process, and in so far it
 is a theoretic fiction; but so much is based on fact that the primary
 processes are present in the apparatus from the beginning, while the
 secondary processes develop gradually in the course of life, inhibiting
 and covering the primary ones, and gaining complete mastery over them
 perhaps only at the height of life. Owing to this retarded appearance of
 the secondary processes, the essence of our being, consisting in
 unconscious wish feelings, can neither be seized nor inhibited by the
 foreconscious, whose part is once for all restricted to the indication
 of the most suitable paths for the wish feelings originating in the
 unconscious. These unconscious wishes establish for all subsequent
 psychic efforts a compulsion to which they have to submit and which
 they must strive if possible to divert from its course and direct to
 higher aims. In consequence of this retardation of the foreconscious
 occupation a large sphere of the memory material remains inaccessible.
 
 Among these indestructible and unincumbered wish feelings originating
 from the infantile life, there are also some, the fulfillments of which
 have entered into a relation of contradiction to the end-presentation of
 the secondary thinking. The fulfillment of these wishes would no longer
 produce an affect of pleasure but one of pain; _and it is just this
 transformation of affect that constitutes the nature of what we
 designate as "repression," in which we recognize the infantile first
 step of passing adverse sentence or of rejecting through reason_. To
 investigate in what way and through what motive forces such a
 transformation can be produced constitutes the problem of repression,
 which we need here only skim over. It will suffice to remark that such a
 transformation of affect occurs in the course of development (one may
 think of the appearance in infantile life of disgust which was
 originally absent), and that it is connected with the activity of the
 secondary system. The memories from which the unconscious wish brings
 about the emotional discharge have never been accessible to the Forec.,
 and for that reason their emotional discharge cannot be inhibited. It
 is just on account of this affective development that these ideas are
 not even now accessible to the foreconscious thoughts to which they have
 transferred their wishing power. On the contrary, the principle of pain
 comes into play, and causes the Forec. to deviate from these thoughts of
 transference. The latter, left to themselves, are "repressed," and thus
 the existence of a store of infantile memories, from the very beginning
 withdrawn from the Forec., becomes the preliminary condition of
 repression.
 
 In the most favorable case the development of pain terminates as soon as
 the energy has been withdrawn from the thoughts of transference in the
 Forec., and this effect characterizes the intervention of the principle
 of pain as expedient. It is different, however, if the repressed
 unconscious wish receives an organic enforcement which it can lend to
 its thoughts of transference and through which it can enable them to
 make an effort towards penetration with their excitement, even after
 they have been abandoned by the occupation of the Forec. A defensive
 struggle then ensues, inasmuch as the Forec. reinforces the antagonism
 against the repressed ideas, and subsequently this leads to a
 penetration by the thoughts of transference (the carriers of the
 unconscious wish) in some form of compromise through symptom formation.
 But from the moment that the suppressed thoughts are powerfully occupied
 by the unconscious wish-feeling and abandoned by the foreconscious
 occupation, they succumb to the primary psychic process and strive only
 for motor discharge; or, if the path be free, for hallucinatory revival
 of the desired perception identity. We have previously found,
 empirically, that the incorrect processes described are enacted only
 with thoughts that exist in the repression. We now grasp another part of
 the connection. These incorrect processes are those that are primary in
 the psychic apparatus; _they appear wherever thoughts abandoned by the
 foreconscious occupation are left to themselves, and can fill themselves
 with the uninhibited energy, striving for discharge from the
 unconscious_. We may add a few further observations to support the view
 that these processes designated "incorrect" are really not
 falsifications of the normal defective thinking, but the modes of
 activity of the psychic apparatus when freed from inhibition. Thus we
 see that the transference of the foreconscious excitement to the
 motility takes place according to the same processes, and that the
 connection of the foreconscious presentations with words readily
 manifest the same displacements and mixtures which are ascribed to
 inattention. Finally, I should like to adduce proof that an increase of
 work necessarily results from the inhibition of these primary courses
 from the fact that we gain a _comical effect_, a surplus to be
 discharged through laughter, _if we allow these streams of thought to
 come to consciousness_.
 
 The theory of the psychoneuroses asserts with complete certainty that
 only sexual wish-feelings from the infantile life experience repression
 (emotional transformation) during the developmental period of childhood.
 These are capable of returning to activity at a later period of
 development, and then have the faculty of being revived, either as a
 consequence of the sexual constitution, which is really formed from the
 original bisexuality, or in consequence of unfavorable influences of the
 sexual life; and they thus supply the motive power for all
 psychoneurotic symptom formations. It is only by the introduction of
 these sexual forces that the gaps still demonstrable in the theory of
 repression can be filled. I will leave it undecided whether the
 postulate of the sexual and infantile may also be asserted for the
 theory of the dream; I leave this here unfinished because I have already
 passed a step beyond the demonstrable in assuming that the dream-wish
 invariably originates from the unconscious.[2] Nor will I further
 investigate the difference in the play of the psychic forces in the
 dream formation and in the formation of the hysterical symptoms, for to
 do this we ought to possess a more explicit knowledge of one of the
 members to be compared. But I regard another point as important, and
 will here confess that it was on account of this very point that I have
 just undertaken this entire discussion concerning the two psychic
 systems, their modes of operation, and the repression. For it is now
 immaterial whether I have conceived the psychological relations in
 question with approximate correctness, or, as is easily possible in such
 a difficult matter, in an erroneous and fragmentary manner. Whatever
 changes may be made in the interpretation of the psychic censor and of
 the correct and of the abnormal elaboration of the dream content, the
 fact nevertheless remains that such processes are active in dream
 formation, and that essentially they show the closest analogy to the
 processes observed in the formation of the hysterical symptoms. The
 dream is not a pathological phenomenon, and it does not leave behind an
 enfeeblement of the mental faculties. The objection that no deduction
 can be drawn regarding the dreams of healthy persons from my own dreams
 and from those of neurotic patients may be rejected without comment.
 Hence, when we draw conclusions from the phenomena as to their motive
 forces, we recognize that the psychic mechanism made use of by the
 neuroses is not created by a morbid disturbance of the psychic life, but
 is found ready in the normal structure of the psychic apparatus. The two
 psychic systems, the censor crossing between them, the inhibition and
 the covering of the one activity by the other, the relations of both to
 consciousness--or whatever may offer a more correct interpretation of
 the actual conditions in their stead--all these belong to the normal
 structure of our psychic instrument, and the dream points out for us one
 of the roads leading to a knowledge of this structure. If, in addition
 to our knowledge, we wish to be contented with a minimum perfectly
 established, we shall say that the dream gives us proof that the
 _suppressed, material continues to exist even in the normal person and
 remains capable of psychic activity_. The dream itself is one of the
 manifestations of this suppressed material; theoretically, this is true
 in _all_ cases; according to substantial experience it is true in at
 least a great number of such as most conspicuously display the prominent
 characteristics of dream life. The suppressed psychic material, which in
 the waking state has been prevented from expression and cut off from
 internal perception _by the antagonistic adjustment of the
 contradictions_, finds ways and means of obtruding itself on
 consciousness during the night under the domination of the compromise
 formations.
 
      _"Flectere si nequeo superos, Acheronta movebo."_
 
 At any rate the interpretation of dreams is the _via regia_ to a
 knowledge of the unconscious in the psychic life.
 
 In following the analysis of the dream we have made some progress toward
 an understanding of the composition of this most marvelous and most
 mysterious of instruments; to be sure, we have not gone very far, but
 enough of a beginning has been made to allow us to advance from other
 so-called pathological formations further into the analysis of the
 unconscious. Disease--at least that which is justly termed
 functional--is not due to the destruction of this apparatus, and the
 establishment of new splittings in its interior; it is rather to be
 explained dynamically through the strengthening and weakening of the
 components in the play of forces by which so many activities are
 concealed during the normal function. We have been able to show in
 another place how the composition of the apparatus from the two systems
 permits a subtilization even of the normal activity which would be
 impossible for a single system.
 
 [1] _Cf._ the significant observations by J. Bueuer in our _Studies on
 Hysteria_, 1895, and 2nd ed. 1909.
 
 [2] Here, as in other places, there are gaps in the treatment of the
 subject, which I have left intentionally, because to fill them up would
 require on the one hand too great effort, and on the other hand an
 extensive reference to material that is foreign to the dream. Thus I
 have avoided stating whether I connect with the word "suppressed"
 another sense than with the word "repressed." It has been made clear
 only that the latter emphasizes more than the former the relation to the
 unconscious. I have not entered into the cognate problem why the dream
 thoughts also experience distortion by the censor when they abandon the
 progressive continuation to consciousness and choose the path of
 regression. I have been above all anxious to awaken an interest in the
 problems to which the further analysis of the dreamwork leads and to
 indicate the other themes which meet these on the way. It was not always
 easy to decide just where the pursuit should be discontinued. That I
 have not treated exhaustively the part played in the dream by the
 psychosexual life and have avoided the interpretation of dreams of an
 obvious sexual content is due to a special reason which may not come up
 to the reader's expectation. To be sure, it is very far from my ideas
 and the principles expressed by me in neuropathology to regard the
 sexual life as a "pudendum" which should be left unconsidered by the
 physician and the scientific investigator. I also consider ludicrous the
 moral indignation which prompted the translator of Artemidoros of Daldis
 to keep from the reader's knowledge the chapter on sexual dreams
 contained in the _Symbolism of the Dreams_. As for myself, I have been
 actuated solely by the conviction that in the explanation of sexual
 dreams I should be bound to entangle myself deeply in the still
 unexplained problems of perversion and bisexuality; and for that reason
 I have reserved this material for another connection.
 
 
 
 
 IX
 
 THE UNCONSCIOUS AND CONSCIOUSNESS--REALITY
 
 
 On closer inspection we find that it is not the existence of two systems
 near the motor end of the apparatus but of two kinds of processes or
 modes of emotional discharge, the assumption of which was explained in
 the psychological discussions of the previous chapter. This can make no
 difference for us, for we must always be ready to drop our auxiliary
 ideas whenever we deem ourselves in position to replace them by
 something else approaching more closely to the unknown reality. Let us
 now try to correct some views which might be erroneously formed as long
 as we regarded the two systems in the crudest and most obvious sense as
 two localities within the psychic apparatus, views which have left their
 traces in the terms "repression" and "penetration." Thus, when we say
 that an unconscious idea strives for transference into the foreconscious
 in order later to penetrate consciousness, we do not mean that a second
 idea is to be formed situated in a new locality like an interlineation
 near which the original continues to remain; also, when we speak of
 penetration into consciousness, we wish carefully to avoid any idea of
 change of locality. When we say that a foreconscious idea is repressed
 and subsequently taken up by the unconscious, we might be tempted by
 these figures, borrowed from the idea of a struggle over a territory, to
 assume that an arrangement is really broken up in one psychic locality
 and replaced by a new one in the other locality. For these comparisons
 we substitute what would seem to correspond better with the real state
 of affairs by saying that an energy occupation is displaced to or
 withdrawn from a certain arrangement so that the psychic formation falls
 under the domination of a system or is withdrawn from the same. Here
 again we replace a topical mode of presentation by a dynamic; it is not
 the psychic formation that appears to us as the moving factor but the
 innervation of the same.
 
 I deem it appropriate and justifiable, however, to apply ourselves still
 further to the illustrative conception of the two systems. We shall
 avoid any misapplication of this manner of representation if we remember
 that presentations, thoughts, and psychic formations should generally
 not be localized in the organic elements of the nervous system, but, so
 to speak, between them, where resistances and paths form the correlate
 corresponding to them. Everything that can become an object of our
 internal perception is virtual, like the image in the telescope produced
 by the passage of the rays of light. But we are justified in assuming
 the existence of the systems, which have nothing psychic in themselves
 and which never become accessible to our psychic perception,
 corresponding to the lenses of the telescope which design the image. If
 we continue this comparison, we may say that the censor between two
 systems corresponds to the refraction of rays during their passage into
 a new medium.
 
 Thus far we have made psychology on our own responsibility; it is now
 time to examine the theoretical opinions governing present-day
 psychology and to test their relation to our theories. The question of
 the unconscious, in psychology is, according to the authoritative words
 of Lipps, less a psychological question than the question of psychology.
 As long as psychology settled this question with the verbal explanation
 that the "psychic" is the "conscious" and that "unconscious psychic
 occurrences" are an obvious contradiction, a psychological estimate of
 the observations gained by the physician from abnormal mental states was
 precluded. The physician and the philosopher agree only when both
 acknowledge that unconscious psychic processes are "the appropriate and
 well-justified expression for an established fact." The physician cannot
 but reject with a shrug of his shoulders the assertion that
 "consciousness is the indispensable quality of the psychic"; he may
 assume, if his respect for the utterings of the philosophers still be
 strong enough, that he and they do not treat the same subject and do not
 pursue the same science. For a single intelligent observation of the
 psychic life of a neurotic, a single analysis of a dream must force upon
 him the unalterable conviction that the most complicated and correct
 mental operations, to which no one will refuse the name of psychic
 occurrences, may take place without exciting the consciousness of the
 person. It is true that the physician does not learn of these
 unconscious processes until they have exerted such an effect on
 consciousness as to admit communication or observation. But this effect
 of consciousness may show a psychic character widely differing from the
 unconscious process, so that the internal perception cannot possibly
 recognize the one as a substitute for the other. The physician must
 reserve for himself the right to penetrate, by a process of deduction,
 from the effect on consciousness to the unconscious psychic process; he
 learns in this way that the effect on consciousness is only a remote
 psychic product of the unconscious process and that the latter has not
 become conscious as such; that it has been in existence and operative
 without betraying itself in any way to consciousness.
 
 A reaction from the over-estimation of the quality of consciousness
 becomes the indispensable preliminary condition for any correct insight
 into the behavior of the psychic. In the words of Lipps, the unconscious
 must be accepted as the general basis of the psychic life. The
 unconscious is the larger circle which includes within itself the
 smaller circle of the conscious; everything conscious has its
 preliminary step in the unconscious, whereas the unconscious may stop
 with this step and still claim full value as a psychic activity.
 Properly speaking, the unconscious is the real psychic; _its inner
 nature is just as unknown to us as the reality of the external world,
 and it is just as imperfectly reported to us through the data of
 consciousness as is the external world through the indications of our
 sensory organs_.
 
 A series of dream problems which have intensely occupied older authors
 will be laid aside when the old opposition between conscious life and
 dream life is abandoned and the unconscious psychic assigned to its
 proper place. Thus many of the activities whose performances in the
 dream have excited our admiration are now no longer to be attributed to
 the dream but to unconscious thinking, which is also active during the
 day. If, according to Scherner, the dream seems to play with a symboling
 representation of the body, we know that this is the work of certain
 unconscious phantasies which have probably given in to sexual emotions,
 and that these phantasies come to expression not only in dreams but also
 in hysterical phobias and in other symptoms. If the dream continues and
 settles activities of the day and even brings to light valuable
 inspirations, we have only to subtract from it the dream disguise as a
 feat of dream-work and a mark of assistance from obscure forces in the
 depth of the mind (_cf._ the devil in Tartini's sonata dream). The
 intellectual task as such must be attributed to the same psychic forces
 which perform all such tasks during the day. We are probably far too
 much inclined to over-estimate the conscious character even of
 intellectual and artistic productions. From the communications of some
 of the most highly productive persons, such as Goethe and Helmholtz, we
 learn, indeed, that the most essential and original parts in their
 creations came to them in the form of inspirations and reached their
 perceptions almost finished. There is nothing strange about the
 assistance of the conscious activity in other cases where there was a
 concerted effort of all the psychic forces. But it is a much abused
 privilege of the conscious activity that it is allowed to hide from us
 all other activities wherever it participates.
 
 It will hardly be worth while to take up the historical significance of
 dreams as a special subject. Where, for instance, a chieftain has been
 urged through a dream to engage in a bold undertaking the success of
 which has had the effect of changing history, a new problem results only
 so long as the dream, regarded as a strange power, is contrasted with
 other more familiar psychic forces; the problem, however, disappears
 when we regard the dream as a form of expression for feelings which are
 burdened with resistance during the day and which can receive
 reinforcements at night from deep emotional sources. But the great
 respect shown by the ancients for the dream is based on a correct
 psychological surmise. It is a homage paid to the unsubdued and
 indestructible in the human mind, and to the demoniacal which furnishes
 the dream-wish and which we find again in our unconscious.
 
 Not inadvisedly do I use the expression "in our unconscious," for what
 we so designate does not coincide with the unconscious of the
 philosophers, nor with the unconscious of Lipps. In the latter uses it
 is intended to designate only the opposite of conscious. That there are
 also unconscious psychic processes beside the conscious ones is the
 hotly contested and energetically defended issue. Lipps gives us the
 more far-reaching theory that everything psychic exists as unconscious,
 but that some of it may exist also as conscious. But it was not to prove
 this theory that we have adduced the phenomena of the dream and of the
 hysterical symptom formation; the observation of normal life alone
 suffices to establish its correctness beyond any doubt. The new fact
 that we have learned from the analysis of the psychopathological
 formations, and indeed from their first member, viz. dreams, is that the
 unconscious--hence the psychic--occurs as a function of two separate
 systems and that it occurs as such even in normal psychic life.
 Consequently there are two kinds of unconscious, which we do not as yet
 find distinguished by the psychologists. Both are unconscious in the
 psychological sense; but in our sense the first, which we call Unc., is
 likewise incapable of consciousness, whereas the second we term "Forec."
 because its emotions, after the observance of certain rules, can reach
 consciousness, perhaps not before they have again undergone censorship,
 but still regardless of the Unc. system. The fact that in order to
 attain consciousness the emotions must traverse an unalterable series of
 events or succession of instances, as is betrayed through their
 alteration by the censor, has helped us to draw a comparison from
 spatiality. We described the relations of the two systems to each other
 and to consciousness by saying that the system Forec. is like a screen
 between the system Unc. and consciousness. The system Forec. not only
 bars access to consciousness, but also controls the entrance to
 voluntary motility and is capable of sending out a sum of mobile energy,
 a portion of which is familiar to us as attention.
 
 We must also steer clear of the distinctions superconscious and
 subconscious which have found so much favor in the more recent
 literature on the psychoneuroses, for just such a distinction seems to
 emphasize the equivalence of the psychic and the conscious.
 
 What part now remains in our description of the once all-powerful and
 all-overshadowing consciousness? None other than that of a sensory organ
 for the perception of psychic qualities. According to the fundamental
 idea of schematic undertaking we can conceive the conscious perception
 only as the particular activity of an independent system for which the
 abbreviated designation "Cons." commends itself. This system we conceive
 to be similar in its mechanical characteristics to the perception system
 P, hence excitable by qualities and incapable of retaining the trace of
 changes, _i.e._ it is devoid of memory. The psychic apparatus which,
 with the sensory organs of the P-system, is turned to the outer world,
 is itself the outer world for the sensory organ of Cons.; the
 teleological justification of which rests on this relationship. We are
 here once more confronted with the principle of the succession of
 instances which seems to dominate the structure of the apparatus. The
 material under excitement flows to the Cons, sensory organ from two
 sides, firstly from the P-system whose excitement, qualitatively
 determined, probably experiences a new elaboration until it comes to
 conscious perception; and, secondly, from the interior of the apparatus
 itself, the quantitative processes of which are perceived as a
 qualitative series of pleasure and pain as soon as they have undergone
 certain changes.
 
 The philosophers, who have learned that correct and highly complicated
 thought structures are possible even without the cooeperation of
 consciousness, have found it difficult to attribute any function to
 consciousness; it has appeared to them a superfluous mirroring of the
 perfected psychic process. The analogy of our Cons. system with the
 systems of perception relieves us of this embarrassment. We see that
 perception through our sensory organs results in directing the
 occupation of attention to those paths on which the incoming sensory
 excitement is diffused; the qualitative excitement of the P-system
 serves the mobile quantity of the psychic apparatus as a regulator for
 its discharge. We may claim the same function for the overlying sensory
 organ of the Cons. system. By assuming new qualities, it furnishes a new
 contribution toward the guidance and suitable distribution of the mobile
 occupation quantities. By means of the perceptions of pleasure and pain,
 it influences the course of the occupations within the psychic
 apparatus, which normally operates unconsciously and through the
 displacement of quantities. It is probable that the principle of pain
 first regulates the displacements of occupation automatically, but it is
 quite possible that the consciousness of these qualities adds a second
 and more subtle regulation which may even oppose the first and perfect
 the working capacity of the apparatus by placing it in a position
 contrary to its original design for occupying and developing even that
 which is connected with the liberation of pain. We learn from
 neuropsychology that an important part in the functional activity of the
 apparatus is attributed to such regulations through the qualitative
 excitation of the sensory organs. The automatic control of the primary
 principle of pain and the restriction of mental capacity connected with
 it are broken by the sensible regulations, which in their turn are again
 automatisms. We learn that the repression which, though originally
 expedient, terminates nevertheless in a harmful rejection of inhibition
 and of psychic domination, is so much more easily accomplished with
 reminiscences than with perceptions, because in the former there is no
 increase in occupation through the excitement of the psychic sensory
 organs. When an idea to be rejected has once failed to become conscious
 because it has succumbed to repression, it can be repressed on other
 occasions only because it has been withdrawn from conscious perception
 on other grounds. These are hints employed by therapy in order to bring
 about a retrogression of accomplished repressions.
 
 The value of the over-occupation which is produced by the regulating
 influence of the Cons. sensory organ on the mobile quantity, is
 demonstrated in the teleological connection by nothing more clearly than
 by the creation of a new series of qualities and consequently a new
 regulation which constitutes the precedence of man over the animals. For
 the mental processes are in themselves devoid of quality except for the
 excitements of pleasure and pain accompanying them, which, as we know,
 are to be held in check as possible disturbances of thought. In order to
 endow them with a quality, they are associated in man with verbal
 memories, the qualitative remnants of which suffice to draw upon them
 the attention of consciousness which in turn endows thought with a new
 mobile energy.
 
 The manifold problems of consciousness in their entirety can be examined
 only through an analysis of the hysterical mental process. From this
 analysis we receive the impression that the transition from the
 foreconscious to the occupation of consciousness is also connected with
 a censorship similar to the one between the Unc. and the Forec. This
 censorship, too, begins to act only with the reaching of a certain
 quantitative degree, so that few intense thought formations escape it.
 Every possible case of detention from consciousness, as well as of
 penetration to consciousness, under restriction is found included within
 the picture of the psychoneurotic phenomena; every case points to the
 intimate and twofold connection between the censor and consciousness. I
 shall conclude these psychological discussions with the report of two
 such occurrences.
 
 On the occasion of a consultation a few years ago the subject was an
 intelligent and innocent-looking girl. Her attire was strange; whereas a
 woman's garb is usually groomed to the last fold, she had one of her
 stockings hanging down and two of her waist buttons opened. She
 complained of pains in one of her legs, and exposed her leg unrequested.
 Her chief complaint, however, was in her own words as follows: She had a
 feeling in her body as if something was stuck into it which moved to and
 fro and made her tremble through and through. This sometimes made her
 whole body stiff. On hearing this, my colleague in consultation looked
 at me; the complaint was quite plain to him. To both of us it seemed
 peculiar that the patient's mother thought nothing of the matter; of
 course she herself must have been repeatedly in the situation described
 by her child. As for the girl, she had no idea of the import of her
 words or she would never have allowed them to pass her lips. Here the
 censor had been deceived so successfully that under the mask of an
 innocent complaint a phantasy was admitted to consciousness which
 otherwise would have remained in the foreconscious.
 
 Another example: I began the psychoanalytic treatment of a boy of
 fourteen years who was suffering from _tic convulsif_, hysterical
 vomiting, headache, &c., by assuring him that, after closing his eyes,
 he would see pictures or have ideas, which I requested him to
 communicate to me. He answered by describing pictures. The last
 impression he had received before coming to me was visually revived in
 his memory. He had played a game of checkers with his uncle, and now saw
 the checkerboard before him. He commented on various positions that were
 favorable or unfavorable, on moves that were not safe to make. He then
 saw a dagger lying on the checker-board, an object belonging to his
 father, but transferred to the checker-board by his phantasy. Then a
 sickle was lying on the board; next a scythe was added; and, finally, he
 beheld the likeness of an old peasant mowing the grass in front of the
 boy's distant parental home. A few days later I discovered the meaning
 of this series of pictures. Disagreeable family relations had made the
 boy nervous. It was the case of a strict and crabbed father who lived
 unhappily with his mother, and whose educational methods consisted in
 threats; of the separation of his father from his tender and delicate
 mother, and the remarrying of his father, who one day brought home a
 young woman as his new mamma. The illness of the fourteen-year-old boy
 broke out a few days later. It was the suppressed anger against his
 father that had composed these pictures into intelligible allusions. The
 material was furnished by a reminiscence from mythology, The sickle was
 the one with which Zeus castrated his father; the scythe and the
 likeness of the peasant represented Kronos, the violent old man who eats
 his children and upon whom Zeus wreaks vengeance in so unfilial a
 manner. The marriage of the father gave the boy an opportunity to return
 the reproaches and threats of his father--which had previously been made
 because the child played with his genitals (the checkerboard; the
 prohibitive moves; the dagger with which a person may be killed). We
 have here long repressed memories and their unconscious remnants which,
 under the guise of senseless pictures have slipped into consciousness by
 devious paths left open to them.
 
 I should then expect to find the theoretical value of the study of
 dreams in its contribution to psychological knowledge and in its
 preparation for an understanding of neuroses. Who can foresee the
 importance of a thorough knowledge of the structure and activities of
 the psychic apparatus when even our present state of knowledge produces
 a happy therapeutic influence in the curable forms of the
 psychoneuroses? What about the practical value of such study some one
 may ask, for psychic knowledge and for the discovering of the secret
 peculiarities of individual character? Have not the unconscious feelings
 revealed by the dream the value of real forces in the psychic life?
 Should we take lightly the ethical significance of the suppressed wishes
 which, as they now create dreams, may some day create other things?
 
 I do not feel justified in answering these questions. I have not thought
 further upon this side of the dream problem. I believe, however, that at
 all events the Roman Emperor was in the wrong who ordered one of his
 subjects executed because the latter dreamt that he had killed the
 Emperor. He should first have endeavored to discover the significance of
 the dream; most probably it was not what it seemed to be. And even if a
 dream of different content had the significance of this offense against
 majesty, it would still have been in place to remember the words of
 Plato, that the virtuous man contents himself with dreaming that which
 the wicked man does in actual life. I am therefore of the opinion that
 it is best to accord freedom to dreams. Whether any reality is to be
 attributed to the unconscious wishes, and in what sense, I am not
 prepared to say offhand. Reality must naturally be denied to all
 transition--and intermediate thoughts. If we had before us the
 unconscious wishes, brought to their last and truest expression, we
 should still do well to remember that more than one single form of
 existence must be ascribed to the psychic reality. Action and the
 conscious expression of thought mostly suffice for the practical need
 of judging a man's character. Action, above all, merits to be placed in
 the first rank; for many of the impulses penetrating consciousness are
 neutralized by real forces of the psychic life before they are converted
 into action; indeed, the reason why they frequently do not encounter any
 psychic obstacle on their way is because the unconscious is certain of
 their meeting with resistances later. In any case it is instructive to
 become familiar with the much raked-up soil from which our virtues
 proudly arise. For the complication of human character moving
 dynamically in all directions very rarely accommodates itself to
 adjustment through a simple alternative, as our antiquated moral
 philosophy would have it.
 
 And how about the value of the dream for a knowledge of the future?
 That, of course, we cannot consider. One feels inclined to substitute:
 "for a knowledge of the past." For the dream originates from the past in
 every sense. To be sure the ancient belief that the dream reveals the
 future is not entirely devoid of truth. By representing to us a wish as
 fulfilled the dream certainly leads us into the future; but this future,
 taken by the dreamer as present, has been formed into the likeness of
 that past by the indestructible wish.
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 Produced by Chuck Greif and the Online Distributed
 Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net (This book was
 produced from scanned images of public domain material
 from the Google Print project.)
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 [Illustration: LEONARDO DA VINCI]
 
 
 
 
 Leonardo da Vinci
 
 A PSYCHOSEXUAL STUDY OF AN
 INFANTILE REMINISCENCE
 
 BY
 PROFESSOR DR. SIGMUND FREUD, LL.D.
 (UNIVERSITY OF VIENNA)
 
 TRANSLATED BY
 
 A. A. BRILL, PH.B., M.D.
 
 Lecturer in Psychoanalysis and Abnormal
 Psychology, New York University
 
 [Illustration]
 
 NEW YORK
 MOFFAT, YARD & COMPANY
 1916
 
 COPYRIGHT, 1916, BY
 
 MOFFAT, YARD & COMPANY
 
 
 
 
 ILLUSTRATIONS
 
 
 Leonardo Da Vinci       _Frontispiece_
 
                               FACING
                                PAGE
 
 Mona Lisa       78
 
 Saint Anne       86
 
 John the Baptist       94
 
 
 
 
 LEONARDO DA VINCI
 
 
 
 
 I
 
 
 When psychoanalytic investigation, which usually contents itself with
 frail human material, approaches the great personages of humanity, it is
 not impelled to it by motives which are often attributed to it by
 laymen. It does not strive "to blacken the radiant and to drag the
 sublime into the mire"; it finds no satisfaction in diminishing the
 distance between the perfection of the great and the inadequacy of the
 ordinary objects. But it cannot help finding that everything is worthy
 of understanding that can be perceived through those prototypes, and it
 also believes that none is so big as to be ashamed of being subject to
 the laws which control the normal and morbid actions with the same
 strictness.
 
 Leonardo da Vinci (1452-1519) was admired even by his contemporaries as
 one of the greatest men of the Italian Renaissance, still even then he
 appeared as mysterious to them as he now appears to us. An all-sided
 genius, "whose form can only be divined but never deeply fathomed,"[1]
 he exerted the most decisive influence on his time as an artist; and it
 remained to us to recognize his greatness as a naturalist which was
 united in him with the artist. Although he left masterpieces of the art
 of painting, while his scientific discoveries remained unpublished and
 unused, the investigator in him has never quite left the artist, often
 it has severely injured the artist and in the end it has perhaps
 suppressed the artist altogether. According to Vasari, Leonardo
 reproached himself during the last hour of his life for having insulted
 God and men because he has not done his duty to his art.[2] And even if
 Vasari's story lacks all probability and belongs to those legends which
 began to be woven about the mystic master while he was still living, it
 nevertheless retains indisputable value as a testimonial of the judgment
 of those people and of those times.
 
 What was it that removed the personality of Leonardo from the
 understanding of his contemporaries? Certainly not the many sidedness of
 his capacities and knowledge, which allowed him to install himself as a
 player of the lyre on an instrument invented by himself, in the court of
 Lodovico Sforza, nicknamed Il Moro, the Duke of Milan, or which allowed
 him to write to the same person that remarkable letter in which he
 boasts of his abilities as a civil and military engineer. For the
 combination of manifold talents in the same person was not unusual in
 the times of the Renaissance; to be sure Leonardo himself furnished one
 of the most splendid examples of such persons. Nor did he belong to that
 type of genial persons who are outwardly poorly endowed by nature, and
 who on their side place no value on the outer forms of life, and in the
 painful gloominess of their feelings fly from human relations. On the
 contrary he was tall and symmetrically built, of consummate beauty of
 countenance and of unusual physical strength, he was charming in his
 manner, a master of speech, and jovial and affectionate to everybody. He
 loved beauty in the objects of his surroundings, he was fond of wearing
 magnificent garments and appreciated every refinement of conduct. In his
 treatise[3] on the art of painting he compares in a significant passage
 the art of painting with its sister arts and thus discusses the
 difficulties of the sculptor: "Now his face is entirely smeared and
 powdered with marble dust, so that he looks like a baker, he is covered
 with small marble splinters, so that it seems as if it snowed on his
 back, and his house is full of stone splinters, and dust. The case of
 the painter is quite different from that; for the painter is well
 dressed and sits with great comfort before his work, he gently and very
 lightly brushes in the beautiful colors. He wears as decorative clothes
 as he likes, and his house is filled with beautiful paintings and is
 spotlessly clean. He often enjoys company, music, or some one may read
 for him various nice works, and all this can be listened to with great
 pleasure, undisturbed by any pounding from the hammer and other noises."
 
 It is quite possible that the conception of a beaming jovial and happy
 Leonardo was true only for the first and longer period of the master's
 life. From now on, when the downfall of the rule of Lodovico Moro forced
 him to leave Milan, his sphere of action and his assured position, to
 lead an unsteady and unsuccessful life until his last asylum in France,
 it is possible that the luster of his disposition became pale and some
 odd features of his character became more prominent. The turning of his
 interest from his art to science which increased with age must have also
 been responsible for widening the gap between himself and his
 contemporaries. All his efforts with which, according to their opinion,
 he wasted his time instead of diligently filling orders and becoming
 rich as perhaps his former classmate Perugino, seemed to his
 contemporaries as capricious playing, or even caused them to suspect him
 of being in the service of the "black art." We who know him from his
 sketches understand him better. In a time in which the authority of the
 church began to be substituted by that of antiquity and in which only
 theoretical investigation existed, he the forerunner, or better the
 worthy competitor of Bacon and Copernicus, was necessarily isolated.
 When he dissected cadavers of horses and human beings, and built flying
 apparatus, or when he studied the nourishment of plants and their
 behavior towards poisons, he naturally deviated much from the
 commentators of Aristotle and came nearer the despised alchemists, in
 whose laboratories the experimental investigations found some refuge
 during these unfavorable times.
 
 The effect that this had on his paintings was that he disliked to handle
 the brush, he painted less and what was more often the case, the things
 he began were mostly left unfinished; he cared less and less for the
 future fate of his works. It was this mode of working that was held up
 to him as a reproach from his contemporaries to whom his behavior to his
 art remained a riddle.
 
 Many of Leonardo's later admirers have attempted to wipe off the stain
 of unsteadiness from his character. They maintained that what is blamed
 in Leonardo is a general characteristic of great artists. They said that
 even the energetic Michelangelo who was absorbed in his work left many
 incompleted works, which was as little due to his fault as to Leonardo's
 in the same case. Besides some pictures were not as unfinished as he
 claimed, and what the layman would call a masterpiece may still appear
 to the creator of the work of art as an unsatisfied embodiment of his
 intentions; he has a faint notion of a perfection which he despairs of
 reproducing in likeness. Least of all should the artist be held
 responsible for the fate which befalls his works.
 
 As plausible as some of these excuses may sound they nevertheless do not
 explain the whole state of affairs which we find in Leonardo. The
 painful struggle with the work, the final flight from it and the
 indifference to its future fate may be seen in many other artists, but
 this behavior is shown in Leonardo to highest degree. Edm. Solmi[4]
 cites (p. 12) the expression of one of his pupils: "Pareva, che ad ogni
 ora tremasse, quando si poneva a dipingere, e per no diede mai fine ad
 alcuna cosa cominciata, considerando la grandezza dell'arte, tal che
 egli scorgeva errori in quelle cose, che ad altri parevano miracoli."
 His last pictures, Leda, the Madonna di Saint Onofrio, Bacchus and St.
 John the Baptist, remained unfinished "come quasi intervenne di tutte le
 cose sue." Lomazzo,[5] who finished a copy of The Holy Supper, refers in
 a sonnet to the familiar inability of Leonardo to finish his works:
 
     "Protogen che il penel di sue pitture
      Non levava, agguaglio il Vinci Divo,
      Di cui opra non  finita pure."
 
 The slowness with which Leonardo worked was proverbial. After the most
 thorough preliminary studies he painted The Holy Supper for three years
 in the cloister of Santa Maria delle Grazie in Milan. One of his
 contemporaries, Matteo Bandelli, the writer of novels, who was then a
 young monk in the cloister, relates that Leonardo often ascended the
 scaffold very early in the morning and did not leave the brush out of
 his hand until twilight, never thinking of eating or drinking. Then days
 passed without putting his hand on it, sometimes he remained for hours
 before the painting and derived satisfaction from studying it by
 himself. At other times he came directly to the cloister from the palace
 of the Milanese Castle where he formed the model of the equestrian
 statue for Francesco Sforza, in order to add a few strokes with the
 brush to one of the figures and then stopped immediately.[6] According
 to Vasari he worked for years on the portrait of Monna Lisa, the wife of
 the Florentine de Gioconda, without being able to bring it to
 completion. This circumstance may also account for the fact that it was
 never delivered to the one who ordered it but remained with Leonardo who
 took it with him to France.[7] Having been procured by King Francis I,
 it now forms one of the greatest treasures of the Louvre.
 
 When one compares these reports about Leonardo's way of working with the
 evidence of the extraordinary amount of sketches and studies left by
 him, one is bound altogether to reject the idea that traits of
 flightiness and unsteadiness exerted the slightest influence on
 Leonardo's relation to his art. On the contrary one notices a very
 extraordinary absorption in work, a richness in possibilities in which a
 decision could be reached only hestitatingly, claims which could hardly
 be satisfied, and an inhibition in the execution which could not even be
 explained by the inevitable backwardness of the artist behind his ideal
 purpose. The slowness which was striking in Leonardo's works from the
 very beginning proved to be a symptom of his inhibition, a forerunner of
 his turning away from painting which manifested itself later.[8] It was
 this slowness which decided the not undeserving fate of The Holy
 Supper. Leonardo could not take kindly to the art of fresco painting
 which demands quick work while the background is still moist, it was for
 this reason that he chose oil colors, the drying of which permitted him
 to complete the picture according to his mood and leisure. But these
 colors separated themselves from the background upon which they were
 painted and which isolated them from the brick wall; the blemishes of
 this wall and the vicissitudes to which the room was subjected seemingly
 contributed to the inevitable deterioration of the picture.[9]
 
 The picture of the cavalry battle of Anghiari, which in competition with
 Michelangelo he began to paint later on a wall of the Sala de Consiglio
 in Florence and which he also left in an unfinished state, seemed to
 have perished through the failure of a similar technical process. It
 seems here as if a peculiar interest, that of the experimenter, at first
 renforced the artistic, only later to damage the art production.
 
 The character of the man Leonardo evinces still some other unusual
 traits and apparent contradictions. Thus a certain inactivity and
 indifference seemed very evident in him. At a time when every individual
 sought to gain the widest latitude for his activity, which could not
 take place without the development of energetic aggression towards
 others, he surprised every one through his quiet peacefulness, his
 shunning of all competition and controversies. He was mild and kind to
 all, he was said to have rejected a meat diet because he did not
 consider it just to rob animals of their lives, and one of his special
 pleasures was to buy caged birds in the market and set them free.[10] He
 condemned war and bloodshed and designated man not so much as the king
 of the animal world, but rather as the worst of the wild beasts.[11] But
 this effeminate delicacy of feeling did not prevent him from
 accompanying condemned criminals on their way to execution in order to
 study and sketch in his notebook their features, distorted by fear, nor
 did it prevent him from inventing the most cruel offensive weapons, and
 from entering the service of Cesare Borgia as chief military engineer.
 Often he seemed to be indifferent to good and evil, or he had to be
 measured with a special standard. He held a high position in Cesare's
 campaign which gained for this most inconsiderate and most faithless of
 foes the possession of the Romagna. Not a single line of Leonardo's
 sketches betrays any criticism or sympathy of the events of those days.
 The comparison with Goethe during the French campaign cannot here be
 altogether rejected.
 
 If a biographical effort really endeavors to penetrate the understanding
 of the psychic life of its hero it must not, as happens in most
 biographies through discretion or prudery, pass over in silence the
 sexual activity or the sex peculiarity of the one examined. What we know
 about it in Leonardo is very little but full of significance. In a
 period where there was a constant struggle between riotous
 licentiousness and gloomy asceticism, Leonardo presented an example of
 cool sexual rejection which one would not expect in an artist and a
 portrayer of feminine beauty. Solmi[12] cites the following sentence
 from Leonardo showing his frigidity: "The act of procreation and
 everything that has any relation to it is so disgusting that human
 beings would soon die out if it were not a traditional custom and if
 there were no pretty faces and sensuous dispositions." His posthumous
 works which not only treat of the greatest scientific problems but also
 comprise the most guileless objects which to us do not seem worthy of so
 great a mind (an allegorical natural history, animal fables, witticisms,
 prophecies),[13] are chaste to a degree--one might say abstinent--that
 in a work of _belle lettres_ would excite wonder even to-day. They evade
 everything sexual so thoroughly, as if Eros alone who preserves
 everything living was no worthy material for the scientific impulse of
 the investigator.[14] It is known how frequently great artists found
 pleasure in giving vent to their phantasies in erotic and even grossly
 obscene representations; in contradistinction to this Leonardo left only
 some anatomical drawings of the woman's internal genitals, the position
 of the child in the womb, etc.
 
 It is doubtful whether Leonardo ever embraced a woman in love, nor is it
 known that he ever entertained an intimate spiritual relation with a
 woman as in the case of Michelangelo and Vittoria Colonna. While he
 still lived as an apprentice in the house of his master Verrocchio, he
 with other young men were accused of forbidden homosexual relations
 which ended in his acquittal. It seems that he came into this suspicion
 because he employed as a model a boy of evil repute.[15] When he was a
 master he surrounded himself with handsome boys and youths whom he took
 as pupils. The last of these pupils Francesco Melzi, accompanied him to
 France, remained with him until his death, and was named by him as his
 heir. Without sharing the certainty of his modern biographers, who
 naturally reject the possibility of a sexual relation between himself
 and his pupils as a baseless insult to this great man, it may be thought
 by far more probable that the affectionate relationships of Leonardo to
 the young men did not result in sexual activity. Nor should one
 attribute to him a high measure of sexual activity.
 
 The peculiarity of this emotional and sexual life viewed in connection
 with Leonardo's double nature as an artist and investigator can be
 grasped only in one way. Of the biographers to whom psychological
 viewpoints are often very foreign, only one, Edm. Solmi, has to my
 knowledge approached the solution of the riddle. But a writer, Dimitri
 Sergewitsch Merejkowski, who selected Leonardo as the hero of a great
 historical novel has based his delineation on such an understanding of
 this unusual man, and if not in dry words he gave unmistakable
 utterance in plastic expression in the manner of a poet.[16] Solmi
 judges Leonardo as follows: "But the unrequited desire to understand
 everything surrounding him, and with cold reflection to discover the
 deepest secret of everything that is perfect, has condemned Leonardo's
 works to remain forever unfinished."[17] In an essay of the Conferenze
 Fiorentine the utterances of Leonardo are cited, which show his
 confession of faith and furnish the key to his character.
 
     "_Nessuna cosa si pu amare n odiare, se_
      _prima no si ha cognition di quella._"[18]
 
 That is: One has no right to love or to hate anything if one has not
 acquired a thorough knowledge of its nature. And the same is repeated by
 Leonardo in a passage of the Treaties on the Art of Painting where he
 seems to defend himself against the accusation of irreligiousness:
 
 "But such censurers might better remain silent. For that action is the
 manner of showing the workmaster so many wonderful things, and this is
 the way to love so great a discoverer. For, verily great love springs
 from great knowledge of the beloved object, and if you little know it
 you will be able to love it only little or not at all."[19]
 
 The value of these utterances of Leonardo cannot be found in that they
 impart to us an important psychological fact, for what they maintain is
 obviously false, and Leonardo must have known this as well as we do. It
 is not true that people refrain from loving or hating until they have
 studied and became familiar with the nature of the object to whom they
 wish to give these affects, on the contrary they love impulsively and
 are guided by emotional motives which have nothing to do with cognition
 and whose affects are weakened, if anything, by thought and reflection.
 Leonardo only could have implied that the love practiced by people is
 not of the proper and unobjectionable kind, one should so love as to
 hold back the affect and to subject it to mental elaboration, and only
 after it has stood the test of the intellect should free play be given
 to it. And we thereby understand that he wishes to tell us that this was
 the case with himself and that it would be worth the effort of everybody
 else to treat love and hatred as he himself does.
 
 And it seems that in his case it was really so. His affects were
 controlled and subjected to the investigation impulse, he neither loved
 nor hated, but questioned himself whence does that arise, which he was
 to love or hate, and what does it signify, and thus he was at first
 forced to appear indifferent to good and evil, to beauty and ugliness.
 During this work of investigation love and hatred threw off their
 designs and uniformly changed into intellectual interest. As a matter of
 fact Leonardo was not dispassionate, he did not lack the divine spark
 which is the mediate or immediate motive power--_il primo motore_--of
 all human activity. He only transmuted his passion into
 inquisitiveness. He then applied himself to study with that
 persistence, steadiness, and profundity which comes from passion, and on
 the height of the psychic work, after the cognition was won, he allowed
 the long checked affect to break loose and to flow off freely like a
 branch of a stream, after it has accomplished its work. At the height of
 his cognition when he could examine a big part of the whole he was
 seized with a feeling of pathos, and in ecstatic words he praised the
 grandeur of that part of creation which he studied, or--in religious
 cloak--the greatness of the creator. Solmi has correctly divined this
 process of transformation in Leonardo. According to the quotation of
 such a passage, in which Leonardo celebrated the higher impulse of
 nature ("O mirabile necessita ... ") he said: "Tale trasfigurazione
 della scienza della natura in emozione, quasi direi, religiosa,  uno
 dei tratti caratteristici de manoscritti vinciani, e si trova cento e
 cento volte espressa...."[20]
 
 Leonardo was called the Italian Faust on account of his insatiable and
 indefatigable desire for investigation. But even if we disregard the
 fact that it is the possible retransformation of the desire for
 investigation into the joys of life which is presupposed in the Faust
 tragedy, one might venture to remark that Leonardo's system recalls
 Spinoza's mode of thinking.
 
 The transformation of psychic motive power into the different forms of
 activity is perhaps as little convertible without loss, as in the case
 of physical powers. Leonardo's example teaches how many other things one
 must follow up in these processes. Not to love before one gains full
 knowledge of the thing loved presupposes a delay which is harmful. When
 one finally reaches cognition he neither loves nor hates properly; one
 remains beyond love and hatred. One has investigated instead of having
 loved. It is perhaps for this reason that Leonardo's life was so much
 poorer in love than those of other great men and great artists. The
 storming passions of the soul-stirring and consuming kind, in which
 others experience the best part of their lives, seem to have missed
 him.
 
 There are still other consequences when one follows Leonardo's dictum.
 Instead of acting and producing one just investigates. He who begins to
 divine the grandeur of the universe and its needs readily forgets his
 own insignificant self. When one is struck with admiration and becomes
 truly humble he easily forgets that he himself is a part of that living
 force, and that according to the measure of his own personality he has
 the right to make an effort to change that destined course of the world,
 the world in which the insignificant is no less wonderful and important
 than the great.
 
 Solmi thinks that Leonardo's investigations started with his art,[21] he
 tried to investigate the attributes and laws of light, of color, of
 shades and of perspective so as to be sure of becoming a master in the
 imitation of nature and to be able to show the way to others. It is
 probable that already at that time he overestimated the value of this
 knowledge for the artist. Following the guide-rope of the painter's
 need, he was then driven further and further to investigate the objects
 of the art of painting, such as animals and plants, and the proportions
 of the human body, and to follow the path from their exterior to their
 interior structure and biological functions, which really also express
 themselves in their appearance and should be depicted in art. And
 finally he was pulled along by this overwhelming desire until the
 connection was torn from the demands of his art, so that he discovered
 the general laws of mechanics and divined the history of the
 stratification and fossilization of the Arno-valley, until he could
 enter in his book with capital letters the cognition: _Il sole non si
 move_ (The sun does not move). His investigations were thus extended
 over almost all realms of natural science, in every one of which he was
 a discoverer or at least a prophet or forerunner.[22] However, his
 curiosity continued to be directed to the outer world, something kept
 him away from the investigation of the psychic life of men; there was
 little room for psychology in the "Academia Vinciana," for which he drew
 very artistic and very complicated emblems.
 
 When he later made the effort to return from his investigations to the
 art from which he started he felt that he was disturbed by the new paths
 of his interest and by the changed nature of his psychic work. In the
 picture he was interested above all in a problem, and behind this one he
 saw emerging numerous other problems just as he was accustomed in the
 endless and indeterminable investigations of natural history. He was no
 longer able to limit his demands, to isolate the work of art, and to
 tear it out from that great connection of which he knew it formed part.
 After the most exhausting efforts to bring to expression all that was in
 him, all that was connected with it in his thoughts, he was forced to
 leave it unfinished, or to declare it incomplete.
 
 The artist had once taken into his service the investigator to assist
 him, now the servant was stronger and suppressed his master.
 
 When we find in the portrait of a person one single impulse very
 forcibly developed, as curiosity in the case of Leonardo, we look for
 the explanation in a special constitution, concerning its probable
 organic determination hardly anything is known. Our psychoanalytic
 studies of nervous people lead us to look for two other expectations
 which we would like to find verified in every case. We consider it
 probable that this very forcible impulse was already active in the
 earliest childhood of the person, and that its supreme sway was fixed by
 infantile impressions; and we further assume that originally it drew
 upon sexual motive powers for its renforcement so that it later can
 take the place of a part of the sexual life. Such person would then,
 e.g., investigate with that passionate devotion which another would give
 to his love, and he could investigate instead of loving. We would
 venture the conclusion of a sexual renforcement not only in the impulse
 to investigate, but also in most other cases of special intensity of an
 impulse.
 
 Observation of daily life shows us that most persons have the capacity
 to direct a very tangible part of their sexual motive powers to their
 professional or business activities. The sexual impulse is particularly
 suited to yield such contributions because it is endowed with the
 capacity of sublimation, i.e., it has the power to exchange its nearest
 aim for others of higher value which are not sexual. We consider this
 process as proved, if the history of childhood or the psychic
 developmental history of a person shows that in childhood this powerful
 impulse was in the service of the sexual interest. We consider it a
 further corroboration if this is substantiated by a striking stunting in
 the sexual life of mature years, as if a part of the sexual activity had
 now been replaced by the activity of the predominant impulse.
 
 The application of these assumptions to the case of the predominant
 investigation-impulse seems to be subject to special difficulties, as
 one is unwilling to admit that this serious impulse exists in children
 or that children show any noteworthy sexual interest. However, these
 difficulties are easily obviated. The untiring pleasure in questioning
 as seen in little children demonstrates their curiosity, which is
 puzzling to the grown-up, as long as he does not understand that all
 these questions are only circumlocutions, and that they cannot come to
 an end because they replace only one question which the child does not
 put. When the child becomes older and gains more understanding this
 manifestation of curiosity suddenly disappears. But psychoanalytic
 investigation gives us a full explanation in that it teaches us that
 many, perhaps most children, at least the most gifted ones, go through a
 period beginning with the third year, which may be designated as the
 period of _infantile sexual investigation_. As far as we know, the
 curiosity is not awakened spontaneously in children of this age, but is
 aroused through the impression of an important experience, through the
 birth of a little brother or sister, or through fear of the same
 endangered by some outward experience, wherein the child sees a danger
 to his egotistic interests. The investigation directs itself to the
 question whence children come, as if the child were looking for means
 to guard against such undesired event. We were astonished to find that
 the child refuses to give credence to the information imparted to it,
 e.g., it energetically rejects the mythological and so ingenious
 stork-fable, we were astonished to find that its psychic independence
 dates from this act of disbelief, that it often feels itself at serious
 variance with the grown-ups, and never forgives them for having been
 deceived of the truth on this occasion. It investigates in its own way,
 it divines that the child is in the mother's womb, and guided by the
 feelings of its own sexuality, it formulates for itself theories about
 the origin of children from food, about being born through the bowels,
 about the rle of the father which is difficult to fathom, and even at
 that time it has a vague conception of the sexual act which appears to
 the child as something hostile, as something violent. But as its own
 sexual constitution is not yet equal to the task of producing children,
 his investigation whence come children must also run aground and must be
 left in the lurch as unfinished. The impression of this failure at the
 first attempt of intellectual independence seems to be of a persevering
 and profoundly depressing nature.[23]
 
 If the period of infantile sexual investigation comes to an end through
 an impetus of energetic sexual repression, the early association with
 sexual interest may result in three different possibilities for the
 future fate of the investigation impulse. The investigation either
 shares the fate of the sexuality, the curiosity henceforth remains
 inhibited and the free activity of intelligence may become narrowed for
 life; this is especially made possible by the powerful religious
 inhibition of thought, which is brought about shortly hereafter through
 education. This is the type of neurotic inhibition. We know well that
 the so acquired mental weakness furnishes effective support for the
 outbreak of a neurotic disease. In a second type the intellectual
 development is sufficiently strong to withstand the sexual repression
 pulling at it. Sometimes after the disappearance of the infantile sexual
 investigation, it offers its support to the old association in order to
 elude the sexual repression, and the suppressed sexual investigation
 comes back from the unconscious as compulsive reasoning, it is naturally
 distorted and not free, but forceful enough to sexualize even thought
 itself and to accentuate the intellectual operations with the pleasure
 and fear of the actual sexual processes. Here the investigation becomes
 sexual activity and often exclusively so, the feeling of settling the
 problem and of explaining things in the mind is put in place of sexual
 gratification. But the indeterminate character of the infantile
 investigation repeats itself also in the fact that this reasoning never
 ends, and that the desired intellectual feeling of the solution
 constantly recedes into the distance. By virtue of a special disposition
 the third, which is the most rare and most perfect type, escapes the
 inhibition of thought and the compulsive reasoning. Also here sexual
 repression takes place, it is unable, however, to direct a partial
 impulse of the sexual pleasure into the unconscious, but the libido
 withdraws from the fate of the repression by being sublimated from the
 beginning into curiosity, and by renforcing the powerful investigation
 impulse. Here, too, the investigation becomes more or less compulsive
 and a substitute of the sexual activity, but owing to the absolute
 difference of the psychic process behind it (sublimation in place of the
 emergence from the unconscious) the character of the neurosis does not
 manifest itself, the subjection to the original complexes of the
 infantile sexual investigation disappears, and the impulse can freely
 put itself in the service of the intellectual interest. It takes account
 of the sexual repression which made it so strong in contributing to it
 sublimated libido, by avoiding all occupation with sexual themes.
 
 In mentioning the concurrence in Leonardo of the powerful investigation
 impulse with the stunting of his sexual life which was limited to the
 so-called ideal homosexuality, we feel inclined to consider him as a
 model example of our third type. The most essential point of his
 character and the secret of it seems to lie in the fact, that after
 utilizing the infantile activity of curiosity in the service of sexual
 interest he was able to sublimate the greater part of his libido into
 the impulse of investigation. But to be sure the proof of this
 conception is not easy to produce. To do this we would have to have an
 insight into the psychic development of his first childhood years, and
 it seems foolish to hope for such material when the reports concerning
 his life are so meager and so uncertain; and moreover, when we deal with
 information which even persons of our own generation withdraw from the
 attention of the observer.
 
 We know very little concerning Leonardo's youth. He was born in 1452 in
 the little city of Vinci between Florence and Empoli; he was an
 illegitimate child which was surely not considered a great popular stain
 in that time. His father was Ser Piero da Vinci, a notary and descendant
 of notaries and farmers, who took their name from the place Vinci; his
 mother, a certain Caterina, probably a peasant girl, who later married
 another native of Vinci. Nothing else about his mother appears in the
 life history of Leonardo, only the writer Merejkowski believed to have
 found some traces of her. The only definite information about Leonardo's
 childhood is furnished by a legal document from the year 1457, a
 register of assessment in which Vinci Leonardo is mentioned among the
 members of the family as a five-year-old illegitimate child of Ser
 Piero.[24] As the marriage of Ser Piero with Donna Albiera remained
 childless the little Leonardo could be brought up in his father's house.
 He did not leave this house until he entered as apprentice--it is not
 known what year--in the studio of Andrea del Verrocchio. In 1472
 Leonardo's name could already be found in the register of the members of
 the "Compagnia dei Pittori." That is all.
 
 
 
 
 II
 
 
 As far as I know Leonardo only once interspersed in his scientific
 descriptions a communication from his childhood. In a passage where he
 speaks about the flight of the vulture, he suddenly interrupts himself
 in order to follow up a memory from very early years which came to his
 mind.
 
 "_It seems that it had been destined before that I should occupy myself
 so thoroughly with the vulture, for it comes to my mind as a very early
 memory, when I was still in the cradle, a vulture came down to me, he
 opened my mouth with his tail and struck me a few times with his tail
 against my lips._"[25]
 
 We have here an infantile memory and to be sure of the strangest sort.
 It is strange on account of its content and account of the time of life
 in which it was fixed. That a person could retain a memory of the
 nursing period is perhaps not impossible, but it can in no way be taken
 as certain. But what this memory of Leonardo states, namely, that a
 vulture opened the child's mouth with its tail, sounds so improbable, so
 fabulous, that another conception which puts an end to the two
 difficulties with one stroke appeals much more to our judgment. The
 scene of the vulture is not a memory of Leonardo, but a phantasy which
 he formed later, and transferred into his childhood. The childhood
 memories of persons often have no different origin, as a matter of fact,
 they are not fixated from an experience like the conscious memories from
 the time of maturity and then repeated, but they are not produced until
 a later period when childhood is already past, they are then changed and
 disguised and put in the service of later tendencies, so that in general
 they cannot be strictly differentiated from phantasies. Their nature
 will perhaps be best understood by recalling the manner in which history
 writing originated among ancient nations. As long as the nation was
 small and weak it gave no thought to the writing of its history, it
 tilled the soil of its land, defended its existence against its
 neighbors by seeking to wrest land from them and endeavored to become
 rich. It was a heroic but unhistoric time. Then came another age, a
 period of self-realization in which one felt rich and powerful, and it
 was then that one experienced the need to discover whence one originated
 and how one developed. The history-writing which then continues to
 register the present events throws also its backward glance to the past,
 it gathers traditions and legends, it interprets what survived from
 olden times into customs and uses, and thus creates a history of past
 ages. It is quite natural that this history of the past ages is more the
 expressions of opinions and desires of the present than a faithful
 picture of the past, for many a thing escaped the people's memory, other
 things became distorted, some trace of the past was misunderstood and
 interpreted in the sense of the present; and besides one does not write
 history through motives of objective curiosity, but because one desires
 to impress his contemporaries, to stimulate and extol them, or to hold
 the mirror before them. The conscious memory of a person concerning the
 experiences of his maturity may now be fully compared to that of history
 writing, and his infantile memories, as far as their origin and
 reliability are concerned will actually correspond to the history of the
 primitive period of a people which was compiled later with purposive
 intent.
 
 Now one may think that if Leonardo's story of the vulture which visited
 him in his cradle is only a phantasy of later birth, it is hardly worth
 while giving more time to it. One could easily explain it by his openly
 avowed inclination to occupy himself with the problem of the flight of
 the bird which would lend to this phantasy an air of predetermined fate.
 But with this depreciation one commits as great an injustice as if one
 would simply ignore the material of legends, traditions, and
 interpretations in the primitive history of a people. Notwithstanding
 all distortions and misunderstandings to the contrary they still
 represent the reality of the past; they represent what the people formed
 out of the experiences of its past age under the domination of once
 powerful and to-day still effective motives, and if these distortions
 could be unraveled through the knowledge of all effective forces, one
 would surely discover the historic truth under this legendary material.
 The same holds true for the infantile reminiscences or for the
 phantasies of individuals. What a person thinks he recalls from his
 childhood, is not of an indifferent nature. As a rule the memory
 remnants, which he himself does not understand, conceal invaluable
 evidences of the most important features of his psychic development. As
 the psychoanalytic technique affords us excellent means for bringing to
 light this concealed material, we shall venture the attempt to fill the
 gaps in the history of Leonardo's life through the analysis of his
 infantile phantasy. And if we should not attain a satisfactory degree of
 certainty, we will have to console ourselves with the fact that so many
 other investigations about this great and mysterious man have met no
 better fate.
 
 When we examine Leonardo's vulture-phantasy with the eyes of a
 psychoanalyst then it does not seem strange very long; we recall that we
 have often found similar structures in dreams, so that we may venture
 to translate this phantasy from its strange language into words that are
 universally understood. The translation then follows an erotic
 direction. Tail, "coda," is one of the most familiar symbols, as well as
 a substitutive designation of the male member which is no less true in
 Italian than in other languages. The situation contained in the
 phantasy, that a vulture opened the mouth of the child and forcefully
 belabored it with its tail, corresponds to the idea of fellatio, a
 sexual act in which the member is placed into the mouth of the other
 person. Strangely enough this phantasy is altogether of a passive
 character; it resembles certain dreams and phantasies of women and of
 passive homosexuals who play the feminine part in sexual relations.
 
 Let the reader be patient for a while and not flare up with indignation
 and refuse to follow psychoanalysis because in its very first
 applications it leads to an unpardonable slander of the memory of a
 great and pure man. For it is quite certain that this indignation will
 never solve for us the meaning of Leonardo's childhood phantasy; on the
 other hand, Leonardo has unequivocally acknowledged this phantasy, and
 we shall therefore not relinquish the expectation--or if you prefer the
 preconception--that like every psychic production such as dreams,
 visions and deliria this phantasy, too, must have some meaning. Let us
 therefore lend our unprejudiced ears for a while to psychoanalytic work
 which after all has not yet uttered the last word.
 
 The desire to take the male member into the mouth and suck it, which is
 considered as one of the most disgusting of sexual perversions, is
 nevertheless a frequent occurrence among the women of our time--and as
 shown in old sculptures was the same in earlier times--and in the state
 of being in love seems to lose entirely its disgusting character. The
 physician encounters phantasies based on this desire, even in women who
 did not come to the knowledge of the possibility of such sexual
 gratification by reading V. Krafft-Ebing's Psychopathia Sexualis or
 through other information. It seems that it is quite easy for the women
 themselves to produce such wish-phantasies.[26] Investigation then
 teaches us that this situation, so forcibly condemned by custom, may be
 traced to the most harmless origin. It is nothing but the elaboration of
 another situation in which we all once felt comfort, namely, when we
 were in the suckling-age ("when I was still in the cradle") and took the
 nipple of our mother's or wet-nurse's breast into our mouth to suck it.
 The organic impression of this first pleasure in our lives surely
 remains indelibly impregnated; when the child later learns to know the
 udder of the cow, which in function is a breast-nipple, but in shape and
 in position on the abdomen resembles the penis, it obtains the primary
 basis for the later formation of that disgusting sexual phantasy.
 
 We now understand why Leonardo displaced the memory of the supposed
 experience with the vulture to his nursing period. This phantasy
 conceals nothing more or less than a reminiscence of nursing--or being
 nursed--at the mother's breast, a scene both human and beautiful, which
 he as well as other artists undertook to depict with the brush in the
 form of the mother of God and her child. At all events, we also wish to
 maintain, something we do not as yet understand, that this reminiscence,
 equally significant for both sexes, was elaborated in the man Leonardo
 into a passive homosexual phantasy. For the present we shall not take up
 the question as to what connection there is between homosexuality and
 suckling at the mother's breast, we merely wish to recall that tradition
 actually designates Leonardo as a person of homosexual feelings. In
 considering this, it makes no difference whether that accusation against
 the youth Leonardo was justified or not. It is not the real activity but
 the nature of the feeling which causes us to decide whether to attribute
 to some one the characteristic of homosexuality.
 
 Another incomprehensible feature of Leonardo's infantile phantasy next
 claims our interest. We interpret the phantasy of being wet-nursed by
 the mother and find that the mother is replaced by a vulture. Where does
 this vulture originate and how does he come into this place?
 
 A thought now obtrudes itself which seems so remote that one is tempted
 to ignore it. In the sacred hieroglyphics of the old Egyptians the
 mother is represented by the picture of the vulture.[27] These Egyptians
 also worshiped a motherly deity, whose head was vulture like, or who had
 many heads of which at least one or two was that of a vulture.[28] The
 name of this goddess was pronounced _Mut_; we may question whether the
 sound similarity to our word mother (Mutter) is only accidental? So the
 vulture really has some connection with the mother, but of what help is
 that to us? Have we a right to attribute this knowledge to Leonardo when
 Franois Champollion first succeeded in reading hieroglyphics between
 1790-1832?[29]
 
 It would also be interesting to discover in what way the old Egyptians
 came to choose the vulture as a symbol of motherhood. As a matter of
 fact the religion and culture of Egyptians were subjects of scientific
 interest even to the Greeks and Romans, and long before we ourselves
 were able to read the Egyptian monuments we had at our disposal some
 communications about them from preserved works of classical antiquity.
 Some of these writings belonged to familiar authors like Strabo,
 Plutarch, Aminianus Marcellus, and some bear unfamiliar names and are
 uncertain as to origin and time, like the hieroglyphica of Horapollo
 Nilus, and like the traditional book of oriental priestly wisdom bearing
 the godly name Hermes Trismegistos. From these sources we learn that the
 vulture was a symbol of motherhood because it was thought that this
 species of birds had only female vultures and no males.[30] The natural
 history of the ancients shows a counterpart to this limitation among the
 scarebus beetles which were revered by the Egyptians as godly, no
 females were supposed to exist.[31]
 
 But how does impregnation take place in vultures if only females exist?
 This is fully answered in a passage of Horapollo.[32] At a certain time
 these birds stop in the midst of their flight, open their vagina and are
 impregnated by the wind.
 
 Unexpectedly we have now reached a point where we can take something as
 quite probable which only shortly before we had to reject as absurd. It
 is quite possible that Leonardo was well acquainted with the scientific
 fable, according to which the Egyptians represented the idea of mother
 with the picture of the vulture. He was an omnivorous reader whose
 interest comprised all spheres of literature and knowledge. In the Codex
 Atlanticus we find an index of all books which he possessed at a certain
 time,[33] as well as numerous notices about other books which he
 borrowed from friends, and according to the excerpts which Fr.
 Richter[34] compiled from his drawings we can hardly overestimate the
 extent of his reading. Among these books there was no lack of older as
 well as contemporary works treating of natural history. All these books
 were already in print at that time, and it so happens that Milan was the
 principal place of the young art of book printing in Italy.
 
 When we proceed further we come upon a communication which may raise to
 a certainty the probability that Leonardo knew the vulture fable. The
 erudite editor and commentator of Horapollo remarked in connection with
 the text (p. 172) cited before: _Caeterum hanc fabulam de vulturibus
 cupide amplexi sunt Patres Ecclesiastici, ut ita argumento ex rerum
 natura petito refutarent eos, qui Virginis partum negabant; itaque apud
 omnes fere hujus rei mentio occurit._
 
 Hence the fable of the monosexuality and the conception of the vulture
 by no means remained as an indifferent anecdote as in the case of the
 analogous fable of the scarebus beetles; that church fathers mastered
 it in order to have it ready as an argument from natural history against
 those who doubted the sacred history. If according the best information
 from antiquity the vultures were directed to let themselves be
 impregnated by the wind, why should the same thing not have happened
 even once in a human female? On account of this use the church fathers
 were "almost all" in the habit of relating this vulture fable, and now
 it can hardly remain doubtful that it also became known to Leonardo
 through so powerful a source.
 
 The origin of Leonardo's vulture phantasy can be conceived in the
 following manner: While reading in the writings of a church father or in
 a book on natural science that the vultures are all females and that
 they know to procreate without the coperation of a male, a memory
 emerged in him which became transformed into that phantasy, but which
 meant to say that he also had been such a vulture child, which had a
 mother but no father. An echo of pleasure which he experienced at his
 mother's breast was added to this in the manner as so old impressions
 alone can manifest themselves. The allusion to the idea of the holy
 virgin with the child, formed by the authors, which is so dear to every
 artist, must have contributed to it to make this phantasy seem to him
 valuable and important. For this helped him to identify himself with the
 Christ child, the comforter and savior of not alone this one woman.
 
 When we break up an infantile phantasy we strive to separate the real
 memory content from the later motives which modify and distort the same.
 In the case of Leonardo we now think that we know the real content of
 the phantasy. The replacement of the mother by the vulture indicates
 that the child missed the father and felt himself alone with his mother.
 The fact of Leonardo's illegitimate birth fits in with his vulture
 phantasy; only on account of it was he able to compare himself with a
 vulture child. But we have discovered as the next definite fact from his
 youth that at the age of five years he had already been received in his
 father's home; when this took place, whether a few months following his
 birth, or a few weeks before the taking of the assessment of taxes, is
 entirely unknown to us. The interpretation of the vulture phantasy then
 steps in and wants to tell us that Leonardo did not spend the first
 decisive years of his life with his father and his step-mother but with
 his poor, forsaken, real mother, so that he had time to miss his father.
 This still seems to be a rather meager and rather daring result of the
 psychoanalytic effort, but on further reflection it will gain in
 significance. Certainty will be promoted by mentioning the actual
 relations in Leonardo's childhood. According to the reports, his father
 Ser Piero da Vinci married the prominent Donna Albiera during the year
 of Leonardo's birth; it was to the childlessness of this marriage that
 the boy owed his legalized reception into his father's or rather
 grandfather's house during his fifth year. However, it is not customary
 to offer an illegitimate offspring to a young woman's care at the
 beginning of marriage when she is still expecting to be blessed with
 children. Years of disappointment must have elapsed before it was
 decided to adopt the probably handsomely developed illegitimate child as
 a compensation for legitimate children who were vainly hoped for. It
 harmonizes best with the interpretation of the vulture-phantasy, if at
 least three years or perhaps five years of Leonardo's life had elapsed
 before he changed from his lonely mother to his father's home. But then
 it had already become too late. In the first three or four years of life
 impressions are fixed and modes of reactions are formed towards the
 outer world which can never be robbed of their importance by any later
 experiences.
 
 If it is true that the incomprehensible childhood reminiscences and the
 person's phantasies based on them always bring out the most significant
 of his psychic development, then the fact corroborated by the vulture
 phantasy, that Leonardo passed the first years of his life alone with
 his mother must have been a most decisive influence on the formation of
 his inner life. Under the effect of this constellation it could not have
 been otherwise than that the child which in his young life encountered
 one problem more than other children, should have begun to ponder very
 passionately over this riddle and thus should have become an
 investigator early in life. For he was tortured by the great questions
 where do children come from and what has the father to do with their
 origin. The vague knowledge of this connection between his investigation
 and his childhood history has later drawn from him the exclamation that
 it was destined that he should deeply occupy himself with the problem of
 the bird's flight, for already in his cradle he had been visited by a
 vulture. To trace the curiosity which is directed to the flight of the
 bird to the infantile sexual investigation will be a later task which
 will not be difficult to accomplish.
 
 
 
 
 III
 
 
 The element of the vulture represents to us the real memory content in
 Leonardo's childhood phantasy; the association into which Leonardo
 himself placed his phantasy threw a bright light on the importance of
 this content for his later life. In continuing the work of
 interpretation we now encounter the strange problem why this memory
 content was elaborated into a homosexual situation. The mother who
 nursed the child, or rather from whom the child suckled was transformed
 into a vulture which stuck its tail into the child's mouth. We maintain
 that the "coda" (tail) of the vulture, following the common substituting
 usages of language, cannot signify anything else but a male genital or
 penis. But we do not understand how the phantastic activity came to
 furnish precisely this maternal bird with the mark of masculinity, and
 in view of this absurdity we become confused at the possibility of
 reducing this phantastic structure to rational sense.
 
 However, we must not despair. How many seemingly absurd dreams have we
 not forced to give up their sense! Why should it become more difficult
 to accomplish this in a childhood phantasy than in a dream!
 
 Let us remember the fact that it is not good to find one isolated
 peculiarity, and let us hasten to add another to it which is still more
 striking.
 
 The vulture-headed goddess _Mut_ of the Egyptians, a figure of
 altogether impersonal character, as expressed by Drexel in Roscher's
 lexicon, was often fused with other maternal deities of living
 individuality like Isis and Hathor, but she retained besides her
 separate existence and reverence. It was especially characteristic of
 the Egyptian pantheon that the individual gods did not perish in this
 amalgamation. Besides the composition of deities the simple divine image
 remained in her independence. In most representations the vulture-headed
 maternal deity was formed by the Egyptians in a phallic manner,[35] her
 body which was distinguished as feminine by its breasts also bore the
 masculine member in a state of erection.
 
 The goddess Mut thus evinced the same union of maternal and paternal
 characteristics as in Leonardo's vulture phantasy. Should we explain
 this concurrence by the assumption that Leonardo knew from studying his
 book the androgynous nature of the maternal vulture? Such possibility is
 more than questionable; it seems that the sources accessible to him
 contained nothing of remarkable determination. It is more likely that
 here as there the agreement is to be traced to a common, effective and
 unknown motive.
 
 Mythology can teach us that the androgynous formation, the union of
 masculine and feminine sex characteristics, did not belong to the
 goddess Mut alone but also to other deities such as Isis and Hathor, but
 in the latter perhaps only insofar as they possessed also a motherly
 nature and became fused with the goddess Mut.[36] It teaches us further
 that other Egyptian deities such as Neith of Sais out of whom the Greek
 Athene was later formed, were originally conceived as androgynous or
 dihermaphroditic, and that the same held true for many of the Greek
 gods, especially of the Dionysian circle, as well as for Aphrodite who
 was later restricted to a feminine love deity. Mythology may also offer
 the explanation that the phallus which was added to the feminine body
 was meant to denote the creative primitive force of nature, and that all
 these hermaphroditic deistic formations express the idea that only a
 union of the masculine and feminine elements can result in a worthy
 representation of divine perfection. But none of these observations
 explain the psychological riddle, namely, that the phantasy of men takes
 no offense at the fact that a figure which was to embody the essence of
 the mother should be provided with the mark of the masculine power which
 is the opposite of motherhood.
 
 The explanation comes from the infantile sexual theories. There really
 was a time in which the male genital was found to be compatible with
 the representation of the mother. When the male child first directs his
 curiosity to the riddle of the sexual life, he is dominated by the
 interest for his own genitals. He finds this part of the body too
 valuable and too important to believe that it would be missing in other
 persons to whom he feels such a resemblance. As he cannot divine that
 there is still another equally valuable type of genital formation he
 must grasp the assumption that all persons, also women, possess such a
 member as he. This preconception is so firm in the youthful investigator
 that it is not destroyed even by the first observation of the genitals
 in little girls. His perception naturally tells him that there is
 something different here than in him, but he is unable to admit to
 himself as the content of this perception that he cannot find this
 member in girls. That this member may be missing is to him a dismal and
 unbearable thought, and he therefore seeks to reconcile it by deciding
 that it also exists in girls but it is still very small and that it will
 grow later.[37] If this expectation does not appear to be fulfilled on
 later observation he has at his disposal another way of escape. The
 member also existed in the little girl but it was cut off and on its
 place there remained a wound. This progress of the theory already makes
 use of his own painful experience; he was threatened in the meantime
 that this important organ will be taken away from him if it will form
 too much of an interest for his occupation. Under the influence of this
 threat of castration he now interprets his conception of the female
 genital, henceforth he will tremble for his masculinity, but at the same
 time he will look with contempt upon those unhappy creatures upon whom,
 in his opinion, this cruel punishment had already been visited.
 
 Before the child came under the domination of the castration complex, at
 the time when he still held the woman at her full value, he began to
 manifest an intensive desire to look as an erotic activity of his
 impulse. He wished to see the genitals of other persons, originally
 probably because he wished to compare them with his own. The erotic
 attraction which emanated from the person of his mother soon reached
 its height in the longing to see her genital which he believed to be a
 penis. With the cognition acquired only later that the woman has no
 penis, this longing often becomes transformed into its opposite and
 gives place to disgust, which in the years of puberty may become the
 cause of psychic impotence, of misogyny and of lasting homosexuality.
 But the fixation on the once so vividly desired object, the penis of the
 woman, leaves ineradicable traces in the psychic life of the child,
 which has gone through that fragment of infantile sexual investigation
 with particular thoroughness. The fetich-like reverence for the feminine
 foot and shoe seems to take the foot only as a substitutive symbol for
 the once revered and since then missed member of the woman. The
 "braid-slashers" without knowing it play the part of persons who perform
 the act of castration on the female genital.
 
 One will not gain any correct understanding of the activities of the
 infantile sexuality and probably will consider these communications
 unworthy of belief, as long as one does not relinquish the attitude of
 our cultural depreciation of the genitals and of the sexual functions in
 general. To understand the infantile psychic life one has to look to
 analogies from primitive times. For a long series of generations we have
 been in the habit of considering the genitals or _pudenda_ as objects of
 shame, and in the case of more successful sexual repression as objects
 of disgust. The majority of those living to-day only reluctantly obey
 the laws of propagation, feeling thereby that their human dignity is
 being offended and degraded. What exists among us of the other
 conception of the sexual life is found only in the uncultivated and in
 the lower social strata; among the higher and more refined types it is
 concealed as culturally inferior, and its activity is ventured only
 under the embittered admonition of a guilty conscience. It was quite
 different in the primitive times of the human race. From the laborious
 collections of students of civilization one gains the conviction that
 the genitals were originally the pride and hope of living beings, they
 enjoyed divine worship, and the divine nature of their functions was
 transported to all newly acquired activities of mankind. Through
 sublimation of its essential elements there arose innumerable
 god-figures, and at the time when the relation of official religions
 with sexual activity was already hidden from the general consciousness,
 secret cults labored to preserve it alive among a number of the
 initiated. In the course of cultural development it finally happened
 that so much godliness and holiness had been extracted from sexuality
 that the exhausted remnant fell into contempt. But considering the
 indestructibility which is in the nature of all psychic impressions one
 need not wonder that even the most primitive forms of genital worship
 could be demonstrated until quite recent times, and that language,
 customs and superstitions of present day humanity contain the remnants
 of all phases of this course of development.[38]
 
 Important biological analogies have taught us that the psychic
 development of the individual is a short repetition of the course of
 development of the race, and we shall therefore not find improbable what
 the psychoanalytic investigation of the child's psyche asserts
 concerning the infantile estimation of the genitals. The infantile
 assumption of the maternal penis is thus the common source of origin for
 the androgynous formation of the maternal deities like the Egyptian
 goddess Mut and the vulture's "coda" (tail) in Leonardo's childhood
 phantasy. As a matter of fact, it is only through misunderstanding that
 these deistic representations are designated hermaphroditic in the
 medical sense of the word. In none of them is there a union of the true
 genitals of both sexes as they are united in some deformed beings to the
 disgust of every human eye; but besides the breast as a mark of
 motherhood there is also the male member, just as it existed in the
 first imagination of the child about his mother's body. Mythology has
 retained for the faithful this revered and very early fancied bodily
 formation of the mother. The prominence given to the vulture-tail in
 Leonardo's phantasy we can now translate as follows: At that time when I
 directed my tender curiosity to my mother I still adjudged to her a
 genital like my own. A further testimonial of Leonardo's precocious
 sexual investigation, which in our opinion became decisive for his
 entire life.
 
 A brief reflection now admonishes us that we should not be satisfied
 with the explanation of the vulture-tail in Leonardo's childhood
 phantasy. It seems as if it contained more than we as yet understand.
 For its more striking feature really consisted in the fact that the
 nursing at the mother's breast was transformed into being nursed, that
 is into a passive act which thus gives the situation an undoubted
 homosexual character. Mindful of the historical probability that
 Leonardo behaved in life as a homosexual in feeling, the question
 obtrudes itself whether this phantasy does not point to a causal
 connection between Leonardo's childhood relations to his mother and the
 later manifest, if only ideal, homosexuality. We would not venture to
 draw such conclusion from Leonardo's disfigured reminiscence were it not
 for the fact that we know from our psychoanalytic investigation of
 homosexual patients that such a relation exists, indeed it really is an
 intimate and necessary relation.
 
 Homosexual men who have started in our times an energetic action against
 the legal limitations of their sexual activity are fond of representing
 themselves through theoretical spokesmen as evincing a sexual variation,
 which may be distinguished from the very beginning, as an intermediate
 stage of sex or as "a third sex." In other words, they maintain that
 they are men who are forced by organic determinants originating in the
 germ to find that pleasure in the man which they cannot feel in the
 woman. As much as one would wish to subscribe to their demands out of
 humane considerations, one must nevertheless exercise reserve regarding
 their theories which were formulated without regard for the psychic
 genesis of homosexuality. Psychoanalysis offers the means to fill this
 gap and to put to test the assertions of the homosexuals. It is true
 that psychoanalysis fulfilled this task in only a small number of
 people, but all investigation thus far undertaken brought the same
 surprising results.[39] In all our male homosexuals there was a very
 intensive erotic attachment to a feminine person, as a rule to the
 mother, which was manifest in the very first period of childhood and
 later entirely forgotten by the individual. This attachment was produced
 or favored by too much love from the mother herself, but was also
 furthered by the retirement or absence of the father during the
 childhood period. Sadger emphasizes the fact that the mothers of his
 homosexual patients were often man-women, or women with energetic traits
 of character who were able to crowd out the father from the place
 allotted to him in the family. I have sometimes observed the same thing,
 but I was more impressed by those cases in which the father was absent
 from the beginning or disappeared early so that the boy was altogether
 under feminine influence. It almost seems that the presence of a strong
 father would assure for the son the proper decision in the selection of
 his object from the opposite sex.
 
 Following this primary stage, a transformation takes place whose
 mechanisms we know but whose motive forces we have not yet grasped. The
 love of the mother cannot continue to develop consciously so that it
 merges into repression. The boy represses the love for the mother by
 putting himself in her place, by identifying himself with her, and by
 taking his own person as a model through the similarity of which he is
 guided in the selection of his love object. He thus becomes homosexual;
 as a matter of fact he returns to the stage of autoerotism, for the boys
 whom the growing adult now loves are only substitutive persons or
 revivals of his own childish person, whom he loves in the same way as
 his mother loved him. We say that he finds his love object on the road
 to narcism, for the Greek legend called a boy Narcissus to whom nothing
 was more pleasing than his own mirrored image, and who became
 transformed into a beautiful flower of this name.
 
 Deeper psychological discussions justify the assertion that the person
 who becomes homosexual in this manner remains fixed in his unconscious
 on the memory picture or his mother, By repressing the love for his
 mother he conserves the same in his unconscious and henceforth remains
 faithful to her. When as a lover he seems to pursue boys, he really thus
 runs away from women who could cause him to become faithless to his
 mother. Through direct observation of individual cases we could
 demonstrate that he who is seemingly receptive only of masculine stimuli
 is in reality influenced by the charms emanating from women just like a
 normal person, but each and every time he hastens to transfer the
 stimulus he received from the woman to a male object and in this manner
 he repeats again and again the mechanism through which he acquired his
 homosexuality.
 
 It is far from us to exaggerate the importance of these explanations
 concerning the psychic genesis of homosexuality. It is quite clear that
 they are in crass opposition to the official theories of the homosexual
 spokesmen, but we are aware that these explanations are not sufficiently
 comprehensive to render possible a final explanation of the problem.
 What one calls homosexual for practical purposes may have its origin in
 a variety of psychosexual inhibiting processes, and the process
 recognized by us is perhaps only one among many, and has reference only
 to one type of "homosexuality." We must also admit, that the number of
 cases in our homosexual type which shows the conditions required by us,
 exceeds by far those cases in which the resulting effect really appears,
 so that even we cannot reject the supposed coperation of unknown
 constitutional factors from which one was otherwise wont to deduce the
 whole of homosexuality. As a matter of fact there would be no occasion
 for entering into the psychic genesis of the form of homosexuality
 studied by us if there were not a strong presumption that Leonardo, from
 whose vulture-phantasy we started, really belonged to this one type of
 homosexuality.
 
 As little as is known concerning the sexual behavior of the great artist
 and investigator, we must still trust to the probability that the
 testimonies of his contemporaries did not go far astray. In the light of
 this tradition he appears to us as a man whose sexual need and activity
 were extraordinarily low, as if a higher striving had raised him above
 the common animal need of mankind. It may be open to doubt whether he
 ever sought direct sexual gratification, and in what manner, or whether
 he could dispense with it altogether. We are justified, however, to look
 also in him for those emotional streams which imperatively force others
 to the sexual act, for we cannot imagine a human psychic life in whose
 development the sexual desire in the broadest sense, the libido, has not
 had its share, whether the latter has withdrawn itself far from the
 original aim or whether it was detained from being put into execution.
 
 Anything but traces of unchanged sexual desire we need not expect in
 Leonardo. These point however to one direction and allow us to count him
 among homosexuals. It has always been emphasized that he took as his
 pupils only strikingly handsome boys and youths. He was kind and
 considerate towards them, he cared for them and nursed them himself when
 they were ill, just like a mother nurses her children, as his own mother
 might have cared for him. As he selected them on account of their
 beauty rather than their talent, none of them--Cesare da Sesto, G.
 Boltraffio, Andrea Salaino, Francesco Melzi and the others--ever became
 a prominent artist. Most of them could not make themselves independent
 of their master and disappeared after his death without leaving a more
 definite physiognomy to the history of art. The others who by their
 productions earned the right to call themselves his pupils, as Luini and
 Bazzi, nicknamed Sodoma, he probably did not know personally.
 
 We realize that we will have to face the objection that Leonardo's
 behavior towards his pupils surely had nothing to do with sexual
 motives, and permits no conclusion as to his sexual peculiarity. Against
 this we wish to assert with all caution that our conception explains
 some strange features in the master's behavior which otherwise would
 have remained enigmatical. Leonardo kept a diary; he made entries in his
 small hand, written from right to left which were meant only for
 himself. It is to be noted that in this diary he addressed himself with
 "thou": "Learn from master Lucca the multiplication of roots."[40] "Let
 master d'Abacco show thee the square of the circle."[41] Or on the
 occasion of a journey he entered in his diary:
 
 "I am going to Milan to look after the affairs of my garden ... order
 two pack-sacks to be made. Ask Boltraffio to show thee his turning-lathe
 and let him polish a stone on it.--Leave the book to master Andrea il
 Todesco."[42] Or he wrote a resolution of quite different significance:
 "Thou must show in thy treatise that the earth is a star, like the moon
 or resembling it, and thus prove the nobility of our world."[43]
 
 In this diary, which like the diaries of other mortals often skim over
 the most important events of the day with only few words or ignore them
 altogether, one finds a few entries which on account of their
 peculiarity are cited by all of Leonardo's biographers. They show
 notations referring to the master's petty expenses, which are recorded
 with painful exactitude as if coming from a pedantic and strictly
 parsimonious family father, while there is nothing to show that he spent
 greater sums, or that the artist was well versed in household
 management. One of these notes refers to a new cloak which he bought for
 his pupil Andrea Salaino:[44]
 
     Silver brocade              Lira 15 Soldi 4
     Crimson velvet for trimming   "   9  "    0
     Braid                         "   0  "    9
     Buttons                       "   0  "   12
 
 Another very detailed notice gives all the expenses which he incurred
 through the bad qualities and the thieving tendencies of another pupil
 or model: "On 21st day of April, 1490, I started this book and started
 again the horse.[45] Jacomo came to me on Magdalene day, 1490, at the
 age of ten years (marginal note: thievish, mendacious, willful,
 gluttonous). On the second day I ordered for him two shirts, a pair of
 pants, and a jacket, and as I put the money away to pay for the things
 named he stole the money from my purse, and it was never possible to
 make him confess, although I was absolutely sure of it (marginal note: 4
 Lira ...)." So the report continues concerning the misdeeds of the
 little boy and concludes with the expense account: "In the first year, a
 cloak, Lira 2: 6 shirts, Lira 4: 3 jackets, Lira 6: 4 pair of socks,
 Lira 7, etc."[46]
 
 Leonardo's biographers, to whom nothing was further than to solve the
 riddle in the psychic life of their hero from these slight weaknesses
 and peculiarities, were wont to remark in connection with these peculiar
 accounts that they emphasized the kindness and consideration of the
 master for his pupils. They forget thereby that it is not Leonardo's
 behavior that needs an explanation, but the fact that he left us these
 testimonies of it. As it is impossible to ascribe to him the motive of
 smuggling into our hands proofs of his kindness, we must assume that
 another affective motive caused him to write this down. It is not easy
 to conjecture what this motive was, and we could not give any if not
 for another account found among Leonardo's papers which throws a
 brilliant light on these peculiarly petty notices about his pupils'
 clothes, and others of a kind:[47]
 
     Burial expenses following the death of Caterina    27 florins
       2 pounds wax                                     18  "
       Cataphalc                                        12  "
       For the transportation and erection of the cross  4  "
       Pall bearers                                      8  "
       To 4 priests and 4 clerics                       20  "
       Ringing of bells                                  2  "
       To grave diggers                                 16  "
       For the approval--to the officials                1  "
                                                      ------------
                  To sum up                            108 florins
 
     Previous expenses:
       To the doctor           4 florins
       For sugar and candles  12   "
                                                        16 florins
                                                      ------------
                     Sum total                         124 florins
 
 The writer Merejkowski is the only one who can tell us who this Caterina
 was. From two different short notices he concludes that she was the
 mother of Leonardo, the poor peasant woman from Vinci, who came to Milan
 in 1493 to visit her son then 41 years old. While on this visit she fell
 ill and was taken to the hospital by Leonardo, and following her death
 she was buried by her son with such sumptuous funeral.[48]
 
 This deduction of the psychological writer of romances is not capable of
 proof, but it can lay claim to so many inner probabilities, it agrees so
 well with everything we know besides about Leonardo's emotional activity
 that I cannot refrain from accepting it as correct. Leonardo succeeded
 in forcing his feelings under the yoke of investigation and in
 inhibiting their free utterance, but even in him there were episodes in
 which the suppression obtained expression, and one of these was the
 death of his mother whom he once loved so ardently. Through this account
 of the burial expenses he represents to us the mourning of his mother in
 an almost unrecognizable distortion. We wonder how such a distortion
 could have come about, and we certainly cannot grasp it when viewed
 under normal mental processes. But similar mechanisms are familiar to us
 under the abnormal conditions of neuroses, and especially in the
 so-called _compulsion neurosis_. Here one can observe how the
 expressions of more intensive feelings have been displaced to trivial
 and even foolish performances. The opposing forces succeeded in debasing
 the expression of these repressed feelings to such an extent that one is
 forced to estimate the intensity of these feelings as extremely
 unimportant, but the imperative compulsion with which these
 insignificant acts express themselves betrays the real force of the
 feelings which are rooted in the unconscious, which consciousness would
 wish to disavow. Only by bearing in mind the mechanisms of compulsion
 neurosis can one explain Leonardo's account of the funeral expenses of
 his mother. In his unconscious he was still tied to her as in childhood,
 by erotically tinged feelings; the opposition of the repression of this
 childhood love which appeared later stood in the way of erecting to her
 in his diary a different and more dignified monument, but what resulted
 as a compromise of this neurotic conflict had to be put in operation and
 hence the account was entered in the diary which thus came to the
 knowledge of posterity as something incomprehensible.
 
 It is not venturing far to transfer the interpretation obtained from the
 funeral expenses to the accounts dealing with his pupils. Accordingly we
 would say that here also we deal with a case in which Leonardo's meager
 remnants of libidinous feelings compulsively obtained a distorted
 expression. The mother and the pupils, the very images of his own boyish
 beauty, would be his sexual objects--as far as his sexual repression
 dominating his nature would allow such manifestations--and the
 compulsion to note with painful circumstantiality his expenses on their
 behalf, would designate the strange betrayal of his rudimentary
 conflicts. From this we would conclude that Leonardo's love-life really
 belonged to that type of homosexuality, the psychic development of which
 we were able to disclose, and the appearance of the homosexual situation
 in his vulture-phantasy would become comprehensible to us, for it states
 nothing more or less than what we have asserted before concerning that
 type. It requires the following interpretation: Through the erotic
 relations to my mother I became a homosexual.[49]
 
 
 
 
 IV
 
 
 The vulture phantasy of Leonardo still absorbs our interest. In words
 which only too plainly recall a sexual act ("and has many times struck
 against my lips with his tail"), Leonardo emphasizes the intensity of
 the erotic relations between the mother and the child. A second memory
 content of the phantasy can readily be conjectured from the association
 of the activity of the mother (of the vulture) with the accentuation of
 the mouth zone. We can translate it as follows: My mother has pressed on
 my mouth innumerable passionate kisses. The phantasy is composed of the
 memories of being nursed and of being kissed by the mother.
 
 [Illustration: MONA LISA]
 
 A kindly nature has bestowed upon the artist the capacity to express in
 artistic productions his most secret psychic feelings hidden even to
 himself, which powerfully affect outsiders who are strangers to the
 artist without their being able to state whence this emotivity comes.
 Should there be no evidence in Leonardo's work of that which his memory
 retained as the strongest impression of his childhood? One would have to
 expect it. However, when one considers what profound transformations an
 impression of an artist has to experience before it can add its
 contribution to the work of art, one is obliged to moderate considerably
 his expectation of demonstrating something definite. This is especially
 true in the case of Leonardo.
 
 He who thinks of Leonardo's paintings will be reminded by the remarkably
 fascinating and puzzling smile which he enchanted on the lips of all his
 feminine figures. It is a fixed smile on elongated, sinuous lips which
 is considered characteristic of him and is preferentially designated as
 "Leonardesque." In the singular and beautiful visage of the Florentine
 Monna Lisa del Giocondo it has produced the greatest effect on the
 spectators and even perplexed them. This smile was in need of an
 interpretation, and received many of the most varied kind but none of
 them was considered satisfactory. As Gruyer puts it: "It is almost four
 centuries since Monna Lisa causes all those to lose their heads who have
 looked upon her for some time."[50]
 
 Muther states:[51] "What fascinates the spectator is the demoniacal
 charm of this smile. Hundreds of poets and writers have written about
 this woman, who now seems to smile upon us seductively and now to stare
 coldly and lifelessly into space, but nobody has solved the riddle of
 her smile, nobody has interpreted her thoughts. Everything, even the
 scenery is mysterious and dream-like, trembling as if in the sultriness
 of sensuality."
 
 The idea that two diverse elements were united in the smile of Monna
 Lisa has been felt by many critics. They therefore recognize in the play
 of features of the beautiful Florentine lady the most perfect
 representation of the contrasts dominating the love-life of the woman
 which is foreign to man, as that of reserve and seduction, and of most
 devoted tenderness and inconsiderateness in urgent and consuming
 sensuality. Mntz[52] expresses himself in this manner: "One knows what
 indecipherable and fascinating enigma Monna Lisa Gioconda has been
 putting for nearly four centuries to the admirers who crowd around her.
 No artist (I borrow the expression of the delicate writer who hides
 himself under the pseudonym of Pierre de Corlay) has ever translated in
 this manner the very essence of femininity: the tenderness and coquetry,
 the modesty and quiet voluptuousness, the whole mystery of the heart
 which holds itself aloof, of a brain which reflects, and of a
 personality who watches itself and yields nothing from herself except
 radiance...." The Italian Angelo Conti[53] saw the picture in the Louvre
 illumined by a ray of the sun and expressed himself as follows: "The
 woman smiled with a royal calmness, her instincts of conquest, of
 ferocity, the entire heredity of the species, the will of seduction and
 ensnaring, the charm of the deceiver, the kindness which conceals a
 cruel purpose, all that appears and disappears alternately behind the
 laughing veil and melts into the poem of her smile.... Good and evil,
 cruelty and compassion, graceful and cat-like, she laughed...."
 
 Leonardo painted this picture four years, perhaps from 1503 until 1507,
 during his second sojourn in Florence when he was about the age of fifty
 years. According to Vasari he applied the choicest artifices in order to
 divert the lady during the sittings and to hold that smile firmly on her
 features. Of all the gracefulness that his brush reproduced on the
 canvas at that time the picture preserves but very little in its present
 state. During its production it was considered the highest that art
 could accomplish; it is certain, however, that it did not satisfy
 Leonardo himself, that he pronounced it as unfinished and did not
 deliver it to the one who ordered it, but took it with him to France
 where his benefactor Francis I, acquired it for the Louvre.
 
 Let us leave the physiognomic riddle of Monna Lisa unsolved, and let us
 note the unequivocal fact that her smile fascinated the artist no less
 than all the spectators for these 400 years. This captivating smile had
 thereafter returned in all of his pictures and in those of his pupils.
 As Leonardo's Monna Lisa was a portrait we cannot assume that he has
 added to her face a trait of his own so difficult to express which she
 herself did not possess. It seems, we cannot help but believe, that he
 found this smile in his model and became so charmed by it that from now
 on he endowed it on all the free creations of his phantasy. This obvious
 conception is, e.g., expressed by A. Konstantinowa in the following
 manner:[54]
 
 "During the long period in which the master occupied himself with the
 portrait of Monna Lisa del Gioconda, he entered into the physiognomic
 delicacies of this feminine face with such sympathy of feeling that he
 transferred these creatures, especially the mysterious smile and the
 peculiar glance, to all faces which he later painted or drew. The mimic
 peculiarity of Gioconda can even be perceived in the picture of John the
 Baptist in the Louvre. But above all they are distinctly recognized in
 the features of Mary in the picture of St. Anne of the Louvre."
 
 But the case could have been different. The need for a deeper reason for
 the fascination which the smile of Gioconda exerted on the artist from
 which he could not rid himself has been felt by more than one of his
 biographers. W. Pater, who sees in the picture of Monna Lisa the
 embodiment of the entire erotic experience of modern man, and discourses
 so excellently on "that unfathomable smile always with a touch of
 something sinister in it, which plays over all Leonardo's work," leads
 us to another track when he says:[55]
 
 "Besides, the picture is a portrait. From childhood we see this image
 defining itself on the fabric of his dream; and but for express
 historical testimony, we might fancy that this was but his ideal lady,
 embodied and beheld at last."
 
 Herzfeld surely must have had something similar in mind when stating
 that in Monna Lisa Leonardo encountered himself and therefore found it
 possible to put so much of his own nature into the picture, "whose
 features from time immemorial have been imbedded with mysterious
 sympathy in Leonardo's soul."[56]
 
 Let us endeavor to clear up these intimations. It was quite possible
 that Leonardo was fascinated by the smile of Monna Lisa, because it had
 awakened something in him which had slumbered in his soul for a long
 time, in all probability an old memory. This memory was of sufficient
 importance to stick to him once it had been aroused; he was forced
 continually to provide it with new expression. The assurance of Pater
 that we can see an image like that of Monna Lisa defining itself from
 Leonardo's childhood on the fabric of his dreams, seems worthy of belief
 and deserves to be taken literally.
 
 Vasari mentions as Leonardo's first artistic endeavors, "heads of women
 who laugh."[57] The passage, which is beyond suspicion, as it is not
 meant to prove anything, reads more precisely as follows:[58] "He formed
 in his youth some laughing feminine heads out of lime, which have been
 reproduced in plaster, and some heads of children, which were as
 beautiful as if modeled by the hands of a master...."
 
 Thus we discover that his practice of art began with the representation
 of two kinds of objects, which would perforce remind us of the two kinds
 of sexual objects which we have inferred from the analysis of his
 vulture phantasy. If the beautiful children's heads were reproductions
 of his own childish person, then the laughing women were nothing else
 but reproductions of Caterina, his mother, and we are beginning to have
 an inkling of the possibility that his mother possessed that mysterious
 smile which he lost, and which fascinated him so much when he found it
 again in the Florentine lady.[59]
 
 [Illustration: SAINT ANNE]
 
 The painting of Leonardo which in point of time stands nearest to the
 Monna Lisa is the so-called Saint Anne of the Louvre, representing
 Saint Anne, Mary and the Christ child. It shows the Leonardesque smile
 most beautifully portrayed in the two feminine heads. It is impossible
 to find out how much earlier or later than the portrait of Monna Lisa
 Leonardo began to paint this picture. As both works extended over years,
 we may well assume that they occupied the master simultaneously. But it
 would best harmonize with our expectation if precisely the absorption in
 the features of Monna Lisa would have instigated Leonardo to form the
 composition of Saint Anne from his phantasy. For if the smile of
 Gioconda had conjured up in him the memory of his mother, we would
 naturally understand that he was first urged to produce a glorification
 of motherhood, and to give back to her the smile he found in that
 prominent lady. We may thus allow our interest to glide over from the
 portrait of Monna Lisa to this other hardly less beautiful picture, now
 also in the Louvre.
 
 Saint Anne with the daughter and grandchild is a subject seldom treated
 in the Italian art of painting; at all events Leonardo's representation
 differs widely from all that is otherwise known. Muther states:[60]
 
 "Some masters like Hans Fries, the older Holbein, and Girolamo dei
 Libri, made Anne sit near Mary and placed the child between the two.
 Others like Jakob Cornelicz in his Berlin pictures, represented Saint
 Anne as holding in her arm the small figure of Mary upon which sits the
 still smaller figure of the Christ child." In Leonardo's picture Mary
 sits on her mother's lap, bent forward and is stretching out both arms
 after the boy who plays with a little lamb, and must have slightly
 maltreated it. The grandmother has one of her unconcealed arms propped
 on her hip and looks down on both with a blissful smile. The grouping is
 certainly not quite unconstrained. But the smile which is playing on the
 lips of both women, although unmistakably the same as in the picture of
 Monna Lisa, has lost its sinister and mysterious character; it expresses
 a calm blissfulness.[61]
 
 On becoming somewhat engrossed in this picture it suddenly dawns upon
 the spectator that only Leonardo could have painted this picture, as
 only he could have formed the vulture phantasy. This picture contains
 the synthesis of the history of Leonardo's childhood, the details of
 which are explainable by the most intimate impressions of his life. In
 his father's home he found not only the kind step-mother Donna Albiera,
 but also the grandmother, his father's mother, Monna Lucia, who we will
 assume was not less tender to him than grandmothers are wont to be. This
 circumstance must have furnished him with the facts for the
 representation of a childhood guarded by a mother and grandmother.
 Another striking feature of the picture assumes still greater
 significance. Saint Anne, the mother of Mary and the grandmother of the
 boy who must have been a matron, is formed here perhaps somewhat more
 mature and more serious than Saint Mary, but still as a young woman of
 unfaded beauty. As a matter of fact Leonardo gave the boy two mothers,
 the one who stretched out her arms after him and another who is seen in
 the background, both are represented with the blissful smile of maternal
 happiness. This peculiarity of the picture has not failed to excite the
 wonder of the authors. Muther, for instance, believes that Leonardo
 could not bring himself to paint old age, folds and wrinkles, and
 therefore formed also Anne as a woman of radiant beauty. Whether one can
 be satisfied with this explanation is a question. Other writers have
 taken occasion to deny generally the sameness of age of mother and
 daughter.[62] However, Muther's tentative explanation is sufficient
 proof for the fact that the impression of Saint Anne's youthful
 appearance was furnished by the picture and is not an imagination
 produced by a tendency.
 
 Leonardo's childhood was precisely as remarkable as this picture. He has
 had two mothers, the first his true mother, Caterina, from whom he was
 torn away between the age of three and five years, and a young tender
 step-mother, Donna Albiera, his father's wife. By connecting this fact
 of his childhood with the one mentioned above and condensing them into a
 uniform fusion, the composition of Saint Anne, Mary and the Child,
 formed itself in him. The maternal form further away from the boy
 designated as grandmother, corresponds in appearance and in spatial
 relation to the boy, with the real first mother, Caterina. With the
 blissful smile of Saint Anne the artist actually disavowed and concealed
 the envy which the unfortunate mother felt when she was forced to give
 up her son to her more aristocratic rival, as once before her lover.
 
 Our feeling that the smile of Monna Lisa del Gioconda awakened in the
 man the memory of the mother of his first years of childhood would thus
 be confirmed from another work of Leonardo. Following the production of
 Monna Lisa, Italian artists depicted in Madonnas and prominent ladies
 the humble dipping of the head and the peculiar blissful smile of the
 poor peasant girl Caterina, who brought to the world the noble son who
 was destined to paint, investigate, and suffer.
 
 When Leonardo succeeded in reproducing in the face of Monna Lisa the
 double sense comprised in this smile, namely, the promise of unlimited
 tenderness, and sinister threat (in the words of Pater), he remained
 true even in this to the content of his earliest reminiscence. For the
 love of the mother became his destiny, it determined his fate and the
 privations which were in store for him. The impetuosity of the caressing
 to which the vulture phantasy points was only too natural. The poor
 forsaken mother had to give vent through mother's love to all her
 memories of love enjoyed as well as to all her yearnings for more
 affection; she was forced to it, not only in order to compensate herself
 for not having a husband, but also the child for not having a father who
 wanted to love it. In the manner of all ungratified mothers she thus
 took her little son in place of her husband, and robbed him of a part of
 his virility by the too early maturing of his eroticism. The love of the
 mother for the suckling whom she nourishes and cares for is something
 far deeper reaching than her later affection for the growing child. It
 is of the nature of a fully gratified love affair, which fulfills not
 only all the psychic wishes but also all physical needs, and when it
 represents one of the forms of happiness attainable by man it is due, in
 no little measure, to the possibility of gratifying without reproach
 also wish feelings which were long repressed and designated as
 perverse.[63] Even in the happiest recent marriage the father feels that
 his child, especially the little boy has become his rival, and this
 gives origin to an antagonism against the favorite one which is deeply
 rooted in the unconscious.
 
 When in the prime of his life Leonardo re-encountered that blissful and
 ecstatic smile as it had once encircled his mother's mouth in caressing,
 he had long been under the ban of an inhibition, forbidding him ever
 again to desire such tenderness from women's lips. But as he had become
 a painter he endeavored to reproduce this smile with his brush and
 furnish all his pictures with it, whether he executed them himself or
 whether they were done by his pupils under his direction, as in Leda,
 John, and Bacchus. The latter two are variations of the same type.
 Muther says: "From the locust eater of the Bible Leonardo made a
 Bacchus, an Apollo, who with a mysterious smile on his lips, and with
 his soft thighs crossed, looks on us with infatuated eyes." These
 pictures breathe a mysticism into the secret of which one dares not
 penetrate; at most one can make the effort to construct the connection
 to Leonardo's earlier productions. The figures are again androgynous but
 no longer in the sense of the vulture phantasy, they are pretty boys of
 feminine tenderness with feminine forms; they do not cast down their
 eyes but gaze mysteriously triumphant, as if they knew of a great happy
 issue concerning which one must remain quiet; the familiar fascinating
 smile leads us to infer that it is a love secret. It is possible that in
 these forms Leonardo disavowed and artistically conquered the
 unhappiness of his love life, in that he represented the wish
 fulfillment of the boy infatuated with his mother in such blissful union
 of the male and female nature.
 
 [Illustration: JOHN THE BAPTIST]
 
 
 
 
 V
 
 
 Among the entries in Leonardo's diaries there is one which absorbs the
 reader's attention through its important content and on account of a
 small formal error. In July, 1504, he wrote:
 
 "Adi 9 Luglio, 1504, mercoledi, a ore 7 mori Ser Piero da Vinci notalio
 al palazzo del Potest, mio padre, a ore 7. Era d'et d'anni 80, lasci
 10 figlioli maschi e 2 feminine."[64]
 
 The notice as we see deals with the death of Leonardo's father. The
 slight error in its form consists in the fact that in the computation of
 the time "at 7 o'clock" is repeated two times, as if Leonardo had
 forgotten at the end of the sentence that he had already written it at
 the beginning. It is only a triviality to which any one but a
 psychoanalyst would pay no attention. Perhaps he would not even notice
 it, or if his attention would be called to it he would say "that can
 happen to anybody during absent-mindedness or in an affective state and
 has no further meaning."
 
 The psychoanalyst thinks differently; to him nothing is too trifling as
 a manifestation of hidden psychic processes; he has long learned that
 such forgetting or repetition is full of meaning, and that one is
 indebted to the "absent-mindedness" when it makes possible the betrayal
 of otherwise concealed feelings.
 
 We would say that, like the funeral account of Caterina and the expense
 account of the pupils, this notice, too, corresponds to a case in which
 Leonardo was unsuccessful in suppressing his affects, and the long
 hidden feeling forcibly obtained a distorted expression. Also the form
 is similar, it shows the same pedantic precision, the same pushing
 forward of numbers.[65]
 
 We call such a repetition a perseveration. It is an excellent means to
 indicate the affective accentuation. One recalls for example Saint
 Peter's angry speech against his unworthy representative on earth, as
 given in Dante's Paradiso:[66]
 
     "Quegli ch'usurpa in terra il luoga mio
      Il luoga mio, il luogo mio, che vaca
      Nella presenza del Figliuol di Dio,
      Fatto ha del cimiterio mio cloaca."
 
 Without Leonardo's affective inhibition the entry into the diary could
 perhaps have read as follows: To-day at 7 o'clock died my father, Ser
 Piero da Vinci, my poor father! But the displacement of the
 perseveration to the most indifferent determination of the obituary to
 dying-hour robs the notice of all pathos and lets us recognize that
 there was something here to conceal and to suppress.
 
 Ser Piero da Vinci, notary and descendant of notaries, was a man of
 great energy who attained respect and affluence. He was married four
 times, the two first wives died childless, and not till the third
 marriage has he gotten the first legitimate son, in 1476, when Leonardo
 was 24 years old, and had long ago changed his father's home for the
 studio of his master Verrocchio. With the fourth and last wife whom he
 married when he was already in the fifties he begot nine sons and two
 daughters.[67]
 
 To be sure the father also assumed importance in Leonardo's psychosexual
 development, and what is more, it was not only in a negative sense,
 through his absence during the boy's first childhood years, but also
 directly through his presence in his later childhood. He who as a child
 desires his mother, cannot help wishing to put himself in his father's
 place, to identify himself with him in his phantasy and later make it
 his life's task to triumph over him. As Leonardo was not yet five years
 old when he was received into his paternal home, the young step-mother,
 Albiera, certainly must have taken the place of his mother in his
 feeling, and this brought him into that relation of rivalry to his
 father which may be designated as normal. As is known, the preference
 for homosexuality did not manifest itself till near the years of
 puberty. When Leonardo accepted this preference the identification with
 the father lost all significance for his sexual life, but continued in
 other spheres of non-erotic activity. We hear that he was fond of luxury
 and pretty raiments, and kept servants and horses, although according to
 Vasari's words "he hardly possessed anything and worked little." We
 shall not hold his artistic taste entirely responsible for all these
 special likings; we recognize in them also the compulsion to copy his
 father and to excel him. He played the part of the great gentleman to
 the poor peasant girl, hence the son retained the incentive that he also
 play the great gentleman, he had the strong feeling "to out-herod
 Herod," and to show his father exactly how the real high rank looks.
 
 Whoever works as an artist certainly feels as a father to his works. The
 identification with his father had a fateful result in Leonardo's works
 of art. He created them and then troubled himself no longer about them,
 just as his father did not trouble himself about him. The later
 worriments of his father could change nothing in this compulsion, as the
 latter originated from the impressions of the first years of childhood,
 and the repression having remained unconscious was incorrigible through
 later experiences.
 
 At the time of the Renaissance, and even much later, every artist was in
 need of a gentleman of rank to act as his benefactor. This patron was
 wont to give the artist commissions for work and entirely controlled his
 destiny. Leonardo found his patron in Lodovico Sforza, nicknamed Il
 Moro, a man of high aspirations, ostentations, diplomatically astute,
 but of an unstable and unreliable character. In his court in Milan,
 Leonardo spent the best period of his life, while in his service he
 evinced his most uninhibited productive activity as is evidenced in The
 Last Supper, and in the equestrian statue of Francesco Sforza. He left
 Milan before the catastrophe struck Lodovico Moro, who died a prisoner
 in a French prison. When the news of his benefactor's fate reached
 Leonardo he made the following entry in his diary: "The duke has lost
 state, wealth, and liberty, not one of his works will be finished by
 himself."[68] It is remarkable and surely not without significance that
 he here raises the same reproach to his benefactor that posterity was to
 apply to him, as if he wanted to lay the responsibility to a person who
 substituted his father-series, for the fact that he himself left his
 works unfinished. As a matter of fact he was not wrong in what he said
 about the Duke.
 
 However, if the imitation of his father hurt him as an artist, his
 resistance against the father was the infantile determinant of his
 perhaps equally vast accomplishment as an artist. According to
 Merejkowski's beautiful comparison he was like a man who awoke too early
 in the darkness, while the others were all still asleep. He dared utter
 this bold principle which contains the justification for all independent
 investigation: _"Chi dispute allegando l'autorit non adopra l'ingegno
 ma piuttosto la memoria"_ (Whoever refers to authorities in disputing
 ideas, works with his memory rather than with his reason).[69] Thus he
 became the first modern natural philosopher, and his courage was
 rewarded by an abundance of cognitions and suggestions; since the Greek
 period he was the first to investigate the secrets of nature, relying
 entirely on his observation and his own judgment. But when he learned to
 depreciate authority and to reject the imitation of the "ancients" and
 constantly pointed to the study of nature as the source of all wisdom,
 he only repeated in the highest sublimation attainable to man, which had
 already obtruded itself on the little boy who surveyed the world with
 wonder. To retranslate the scientific abstractions into concrete
 individual experiences, we would say that the "ancients" and authority
 only corresponded to the father, and nature again became the tender
 mother who nourished him. While in most human beings to-day, as in
 primitive times, the need for a support of some authority is so
 imperative that their world becomes shaky when their authority is
 menaced, Leonardo alone was able to exist without such support; but that
 would not have been possible had he not been deprived of his father in
 the first years of his life. The boldness and independence of his later
 scientific investigation presupposes that his infantile sexual
 investigation was not inhibited by his father, and this same spirit of
 scientific independence was continued by his withdrawing from sex.
 
 If any one like Leonardo escapes in his childhood his father's
 intimidation and later throws off the shackles of authority in his
 scientific investigation, it would be in gross contradiction to our
 expectation if we found that this same man remained a believer and
 unable to withdraw from dogmatic religion. Psychoanalysis has taught us
 the intimate connection between the father complex and belief in God,
 and daily demonstrates to us how youthful persons lose their religious
 belief as soon as the authority of the father breaks down. In the
 parental complex we thus recognize the roots of religious need; the
 almighty, just God, and kindly nature appear to us as grand sublimations
 of father and mother, or rather as revivals and restorations of the
 infantile conceptions of both parents. Religiousness is biologically
 traced to the long period of helplessness and need of help of the little
 child. When the child grows up and realizes his loneliness and weakness
 in the presence of the great forces of life, he perceives his condition
 as in childhood and seeks to disavow his despair through a regressive
 revival of the protecting forces of childhood.
 
 It does not seem that Leonardo's life disproves this conception of
 religious belief. Accusations charging him with irreligiousness, which
 in those times was equivalent to renouncing Christianity, were brought
 against him already in his lifetime, and were clearly described in the
 first biography given by Vasari.[70] In the second edition of his Vite
 (1568) Vasari left out this observation. In view of the extraordinary
 sensitiveness of his age in matters of religion it is perfectly
 comprehensible to us why Leonardo refrained from directly expressing his
 position to Christianity in his notes. As investigator he did not permit
 himself to be misled by the account of the creation of the holy
 scriptures; for instance, he disputed the possibility of a universal
 flood, and in geology he was as unscrupulous in calculating with hundred
 thousands of years as modern investigators.
 
 Among his "prophecies" one finds some things that would perforce offend
 the sensitive feelings of a religious Christian, e.g. Praying to the
 images of Saints, reads as follows:[71]
 
 "People talk to people who perceive nothing, who have open eyes and see
 nothing; they shall talk to them and receive no answer; they shall adore
 those who have ears and hear nothing; they shall burn lamps for those
 who do not see."
 
 Or: Concerning mourning on Good Friday (p. 297):
 
 "In all parts of Europe great peoples will bewail the death of one man
 who died in the Orient."
 
 It was asserted of Leonardo's art that he took away the last remnant of
 religious attachment from the holy figures and put them into human form
 in order to depict in them great and beautiful human feelings. Muther
 praises him for having overcome the feeling of decadence, and for having
 returned to man the right of sensuality and pleasurable enjoyment. The
 notices which show Leonardo absorbed in fathoming the great riddles of
 nature do not lack any expressions of admiration for the creator, the
 last cause of all these wonderful secrets, but nothing indicates that he
 wished to hold any personal relation to this divine force. The sentences
 which contain the deep wisdom of his last years breathe the resignation
 of the man who subjects himself to the laws of nature and expects no
 alleviation from the kindness or grace of God. There is hardly any doubt
 that Leonardo had vanquished dogmatic as well as personal religion, and
 through his work of investigation he had withdrawn far from the world
 aspect of the religious Christian.
 
 From our views mentioned before in the development of the infantile
 psychic life, it becomes clear that also Leonardo's first investigations
 in childhood occupied themselves with the problems of sexuality. But he
 himself betrays it to us through a transparent veil, in that he
 connects his impulse to investigate with the vulture phantasy, and in
 emphasizing the problem of the flight of the bird as one whose
 elaboration devolved upon him through special concatenations of fate. A
 very obscure as well as a prophetically sounding passage in his notes
 dealing with the flight of the bird demonstrates in the nicest way with
 how much affective interest he clung to the wish that he himself should
 be able to imitate, the art of flying: "The human bird shall take his
 first flight, filling the world with amazement, all writings with his
 fame, and bringing eternal glory to the nest whence he sprang." He
 probably hoped that he himself would sometimes be able to fly, and we
 know from the wish fulfilling dreams of people what bliss one expects
 from the fulfillment of this hope.
 
 But why do so many people dream that they are able to fly?
 Psychoanalysis answers this question by stating that to fly or to be a
 bird in the dream is only a concealment of another wish, to the
 recognition of which one can reach by more than one linguistic or
 objective bridge. When the inquisitive child is told that a big bird
 like the stork brings the little children, when the ancients have formed
 the phallus winged, when the popular designation of the sexual activity
 of man is expressed in German by the word "to bird" (vgeln), when the
 male member is directly called _l'uccello_ (bird) by the Italians, all
 these facts are only small fragments from a large collection which
 teaches us that the wish to be able to fly signifies in the dream
 nothing more or less than the longing for the ability of sexual
 accomplishment. This is an early infantile wish. When the grown-up
 recalls his childhood it appears to him as a happy time in which one is
 happy for the moment and looks to the future without any wishes, it is
 for this reason that he envies children. But if children themselves
 could inform us about it they would probably give different reports. It
 seems that childhood is not that blissful Idyl into which we later
 distort it, that on the contrary children are lashed through the years
 of childhood by the wish to become big, and to imitate the grown ups.
 This wish instigates all their playing. If in the course of their
 sexual investigation children feel that the grown up knows something
 wonderful in the mysterious and yet so important realm, what they are
 prohibited from knowing or doing, they are seized with a violent wish to
 know it, and dream of it in the form of flying, or prepare this disguise
 of the wish for their later flying dreams. Thus aviation, which has
 attained its aim in our times, has also its infantile erotic roots.
 
 By admitting that he entertained a special personal relation to the
 problem of flying since his childhood, Leonardo bears out what we must
 assume from our investigation of children of our times, namely, that his
 childhood investigation was directed to sexual matters. At least this
 one problem escaped the repression which has later estranged him from
 sexuality. From childhood until the age of perfect intellectual maturity
 this subject, slightly varied, continued to hold his interest, and it is
 quite possible that he was as little successful in his cherished art in
 the primary sexual sense as in his desires for mechanical matters, that
 both wishes were denied to him.
 
 As a matter of fact the great Leonardo remained infantile in some ways
 throughout his whole life; it is said that all great men retain
 something of the infantile. As a grown up he still continued playing,
 which sometimes made him appear strange and incomprehensible to his
 contemporaries. When he constructed the most artistic mechanical toys
 for court festivities and receptions we are dissatisfied thereby because
 we dislike to see the master waste his power on such petty stuff. He
 himself did not seem averse to giving his time to such things. Vasari
 reports that he did similar things even when not urged to it by request:
 "There (in Rome) he made a doughy mass out of wax, and when it softened
 he formed thereof very delicate animals filled with air; when he blew
 into them they flew in the air, and when the air was exhausted they fell
 to the ground. For a peculiar lizard caught by the wine-grower of
 Belvedere Leonardo made wings from skin pulled off from other lizards,
 which he filled with mercury so that they moved and trembled when it
 walked; he then made for it eyes, a beard and horns, tamed it and put it
 in a little box and terrified all his friends with it."[72] Such
 playing often served him as an expression of serious thoughts: "He had
 often cleaned the intestines of a sheep so well that one could hold them
 in the hollow of the hand; he brought them into a big room, and attached
 them to a blacksmith's bellows which he kept in an adjacent room, he
 then blew them up until they filled up the whole room so that everybody
 had to crowd into a corner. In this manner he showed how they gradually
 became transparent and filled up with air, and as they were at first
 limited to very little space and gradually became more and more extended
 in the big room, he compared them to a genius."[73] His fables and
 riddles evince the same playful pleasure in harmless concealment and
 artistic investment, the riddles were put into the form of prophecies;
 almost all are rich in ideas and to a remarkable degree devoid of wit.
 
 The plays and jumps which Leonardo allowed his phantasy have in some
 cases quite misled his biographers who misunderstood this part of his
 nature. In Leonardo's Milanese manuscripts one finds, for example,
 outlines of letters to the "Diodario of Sorio (Syria), viceroy of the
 holy Sultan of Babylon," in which Leonardo presents himself as an
 engineer sent to these regions of the Orient in order to construct some
 works. In these letters he defends himself against the reproach of
 laziness, he furnishes geographical descriptions of cities and
 mountains, and finally discusses a big elementary event which occurred
 while he was there.[74]
 
 In 1881, J. P. Richter had endeavored to prove from these documents that
 Leonardo made these traveler's observations when he really was in the
 service of the Sultan of Egypt, and that while in the Orient he embraced
 the Mohammedan religion. This sojourn in the Orient should have taken
 place in the time of 1483, that is, before he removed to the court of
 the Duke of Milan. However, it was not difficult for other authors to
 recognize the illustrations of this supposed journey to the Orient as
 what they really were, namely, phantastic productions of the youthful
 artist which he created for his own amusement, and in which he probably
 brought to expression his wishes to see the world and experience
 adventures.
 
 A phantastic formation is probably also the "Academia Vinciana," the
 acceptance of which is due to the existence of five or six most clever
 and intricate emblems with the inscription of the Academy. Vasari
 mentions these drawings but not the Academy.[75] Mntz who placed such
 ornament on the cover of his big work on Leonardo belongs to the few who
 believe in the reality of an "Academia Vinciana."
 
 It is probable that this impulse to play disappeared in Leonardo's
 maturer years, that it became discharged in the investigating activity
 which signified the highest development of his personality. But the fact
 that it continued so long may teach us how slowly one tears himself away
 from his infantilism after having enjoyed in his childhood supreme
 erotic happiness which is later unattainable.
 
 
 
 
 VI
 
 
 It would be futile to delude ourselves that at present, readers find
 every pathography unsavory. This attitude is excused with the reproach
 that from a pathographic elaboration of a great man one never obtains an
 understanding of his importance and his attainments, that it is
 therefore useless mischief to study in him things which could just as
 well be found in the first comer. However, this criticism is so clearly
 unjust that it can only be grasped when viewed as a pretext and a
 disguise for something. As a matter of fact pathography does not aim at
 making comprehensible the attainments of the great man; no one should
 really be blamed for not doing something which one never promised. The
 real motives for the opposition are quite different. One finds them when
 one bears in mind that biographers are fixed on their heroes in quite a
 peculiar manner. Frequently they take the hero as the object of study
 because, for reasons of their personal emotional life, they bear him a
 special affection from the very outset. They then devote themselves to a
 work of idealization which strives to enroll the great men among their
 infantile models, and to revive through him, as it were, the infantile
 conception of the father. For the sake of this wish they wipe out the
 individual features in his physiognomy, they rub out the traces of his
 life's struggle with inner and outer resistances, and do not tolerate in
 him anything of human weakness or imperfection; they then give us a
 cold, strange, ideal form instead of the man to whom we could feel
 distantly related. It is to be regretted that they do this, for they
 thereby sacrifice the truth to an illusion, and for the sake of their
 infantile phantasies they let slip the opportunity to penetrate into the
 most attractive secrets of human nature.[76]
 
 Leonardo himself, judging from his love for the truth and his
 inquisitiveness, would have interposed no objections to the effort of
 discovering the determinations of his psychic and intellectual
 development from the trivial peculiarities and riddles of his nature. We
 respect him by learning from him. It does no injury to his greatness to
 study the sacrifices which his development from the child must have
 entailed, and to the compile factors which have stamped on his person
 the tragic feature of failure.
 
 Let us expressly emphasize that we have never considered Leonardo as a
 neurotic or as a "nervous person" in the sense of this awkward term.
 Whoever takes it amiss that we should even dare apply to him viewpoints
 gained from pathology, still clings to prejudices which we have at
 present justly given up. We no longer believe that health and disease,
 normal and nervous, are sharply distinguished from each other, and that
 neurotic traits must be judged as proof of general inferiority. We know
 to-day that neurotic symptoms are substitutive formations for certain
 repressive acts which have to be brought about in the course of our
 development from the child to the cultural man, that we all produce
 such substitutive formations, and that only the amount, intensity, and
 distribution of these substitutive formations justify the practical
 conception of illness and the conclusion of constitutional inferiority.
 Following the slight signs in Leonardo's personality we would place him
 near that neurotic type which we designate as the "compulsive type," and
 we would compare his investigation with the "reasoning mania" of
 neurotics, and his inhibitions with the so-called "abulias" of the
 latter.
 
 The object of our work was to explain the inhibitions in Leonardo's
 sexual life and in his artistic activity. For this purpose we shall now
 sum up what we could discover concerning the course of his psychic
 development.
 
 We were unable to gain any knowledge about his hereditary factors, on
 the other hand we recognize that the accidental circumstances of his
 childhood produced a far reaching disturbing effect. His illegitimate
 birth deprived him of the influence of a father until perhaps his fifth
 year, and left him to the tender seduction of a mother whose only
 consolation he was. Having been kissed by her into sexual prematurity,
 he surely must have entered into a phase of infantile sexual activity of
 which only one single manifestation was definitely evinced, namely, the
 intensity of his infantile sexual investigation. The impulse for looking
 and inquisitiveness were most strongly stimulated by his impressions
 from early childhood; the enormous mouth-zone received its accentuation
 which it had never given up. From his later contrasting behavior, as the
 exaggerated sympathy for animals, we can conclude that this infantile
 period did not lack in strong sadistic traits.
 
 An energetic shift of repression put an end to this infantile excess,
 and established the dispositions which became manifest in the years of
 puberty. The most striking result of this transformation was a turning
 away from all gross sensual activities. Leonardo was able to lead a life
 of abstinence and made the impression of an asexual person. When the
 floods of pubescent excitement came over the boy they did not make him
 ill by forcing him to costly and harmful substitutive formations; owing
 to the early preference for sexual inquisitiveness, the greater part of
 the sexual needs could be sublimated into a general thirst after
 knowledge and so elude repression. A much smaller portion of the libido
 was applied to sexual aims, and represented the stunted sexual life of
 the grown up. In consequence of the repression of the love for the
 mother this portion assumed a homosexual attitude and manifested itself
 as ideal love for boys. The fixation on the mother, as well as the happy
 reminiscences of his relations with her, was preserved in his
 unconscious but remained for the time in an inactive state. In this
 manner the repression, fixation, and sublimation participated in the
 disposal of the contributions which the sexual impulse furnished to
 Leonardo's psychic life.
 
 From the obscure age of boyhood Leonardo appears to us as an artist, a
 painter, and sculptor, thanks to a specific talent which was probably
 enforced by the early awakening of the impulse for looking in the first
 years of childhood. We would gladly report in what way the artistic
 activity depends on the psychic primitive forces were it not that our
 material is inadequate just here. We content ourselves by emphasizing
 the fact, concerning which hardly any doubt still exists, that the
 productions of the artist give outlet also to his sexual desire, and in
 the case of Leonardo we can refer to the information imparted by Vasari,
 namely, that heads of laughing women and pretty boys, or representations
 of his sexual objects, attracted attention among his first artistic
 attempts. It seems that during his flourishing youth Leonardo at first
 worked in an uninhibited manner. As he took his father as a model for
 his outer conduct in life, he passed through a period of manly creative
 power and artistic productivity in Milan, where favored by fate he found
 a substitute for his father in the duke Lodovico Moro. But the
 experience of others was soon confirmed in him, to wit, that the almost
 complete suppression of the real sexual life does not furnish the most
 favorable conditions for the activity of the sublimated sexual
 strivings. The figurativeness of his sexual life asserted itself, his
 activity and ability to quick decisions began to weaken, the tendency to
 reflection and delay was already noticeable as a disturbance in The
 Holy Supper, and with the influence of the technique determined the fate
 of this magnificent work. Slowly a process developed in him which can be
 put parallel only to the regressions of neurotics. His development at
 puberty into the artist was outstripped by the early infantile
 determinant of the investigator, the second sublimation of his erotic
 impulses turned back to the primitive one which was prepared at the
 first repression. He became an investigator, first in service of his
 art, later independently and away from his art. With the loss of his
 patron, the substitute for his father, and with the increasing
 difficulties in his life, the regressive displacement extended in
 dimension. He became _"impacientissimo al pennello"_ (most impatient
 with the brush) as reported by a correspondent of the countess Isabella
 d'Este who desired to possess at any cost a painting from his hand.[77]
 His infantile past had obtained control over him. The investigation,
 however, which now took the place of his artistic production, seems to
 have born certain traits which betrayed the activity of unconscious
 impulses; this was seen in his insatiability, his regardless obstinacy,
 and in his lack of ability to adjust himself to actual conditions.
 
 At the summit of his life, in the age of the first fifties, at a time
 when the sex characteristics of the woman have already undergone a
 regressive change, and when the libido in the man not infrequently
 ventures into an energetic advance, a new transformation came over him.
 Still deeper strata of his psychic content became active again, but this
 further regression was of benefit to his art which was in a state of
 deterioration. He met the woman who awakened in him the memory of the
 happy and sensuously enraptured smile of his mother, and under the
 influence of this awakening he acquired back the stimulus which guided
 him in the beginning of his artistic efforts when he formed the smiling
 woman. He painted Monna Lisa, Saint Anne, and a number of mystic
 pictures which were characterized by the enigmatic smile. With the help
 of his oldest erotic feelings he triumphed in conquering once more the
 inhibition in his art. This last development faded away in the obscurity
 of the approaching old age. But before this his intellect rose to the
 highest capacity of a view of life, which was far in advance of his
 time.
 
 In the preceding chapters I have shown what justification one may have
 for such representation of Leonardo's course of development, for this
 manner of arranging his life and explaining his wavering between art and
 science. If after accomplishing these things I should provoke the
 criticism from even friends and adepts of psychoanalysis, that I have
 only written a psychoanalytic romance, I should answer that I certainly
 did not overestimate the reliability of these results. Like others I
 succumbed to the attraction emanating from this great and mysterious
 man, in whose being one seems to feel powerful propelling passions,
 which after all can only evince themselves so remarkably subdued.
 
 But whatever may be the truth about Leonardo's life we cannot relinquish
 our effort to investigate it psychoanalytically before we have finished
 another task. In general we must mark out the limits which are set up
 for the working capacity of psychoanalysis in biography so that every
 omitted explanation should not be held up to us as a failure.
 Psychoanalytic investigation has at its disposal the data of the history
 of the person's life, which on the one hand consists of accidental
 events and environmental influences, and on the other hand of the
 reported reactions of the individual. Based on the knowledge of psychic
 mechanisms it now seeks to investigate dynamically the character of the
 individual from his reactions, and to lay bare his earliest psychic
 motive forces as well as their later transformations and developments.
 If this succeeds then the reaction of the personality is explained
 through the coperation of constitutional and accidental factors or
 through inner and outer forces. If such an undertaking, as perhaps in
 the case of Leonardo, does not yield definite results then the blame for
 it is not to be laid to the faulty or inadequate psychoanalytic method,
 but to the vague and fragmentary material left by tradition about this
 person. It is, therefore, only the author who forced psychoanalysis to
 furnish an expert opinion on such insufficient material, who is to be
 held responsible for the failure.
 
 However, even if one had at his disposal a very rich historical material
 and could manage the psychic mechanism with the greatest certainty, a
 psychoanalytic investigation could not possibly furnish the definite
 view, if it concerns two important questions, that the individual could
 turn out only so and not differently. Concerning Leonardo we had to
 represent the view that the accident of his illegitimate birth and the
 pampering of his mother exerted the most decisive influence on his
 character formation and his later fate, through the fact that the sexual
 repression following this infantile phase caused him to sublimate his
 libido into a thirst after knowledge, and thus determined his sexual
 inactivity for his entire later life. The repression, however, which
 followed the first erotic gratification of childhood did not have to
 take place, in another individual it would perhaps not have taken place
 or it would have turned out not nearly as profuse. We must recognize
 here a degree of freedom which can no longer be solved psychoanalytically.
 One is as little justified in representing the issue of this shift of
 repression as the only possible issue. It is quite probable that another
 person would not have succeeded in withdrawing the main part of his
 libido from the repression through sublimation into a desire for
 knowledge; under the same influences as Leonardo another person might
 have sustained a permanent injury to his intellectual work or an
 uncontrollable disposition to compulsion neurosis. The two
 characteristics of Leonardo which remained unexplained through
 psychoanalytic effort are first, his particular tendency to repress his
 impulses, and second, his extraordinary ability to sublimate the
 primitive impulses.
 
 The impulses and their transformations are the last things that
 psychoanalysis can discern. Henceforth it leaves the place to biological
 investigation. The tendency to repression, as well as the ability to
 sublimate, must be traced back to the organic bases of the character,
 upon which alone the psychic structure springs up. As artistic talent
 and productive ability are intimately connected with sublimation we
 have to admit that also the nature of artistic attainment is
 psychoanalytically inaccessible to us. Biological investigation of our
 time endeavors to explain the chief traits of the organic constitution
 of a person through the fusion of male and female predispositions in the
 material sense; Leonardo's physical beauty as well as his
 left-handedness furnish here some support. However, we do not wish to
 leave the ground of pure psychologic investigation. Our aim remains to
 demonstrate the connection between outer experiences and reactions of
 the person over the path of the activity of the impulses. Even if
 psychoanalysis does not explain to us the fact of Leonardo's artistic
 accomplishment, it still gives us an understanding of the expressions
 and limitations of the same. It does seem as if only a man with
 Leonardo's childhood experiences could have painted Monna Lisa and Saint
 Anne, and could have supplied his works with that sad fate and so obtain
 unheard of fame as a natural historian; it seems as if the key to all
 his attainments and failures was hidden in the childhood phantasy of
 the vulture.
 
 But may one not take offense at the results of an investigation which
 concede to the accidents of the parental constellation so decisive an
 influence on the fate of a person, which, for example, subordinates
 Leonardo's fate to his illegitimate birth and to the sterility of his
 first step-mother Donna Albiera? I believe that one has no right to feel
 so; if one considers accident as unworthy of determining our fate, it is
 only a relapse to the pious aspect of life, the overcoming of which
 Leonardo himself prepared when he put down in writing that the sun does
 not move. We are naturally grieved over the fact that a just God and a
 kindly providence do not guard us better against such influences in our
 most defenseless age. We thereby gladly forget that as a matter of fact
 everything in our life is accident from our very origin through the
 meeting of spermatozoa and ovum, accident, which nevertheless
 participates in the lawfulness and fatalities of nature, and lacks only
 the connection to our wishes and illusions. The division of life's
 determinants into the "fatalities" of our constitution and the
 "accidents" of our childhood may still be indefinite in individual
 cases, but taken altogether one can no longer entertain any doubt about
 the importance of precisely our first years of childhood. We all still
 show too little respect for nature, which in Leonardo's deep words
 recalling Hamlet's speech _"is full of infinite reasons which never
 appeared in experience."_[78] Every one of us human beings corresponds
 to one of the infinite experiments in which these "reasons of nature"
 force themselves into experience.
 
 
 THE END
 
 
 FOOTNOTES:
 
 [1] In the words of J. Burckhard, cited by Alexandra Konstantinowa, Die
 Entwicklung des Madonnentypus by Leonardo da Vinci, Strassburg, 1907.
 
 [2] Vite, etc. LXXXIII. 1550-1584.
 
 [3] Traktat von der Malerei, new edition and introduction by Marie
 Herzfeld, E. Diederichs, Jena, 1909.
 
 [4] Solmi. La resurrezione dell' opera di Leonardo in the collected
 work; Leonardo da Vinci. Conferenze Florentine, Milan, 1910.
 
 [5] Scognamiglio Ricerche e Documenti sulla giovinezza di Leonardo da
 Vinci. Napoli, 1900.
 
 [6] W. v. Seidlitz. Leonardo da Vinci, der Wendepunkt der Renaissance,
 1909, Bd. I, p. 203.
 
 [7] W. v. Seidlitz, l. c. Bd. II, p. 48
 
 [8] W. Pater. The Renaissance, p. 107, The Macmillan Co., 1910. "But it
 is certain that at one period of his life he had almost ceased to be an
 artist."
 
 [9] Cf. v. Seidlitz, Bd. I die Geschichte der Restaurations--und
 Rettungsversuche.
 
 [10] Mntz. Lonard de Vinci, Paris, 1899, p. 18. (A letter of a
 contemporary from India to a Medici alludes to this peculiarity of
 Leonardo. Given by Richter: The literary Works of Leonardo da Vinci.)
 
 [11] F. Botazzi. Leonardo biologo e anatomico. Conferenze Florentine, p.
 186, 1910.
 
 [12] E. Solmi: Leonardo da Vinci. German Translation by Emmi Hirschberg.
 Berlin, 1908.
 
 [13] Marie Herzfeld: Leonardo da Vinci der Denker, Forscher und Poet.
 Second edition. Jena, 1906.
 
 [14] His collected witticisms--belle facezie,--which are not translated,
 may be an exception. Cf. Herzfeld, Leonardo da Vinci, p. 151.
 
 [15] According to Scognamiglio (l. c. p. 49) reference is made to this
 episode in an obscure and even variously interpreted passage of the
 Codex Atlanticus: "Quando io feci Domeneddio putto voi mi metteste in
 prigione, ora s'io lo fo grande, voi mi farete peggio."
 
 [16] Merejkowski: The Romance of Leonardo da Vinci, translated by
 Herbert Trench, G. P. Putnam Sons, New York. It forms the second of the
 historical Trilogy entitled Christ and Anti-Christ, of which the first
 volume is Julian Apostata, and the third volume is Peter the Great and
 Alexei.
 
 [17] Solmi l. c. p. 46.
 
 [18] Filippo Botazzi, l. c. p. 193.
 
 [19] Marie Herzfeld: Leonardo da Vinci, Traktat von der Malerei, Jena,
 1909 (Chap. I, 64).
 
 [20] "Such transfiguration of science and of nature into emotions, or
 one might say, religion, is one of the characteristic traits of da
 Vinci's manuscripts, which one finds expressed hundreds of times."
 Solmi: La resurrezione, etc, p. 11.
 
 [21] La resurrezione, etc., p. 8: "Leonardo placed the study of nature
 as a precept to painting ... later the passion for study became
 dominating, he no longer wished to acquire science for art, but science
 for science' sake."
 
 [22] For an enumeration of his scientific attainments see Marie
 Herzfeld's interesting introduction (Jena, 1906) to the essays of the
 Conference Florentine, 1910, and elsewhere.
 
 [23] For a corroboration of this improbable sounding assertion see the
 "Analysis of the Phobia of a Five-year-old Boy," Jahrbuch fr
 Psychoanalytische und Psychopathologische Forschungen, Bd. I, 1909, and
 the similar observation in Bd. II, 1910. In an essay concerning
 "Infantile Theories of Sex" (Sammlungen kleiner Schriften zur
 Neurosenlehre, p. 167, Second Series, 1909), I wrote: "But this
 reasoning and doubting serves as a model for all later intellectual work
 in problems, and the first failure acts as a paralyzer for all times."
 
 [24] Scognamiglio 1. c., p. 15.
 
 [25] Cited by Scognamiglio from the Codex Atlanticus, p. 65.
 
 [26] Cf. here the "Bruchstck einer Hysterieanalyse," in Neurosenlehre,
 Second series, 1909.
 
 [27] Horapollo: Hieroglyphica I, II.    ...  .
 
 [28] Roscher: Ausf. Lexicon der griechischen und rmischen Mythologie.
 Artikel Mut, II Bd., 1894-1897.--Lanzone. Dizionario di Mitologia
 egizia. Torino, 1882.
 
 [29] H. Hartleben, Champollion. Sein Leben und sein Werk, 1906.
 
 [30] "     ,   ," cited by v. Rmer. ber die
 androgynische Idee des Lebens, Jahrb. f. Sexuelle Zwischenstufen, V, 1903, p. 732.
 
 [31] Plutarch: Veluti scarabaeos mares tantum esse putarunt Aegyptii sic
 inter vultures mares non inveniri statuerunt
 
 [32] Horapollinis Niloi Hieroglyphica edidit Conradus Leemans
 Amstelodami, 1835. The words referring to the sex of the vulture read as
 follows (p. 14): "         ."
 
 [33] E. Mntz, 1. c., p. 282.
 
 [34] E. Mntz, 1. c.
 
 [35] See the illustrations in Lanzone l. c. T. CXXXVI-VIII.
 
 [36] v. Rmer l. c.
 
 [37] Cf. the observations in the Jahrbuch fr Psychoanalytische und
 Psychopathologische Forschungen, Vol. I, 1909.
 
 [38] Cf. Richard Payne Knight: The Cult of Priapus.
 
 [39] Prominently among those who undertook these investigations are I.
 Sadger, whose results I can essentially corroborate from my own
 experience. I am also aware that Stekel of Vienna, Ferenczi of Budapest,
 and Brill of New York, came to the same conclusions.
 
 [40] Edm. Solmi: Leonardo da Vinci, German translation, p. 152.
 
 [41] Solmi, 1. c. p. 203.
 
 [42] Leonardo thus behaves like one who was in the habit of making a
 daily confession to another person whom he now replaced by his diary.
 For an assumption as to who this person may have been see Merejkowski,
 p. 309.
 
 [43] M. Herzfeld: Leonardo da Vinci, 1906, p. 141.
 
 [44] The wording is that of Merejkowski, 1. c. p. 237.
 
 [45] The equestrian monument of Francesco Sforza.
 
 [46] The full wording is found in M. Herzfeld, 1. c. p. 45.
 
 [47] Merejkowski 1. c.--As a disappointing illustration of the vagueness
 of the information concerning Leonardo's intimate life, meager as it is,
 I mention the fact that the same expense account is given by Solmi with
 considerable variation (German translation, p. 104). The most serious
 difference is the substitution of florins by soldi. One may assume that
 in this account florins do not mean the old "gold florins," but those
 used at a later period which amounted to 1-2/3 lira or 33-1/2
 soldi.--Solmi represents Caterina as a servant who had taken care of
 Leonardo's household for a certain time. The source from which the two
 representations of this account were taken was not accessible to me.
 
 [48] "Caterina came in July, 1493."
 
 [49] The manner of expression through which the repressed libidio could
 manifest itself in Leonardo, such as circumstantiality and marked
 interest in money, belongs to those traits of character which emanate
 from anal eroticism. Cf. Character und Analerotik in the second series
 of my Sammlung zur Neurosenlehre, 1909, also Brill's Psychoanalysis, its
 Theories and Practical Applications, Chap. XIII, Anal Eroticism and
 Character, Saunders, Philadelphia.
 
 [50] Seidlitz: Leonardo da Vinci, II Bd., p. 280.
 
 [51] Geschichte der Malerei, Bd. I, p. 314.
 
 [52] l. c. p. 417.
 
 [53] A. Conti: Leonardo pittore, Conferenze Fiorentine, l. c. p. 93.
 
 [54] l. c. p. 45.
 
 [55] W. Pater: The Renaissance, p. 124, The Macmillan Co., 1910.
 
 [56] M. Herzfeld: Leonardo da Vinci, p. 88.
 
 [57] Scognamiglio, l. c. p. 32.
 
 [58] L. Schorn, Bd. III, 1843, p. 6.
 
 [59] The same is assumed by Merejkowski, who imagined a childhood for
 Leonardo which deviates in the essential points from ours, drawn from
 the results of the vulture phantasy. But if Leonardo himself had
 displayed this smile, tradition hardly would have failed to report to us
 this coincidence.
 
 [60] l. c. p. 309.
 
 [61] A. Konstantinowa, l. c., says: "Mary looks tenderly down on her
 beloved child with a smile that recalls the mysterious expression of la
 Gioconda." Elsewhere speaking of Mary she says: "The smile of Gioconda
 floats upon her features."
 
 [62] Cf. v. Seidlitz, l. c. Bd. II, p. 274.
 
 [63] Cf. Three Contributions to the Theory of Sex, translated by A. A.
 Brill, 2nd edition, 1916, Monograph series.
 
 [64] "On the 9th of July, 1504, Wednesday at 7 o'clock died Ser Piero da
 Vinci, notary at the palace of the Podesta, my father, at 7 o'clock. He
 was 80 years old, left 10 sons and 2 daughters." (E. Mntz, l. c. p.
 13.)
 
 [65] I shall overlook a greater error committed by Leonardo in his
 notice in that he gives his 77-year-old father 80 years.
 
 [66] "He who usurps on earth my place, my place, my place, which is void
 in the presence of the Son of God, has made out of my cemetery a sewer."
 Canto XXXVII.
 
 [67] It seems that in that passage of the diary Leonardo also erred in
 the number of his sisters and brothers, which stands in remarkable
 contrast to the apparent exactness of the same.
 
 [68] v. Seidlitz, l. c., II, p. 270.
 
 [69] Solmi, Conf. fior, p. 13.
 
 [70] Mntz, l. c., La Religion de Leonardo, p. 292, etc.
 
 [71] Herzfeld, p. 292.
 
 [72] Vasari, translated by Schorn, 1843.
 
 [73] Ebenda, p. 39.
 
 [74] Concerning these letters and the combinations connected with them
 see Mntz, l. c., p. 82; for the wording of the same and for the notices
 connected with them see Herzfeld, l. c., p. 223.
 
 [75] Besides, he lost some time in that he even made a drawing of a
 braided cord in which one could follow the thread from one end to the
 other, until it formed a perfectly circular figure; a very difficult and
 beautiful drawing of this kind is engraved on copper, in the center of
 it one can read the words: "Leonardus Vinci Academia" (p. 8).
 
 [76] This criticism holds quite generally and is not aimed at Leonardo's
 biographers in particular.
 
 [77] Seidlitz II, p. 271.
 
 [78] La natura  piena d'infinite ragion che non furono mai in
 isperienza, M. Herzfeld, l. c. p. II.
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 Produced by Chuck Greif and the Online Distributed
 Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net (This book was
 produced from scanned images of public domain material
 from the Google Print project.)
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 [Illustration: LEONARDO DA VINCI]
 
 
 
 
 Leonardo da Vinci
 
 A PSYCHOSEXUAL STUDY OF AN
 INFANTILE REMINISCENCE
 
 BY
 PROFESSOR DR. SIGMUND FREUD, LL.D.
 (UNIVERSITY OF VIENNA)
 
 TRANSLATED BY
 
 A. A. BRILL, PH.B., M.D.
 
 Lecturer in Psychoanalysis and Abnormal
 Psychology, New York University
 
 [Illustration]
 
 NEW YORK
 MOFFAT, YARD & COMPANY
 1916
 
 COPYRIGHT, 1916, BY
 
 MOFFAT, YARD & COMPANY
 
 
 
 
 ILLUSTRATIONS
 
 
 Leonardo Da Vinci       _Frontispiece_
 
                               FACING
                                PAGE
 
 Mona Lisa       78
 
 Saint Anne       86
 
 John the Baptist       94
 
 
 
 
 LEONARDO DA VINCI
 
 
 
 
 I
 
 
 When psychoanalytic investigation, which usually contents itself with
 frail human material, approaches the great personages of humanity, it is
 not impelled to it by motives which are often attributed to it by
 laymen. It does not strive "to blacken the radiant and to drag the
 sublime into the mire"; it finds no satisfaction in diminishing the
 distance between the perfection of the great and the inadequacy of the
 ordinary objects. But it cannot help finding that everything is worthy
 of understanding that can be perceived through those prototypes, and it
 also believes that none is so big as to be ashamed of being subject to
 the laws which control the normal and morbid actions with the same
 strictness.
 
 Leonardo da Vinci (1452-1519) was admired even by his contemporaries as
 one of the greatest men of the Italian Renaissance, still even then he
 appeared as mysterious to them as he now appears to us. An all-sided
 genius, "whose form can only be divined but never deeply fathomed,"[1]
 he exerted the most decisive influence on his time as an artist; and it
 remained to us to recognize his greatness as a naturalist which was
 united in him with the artist. Although he left masterpieces of the art
 of painting, while his scientific discoveries remained unpublished and
 unused, the investigator in him has never quite left the artist, often
 it has severely injured the artist and in the end it has perhaps
 suppressed the artist altogether. According to Vasari, Leonardo
 reproached himself during the last hour of his life for having insulted
 God and men because he has not done his duty to his art.[2] And even if
 Vasari's story lacks all probability and belongs to those legends which
 began to be woven about the mystic master while he was still living, it
 nevertheless retains indisputable value as a testimonial of the judgment
 of those people and of those times.
 
 What was it that removed the personality of Leonardo from the
 understanding of his contemporaries? Certainly not the many sidedness of
 his capacities and knowledge, which allowed him to install himself as a
 player of the lyre on an instrument invented by himself, in the court of
 Lodovico Sforza, nicknamed Il Moro, the Duke of Milan, or which allowed
 him to write to the same person that remarkable letter in which he
 boasts of his abilities as a civil and military engineer. For the
 combination of manifold talents in the same person was not unusual in
 the times of the Renaissance; to be sure Leonardo himself furnished one
 of the most splendid examples of such persons. Nor did he belong to that
 type of genial persons who are outwardly poorly endowed by nature, and
 who on their side place no value on the outer forms of life, and in the
 painful gloominess of their feelings fly from human relations. On the
 contrary he was tall and symmetrically built, of consummate beauty of
 countenance and of unusual physical strength, he was charming in his
 manner, a master of speech, and jovial and affectionate to everybody. He
 loved beauty in the objects of his surroundings, he was fond of wearing
 magnificent garments and appreciated every refinement of conduct. In his
 treatise[3] on the art of painting he compares in a significant passage
 the art of painting with its sister arts and thus discusses the
 difficulties of the sculptor: "Now his face is entirely smeared and
 powdered with marble dust, so that he looks like a baker, he is covered
 with small marble splinters, so that it seems as if it snowed on his
 back, and his house is full of stone splinters, and dust. The case of
 the painter is quite different from that; for the painter is well
 dressed and sits with great comfort before his work, he gently and very
 lightly brushes in the beautiful colors. He wears as decorative clothes
 as he likes, and his house is filled with beautiful paintings and is
 spotlessly clean. He often enjoys company, music, or some one may read
 for him various nice works, and all this can be listened to with great
 pleasure, undisturbed by any pounding from the hammer and other noises."
 
 It is quite possible that the conception of a beaming jovial and happy
 Leonardo was true only for the first and longer period of the master's
 life. From now on, when the downfall of the rule of Lodovico Moro forced
 him to leave Milan, his sphere of action and his assured position, to
 lead an unsteady and unsuccessful life until his last asylum in France,
 it is possible that the luster of his disposition became pale and some
 odd features of his character became more prominent. The turning of his
 interest from his art to science which increased with age must have also
 been responsible for widening the gap between himself and his
 contemporaries. All his efforts with which, according to their opinion,
 he wasted his time instead of diligently filling orders and becoming
 rich as perhaps his former classmate Perugino, seemed to his
 contemporaries as capricious playing, or even caused them to suspect him
 of being in the service of the "black art." We who know him from his
 sketches understand him better. In a time in which the authority of the
 church began to be substituted by that of antiquity and in which only
 theoretical investigation existed, he the forerunner, or better the
 worthy competitor of Bacon and Copernicus, was necessarily isolated.
 When he dissected cadavers of horses and human beings, and built flying
 apparatus, or when he studied the nourishment of plants and their
 behavior towards poisons, he naturally deviated much from the
 commentators of Aristotle and came nearer the despised alchemists, in
 whose laboratories the experimental investigations found some refuge
 during these unfavorable times.
 
 The effect that this had on his paintings was that he disliked to handle
 the brush, he painted less and what was more often the case, the things
 he began were mostly left unfinished; he cared less and less for the
 future fate of his works. It was this mode of working that was held up
 to him as a reproach from his contemporaries to whom his behavior to his
 art remained a riddle.
 
 Many of Leonardo's later admirers have attempted to wipe off the stain
 of unsteadiness from his character. They maintained that what is blamed
 in Leonardo is a general characteristic of great artists. They said that
 even the energetic Michelangelo who was absorbed in his work left many
 incompleted works, which was as little due to his fault as to Leonardo's
 in the same case. Besides some pictures were not as unfinished as he
 claimed, and what the layman would call a masterpiece may still appear
 to the creator of the work of art as an unsatisfied embodiment of his
 intentions; he has a faint notion of a perfection which he despairs of
 reproducing in likeness. Least of all should the artist be held
 responsible for the fate which befalls his works.
 
 As plausible as some of these excuses may sound they nevertheless do not
 explain the whole state of affairs which we find in Leonardo. The
 painful struggle with the work, the final flight from it and the
 indifference to its future fate may be seen in many other artists, but
 this behavior is shown in Leonardo to highest degree. Edm. Solmi[4]
 cites (p. 12) the expression of one of his pupils: "Pareva, che ad ogni
 ora tremasse, quando si poneva a dipingere, e pero no diede mai fine ad
 alcuna cosa cominciata, considerando la grandezza dell'arte, tal che
 egli scorgeva errori in quelle cose, che ad altri parevano miracoli."
 His last pictures, Leda, the Madonna di Saint Onofrio, Bacchus and St.
 John the Baptist, remained unfinished "come quasi intervenne di tutte le
 cose sue." Lomazzo,[5] who finished a copy of The Holy Supper, refers in
 a sonnet to the familiar inability of Leonardo to finish his works:
 
     "Protogen che il penel di sue pitture
      Non levava, agguaglio il Vinci Divo,
      Di cui opra non e finita pure."
 
 The slowness with which Leonardo worked was proverbial. After the most
 thorough preliminary studies he painted The Holy Supper for three years
 in the cloister of Santa Maria delle Grazie in Milan. One of his
 contemporaries, Matteo Bandelli, the writer of novels, who was then a
 young monk in the cloister, relates that Leonardo often ascended the
 scaffold very early in the morning and did not leave the brush out of
 his hand until twilight, never thinking of eating or drinking. Then days
 passed without putting his hand on it, sometimes he remained for hours
 before the painting and derived satisfaction from studying it by
 himself. At other times he came directly to the cloister from the palace
 of the Milanese Castle where he formed the model of the equestrian
 statue for Francesco Sforza, in order to add a few strokes with the
 brush to one of the figures and then stopped immediately.[6] According
 to Vasari he worked for years on the portrait of Monna Lisa, the wife of
 the Florentine de Gioconda, without being able to bring it to
 completion. This circumstance may also account for the fact that it was
 never delivered to the one who ordered it but remained with Leonardo who
 took it with him to France.[7] Having been procured by King Francis I,
 it now forms one of the greatest treasures of the Louvre.
 
 When one compares these reports about Leonardo's way of working with the
 evidence of the extraordinary amount of sketches and studies left by
 him, one is bound altogether to reject the idea that traits of
 flightiness and unsteadiness exerted the slightest influence on
 Leonardo's relation to his art. On the contrary one notices a very
 extraordinary absorption in work, a richness in possibilities in which a
 decision could be reached only hestitatingly, claims which could hardly
 be satisfied, and an inhibition in the execution which could not even be
 explained by the inevitable backwardness of the artist behind his ideal
 purpose. The slowness which was striking in Leonardo's works from the
 very beginning proved to be a symptom of his inhibition, a forerunner of
 his turning away from painting which manifested itself later.[8] It was
 this slowness which decided the not undeserving fate of The Holy
 Supper. Leonardo could not take kindly to the art of fresco painting
 which demands quick work while the background is still moist, it was for
 this reason that he chose oil colors, the drying of which permitted him
 to complete the picture according to his mood and leisure. But these
 colors separated themselves from the background upon which they were
 painted and which isolated them from the brick wall; the blemishes of
 this wall and the vicissitudes to which the room was subjected seemingly
 contributed to the inevitable deterioration of the picture.[9]
 
 The picture of the cavalry battle of Anghiari, which in competition with
 Michelangelo he began to paint later on a wall of the Sala de Consiglio
 in Florence and which he also left in an unfinished state, seemed to
 have perished through the failure of a similar technical process. It
 seems here as if a peculiar interest, that of the experimenter, at first
 reenforced the artistic, only later to damage the art production.
 
 The character of the man Leonardo evinces still some other unusual
 traits and apparent contradictions. Thus a certain inactivity and
 indifference seemed very evident in him. At a time when every individual
 sought to gain the widest latitude for his activity, which could not
 take place without the development of energetic aggression towards
 others, he surprised every one through his quiet peacefulness, his
 shunning of all competition and controversies. He was mild and kind to
 all, he was said to have rejected a meat diet because he did not
 consider it just to rob animals of their lives, and one of his special
 pleasures was to buy caged birds in the market and set them free.[10] He
 condemned war and bloodshed and designated man not so much as the king
 of the animal world, but rather as the worst of the wild beasts.[11] But
 this effeminate delicacy of feeling did not prevent him from
 accompanying condemned criminals on their way to execution in order to
 study and sketch in his notebook their features, distorted by fear, nor
 did it prevent him from inventing the most cruel offensive weapons, and
 from entering the service of Cesare Borgia as chief military engineer.
 Often he seemed to be indifferent to good and evil, or he had to be
 measured with a special standard. He held a high position in Cesare's
 campaign which gained for this most inconsiderate and most faithless of
 foes the possession of the Romagna. Not a single line of Leonardo's
 sketches betrays any criticism or sympathy of the events of those days.
 The comparison with Goethe during the French campaign cannot here be
 altogether rejected.
 
 If a biographical effort really endeavors to penetrate the understanding
 of the psychic life of its hero it must not, as happens in most
 biographies through discretion or prudery, pass over in silence the
 sexual activity or the sex peculiarity of the one examined. What we know
 about it in Leonardo is very little but full of significance. In a
 period where there was a constant struggle between riotous
 licentiousness and gloomy asceticism, Leonardo presented an example of
 cool sexual rejection which one would not expect in an artist and a
 portrayer of feminine beauty. Solmi[12] cites the following sentence
 from Leonardo showing his frigidity: "The act of procreation and
 everything that has any relation to it is so disgusting that human
 beings would soon die out if it were not a traditional custom and if
 there were no pretty faces and sensuous dispositions." His posthumous
 works which not only treat of the greatest scientific problems but also
 comprise the most guileless objects which to us do not seem worthy of so
 great a mind (an allegorical natural history, animal fables, witticisms,
 prophecies),[13] are chaste to a degree--one might say abstinent--that
 in a work of _belle lettres_ would excite wonder even to-day. They evade
 everything sexual so thoroughly, as if Eros alone who preserves
 everything living was no worthy material for the scientific impulse of
 the investigator.[14] It is known how frequently great artists found
 pleasure in giving vent to their phantasies in erotic and even grossly
 obscene representations; in contradistinction to this Leonardo left only
 some anatomical drawings of the woman's internal genitals, the position
 of the child in the womb, etc.
 
 It is doubtful whether Leonardo ever embraced a woman in love, nor is it
 known that he ever entertained an intimate spiritual relation with a
 woman as in the case of Michelangelo and Vittoria Colonna. While he
 still lived as an apprentice in the house of his master Verrocchio, he
 with other young men were accused of forbidden homosexual relations
 which ended in his acquittal. It seems that he came into this suspicion
 because he employed as a model a boy of evil repute.[15] When he was a
 master he surrounded himself with handsome boys and youths whom he took
 as pupils. The last of these pupils Francesco Melzi, accompanied him to
 France, remained with him until his death, and was named by him as his
 heir. Without sharing the certainty of his modern biographers, who
 naturally reject the possibility of a sexual relation between himself
 and his pupils as a baseless insult to this great man, it may be thought
 by far more probable that the affectionate relationships of Leonardo to
 the young men did not result in sexual activity. Nor should one
 attribute to him a high measure of sexual activity.
 
 The peculiarity of this emotional and sexual life viewed in connection
 with Leonardo's double nature as an artist and investigator can be
 grasped only in one way. Of the biographers to whom psychological
 viewpoints are often very foreign, only one, Edm. Solmi, has to my
 knowledge approached the solution of the riddle. But a writer, Dimitri
 Sergewitsch Merejkowski, who selected Leonardo as the hero of a great
 historical novel has based his delineation on such an understanding of
 this unusual man, and if not in dry words he gave unmistakable
 utterance in plastic expression in the manner of a poet.[16] Solmi
 judges Leonardo as follows: "But the unrequited desire to understand
 everything surrounding him, and with cold reflection to discover the
 deepest secret of everything that is perfect, has condemned Leonardo's
 works to remain forever unfinished."[17] In an essay of the Conferenze
 Fiorentine the utterances of Leonardo are cited, which show his
 confession of faith and furnish the key to his character.
 
     "_Nessuna cosa si puo amare ne odiare, se_
      _prima no si ha cognition di quella._"[18]
 
 That is: One has no right to love or to hate anything if one has not
 acquired a thorough knowledge of its nature. And the same is repeated by
 Leonardo in a passage of the Treaties on the Art of Painting where he
 seems to defend himself against the accusation of irreligiousness:
 
 "But such censurers might better remain silent. For that action is the
 manner of showing the workmaster so many wonderful things, and this is
 the way to love so great a discoverer. For, verily great love springs
 from great knowledge of the beloved object, and if you little know it
 you will be able to love it only little or not at all."[19]
 
 The value of these utterances of Leonardo cannot be found in that they
 impart to us an important psychological fact, for what they maintain is
 obviously false, and Leonardo must have known this as well as we do. It
 is not true that people refrain from loving or hating until they have
 studied and became familiar with the nature of the object to whom they
 wish to give these affects, on the contrary they love impulsively and
 are guided by emotional motives which have nothing to do with cognition
 and whose affects are weakened, if anything, by thought and reflection.
 Leonardo only could have implied that the love practiced by people is
 not of the proper and unobjectionable kind, one should so love as to
 hold back the affect and to subject it to mental elaboration, and only
 after it has stood the test of the intellect should free play be given
 to it. And we thereby understand that he wishes to tell us that this was
 the case with himself and that it would be worth the effort of everybody
 else to treat love and hatred as he himself does.
 
 And it seems that in his case it was really so. His affects were
 controlled and subjected to the investigation impulse, he neither loved
 nor hated, but questioned himself whence does that arise, which he was
 to love or hate, and what does it signify, and thus he was at first
 forced to appear indifferent to good and evil, to beauty and ugliness.
 During this work of investigation love and hatred threw off their
 designs and uniformly changed into intellectual interest. As a matter of
 fact Leonardo was not dispassionate, he did not lack the divine spark
 which is the mediate or immediate motive power--_il primo motore_--of
 all human activity. He only transmuted his passion into
 inquisitiveness. He then applied himself to study with that
 persistence, steadiness, and profundity which comes from passion, and on
 the height of the psychic work, after the cognition was won, he allowed
 the long checked affect to break loose and to flow off freely like a
 branch of a stream, after it has accomplished its work. At the height of
 his cognition when he could examine a big part of the whole he was
 seized with a feeling of pathos, and in ecstatic words he praised the
 grandeur of that part of creation which he studied, or--in religious
 cloak--the greatness of the creator. Solmi has correctly divined this
 process of transformation in Leonardo. According to the quotation of
 such a passage, in which Leonardo celebrated the higher impulse of
 nature ("O mirabile necessita ... ") he said: "Tale trasfigurazione
 della scienza della natura in emozione, quasi direi, religiosa, e uno
 dei tratti caratteristici de manoscritti vinciani, e si trova cento e
 cento volte espressa...."[20]
 
 Leonardo was called the Italian Faust on account of his insatiable and
 indefatigable desire for investigation. But even if we disregard the
 fact that it is the possible retransformation of the desire for
 investigation into the joys of life which is presupposed in the Faust
 tragedy, one might venture to remark that Leonardo's system recalls
 Spinoza's mode of thinking.
 
 The transformation of psychic motive power into the different forms of
 activity is perhaps as little convertible without loss, as in the case
 of physical powers. Leonardo's example teaches how many other things one
 must follow up in these processes. Not to love before one gains full
 knowledge of the thing loved presupposes a delay which is harmful. When
 one finally reaches cognition he neither loves nor hates properly; one
 remains beyond love and hatred. One has investigated instead of having
 loved. It is perhaps for this reason that Leonardo's life was so much
 poorer in love than those of other great men and great artists. The
 storming passions of the soul-stirring and consuming kind, in which
 others experience the best part of their lives, seem to have missed
 him.
 
 There are still other consequences when one follows Leonardo's dictum.
 Instead of acting and producing one just investigates. He who begins to
 divine the grandeur of the universe and its needs readily forgets his
 own insignificant self. When one is struck with admiration and becomes
 truly humble he easily forgets that he himself is a part of that living
 force, and that according to the measure of his own personality he has
 the right to make an effort to change that destined course of the world,
 the world in which the insignificant is no less wonderful and important
 than the great.
 
 Solmi thinks that Leonardo's investigations started with his art,[21] he
 tried to investigate the attributes and laws of light, of color, of
 shades and of perspective so as to be sure of becoming a master in the
 imitation of nature and to be able to show the way to others. It is
 probable that already at that time he overestimated the value of this
 knowledge for the artist. Following the guide-rope of the painter's
 need, he was then driven further and further to investigate the objects
 of the art of painting, such as animals and plants, and the proportions
 of the human body, and to follow the path from their exterior to their
 interior structure and biological functions, which really also express
 themselves in their appearance and should be depicted in art. And
 finally he was pulled along by this overwhelming desire until the
 connection was torn from the demands of his art, so that he discovered
 the general laws of mechanics and divined the history of the
 stratification and fossilization of the Arno-valley, until he could
 enter in his book with capital letters the cognition: _Il sole non si
 move_ (The sun does not move). His investigations were thus extended
 over almost all realms of natural science, in every one of which he was
 a discoverer or at least a prophet or forerunner.[22] However, his
 curiosity continued to be directed to the outer world, something kept
 him away from the investigation of the psychic life of men; there was
 little room for psychology in the "Academia Vinciana," for which he drew
 very artistic and very complicated emblems.
 
 When he later made the effort to return from his investigations to the
 art from which he started he felt that he was disturbed by the new paths
 of his interest and by the changed nature of his psychic work. In the
 picture he was interested above all in a problem, and behind this one he
 saw emerging numerous other problems just as he was accustomed in the
 endless and indeterminable investigations of natural history. He was no
 longer able to limit his demands, to isolate the work of art, and to
 tear it out from that great connection of which he knew it formed part.
 After the most exhausting efforts to bring to expression all that was in
 him, all that was connected with it in his thoughts, he was forced to
 leave it unfinished, or to declare it incomplete.
 
 The artist had once taken into his service the investigator to assist
 him, now the servant was stronger and suppressed his master.
 
 When we find in the portrait of a person one single impulse very
 forcibly developed, as curiosity in the case of Leonardo, we look for
 the explanation in a special constitution, concerning its probable
 organic determination hardly anything is known. Our psychoanalytic
 studies of nervous people lead us to look for two other expectations
 which we would like to find verified in every case. We consider it
 probable that this very forcible impulse was already active in the
 earliest childhood of the person, and that its supreme sway was fixed by
 infantile impressions; and we further assume that originally it drew
 upon sexual motive powers for its reenforcement so that it later can
 take the place of a part of the sexual life. Such person would then,
 e.g., investigate with that passionate devotion which another would give
 to his love, and he could investigate instead of loving. We would
 venture the conclusion of a sexual reenforcement not only in the impulse
 to investigate, but also in most other cases of special intensity of an
 impulse.
 
 Observation of daily life shows us that most persons have the capacity
 to direct a very tangible part of their sexual motive powers to their
 professional or business activities. The sexual impulse is particularly
 suited to yield such contributions because it is endowed with the
 capacity of sublimation, i.e., it has the power to exchange its nearest
 aim for others of higher value which are not sexual. We consider this
 process as proved, if the history of childhood or the psychic
 developmental history of a person shows that in childhood this powerful
 impulse was in the service of the sexual interest. We consider it a
 further corroboration if this is substantiated by a striking stunting in
 the sexual life of mature years, as if a part of the sexual activity had
 now been replaced by the activity of the predominant impulse.
 
 The application of these assumptions to the case of the predominant
 investigation-impulse seems to be subject to special difficulties, as
 one is unwilling to admit that this serious impulse exists in children
 or that children show any noteworthy sexual interest. However, these
 difficulties are easily obviated. The untiring pleasure in questioning
 as seen in little children demonstrates their curiosity, which is
 puzzling to the grown-up, as long as he does not understand that all
 these questions are only circumlocutions, and that they cannot come to
 an end because they replace only one question which the child does not
 put. When the child becomes older and gains more understanding this
 manifestation of curiosity suddenly disappears. But psychoanalytic
 investigation gives us a full explanation in that it teaches us that
 many, perhaps most children, at least the most gifted ones, go through a
 period beginning with the third year, which may be designated as the
 period of _infantile sexual investigation_. As far as we know, the
 curiosity is not awakened spontaneously in children of this age, but is
 aroused through the impression of an important experience, through the
 birth of a little brother or sister, or through fear of the same
 endangered by some outward experience, wherein the child sees a danger
 to his egotistic interests. The investigation directs itself to the
 question whence children come, as if the child were looking for means
 to guard against such undesired event. We were astonished to find that
 the child refuses to give credence to the information imparted to it,
 e.g., it energetically rejects the mythological and so ingenious
 stork-fable, we were astonished to find that its psychic independence
 dates from this act of disbelief, that it often feels itself at serious
 variance with the grown-ups, and never forgives them for having been
 deceived of the truth on this occasion. It investigates in its own way,
 it divines that the child is in the mother's womb, and guided by the
 feelings of its own sexuality, it formulates for itself theories about
 the origin of children from food, about being born through the bowels,
 about the role of the father which is difficult to fathom, and even at
 that time it has a vague conception of the sexual act which appears to
 the child as something hostile, as something violent. But as its own
 sexual constitution is not yet equal to the task of producing children,
 his investigation whence come children must also run aground and must be
 left in the lurch as unfinished. The impression of this failure at the
 first attempt of intellectual independence seems to be of a persevering
 and profoundly depressing nature.[23]
 
 If the period of infantile sexual investigation comes to an end through
 an impetus of energetic sexual repression, the early association with
 sexual interest may result in three different possibilities for the
 future fate of the investigation impulse. The investigation either
 shares the fate of the sexuality, the curiosity henceforth remains
 inhibited and the free activity of intelligence may become narrowed for
 life; this is especially made possible by the powerful religious
 inhibition of thought, which is brought about shortly hereafter through
 education. This is the type of neurotic inhibition. We know well that
 the so acquired mental weakness furnishes effective support for the
 outbreak of a neurotic disease. In a second type the intellectual
 development is sufficiently strong to withstand the sexual repression
 pulling at it. Sometimes after the disappearance of the infantile sexual
 investigation, it offers its support to the old association in order to
 elude the sexual repression, and the suppressed sexual investigation
 comes back from the unconscious as compulsive reasoning, it is naturally
 distorted and not free, but forceful enough to sexualize even thought
 itself and to accentuate the intellectual operations with the pleasure
 and fear of the actual sexual processes. Here the investigation becomes
 sexual activity and often exclusively so, the feeling of settling the
 problem and of explaining things in the mind is put in place of sexual
 gratification. But the indeterminate character of the infantile
 investigation repeats itself also in the fact that this reasoning never
 ends, and that the desired intellectual feeling of the solution
 constantly recedes into the distance. By virtue of a special disposition
 the third, which is the most rare and most perfect type, escapes the
 inhibition of thought and the compulsive reasoning. Also here sexual
 repression takes place, it is unable, however, to direct a partial
 impulse of the sexual pleasure into the unconscious, but the libido
 withdraws from the fate of the repression by being sublimated from the
 beginning into curiosity, and by reenforcing the powerful investigation
 impulse. Here, too, the investigation becomes more or less compulsive
 and a substitute of the sexual activity, but owing to the absolute
 difference of the psychic process behind it (sublimation in place of the
 emergence from the unconscious) the character of the neurosis does not
 manifest itself, the subjection to the original complexes of the
 infantile sexual investigation disappears, and the impulse can freely
 put itself in the service of the intellectual interest. It takes account
 of the sexual repression which made it so strong in contributing to it
 sublimated libido, by avoiding all occupation with sexual themes.
 
 In mentioning the concurrence in Leonardo of the powerful investigation
 impulse with the stunting of his sexual life which was limited to the
 so-called ideal homosexuality, we feel inclined to consider him as a
 model example of our third type. The most essential point of his
 character and the secret of it seems to lie in the fact, that after
 utilizing the infantile activity of curiosity in the service of sexual
 interest he was able to sublimate the greater part of his libido into
 the impulse of investigation. But to be sure the proof of this
 conception is not easy to produce. To do this we would have to have an
 insight into the psychic development of his first childhood years, and
 it seems foolish to hope for such material when the reports concerning
 his life are so meager and so uncertain; and moreover, when we deal with
 information which even persons of our own generation withdraw from the
 attention of the observer.
 
 We know very little concerning Leonardo's youth. He was born in 1452 in
 the little city of Vinci between Florence and Empoli; he was an
 illegitimate child which was surely not considered a great popular stain
 in that time. His father was Ser Piero da Vinci, a notary and descendant
 of notaries and farmers, who took their name from the place Vinci; his
 mother, a certain Caterina, probably a peasant girl, who later married
 another native of Vinci. Nothing else about his mother appears in the
 life history of Leonardo, only the writer Merejkowski believed to have
 found some traces of her. The only definite information about Leonardo's
 childhood is furnished by a legal document from the year 1457, a
 register of assessment in which Vinci Leonardo is mentioned among the
 members of the family as a five-year-old illegitimate child of Ser
 Piero.[24] As the marriage of Ser Piero with Donna Albiera remained
 childless the little Leonardo could be brought up in his father's house.
 He did not leave this house until he entered as apprentice--it is not
 known what year--in the studio of Andrea del Verrocchio. In 1472
 Leonardo's name could already be found in the register of the members of
 the "Compagnia dei Pittori." That is all.
 
 
 
 
 II
 
 
 As far as I know Leonardo only once interspersed in his scientific
 descriptions a communication from his childhood. In a passage where he
 speaks about the flight of the vulture, he suddenly interrupts himself
 in order to follow up a memory from very early years which came to his
 mind.
 
 "_It seems that it had been destined before that I should occupy myself
 so thoroughly with the vulture, for it comes to my mind as a very early
 memory, when I was still in the cradle, a vulture came down to me, he
 opened my mouth with his tail and struck me a few times with his tail
 against my lips._"[25]
 
 We have here an infantile memory and to be sure of the strangest sort.
 It is strange on account of its content and account of the time of life
 in which it was fixed. That a person could retain a memory of the
 nursing period is perhaps not impossible, but it can in no way be taken
 as certain. But what this memory of Leonardo states, namely, that a
 vulture opened the child's mouth with its tail, sounds so improbable, so
 fabulous, that another conception which puts an end to the two
 difficulties with one stroke appeals much more to our judgment. The
 scene of the vulture is not a memory of Leonardo, but a phantasy which
 he formed later, and transferred into his childhood. The childhood
 memories of persons often have no different origin, as a matter of fact,
 they are not fixated from an experience like the conscious memories from
 the time of maturity and then repeated, but they are not produced until
 a later period when childhood is already past, they are then changed and
 disguised and put in the service of later tendencies, so that in general
 they cannot be strictly differentiated from phantasies. Their nature
 will perhaps be best understood by recalling the manner in which history
 writing originated among ancient nations. As long as the nation was
 small and weak it gave no thought to the writing of its history, it
 tilled the soil of its land, defended its existence against its
 neighbors by seeking to wrest land from them and endeavored to become
 rich. It was a heroic but unhistoric time. Then came another age, a
 period of self-realization in which one felt rich and powerful, and it
 was then that one experienced the need to discover whence one originated
 and how one developed. The history-writing which then continues to
 register the present events throws also its backward glance to the past,
 it gathers traditions and legends, it interprets what survived from
 olden times into customs and uses, and thus creates a history of past
 ages. It is quite natural that this history of the past ages is more the
 expressions of opinions and desires of the present than a faithful
 picture of the past, for many a thing escaped the people's memory, other
 things became distorted, some trace of the past was misunderstood and
 interpreted in the sense of the present; and besides one does not write
 history through motives of objective curiosity, but because one desires
 to impress his contemporaries, to stimulate and extol them, or to hold
 the mirror before them. The conscious memory of a person concerning the
 experiences of his maturity may now be fully compared to that of history
 writing, and his infantile memories, as far as their origin and
 reliability are concerned will actually correspond to the history of the
 primitive period of a people which was compiled later with purposive
 intent.
 
 Now one may think that if Leonardo's story of the vulture which visited
 him in his cradle is only a phantasy of later birth, it is hardly worth
 while giving more time to it. One could easily explain it by his openly
 avowed inclination to occupy himself with the problem of the flight of
 the bird which would lend to this phantasy an air of predetermined fate.
 But with this depreciation one commits as great an injustice as if one
 would simply ignore the material of legends, traditions, and
 interpretations in the primitive history of a people. Notwithstanding
 all distortions and misunderstandings to the contrary they still
 represent the reality of the past; they represent what the people formed
 out of the experiences of its past age under the domination of once
 powerful and to-day still effective motives, and if these distortions
 could be unraveled through the knowledge of all effective forces, one
 would surely discover the historic truth under this legendary material.
 The same holds true for the infantile reminiscences or for the
 phantasies of individuals. What a person thinks he recalls from his
 childhood, is not of an indifferent nature. As a rule the memory
 remnants, which he himself does not understand, conceal invaluable
 evidences of the most important features of his psychic development. As
 the psychoanalytic technique affords us excellent means for bringing to
 light this concealed material, we shall venture the attempt to fill the
 gaps in the history of Leonardo's life through the analysis of his
 infantile phantasy. And if we should not attain a satisfactory degree of
 certainty, we will have to console ourselves with the fact that so many
 other investigations about this great and mysterious man have met no
 better fate.
 
 When we examine Leonardo's vulture-phantasy with the eyes of a
 psychoanalyst then it does not seem strange very long; we recall that we
 have often found similar structures in dreams, so that we may venture
 to translate this phantasy from its strange language into words that are
 universally understood. The translation then follows an erotic
 direction. Tail, "coda," is one of the most familiar symbols, as well as
 a substitutive designation of the male member which is no less true in
 Italian than in other languages. The situation contained in the
 phantasy, that a vulture opened the mouth of the child and forcefully
 belabored it with its tail, corresponds to the idea of fellatio, a
 sexual act in which the member is placed into the mouth of the other
 person. Strangely enough this phantasy is altogether of a passive
 character; it resembles certain dreams and phantasies of women and of
 passive homosexuals who play the feminine part in sexual relations.
 
 Let the reader be patient for a while and not flare up with indignation
 and refuse to follow psychoanalysis because in its very first
 applications it leads to an unpardonable slander of the memory of a
 great and pure man. For it is quite certain that this indignation will
 never solve for us the meaning of Leonardo's childhood phantasy; on the
 other hand, Leonardo has unequivocally acknowledged this phantasy, and
 we shall therefore not relinquish the expectation--or if you prefer the
 preconception--that like every psychic production such as dreams,
 visions and deliria this phantasy, too, must have some meaning. Let us
 therefore lend our unprejudiced ears for a while to psychoanalytic work
 which after all has not yet uttered the last word.
 
 The desire to take the male member into the mouth and suck it, which is
 considered as one of the most disgusting of sexual perversions, is
 nevertheless a frequent occurrence among the women of our time--and as
 shown in old sculptures was the same in earlier times--and in the state
 of being in love seems to lose entirely its disgusting character. The
 physician encounters phantasies based on this desire, even in women who
 did not come to the knowledge of the possibility of such sexual
 gratification by reading V. Krafft-Ebing's Psychopathia Sexualis or
 through other information. It seems that it is quite easy for the women
 themselves to produce such wish-phantasies.[26] Investigation then
 teaches us that this situation, so forcibly condemned by custom, may be
 traced to the most harmless origin. It is nothing but the elaboration of
 another situation in which we all once felt comfort, namely, when we
 were in the suckling-age ("when I was still in the cradle") and took the
 nipple of our mother's or wet-nurse's breast into our mouth to suck it.
 The organic impression of this first pleasure in our lives surely
 remains indelibly impregnated; when the child later learns to know the
 udder of the cow, which in function is a breast-nipple, but in shape and
 in position on the abdomen resembles the penis, it obtains the primary
 basis for the later formation of that disgusting sexual phantasy.
 
 We now understand why Leonardo displaced the memory of the supposed
 experience with the vulture to his nursing period. This phantasy
 conceals nothing more or less than a reminiscence of nursing--or being
 nursed--at the mother's breast, a scene both human and beautiful, which
 he as well as other artists undertook to depict with the brush in the
 form of the mother of God and her child. At all events, we also wish to
 maintain, something we do not as yet understand, that this reminiscence,
 equally significant for both sexes, was elaborated in the man Leonardo
 into a passive homosexual phantasy. For the present we shall not take up
 the question as to what connection there is between homosexuality and
 suckling at the mother's breast, we merely wish to recall that tradition
 actually designates Leonardo as a person of homosexual feelings. In
 considering this, it makes no difference whether that accusation against
 the youth Leonardo was justified or not. It is not the real activity but
 the nature of the feeling which causes us to decide whether to attribute
 to some one the characteristic of homosexuality.
 
 Another incomprehensible feature of Leonardo's infantile phantasy next
 claims our interest. We interpret the phantasy of being wet-nursed by
 the mother and find that the mother is replaced by a vulture. Where does
 this vulture originate and how does he come into this place?
 
 A thought now obtrudes itself which seems so remote that one is tempted
 to ignore it. In the sacred hieroglyphics of the old Egyptians the
 mother is represented by the picture of the vulture.[27] These Egyptians
 also worshiped a motherly deity, whose head was vulture like, or who had
 many heads of which at least one or two was that of a vulture.[28] The
 name of this goddess was pronounced _Mut_; we may question whether the
 sound similarity to our word mother (Mutter) is only accidental? So the
 vulture really has some connection with the mother, but of what help is
 that to us? Have we a right to attribute this knowledge to Leonardo when
 Francois Champollion first succeeded in reading hieroglyphics between
 1790-1832?[29]
 
 It would also be interesting to discover in what way the old Egyptians
 came to choose the vulture as a symbol of motherhood. As a matter of
 fact the religion and culture of Egyptians were subjects of scientific
 interest even to the Greeks and Romans, and long before we ourselves
 were able to read the Egyptian monuments we had at our disposal some
 communications about them from preserved works of classical antiquity.
 Some of these writings belonged to familiar authors like Strabo,
 Plutarch, Aminianus Marcellus, and some bear unfamiliar names and are
 uncertain as to origin and time, like the hieroglyphica of Horapollo
 Nilus, and like the traditional book of oriental priestly wisdom bearing
 the godly name Hermes Trismegistos. From these sources we learn that the
 vulture was a symbol of motherhood because it was thought that this
 species of birds had only female vultures and no males.[30] The natural
 history of the ancients shows a counterpart to this limitation among the
 scarebaeus beetles which were revered by the Egyptians as godly, no
 females were supposed to exist.[31]
 
 But how does impregnation take place in vultures if only females exist?
 This is fully answered in a passage of Horapollo.[32] At a certain time
 these birds stop in the midst of their flight, open their vagina and are
 impregnated by the wind.
 
 Unexpectedly we have now reached a point where we can take something as
 quite probable which only shortly before we had to reject as absurd. It
 is quite possible that Leonardo was well acquainted with the scientific
 fable, according to which the Egyptians represented the idea of mother
 with the picture of the vulture. He was an omnivorous reader whose
 interest comprised all spheres of literature and knowledge. In the Codex
 Atlanticus we find an index of all books which he possessed at a certain
 time,[33] as well as numerous notices about other books which he
 borrowed from friends, and according to the excerpts which Fr.
 Richter[34] compiled from his drawings we can hardly overestimate the
 extent of his reading. Among these books there was no lack of older as
 well as contemporary works treating of natural history. All these books
 were already in print at that time, and it so happens that Milan was the
 principal place of the young art of book printing in Italy.
 
 When we proceed further we come upon a communication which may raise to
 a certainty the probability that Leonardo knew the vulture fable. The
 erudite editor and commentator of Horapollo remarked in connection with
 the text (p. 172) cited before: _Caeterum hanc fabulam de vulturibus
 cupide amplexi sunt Patres Ecclesiastici, ut ita argumento ex rerum
 natura petito refutarent eos, qui Virginis partum negabant; itaque apud
 omnes fere hujus rei mentio occurit._
 
 Hence the fable of the monosexuality and the conception of the vulture
 by no means remained as an indifferent anecdote as in the case of the
 analogous fable of the scarebaeus beetles; that church fathers mastered
 it in order to have it ready as an argument from natural history against
 those who doubted the sacred history. If according the best information
 from antiquity the vultures were directed to let themselves be
 impregnated by the wind, why should the same thing not have happened
 even once in a human female? On account of this use the church fathers
 were "almost all" in the habit of relating this vulture fable, and now
 it can hardly remain doubtful that it also became known to Leonardo
 through so powerful a source.
 
 The origin of Leonardo's vulture phantasy can be conceived in the
 following manner: While reading in the writings of a church father or in
 a book on natural science that the vultures are all females and that
 they know to procreate without the cooeperation of a male, a memory
 emerged in him which became transformed into that phantasy, but which
 meant to say that he also had been such a vulture child, which had a
 mother but no father. An echo of pleasure which he experienced at his
 mother's breast was added to this in the manner as so old impressions
 alone can manifest themselves. The allusion to the idea of the holy
 virgin with the child, formed by the authors, which is so dear to every
 artist, must have contributed to it to make this phantasy seem to him
 valuable and important. For this helped him to identify himself with the
 Christ child, the comforter and savior of not alone this one woman.
 
 When we break up an infantile phantasy we strive to separate the real
 memory content from the later motives which modify and distort the same.
 In the case of Leonardo we now think that we know the real content of
 the phantasy. The replacement of the mother by the vulture indicates
 that the child missed the father and felt himself alone with his mother.
 The fact of Leonardo's illegitimate birth fits in with his vulture
 phantasy; only on account of it was he able to compare himself with a
 vulture child. But we have discovered as the next definite fact from his
 youth that at the age of five years he had already been received in his
 father's home; when this took place, whether a few months following his
 birth, or a few weeks before the taking of the assessment of taxes, is
 entirely unknown to us. The interpretation of the vulture phantasy then
 steps in and wants to tell us that Leonardo did not spend the first
 decisive years of his life with his father and his step-mother but with
 his poor, forsaken, real mother, so that he had time to miss his father.
 This still seems to be a rather meager and rather daring result of the
 psychoanalytic effort, but on further reflection it will gain in
 significance. Certainty will be promoted by mentioning the actual
 relations in Leonardo's childhood. According to the reports, his father
 Ser Piero da Vinci married the prominent Donna Albiera during the year
 of Leonardo's birth; it was to the childlessness of this marriage that
 the boy owed his legalized reception into his father's or rather
 grandfather's house during his fifth year. However, it is not customary
 to offer an illegitimate offspring to a young woman's care at the
 beginning of marriage when she is still expecting to be blessed with
 children. Years of disappointment must have elapsed before it was
 decided to adopt the probably handsomely developed illegitimate child as
 a compensation for legitimate children who were vainly hoped for. It
 harmonizes best with the interpretation of the vulture-phantasy, if at
 least three years or perhaps five years of Leonardo's life had elapsed
 before he changed from his lonely mother to his father's home. But then
 it had already become too late. In the first three or four years of life
 impressions are fixed and modes of reactions are formed towards the
 outer world which can never be robbed of their importance by any later
 experiences.
 
 If it is true that the incomprehensible childhood reminiscences and the
 person's phantasies based on them always bring out the most significant
 of his psychic development, then the fact corroborated by the vulture
 phantasy, that Leonardo passed the first years of his life alone with
 his mother must have been a most decisive influence on the formation of
 his inner life. Under the effect of this constellation it could not have
 been otherwise than that the child which in his young life encountered
 one problem more than other children, should have begun to ponder very
 passionately over this riddle and thus should have become an
 investigator early in life. For he was tortured by the great questions
 where do children come from and what has the father to do with their
 origin. The vague knowledge of this connection between his investigation
 and his childhood history has later drawn from him the exclamation that
 it was destined that he should deeply occupy himself with the problem of
 the bird's flight, for already in his cradle he had been visited by a
 vulture. To trace the curiosity which is directed to the flight of the
 bird to the infantile sexual investigation will be a later task which
 will not be difficult to accomplish.
 
 
 
 
 III
 
 
 The element of the vulture represents to us the real memory content in
 Leonardo's childhood phantasy; the association into which Leonardo
 himself placed his phantasy threw a bright light on the importance of
 this content for his later life. In continuing the work of
 interpretation we now encounter the strange problem why this memory
 content was elaborated into a homosexual situation. The mother who
 nursed the child, or rather from whom the child suckled was transformed
 into a vulture which stuck its tail into the child's mouth. We maintain
 that the "coda" (tail) of the vulture, following the common substituting
 usages of language, cannot signify anything else but a male genital or
 penis. But we do not understand how the phantastic activity came to
 furnish precisely this maternal bird with the mark of masculinity, and
 in view of this absurdity we become confused at the possibility of
 reducing this phantastic structure to rational sense.
 
 However, we must not despair. How many seemingly absurd dreams have we
 not forced to give up their sense! Why should it become more difficult
 to accomplish this in a childhood phantasy than in a dream!
 
 Let us remember the fact that it is not good to find one isolated
 peculiarity, and let us hasten to add another to it which is still more
 striking.
 
 The vulture-headed goddess _Mut_ of the Egyptians, a figure of
 altogether impersonal character, as expressed by Drexel in Roscher's
 lexicon, was often fused with other maternal deities of living
 individuality like Isis and Hathor, but she retained besides her
 separate existence and reverence. It was especially characteristic of
 the Egyptian pantheon that the individual gods did not perish in this
 amalgamation. Besides the composition of deities the simple divine image
 remained in her independence. In most representations the vulture-headed
 maternal deity was formed by the Egyptians in a phallic manner,[35] her
 body which was distinguished as feminine by its breasts also bore the
 masculine member in a state of erection.
 
 The goddess Mut thus evinced the same union of maternal and paternal
 characteristics as in Leonardo's vulture phantasy. Should we explain
 this concurrence by the assumption that Leonardo knew from studying his
 book the androgynous nature of the maternal vulture? Such possibility is
 more than questionable; it seems that the sources accessible to him
 contained nothing of remarkable determination. It is more likely that
 here as there the agreement is to be traced to a common, effective and
 unknown motive.
 
 Mythology can teach us that the androgynous formation, the union of
 masculine and feminine sex characteristics, did not belong to the
 goddess Mut alone but also to other deities such as Isis and Hathor, but
 in the latter perhaps only insofar as they possessed also a motherly
 nature and became fused with the goddess Mut.[36] It teaches us further
 that other Egyptian deities such as Neith of Sais out of whom the Greek
 Athene was later formed, were originally conceived as androgynous or
 dihermaphroditic, and that the same held true for many of the Greek
 gods, especially of the Dionysian circle, as well as for Aphrodite who
 was later restricted to a feminine love deity. Mythology may also offer
 the explanation that the phallus which was added to the feminine body
 was meant to denote the creative primitive force of nature, and that all
 these hermaphroditic deistic formations express the idea that only a
 union of the masculine and feminine elements can result in a worthy
 representation of divine perfection. But none of these observations
 explain the psychological riddle, namely, that the phantasy of men takes
 no offense at the fact that a figure which was to embody the essence of
 the mother should be provided with the mark of the masculine power which
 is the opposite of motherhood.
 
 The explanation comes from the infantile sexual theories. There really
 was a time in which the male genital was found to be compatible with
 the representation of the mother. When the male child first directs his
 curiosity to the riddle of the sexual life, he is dominated by the
 interest for his own genitals. He finds this part of the body too
 valuable and too important to believe that it would be missing in other
 persons to whom he feels such a resemblance. As he cannot divine that
 there is still another equally valuable type of genital formation he
 must grasp the assumption that all persons, also women, possess such a
 member as he. This preconception is so firm in the youthful investigator
 that it is not destroyed even by the first observation of the genitals
 in little girls. His perception naturally tells him that there is
 something different here than in him, but he is unable to admit to
 himself as the content of this perception that he cannot find this
 member in girls. That this member may be missing is to him a dismal and
 unbearable thought, and he therefore seeks to reconcile it by deciding
 that it also exists in girls but it is still very small and that it will
 grow later.[37] If this expectation does not appear to be fulfilled on
 later observation he has at his disposal another way of escape. The
 member also existed in the little girl but it was cut off and on its
 place there remained a wound. This progress of the theory already makes
 use of his own painful experience; he was threatened in the meantime
 that this important organ will be taken away from him if it will form
 too much of an interest for his occupation. Under the influence of this
 threat of castration he now interprets his conception of the female
 genital, henceforth he will tremble for his masculinity, but at the same
 time he will look with contempt upon those unhappy creatures upon whom,
 in his opinion, this cruel punishment had already been visited.
 
 Before the child came under the domination of the castration complex, at
 the time when he still held the woman at her full value, he began to
 manifest an intensive desire to look as an erotic activity of his
 impulse. He wished to see the genitals of other persons, originally
 probably because he wished to compare them with his own. The erotic
 attraction which emanated from the person of his mother soon reached
 its height in the longing to see her genital which he believed to be a
 penis. With the cognition acquired only later that the woman has no
 penis, this longing often becomes transformed into its opposite and
 gives place to disgust, which in the years of puberty may become the
 cause of psychic impotence, of misogyny and of lasting homosexuality.
 But the fixation on the once so vividly desired object, the penis of the
 woman, leaves ineradicable traces in the psychic life of the child,
 which has gone through that fragment of infantile sexual investigation
 with particular thoroughness. The fetich-like reverence for the feminine
 foot and shoe seems to take the foot only as a substitutive symbol for
 the once revered and since then missed member of the woman. The
 "braid-slashers" without knowing it play the part of persons who perform
 the act of castration on the female genital.
 
 One will not gain any correct understanding of the activities of the
 infantile sexuality and probably will consider these communications
 unworthy of belief, as long as one does not relinquish the attitude of
 our cultural depreciation of the genitals and of the sexual functions in
 general. To understand the infantile psychic life one has to look to
 analogies from primitive times. For a long series of generations we have
 been in the habit of considering the genitals or _pudenda_ as objects of
 shame, and in the case of more successful sexual repression as objects
 of disgust. The majority of those living to-day only reluctantly obey
 the laws of propagation, feeling thereby that their human dignity is
 being offended and degraded. What exists among us of the other
 conception of the sexual life is found only in the uncultivated and in
 the lower social strata; among the higher and more refined types it is
 concealed as culturally inferior, and its activity is ventured only
 under the embittered admonition of a guilty conscience. It was quite
 different in the primitive times of the human race. From the laborious
 collections of students of civilization one gains the conviction that
 the genitals were originally the pride and hope of living beings, they
 enjoyed divine worship, and the divine nature of their functions was
 transported to all newly acquired activities of mankind. Through
 sublimation of its essential elements there arose innumerable
 god-figures, and at the time when the relation of official religions
 with sexual activity was already hidden from the general consciousness,
 secret cults labored to preserve it alive among a number of the
 initiated. In the course of cultural development it finally happened
 that so much godliness and holiness had been extracted from sexuality
 that the exhausted remnant fell into contempt. But considering the
 indestructibility which is in the nature of all psychic impressions one
 need not wonder that even the most primitive forms of genital worship
 could be demonstrated until quite recent times, and that language,
 customs and superstitions of present day humanity contain the remnants
 of all phases of this course of development.[38]
 
 Important biological analogies have taught us that the psychic
 development of the individual is a short repetition of the course of
 development of the race, and we shall therefore not find improbable what
 the psychoanalytic investigation of the child's psyche asserts
 concerning the infantile estimation of the genitals. The infantile
 assumption of the maternal penis is thus the common source of origin for
 the androgynous formation of the maternal deities like the Egyptian
 goddess Mut and the vulture's "coda" (tail) in Leonardo's childhood
 phantasy. As a matter of fact, it is only through misunderstanding that
 these deistic representations are designated hermaphroditic in the
 medical sense of the word. In none of them is there a union of the true
 genitals of both sexes as they are united in some deformed beings to the
 disgust of every human eye; but besides the breast as a mark of
 motherhood there is also the male member, just as it existed in the
 first imagination of the child about his mother's body. Mythology has
 retained for the faithful this revered and very early fancied bodily
 formation of the mother. The prominence given to the vulture-tail in
 Leonardo's phantasy we can now translate as follows: At that time when I
 directed my tender curiosity to my mother I still adjudged to her a
 genital like my own. A further testimonial of Leonardo's precocious
 sexual investigation, which in our opinion became decisive for his
 entire life.
 
 A brief reflection now admonishes us that we should not be satisfied
 with the explanation of the vulture-tail in Leonardo's childhood
 phantasy. It seems as if it contained more than we as yet understand.
 For its more striking feature really consisted in the fact that the
 nursing at the mother's breast was transformed into being nursed, that
 is into a passive act which thus gives the situation an undoubted
 homosexual character. Mindful of the historical probability that
 Leonardo behaved in life as a homosexual in feeling, the question
 obtrudes itself whether this phantasy does not point to a causal
 connection between Leonardo's childhood relations to his mother and the
 later manifest, if only ideal, homosexuality. We would not venture to
 draw such conclusion from Leonardo's disfigured reminiscence were it not
 for the fact that we know from our psychoanalytic investigation of
 homosexual patients that such a relation exists, indeed it really is an
 intimate and necessary relation.
 
 Homosexual men who have started in our times an energetic action against
 the legal limitations of their sexual activity are fond of representing
 themselves through theoretical spokesmen as evincing a sexual variation,
 which may be distinguished from the very beginning, as an intermediate
 stage of sex or as "a third sex." In other words, they maintain that
 they are men who are forced by organic determinants originating in the
 germ to find that pleasure in the man which they cannot feel in the
 woman. As much as one would wish to subscribe to their demands out of
 humane considerations, one must nevertheless exercise reserve regarding
 their theories which were formulated without regard for the psychic
 genesis of homosexuality. Psychoanalysis offers the means to fill this
 gap and to put to test the assertions of the homosexuals. It is true
 that psychoanalysis fulfilled this task in only a small number of
 people, but all investigation thus far undertaken brought the same
 surprising results.[39] In all our male homosexuals there was a very
 intensive erotic attachment to a feminine person, as a rule to the
 mother, which was manifest in the very first period of childhood and
 later entirely forgotten by the individual. This attachment was produced
 or favored by too much love from the mother herself, but was also
 furthered by the retirement or absence of the father during the
 childhood period. Sadger emphasizes the fact that the mothers of his
 homosexual patients were often man-women, or women with energetic traits
 of character who were able to crowd out the father from the place
 allotted to him in the family. I have sometimes observed the same thing,
 but I was more impressed by those cases in which the father was absent
 from the beginning or disappeared early so that the boy was altogether
 under feminine influence. It almost seems that the presence of a strong
 father would assure for the son the proper decision in the selection of
 his object from the opposite sex.
 
 Following this primary stage, a transformation takes place whose
 mechanisms we know but whose motive forces we have not yet grasped. The
 love of the mother cannot continue to develop consciously so that it
 merges into repression. The boy represses the love for the mother by
 putting himself in her place, by identifying himself with her, and by
 taking his own person as a model through the similarity of which he is
 guided in the selection of his love object. He thus becomes homosexual;
 as a matter of fact he returns to the stage of autoerotism, for the boys
 whom the growing adult now loves are only substitutive persons or
 revivals of his own childish person, whom he loves in the same way as
 his mother loved him. We say that he finds his love object on the road
 to narcism, for the Greek legend called a boy Narcissus to whom nothing
 was more pleasing than his own mirrored image, and who became
 transformed into a beautiful flower of this name.
 
 Deeper psychological discussions justify the assertion that the person
 who becomes homosexual in this manner remains fixed in his unconscious
 on the memory picture or his mother, By repressing the love for his
 mother he conserves the same in his unconscious and henceforth remains
 faithful to her. When as a lover he seems to pursue boys, he really thus
 runs away from women who could cause him to become faithless to his
 mother. Through direct observation of individual cases we could
 demonstrate that he who is seemingly receptive only of masculine stimuli
 is in reality influenced by the charms emanating from women just like a
 normal person, but each and every time he hastens to transfer the
 stimulus he received from the woman to a male object and in this manner
 he repeats again and again the mechanism through which he acquired his
 homosexuality.
 
 It is far from us to exaggerate the importance of these explanations
 concerning the psychic genesis of homosexuality. It is quite clear that
 they are in crass opposition to the official theories of the homosexual
 spokesmen, but we are aware that these explanations are not sufficiently
 comprehensive to render possible a final explanation of the problem.
 What one calls homosexual for practical purposes may have its origin in
 a variety of psychosexual inhibiting processes, and the process
 recognized by us is perhaps only one among many, and has reference only
 to one type of "homosexuality." We must also admit, that the number of
 cases in our homosexual type which shows the conditions required by us,
 exceeds by far those cases in which the resulting effect really appears,
 so that even we cannot reject the supposed cooeperation of unknown
 constitutional factors from which one was otherwise wont to deduce the
 whole of homosexuality. As a matter of fact there would be no occasion
 for entering into the psychic genesis of the form of homosexuality
 studied by us if there were not a strong presumption that Leonardo, from
 whose vulture-phantasy we started, really belonged to this one type of
 homosexuality.
 
 As little as is known concerning the sexual behavior of the great artist
 and investigator, we must still trust to the probability that the
 testimonies of his contemporaries did not go far astray. In the light of
 this tradition he appears to us as a man whose sexual need and activity
 were extraordinarily low, as if a higher striving had raised him above
 the common animal need of mankind. It may be open to doubt whether he
 ever sought direct sexual gratification, and in what manner, or whether
 he could dispense with it altogether. We are justified, however, to look
 also in him for those emotional streams which imperatively force others
 to the sexual act, for we cannot imagine a human psychic life in whose
 development the sexual desire in the broadest sense, the libido, has not
 had its share, whether the latter has withdrawn itself far from the
 original aim or whether it was detained from being put into execution.
 
 Anything but traces of unchanged sexual desire we need not expect in
 Leonardo. These point however to one direction and allow us to count him
 among homosexuals. It has always been emphasized that he took as his
 pupils only strikingly handsome boys and youths. He was kind and
 considerate towards them, he cared for them and nursed them himself when
 they were ill, just like a mother nurses her children, as his own mother
 might have cared for him. As he selected them on account of their
 beauty rather than their talent, none of them--Cesare da Sesto, G.
 Boltraffio, Andrea Salaino, Francesco Melzi and the others--ever became
 a prominent artist. Most of them could not make themselves independent
 of their master and disappeared after his death without leaving a more
 definite physiognomy to the history of art. The others who by their
 productions earned the right to call themselves his pupils, as Luini and
 Bazzi, nicknamed Sodoma, he probably did not know personally.
 
 We realize that we will have to face the objection that Leonardo's
 behavior towards his pupils surely had nothing to do with sexual
 motives, and permits no conclusion as to his sexual peculiarity. Against
 this we wish to assert with all caution that our conception explains
 some strange features in the master's behavior which otherwise would
 have remained enigmatical. Leonardo kept a diary; he made entries in his
 small hand, written from right to left which were meant only for
 himself. It is to be noted that in this diary he addressed himself with
 "thou": "Learn from master Lucca the multiplication of roots."[40] "Let
 master d'Abacco show thee the square of the circle."[41] Or on the
 occasion of a journey he entered in his diary:
 
 "I am going to Milan to look after the affairs of my garden ... order
 two pack-sacks to be made. Ask Boltraffio to show thee his turning-lathe
 and let him polish a stone on it.--Leave the book to master Andrea il
 Todesco."[42] Or he wrote a resolution of quite different significance:
 "Thou must show in thy treatise that the earth is a star, like the moon
 or resembling it, and thus prove the nobility of our world."[43]
 
 In this diary, which like the diaries of other mortals often skim over
 the most important events of the day with only few words or ignore them
 altogether, one finds a few entries which on account of their
 peculiarity are cited by all of Leonardo's biographers. They show
 notations referring to the master's petty expenses, which are recorded
 with painful exactitude as if coming from a pedantic and strictly
 parsimonious family father, while there is nothing to show that he spent
 greater sums, or that the artist was well versed in household
 management. One of these notes refers to a new cloak which he bought for
 his pupil Andrea Salaino:[44]
 
     Silver brocade              Lira 15 Soldi 4
     Crimson velvet for trimming   "   9  "    0
     Braid                         "   0  "    9
     Buttons                       "   0  "   12
 
 Another very detailed notice gives all the expenses which he incurred
 through the bad qualities and the thieving tendencies of another pupil
 or model: "On 21st day of April, 1490, I started this book and started
 again the horse.[45] Jacomo came to me on Magdalene day, 1490, at the
 age of ten years (marginal note: thievish, mendacious, willful,
 gluttonous). On the second day I ordered for him two shirts, a pair of
 pants, and a jacket, and as I put the money away to pay for the things
 named he stole the money from my purse, and it was never possible to
 make him confess, although I was absolutely sure of it (marginal note: 4
 Lira ...)." So the report continues concerning the misdeeds of the
 little boy and concludes with the expense account: "In the first year, a
 cloak, Lira 2: 6 shirts, Lira 4: 3 jackets, Lira 6: 4 pair of socks,
 Lira 7, etc."[46]
 
 Leonardo's biographers, to whom nothing was further than to solve the
 riddle in the psychic life of their hero from these slight weaknesses
 and peculiarities, were wont to remark in connection with these peculiar
 accounts that they emphasized the kindness and consideration of the
 master for his pupils. They forget thereby that it is not Leonardo's
 behavior that needs an explanation, but the fact that he left us these
 testimonies of it. As it is impossible to ascribe to him the motive of
 smuggling into our hands proofs of his kindness, we must assume that
 another affective motive caused him to write this down. It is not easy
 to conjecture what this motive was, and we could not give any if not
 for another account found among Leonardo's papers which throws a
 brilliant light on these peculiarly petty notices about his pupils'
 clothes, and others of a kind:[47]
 
     Burial expenses following the death of Caterina    27 florins
       2 pounds wax                                     18  "
       Cataphalc                                        12  "
       For the transportation and erection of the cross  4  "
       Pall bearers                                      8  "
       To 4 priests and 4 clerics                       20  "
       Ringing of bells                                  2  "
       To grave diggers                                 16  "
       For the approval--to the officials                1  "
                                                      ------------
                  To sum up                            108 florins
 
     Previous expenses:
       To the doctor           4 florins
       For sugar and candles  12   "
                                                        16 florins
                                                      ------------
                     Sum total                         124 florins
 
 The writer Merejkowski is the only one who can tell us who this Caterina
 was. From two different short notices he concludes that she was the
 mother of Leonardo, the poor peasant woman from Vinci, who came to Milan
 in 1493 to visit her son then 41 years old. While on this visit she fell
 ill and was taken to the hospital by Leonardo, and following her death
 she was buried by her son with such sumptuous funeral.[48]
 
 This deduction of the psychological writer of romances is not capable of
 proof, but it can lay claim to so many inner probabilities, it agrees so
 well with everything we know besides about Leonardo's emotional activity
 that I cannot refrain from accepting it as correct. Leonardo succeeded
 in forcing his feelings under the yoke of investigation and in
 inhibiting their free utterance, but even in him there were episodes in
 which the suppression obtained expression, and one of these was the
 death of his mother whom he once loved so ardently. Through this account
 of the burial expenses he represents to us the mourning of his mother in
 an almost unrecognizable distortion. We wonder how such a distortion
 could have come about, and we certainly cannot grasp it when viewed
 under normal mental processes. But similar mechanisms are familiar to us
 under the abnormal conditions of neuroses, and especially in the
 so-called _compulsion neurosis_. Here one can observe how the
 expressions of more intensive feelings have been displaced to trivial
 and even foolish performances. The opposing forces succeeded in debasing
 the expression of these repressed feelings to such an extent that one is
 forced to estimate the intensity of these feelings as extremely
 unimportant, but the imperative compulsion with which these
 insignificant acts express themselves betrays the real force of the
 feelings which are rooted in the unconscious, which consciousness would
 wish to disavow. Only by bearing in mind the mechanisms of compulsion
 neurosis can one explain Leonardo's account of the funeral expenses of
 his mother. In his unconscious he was still tied to her as in childhood,
 by erotically tinged feelings; the opposition of the repression of this
 childhood love which appeared later stood in the way of erecting to her
 in his diary a different and more dignified monument, but what resulted
 as a compromise of this neurotic conflict had to be put in operation and
 hence the account was entered in the diary which thus came to the
 knowledge of posterity as something incomprehensible.
 
 It is not venturing far to transfer the interpretation obtained from the
 funeral expenses to the accounts dealing with his pupils. Accordingly we
 would say that here also we deal with a case in which Leonardo's meager
 remnants of libidinous feelings compulsively obtained a distorted
 expression. The mother and the pupils, the very images of his own boyish
 beauty, would be his sexual objects--as far as his sexual repression
 dominating his nature would allow such manifestations--and the
 compulsion to note with painful circumstantiality his expenses on their
 behalf, would designate the strange betrayal of his rudimentary
 conflicts. From this we would conclude that Leonardo's love-life really
 belonged to that type of homosexuality, the psychic development of which
 we were able to disclose, and the appearance of the homosexual situation
 in his vulture-phantasy would become comprehensible to us, for it states
 nothing more or less than what we have asserted before concerning that
 type. It requires the following interpretation: Through the erotic
 relations to my mother I became a homosexual.[49]
 
 
 
 
 IV
 
 
 The vulture phantasy of Leonardo still absorbs our interest. In words
 which only too plainly recall a sexual act ("and has many times struck
 against my lips with his tail"), Leonardo emphasizes the intensity of
 the erotic relations between the mother and the child. A second memory
 content of the phantasy can readily be conjectured from the association
 of the activity of the mother (of the vulture) with the accentuation of
 the mouth zone. We can translate it as follows: My mother has pressed on
 my mouth innumerable passionate kisses. The phantasy is composed of the
 memories of being nursed and of being kissed by the mother.
 
 [Illustration: MONA LISA]
 
 A kindly nature has bestowed upon the artist the capacity to express in
 artistic productions his most secret psychic feelings hidden even to
 himself, which powerfully affect outsiders who are strangers to the
 artist without their being able to state whence this emotivity comes.
 Should there be no evidence in Leonardo's work of that which his memory
 retained as the strongest impression of his childhood? One would have to
 expect it. However, when one considers what profound transformations an
 impression of an artist has to experience before it can add its
 contribution to the work of art, one is obliged to moderate considerably
 his expectation of demonstrating something definite. This is especially
 true in the case of Leonardo.
 
 He who thinks of Leonardo's paintings will be reminded by the remarkably
 fascinating and puzzling smile which he enchanted on the lips of all his
 feminine figures. It is a fixed smile on elongated, sinuous lips which
 is considered characteristic of him and is preferentially designated as
 "Leonardesque." In the singular and beautiful visage of the Florentine
 Monna Lisa del Giocondo it has produced the greatest effect on the
 spectators and even perplexed them. This smile was in need of an
 interpretation, and received many of the most varied kind but none of
 them was considered satisfactory. As Gruyer puts it: "It is almost four
 centuries since Monna Lisa causes all those to lose their heads who have
 looked upon her for some time."[50]
 
 Muther states:[51] "What fascinates the spectator is the demoniacal
 charm of this smile. Hundreds of poets and writers have written about
 this woman, who now seems to smile upon us seductively and now to stare
 coldly and lifelessly into space, but nobody has solved the riddle of
 her smile, nobody has interpreted her thoughts. Everything, even the
 scenery is mysterious and dream-like, trembling as if in the sultriness
 of sensuality."
 
 The idea that two diverse elements were united in the smile of Monna
 Lisa has been felt by many critics. They therefore recognize in the play
 of features of the beautiful Florentine lady the most perfect
 representation of the contrasts dominating the love-life of the woman
 which is foreign to man, as that of reserve and seduction, and of most
 devoted tenderness and inconsiderateness in urgent and consuming
 sensuality. Muentz[52] expresses himself in this manner: "One knows what
 indecipherable and fascinating enigma Monna Lisa Gioconda has been
 putting for nearly four centuries to the admirers who crowd around her.
 No artist (I borrow the expression of the delicate writer who hides
 himself under the pseudonym of Pierre de Corlay) has ever translated in
 this manner the very essence of femininity: the tenderness and coquetry,
 the modesty and quiet voluptuousness, the whole mystery of the heart
 which holds itself aloof, of a brain which reflects, and of a
 personality who watches itself and yields nothing from herself except
 radiance...." The Italian Angelo Conti[53] saw the picture in the Louvre
 illumined by a ray of the sun and expressed himself as follows: "The
 woman smiled with a royal calmness, her instincts of conquest, of
 ferocity, the entire heredity of the species, the will of seduction and
 ensnaring, the charm of the deceiver, the kindness which conceals a
 cruel purpose, all that appears and disappears alternately behind the
 laughing veil and melts into the poem of her smile.... Good and evil,
 cruelty and compassion, graceful and cat-like, she laughed...."
 
 Leonardo painted this picture four years, perhaps from 1503 until 1507,
 during his second sojourn in Florence when he was about the age of fifty
 years. According to Vasari he applied the choicest artifices in order to
 divert the lady during the sittings and to hold that smile firmly on her
 features. Of all the gracefulness that his brush reproduced on the
 canvas at that time the picture preserves but very little in its present
 state. During its production it was considered the highest that art
 could accomplish; it is certain, however, that it did not satisfy
 Leonardo himself, that he pronounced it as unfinished and did not
 deliver it to the one who ordered it, but took it with him to France
 where his benefactor Francis I, acquired it for the Louvre.
 
 Let us leave the physiognomic riddle of Monna Lisa unsolved, and let us
 note the unequivocal fact that her smile fascinated the artist no less
 than all the spectators for these 400 years. This captivating smile had
 thereafter returned in all of his pictures and in those of his pupils.
 As Leonardo's Monna Lisa was a portrait we cannot assume that he has
 added to her face a trait of his own so difficult to express which she
 herself did not possess. It seems, we cannot help but believe, that he
 found this smile in his model and became so charmed by it that from now
 on he endowed it on all the free creations of his phantasy. This obvious
 conception is, e.g., expressed by A. Konstantinowa in the following
 manner:[54]
 
 "During the long period in which the master occupied himself with the
 portrait of Monna Lisa del Gioconda, he entered into the physiognomic
 delicacies of this feminine face with such sympathy of feeling that he
 transferred these creatures, especially the mysterious smile and the
 peculiar glance, to all faces which he later painted or drew. The mimic
 peculiarity of Gioconda can even be perceived in the picture of John the
 Baptist in the Louvre. But above all they are distinctly recognized in
 the features of Mary in the picture of St. Anne of the Louvre."
 
 But the case could have been different. The need for a deeper reason for
 the fascination which the smile of Gioconda exerted on the artist from
 which he could not rid himself has been felt by more than one of his
 biographers. W. Pater, who sees in the picture of Monna Lisa the
 embodiment of the entire erotic experience of modern man, and discourses
 so excellently on "that unfathomable smile always with a touch of
 something sinister in it, which plays over all Leonardo's work," leads
 us to another track when he says:[55]
 
 "Besides, the picture is a portrait. From childhood we see this image
 defining itself on the fabric of his dream; and but for express
 historical testimony, we might fancy that this was but his ideal lady,
 embodied and beheld at last."
 
 Herzfeld surely must have had something similar in mind when stating
 that in Monna Lisa Leonardo encountered himself and therefore found it
 possible to put so much of his own nature into the picture, "whose
 features from time immemorial have been imbedded with mysterious
 sympathy in Leonardo's soul."[56]
 
 Let us endeavor to clear up these intimations. It was quite possible
 that Leonardo was fascinated by the smile of Monna Lisa, because it had
 awakened something in him which had slumbered in his soul for a long
 time, in all probability an old memory. This memory was of sufficient
 importance to stick to him once it had been aroused; he was forced
 continually to provide it with new expression. The assurance of Pater
 that we can see an image like that of Monna Lisa defining itself from
 Leonardo's childhood on the fabric of his dreams, seems worthy of belief
 and deserves to be taken literally.
 
 Vasari mentions as Leonardo's first artistic endeavors, "heads of women
 who laugh."[57] The passage, which is beyond suspicion, as it is not
 meant to prove anything, reads more precisely as follows:[58] "He formed
 in his youth some laughing feminine heads out of lime, which have been
 reproduced in plaster, and some heads of children, which were as
 beautiful as if modeled by the hands of a master...."
 
 Thus we discover that his practice of art began with the representation
 of two kinds of objects, which would perforce remind us of the two kinds
 of sexual objects which we have inferred from the analysis of his
 vulture phantasy. If the beautiful children's heads were reproductions
 of his own childish person, then the laughing women were nothing else
 but reproductions of Caterina, his mother, and we are beginning to have
 an inkling of the possibility that his mother possessed that mysterious
 smile which he lost, and which fascinated him so much when he found it
 again in the Florentine lady.[59]
 
 [Illustration: SAINT ANNE]
 
 The painting of Leonardo which in point of time stands nearest to the
 Monna Lisa is the so-called Saint Anne of the Louvre, representing
 Saint Anne, Mary and the Christ child. It shows the Leonardesque smile
 most beautifully portrayed in the two feminine heads. It is impossible
 to find out how much earlier or later than the portrait of Monna Lisa
 Leonardo began to paint this picture. As both works extended over years,
 we may well assume that they occupied the master simultaneously. But it
 would best harmonize with our expectation if precisely the absorption in
 the features of Monna Lisa would have instigated Leonardo to form the
 composition of Saint Anne from his phantasy. For if the smile of
 Gioconda had conjured up in him the memory of his mother, we would
 naturally understand that he was first urged to produce a glorification
 of motherhood, and to give back to her the smile he found in that
 prominent lady. We may thus allow our interest to glide over from the
 portrait of Monna Lisa to this other hardly less beautiful picture, now
 also in the Louvre.
 
 Saint Anne with the daughter and grandchild is a subject seldom treated
 in the Italian art of painting; at all events Leonardo's representation
 differs widely from all that is otherwise known. Muther states:[60]
 
 "Some masters like Hans Fries, the older Holbein, and Girolamo dei
 Libri, made Anne sit near Mary and placed the child between the two.
 Others like Jakob Cornelicz in his Berlin pictures, represented Saint
 Anne as holding in her arm the small figure of Mary upon which sits the
 still smaller figure of the Christ child." In Leonardo's picture Mary
 sits on her mother's lap, bent forward and is stretching out both arms
 after the boy who plays with a little lamb, and must have slightly
 maltreated it. The grandmother has one of her unconcealed arms propped
 on her hip and looks down on both with a blissful smile. The grouping is
 certainly not quite unconstrained. But the smile which is playing on the
 lips of both women, although unmistakably the same as in the picture of
 Monna Lisa, has lost its sinister and mysterious character; it expresses
 a calm blissfulness.[61]
 
 On becoming somewhat engrossed in this picture it suddenly dawns upon
 the spectator that only Leonardo could have painted this picture, as
 only he could have formed the vulture phantasy. This picture contains
 the synthesis of the history of Leonardo's childhood, the details of
 which are explainable by the most intimate impressions of his life. In
 his father's home he found not only the kind step-mother Donna Albiera,
 but also the grandmother, his father's mother, Monna Lucia, who we will
 assume was not less tender to him than grandmothers are wont to be. This
 circumstance must have furnished him with the facts for the
 representation of a childhood guarded by a mother and grandmother.
 Another striking feature of the picture assumes still greater
 significance. Saint Anne, the mother of Mary and the grandmother of the
 boy who must have been a matron, is formed here perhaps somewhat more
 mature and more serious than Saint Mary, but still as a young woman of
 unfaded beauty. As a matter of fact Leonardo gave the boy two mothers,
 the one who stretched out her arms after him and another who is seen in
 the background, both are represented with the blissful smile of maternal
 happiness. This peculiarity of the picture has not failed to excite the
 wonder of the authors. Muther, for instance, believes that Leonardo
 could not bring himself to paint old age, folds and wrinkles, and
 therefore formed also Anne as a woman of radiant beauty. Whether one can
 be satisfied with this explanation is a question. Other writers have
 taken occasion to deny generally the sameness of age of mother and
 daughter.[62] However, Muther's tentative explanation is sufficient
 proof for the fact that the impression of Saint Anne's youthful
 appearance was furnished by the picture and is not an imagination
 produced by a tendency.
 
 Leonardo's childhood was precisely as remarkable as this picture. He has
 had two mothers, the first his true mother, Caterina, from whom he was
 torn away between the age of three and five years, and a young tender
 step-mother, Donna Albiera, his father's wife. By connecting this fact
 of his childhood with the one mentioned above and condensing them into a
 uniform fusion, the composition of Saint Anne, Mary and the Child,
 formed itself in him. The maternal form further away from the boy
 designated as grandmother, corresponds in appearance and in spatial
 relation to the boy, with the real first mother, Caterina. With the
 blissful smile of Saint Anne the artist actually disavowed and concealed
 the envy which the unfortunate mother felt when she was forced to give
 up her son to her more aristocratic rival, as once before her lover.
 
 Our feeling that the smile of Monna Lisa del Gioconda awakened in the
 man the memory of the mother of his first years of childhood would thus
 be confirmed from another work of Leonardo. Following the production of
 Monna Lisa, Italian artists depicted in Madonnas and prominent ladies
 the humble dipping of the head and the peculiar blissful smile of the
 poor peasant girl Caterina, who brought to the world the noble son who
 was destined to paint, investigate, and suffer.
 
 When Leonardo succeeded in reproducing in the face of Monna Lisa the
 double sense comprised in this smile, namely, the promise of unlimited
 tenderness, and sinister threat (in the words of Pater), he remained
 true even in this to the content of his earliest reminiscence. For the
 love of the mother became his destiny, it determined his fate and the
 privations which were in store for him. The impetuosity of the caressing
 to which the vulture phantasy points was only too natural. The poor
 forsaken mother had to give vent through mother's love to all her
 memories of love enjoyed as well as to all her yearnings for more
 affection; she was forced to it, not only in order to compensate herself
 for not having a husband, but also the child for not having a father who
 wanted to love it. In the manner of all ungratified mothers she thus
 took her little son in place of her husband, and robbed him of a part of
 his virility by the too early maturing of his eroticism. The love of the
 mother for the suckling whom she nourishes and cares for is something
 far deeper reaching than her later affection for the growing child. It
 is of the nature of a fully gratified love affair, which fulfills not
 only all the psychic wishes but also all physical needs, and when it
 represents one of the forms of happiness attainable by man it is due, in
 no little measure, to the possibility of gratifying without reproach
 also wish feelings which were long repressed and designated as
 perverse.[63] Even in the happiest recent marriage the father feels that
 his child, especially the little boy has become his rival, and this
 gives origin to an antagonism against the favorite one which is deeply
 rooted in the unconscious.
 
 When in the prime of his life Leonardo re-encountered that blissful and
 ecstatic smile as it had once encircled his mother's mouth in caressing,
 he had long been under the ban of an inhibition, forbidding him ever
 again to desire such tenderness from women's lips. But as he had become
 a painter he endeavored to reproduce this smile with his brush and
 furnish all his pictures with it, whether he executed them himself or
 whether they were done by his pupils under his direction, as in Leda,
 John, and Bacchus. The latter two are variations of the same type.
 Muther says: "From the locust eater of the Bible Leonardo made a
 Bacchus, an Apollo, who with a mysterious smile on his lips, and with
 his soft thighs crossed, looks on us with infatuated eyes." These
 pictures breathe a mysticism into the secret of which one dares not
 penetrate; at most one can make the effort to construct the connection
 to Leonardo's earlier productions. The figures are again androgynous but
 no longer in the sense of the vulture phantasy, they are pretty boys of
 feminine tenderness with feminine forms; they do not cast down their
 eyes but gaze mysteriously triumphant, as if they knew of a great happy
 issue concerning which one must remain quiet; the familiar fascinating
 smile leads us to infer that it is a love secret. It is possible that in
 these forms Leonardo disavowed and artistically conquered the
 unhappiness of his love life, in that he represented the wish
 fulfillment of the boy infatuated with his mother in such blissful union
 of the male and female nature.
 
 [Illustration: JOHN THE BAPTIST]
 
 
 
 
 V
 
 
 Among the entries in Leonardo's diaries there is one which absorbs the
 reader's attention through its important content and on account of a
 small formal error. In July, 1504, he wrote:
 
 "Adi 9 Luglio, 1504, mercoledi, a ore 7 mori Ser Piero da Vinci notalio
 al palazzo del Potesta, mio padre, a ore 7. Era d'eta d'anni 80, lascio
 10 figlioli maschi e 2 feminine."[64]
 
 The notice as we see deals with the death of Leonardo's father. The
 slight error in its form consists in the fact that in the computation of
 the time "at 7 o'clock" is repeated two times, as if Leonardo had
 forgotten at the end of the sentence that he had already written it at
 the beginning. It is only a triviality to which any one but a
 psychoanalyst would pay no attention. Perhaps he would not even notice
 it, or if his attention would be called to it he would say "that can
 happen to anybody during absent-mindedness or in an affective state and
 has no further meaning."
 
 The psychoanalyst thinks differently; to him nothing is too trifling as
 a manifestation of hidden psychic processes; he has long learned that
 such forgetting or repetition is full of meaning, and that one is
 indebted to the "absent-mindedness" when it makes possible the betrayal
 of otherwise concealed feelings.
 
 We would say that, like the funeral account of Caterina and the expense
 account of the pupils, this notice, too, corresponds to a case in which
 Leonardo was unsuccessful in suppressing his affects, and the long
 hidden feeling forcibly obtained a distorted expression. Also the form
 is similar, it shows the same pedantic precision, the same pushing
 forward of numbers.[65]
 
 We call such a repetition a perseveration. It is an excellent means to
 indicate the affective accentuation. One recalls for example Saint
 Peter's angry speech against his unworthy representative on earth, as
 given in Dante's Paradiso:[66]
 
     "Quegli ch'usurpa in terra il luoga mio
      Il luoga mio, il luogo mio, che vaca
      Nella presenza del Figliuol di Dio,
      Fatto ha del cimiterio mio cloaca."
 
 Without Leonardo's affective inhibition the entry into the diary could
 perhaps have read as follows: To-day at 7 o'clock died my father, Ser
 Piero da Vinci, my poor father! But the displacement of the
 perseveration to the most indifferent determination of the obituary to
 dying-hour robs the notice of all pathos and lets us recognize that
 there was something here to conceal and to suppress.
 
 Ser Piero da Vinci, notary and descendant of notaries, was a man of
 great energy who attained respect and affluence. He was married four
 times, the two first wives died childless, and not till the third
 marriage has he gotten the first legitimate son, in 1476, when Leonardo
 was 24 years old, and had long ago changed his father's home for the
 studio of his master Verrocchio. With the fourth and last wife whom he
 married when he was already in the fifties he begot nine sons and two
 daughters.[67]
 
 To be sure the father also assumed importance in Leonardo's psychosexual
 development, and what is more, it was not only in a negative sense,
 through his absence during the boy's first childhood years, but also
 directly through his presence in his later childhood. He who as a child
 desires his mother, cannot help wishing to put himself in his father's
 place, to identify himself with him in his phantasy and later make it
 his life's task to triumph over him. As Leonardo was not yet five years
 old when he was received into his paternal home, the young step-mother,
 Albiera, certainly must have taken the place of his mother in his
 feeling, and this brought him into that relation of rivalry to his
 father which may be designated as normal. As is known, the preference
 for homosexuality did not manifest itself till near the years of
 puberty. When Leonardo accepted this preference the identification with
 the father lost all significance for his sexual life, but continued in
 other spheres of non-erotic activity. We hear that he was fond of luxury
 and pretty raiments, and kept servants and horses, although according to
 Vasari's words "he hardly possessed anything and worked little." We
 shall not hold his artistic taste entirely responsible for all these
 special likings; we recognize in them also the compulsion to copy his
 father and to excel him. He played the part of the great gentleman to
 the poor peasant girl, hence the son retained the incentive that he also
 play the great gentleman, he had the strong feeling "to out-herod
 Herod," and to show his father exactly how the real high rank looks.
 
 Whoever works as an artist certainly feels as a father to his works. The
 identification with his father had a fateful result in Leonardo's works
 of art. He created them and then troubled himself no longer about them,
 just as his father did not trouble himself about him. The later
 worriments of his father could change nothing in this compulsion, as the
 latter originated from the impressions of the first years of childhood,
 and the repression having remained unconscious was incorrigible through
 later experiences.
 
 At the time of the Renaissance, and even much later, every artist was in
 need of a gentleman of rank to act as his benefactor. This patron was
 wont to give the artist commissions for work and entirely controlled his
 destiny. Leonardo found his patron in Lodovico Sforza, nicknamed Il
 Moro, a man of high aspirations, ostentations, diplomatically astute,
 but of an unstable and unreliable character. In his court in Milan,
 Leonardo spent the best period of his life, while in his service he
 evinced his most uninhibited productive activity as is evidenced in The
 Last Supper, and in the equestrian statue of Francesco Sforza. He left
 Milan before the catastrophe struck Lodovico Moro, who died a prisoner
 in a French prison. When the news of his benefactor's fate reached
 Leonardo he made the following entry in his diary: "The duke has lost
 state, wealth, and liberty, not one of his works will be finished by
 himself."[68] It is remarkable and surely not without significance that
 he here raises the same reproach to his benefactor that posterity was to
 apply to him, as if he wanted to lay the responsibility to a person who
 substituted his father-series, for the fact that he himself left his
 works unfinished. As a matter of fact he was not wrong in what he said
 about the Duke.
 
 However, if the imitation of his father hurt him as an artist, his
 resistance against the father was the infantile determinant of his
 perhaps equally vast accomplishment as an artist. According to
 Merejkowski's beautiful comparison he was like a man who awoke too early
 in the darkness, while the others were all still asleep. He dared utter
 this bold principle which contains the justification for all independent
 investigation: _"Chi dispute allegando l'autorita non adopra l'ingegno
 ma piuttosto la memoria"_ (Whoever refers to authorities in disputing
 ideas, works with his memory rather than with his reason).[69] Thus he
 became the first modern natural philosopher, and his courage was
 rewarded by an abundance of cognitions and suggestions; since the Greek
 period he was the first to investigate the secrets of nature, relying
 entirely on his observation and his own judgment. But when he learned to
 depreciate authority and to reject the imitation of the "ancients" and
 constantly pointed to the study of nature as the source of all wisdom,
 he only repeated in the highest sublimation attainable to man, which had
 already obtruded itself on the little boy who surveyed the world with
 wonder. To retranslate the scientific abstractions into concrete
 individual experiences, we would say that the "ancients" and authority
 only corresponded to the father, and nature again became the tender
 mother who nourished him. While in most human beings to-day, as in
 primitive times, the need for a support of some authority is so
 imperative that their world becomes shaky when their authority is
 menaced, Leonardo alone was able to exist without such support; but that
 would not have been possible had he not been deprived of his father in
 the first years of his life. The boldness and independence of his later
 scientific investigation presupposes that his infantile sexual
 investigation was not inhibited by his father, and this same spirit of
 scientific independence was continued by his withdrawing from sex.
 
 If any one like Leonardo escapes in his childhood his father's
 intimidation and later throws off the shackles of authority in his
 scientific investigation, it would be in gross contradiction to our
 expectation if we found that this same man remained a believer and
 unable to withdraw from dogmatic religion. Psychoanalysis has taught us
 the intimate connection between the father complex and belief in God,
 and daily demonstrates to us how youthful persons lose their religious
 belief as soon as the authority of the father breaks down. In the
 parental complex we thus recognize the roots of religious need; the
 almighty, just God, and kindly nature appear to us as grand sublimations
 of father and mother, or rather as revivals and restorations of the
 infantile conceptions of both parents. Religiousness is biologically
 traced to the long period of helplessness and need of help of the little
 child. When the child grows up and realizes his loneliness and weakness
 in the presence of the great forces of life, he perceives his condition
 as in childhood and seeks to disavow his despair through a regressive
 revival of the protecting forces of childhood.
 
 It does not seem that Leonardo's life disproves this conception of
 religious belief. Accusations charging him with irreligiousness, which
 in those times was equivalent to renouncing Christianity, were brought
 against him already in his lifetime, and were clearly described in the
 first biography given by Vasari.[70] In the second edition of his Vite
 (1568) Vasari left out this observation. In view of the extraordinary
 sensitiveness of his age in matters of religion it is perfectly
 comprehensible to us why Leonardo refrained from directly expressing his
 position to Christianity in his notes. As investigator he did not permit
 himself to be misled by the account of the creation of the holy
 scriptures; for instance, he disputed the possibility of a universal
 flood, and in geology he was as unscrupulous in calculating with hundred
 thousands of years as modern investigators.
 
 Among his "prophecies" one finds some things that would perforce offend
 the sensitive feelings of a religious Christian, e.g. Praying to the
 images of Saints, reads as follows:[71]
 
 "People talk to people who perceive nothing, who have open eyes and see
 nothing; they shall talk to them and receive no answer; they shall adore
 those who have ears and hear nothing; they shall burn lamps for those
 who do not see."
 
 Or: Concerning mourning on Good Friday (p. 297):
 
 "In all parts of Europe great peoples will bewail the death of one man
 who died in the Orient."
 
 It was asserted of Leonardo's art that he took away the last remnant of
 religious attachment from the holy figures and put them into human form
 in order to depict in them great and beautiful human feelings. Muther
 praises him for having overcome the feeling of decadence, and for having
 returned to man the right of sensuality and pleasurable enjoyment. The
 notices which show Leonardo absorbed in fathoming the great riddles of
 nature do not lack any expressions of admiration for the creator, the
 last cause of all these wonderful secrets, but nothing indicates that he
 wished to hold any personal relation to this divine force. The sentences
 which contain the deep wisdom of his last years breathe the resignation
 of the man who subjects himself to the laws of nature and expects no
 alleviation from the kindness or grace of God. There is hardly any doubt
 that Leonardo had vanquished dogmatic as well as personal religion, and
 through his work of investigation he had withdrawn far from the world
 aspect of the religious Christian.
 
 From our views mentioned before in the development of the infantile
 psychic life, it becomes clear that also Leonardo's first investigations
 in childhood occupied themselves with the problems of sexuality. But he
 himself betrays it to us through a transparent veil, in that he
 connects his impulse to investigate with the vulture phantasy, and in
 emphasizing the problem of the flight of the bird as one whose
 elaboration devolved upon him through special concatenations of fate. A
 very obscure as well as a prophetically sounding passage in his notes
 dealing with the flight of the bird demonstrates in the nicest way with
 how much affective interest he clung to the wish that he himself should
 be able to imitate, the art of flying: "The human bird shall take his
 first flight, filling the world with amazement, all writings with his
 fame, and bringing eternal glory to the nest whence he sprang." He
 probably hoped that he himself would sometimes be able to fly, and we
 know from the wish fulfilling dreams of people what bliss one expects
 from the fulfillment of this hope.
 
 But why do so many people dream that they are able to fly?
 Psychoanalysis answers this question by stating that to fly or to be a
 bird in the dream is only a concealment of another wish, to the
 recognition of which one can reach by more than one linguistic or
 objective bridge. When the inquisitive child is told that a big bird
 like the stork brings the little children, when the ancients have formed
 the phallus winged, when the popular designation of the sexual activity
 of man is expressed in German by the word "to bird" (voegeln), when the
 male member is directly called _l'uccello_ (bird) by the Italians, all
 these facts are only small fragments from a large collection which
 teaches us that the wish to be able to fly signifies in the dream
 nothing more or less than the longing for the ability of sexual
 accomplishment. This is an early infantile wish. When the grown-up
 recalls his childhood it appears to him as a happy time in which one is
 happy for the moment and looks to the future without any wishes, it is
 for this reason that he envies children. But if children themselves
 could inform us about it they would probably give different reports. It
 seems that childhood is not that blissful Idyl into which we later
 distort it, that on the contrary children are lashed through the years
 of childhood by the wish to become big, and to imitate the grown ups.
 This wish instigates all their playing. If in the course of their
 sexual investigation children feel that the grown up knows something
 wonderful in the mysterious and yet so important realm, what they are
 prohibited from knowing or doing, they are seized with a violent wish to
 know it, and dream of it in the form of flying, or prepare this disguise
 of the wish for their later flying dreams. Thus aviation, which has
 attained its aim in our times, has also its infantile erotic roots.
 
 By admitting that he entertained a special personal relation to the
 problem of flying since his childhood, Leonardo bears out what we must
 assume from our investigation of children of our times, namely, that his
 childhood investigation was directed to sexual matters. At least this
 one problem escaped the repression which has later estranged him from
 sexuality. From childhood until the age of perfect intellectual maturity
 this subject, slightly varied, continued to hold his interest, and it is
 quite possible that he was as little successful in his cherished art in
 the primary sexual sense as in his desires for mechanical matters, that
 both wishes were denied to him.
 
 As a matter of fact the great Leonardo remained infantile in some ways
 throughout his whole life; it is said that all great men retain
 something of the infantile. As a grown up he still continued playing,
 which sometimes made him appear strange and incomprehensible to his
 contemporaries. When he constructed the most artistic mechanical toys
 for court festivities and receptions we are dissatisfied thereby because
 we dislike to see the master waste his power on such petty stuff. He
 himself did not seem averse to giving his time to such things. Vasari
 reports that he did similar things even when not urged to it by request:
 "There (in Rome) he made a doughy mass out of wax, and when it softened
 he formed thereof very delicate animals filled with air; when he blew
 into them they flew in the air, and when the air was exhausted they fell
 to the ground. For a peculiar lizard caught by the wine-grower of
 Belvedere Leonardo made wings from skin pulled off from other lizards,
 which he filled with mercury so that they moved and trembled when it
 walked; he then made for it eyes, a beard and horns, tamed it and put it
 in a little box and terrified all his friends with it."[72] Such
 playing often served him as an expression of serious thoughts: "He had
 often cleaned the intestines of a sheep so well that one could hold them
 in the hollow of the hand; he brought them into a big room, and attached
 them to a blacksmith's bellows which he kept in an adjacent room, he
 then blew them up until they filled up the whole room so that everybody
 had to crowd into a corner. In this manner he showed how they gradually
 became transparent and filled up with air, and as they were at first
 limited to very little space and gradually became more and more extended
 in the big room, he compared them to a genius."[73] His fables and
 riddles evince the same playful pleasure in harmless concealment and
 artistic investment, the riddles were put into the form of prophecies;
 almost all are rich in ideas and to a remarkable degree devoid of wit.
 
 The plays and jumps which Leonardo allowed his phantasy have in some
 cases quite misled his biographers who misunderstood this part of his
 nature. In Leonardo's Milanese manuscripts one finds, for example,
 outlines of letters to the "Diodario of Sorio (Syria), viceroy of the
 holy Sultan of Babylon," in which Leonardo presents himself as an
 engineer sent to these regions of the Orient in order to construct some
 works. In these letters he defends himself against the reproach of
 laziness, he furnishes geographical descriptions of cities and
 mountains, and finally discusses a big elementary event which occurred
 while he was there.[74]
 
 In 1881, J. P. Richter had endeavored to prove from these documents that
 Leonardo made these traveler's observations when he really was in the
 service of the Sultan of Egypt, and that while in the Orient he embraced
 the Mohammedan religion. This sojourn in the Orient should have taken
 place in the time of 1483, that is, before he removed to the court of
 the Duke of Milan. However, it was not difficult for other authors to
 recognize the illustrations of this supposed journey to the Orient as
 what they really were, namely, phantastic productions of the youthful
 artist which he created for his own amusement, and in which he probably
 brought to expression his wishes to see the world and experience
 adventures.
 
 A phantastic formation is probably also the "Academia Vinciana," the
 acceptance of which is due to the existence of five or six most clever
 and intricate emblems with the inscription of the Academy. Vasari
 mentions these drawings but not the Academy.[75] Muentz who placed such
 ornament on the cover of his big work on Leonardo belongs to the few who
 believe in the reality of an "Academia Vinciana."
 
 It is probable that this impulse to play disappeared in Leonardo's
 maturer years, that it became discharged in the investigating activity
 which signified the highest development of his personality. But the fact
 that it continued so long may teach us how slowly one tears himself away
 from his infantilism after having enjoyed in his childhood supreme
 erotic happiness which is later unattainable.
 
 
 
 
 VI
 
 
 It would be futile to delude ourselves that at present, readers find
 every pathography unsavory. This attitude is excused with the reproach
 that from a pathographic elaboration of a great man one never obtains an
 understanding of his importance and his attainments, that it is
 therefore useless mischief to study in him things which could just as
 well be found in the first comer. However, this criticism is so clearly
 unjust that it can only be grasped when viewed as a pretext and a
 disguise for something. As a matter of fact pathography does not aim at
 making comprehensible the attainments of the great man; no one should
 really be blamed for not doing something which one never promised. The
 real motives for the opposition are quite different. One finds them when
 one bears in mind that biographers are fixed on their heroes in quite a
 peculiar manner. Frequently they take the hero as the object of study
 because, for reasons of their personal emotional life, they bear him a
 special affection from the very outset. They then devote themselves to a
 work of idealization which strives to enroll the great men among their
 infantile models, and to revive through him, as it were, the infantile
 conception of the father. For the sake of this wish they wipe out the
 individual features in his physiognomy, they rub out the traces of his
 life's struggle with inner and outer resistances, and do not tolerate in
 him anything of human weakness or imperfection; they then give us a
 cold, strange, ideal form instead of the man to whom we could feel
 distantly related. It is to be regretted that they do this, for they
 thereby sacrifice the truth to an illusion, and for the sake of their
 infantile phantasies they let slip the opportunity to penetrate into the
 most attractive secrets of human nature.[76]
 
 Leonardo himself, judging from his love for the truth and his
 inquisitiveness, would have interposed no objections to the effort of
 discovering the determinations of his psychic and intellectual
 development from the trivial peculiarities and riddles of his nature. We
 respect him by learning from him. It does no injury to his greatness to
 study the sacrifices which his development from the child must have
 entailed, and to the compile factors which have stamped on his person
 the tragic feature of failure.
 
 Let us expressly emphasize that we have never considered Leonardo as a
 neurotic or as a "nervous person" in the sense of this awkward term.
 Whoever takes it amiss that we should even dare apply to him viewpoints
 gained from pathology, still clings to prejudices which we have at
 present justly given up. We no longer believe that health and disease,
 normal and nervous, are sharply distinguished from each other, and that
 neurotic traits must be judged as proof of general inferiority. We know
 to-day that neurotic symptoms are substitutive formations for certain
 repressive acts which have to be brought about in the course of our
 development from the child to the cultural man, that we all produce
 such substitutive formations, and that only the amount, intensity, and
 distribution of these substitutive formations justify the practical
 conception of illness and the conclusion of constitutional inferiority.
 Following the slight signs in Leonardo's personality we would place him
 near that neurotic type which we designate as the "compulsive type," and
 we would compare his investigation with the "reasoning mania" of
 neurotics, and his inhibitions with the so-called "abulias" of the
 latter.
 
 The object of our work was to explain the inhibitions in Leonardo's
 sexual life and in his artistic activity. For this purpose we shall now
 sum up what we could discover concerning the course of his psychic
 development.
 
 We were unable to gain any knowledge about his hereditary factors, on
 the other hand we recognize that the accidental circumstances of his
 childhood produced a far reaching disturbing effect. His illegitimate
 birth deprived him of the influence of a father until perhaps his fifth
 year, and left him to the tender seduction of a mother whose only
 consolation he was. Having been kissed by her into sexual prematurity,
 he surely must have entered into a phase of infantile sexual activity of
 which only one single manifestation was definitely evinced, namely, the
 intensity of his infantile sexual investigation. The impulse for looking
 and inquisitiveness were most strongly stimulated by his impressions
 from early childhood; the enormous mouth-zone received its accentuation
 which it had never given up. From his later contrasting behavior, as the
 exaggerated sympathy for animals, we can conclude that this infantile
 period did not lack in strong sadistic traits.
 
 An energetic shift of repression put an end to this infantile excess,
 and established the dispositions which became manifest in the years of
 puberty. The most striking result of this transformation was a turning
 away from all gross sensual activities. Leonardo was able to lead a life
 of abstinence and made the impression of an asexual person. When the
 floods of pubescent excitement came over the boy they did not make him
 ill by forcing him to costly and harmful substitutive formations; owing
 to the early preference for sexual inquisitiveness, the greater part of
 the sexual needs could be sublimated into a general thirst after
 knowledge and so elude repression. A much smaller portion of the libido
 was applied to sexual aims, and represented the stunted sexual life of
 the grown up. In consequence of the repression of the love for the
 mother this portion assumed a homosexual attitude and manifested itself
 as ideal love for boys. The fixation on the mother, as well as the happy
 reminiscences of his relations with her, was preserved in his
 unconscious but remained for the time in an inactive state. In this
 manner the repression, fixation, and sublimation participated in the
 disposal of the contributions which the sexual impulse furnished to
 Leonardo's psychic life.
 
 From the obscure age of boyhood Leonardo appears to us as an artist, a
 painter, and sculptor, thanks to a specific talent which was probably
 enforced by the early awakening of the impulse for looking in the first
 years of childhood. We would gladly report in what way the artistic
 activity depends on the psychic primitive forces were it not that our
 material is inadequate just here. We content ourselves by emphasizing
 the fact, concerning which hardly any doubt still exists, that the
 productions of the artist give outlet also to his sexual desire, and in
 the case of Leonardo we can refer to the information imparted by Vasari,
 namely, that heads of laughing women and pretty boys, or representations
 of his sexual objects, attracted attention among his first artistic
 attempts. It seems that during his flourishing youth Leonardo at first
 worked in an uninhibited manner. As he took his father as a model for
 his outer conduct in life, he passed through a period of manly creative
 power and artistic productivity in Milan, where favored by fate he found
 a substitute for his father in the duke Lodovico Moro. But the
 experience of others was soon confirmed in him, to wit, that the almost
 complete suppression of the real sexual life does not furnish the most
 favorable conditions for the activity of the sublimated sexual
 strivings. The figurativeness of his sexual life asserted itself, his
 activity and ability to quick decisions began to weaken, the tendency to
 reflection and delay was already noticeable as a disturbance in The
 Holy Supper, and with the influence of the technique determined the fate
 of this magnificent work. Slowly a process developed in him which can be
 put parallel only to the regressions of neurotics. His development at
 puberty into the artist was outstripped by the early infantile
 determinant of the investigator, the second sublimation of his erotic
 impulses turned back to the primitive one which was prepared at the
 first repression. He became an investigator, first in service of his
 art, later independently and away from his art. With the loss of his
 patron, the substitute for his father, and with the increasing
 difficulties in his life, the regressive displacement extended in
 dimension. He became _"impacientissimo al pennello"_ (most impatient
 with the brush) as reported by a correspondent of the countess Isabella
 d'Este who desired to possess at any cost a painting from his hand.[77]
 His infantile past had obtained control over him. The investigation,
 however, which now took the place of his artistic production, seems to
 have born certain traits which betrayed the activity of unconscious
 impulses; this was seen in his insatiability, his regardless obstinacy,
 and in his lack of ability to adjust himself to actual conditions.
 
 At the summit of his life, in the age of the first fifties, at a time
 when the sex characteristics of the woman have already undergone a
 regressive change, and when the libido in the man not infrequently
 ventures into an energetic advance, a new transformation came over him.
 Still deeper strata of his psychic content became active again, but this
 further regression was of benefit to his art which was in a state of
 deterioration. He met the woman who awakened in him the memory of the
 happy and sensuously enraptured smile of his mother, and under the
 influence of this awakening he acquired back the stimulus which guided
 him in the beginning of his artistic efforts when he formed the smiling
 woman. He painted Monna Lisa, Saint Anne, and a number of mystic
 pictures which were characterized by the enigmatic smile. With the help
 of his oldest erotic feelings he triumphed in conquering once more the
 inhibition in his art. This last development faded away in the obscurity
 of the approaching old age. But before this his intellect rose to the
 highest capacity of a view of life, which was far in advance of his
 time.
 
 In the preceding chapters I have shown what justification one may have
 for such representation of Leonardo's course of development, for this
 manner of arranging his life and explaining his wavering between art and
 science. If after accomplishing these things I should provoke the
 criticism from even friends and adepts of psychoanalysis, that I have
 only written a psychoanalytic romance, I should answer that I certainly
 did not overestimate the reliability of these results. Like others I
 succumbed to the attraction emanating from this great and mysterious
 man, in whose being one seems to feel powerful propelling passions,
 which after all can only evince themselves so remarkably subdued.
 
 But whatever may be the truth about Leonardo's life we cannot relinquish
 our effort to investigate it psychoanalytically before we have finished
 another task. In general we must mark out the limits which are set up
 for the working capacity of psychoanalysis in biography so that every
 omitted explanation should not be held up to us as a failure.
 Psychoanalytic investigation has at its disposal the data of the history
 of the person's life, which on the one hand consists of accidental
 events and environmental influences, and on the other hand of the
 reported reactions of the individual. Based on the knowledge of psychic
 mechanisms it now seeks to investigate dynamically the character of the
 individual from his reactions, and to lay bare his earliest psychic
 motive forces as well as their later transformations and developments.
 If this succeeds then the reaction of the personality is explained
 through the cooeperation of constitutional and accidental factors or
 through inner and outer forces. If such an undertaking, as perhaps in
 the case of Leonardo, does not yield definite results then the blame for
 it is not to be laid to the faulty or inadequate psychoanalytic method,
 but to the vague and fragmentary material left by tradition about this
 person. It is, therefore, only the author who forced psychoanalysis to
 furnish an expert opinion on such insufficient material, who is to be
 held responsible for the failure.
 
 However, even if one had at his disposal a very rich historical material
 and could manage the psychic mechanism with the greatest certainty, a
 psychoanalytic investigation could not possibly furnish the definite
 view, if it concerns two important questions, that the individual could
 turn out only so and not differently. Concerning Leonardo we had to
 represent the view that the accident of his illegitimate birth and the
 pampering of his mother exerted the most decisive influence on his
 character formation and his later fate, through the fact that the sexual
 repression following this infantile phase caused him to sublimate his
 libido into a thirst after knowledge, and thus determined his sexual
 inactivity for his entire later life. The repression, however, which
 followed the first erotic gratification of childhood did not have to
 take place, in another individual it would perhaps not have taken place
 or it would have turned out not nearly as profuse. We must recognize
 here a degree of freedom which can no longer be solved psychoanalytically.
 One is as little justified in representing the issue of this shift of
 repression as the only possible issue. It is quite probable that another
 person would not have succeeded in withdrawing the main part of his
 libido from the repression through sublimation into a desire for
 knowledge; under the same influences as Leonardo another person might
 have sustained a permanent injury to his intellectual work or an
 uncontrollable disposition to compulsion neurosis. The two
 characteristics of Leonardo which remained unexplained through
 psychoanalytic effort are first, his particular tendency to repress his
 impulses, and second, his extraordinary ability to sublimate the
 primitive impulses.
 
 The impulses and their transformations are the last things that
 psychoanalysis can discern. Henceforth it leaves the place to biological
 investigation. The tendency to repression, as well as the ability to
 sublimate, must be traced back to the organic bases of the character,
 upon which alone the psychic structure springs up. As artistic talent
 and productive ability are intimately connected with sublimation we
 have to admit that also the nature of artistic attainment is
 psychoanalytically inaccessible to us. Biological investigation of our
 time endeavors to explain the chief traits of the organic constitution
 of a person through the fusion of male and female predispositions in the
 material sense; Leonardo's physical beauty as well as his
 left-handedness furnish here some support. However, we do not wish to
 leave the ground of pure psychologic investigation. Our aim remains to
 demonstrate the connection between outer experiences and reactions of
 the person over the path of the activity of the impulses. Even if
 psychoanalysis does not explain to us the fact of Leonardo's artistic
 accomplishment, it still gives us an understanding of the expressions
 and limitations of the same. It does seem as if only a man with
 Leonardo's childhood experiences could have painted Monna Lisa and Saint
 Anne, and could have supplied his works with that sad fate and so obtain
 unheard of fame as a natural historian; it seems as if the key to all
 his attainments and failures was hidden in the childhood phantasy of
 the vulture.
 
 But may one not take offense at the results of an investigation which
 concede to the accidents of the parental constellation so decisive an
 influence on the fate of a person, which, for example, subordinates
 Leonardo's fate to his illegitimate birth and to the sterility of his
 first step-mother Donna Albiera? I believe that one has no right to feel
 so; if one considers accident as unworthy of determining our fate, it is
 only a relapse to the pious aspect of life, the overcoming of which
 Leonardo himself prepared when he put down in writing that the sun does
 not move. We are naturally grieved over the fact that a just God and a
 kindly providence do not guard us better against such influences in our
 most defenseless age. We thereby gladly forget that as a matter of fact
 everything in our life is accident from our very origin through the
 meeting of spermatozoa and ovum, accident, which nevertheless
 participates in the lawfulness and fatalities of nature, and lacks only
 the connection to our wishes and illusions. The division of life's
 determinants into the "fatalities" of our constitution and the
 "accidents" of our childhood may still be indefinite in individual
 cases, but taken altogether one can no longer entertain any doubt about
 the importance of precisely our first years of childhood. We all still
 show too little respect for nature, which in Leonardo's deep words
 recalling Hamlet's speech _"is full of infinite reasons which never
 appeared in experience."_[78] Every one of us human beings corresponds
 to one of the infinite experiments in which these "reasons of nature"
 force themselves into experience.
 
 
 THE END
 
 
 FOOTNOTES:
 
 [1] In the words of J. Burckhard, cited by Alexandra Konstantinowa, Die
 Entwicklung des Madonnentypus by Leonardo da Vinci, Strassburg, 1907.
 
 [2] Vite, etc. LXXXIII. 1550-1584.
 
 [3] Traktat von der Malerei, new edition and introduction by Marie
 Herzfeld, E. Diederichs, Jena, 1909.
 
 [4] Solmi. La resurrezione dell' opera di Leonardo in the collected
 work; Leonardo da Vinci. Conferenze Florentine, Milan, 1910.
 
 [5] Scognamiglio Ricerche e Documenti sulla giovinezza di Leonardo da
 Vinci. Napoli, 1900.
 
 [6] W. v. Seidlitz. Leonardo da Vinci, der Wendepunkt der Renaissance,
 1909, Bd. I, p. 203.
 
 [7] W. v. Seidlitz, l. c. Bd. II, p. 48
 
 [8] W. Pater. The Renaissance, p. 107, The Macmillan Co., 1910. "But it
 is certain that at one period of his life he had almost ceased to be an
 artist."
 
 [9] Cf. v. Seidlitz, Bd. I die Geschichte der Restaurations--und
 Rettungsversuche.
 
 [10] Muentz. Leonard de Vinci, Paris, 1899, p. 18. (A letter of a
 contemporary from India to a Medici alludes to this peculiarity of
 Leonardo. Given by Richter: The literary Works of Leonardo da Vinci.)
 
 [11] F. Botazzi. Leonardo biologo e anatomico. Conferenze Florentine, p.
 186, 1910.
 
 [12] E. Solmi: Leonardo da Vinci. German Translation by Emmi Hirschberg.
 Berlin, 1908.
 
 [13] Marie Herzfeld: Leonardo da Vinci der Denker, Forscher und Poet.
 Second edition. Jena, 1906.
 
 [14] His collected witticisms--belle facezie,--which are not translated,
 may be an exception. Cf. Herzfeld, Leonardo da Vinci, p. 151.
 
 [15] According to Scognamiglio (l. c. p. 49) reference is made to this
 episode in an obscure and even variously interpreted passage of the
 Codex Atlanticus: "Quando io feci Domeneddio putto voi mi metteste in
 prigione, ora s'io lo fo grande, voi mi farete peggio."
 
 [16] Merejkowski: The Romance of Leonardo da Vinci, translated by
 Herbert Trench, G. P. Putnam Sons, New York. It forms the second of the
 historical Trilogy entitled Christ and Anti-Christ, of which the first
 volume is Julian Apostata, and the third volume is Peter the Great and
 Alexei.
 
 [17] Solmi l. c. p. 46.
 
 [18] Filippo Botazzi, l. c. p. 193.
 
 [19] Marie Herzfeld: Leonardo da Vinci, Traktat von der Malerei, Jena,
 1909 (Chap. I, 64).
 
 [20] "Such transfiguration of science and of nature into emotions, or
 one might say, religion, is one of the characteristic traits of da
 Vinci's manuscripts, which one finds expressed hundreds of times."
 Solmi: La resurrezione, etc, p. 11.
 
 [21] La resurrezione, etc., p. 8: "Leonardo placed the study of nature
 as a precept to painting ... later the passion for study became
 dominating, he no longer wished to acquire science for art, but science
 for science' sake."
 
 [22] For an enumeration of his scientific attainments see Marie
 Herzfeld's interesting introduction (Jena, 1906) to the essays of the
 Conference Florentine, 1910, and elsewhere.
 
 [23] For a corroboration of this improbable sounding assertion see the
 "Analysis of the Phobia of a Five-year-old Boy," Jahrbuch fuer
 Psychoanalytische und Psychopathologische Forschungen, Bd. I, 1909, and
 the similar observation in Bd. II, 1910. In an essay concerning
 "Infantile Theories of Sex" (Sammlungen kleiner Schriften zur
 Neurosenlehre, p. 167, Second Series, 1909), I wrote: "But this
 reasoning and doubting serves as a model for all later intellectual work
 in problems, and the first failure acts as a paralyzer for all times."
 
 [24] Scognamiglio 1. c., p. 15.
 
 [25] Cited by Scognamiglio from the Codex Atlanticus, p. 65.
 
 [26] Cf. here the "Bruchstueck einer Hysterieanalyse," in Neurosenlehre,
 Second series, 1909.
 
 [27] Horapollo: Hieroglyphica I, II. [Greek: Metera de graphontex ...
 gupa zographonsin].
 
 [28] Roscher: Ausf. Lexicon der griechischen und roemischen Mythologie.
 Artikel Mut, II Bd., 1894-1897.--Lanzone. Dizionario di Mitologia
 egizia. Torino, 1882.
 
 [29] H. Hartleben, Champollion. Sein Leben und sein Werk, 1906.
 
 [30] "[Greek: gypa de arrena ou phasigenesthai pote, aila pheleias
 apasas]," cited by v. Roemer. Ueber die androgynische Idee des Lebens,
 Jahrb. f. Sexuelle Zwischenstufen, V, 1903, p. 732.
 
 [31] Plutarch: Veluti scarabaeos mares tantum esse putarunt Aegyptii sic
 inter vultures mares non inveniri statuerunt
 
 [32] Horapollinis Niloi Hieroglyphica edidit Conradus Leemans
 Amstelodami, 1835. The words referring to the sex of the vulture read as
 follows (p. 14): "[Greek: petera men hepeide arren en touto genei ton
 zoon ouch hyparchei.]."
 
 [33] E. Muentz, 1. c., p. 282.
 
 [34] E. Muentz, 1. c.
 
 [35] See the illustrations in Lanzone l. c. T. CXXXVI-VIII.
 
 [36] v. Roemer l. c.
 
 [37] Cf. the observations in the Jahrbuch fuer Psychoanalytische und
 Psychopathologische Forschungen, Vol. I, 1909.
 
 [38] Cf. Richard Payne Knight: The Cult of Priapus.
 
 [39] Prominently among those who undertook these investigations are I.
 Sadger, whose results I can essentially corroborate from my own
 experience. I am also aware that Stekel of Vienna, Ferenczi of Budapest,
 and Brill of New York, came to the same conclusions.
 
 [40] Edm. Solmi: Leonardo da Vinci, German translation, p. 152.
 
 [41] Solmi, 1. c. p. 203.
 
 [42] Leonardo thus behaves like one who was in the habit of making a
 daily confession to another person whom he now replaced by his diary.
 For an assumption as to who this person may have been see Merejkowski,
 p. 309.
 
 [43] M. Herzfeld: Leonardo da Vinci, 1906, p. 141.
 
 [44] The wording is that of Merejkowski, 1. c. p. 237.
 
 [45] The equestrian monument of Francesco Sforza.
 
 [46] The full wording is found in M. Herzfeld, 1. c. p. 45.
 
 [47] Merejkowski 1. c.--As a disappointing illustration of the vagueness
 of the information concerning Leonardo's intimate life, meager as it is,
 I mention the fact that the same expense account is given by Solmi with
 considerable variation (German translation, p. 104). The most serious
 difference is the substitution of florins by soldi. One may assume that
 in this account florins do not mean the old "gold florins," but those
 used at a later period which amounted to 1-2/3 lira or 33-1/2
 soldi.--Solmi represents Caterina as a servant who had taken care of
 Leonardo's household for a certain time. The source from which the two
 representations of this account were taken was not accessible to me.
 
 [48] "Caterina came in July, 1493."
 
 [49] The manner of expression through which the repressed libidio could
 manifest itself in Leonardo, such as circumstantiality and marked
 interest in money, belongs to those traits of character which emanate
 from anal eroticism. Cf. Character und Analerotik in the second series
 of my Sammlung zur Neurosenlehre, 1909, also Brill's Psychoanalysis, its
 Theories and Practical Applications, Chap. XIII, Anal Eroticism and
 Character, Saunders, Philadelphia.
 
 [50] Seidlitz: Leonardo da Vinci, II Bd., p. 280.
 
 [51] Geschichte der Malerei, Bd. I, p. 314.
 
 [52] l. c. p. 417.
 
 [53] A. Conti: Leonardo pittore, Conferenze Fiorentine, l. c. p. 93.
 
 [54] l. c. p. 45.
 
 [55] W. Pater: The Renaissance, p. 124, The Macmillan Co., 1910.
 
 [56] M. Herzfeld: Leonardo da Vinci, p. 88.
 
 [57] Scognamiglio, l. c. p. 32.
 
 [58] L. Schorn, Bd. III, 1843, p. 6.
 
 [59] The same is assumed by Merejkowski, who imagined a childhood for
 Leonardo which deviates in the essential points from ours, drawn from
 the results of the vulture phantasy. But if Leonardo himself had
 displayed this smile, tradition hardly would have failed to report to us
 this coincidence.
 
 [60] l. c. p. 309.
 
 [61] A. Konstantinowa, l. c., says: "Mary looks tenderly down on her
 beloved child with a smile that recalls the mysterious expression of la
 Gioconda." Elsewhere speaking of Mary she says: "The smile of Gioconda
 floats upon her features."
 
 [62] Cf. v. Seidlitz, l. c. Bd. II, p. 274.
 
 [63] Cf. Three Contributions to the Theory of Sex, translated by A. A.
 Brill, 2nd edition, 1916, Monograph series.
 
 [64] "On the 9th of July, 1504, Wednesday at 7 o'clock died Ser Piero da
 Vinci, notary at the palace of the Podesta, my father, at 7 o'clock. He
 was 80 years old, left 10 sons and 2 daughters." (E. Muentz, l. c. p.
 13.)
 
 [65] I shall overlook a greater error committed by Leonardo in his
 notice in that he gives his 77-year-old father 80 years.
 
 [66] "He who usurps on earth my place, my place, my place, which is void
 in the presence of the Son of God, has made out of my cemetery a sewer."
 Canto XXXVII.
 
 [67] It seems that in that passage of the diary Leonardo also erred in
 the number of his sisters and brothers, which stands in remarkable
 contrast to the apparent exactness of the same.
 
 [68] v. Seidlitz, l. c., II, p. 270.
 
 [69] Solmi, Conf. fior, p. 13.
 
 [70] Muentz, l. c., La Religion de Leonardo, p. 292, etc.
 
 [71] Herzfeld, p. 292.
 
 [72] Vasari, translated by Schorn, 1843.
 
 [73] Ebenda, p. 39.
 
 [74] Concerning these letters and the combinations connected with them
 see Muentz, l. c., p. 82; for the wording of the same and for the notices
 connected with them see Herzfeld, l. c., p. 223.
 
 [75] Besides, he lost some time in that he even made a drawing of a
 braided cord in which one could follow the thread from one end to the
 other, until it formed a perfectly circular figure; a very difficult and
 beautiful drawing of this kind is engraved on copper, in the center of
 it one can read the words: "Leonardus Vinci Academia" (p. 8).
 
 [76] This criticism holds quite generally and is not aimed at Leonardo's
 biographers in particular.
 
 [77] Seidlitz II, p. 271.
 
 [78] La natura e piena d'infinite ragione che non furono mai in
 isperienza, M. Herzfeld, l. c. p. II.
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 Produced by Chuck Greif and the Online Distributed
 Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net (This book was
 produced from scanned images of public domain material
 from the Google Print project.)
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 REFLECTIONS
 ON WAR AND DEATH
 
 
 
 
 REFLECTIONS
 ON WAR AND DEATH
 
 _By_
 PROFESSOR DR. SIGMUND FREUD, LL.D.
 
 _Authorized English Translation By_
 
 DR. A. A. BRILL and
 ALFRED B. KUTTNER
 
 [Illustration: colophon]
 
 MOFFAT, YARD AND COMPANY
 NEW YORK
 1918
 
 Copyright, 1918, by
 MOFFAT, YARD, AND COMPANY
 
 
 This book is offered to the American public at the present time in the
 hope that it may contribute something to the cause of international
 understanding and good will which has become the hope of the world.
 
 THE TRANSLATORS.
 
 
 
 
 REFLECTIONS
 ON WAR AND DEATH
 
 
 
 
 I
 
 THE DISAPPOINTMENTS OF WAR
 
 
 Caught in the whirlwind of these war times, without any real information
 or any perspective upon the great changes that have already occurred or
 are about to be enacted, lacking all premonition of the future, it is
 small wonder that we ourselves become confused as to the meaning of
 impressions which crowd in upon us or of the value of the judgments we
 are forming. It would seem as though no event had ever destroyed so much
 of the precious heritage of mankind, confused so many of the clearest
 intellects or so thoroughly debased what is highest.
 
 Even science has lost her dispassionate impartiality. Her deeply
 embittered votaries are intent upon seizing her weapons to do their
 share in the battle against the enemy. The anthropologist has to declare
 his opponent inferior and degenerate, the psychiatrist must diagnose him
 as mentally deranged. Yet it is probable that we are affected out of all
 proportion by the evils of these times and have no right to compare them
 with the evils of other times through which we have not lived.
 
 The individual who is not himself a combatant and therefore has not
 become a cog in the gigantic war machinery, feels confused in his
 bearings and hampered in his activities. I think any little suggestion
 that will make it easier for him to see his way more clearly will be
 welcome. Among the factors which cause the stay-at-home so much
 spiritual misery and are so hard to endure there are two in particular
 which I should like to emphasize and discuss. I mean the disappointment
 that this war has called forth and the altered attitude towards death to
 which it, in common with other wars, forces us.
 
 When I speak of disappointment everybody knows at once what I mean. One
 need not be a sentimentalist, one may realize the biological and
 physiological necessity of suffering in the economy of human life, and
 yet one may condemn the methods and the aims of war and long for its
 termination. To be sure, we used to say that wars cannot cease as long
 as nations live under such varied conditions, as long as they place
 such different values upon the individual life, and as long as the
 animosities which divide them represent such powerful psychic forces. We
 were therefore quite ready to believe that for some time to come there
 would be wars between primitive and civilized nations and between those
 divided by color, as well as with and among the partly enlightened and
 more or less civilized peoples of Europe. But we dared to hope
 differently. We expected that the great ruling nations of the white
 race, the leaders of mankind, who had cultivated world wide interests,
 and to whom we owe the technical progress in the control of nature as
 well as the creation of artistic and scientific cultural standards--we
 expected that these nations would find some other way of settling their
 differences and conflicting interests.
 
 Each of these nations had set a high moral standard to which the
 individual had to conform if he wished to be a member of the civilized
 community.
 
 These frequently over strict precepts demanded a great deal of him, a
 great self-restraint and a marked renunciation of his impulses. Above
 all he was forbidden to resort to lying and cheating, which are so
 extraordinarily useful in competition with others. The civilized state
 considered these moral standards the foundation of its existence, it
 drastically interfered if anyone dared to question them and often
 declared it improper even to submit them to the test of intellectual
 criticism. It was therefore assumed that the state itself would respect
 them and would do nothing that might contradict the foundations of its
 own existence. To be sure, one was aware that scattered among these
 civilized nations there were certain remnants of races that were quite
 universally disliked, and were therefore reluctantly and only to a
 certain extent permitted to participate in the common work of
 civilization where they had proved themselves sufficiently fit for the
 task. But the great nations themselves, one should have thought, had
 acquired sufficient understanding for the qualities they had in common
 and enough tolerance for their differences so that, unlike in the days
 of classical antiquity, the words "foreign" and "hostile" should no
 longer be synonyms.
 
 Trusting to this unity of civilized races countless people left hearth
 and home to live in strange lands and trusted their fortunes to the
 friendly relations existing between the various countries. And even he
 who was not tied down to the same spot by the exigencies of life could
 combine all the advantages and charms of civilized countries into a
 newer and greater fatherland which he could enjoy without hindrance or
 suspicion. He thus took delight in the blue and the grey ocean, the
 beauty of snow clad mountains and of the green lowlands, the magic of
 the north woods and the grandeur of southern vegetation, the atmosphere
 of landscapes upon which great historical memories rest, and the peace
 of untouched nature. The new fatherland was to him also a museum, filled
 with the treasure that all the artists of the world for many centuries
 had created and left behind. While he wandered from one hall to another
 in this museum he could give his impartial appreciation to the varied
 types of perfection that had been developed among his distant
 compatriots by the mixture of blood, by history, and by the
 peculiarities of physical environment. Here cool, inflexible energy was
 developed to the highest degree, there the graceful art of beautifying
 life, elsewhere the sense of law and order, or other qualities that have
 made man master of the earth.
 
 We must not forget that every civilized citizen of the world had created
 his own special "Parnassus" and his own "School of Athens." Among the
 great philosophers, poets, and artists of all nations he had selected
 those to whom he considered himself indebted for the best enjoyment and
 understanding of life, and he associated them in his homage both with
 the immortal ancients and with the familiar masters of his own tongue.
 Not one of these great figures seemed alien to him just because he spoke
 in a different language; be it the incomparable explorer of human
 passions or the intoxicated worshiper of beauty, the mighty and
 threatening seer or the sensitive scoffer, and yet he never reproached
 himself with having become an apostate to his own nation and his beloved
 mother tongue.
 
 The enjoyment of this common civilization was occasionally disturbed by
 voices which warned that in consequence of traditional differences wars
 were unavoidable even between those who shared this civilization. One
 did not want to believe this, but what did one imagine such a war to be
 like if it should ever come about? No doubt it was to be an opportunity
 to show the progress in man's community feeling since the days when the
 Greek amphictyonies had forbidden the destruction of a city belonging to
 the league, the felling of her oil trees and the cutting off of her
 water supply. It would be a chivalrous bout of arms for the sole purpose
 of establishing the superiority of one side or the other with the
 greatest possible avoidance of severe suffering which could contribute
 nothing to the decision, with complete protection for the wounded, who
 must withdraw from the battle, and for the physicians and nurses who
 devote themselves to their care. With every consideration, of course,
 for noncombatants, for the women who are removed from the activities of
 war, and for the children who, when grown up, are to become friends and
 co-workers on both sides. And with the maintenance, finally, of all the
 international projects and institutions in which the civilized community
 of peace times had expressed its corporate life.
 
 Such a war would still be horrible enough and full of burdens, but it
 would not have interrupted the development of ethical relations between
 the large human units, between nations and states. But the war in which
 we did not want to believe broke out and brought--disappointment. It is
 not only bloodier and more destructive than any foregoing war, as a
 result of the tremendous development of weapons of attack and defense,
 but it is at least as cruel, bitter, and merciless as any earlier war.
 It places itself above all the restrictions pledged in times of peace,
 the so-called rights of nations, it does not acknowledge the
 prerogatives of the wounded and of physicians, the distinction between
 peaceful and fighting members of the population, or the claims of
 private property. It hurls down in blind rage whatever bars its way, as
 though there were to be no future and no peace after it is over. It
 tears asunder all community bonds among the struggling peoples and
 threatens to leave a bitterness which will make impossible any
 re-establishment of these ties for a long time to come.
 
 It has also brought to light the barely conceivable phenomenon of
 civilized nations knowing and understanding each other so little that
 one can turn from the other with hate and loathing. Indeed one of these
 great civilized nations has become so universally disliked that it is
 even attempted to cast it out from the civilized community as though it
 were barbaric, although this very nation has long proved its
 eligibility through contribution after contribution of brilliant
 achievements. We live in the hope that impartial history will furnish
 the proof that this very nation, in whose language I am writing and for
 whose victory our dear ones are fighting, has sinned least against the
 laws of human civilization. But who is privileged to step forward at
 such a time as judge in his own defense?
 
 Races are roughly represented by the states they form and these states
 by the governments which guide them. The individual citizen can prove
 with dismay in this war what occasionally thrust itself upon him already
 in times of peace, namely, that the state forbids him to do wrong not
 because it wishes to do away with wrongdoing but because it wishes to
 monopolize it, like salt and tobacco. A state at war makes free use of
 every injustice, every act of violence, that would dishonor the
 individual. It employs not only permissible cunning but conscious lies
 and intentional deception against the enemy, and this to a degree which
 apparently outdoes what was customary in previous wars. The state
 demands the utmost obedience and sacrifice of its citizens, but at the
 same time it treats them as children through an excess of secrecy and a
 censorship of news and expression of opinion which render the minds of
 those who are thus intellectually repressed defenseless against every
 unfavorable situation and every wild rumor. It absolves itself from
 guarantees and treaties by which it was bound to other states, makes
 unabashed confession of its greed and aspiration to power, which the
 individual is then supposed to sanction out of patriotism.
 
 Let the reader not object that the state cannot abstain from the use of
 injustice because it would thereby put itself at a disadvantage. For the
 individual, too, obedience to moral standards and abstinence from brutal
 acts of violence are as a rule very disadvantageous, and the state but
 rarely proves itself capable of indemnifying the individual for the
 sacrifice it demands of him. Nor is it to be wondered at that the
 loosening of moral ties between the large human units has had a
 pronounced effect upon the morality of the individual, for our
 conscience is not the inexorable judge that teachers of ethics say it
 is; it has its origin in nothing but "social fear." Wherever the
 community suspends its reproach the suppression of evil desire also
 ceases, and men commit acts of cruelty, treachery, deception, and
 brutality, the very possibility of which would have been considered
 incompatible with their level of culture.
 
 Thus the civilized world-citizen of whom I spoke before may find himself
 helpless in a world that has grown strange to him when he sees his great
 fatherland disintegrated, the possessions common to mankind destroyed,
 and his fellow citizens divided and debased.
 
 Nevertheless several things might be said in criticism of his
 disappointment. Strictly speaking it is not justified, for it consists
 in the destruction of an illusion. Illusions commend themselves to us
 because they save us pain and allow us to enjoy pleasure instead. We
 must therefore accept it without complaint when they sometimes collide
 with a bit of reality against which they are dashed to pieces.
 
 Two things have roused our disappointment in this war: the feeble
 morality of states in their external relations which have inwardly acted
 as guardians of moral standards, and the brutal behavior of individuals
 of the highest culture of whom one would not have believed any such
 thing possible.
 
 Let us begin with the second point and try to sum up the view which we
 wish to criticise in a single compact statement. Through what process
 does the individual reach a higher stage of morality? The first answer
 will probably be: He is really good and noble from birth, in the first
 place. It is hardly necessary to give this any further consideration.
 The second answer will follow the suggestion that a process of
 development is involved here and will probably assume that this
 development consists in eradicating the evil inclinations of man and
 substituting good inclinations under the influence of education and
 cultural environment. In that case we may indeed wonder that evil should
 appear again so actively in persons who have been educated in this way.
 
 But this answer also contains the theory which we wish to contradict. In
 reality there is no such thing as "eradicating" evil. Psychological, or
 strictly speaking, psychoanalytic investigation proves, on the contrary,
 that the deepest character of man consists of impulses of an elemental
 kind which are similar in all human beings, the aim of which is the
 gratification of certain primitive needs. These impulses are in
 themselves neither good or evil. We classify them and their
 manifestations according to their relation to the needs and demands of
 the human community. It is conceded that all the impulses which society
 rejects as evil, such as selfishness and cruelty, are of this primitive
 nature.
 
 These primitive impulses go through a long process of development before
 they can become active in the adult. They become inhibited and diverted
 to other aims and fields, they unite with each other, change their
 objects and in part turn against one's own person. The formation of
 reactions against certain impulses give the deceptive appearance of a
 change of content, as if egotism had become altruism and cruelty had
 changed into sympathy. The formation of these reactions is favored by
 the fact that many impulses appear almost from the beginning in
 contrasting pairs; this is a remarkable state of affairs called the
 ambivalence of feeling and is quite unknown to the layman. This feeling
 is best observed and grasped through the fact that intense love and
 intense hate occur so frequently in the same person. Psychoanalysis goes
 further and states that the two contrasting feelings not infrequently
 take the same person as their object.
 
 What we call the character of a person does not really emerge until the
 fate of all these impulses has been settled, and character, as we all
 know, is very inadequately defined in terms of either "good" or "evil."
 Man is seldom entirely good or evil, he is "good" on the whole in one
 respect and "evil" in another, or "good" under certain conditions, and
 decidedly "evil" under others. It is interesting to learn that the
 earlier infantile existence of intense "bad" impulses is often the
 necessary condition of being "good" in later life. The most pronounced
 childish egotists may become the most helpful and self-sacrificing
 citizens; the majority of idealists, humanitarians, and protectors of
 animals have developed from little sadists and animal tormentors.
 
 The transformation of "evil" impulses is the result of two factors
 operating in the same sense, one inwardly and the other outwardly. The
 inner factor consists in influencing the evil or selfish impulses
 through erotic elements, the love needs of man interpreted in the widest
 sense. The addition of erotic components transforms selfish impulses
 into social impulses. We learn to value being loved as an advantage for
 the sake of which we can renounce other advantages. The outer factor is
 the force of education which represents the demands of the civilized
 environment and which is then continued through the direct influence of
 the cultural _milieu_.
 
 Civilization is based upon the renunciation of impulse gratification and
 in turn demands the same renunciation of impulses from every newcomer.
 During the individual's life a constant change takes place from outer to
 inner compulsion. The influences of civilization work through the erotic
 components to bring about the transformation of more and more of the
 selfish tendencies into altruistic and social tendencies. We may indeed
 assume that the inner compulsion which makes itself felt in the
 development of man was originally, that is, in the history of mankind,
 a purely external compulsion. Today people bring along a certain
 tendency (disposition) to transform the egotistic into social impulses
 as a part of their hereditary organization, which then responds to
 further slight incentives to complete the transformation. A part of this
 transformation of impulse must also be made during life. In this way the
 individual man is not only under the influence of his own contemporary
 cultural _milieu_ but is also subject to the influences of his ancestral
 civilization.
 
 If we call a person's individual capacity for transforming his
 egotistical impulses under the influence of love his cultural
 adaptability, we can say that this consists of two parts, one congenital
 and the other acquired, and we may add that the relation of these two to
 each other and to the untransformed part of the emotional life is a
 very variable one.
 
 In general we are inclined to rate the congenital part too highly, and
 are also in danger of over-valuing the whole cultural adaptability in
 its relation to that part of the impulse life which has remained
 primitive, that is, we are misled into judging people to be "better"
 than they really are. For there is another factor which clouds our
 judgment and falsifies the result in favor of what we are judging.
 
 We are of course in no position to observe the impulses of another
 person. We deduce them from his actions and his conduct, which we trace
 back to motives springing from his emotional life. In a number of cases
 such a conclusion is necessarily incorrect. The same actions which are
 "good" in the civilized sense may sometimes originate in "noble"
 motives and sometimes not. Students of the theory of ethics call only
 those acts "good" which are the expression of good impulses and refuse
 to acknowledge others as such. But society is on the whole guided by
 practical aims and does not bother about this distinction; it is
 satisfied if a man adapts his conduct and his actions to the precepts of
 civilization and asks little about his motives.
 
 We have heard that the outer compulsion which education and environment
 exercise upon a man brings about a further transformation of his impulse
 life for the good, the change from egotism to altruism. But this is not
 the necessary or regular effect of the outer compulsion. Education and
 environment have not only love premiums to offer but work with profit
 premiums of another sort, namely rewards and punishments. They can
 therefore bring it about that a person subject to their influence
 decides in favor of good conduct in the civilized sense without any
 ennobling of impulse or change from egotistic into altruistic
 inclinations. On the whole the consequence remains the same; only
 special circumstances will reveal whether the one person is always good
 because his impulses compel him to be so while another person is good
 only in so far as this civilized behavior is of advantage to his selfish
 purposes. But our superficial knowledge of the individual gives us no
 means of distinguishing the two cases, and we shall certainly be misled
 by our optimism into greatly over-estimating the number of people who
 have been transformed by civilization.
 
 Civilized society, which demands good conduct and does not bother about
 the impulse on which it is based, has thus won over a great many people
 to civilized obedience who do not thereby follow their own natures.
 Encouraged by this success, society has permitted itself to be misled
 into putting the ethical demands as high as possible, thereby forcing
 its members to move still further from their emotional dispositions. A
 continual emotional suppression is imposed upon them, the strain of
 which is indicated by the appearance of the most remarkable reactions
 and compensations.
 
 In the field of sexuality, where such suppression is most difficult to
 carry out, it results in reactions known as neurotic ailments. In other
 fields the pressure of civilization shows no pathological results but
 manifests itself in distorted characters and in the constant readiness
 of the inhibited impulses to enforce their gratification at any fitting
 opportunity.
 
 Anyone thus forced to react continually to precepts that are not the
 expressions of his impulses lives, psychologically speaking, above his
 means, and may be objectively described as a hypocrite, whether he is
 clearly conscious of this difference or not. It is undeniable that our
 contemporary civilization favors this sort of hypocrisy to an
 extraordinary extent. One might even venture to assert that it is built
 upon such a hypocrisy and would have to undergo extensive changes if man
 were to undertake to live according to the psychological truth. There
 are therefore more civilized hypocrites than truly cultured persons, and
 one can even discuss the question whether a certain amount of civilized
 hypocrisy is not indispensable to maintain civilization because the
 already organized cultural adaptability of the man of today would
 perhaps not suffice for the task of living according to the truth. On
 the other hand the maintenance of civilization even on such questionable
 grounds offers the prospect that with every new generation a more
 extensive transformation of impulses will pave the way for a better
 civilization.
 
 These discussions have already afforded us the consolation that our
 mortification and painful disappointment on account of the uncivilized
 behavior of our fellow world citizens in this war were not justified.
 They rested upon an illusion to which we had succumbed. In reality they
 have not sunk as deeply as we feared because they never really rose as
 high as we had believed. The fact that states and races abolished their
 mutual ethical restrictions not unnaturally incited them to withdraw for
 a time from the existing pressure of civilization and to sanction a
 passing gratification of their suppressed impulses. In doing so their
 relative morality within their own national life probably suffered no
 rupture.
 
 But we can still further deepen our understanding of the change which
 this war has brought about in our former compatriots and at the same
 time take warning not to be unjust to them. For psychic evolution shows
 a peculiarity which is not found in any other process of development.
 When a town becomes a city or a child grows into a man, town and child
 disappear in the city and in the man. Only memory can sketch in the old
 features in the new picture; in reality the old materials and forms have
 been replaced by new ones. It is different in the case of psychic
 evolution. One can describe this unique state of affairs only by saying
 that every previous stage of development is preserved next to the
 following one from which it has evolved; the succession stipulates a
 co-existence although the material in which the whole series of changes
 has taken place remains the same.
 
 The earlier psychic state may not have manifested itself for years but
 nevertheless continues to exist to the extent that it may some day again
 become the form in which psychic forces express themselves, in fact the
 only form, as though all subsequent developments had been annulled and
 made regressive. This extraordinary plasticity of psychic development
 is not without limits as to its direction; one can describe it as a
 special capacity for retrograde action or regression, for it sometimes
 happens that a later and higher stage of development that has been
 abandoned cannot be attained again. But the primitive conditions can
 always be reconstructed; the primitive psyche is in the strictest sense
 indestructible.
 
 The so-called mental diseases must make the impression on the layman of
 mental and psychic life fallen into decay. In reality the destruction
 concerns only later acquisitions and developments. The nature of mental
 diseases consists in the return to former states of the affective life
 and function. An excellent example of the plasticity of the psychic life
 is the state of sleep, which we all court every night.
 
 Since we know how to interpret even the maddest and most confused
 dreams, we know that every time we go to sleep we throw aside our hard
 won morality like a garment in order to put it on again in the morning.
 This laying bare is, of course, harmless, because we are paralyzed and
 condemned to inactivity by the sleeping state.
 
 Only the dream can inform us of the regression of our emotional life to
 an earlier stage of development. Thus, for instance, it is worthy of
 note that all our dreams are governed by purely egotistic motives. One
 of my English friends once presented this theory to a scientific meeting
 in America, whereupon a lady present made the remark that this might
 perhaps be true of Austrians, but she ventured to assert for herself and
 her friends that even in dreams they always felt altruistically. My
 friend, although himself a member of the English race, was obliged to
 contradict the lady energetically on the basis of his experience in
 dream analysis. The noble Americans are just as egotistic in their
 dreams as the Austrians.
 
 The transformation of impulses upon which our cultural adaptability
 rests can therefore also be permanently or temporarily made regressive.
 Without doubt the influences of war belong to those forces which can
 create such regressions; we therefore need not deny cultural
 adaptibility to all those who at present are acting in such an
 uncivilized manner, and may expect that the refinement of their
 impulses will continue in more peaceful times.
 
 But there is perhaps another symptom of our fellow citizens of the world
 which has caused us no less surprise and fear than this descent from
 former ethical heights which has been so painful to us. I mean the lack
 of insight that our greatest intellectual leaders have shown, their
 obduracy, their inaccessibility to the most impressive arguments, their
 uncritical credulity concerning the most contestable assertions. This
 certainly presents a sad picture, and I wish expressly to emphasize that
 I am by no means a blinded partisan who finds all the intellectual
 mistakes on one side. But this phenomenon is more easily explained and
 far less serious than the one which we have just considered. Students of
 human nature and philosophers have long ago taught us that we do wrong
 to value our intelligence as an independent force and to overlook its
 dependence upon our emotional life. According to their view our
 intellect can work reliably only when it is removed from the influence
 of powerful incitements; otherwise it acts simply as an instrument at
 the beck and call of our will and delivers the results which the will
 demands. Logical argumentation is therefore powerless against affective
 interests; that is why arguing with reasons which, according to
 Falstaff, are as common as blackberries, are so fruitless where our
 interests are concerned. Whenever possible psychoanalytic experience has
 driven home this assertion. It is in a position to prove every day that
 the cleverest people suddenly behave as unintelligently as defectives
 as soon as their understanding encounters emotional resistance, but that
 they regain their intelligence completely as soon as this resistance has
 been overcome. This blindness to logic which this war has so frequently
 conjured up in just our best fellow citizens, is therefore a secondary
 phenomenon, the result of emotional excitement and destined, we hope, to
 disappear simultaneously with it.
 
 If we have thus come to a fresh understanding of our estranged fellow
 citizens we can more easily bear the disappointment which nations have
 caused us, for of them we must only make demands of a far more modest
 nature. They are perhaps repeating the development of the individual and
 at the present day still exhibit very primitive stages of development
 with a correspondingly slow progress towards the formation of higher
 unities. It is in keeping with this that the educational factor of an
 outer compulsion to morality, which we found so active in the
 individual, is barely perceptible in them. We had indeed hoped that the
 wonderful community of interests established by intercourse and the
 exchange of products would result in the beginning of such a compulsion,
 but it seems that nations obey their passions of the moment far more
 than their interests. At most they make use of their interests to
 justify the gratification of their passions.
 
 It is indeed a mystery why the individual members of nations should
 disdain, hate, and abhor each other at all, even in times of peace. I do
 not know why it is. It seems as if all the moral achievements of the
 individual were obliterated in the case of a large number of people,
 not to mention millions, until only the most primitive, oldest, and most
 brutal psychic inhibitions remained.
 
 Perhaps only later developments will succeed in changing these
 lamentable conditions. But a little more truthfulness and
 straightforward dealing on all sides, both in the relation of people
 towards each other and between themselves and those who govern them,
 might smooth the way for such a change.
 
 
 
 
 II
 
 OUR ATTITUDE TOWARDS DEATH
 
 
 It remains for us to consider the second factor of which I have already
 spoken which accounts for our feeling of strangeness in a world which
 used to seem so beautiful and familiar to us. I refer to the disturbance
 in our former attitude towards death.
 
 Our attitude had not been a sincere one. To listen to us we were, of
 course, prepared to maintain that death is the necessary termination of
 life, that everyone of us owes nature his death and must be prepared to
 pay his debt, in short, that death was natural, undeniable, and
 inevitable. In practice we were accustomed to act as if matters were
 quite different. We have shown an unmistakable tendency to put death
 aside, to eliminate it from life. We attempted to hush it up, in fact,
 we have the proverb: to think of something as of death. Of course we
 meant our own death. We cannot, indeed, imagine our own death; whenever
 we try to do so we find that we survive ourselves as spectators. The
 school of psychoanalysis could thus assert that at bottom no one
 believes in his own death, which amounts to saying: in the unconscious
 every one of us is convinced of his immortality.
 
 As far as the death of another person is concerned every man of culture
 will studiously avoid mentioning this possibility in the presence of the
 person in question. Only children ignore this restraint; they boldly
 threaten each other with the possibility of death, and are quite capable
 of giving expression to the thought of death in relation to the persons
 they love, as, for instance: Dear Mama, when unfortunately, you are
 dead, I shall do so and so. The civilized adult also likes to avoid
 entertaining the thought of another's death lest he seem harsh or
 unkind, unless his profession as a physician or a lawyer brings up the
 question. Least of all would he permit himself to think of somebody's
 death if this event is connected with a gain of freedom, wealth, or
 position. Death is, of course, not deferred through our sensitiveness on
 the subject, and when it occurs we are always deeply affected, as if our
 expectations had been shattered. We regularly lay stress upon the
 unexpected causes of death, we speak of the accident, the infection, or
 advanced age, and thus betray our endeavor to debase death from a
 necessity to an accident. A large number of deaths seems unspeakably
 dreadful to us. We assume a special attitude towards the dead, something
 almost like admiration for one who has accomplished a very difficult
 feat. We suspend criticism of him, overlooking whatever wrongs he may
 have done, and issue the command, _de mortuis nil nisi bene_: we act as
 if we were justified in singing his praises at the funeral oration, and
 inscribe only what is to his advantage on the tombstone. This
 consideration for the dead, which he really no longer needs, is more
 important to us than the truth and to most of us, certainly, it is more
 important than consideration for the living.
 
 This conventional attitude of civilized people towards death is made
 still more striking by our complete collapse at the death of a person
 closely related to us, such as a parent, a wife or husband, a brother or
 sister, a child or a dear friend. We bury our hopes, our wishes, and our
 desires with the dead, we are inconsolable and refuse to replace our
 loss. We act in this case as if we belonged to the tribe of the Asra who
 also die when those whom they love perish.[1]
 
 But this attitude of ours towards death exerts a powerful influence upon
 our lives. Life becomes impoverished and loses its interest when life
 itself, the highest stake in the game of living, must not be risked. It
 becomes as hollow and empty as an American flirtation in which it is
 understood from the beginning that nothing is to happen, in contrast to
 a continental love affair in which both partners must always bear in
 mind the serious consequences. Our emotional ties, the unbearable
 intensity of our grief, make us disinclined to court dangers for
 ourselves and those belonging to us. We do not dare to contemplate a
 number of undertakings that are dangerous but really indispensable, such
 as aeroplane flights, expeditions to distant countries, and experiments
 with explosive substances. We are paralyzed by the thought of who is to
 replace the son to his mother, the husband to his wife, or the father to
 his children, should an accident occur. A number of other renunciations
 and exclusions result from this tendency to rule out death from the
 calculations of life. And yet the motto of the Hanseatic League said:
 _Navigare necesse est, vivere non necesse_: It is necessary to sail the
 seas, but not to live.
 
 It is therefore inevitable that we should seek compensation for the loss
 of life in the world of fiction, in literature, and in the theater.
 There we still find people who know how to die, who are even quite
 capable of killing others. There alone the condition for reconciling
 ourselves to death is fulfilled, namely, if beneath all the vicissitudes
 of life a permanent life still remains to us. It is really too sad that
 it may happen in life as in chess, where a false move can force us to
 lose the game, but with this difference, that we cannot begin a return
 match. In the realm of fiction we find the many lives in one for which
 we crave. We die in identification with a certain hero and yet we
 outlive him and, quite unharmed, are prepared to die again with the next
 hero.
 
 It is obvious that the war must brush aside this conventional treatment
 of death. Death is no longer to be denied; we are compelled to believe
 in it. People really die and no longer one by one, but in large numbers,
 often ten thousand in one day. It is no longer an accident. Of course,
 it still seems accidental whether a particular bullet strikes this man
 or that but the survivor may easily be struck down by a second bullet,
 and the accumulation of deaths ends the impression of accident. Life has
 indeed become interesting again; it has once more received its full
 significance.
 
 Let us make a division here and separate those who risk their lives in
 battle from those who remain at home, where they can only expect to
 lose one of their loved ones through injury, illness, or infection. It
 would certainly be very interesting to study the changes in the
 psychology of the combatants but I know too little about this. We must
 stick to the second group, to which we ourselves belong. I have already
 stated that I think the confusion and paralysis of our activities from
 which we are suffering is essentially determined by the fact that we
 cannot retain our previous attitude towards death. Perhaps it will help
 us to direct our psychological investigation to two other attitudes
 towards death, one of which we may ascribe to primitive man, while the
 other is still preserved, though invisible to our consciousness, in the
 deeper layers of our psychic life.
 
 The attitude of prehistoric man towards death is, of course, known to us
 only through deductions and reconstructions, but I am of the opinion
 that these have given us fairly trustworthy information.
 
 Primitive man maintained a very curious attitude towards death. It is
 not at all consistent but rather contradictory. On the one hand he took
 death very seriously, recognized it as the termination of life, and made
 use of it in this sense; but, on the other hand, he also denied death
 and reduced it to nothingness. This contradiction was made possible by
 the fact that he maintained a radically different position in regard to
 the death of others, a stranger or an enemy, than in regard to his own.
 The death of another person fitted in with his idea, it signified the
 annihilation of the hated one, and primitive man had no scruples
 against bringing it about. He must have been a very passionate being,
 more cruel and vicious than other animals. He liked to kill and did it
 as a matter of course. Nor need we attribute to him the instinct which
 restrains other animals from killing and devouring their own species.
 
 As a matter of fact the primitive history of mankind is filled with
 murder. The history of the world which is still taught to our children
 is essentially a series of race murders. The dimly felt sense of guilt
 under which man has lived since archaic times, and which in many
 religions has been condensed into the assumption of a primal guilt, a
 hereditary sin, is probably the expression of a blood guilt, the burden
 of which primitive man assumed. In my book entitled "Totem and Taboo,"
 1913, I have followed the hints of W. Robertson Smith, Atkinson, and
 Charles Darwin in the attempt to fathom the nature of this ancient
 guilt, and am of the opinion that the Christian doctrine of today still
 makes it possible for us to work back to its origin.[2]
 
 If the Son of God had to sacrifice his life to absolve mankind from
 original sin, then, according to the law of retaliation, the return of
 like for like, this sin must have been an act of killing, a murder.
 Nothing else could call for the sacrifice of a life in expiation. And if
 original sin was a sin against the God Father, the oldest sin of mankind
 must have been a patricide--the killing of the primal father of the
 primitive human horde, whose memory picture later was transfigured into
 a deity.[3]
 
 Primitive man was as incapable of imagining and realizing his own death
 as any one of us are today. But a case arose in which the two opposite
 attitudes towards death clashed and came into conflict with each other,
 with results that are both significant and far reaching. Such a case was
 given when primitive man saw one of his own relatives die, his wife,
 child, or friend, whom he certainly loved as we do ours; for love cannot
 be much younger than the lust for murder. In his pain he must have
 discovered that he, too, could die, an admission against which his whole
 being must have revolted, for everyone of these loved ones was a part of
 his own beloved self. On the other hand again, every such death was
 satisfactory to him, for there was also something foreign in each one of
 these persons. The law of emotional ambivalence, which today still
 governs our emotional relations to those whom we love, certainly
 obtained far more widely in primitive times. The beloved dead had
 nevertheless roused some hostile feelings in primitive man just because
 they had been both friends and enemies.
 
 Philosophers have maintained that the intellectual puzzle which the
 picture of death presented to primitive man forced him to reflect and
 became the starting point of every speculation. I believe the
 philosophers here think too philosophically, they give too little
 consideration to the primary effective motive. I should therefore like
 to correct and limit the above assertion; primitive man probably
 triumphed at the side of the corpse of the slain enemy, without finding
 any occasion to puzzle his head about the riddle of life and death. It
 was not the intellectual puzzle or any particular death which roused the
 spirit of inquiry in man, but the conflict of emotions at the death of
 beloved and withal foreign and hated persons.
 
 From this emotional conflict psychology arose. Man could no longer keep
 death away from him, for he had tasted of it in his grief for the
 deceased, but he did not want to acknowledge it, since he could not
 imagine himself dead. He therefore formed a compromise and concealed his
 own death but denied it the significance of destroying life, a
 distinction for which the death of his enemies had given him no motive.
 He invented spirits during his contemplation of the corpse of the
 person he loved, and his consciousness of guilt over the gratification
 which mingled with his grief brought it about that these first created
 spirits were transformed into evil demons who were to be feared. The
 changes wrought by death suggested to him to divide the individual into
 body and soul, at first several souls, and in this way his train of
 thought paralleled the disintegration process inaugurated by death. The
 continued remembrance of the dead became the basis of the assumption of
 other forms of existence and gave him the idea of a future life after
 apparent death.
 
 These later forms of existence were at first only vaguely associated
 appendages to those whom death had cut off, and enjoyed only slight
 esteem until much later times; they still betrayed a very meagre
 knowledge. The reply which the soul of Achilles made to Odysseus comes
 to our mind:
 
     Erst in the life on the earth, no less than a god we revered thee,
     We the Achaeans; and now in the realm of the dead as a monarch
     Here thou dost rule; then why should death thus grieve thee, Achilles?
     Thus did I speak: forthwith then answering thus he addressed me.
     Speak not smoothly of death, I beseech, O famous Odysseus,
     Better by far to remain on the earth as the thrall of another,
     E'en of a portionless man that hath means right scanty of living,
     Rather than reign sole king in the realm of the bodiless phantoms.
 
                      Odysseus XI, verse 484-491
                        Translated by H. B. Coterill.
 
 Heine has rendered this in a forcible and bitter parody:
 
     The smallest living philistine,
     At Stuckert on the Neckar
     Is much happier than I am,
     Son of Pelleus, the dead hero,
     Shadowy ruler of the Underworld.
 
 It was much later before religions managed to declare this after-life as
 the more valuable and perfect and to debase our mortal life to a mere
 preparation for the life to come. It was then only logical to prolong
 our existence into the past and to invent former existences,
 transmigrations of souls, and reincarnations, all with the object of
 depriving death of its meaning as the termination of life. It was as
 early as this that the denial of death, which we described as the
 product of conventional culture, originated.
 
 Contemplation of the corpse of the person loved gave birth not only to
 the theory of the soul, the belief in immortality, and implanted the
 deep roots of the human sense of guilt, but it also created the first
 ethical laws. The first and most important prohibition of the awakening
 conscience declared: Thou shalt not kill. This arose as a reaction
 against the gratification of hate for the beloved dead which is
 concealed behind grief, and was gradually extended to the unloved
 stranger and finally also to the enemy.
 
 Civilized man no longer feels this way in regard to killing enemies.
 When the fierce struggle of this war will have reached a decision every
 victorious warrior will joyfully and without delay return home to his
 wife and children, undisturbed by thoughts of the enemy he has killed
 either at close quarters or with weapons operating at a distance.
 
 It is worthy of note that the primitive races which still inhabit the
 earth and who are certainly closer to primitive man than we, act
 differently in this respect, or have so acted as long as they did not
 yet feel the influence of our civilization. The savage, such as the
 Australian, the Bushman, or the inhabitant of Terra del Fuego, is by no
 means a remorseless murderer; when he returns home as victor from the
 war path he is not allowed to enter his village or touch his wife until
 he has expiated his war murders through lengthy and often painful
 penances. The explanation for this is, of course, related to his
 superstition; the savage fears the avenging spirit of the slain. But the
 spirits of the fallen enemy are nothing but the expression of his evil
 conscience over his blood guilt; behind this superstition there lies
 concealed a bit of ethical delicacy of feeling which has been lost to
 us civilized beings.[4]
 
 Pious souls, who would like to think us removed from contact with what
 is evil and mean, will surely not fail to draw satisfactory conclusions
 in regard to the strength of the ethical impulses which have been
 implanted in us from these early and forcible murder prohibitions.
 Unfortunately this argument proves even more for the opposite
 contention.
 
 Such a powerful inhibition can only be directed against an equally
 strong impulse. What no human being desires to do does not have to be
 forbidden, it is self-exclusive. The very emphasis of the commandment:
 Thou shalt not kill, makes it certain that we are descended from an
 endlessly long chain of generations of murderers, whose love of murder
 was in their blood as it is perhaps also in ours. The ethical strivings
 of mankind, with the strength and significance of which we need not
 quarrel, are an acquisition of the history of man; they have since
 become, though unfortunately in very variable quantities, the hereditary
 possessions of people of today.
 
 Let us now leave primitive man and turn to the unconscious in our
 psyche. Here we depend entirely upon psychoanalytic investigation, the
 only method which reaches such depths. The question is what is the
 attitude of our unconscious towards death. In answer we say that it is
 almost like that of primitive man. In this respect, as well as in many
 others, the man of prehistoric times lives on, unchanged, in our
 conscious.
 
 Our unconscious therefore does not believe in its own death; it acts as
 though it were immortal. What we call our unconscious, those deepest
 layers in our psyche which consist of impulses, recognizes no negative
 or any form of denial and resolves all contradictions, so that it does
 not acknowledge its own death, to which we can give only a negative
 content. The idea of death finds absolutely no acceptance in our
 impulses. This is perhaps the real secret of heroism. The rational basis
 of heroism is dependent upon the decision that one's own life cannot be
 worth as much as certain abstract common ideals. But I believe that
 instinctive or impulsive heroism is much more frequently independent of
 such motivation and simply defies danger on the assurance which
 animated Hans, the stone-cutter, a character in Anzengruber, who always
 said to himself: Nothing can happen to me. Or that motivation only
 serves to clear away the hesitations which might restrain the
 corresponding heroic reaction in the unconscious. The fear of death,
 which controls us more frequently than we are aware, is comparatively
 secondary and is usually the outcome of the consciousness of guilt.
 
 On the other hand we recognize the death of strangers and of enemies and
 sentence them to it just as willingly and unhesitatingly as primitive
 man. Here there is indeed a distinction which becomes decisive in
 practice. Our unconscious does not carry out the killing, it only thinks
 and wishes it. But it would be wrong to underestimate the psychic
 reality so completely in comparison to the practical reality. It is
 really important and full of serious consequences.
 
 In our unconscious we daily and hourly do away with all those who stand
 in our way, all those who have insulted or harmed us. The expression:
 "The devil take him," which so frequently crosses our lips in the form
 of an ill-humored jest, but by which we really intend to say, "Death
 take him," is a serious and forceful death wish in our unconscious.
 Indeed our unconscious murders even for trifles; like the old Athenian
 law of Draco, it knows no other punishment for crime than death, and
 this not without a certain consistency, for every injury done to our
 all-mighty and self-glorifying self is at bottom a _crimen laesae
 majestatis_.
 
 Thus, if we are to be judged by our unconscious wishes, we ourselves
 are nothing but a band of murderers, just like primitive man. It is
 lucky that all wishes do not possess the power which people of primitive
 times attributed to them.[5] For in the cross fire of mutual
 maledictions mankind would have perished long ago, not excepting the
 best and wisest of men as well as the most beautiful and charming women.
 
 As a rule the layman refuses to believe these theories of
 psychoanalysis. They are rejected as calumnies which can be ignored in
 the face of the assurances of consciousness, while the few signs through
 which the unconscious betrays itself to consciousness are cleverly
 overlooked. It is therefore in place here to point out that many
 thinkers who could not possibly have been influenced by psychoanalysis
 have very clearly accused our silent thought of a readiness to ignore
 the murder prohibition in order to clear away what stands in our path.
 Instead of quoting many examples I have chosen one which is very famous.
 In his novel, _Pere Goriot_, Balzac refers to a place in the works of J.
 J. Rousseau where this author asks the reader what he would do if,
 without leaving Paris and, of course, without being discovered, he could
 kill an old mandarin in Peking, with great profit to himself, by a mere
 act of the will. He makes it possible for us to guess that he does not
 consider the life of this dignitary very secure. "To kill your mandarin"
 has become proverbial for this secret readiness to kill, even on the
 part of people of today.
 
 There are also a number of cynical jokes and anecdotes which bear
 witness to the same effect, such as the remark attributed to the
 husband: "If one of us dies I shall move to Paris." Such cynical jokes
 would not be possible if they did not have an unavowed truth to reveal
 which we cannot admit when it is baldly and seriously stated. It is well
 known that one may even speak the truth in jest.
 
 A case arises for our consciousness, just as it did for primitive man,
 in which the two opposite attitudes towards death, one of which
 acknowledges it as the destroyer of life, while the other denies the
 reality of death, clash and come into conflict. The case is identical
 for both, it consists of the death of one of our loved ones, of a parent
 or a partner in wedlock, of a brother or a sister, of a child or a
 friend. These persons we love are on the one hand a part of our inner
 possessions and a constituent of our own selves, but on the other hand
 they are also in part strangers and even enemies. Except in a few
 instances, even the tenderest and closest love relations also contain a
 bit of hostility which can rouse an unconscious death wish. But at the
 present day this ambivalent conflict no longer results in the
 development of ethics and soul theories, but in neuroses which also
 gives us a profound insight into the normal psychic life. Doctors who
 practice psychoanalysis have frequently had to deal with the symptom of
 over tender care for the welfare of relatives or with wholly unfounded
 self reproaches after the death of a beloved person. The study of these
 cases has left them in no doubt as to the significance of unconscious
 death wishes.
 
 The layman feels an extraordinary horror at the possibility of such an
 emotion and takes his aversion to it as a legitimate ground for
 disbelief in the assertions of psychoanalysis. I think he is wrong
 there. No debasing of our love life is intended and none such has
 resulted. It is indeed foreign to our comprehension as well as to our
 feelings to unite love and hate in this manner, but in so far as nature
 employs these contrasts she brings it about that love is always kept
 alive and fresh in order to safeguard it against the hate that is
 lurking behind it. It may be said that we owe the most beautiful
 unfolding of our love life to the reaction against this hostile impulse
 which we feel in our hearts.
 
 Let us sum up what we have said. Our unconscious is just as inaccessible
 to the conception of our own death, just as much inclined to kill the
 stranger, and just as divided, or ambivalent towards the persons we love
 as was primitive man. But how far we are removed from this primitive
 state in our conventionally civilized attitude towards death!
 
 It is easy to see how war enters into this disunity. War strips off the
 later deposits of civilization and allows the primitive man in us to
 reappear. It forces us again to be heroes who cannot believe in their
 own death, it stamps all strangers as enemies whose death we ought to
 cause or wish; it counsels us to rise above the death of those whom we
 love. But war cannot be abolished; as long as the conditions of
 existence among races are so varied and the repulsions between them are
 so vehement, there will have to be wars. The question then arises
 whether we shall be the ones to yield and adapt ourselves to it. Shall
 we not admit that in our civilized attitude towards death we have again
 lived psychologically beyond our means? Shall we not turn around and
 avow the truth? Were it not better to give death the place to which it
 is entitled both in reality and in our thoughts and to reveal a little
 more of our unconscious attitude towards death which up to now we have
 so carefully suppressed? This may not appear a very high achievement and
 in some respects rather a step backwards, a kind of regression, but at
 least it has the advantage of taking the truth into account a little
 more and of making life more bearable again. To bear life remains, after
 all, the first duty of the living. The illusion becomes worthless if it
 disturbs us in this.
 
 We remember the old saying:
 
             _Si vis pacem, para bellum._
     If you wish peace, prepare for war.
 
 The times call for a paraphrase:
 
            _Si vis vitam, para mortem._
     If you wish life, prepare for death.
 
 
 FOOTNOTES:
 
 [1] Compare Heine's poem, "Der Asra," Louis Untermeyer's translation, p.
 269, Henry Holt & Co., 1917.
 
 [2] Totem and Taboo, translated by Dr. A. A. Brill, Moffat, Yard & Co.,
 1918.
 
 [3] Totem and Taboo, Chapter IV.
 
 [4] Totem and Taboo, Chapter IV.
 
 [5] See Totem and Taboo, Chapter III.
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 Produced by Chuck Greif, University of Michigan and the
 Online Distributed Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 THE INTERNATIONAL PSYCHO-ANALYTICAL LIBRARY
 No. 6
 
 
 
 
 GROUP PSYCHOLOGY
 AND
 THE ANALYSIS OF THE EGO
 
 BY
 SIGM. FREUD, M. D., LL. D.
 
 AUTHORIZED TRANSLATION
 BY
 JAMES STRACHEY
 
 [Illustration: colophon]
 
 THE INTERNATIONAL PSYCHO-ANALYTICAL PRESS
 LONDON MCMXXII VIENNA
 
 Copyright 1922
 
 
 
 
 TRANSLATOR'S NOTE
 
 
 A comparison of the following pages with the German original
 (_Massenpsychologie und Ich-Analyse_, Internationaler Psychoanalytischer
 Verlag, Vienna, 1921) will show that certain passages have been
 transferred in the English version from the text to the footnotes. This
 alteration has been carried out at the author's express desire.
 
 All technical terms have been translated in accordance with the Glossary
 to be published as a supplement to the _International Journal of
 Psycho-Analysis_.
 
 J. S.
 
 
 
 
 CONTENTS
 
 
                                                        Page
 
    I Introduction                                         1
 
   II Le Bon's Description of the Group Mind               5
 
  III Other Accounts of Collective Mental Life            23
 
   IV Suggestion and Libido                               33
 
    V Two Artificial Groups: the Church and the Army      41
 
   VI Further Problems and Lines of Work                  52
 
  VII Identification                                      60
 
 VIII Being in Love and Hypnosis                          71
 
   IX The Herd Instinct                                   81
 
    X The Group and the Primal Horde                      90
 
   XI A Differentiating Grade in the Ego                 101
 
  XII Postscript                                         110
 
 
 
 
 GROUP PSYCHOLOGY AND THE ANALYSIS OF THE EGO
 
 
 
 
 I
 
 INTRODUCTION
 
 
 The contrast between Individual Psychology and Social or Group[1]
 Psychology, which at a first glance may seem to be full of significance,
 loses a great deal of its sharpness when it is examined more closely. It
 is true that Individual Psychology is concerned with the individual man
 and explores the paths by which he seeks to find satisfaction for his
 instincts; but only rarely and under certain exceptional conditions is
 Individual Psychology in a position to disregard the relations of this
 individual to others. In the individual's mental life someone else is
 invariably involved, as a model, as an object, as a helper, as an
 opponent, and so from the very first Individual Psychology is at the
 same time Social Psychology as well--in this extended but entirely
 justifiable sense of the words.
 
 The relations of an individual to his parents and to his brothers and
 sisters, to the object of his love, and to his physician--in fact all
 the relations which have hitherto been the chief subject of
 psycho-analytic research--may claim to be considered as social
 phenomena; and in this respect they may be contrasted with certain other
 processes, described by us as 'narcissistic', in which the satisfaction
 of the instincts is partially or totally withdrawn from the influence of
 other people. The contrast between social and narcissistic--Bleuler
 would perhaps call them 'autistic'--mental acts therefore falls wholly
 within the domain of Individual Psychology, and is not well calculated
 to differentiate it from a Social or Group Psychology.
 
 The individual in the relations which have already been mentioned--to
 his parents and to his brothers and sisters, to the person he is in love
 with, to his friend, and to his physician--comes under the influence of
 only a single person, or of a very small number of persons, each one of
 whom has become enormously important to him. Now in speaking of Social
 or Group Psychology it has become usual to leave these relations on one
 side and to isolate as the subject of inquiry the influencing of an
 individual by a large number of people simultaneously, people with whom
 he is connected by something, though otherwise they may in many respects
 be strangers to him. Group Psychology is therefore concerned with the
 individual man as a member of a race, of a nation, of a caste, of a
 profession, of an institution, or as a component part of a crowd of
 people who have been organised into a group at some particular time for
 some definite purpose. When once natural continuity has been severed in
 this way, it is easy to regard the phenomena that appear under these
 special conditions as being expressions of a special instinct that is
 not further reducible, the social instinct ('herd instinct', 'group
 mind'), which does not come to light in any other situations. But we may
 perhaps venture to object that it seems difficult to attribute to the
 factor of number a significance so great as to make it capable by itself
 or arousing in our mental life a new instinct that is otherwise not
 brought into play. Our expectation is therefore directed towards two
 other possibilities: that the social instinct may not be a primitive one
 and insusceptible of dissection, and that it may be possible to discover
 the beginnings of its development in a narrower circle, such as that of
 the family.
 
 Although Group Psychology is only in its infancy, it embraces an immense
 number of separate issues and offers to investigators countless
 problems which have hitherto not even been properly distinguished from
 one another. The mere classification of the different forms of group
 formation and the description of the mental phenomena produced by them
 require a great expenditure of observation and exposition, and have
 already given rise to a copious literature. Anyone who compares the
 narrow dimensions of this little book with the extent of Group
 Psychology will at once be able to guess that only a few points chosen
 from the whole material are to be dealt with here. And they will in fact
 only be a few questions with which the depth-psychology of
 psycho-analysis is specially concerned.
 
 
 
 
 II
 
 LE BON'S DESCRIPTION OF THE GROUP MIND
 
 
 Instead of starting from a definition, it seems more useful to begin
 with some indication of the range of the phenomena under review, and to
 select from among them a few specially striking and characteristic facts
 to which our inquiry can be attached. We can achieve both of these aims
 by means of quotation from Le Bon's deservedly famous work _Psychologie
 des foules_.[2]
 
 Let us make the matter clear once again. If a Psychology, concerned with
 exploring the predispositions, the instincts, the motives and the aims
 of an individual man down to his actions and his relations with those
 who are nearest to him, had completely achieved its task, and had
 cleared up the whole of these matters with their inter-connections, it
 would then suddenly find itself confronted by a new task which would lie
 before it unachieved. It would be obliged to explain the surprising
 fact that under a certain condition this individual whom it had come to
 understand thought, felt, and acted in quite a different way from what
 would have been expected. And this condition is his insertion into a
 collection of people which has acquired the characteristic of a
 'psychological group'. What, then, is a 'group'? How does it acquire the
 capacity for exercising such a decisive influence over the mental life
 of the individual? And what is the nature of the mental change which it
 forces upon the individual?
 
 It is the task of a theoretical Group Psychology to answer these three
 questions. The best way of approaching them is evidently to start with
 the third. Observation of the changes in the individual's reactions is
 what provides Group Psychology with its material; for every attempt at
 an explanation must be preceded by a description of the thing that is to
 be explained.
 
 I will now let Le Bon speak for himself. He says: 'The most striking
 peculiarity presented by a psychological group[3] is the following.
 Whoever be the individuals that compose it, however like or unlike be
 their mode of life, their occupations, their character, or their
 intelligence, the fact that they have been transformed into a group puts
 them in possession of a sort of collective mind which makes them feel,
 think, and act in a manner quite different from that in which each
 individual of them would feel, think, and act were he in a state of
 isolation. There are certain ideas and feelings which do not come into
 being, or do not transform themselves into acts except in the case of
 individuals forming a group. The psychological group is a provisional
 being formed of heterogeneous elements, which for a moment are combined,
 exactly as the cells which constitute a living body form by their
 reunion a new being which displays characteristics very different from
 those possessed by each of the cells singly.' (p. 29.)[4]
 
 We shall take the liberty of interrupting Le Bon's exposition with
 glosses of our own, and shall accordingly insert an observation at this
 point. If the individuals in the group are combined into a unity, there
 must surely be something to unite them, and this bond might be precisely
 the thing that is characteristic of a group. But Le Bon does not answer
 this question; he goes on to consider the alteration which the
 individual undergoes when in a group and describes it in terms which
 harmonize well with the fundamental postulates of our own
 depth-psychology.
 
 'It is easy to prove how much the individual forming part of a group
 differs from the isolated individual, but it is less easy to discover
 the causes of this difference.
 
 'To obtain at any rate a glimpse of them it is necessary in the first
 place to call to mind the truth established by modern psychology, that
 unconscious phenomena play an altogether preponderating part not only in
 organic life, but also in the operations of the intelligence. The
 conscious life of the mind is of small importance in comparison with its
 unconscious life. The most subtle analyst, the most acute observer, is
 scarcely successful in discovering more than a very small number of the
 conscious[5] motives that determine his conduct. Our conscious acts are
 the outcome of an unconscious substratum created in the mind in the main
 by hereditary influences. This substratum consists of the innumerable
 common characteristics handed down from generation to generation, which
 constitute the genius of a race. Behind the avowed causes of our acts
 there undoubtedly lie secret causes that we do not avow, but behind
 these secret causes there are many others more secret still, of which we
 ourselves are ignorant.[6] The greater part of our daily actions are the
 result of hidden motives which escape our observation.' (p. 30.)
 
 Le Bon thinks that the particular acquirements of individuals become
 obliterated in a group, and that in this way their distinctiveness
 vanishes. The racial unconscious emerges; what is heterogeneous is
 submerged in what is homogeneous. We may say that the mental
 superstructure, the development of which in individuals shows such
 dissimilarities, is removed, and that the unconscious foundations, which
 are similar in everyone, stand exposed to view.
 
 In this way individuals in a group would come to show an average
 character. But Le Bon believes that they also display new
 characteristics which they have not previously possessed, and he seeks
 the reason for this in three different factors.
 
 'The first is that the individual forming part of a group acquires,
 solely from numerical considerations, a sentiment of invincible power
 which allows him to yield to instincts which, had he been alone, he
 would perforce have kept under restraint. He will be the less disposed
 to check himself from the consideration that, a group being anonymous,
 and in consequence irresponsible, the sentiment of responsibility which
 always controls individuals disappears entirely.' (p. 33.)
 
 From our point of view we need not attribute so much importance to the
 appearance of new characteristics. For us it would be enough to say that
 in a group the individual is brought under conditions which allow him to
 throw off the repressions of his unconscious instincts. The apparently
 new characteristics which he then displays are in fact the
 manifestations of this unconscious, in which all that is evil in the
 human mind is contained as a predisposition. We can find no difficulty
 in understanding the disappearance of conscience or of a sense of
 responsibility in these circumstances. It has long been our contention
 that 'dread of society [_soziale Angst_]' is the essence of what is
 called conscience.[7]
 
 'The second cause, which is contagion, also intervenes to determine the
 manifestation in groups of their special characteristics, and at the
 same time the trend they are to take. Contagion is a phenomenon of which
 it is easy to establish the presence, but that it is not easy to
 explain. It must be classed among those phenomena of a hypnotic order,
 which we shall shortly study. In a group every sentiment and act is
 contagious, and contagious to such a degree that an individual readily
 sacrifices his personal interest to the collective interest. This is an
 aptitude very contrary to his nature, and of which a man is scarcely
 capable, except when he makes part of a group.' (p. 33.)
 
 We shall later on base an important conjecture upon this last statement.
 
 'A third cause, and by far the most important, determines in the
 individuals of a group special characteristics which are quite contrary
 at times to those presented by the isolated individual. I allude to that
 suggestibility of which, moreover, the contagion mentioned above is only
 an effect.
 
 'To understand this phenomenon it is necessary to bear in mind certain
 recent physiological discoveries. We know to-day that by various
 processes an individual may be brought into such a condition that,
 having entirely lost his conscious personality, he obeys all the
 suggestions of the operator who has deprived him of it, and commits acts
 in utter contradiction with his character and habits. The most careful
 investigations seem to prove that an individual immersed for some length
 of time in a group in action soon finds himself--either in consequence
 of the magnetic influence given out by the group, or from some other
 cause of which we are ignorant--in a special state, which much resembles
 the state of fascination in which the hypnotised individual finds
 himself in the hands of the hypnotiser.... The conscious personality has
 entirely vanished; will and discernment are lost. All feelings and
 thoughts are bent in the direction determined by the hypnotiser.
 
 'Such also is approximately the state of the individual forming part of
 a psychological group. He is no longer conscious of his acts. In his
 case, as in the case of the hypnotised subject, at the same time that
 certain faculties are destroyed, others may be brought to a high degree
 of exaltation. Under the influence of a suggestion, he will undertake
 the accomplishment of certain acts with irresistible impetuosity. This
 impetuosity is the more irresistible in the case of groups than in that
 of the hypnotised subject, from the fact that, the suggestion being the
 same for all the individuals of the group, it gains in strength by
 reciprocity.' (p. 34.)
 
 'We see, then, that the disappearance of the conscious personality, the
 predominance of the unconscious personality, the turning by means of
 suggestion and contagion of feelings and ideas in an identical
 direction, the tendency to immediately transform the suggested ideas
 into acts; these, we see, are the principal characteristics of the
 individual forming part of a group. He is no longer himself, but has
 become an automaton who has ceased to be guided by his will.' (p. 35.)
 
 I have quoted this passage so fully in order to make it quite clear that
 Le Bon explains the condition of an individual in a group as being
 actually hypnotic, and does not merely make a comparison between the two
 states. We have no intention of raising any objection at this point, but
 wish only to emphasize the fact that the two last causes of an
 individual becoming altered in a group (the contagion and the heightened
 suggestibility) are evidently not on a par, since the contagion seems
 actually to be a manifestation of the suggestibility. Moreover the
 effects of the two factors do not seem to be sharply differentiated in
 the text of Le Bon's remarks. We may perhaps best interpret his
 statement if we connect the contagion with the effects of the individual
 members of the group upon one another, while we point to another source
 for those manifestations of suggestion in the group which are put on a
 level with the phenomena of hypnotic influence. But to what source? We
 cannot avoid being struck with a sense of deficiency when we notice that
 one of the chief elements of the comparison, namely the person who is to
 replace the hypnotist in the case of the group, is not mentioned in Le
 Bon's exposition. But he nevertheless distinguishes between this
 influence of fascination which remains plunged in obscurity and the
 contagious effect which the individuals exercise upon one another and by
 which the original suggestion is strengthened.
 
 Here is yet another important consideration for helping us to understand
 the individual in a group: 'Moreover, by the mere fact that he forms
 part of an organised group, a man descends several rungs in the ladder
 of civilisation. Isolated, he may be a cultivated individual; in a
 crowd, he is a barbarian--that is, a creature acting by instinct. He
 possesses the spontaneity, the violence, the ferocity, and also the
 enthusiasm and heroism of primitive beings.' (p. 36.) He then dwells
 especially upon the lowering in intellectual ability which an individual
 experiences when he becomes merged in a group.[8]
 
 Let us now leave the individual, and turn to the group mind, as it has
 been outlined by Le Bon. It shows not a single feature which a
 psycho-analyst would find any difficulty in placing or in deriving from
 its source. Le Bon himself shows us the way by pointing to its
 similarity with the mental life of primitive people and of children (p.
 40).
 
 A group is impulsive, changeable and irritable. It is led almost
 exclusively by the unconscious.[9] The impulses which a group obeys may
 according to circumstances be generous or cruel, heroic or cowardly, but
 they are always so imperious that no personal interest, not even that of
 self-preservation, can make itself felt (p. 41). Nothing about it is
 premeditated. Though it may desire things passionately, yet this is
 never so for long, for it is incapable of perseverance. It cannot
 tolerate any delay between its desire and the fulfilment of what it
 desires. It has a sense of omnipotence; the notion of impossibility
 disappears for the individual in a group.[10]
 
 A group is extraordinarily credulous and open to influence, it has no
 critical faculty, and the improbable does not exist for it. It thinks in
 images, which call one another up by association (just as they arise
 with individuals in states of free imagination), and whose agreement
 with reality is never checked by any reasonable function
 [_Instanz_].[11] The feelings of a group are always very simple and very
 exaggerated. So that a group knows neither doubt nor uncertainty.[12]
 
 It goes directly to extremes; if a suspicion is expressed, it is
 instantly changed into an incontrovertible certainty; a trace of
 antipathy is turned into furious hatred (p. 56).[13]
 
 Inclined as it itself is to all extremes, a group can only be excited by
 an excessive stimulus. Anyone who wishes to produce an effect upon it
 needs no logical adjustment in his arguments; he must paint in the most
 forcible colours, he must exaggerate, and he must repeat the same thing
 again and again.
 
 Since a group is in no doubt as to what constitutes truth or error, and
 is conscious, moreover, of its own great strength, it is as intolerant
 as it is obedient to authority. It respects force and can only be
 slightly influenced by kindness, which it regards merely as a form of
 weakness. What it demands of its heroes is strength, or even violence.
 It wants to be ruled and oppressed and to fear its masters.
 Fundamentally it is entirely conservative, and it has a deep aversion
 from all innovations and advances and an unbounded respect for tradition
 (p. 62).
 
 In order to make a correct judgement upon the morals of groups, one must
 take into consideration the fact that when individuals come together in
 a group all their individual inhibitions fall away and all the cruel,
 brutal and destructive instincts, which lie dormant in individuals as
 relics of a primitive epoch, are stirred up to find free gratification.
 But under the influence of suggestion groups are also capable of high
 achievements in the shape of abnegation, unselfishness, and devotion to
 an ideal. While with isolated individuals personal interest is almost
 the only motive force, with groups it is very rarely prominent. It is
 possible to speak of an individual having his moral standards raised by
 a group (p. 65). Whereas the intellectual capacity of a group is always
 far below that of an individual, its ethical conduct may rise as high
 above his as it may sink deep below it.
 
 Some other features in Le Bon's description show in a clear light how
 well justified is the identification of the group mind with the mind of
 primitive people. In groups the most contradictory ideas can exist side
 by side and tolerate each other, without any conflict arising from the
 logical contradiction between them. But this is also the case in the
 unconscious mental life of individuals, of children and of neurotics, as
 psycho-analysis has long pointed out.[14]
 
 A group, further, is subject to the truly magical power of words; they
 can evoke the most formidable tempests in the group mind, and are also
 capable of stilling them (p. 117). 'Reason and arguments are incapable
 of combating certain words and formulas. They are uttered with solemnity
 in the presence of groups, and as soon as they have been pronounced an
 expression of respect is visible on every countenance, and all heads are
 bowed. By many they are considered as natural forces, as supernatural
 powers.' (p. 117.) It is only necessary in this connection to remember
 the taboo upon names among primitive people and the magical powers which
 they ascribe to names and words.[15]
 
 And, finally, groups have never thirsted after truth. They demand
 illusions, and cannot do without them. They constantly give what is
 unreal precedence over what is real; they are almost as strongly
 influenced by what is untrue as by what is true. They have an evident
 tendency not to distinguish between the two (p. 77).
 
 We have pointed out that this predominance of the life of phantasy and
 of the illusion born of an unfulfilled wish is the ruling factor in the
 psychology of neuroses. We have found that what neurotics are guided by
 is not ordinary objective reality but psychological reality. A
 hysterical symptom is based upon phantasy instead of upon the repetition
 of real experience, and the sense of guilt in an obsessional neurosis is
 based upon the fact of an evil intention which was never carried out.
 Indeed, just as in dreams and in hypnosis, in the mental operations of a
 group the function for testing the reality of things falls into the
 background in comparison with the strength of wishes with their
 affective cathexis.[16]
 
 What Le Bon says on the subject of leaders of groups is less exhaustive,
 and does not enable us to make out an underlying principle so clearly.
 He thinks that as soon as living beings are gathered together in certain
 numbers, no matter whether they are a herd of animals or a collection of
 human beings, they place themselves instinctively under the authority
 of a chief (p. 134). A group is an obedient herd, which could never live
 without a master. It has such a thirst for obedience that it submits
 instinctively to anyone who appoints himself its master.
 
 Although in this way the needs of a group carry it half-way to meet the
 leader, yet he too must fit in with it in his personal qualities. He
 must himself be held in fascination by a strong faith (in an idea) in
 order to awaken the group's faith; he must possess a strong and imposing
 will, which the group, which has no will of its own, can accept from
 him. Le Bon then discusses the different kinds of leaders, and the means
 by which they work upon the group. On the whole he believes that the
 leaders make themselves felt by means of the ideas in which they
 themselves are fanatical believers.
 
 Moreover, he ascribes both to the ideas and to the leaders a mysterious
 and irresistible power, which he calls 'prestige'. Prestige is a sort of
 domination exercised over us by an individual, a work or an idea. It
 entirely paralyses our critical faculty, and fills us with astonishment
 and respect. It would seem to arouse a feeling like that of fascination
 in hypnosis (p. 148). He distinguishes between acquired or artificial
 and personal prestige. The former is attached to persons in virtue of
 their name, fortune and reputation, and to opinions, works of art, etc.,
 in virtue of tradition. Since in every case it harks back to the past,
 it cannot be of much help to us in understanding this puzzling
 influence. Personal prestige is attached to a few people, who become
 leaders by means of it, and it has the effect of making everything obey
 them as though by the operation of some magnetic magic. All prestige,
 however, is also dependent upon success, and is lost in the event of
 failure (p. 159).
 
 We cannot feel that Le Bon has brought the function of the leader and
 the importance of prestige completely into harmony with his brilliantly
 executed picture of the group mind.
 
 
 
 
 III
 
 OTHER ACCOUNTS OF COLLECTIVE MENTAL LIFE
 
 
 We have made use of Le Bon's description by way of introduction, because
 it fits in so well with our own Psychology in the emphasis which it lays
 upon unconscious mental life. But we must now add that as a matter of
 fact none of that author's statements bring forward anything new.
 Everything that he says to the detriment and depreciation of the
 manifestations of the group mind had already been said by others before
 him with equal distinctness and equal hostility, and has been repeated
 in unison by thinkers, statesmen and writers since the earliest periods
 of literature.[17] The two theses which comprise the most important of
 Le Bon's opinions, those touching upon the collective inhibition of
 intellectual functioning and the heightening of affectivity in groups,
 had been formulated shortly before by Sighele.[18] At bottom, all that
 is left over as being peculiar to Le Bon are the two notions of the
 unconscious and of the comparison with the mental life of primitive
 people, and even these had naturally often been alluded to before him.
 
 But, what is more, the description and estimate of the group mind as
 they have been given by Le Bon and the rest have not by any means been
 left undisputed. There is no doubt that all the phenomena of the group
 mind which have just been mentioned have been correctly observed, but it
 is also possible to distinguish other manifestations of the group
 formation, which operate in a precisely opposite sense, and from which a
 much higher opinion of the group mind must necessarily follow.
 
 Le Bon himself was prepared to admit that in certain circumstances the
 morals of a group can be higher than those of the individuals that
 compose it, and that only collectivities are capable of a high degree of
 unselfishness and devotion. 'While with isolated individuals personal
 interest is almost the only motive force, with groups it is very rarely
 prominent.' (p. 65.) Other writers adduce the fact that it is only
 society which prescribes any ethical standards at all for the
 individual, while he as a rule fails in one way or another to come up to
 its high demands. Or they point out that in exceptional circumstances
 there may arise in communities the phenomenon of enthusiasm, which has
 made the most splendid group achievements possible.
 
 As regards intellectual work it remains a fact, indeed, that great
 decisions in the realm of thought and momentous discoveries and
 solutions of problems are only possible to an individual, working in
 solitude. But even the group mind is capable of genius in intellectual
 creation, as is shown above all by language itself, as well as by
 folk-song, folk-lore and the like. It remains an open question,
 moreover, how much the individual thinker or writer owes to the
 stimulation of the group in which he lives, or whether he does more than
 perfect a mental work in which the others have had a simultaneous share.
 
 In face of these completely contradictory accounts, it looks as though
 the work of Group Psychology were bound to come to an ineffectual end.
 But it is easy to find a more hopeful escape from the dilemma. A number
 of very different formations have probably been merged under the term
 'group' and may require to be distinguished. The assertions of Sighele,
 Le Bon and the rest relate to groups of a short-lived character, which
 some passing interest has hastily agglomerated out of various sorts of
 individuals. The characteristics of revolutionary groups, and
 especially those of the great French Revolution, have unmistakably
 influenced their descriptions. The opposite opinions owe their origin to
 the consideration of those stable groups or associations in which
 mankind pass their lives, and which are embodied in the institutions of
 society. Groups of the first kind stand in the same sort of relation to
 those of the second as a high but choppy sea to a ground swell.
 
 McDougall, in his book on _The Group Mind_,[19] starts out from the same
 contradiction that has just been mentioned, and finds a solution for it
 in the factor of organisation. In the simplest case, he says, the
 'group' possesses no organisation at all or one scarcely deserving the
 name. He describes a group of this kind as a 'crowd'. But he admits that
 a crowd of human beings can hardly come together without possessing at
 all events the rudiments of an organisation, and that precisely in these
 simple groups many of the fundamental facts of Collective Psychology can
 be observed with special ease (p. 22). Before the members of a random
 crowd of people can constitute something in the nature of a group in the
 psychological sense of the word, a condition has to be fulfilled; these
 individuals must have something in common with one another, a common
 interest in an object, a similar emotional bias in some situation or
 other, and ('consequently', I should like to interpolate) 'some degree
 of reciprocal influence' (p. 23). The higher the degree of 'this mental
 homogeneity', the more readily do the individuals form a psychological
 group, and the more striking are the manifestations of a group mind.
 
 The most remarkable and also the most important result of the formation
 of a group is the 'exaltation or intensification of emotion' produced in
 every member of it (p. 24). In McDougall's opinion men's emotions are
 stirred in a group to a pitch that they seldom or never attain under
 other conditions; and it is a pleasurable experience for those who are
 concerned to surrender themselves so unreservedly to their passions and
 thus to become merged in the group and to lose the sense of the limits
 of their individuality. The manner in which individuals are thus carried
 away by a common impulse is explained by McDougall by means of what he
 calls the 'principle of direct induction of emotion by way of the
 primitive sympathetic response' (p. 25), that is, by means of the
 emotional contagion with which we are already familiar. The fact is that
 the perception of the signs of an emotional state is calculated
 automatically to arouse the same emotion in the person who perceives
 them. The greater the number of people in whom the same emotion can be
 simultaneously observed, the stronger does this automatic compulsion
 grow. The individual loses his power of criticism, and lets himself slip
 into the same emotion. But in so doing he increases the excitement of
 the other people, who had produced this effect upon him, and thus the
 emotional charge of the individuals becomes intensified by mutual
 interaction. Something is unmistakably at work in the nature of a
 compulsion to do the same as the others, to remain in harmony with the
 many. The coarser and simpler emotions are the more apt to spread
 through a group in this way (p. 39).
 
 This mechanism for the intensification of emotion is favoured by some
 other influences which emanate from groups. A group impresses the
 individual with a sense of unlimited power and of insurmountable peril.
 For the moment it replaces the whole of human society, which is the
 wielder of authority, whose punishments the individual fears, and for
 whose sake he has submitted to so many inhibitions. It is clearly
 perilous for him to put himself in opposition to it, and it will be
 safer to follow the example of those around him and perhaps even 'hunt
 with the pack'. In obedience to the new authority he may put his former
 'conscience' out of action, and so surrender to the attraction of the
 increased pleasure that is certainly obtained from the removal of
 inhibitions. On the whole, therefore, it is not so remarkable that we
 should see an individual in a group doing or approving things which he
 would have avoided in the normal conditions of life; and in this way we
 may even hope to clear up a little of the mystery which is so often
 covered by the enigmatic word 'suggestion'.
 
 McDougall does not dispute the thesis as to the collective inhibition of
 intelligence in groups (p. 41). He says that the minds of lower
 intelligence bring down those of a higher order to their own level. The
 latter are obstructed in their activity, because in general an
 intensification of emotion creates unfavourable conditions for sound
 intellectual work, and further because the individuals are intimidated
 by the group and their mental activity is not free, and because there is
 a lowering in each individual of his sense of responsibility for his own
 performances.
 
 The judgement with which McDougall sums up the psychological behaviour
 of a simple 'unorganised' group is no more friendly than that of Le Bon.
 Such a group 'is excessively emotional, impulsive, violent, fickle,
 inconsistent, irresolute and extreme in action, displaying only the
 coarser emotions and the less refined sentiments; extremely suggestible,
 careless in deliberation, hasty in judgment, incapable of any but the
 simpler and imperfect forms of reasoning; easily swayed and led,
 lacking in self-consciousness, devoid of self-respect and of sense of
 responsibility, and apt to be carried away by the consciousness of its
 own force, so that it tends to produce all the manifestations we have
 learnt to expect of any irresponsible and absolute power. Hence its
 behaviour is like that of an unruly child or an untutored passionate
 savage in a strange situation, rather than like that of its average
 member; and in the worst cases it is like that of a wild beast, rather
 than like that of human beings.' (p. 45.)
 
 Since McDougall contrasts the behaviour of a highly organised group with
 what has just been described, we shall be particularly interested to
 learn in what this organisation consists, and by what factors it is
 produced. The author enumerates five 'principal conditions' for raising
 collective mental life to a higher level.
 
 The first and fundamental condition is that there should be some degree
 of continuity of existence in the group. This may be either material or
 formal; the former, if the same individuals persist in the group for
 some time; and the latter, if there is developed within the group a
 system of fixed positions which are occupied by a succession of
 individuals.
 
 The second condition is that in the individual member of the group some
 definite idea should be formed of the nature, composition, functions and
 capacities of the group, so that from this he may develop an emotional
 relation to the group as a whole.
 
 The third is that the group should be brought into interaction (perhaps
 in the form of rivalry) with other groups similar to it but differing
 from it in many respects.
 
 The fourth is that the group should possess traditions, customs and
 habits, and especially such as determine the relations of its members to
 one another.
 
 The fifth is that the group should have a definite structure, expressed
 in the specialisation and differentiation of the functions of its
 constituents.
 
 According to McDougall, if these conditions are fulfilled, the
 psychological disadvantages of the group formation are removed. The
 collective lowering of intellectual ability is avoided by withdrawing
 the performance of intellectual tasks from the group and reserving them
 for individual members of it.
 
 It seems to us that the condition which McDougall designates as the
 'organisation' of a group can with more justification be described in
 another way. The problem consists in how to procure for the group
 precisely those features which were characteristic of the individual and
 which are extinguished in him by the formation of the group. For the
 individual, outside the primitive group, possessed his own continuity,
 his self-consciousness, his traditions and customs, his own particular
 functions and position, and kept apart from his rivals. Owing to his
 entry into an 'unorganised' group he had lost this distinctiveness for a
 time. If we thus recognise that the aim is to equip the group with the
 attributes of the individual, we shall be reminded of a valuable remark
 of Trotter's,[20] to the effect that the tendency towards the formation
 of groups is biologically a continuation of the multicellular character
 of all the higher organisms.
 
 
 
 
 IV
 
 SUGGESTION AND LIBIDO
 
 
 We started from the fundamental fact that an individual in a group is
 subjected through its influence to what is often a profound alteration
 in his mental activity. His emotions become extraordinarily intensified,
 while his intellectual ability becomes markedly reduced, both processes
 being evidently in the direction of an approximation to the other
 individuals in the group; and this result can only be reached by the
 removal of those inhibitions upon his instincts which are peculiar to
 each individual, and by his resigning those expressions of his
 inclinations which are especially his own. We have heard that these
 often unwelcome consequences are to some extent at least prevented by a
 higher 'organisation' of the group; but this does not contradict the
 fundamental fact of Group Psychology--the two theses as to the
 intensification of the emotions and the inhibition of the intellect in
 primitive groups. Our interest is now directed to discovering the
 psychological explanation of this mental change which is experienced by
 the individual in a group.
 
 It is clear that rational factors (such as the intimidation of the
 individual which has already been mentioned, that is, the action of his
 instinct of self-preservation) do not cover the observable phenomena.
 Beyond this what we are offered as an explanation by authorities upon
 Sociology and Group Psychology is always the same, even though it is
 given various names, and that is--the magic word 'suggestion'. Tarde
 calls it 'imitation'; but we cannot help agreeing with a writer who
 protests that imitation comes under the concept of suggestion, and is in
 fact one of its results.[21] Le Bon traces back all the puzzling
 features of social phenomena to two factors: the mutual suggestion of
 individuals and the prestige of leaders. But prestige, again, is only
 recognizable by its capacity for evoking suggestion. McDougall for a
 moment gives us an impression that his principle of 'primitive induction
 of emotion' might enable us to do without the assumption of suggestion.
 But on further consideration we are forced to perceive that this
 principle says no more than the familiar assertions about 'imitation' or
 'contagion', except for a decided stress upon the emotional factor.
 There is no doubt that something exists in us which, when we become
 aware of signs of an emotion in someone else, tends to make us fall into
 the same emotion; but how often do we not successfully oppose it, resist
 the emotion, and react in quite an opposite way? Why, therefore, do we
 invariably give way to this contagion when we are in a group? Once more
 we should have to say that what compels us to obey this tendency is
 imitation, and what induces the emotion in us is the group's suggestive
 influence. Moreover, quite apart from this, McDougall does not enable us
 to evade suggestion; we hear from him as well as from other writers that
 groups are distinguished by their special suggestibility.
 
 We shall therefore be prepared for the statement that suggestion (or
 more correctly suggestibility) is actually an irreducible, primitive
 phenomenon, a fundamental fact in the mental life of man. Such, too, was
 the opinion of Bernheim, of whose astonishing arts I was a witness in
 the year 1889. But I can remember even then feeling a muffled hostility
 to this tyranny of suggestion. When a patient who showed himself
 unamenable was met with the shout: 'What are you doing? _Vous vous
 contresuggestionnez!_', I said to myself that this was an evident
 injustice and an act of violence. For the man certainly had a right to
 counter-suggestions if they were trying to subdue him with suggestions.
 Later on my resistance took the direction of protesting against the view
 that suggestion, which explained everything, was itself to be preserved
 from explanation. Thinking of it, I repeated the old conundrum:[22]
 
             Christoph trug Christum,
             Christus trug die ganze Welt,
             Sag' wo hat Christoph
             Damals hin den Fuss gestellt?[23]
 
 Christophorus Christum, sed Christus sustulit orbem:
     Constiterit pedibus dic ubi Christophorus?
 
 Now that I once more approach the riddle of suggestion after having kept
 away from it for some thirty years, I find there is no change in the
 situation. To this statement I can discover only a single exception,
 which I need not mention, since it is one which bears witness to the
 influence of psycho-analysis. I notice that particular efforts are being
 made to formulate the concept of suggestion correctly, that is, to fix
 the conventional use of the name.[24] And this is by no means
 superfluous, for the word is acquiring a more and more extended use and
 a looser and looser meaning, and will soon come to designate any sort of
 influence whatever, just as in English, where 'to suggest' and
 'suggestion' correspond to our _nahelegen_ and _Anregung_. But there has
 been no explanation of the nature of suggestion, that is, of the
 conditions under which influence without adequate logical foundation
 takes place. I should not avoid the task of supporting this statement by
 an analysis of the literature of the last thirty years, if I were not
 aware that an exhaustive inquiry is being undertaken close at hand which
 has in view the fulfilment of this very task.
 
 Instead of this I shall make an attempt at using the concept of _libido_
 for the purpose of throwing light upon Group Psychology, a concept which
 has done us such good service in the study of psycho-neuroses.
 
 Libido is an expression taken from the theory of the emotions. We call
 by that name the energy (regarded as a quantitative magnitude, though
 not at present actually mensurable) of those instincts which have to do
 with all that may be comprised under the word 'love'. The nucleus of
 what we mean by love naturally consists (and this is what is commonly
 called love, and what the poets sing of) in sexual love with sexual
 union as its aim. But we do not separate from this--what in any case
 has a share in the name 'love'--on the one hand, self-love, and on the
 other, love for parents and children, friendship and love for humanity
 in general, and also devotion to concrete objects and to abstract ideas.
 Our justification lies in the fact that psycho-analytic research has
 taught us that all these tendencies are an expression of the same
 instinctive activities; in relations between the sexes these instincts
 force their way towards sexual union, but in other circumstances they
 are diverted from this aim or are prevented from reaching it, though
 always preserving enough of their original nature to keep their identity
 recognizable (as in such features as the longing for proximity, and
 self-sacrifice).
 
 We are of opinion, then, that language has carried out an entirely
 justifiable piece of unification in creating the word 'love' with its
 numerous uses, and that we cannot do better than take it as the basis of
 our scientific discussions and expositions as well. By coming to this
 decision, psycho-analysis has let loose a storm of indignation, as
 though it had been guilty of an act of outrageous innovation. Yet
 psycho-analysis has done nothing original in taking love in this 'wider'
 sense. In its origin, function, and relation to sexual love, the
 '_Eros_' of the philosopher Plato coincides exactly with the love force,
 the libido, of psycho-analysis, as has been shown in detail by
 Nachmansohn and Pfister;[25] and when the apostle Paul, in his famous
 epistle to the Corinthians, prizes love above all else, he certainly
 understands it in the same 'wider' sense.[26] But this only shows that
 men do not always take their great thinkers seriously, even when they
 profess most to admire them.
 
 Psycho-analysis, then, gives these love instincts the name of sexual
 instincts, a _potiori_ and by reason of their origin. The majority of
 'educated' people have taken their revenge by retorting upon
 psycho-analysis with the reproach of 'pan-sexualism'. Anyone who
 considers sex as something mortifying and humiliating to human nature is
 at liberty to make use of the more genteel expressions 'Eros' and
 'erotic'. I might have done so myself from the first and thus have
 spared myself much opposition. But I did not want to, for I like to
 avoid concessions to faint-heartedness. One can never tell where that
 road may lead one; one gives way first in words, and then little by
 little in substance too. I cannot see any merit in being ashamed of sex;
 the Greek word 'Eros', which is to soften the affront, is in the end
 nothing more than a translation of our German word _Liebe_ [love]; and
 finally, he who knows how to wait need make no concessions.
 
 We will try our fortune, then, with the supposition that love
 relationships (or, to use a more neutral expression, emotional ties)
 also constitute the essence of the group mind. Let us remember that the
 authorities make no mention of any such relations. What would correspond
 to them is evidently concealed behind the shelter, the screen, of
 suggestion. Our hypothesis finds support in the first instance from two
 passing thoughts. First, that a group is clearly held together by a
 power of some kind: and to what power could this feat be better ascribed
 than to Eros, who holds together everything in the world? Secondly, that
 if an individual gives up his distinctiveness in a group and lets its
 other members influence him by suggestion, it gives one the impression
 that he does it because he feels the need of being in harmony with them
 rather than in opposition to them--so that perhaps after all he does it
 '_ihnen zu Liebe_'.[27]
 
 
 
 
 V
 
 TWO ARTIFICIAL GROUPS: THE CHURCH AND THE ARMY
 
 
 We may recall from what we know of the morphology of groups that it is
 possible to distinguish very different kinds of groups and opposing
 lines in their development. There are very fleeting groups and extremely
 lasting ones; homogeneous ones, made up of the same sorts of
 individuals, and unhomogeneous ones; natural groups, and artificial
 ones, requiring an external force to keep them together; primitive
 groups, and highly organised ones with a definite structure. But for
 reasons which have yet to be explained we should like to lay particular
 stress upon a distinction to which the authorities have rather given too
 little attention; I refer to that between leaderless groups and those
 with leaders. And, in complete opposition to the usual practice, we
 shall not choose a relatively simple group formation as our point of
 departure, but shall begin with highly organised, lasting and artificial
 groups. The most interesting example of such structures are
 churches--communities of believers--and armies.
 
 A church and an army are artificial groups, that is, a certain external
 force is employed to prevent them from disintegrating and to check
 alterations in their structure. As a rule a person is not consulted or
 is given no choice, as to whether he wants to enter such a group; any
 attempt at leaving it is usually met with persecution or with severe
 punishment, or has quite definite conditions attached to it. It is quite
 outside our present interest to enquire why these associations need such
 special safeguards. We are only attracted by one circumstance, namely
 that certain facts, which are far more concealed in other cases, can be
 observed very clearly in those highly organised groups which are
 protected from dissolution in the manner that has been mentioned. In a
 church (and we may with advantage take the Catholic Church as a type) as
 well as in an army, however different the two may be in other respects,
 the same illusion holds good of there being a head--in the Catholic
 Church Christ, in an army its Commander-in-Chief--who loves all the
 individuals in the group with an equal love. Everything depends upon
 this illusion; if it were to be dropped, then both Church and army would
 dissolve, so far as the external force permitted them to. This equal
 love was expressly enunciated by Christ: 'Inasmuch as ye have done it
 unto one of the least of these my brethren, ye have done it unto me.' He
 stands to the individual members of the group of believers in the
 relation of a kind elder brother; he is their father surrogate. All the
 demands that are made upon the individual are derived from this love of
 Christ's. A democratic character runs through the Church, for the very
 reason that before Christ everyone is equal, and that everyone has an
 equal share in his love. It is not without a deep reason that the
 similarity between the Christian community and a family is invoked, and
 that believers call themselves brothers in Christ, that is, brothers
 through the love which Christ has for them. There is no doubt that the
 tie which unites each individual with Christ is also the cause of the
 tie which unites them with one another. The like holds good of an army.
 The Commander-in-Chief is a father who loves all his soldiers equally,
 and for that reason they are comrades among themselves. The army differs
 structurally from the Church in being built up of a series of such
 groups. Every captain is, as it were, the Commander-in-Chief and the
 father of his company, and so is every non-commissioned officer of his
 section. It is true that a similar hierarchy has been constructed in the
 Church, but it does not play the same part in it economically; for more
 knowledge and care about individuals may be attributed to Christ than
 to a human Commander-in-Chief.[28]
 
 It is to be noticed that in these two artificial groups each individual
 is bound by libidinal[29] ties on the one hand to the leader (Christ,
 the Commander-in-Chief) and on the other hand to the other members of
 the group. How these two ties are related to each other, whether they
 are of the same kind and the same value, and how they are to be
 described psychologically--these questions must be reserved for
 subsequent enquiry. But we shall venture even now upon a mild reproach
 against the authorities for not having sufficiently appreciated the
 importance of the leader in the psychology of the group, while our own
 choice of a first object for investigation has brought us into a more
 favourable position. It would appear as though we were on the right road
 towards an explanation of the principal phenomenon of Group
 Psychology--the individual's lack of freedom in a group. If each
 individual is bound in two directions by such an intense emotional tie,
 we shall find no difficulty in attributing to that circumstance the
 alteration and limitation which have been observed in his personality.
 
 A hint to the same effect, that the essence of a group lies in the
 libidinal ties existing in it, is also to be found in the phenomenon of
 panic, which is best studied in military groups. A panic arises if a
 group of that kind becomes disintegrated. Its characteristics are that
 none of the orders given by superiors are any longer listened to, and
 that each individual is only solicitous on his own account, and without
 any consideration for the rest. The mutual ties have ceased to exist,
 and a gigantic and senseless dread [_Angst_] is set free. At this point,
 again, the objection will naturally be made that it is rather the other
 way round; and that the dread has grown so great as to be able to
 disregard all ties and all feelings of consideration for others.
 McDougall has even (p. 24) made use of the case of panic (though not of
 military panic) as a typical instance of that intensification of emotion
 by contagion ('primary induction') upon which he lays so much emphasis.
 But nevertheless this rational method of explanation is here quite
 inadequate. The very question that needs explanation is why the dread
 has become so gigantic. The greatness of the danger cannot be
 responsible, for the same army which now falls a victim to panic may
 previously have faced equally great or greater danger with complete
 success; it is of the very essence of panic that it bears no relation to
 the danger that threatens, and often breaks out upon the most trivial
 occasions. If an individual in panic dread begins to be solicitous only
 on his own account, he bears witness in so doing to the fact that the
 emotional ties, which have hitherto made the danger seem small to him,
 have ceased to exist. Now that he is by himself in facing the danger,
 he may surely think it greater. The fact is, therefore, that panic dread
 presupposes a relaxation in the libidinal structure of the group and
 reacts to it in a justifiable manner, and the contrary view--that the
 libidinal ties of the group are destroyed owing to dread in the face of
 the danger--can be refuted.
 
 The contention that dread in a group is increased to enormous
 proportions by means of induction (contagion) is not in the least
 contradicted by these remarks. McDougall's view meets the case entirely
 when the danger is a really great one and when the group has no strong
 emotional ties--conditions which are fulfilled, for instance, when a
 fire breaks out in a theatre or a place of amusement. But the really
 instructive case and the one which can be best employed for our purposes
 is that mentioned above, in which a body of troops breaks into a panic
 although the danger has not increased beyond a degree that is usual and
 has often been previously faced. It is not to be expected that the usage
 of the word 'panic' should be clearly and unambiguously determined.
 Sometimes it is used to describe any collective dread, sometimes even
 dread in an individual when it exceeds all bounds, and often the name
 seems to be reserved for cases in which the outbreak of dread is not
 warranted by the occasion. If we take the word 'panic' in the sense of
 collective dread, we can establish a far-reaching analogy. Dread in an
 individual is provoked either by the greatness of a danger or by the
 cessation of emotional ties (libidinal cathexes[30]
 [_Libidobesetzungen_]); the latter is the case of neurotic dread.[31] In
 just the same way panic arises either owing to an increase of the common
 danger or owing to the disappearance of the emotional ties which hold
 the group together; and the latter case is analogous to that of neurotic
 dread.[32]
 
 Anyone who, like McDougall (l.c.), describes a panic as one of the
 plainest functions of the 'group mind', arrives at the paradoxical
 position that this group mind does away with itself in one of its most
 striking manifestations. It is impossible to doubt that panic means the
 disintegration of a group; it involves the cessation of all the feelings
 of consideration which the members of the group otherwise show one
 another.
 
 The typical occasion of the outbreak of a panic is very much as it is
 represented in Nestroy's parody of Hebbel's play about Judith and
 Holofernes. A soldier cries out: "The general has lost his head!" and
 thereupon all the Assyrians take to flight. The loss of the leader in
 some sense or other, the birth, of misgivings about him, brings on the
 outbreak of panic, though the danger remains the same; the mutual ties
 between the members of the group disappear, as a rule, at the same time
 as the tie with their leader. The group vanishes in dust, like a Bologna
 flask when its top is broken off.
 
 The dissolution of a religious group is not so easy to observe. A short
 time ago there came into my hands an English novel of Catholic origin,
 recommended by the Bishop of London, with the title _When It Was Dark_.
 It gave a clever and, as it seems to me, a convincing picture of such a
 possibility and its consequences. The novel, which is supposed to
 relate to the present day, tells how a conspiracy of enemies of the
 figure of Christ and of the Christian faith succeed in arranging for a
 sepulchre to be discovered in Jerusalem. In this sepulchre is an
 inscription, in which Joseph of Arimathaea confesses that for reasons of
 piety he secretly removed the body of Christ from its grave on the third
 day after its entombment and buried it in this spot. The resurrection of
 Christ and his divine nature are by this means disposed of, and the
 result of this archaeological discovery is a convulsion in European
 civilisation and an extraordinary increase in all crimes and acts of
 violence, which only ceases when the forgers' plot has been revealed.
 
 The phenomenon which accompanies the dissolution that is here supposed
 to overtake a religious group is not dread, for which the occasion is
 wanting. Instead of it ruthless and hostile impulses towards other
 people make their appearance, which, owing to the equal love of Christ,
 they had previously been unable to do.[33] But even during the kingdom
 of Christ those people who do not belong to the community of believers,
 who do not love him, and whom he does not love, stand outside this tie.
 Therefore a religion, even if it calls itself the religion of love,
 must be hard and unloving to those who do not belong to it.
 Fundamentally indeed every religion is in this same way a religion of
 love for all those whom it embraces; while cruelty and intolerance
 towards those who do not belong to it are natural to every religion.
 However difficult we may find it personally, we ought not to reproach
 believers too severely on this account; people who are unbelieving or
 indifferent are so much better off psychologically in this respect. If
 to-day that intolerance no longer shows itself so violent and cruel as
 in former centuries, we can scarcely conclude that there has been a
 softening in human manners. The cause is rather to be found in the
 undeniable weakening of religious feelings and the libidinal ties which
 depend upon them. If another group tie takes the place of the religious
 one--and the socialistic tie seems to be succeeding in doing so--, then
 there will be the same intolerance towards outsiders as in the age of
 the Wars of Religion; and if differences between scientific opinions
 could ever attain a similar significance for groups, the same result
 would again be repeated with this new motivation.
 
 
 
 
 VI
 
 FURTHER PROBLEMS AND LINES OF WORK
 
 
 We have hitherto considered two artificial groups and have found that
 they are dominated by two emotional ties. One of these, the tie with the
 leader, seems (at all events for these cases) to be more of a ruling
 factor than the other, which holds between the members of the group.
 
 Now much else remains to be examined and described in the morphology of
 groups. We should have to start from the ascertained fact that a mere
 collection of people is not a group, so long as these ties have not been
 established in it; but we should have to admit that in any collection of
 people the tendency to form a psychological group may very easily become
 prominent. We should have to give our attention to the different kinds
 of groups, more or less stable, that arise spontaneously, and to study
 the conditions of their origin and of their dissolution. We should above
 all be concerned with the distinction between groups which have a
 leader and leaderless groups. We should consider whether groups with
 leaders may not be the more primitive and complete, whether in the
 others an idea, an abstraction, may not be substituted for the leader (a
 state of things to which religious groups, with their invisible head,
 form a transition stage), and whether a common tendency, a wish in which
 a number of people can have a share, may not in the same way serve as a
 substitute. This abstraction, again, might be more or less completely
 embodied in the figure of what we might call a secondary leader, and
 interesting varieties would arise from the relation between the idea and
 the leader. The leader or the leading idea might also, so to speak, be
 negative; hatred against a particular person or institution might
 operate in just the same unifying way, and might call up the same kind
 of emotional ties as positive attachment. Then the question would also
 arise whether a leader is really indispensable to the essence of a
 group--and other questions besides.
 
 But all these questions, which may, moreover, have been dealt with in
 part in the literature of Group Psychology, will not succeed in
 diverting our interest from the fundamental psychological problems that
 confront us in the structure of a group. And our attention will first be
 attracted by a consideration which promises to bring us in the most
 direct way to a proof that libidinal ties are what characterize a
 group.
 
 Let us keep before our eyes the nature of the emotional relations which
 hold between men in general. According to Schopenhauer's famous simile
 of the freezing porcupines no one can tolerate a too intimate approach
 to his neighbour.[34]
 
 The evidence of psycho-analysis shows that almost every intimate
 emotional relation between two people which lasts for some
 time--marriage, friendship, the relations between parents and
 children[35]--leaves a sediment of feelings of aversion and hostility,
 which have first to be eliminated by repression. This is less disguised
 in the common wrangles between business partners or in the grumbles of a
 subordinate at his superior. The same thing happens when men come
 together in larger units. Every time two families become connected by a
 marriage, each of them thinks itself superior to or of better birth than
 the other. Of two neighbouring towns each is the other's most jealous
 rival; every little canton looks down upon the others with contempt.
 Closely related races keep one another at arm's length; the South German
 cannot endure the North German, the Englishman casts every kind of
 aspersion upon the Scotchman, the Spaniard despises the Portuguese. We
 are no longer astonished that greater differences should lead to an
 almost insuperable repugnance, such as the Gallic people feel for the
 German, the Aryan for the Semite, and the white races for the coloured.
 
 When this hostility is directed against people who are otherwise loved
 we describe it as ambivalence of feeling; and we explain the fact, in
 what is probably far too rational a manner, by means of the numerous
 occasions for conflicts of interest which arise precisely in such
 intimate relations. In the undisguised antipathies and aversions which
 people feel towards strangers with whom they have to do we may recognize
 the expression of self-love--of narcissism. This self-love works for the
 self-assertion of the individual, and behaves as though the occurrence
 of any divergence from his own particular lines of development involved
 a criticism of them and a demand for their alteration. We do not know
 why such sensitiveness should have been directed to just these details
 of differentiation; but it is unmistakable that in this whole connection
 men give evidence of a readiness for hatred, an aggressiveness, the
 source of which is unknown, and to which one is tempted to ascribe an
 elementary character.[36]
 
 But the whole of this intolerance vanishes, temporarily or permanently,
 as the result of the formation of a group, and in a group. So long as a
 group formation persists or so far as it extends, individuals behave as
 though they were uniform, tolerate other people's peculiarities, put
 themselves on an equal level with them, and have no feeling of aversion
 towards them. Such a limitation of narcissism can, according to our
 theoretical views, only be produced by one factor, a libidinal tie with
 other people. Love for oneself knows only one barrier--love for others,
 love for objects.[37] The question will at once be raised whether
 community of interest in itself, without any addition of libido, must
 not necessarily lead to the toleration of other people and to
 considerateness for them. This objection may be met by the reply that
 nevertheless no lasting limitation of narcissism is effected in this
 way, since this tolerance does not persist longer than the immediate
 advantage gained from the other people's collaboration. But the
 practical importance of the discussion is less than might be supposed,
 for experience has shown that in cases of collaboration libidinal ties
 are regularly formed between the fellow-workers which prolong and
 solidify the relation between them to a point beyond what is merely
 profitable. The same thing occurs in men's social relations as has
 become familiar to psycho-analytic research in the course of the
 development of the individual libido. The libido props itself upon the
 satisfaction of the great vital needs, and chooses as its first objects
 the people who have a share in that process. And in the development of
 mankind as a whole, just as in individuals, love alone acts as the
 civilizing factor in the sense that it brings a change from egoism to
 altruism. And this is true both of the sexual love for women, with all
 the obligations which it involves of sparing what women are fond of, and
 also of the desexualised, sublimated homosexual love for other men,
 which springs from work in common. If therefore in groups narcissistic
 self-love is subject to limitations which do not operate outside them,
 that is cogent evidence that the essence of a group formation consists
 in a new kind of libidinal ties among the members of the group.
 
 But our interest now leads us on to the pressing question as to what may
 be the nature of these ties which exist in groups. In the
 psycho-analytic study of neuroses we have hitherto been occupied almost
 exclusively with ties that unite with their objects those love instincts
 which still pursue directly sexual aims. In groups there can evidently
 be no question of sexual aims of that kind. We are concerned here with
 love instincts which have been diverted from their original aims, though
 they do not operate with less energy on that account. Now we have
 already observed within the range of the usual sexual object-cathexis
 [_Objektbesetzung_] phenomena which represent a diversion of the
 instinct from its sexual aim. We have described them as degrees of being
 in love, and have recognized that they involve a certain encroachment
 upon the ego. We shall now turn our attention more closely to these
 phenomena of being in love, in the firm expectation of finding in them
 conditions which can be transferred to the ties that exist in groups.
 But we should also like to know whether this kind of object-cathexis, as
 we know it in sexual life, represents the only manner of emotional tie
 with other people, or whether we must take other mechanisms of the sort
 into account. As a matter of fact we learn from psycho-analysis that
 there do exist other mechanisms for emotional ties, the so-called
 _identifications_, insufficiently-known processes and hard to describe,
 the investigation of which will for some time keep us away from the
 subject of Group Psychology.
 
 
 
 
 VII
 
 IDENTIFICATION
 
 
 Identification is known to psycho-analysis as the earliest expression of
 an emotional tie with another person. It plays a part in the early
 history of the Oedipus complex. A little boy will exhibit a special
 interest in his father; he would like to grow like him and be like him,
 and take his place everywhere. We may say simply that he takes his
 father as his ideal. This behaviour has nothing to do with a passive or
 feminine attitude towards his father (and towards males in general); it
 is on the contrary typically masculine. It fits in very well with the
 Oedipus complex, for which it helps to prepare the way.
 
 At the same time as this identification with his father, or a little
 later, the boy has begun to develop a true object-cathexis towards his
 mother according to the anaclitic type [_Anlehnungstypus_].[38] He then
 exhibits, therefore, two psychologically distinct ties: a
 straightforward sexual object-cathexis towards his mother and a typical
 identification towards his father. The two subsist side by side for a
 time without any mutual influence or interference. In consequence of the
 irresistible advance towards a unification of mental life they come
 together at last; and the normal Oedipus complex originates from their
 confluence. The little boy notices that his father stands in his way
 with his mother. His identification with his father then takes on a
 hostile colouring and becomes identical with the wish to replace his
 father in regard to his mother as well. Identification, in fact, is
 ambivalent from the very first; it can turn into an expression of
 tenderness as easily as into a wish for someone's removal. It behaves
 like a derivative of the first _oral_ phase of the organisation of the
 libido, in which the object that we long for and prize is assimilated by
 eating and is in that way annihilated as such. The cannibal, as we know,
 has remained at this standpoint; he has a devouring affection for his
 enemies and only devours people of whom he is fond.[39]
 
 The subsequent history of this identification with the father may easily
 be lost sight of. It may happen that the Oedipus complex becomes
 inverted, and that the father is taken as the object of a feminine
 attitude, an object from which the directly sexual instincts look for
 satisfaction; in that event the identification with the father has
 become the precursor of an object tie with the father. The same holds
 good, with the necessary substitutions, of the baby daughter as well.
 
 It is easy to state in a formula the distinction between an
 identification with the father and the choice of the father as an
 object. In the first case one's father is what one would like to _be_,
 and in the second he is what one would like to _have_. The distinction,
 that is, depends upon whether the tie attaches to the subject or to the
 object of the ego. The former is therefore already possible before any
 sexual object-choice has been made. It is much more difficult to give a
 clear metapsychological representation of the distinction. We can only
 see that identification endeavours to mould a person's own ego after the
 fashion of the one that has been taken as a 'model'.
 
 Let us disentangle identification as it occurs in the structure of a
 neurotic symptom from its rather complicated connections. Supposing that
 a little girl (and we will keep to her for the present) develops the
 same painful symptom as her mother--for instance, the same tormenting
 cough. Now this may come about in various ways. The identification may
 come from the Oedipus complex; in that case it signifies a hostile
 desire on the girl's part to take her mother's place, and the symptom
 expresses her object love towards her father, and brings about a
 realisation, under the influence of a sense of guilt, of her desire to
 take her mother's place: 'You wanted to be your mother, and now you
 _are_--anyhow as far as the pain goes'. This is the complete mechanism
 of the structure of a hysterical symptom. Or, on the other hand, the
 symptom may be the same as that of the person who is loved--(so, for
 instance, Dora in the 'Bruchstck einer Hysterieanalyse'[40] imitated
 her father's cough); in that case we can only describe the state of
 things by saying that _identification has appeared instead of
 object-choice, and that object-choice has regressed to identification_.
 We have heard that identification is the earliest and original form of
 emotional tie; it often happens that under the conditions in which
 symptoms are constructed, that is, where there is repression and where
 the mechanisms of the unconscious are dominant, object-choice is turned
 back into identification--the ego, that is, assumes the characteristics
 of the object. It is noticeable that in these identifications the ego
 sometimes copies the person who is not loved and sometimes the one who
 is loved. It must also strike us that in both cases the identification
 is a partial and extremely limited one and only borrows a single trait
 from the person who is its object.
 
 There is a third particularly frequent and important case of symptom
 formation, in which the identification leaves any object relation to the
 person who is being copied entirely out of account. Supposing, for
 instance, that one of the girls in a boarding school has had a letter
 from someone with whom she is secretly in love which arouses her
 jealousy, and that she reacts to it with a fit of hysterics; then some
 of her friends who know about it will contract the fit, as we say, by
 means of mental infection. The mechanism is that of identification based
 upon the possibility or desire of putting oneself in the same
 situation. The other girls would like to have a secret love affair too,
 and under the influence of a sense of guilt they also accept the pain
 involved in it. It would be wrong to suppose that they take on the
 symptom out of sympathy. On the contrary, the sympathy only arises out
 of the identification, and this is proved by the fact that infection or
 imitation of this kind takes place in circumstances where even less
 pre-existing sympathy is to be assumed than usually exists between
 friends in a girls' school. One ego has perceived a significant analogy
 with another upon one point--in our example upon a similar readiness for
 emotion; an identification is thereupon constructed on this point, and,
 under the influence of the pathogenic situation, is displaced on to the
 symptom which the one ego has produced. The identification by means of
 the symptom has thus become the mark of a point of coincidence between
 the two egos which has to be kept repressed.
 
 What we have learned from these three sources may be summarised as
 follows. First, identification is the original form of emotional tie
 with an object; secondly, in a regressive way it becomes a substitute
 for a libidinal object tie, as it were by means of the introjection of
 the object into the ego; and thirdly, it may arise with every new
 perception of a common quality shared with some other person who is not
 an object of the sexual instinct. The more important this common
 quality is, the more successful may this partial identification become,
 and it may thus represent the beginning of a new tie.
 
 We already begin to divine that the mutual tie between members of a
 group is in the nature of an identification of this kind, based upon an
 important emotional common quality; and we may suspect that this common
 quality lies in the nature of the tie with the leader. Another suspicion
 may tell us that we are far from having exhausted the problem of
 identification, and that we are faced by the process which psychology
 calls 'empathy [_Einfhlung_]' and which plays the largest part in our
 understanding of what is inherently foreign to our ego in other people.
 But we shall here limit ourselves to the immediate emotional effects of
 identification, and shall leave on one side its significance for our
 intellectual life.
 
 Psycho-analytic research, which has already occasionally attacked the
 more difficult problems of the psychoses, has also been able to exhibit
 identification to us in some other cases which are not immediately
 comprehensible. I shall treat two of these cases in detail as material
 for our further consideration.
 
 The genesis of male homosexuality in a large class of cases is as
 follows. A young man has been unusually long and intensely fixated upon
 his mother in the sense of the Oedipus complex. But at last, after the
 end of his puberty, the time comes for exchanging his mother for some
 other sexual object. Things take a sudden turn: the young man does not
 abandon his mother, but identifies himself with her; he transforms
 himself into her, and now looks about for objects which can replace his
 ego for him, and on which he can bestow such love and care as he has
 experienced from his mother. This is a frequent process, which can be
 confirmed as often as one likes, and which is naturally quite
 independent of any hypothesis that may be made as to the organic driving
 force and the motives of the sudden transformation. A striking thing
 about this identification is its ample scale; it remoulds the ego in one
 of its important features--in its sexual character--upon the model of
 what has hitherto been the object. In this process the object itself is
 renounced--whether entirely or in the sense of being preserved only in
 the unconscious is a question outside the present discussion.
 Identification with an object that is renounced or lost as a substitute
 for it, introjection of this object into the ego, is indeed no longer a
 novelty to us. A process of the kind may sometimes be directly observed
 in small children. A short time ago an observation of this sort was
 published in the _Internationale Zeitschrift fr Psychoanalyse_. A child
 who was unhappy over the loss of a kitten declared straight out that now
 he himself was the kitten, and accordingly crawled about on all fours,
 would not eat at table, etc.[41]
 
 Another such instance of introjection of the object has been provided by
 the analysis of melancholia, an affection which counts among the most
 remarkable of its exciting causes the real or emotional loss of a loved
 object. A leading characteristic of these cases is a cruel
 self-depreciation of the ego combined with relentless self-criticism and
 bitter self-reproaches. Analyses have shown that this disparagement and
 these reproaches apply at bottom to the object and represent the ego's
 revenge upon it. The shadow of the object has fallen upon the ego, as I
 have said elsewhere.[42] The introjection of the object is here
 unmistakably clear.
 
 But these melancholias also show us something else, which may be of
 importance for our later discussions. They show us the ego divided,
 fallen into two pieces, one of which rages against the second. This
 second piece is the one which has been altered by introjection and which
 contains the lost object. But the piece which behaves so cruelly is not
 unknown to us either. It comprises the conscience, a critical faculty
 [_Instanz_][43] within the ego, which even in normal times takes up a
 critical attitude towards the ego, though never so relentlessly and so
 unjustifiably. On previous occasions we have been driven to the
 hypothesis[44] that some such faculty develops in our ego which may cut
 itself off from the rest of the ego and come into conflict with it. We
 have called it the 'ego ideal', and by way of functions we have ascribed
 to it self-observation, the moral conscience, the censorship of dreams,
 and the chief influence in repression. We have said that it is the heir
 to the original narcissism in which the childish ego found its
 self-sufficiency; it gradually gathers up from the influences of the
 environment the demands which that environment makes upon the ego and
 which the ego cannot always rise to; so that a man, when he cannot be
 satisfied with his ego itself, may nevertheless be able to find
 satisfaction in the ego ideal which has been differentiated out of the
 ego. In delusions of observation, as we have further shown, the
 disintegration of this faculty has become patent, and has thus revealed
 its origin in the influence of superior powers, and above all of
 parents.[45] But we have not forgotten to add that the amount of
 distance between this ego ideal and the real ego is very variable from
 one individual to another, and that with many people this
 differentiation within the ego does not go further than with children.
 
 But before we can employ this material for understanding the libidinal
 organisation of groups, we must take into account some other examples of
 the mutual relations between the object and the ego.[46]
 
 
 
 
 VIII
 
 BEING IN LOVE AND HYPNOSIS
 
 
 Even in its caprices the usage of language remains true to some kind of
 reality. Thus it gives the name of 'love' to a great many kinds of
 emotional relationship which we too group together theoretically as
 love; but then again it feels a doubt whether this love is real, true,
 actual love, and so hints at a whole scale of possibilities within the
 range of the phenomena of love. We shall have no difficulty in making
 the same discovery empirically.
 
 In one class of cases being in love is nothing more than object-cathexis
 on the part of the sexual instincts with a view to directly sexual
 satisfaction, a cathexis which expires, moreover, when this aim has been
 reached; this is what is called common, sensual love. But, as we know,
 the libidinal situation rarely remains so simple. It was possible to
 calculate with certainty upon the revival of the need which had just
 expired; and this must no doubt have been the first motive for
 directing a lasting cathexis upon the sexual object and for 'loving' it
 in the passionless intervals as well.
 
 To this must be added another factor derived from the astonishing course
 of development which is pursued by the erotic life of man. In his first
 phase, which has usually come to an end by the time he is five years
 old, a child has found the first object for his love in one or other of
 his parents, and all of his sexual instincts with their demand for
 satisfaction have been united upon this object. The repression which
 then sets in compels him to renounce the greater number of these
 infantile sexual aims, and leaves behind a profound modification in his
 relation to his parents. The child still remains tied to his parents,
 but by instincts which must be described as being 'inhibited in their
 aim [_zielgehemmte_]'. The emotions which he feels henceforward towards
 these objects of his love are characterized as 'tender'. It is well
 known that the earlier 'sensual' tendencies remain more or less strongly
 preserved in the unconscious, so that in a certain sense the whole of
 the original current continues to exist.[47]
 
 At puberty, as we know, there set in new and very strong tendencies with
 directly sexual aims. In unfavourable cases they remain separate, in the
 form of a sensual current, from the 'tender' emotional trends which
 persist. We are then faced by a picture the two aspects of which certain
 movements in literature take such delight in idealising. A man of this
 kind will show a sentimental enthusiasm for women whom he deeply
 respects but who do not excite him to sexual activities, and he will
 only be potent with other women whom he does not 'love' but thinks
 little of or even despises.[48] More often, however, the adolescent
 succeeds in bringing about a certain degree of synthesis between the
 unsensual, heavenly love and the sensual, earthly love, and his relation
 to his sexual object is characterised by the interaction of uninhibited
 instincts and of instincts inhibited in their aim. The depth to which
 anyone is in love, as contrasted with his purely sensual desire, may be
 measured by the size of the share taken by the inhibited instincts of
 tenderness.
 
 In connection with this question of being in love we have always been
 struck by the phenomenon of sexual over-estimation--the fact that the
 loved object enjoys a certain amount of freedom from criticism, and that
 all its characteristics are valued more highly than those of people who
 are not loved, or than its own were at a time when it itself was not
 loved. If the sensual tendencies are somewhat more effectively
 repressed or set aside, the illusion is produced that the object has
 come to be sensually loved on account of its spiritual merits, whereas
 on the contrary these merits may really only have been lent to it by its
 sensual charm.
 
 The tendency which falsifies judgement in this respect is that of
 _idealisation_. But this makes it easier for us to find our way about.
 We see that the object is being treated in the same way as our own ego,
 so that when we are in love a considerable amount of narcissistic libido
 overflows on to the object. It is even obvious, in many forms of love
 choice, that the object serves as a substitute for some unattained ego
 ideal of our own. We love it on account of the perfections which we have
 striven to reach for our own ego, and which we should now like to
 procure in this roundabout way as a means of satisfying our narcissism.
 
 If the sexual over-estimation and the being in love increase even
 further, then the interpretation of the picture becomes still more
 unmistakable. The tendencies whose trend is towards directly sexual
 satisfaction may now be pushed back entirely, as regularly happens, for
 instance, with the young man's sentimental passion; the ego becomes more
 and more unassuming and modest, and the object more and more sublime and
 precious, until at last it gets possession of the entire self-love of
 the ego, whose self-sacrifice thus follows as a natural consequence. The
 object has, so to speak, consumed the ego. Traits of humility, of the
 limitation of narcissism, and of self-injury occur in every case of
 being in love; in the extreme case they are only intensified, and as a
 result of the withdrawal of the sensual claims they remain in solitary
 supremacy.
 
 This happens especially easily with love that is unhappy and cannot be
 satisfied; for in spite of everything each sexual satisfaction always
 involves a reduction in sexual over-estimation. Contemporaneously with
 this 'devotion' of the ego to the object, which is no longer to be
 distinguished from a sublimated devotion to an abstract idea, the
 functions allotted to the ego ideal entirely cease to operate. The
 criticism exercised by that faculty is silent; everything that the
 object does and asks for is right and blameless. Conscience has no
 application to anything that is done for the sake of the object; in the
 blindness of love remorselessness is carried to the pitch of crime. The
 whole situation can be completely summarised in a formula: _The object
 has taken the place of the ego ideal._
 
 It is now easy to define the distinction between identification and such
 extreme developments of being in love as may be described as fascination
 or infatuation. In the former case the ego has enriched itself with the
 properties of the object, it has 'introjected' the object into itself,
 as Ferenczi expresses it. In the second case it is impoverished, it has
 surrendered itself to the object, it has substituted the object for its
 most important constituent. Closer consideration soon makes it plain,
 however, that this kind of account creates an illusion of
 contradistinctions that have no real existence. Economically there is no
 question of impoverishment or enrichment; it is even possible to
 describe an extreme case of being in love as a state in which the ego
 has introjected the object into itself. Another distinction is perhaps
 better calculated to meet the essence of the matter. In the case of
 identification the object has been lost or given up; it is then set up
 again inside the ego, and the ego makes a partial alteration in itself
 after the model of the lost object. In the other case the object is
 retained, and there is a hyper-cathexis of it by the ego and at the
 ego's expense. But here again a difficulty presents itself. Is it quite
 certain that identification presupposes that object-cathexis has been
 given up? Can there be no identification with the object retained? And
 before we embark upon a discussion of this delicate question, the
 perception may already be beginning to dawn on us that yet another
 alternative embraces the real essence of the matter, namely, _whether
 the object is put in the place of the ego or of the ego ideal_.
 
 From being in love to hypnosis is evidently only a short step. The
 respects in which the two agree are obvious. There is the same humble
 subjection, the same compliance, the same absence of criticism, towards
 the hypnotist just as towards the loved object. There is the same
 absorption of one's own initiative; no one can doubt that the hypnotist
 has stepped into the place of the ego ideal. It is only that everything
 is even clearer and more intense in hypnosis, so that it would be more
 to the point to explain being in love by means of hypnosis than the
 other way round. The hypnotist is the sole object, and no attention is
 paid to any but him. The fact that the ego experiences in a dream-like
 way whatever he may request or assert reminds us that we omitted to
 mention among the functions of the ego ideal the business of testing the
 reality of things.[49] No wonder that the ego takes a perception for
 real if its reality is vouched for by the mental faculty which
 ordinarily discharges the duty of testing the reality of things. The
 complete absence of tendencies which are uninhibited in their sexual
 aims contributes further towards the extreme purity of the phenomena.
 The hypnotic relation is the devotion of someone in love to an unlimited
 degree but with sexual satisfaction excluded; whereas in the case of
 being in love this kind of satisfaction is only temporarily kept back,
 and remains in the background as a possible aim at some later time.
 
 But on the other hand we may also say that the hypnotic relation is (if
 the expression is permissible) a group formation with two members.
 Hypnosis is not a good object for comparison with a group formation,
 because it is truer to say that it is identical with it. Out of the
 complicated fabric of the group it isolates one element for us--the
 behaviour of the individual to the leader. Hypnosis is distinguished
 from a group formation by this limitation of number, just as it is
 distinguished from being in love by the absence of directly sexual
 tendencies. In this respect it occupies a middle position between the
 two.
 
 It is interesting to see that it is precisely those sexual tendencies
 that are inhibited in their aims which achieve such lasting ties between
 men. But this can easily be understood from the fact that they are not
 capable of complete satisfaction, while sexual tendencies which are
 uninhibited in their aims suffer an extraordinary reduction through the
 discharge of energy every time the sexual aim is attained. It is the
 fate of sensual love to become extinguished when it is satisfied; for it
 to be able to last, it must from the first be mixed with purely tender
 components--with such, that is, as are inhibited in their aims--or it
 must itself undergo a transformation of this kind.
 
 Hypnosis would solve the riddle of the libidinal constitution of groups
 for us straight away, if it were not that it itself exhibits some
 features which are not met by the rational explanation we have hitherto
 given of it as a state of being in love with the directly sexual
 tendencies excluded. There is still a great deal in it which we must
 recognise as unexplained and mystical. It contains an additional element
 of paralysis derived from the relation between someone with superior
 power and someone who is without power and helpless--which may afford a
 transition to the hypnosis of terror which occurs in animals. The manner
 in which it is produced and its relationship to sleep are not clear; and
 the puzzling way in which some people are subject to it, while others
 resist it completely, points to some factor still unknown which is
 realised in it and which perhaps alone makes possible the purity of the
 attitudes of the libido which it exhibits. It is noticeable that, even
 when there is complete suggestive compliance in other respects, the
 moral conscience of the person hypnotized may show resistance. But this
 may be due to the fact that in hypnosis as it is usually practised some
 knowledge may be retained that what is happening is only a game, an
 untrue reproduction of another situation of far more importance to life.
 
 But after the preceding discussions we are quite in a position to give
 the formula for the libidinal constitution of groups: or at least of
 such groups as we have hitherto considered, namely, those that have a
 leader and have not been able by means of too much 'organisation' to
 acquire secondarily the characteristics of an individual. _A primary
 group of this kind is a number of individuals who have substituted one
 and the same object for their ego ideal and have consequently identified
 themselves with one another in their ego._ This condition admits of
 graphic representation:
 
 [Illustration]
 
 
 
 
 IX
 
 THE HERD INSTINCT
 
 
 We cannot for long enjoy the illusion that we have solved the riddle of
 the group with this formula. It is impossible to escape the immediate
 and disturbing recollection that all we have really done has been to
 shift the question on to the riddle of hypnosis, about which so many
 points have yet to be cleared up. And now another objection shows us our
 further path.
 
 It might be said that the intense emotional ties which we observe in
 groups are quite sufficient to explain one of their characteristics--the
 lack of independence and initiative in their members, the similarity in
 the reactions of all of them, their reduction, so to speak, to the level
 of group individuals. But if we look at it as a whole, a group shows us
 more than this. Some of its features--the weakness of intellectual
 ability, the lack of emotional restraint, the incapacity for moderation
 and delay, the inclination to exceed every limit in the expression of
 emotion and to work it off completely in the form of action--these and
 similar features, which we find so impressively described in Le Bon,
 show an unmistakable picture of a regression of mental activity to an
 earlier stage such as we are not surprised to find among savages or
 children. A regression of this sort is in particular an essential
 characteristic of common groups, while, as we have heard, in organized
 and artificial groups it can to a large extent be checked.
 
 We thus have an impression of a state in which an individual's separate
 emotion and personal intellectual act are too weak to come to anything
 by themselves and are absolutely obliged to wait till they are
 reinforced through being repeated in a similar way in the other members
 of the group. We are reminded of how many of these phenomena of
 dependence are part of the normal constitution of human society, of how
 little originality and personal courage are to be found in it, of how
 much every individual is ruled by those attitudes of the group mind
 which exhibit themselves in such forms as racial characteristics, class
 prejudices, public opinion, etc. The influence of suggestion becomes a
 greater riddle for us when we admit that it is not exercised only by the
 leader, but by every individual upon every other individual; and we must
 reproach ourselves with having unfairly emphasized the relation to the
 leader and with having kept the other factor of mutual suggestion too
 much in the background.
 
 After this encouragement to modesty, we shall be inclined to listen to
 another voice, which promises us an explanation based upon simpler
 grounds. Such a one is to be found in Trotter's thoughtful book upon the
 herd instinct, concerning which my only regret is that it does not
 entirely escape the antipathies that were set loose by the recent great
 war.[50]
 
 Trotter derives the mental phenomena that are described as occurring in
 groups from a herd instinct ('gregariousness'), which is innate in human
 beings just as in other species of animals. Biologically this
 gregariousness is an analogy to multicellularity and as it were a
 continuation of it. From the standpoint of the libido theory it is a
 further manifestation of the inclination, which proceeds from the
 libido, and which is felt by all living beings of the same kind, to
 combine in more and more comprehensive units.[51] The individual feels
 'incomplete' if he is alone. The dread shown by small children would
 seem already to be an expression of this herd instinct. Opposition to
 the herd is as good as separation from it, and is therefore anxiously
 avoided. But the herd turns away from anything that is new or unusual.
 The herd instinct would appear to be something primary, something
 'which cannot be split up'.
 
 Trotter gives as the list of instincts which he considers as primary
 those of self-preservation, of nutrition, of sex, and of the herd. The
 last often comes into opposition with the others. The feelings of guilt
 and of duty are the peculiar possessions of a gregarious animal. Trotter
 also derives from the herd instinct the repressive forces which
 psycho-analysis has shown to exist in the ego, and from the same source
 accordingly the resistances which the physician comes up against in
 psycho-analytic treatment. Speech owes its importance to its aptitude
 for mutual understanding in the herd, and upon it the identification of
 the individuals with one another largely rests.
 
 While Le Bon is principally concerned with typical transient group
 formations, and McDougall with stable associations, Trotter has chosen
 as the centre of his interest the most generalised form of assemblage in
 which man, that  , passes his life, and he gives
 us its psychological basis. But Trotter is under no necessity of tracing
 back the herd instinct, for he characterizes it as primary and not
 further reducible. Boris Sidis's attempt, to which he refers, at tracing
 the herd instinct back to suggestibility is fortunately superfluous as
 far as he is concerned; it is an explanation of a familiar and
 unsatisfactory type, and the converse proposition--that suggestibility
 is a derivative of the herd instinct--would seem to me to throw far more
 light on the subject.
 
 But Trotter's exposition, with even more justice than the others', is
 open to the objection that it takes too little account of the leader's
 part in a group, while we incline rather to the opposite judgement, that
 it is impossible to grasp the nature of a group if the leader is
 disregarded. The herd instinct leaves no room at all for the leader; he
 is merely thrown in along with the herd, almost by chance; it follows,
 too, that no path leads from this instinct to the need for a God; the
 herd is without a herdsman. But besides this Trotter's exposition can be
 undermined psychologically; that is to say, it can be made at all events
 probable that the herd instinct is not irreducible, that it is not
 primary in the same sense as the instinct of self-preservation and the
 sexual instinct.
 
 It is naturally no easy matter to trace the ontogenesis of the herd
 instinct. The dread which is shown by small children when they are left
 alone, and which Trotter claims as being already a manifestation of the
 instinct, nevertheless suggests more readily another interpretation. The
 dread relates to the child's mother, and later to other familiar
 persons, and it is the expression of an unfulfilled desire, which the
 child does not yet know how to deal with in any way except by turning
 it into dread.[52] Nor is the child's dread when it is alone pacified by
 the sight of any haphazard 'member of the herd', but on the contrary it
 is only brought into existence by the approach of a 'stranger' of this
 sort. Then for a long time nothing in the nature of herd instinct or
 group feeling is to be observed in children. Something like it grows up
 first of all, in a nursery containing many children, out of the
 children's relation to their parents, and it does so as a reaction to
 the initial envy with which the elder child receives the younger one.
 The elder child would certainly like to put its successor jealously
 aside, to keep it away from the parents, and to rob it of all its
 privileges; but in face of the fact that this child (like all that come
 later) is loved by the parents in just the same way, and in consequence
 of the impossibility of maintaining its hostile attitude without
 damaging itself, it is forced into identifying itself with the other
 children. So there grows up in the troop of children a communal or group
 feeling, which is then further developed at school. The first demand
 made by this reaction-formation is for justice, for equal treatment for
 all. We all know how loudly and implacably this claim is put forward at
 school. If one cannot be the favourite oneself, at all events nobody
 else shall be the favourite. This transformation--the replacing of
 jealousy by a group feeling in the nursery and classroom--might be
 considered improbable, if the same process could not later on be
 observed again in other circumstances. We have only to think of the
 troop of women and girls, all of them in love in an enthusiastically
 sentimental way, who crowd round a singer or pianist after his
 performance. It would certainly be easy for each of them to be jealous
 of the rest; but, in face of their numbers and the consequent
 impossibility of their reaching the aim of their love, they renounce it,
 and, instead of pulling out one another's hair, they act as a united
 group, do homage to the hero of the occasion with their common actions,
 and would probably be glad to have a share of his flowing locks.
 Originally rivals, they have succeeded in identifying themselves with
 one another by means of a similar love for the same object. When, as is
 usual, a situation in the field of the instincts is capable of various
 outcomes, we need not be surprised if the actual outcome is one which
 involves the possibility of a certain amount of satisfaction, while
 another, even though in itself more obvious, is passed over because the
 circumstances of life prevent its attaining this aim.
 
 What appears later on in society in the shape of _Gemeingeist_, _esprit
 de corps_, 'group spirit', etc., does not belie its derivation from what
 was originally envy. No one must want to put himself forward, every one
 must be the same and have the same. Social justice means that we deny
 ourselves many things so that others may have to do without them as
 well, or, what is the same thing, may not be able to ask for them. This
 demand for equality is the root of social conscience and the sense of
 duty. It reveals itself unexpectedly in the syphilitic's dread of
 infecting other people, which psycho-analysis has taught us to
 understand. The dread exhibited by these poor wretches corresponds to
 their violent struggles against the unconscious wish to spread their
 infection on to other people; for why should they alone be infected and
 cut off from so much? why not other people as well? And the same germ is
 to be found in the pretty anecdote of the judgement of Solomon. If one
 woman's child is dead, the other shall not have a live one either. The
 bereaved woman is recognized by this wish.
 
 Thus social feeling is based upon the reversal of what was first a
 hostile feeling into a positively-toned tie of the nature of an
 identification. So far as we have hitherto been able to follow the
 course of events, this reversal appears to be effected under the
 influence of a common tender tie with a person outside the group. We do
 not ourselves regard our analysis of identification as exhaustive, but
 it is enough for our present purpose that we should revert to this one
 feature--its demand that equalization shall be consistently carried
 through. We have already heard in the discussion of the two artificial
 groups, church and army, that their preliminary condition is that all
 their members should be loved in the same way by one person, the leader.
 Do not let us forget, however, that the demand for equality in a group
 applies only to its members and not to the leader. All the members must
 be equal to one another, but they all want to be ruled by one person.
 Many equals, who can identify themselves with one another, and a single
 person superior to them all--that is the situation that we find realised
 in groups which are capable of subsisting. Let us venture, then, to
 correct Trotter's pronouncement that man is a herd animal and assert
 that he is rather a horde animal, an individual creature in a horde led
 by a chief.
 
 
 
 
 X
 
 THE GROUP AND THE PRIMAL HORDE
 
 
 In 1912 I took up a conjecture of Darwin's to the effect that the
 primitive form of human society was that of a horde ruled over
 despotically by a powerful male. I attempted to show that the fortunes
 of this horde have left indestructible traces upon the history of human
 descent; and, especially, that the development of totemism, which
 comprises in itself the beginnings of religion, morality, and social
 organisation, is connected with the killing of the chief by violence and
 the transformation of the paternal horde into a community of
 brothers.[53] To be sure, this is only a hypothesis, like so many others
 with which archaeologists endeavour to lighten the darkness of
 prehistoric times--a 'Just-So Story', as it was amusingly called by a
 not unkind critic (Kroeger); but I think it is creditable to such a
 hypothesis if it proves able to bring coherence and understanding into
 more and more new regions.
 
 Human groups exhibit once again the familiar picture of an individual of
 superior strength among a troop of similar companions, a picture which
 is also contained in our idea of the primal horde. The psychology of
 such a group, as we know it from the descriptions to which we have so
 often referred--the dwindling of the conscious individual personality,
 the focussing of thoughts and feelings into a common direction, the
 predominance of the emotions and of the unconscious mental life, the
 tendency to the immediate carrying out of intentions as they emerge--all
 this corresponds to a state of regression to a primitive mental
 activity, of just such a sort as we should be inclined to ascribe to the
 primal horde.[54]
 
 Thus the group appears to us as a revival of the primal horde. Just as
 primitive man virtually survives in every individual, so the primal
 horde may arise once more out of any random crowd; in so far as men are
 habitually under the sway of group formation we recognise in it the
 survival of the primal horde. We must conclude that the psychology of
 the group is the oldest human psychology; what we have isolated as
 individual psychology, by neglecting all traces of the group, has only
 since come into prominence out of the old group psychology, by a gradual
 process which may still, perhaps, be described as incomplete. We shall
 later venture upon an attempt at specifying the point of departure of
 this development.
 
 Further reflection will show us in what respect this statement requires
 correction. Individual psychology must, on the contrary, be just as old
 as group psychology, for from the first there were two kinds of
 psychologies, that of the individual members of the group and that of
 the father, chief, or leader. The members of the group were subject to
 ties just as we see them to-day, but the father of the primal horde was
 free. His intellectual acts were strong and independent even in
 isolation, and his will needed no reinforcement from others. Consistency
 leads us to assume that his ego had few libidinal ties; he loved no one
 but himself, or other people only in so far as they served his needs. To
 objects his ego gave away no more than was barely necessary.
 
 He, at the very beginning of the history of mankind, was the _Superman_
 whom Nietzsche only expected from the future. Even to-day the members of
 a group stand in need of the illusion that they are equally and justly
 loved by their leader; but the leader himself need love no one else, he
 may be of a masterly nature, absolutely narcissistic, but self-confident
 and independent. We know that love puts a check upon narcissism, and it
 would be possible to show how, by operating in this way, it became a
 factor of civilisation.
 
 The primal father of the horde was not yet immortal, as he later became
 by deification. If he died, he had to be replaced; his place was
 probably taken by a youngest son, who had up to then been a member of
 the group like any other. There must therefore be a possibility of
 transforming group psychology into individual psychology; a condition
 must be discovered under which such a transformation is easily
 accomplished, just as it is possible for bees in case of necessity to
 turn a larva into a queen instead of into a worker. One can imagine only
 one possibility: the primal father had prevented his sons from
 satisfying their directly sexual tendencies; he forced them into
 abstinence and consequently into the emotional ties with him and with
 one another which could arise out of those of their tendencies that were
 inhibited in their sexual aim. He forced them, so to speak, into group
 psychology. His sexual jealousy and intolerance became in the last
 resort the causes of group psychology.[55]
 
 Whoever became his successor was also given the possibility of sexual
 satisfaction, and was by that means offered a way out of the conditions
 of group psychology. The fixation of the libido to woman and the
 possibility of satisfaction without any need for delay or accumulation
 made and end of the importance of those of his sexual tendencies that
 were inhibited in their aim, and allowed his narcissism always to rise
 to its full height. We shall return in a postscript to this connection
 between love and character formation.
 
 We may further emphasize, as being specially instructive, the relation
 that holds between the contrivance by means of which an artificial group
 is held together and the constitution of the primal horde. We have seen
 that with an army and a church this contrivance is the illusion that
 the leader loves all of the individuals equally and justly. But this is
 simply an idealistic remodelling of the state of affairs in the primal
 horde, where all of the sons knew that they were equally persecuted by
 the primal father, and feared him equally. This same recasting upon
 which all social duties are built up is already presupposed by the next
 form of human society, the totemistic clan. The indestructible strength
 of the family as a natural group formation rests upon the fact that this
 necessary presupposition of the father's equal love can have a real
 application in the family.
 
 But we expect even more of this derivation of the group from the primal
 horde. It ought also to help us to understand what is still
 incomprehensible and mysterious in group formations--all that lies
 hidden behind the enigmatic words hypnosis and suggestion. And I think
 it can succeed in this too. Let us recall that hypnosis has something
 positively uncanny about it; but the characteristic of uncanniness
 suggests something old and familiar that has undergone repression.[56]
 Let us consider how hypnosis is induced. The hypnotist asserts that he
 is in possession of a mysterious power which robs the subject of his own
 will, or, which is the same thing, the subject believes it of him. This
 mysterious power (which is even now often described popularly as animal
 magnetism) must be the same that is looked upon by primitive people as
 the source of taboo, the same that emanates from kings and chieftains
 and makes it dangerous to approach them (_mana_). The hypnotist, then,
 is supposed to be in possession of this power; and how does he manifest
 it? By telling the subject to look him in the eyes; his most typical
 method of hypnotising is by his look. But it is precisely the sight of
 the chieftain that is dangerous and unbearable for primitive people,
 just as later that of the Godhead is for mortals. Even Moses had to act
 as an intermediary between his people and Jehovah, since the people
 could not support the sight of God; and when he returned from the
 presence of God his face shone--some of the _mana_ had been transferred
 on to him, just as happens with the intermediary among primitive
 people.[57]
 
 It is true that hypnosis can also be evoked in other ways, for instance
 by fixing the eyes upon a bright object or by listening to a monotonous
 sound. This is misleading and has given occasion to inadequate
 physiological theories. As a matter of fact these procedures merely
 serve to divert conscious attention and to hold it riveted. The
 situation is the same as if the hypnotist had said to the subject: 'Now
 concern yourself exclusively with my person; the rest of the world is
 quite uninteresting.' It would of course be technically inexpedient for
 a hypnotist to make such a speech; it would tear the subject away from
 his unconscious attitude and stimulate him to conscious opposition. The
 hypnotist avoids directing the subject's conscious thoughts towards his
 own intentions, and makes the person upon whom he is experimenting sink
 into an activity in which the world is bound to seem uninteresting to
 him; but at the same time the subject is in reality unconsciously
 concentrating his whole attention upon the hypnotist, and is getting
 into an attitude of _rapport_, of transference on to him. Thus the
 indirect methods of hypnotising, like many of the technical procedures
 used in making jokes, have the effect of checking certain distributions
 of mental energy which would interfere with the course of events in the
 unconscious, and they lead eventually to the same result as the direct
 methods of influence by means of staring or stroking.[58]
 
 Ferenczi has made the true discovery that when a hypnotist gives the
 command to sleep, which is often done at the beginning of hypnosis, he
 is putting himself in the place of the subject's parents. He thinks that
 two sorts of hypnosis are to be distinguished: one coaxing and soothing,
 which he considers is modelled upon the mother, and another threatening,
 which is derived from the father.[59] Now the command to sleep in
 hypnosis means nothing more nor less than an order to withdraw all
 interest from the world and to concentrate it upon the person of the
 hypnotist. And it is so understood by the subject; for in this
 withdrawal of interest from the outer world lies the psychological
 characteristic of sleep, and the kinship between sleep and the state of
 hypnosis is based upon it.
 
 By the measures that he takes, then, the hypnotist awakens in the
 subject a portion of his archaic inheritance which had also made him
 compliant towards his parents and which had experienced an individual
 re-animation in his relation to his father; what is thus awakened is the
 idea of a paramount and dangerous personality, towards whom only a
 passive-masochistic attitude is possible, to whom one's will has to be
 surrendered,--while to be alone with him, 'to look him in the face',
 appears a hazardous enterprise. It is only in some such way as this that
 we can picture the relation of the individual member of the primal horde
 to the primal father. As we know from other reactions, individuals have
 preserved a variable degree of personal aptitude for reviving old
 situations of this kind. Some knowledge that in spite of everything
 hypnosis is only a game, a deceptive renewal of these old impressions,
 may however remain behind and take care that there is a resistance
 against any too serious consequences of the suspension of the will in
 hypnosis.
 
 The uncanny and coercive characteristics of group formations, which are
 shown in their suggestion phenomena, may therefore with justice be
 traced back to the fact of their origin from the primal horde. The
 leader of the group is still the dreaded primal father; the group still
 wishes to be governed by unrestricted force; it has an extreme passion
 for authority; in Le Bon's phrase, it has a thirst for obedience. The
 primal father is the group ideal, which governs the ego in the place of
 the ego ideal. Hypnosis has a good claim to being described as a group
 of two; there remains as a definition for suggestion--a conviction which
 is not based upon perception and reasoning but upon an erotic tie.[60]
 
 
 
 
 XI
 
 A DIFFERENTIATING GRADE IN THE EGO
 
 
 If we survey the life of an individual man of to-day, bearing in mind
 the mutually complementary accounts of group psychology given by the
 authorities, we may lose the courage, in face of the complications that
 are revealed, to attempt a comprehensive exposition. Each individual is
 a component part of numerous groups, he is bound by ties of
 identification in many directions, and he has built up his ego ideal
 upon the most various models. Each individual therefore has a share in
 numerous group minds--those of his race, of his class, of his creed, of
 his nationality, etc.--and he can also raise himself above them to the
 extent of having a scrap of independence and originality. Such stable
 and lasting group formations, with their uniform and constant effects,
 are less striking to an observer than the rapidly formed and transient
 groups from which Le Bon has made his brilliant psychological character
 sketch of the group mind. And it is just in these noisy ephemeral
 groups, which are as it were superimposed upon the others, that we are
 met by the prodigy of the complete, even though only temporary,
 disappearance of exactly what we have recognized as individual
 acquirements.
 
 We have interpreted this prodigy as meaning that the individual gives up
 his ego ideal and substitutes for it the group ideal as embodied in the
 leader. And we must add by way of correction that the prodigy is not
 equally great in every case. In many individuals the separation between
 the ego and the ego ideal is not very far advanced; the two still
 coincide readily; the ego has often preserved its earlier
 self-complacency. The selection of the leader is very much facilitated
 by this circumstance. He need only possess the typical qualities of the
 individuals concerned in a particularly clearly marked and pure form,
 and need only give an impression of greater force and of more freedom of
 libido; and in that case the need for a strong chief will often meet him
 half-way and invest him with a predominance to which he would otherwise
 perhaps have had no claim. The other members of the group, whose ego
 ideal would not, apart from this, have become embodied in his person
 without some correction, are then carried away with the rest by
 'suggestion', that is to say, by means of identification.
 
 We are aware that what we have been able to contribute towards the
 explanation of the libidinal structure of groups leads back to the
 distinction between the ego and the ego ideal and to the double kind of
 tie which this makes possible--identification, and substitution of the
 object for the ego ideal. The assumption of this kind of differentiating
 grade [_Stufe_] in the ego as a first step in an analysis of the ego
 must gradually establish its justification in the most various regions
 of psychology. In my paper 'Zur Einfhrung des Narzissmus' I have put
 together all the pathological material that could at the moment be used
 in support of this separation. But it may be expected that when we
 penetrate deeper into the psychology of the psychoses its significance
 will be discovered to be far greater. Let us reflect that the ego now
 appears in the relation of an object to the ego ideal which has been
 developed out of it, and that all the interplay between an outer object
 and the ego as a whole, with which our study of the neuroses has made us
 acquainted, may possibly be repeated upon this new scene of action
 inside the ego.
 
 In this place I shall only follow up one of the consequences which seem
 possible from this point of view, thus resuming the discussion of a
 problem which I was obliged to leave unsolved elsewhere.[61] Each of the
 mental differentiations that we have become acquainted with represents a
 fresh aggravation of the difficulties of mental functioning, increases
 its instability, and may become the starting-point for its breakdown,
 that is, for the onset of a disease. Thus, by being born we have made
 the step from an absolutely self-sufficient narcissism to the perception
 of a changing outer world and to the beginnings of the discovery of
 objects. And with this is associated the fact that we cannot endure the
 new state of things for long, that we periodically revert from it, in
 our sleep, to our former condition of absence of stimulation and
 avoidance of objects. It is true, however, that in this we are following
 a hint from the outer world, which, by means of the periodical change of
 day and night, temporarily withdraws the greater part of the stimuli
 that affect us. The second example, which is pathologically more
 important, is not subject to any such qualification. In the course of
 our development we have effected a separation of our mental existence
 into a coherent ego and into an unconscious and repressed portion which
 is left outside it; and we know that the stability of this new
 acquisition is exposed to constant shocks. In dreams and in neuroses
 what is thus excluded knocks for admission at the gates, guarded though
 they are by resistances; and in our waking health we make use of special
 artifices for allowing what is repressed to circumvent the resistances
 and for receiving it temporarily into our ego to the increase of our
 pleasure. Wit and humour, and to some extent the comic in general, may
 be regarded in this light. Everyone acquainted with the psychology of
 the neuroses will think of similar examples of less importance; but I
 hasten on to the application I have in view.
 
 It is quite conceivable that the separation of the ego ideal from the
 ego cannot be borne for long either, and has to be temporarily undone.
 In all renunciations and limitations imposed upon the ego a periodical
 infringement of the prohibition is the rule; this indeed is shown by the
 institution of festivals, which in origin are nothing more nor less than
 excesses provided by law and which owe their cheerful character to the
 release which they bring.[62] The Saturnalia of the Romans and our
 modern carnival agree in this essential feature with the festivals of
 primitive people, which usually end in debaucheries of every kind and
 the transgression of what are at other times the most sacred
 commandments. But the ego ideal comprises the sum of all the limitations
 in which the ego has to acquiesce, and for that reason the abrogation of
 the ideal would necessarily be a magnificent festival for the ego, which
 might then once again feel satisfied with itself.[63]
 
 There is always a feeling of triumph when something in the ego coincides
 with the ego ideal. And the sense of guilt (as well as the sense of
 inferiority) can also be understood as an expression of tension between
 the ego and the ego ideal.
 
 It is well known that there are people the general colour of whose mood
 oscillates periodically from an excessive depression through some kind
 of intermediate state to an exalted sense of well-being. These
 oscillations appear in very different degrees of amplitude, from what is
 just noticeable to those extreme instances which, in the shape of
 melancholia and mania, make the most painful or disturbing inroads upon
 the life of the person concerned. In typical cases of this cyclical
 depression outer exciting causes do not seem to play any decisive part;
 as regards inner motives, nothing more (or nothing different) is to be
 found in these patients than in all others. It has consequently become
 the custom to consider these cases as not being psychogenic. We shall
 refer later on to those other exactly similar cases of cyclical
 depression which can nevertheless easily be traced back to mental
 traumata.
 
 Thus the foundation of these spontaneous oscillations of mood is
 unknown; we are without insight into the mechanism of the displacement
 of a melancholia by a mania. So we are free to suppose that these
 patients are people in whom our conjecture might find an actual
 application--their ego ideal might be temporarily resolved into their
 ego after having previously ruled it with especial strictness.
 
 Let us keep to what is clear: On the basis of our analysis of the ego it
 cannot be doubted that in cases of mania the ego and the ego ideal have
 fused together, so that the person, in a mood of triumph and
 self-satisfaction, disturbed by no self-criticism, can enjoy the
 abolition of his inhibitions, his feelings of consideration for others,
 and his self-reproaches. It is not so obvious, but nevertheless very
 probable, that the misery of the melancholiac is the expression of a
 sharp conflict between the two faculties of his ego, a conflict in which
 the ideal, in an excess of sensitiveness, relentlessly exhibits its
 condemnation of the ego in delusions of inferiority and in
 self-depreciation. The only question is whether we are to look for the
 causes of these altered relations between the ego and the ego ideal in
 the periodic rebellions, which we have postulated above, against the new
 institution, or whether we are to make other circumstances responsible
 for them.
 
 A change into mania is not an indispensable feature of the
 symptomatology of melancholic depression. There are simple melancholias,
 some in single and some in recurring attacks, which never show this
 development. On the other hand there are melancholias in which the
 exciting cause clearly plays an aetiological part. They are those which
 occur after the loss of a loved object, whether by death or as a result
 of circumstances which have necessitated the withdrawal of the libido
 from the object. A psychogenic melancholia of this sort can end in
 mania, and this cycle can be repeated several times, just as easily as
 in a case which appears to be spontaneous. Thus the state of things is
 somewhat obscure, especially as only a few forms and cases of
 melancholia have been submitted to psycho-analytical investigation.[64]
 So far we only understand those cases in which the object is given up
 because it has shown itself unworthy of love. It is then set up again
 inside the ego, by means of identification, and severely condemned by
 the ego ideal. The reproaches and attacks directed towards the object
 come to light in the shape of melancholic self-reproaches.[65]
 
 A melancholia of this kind may also end in a change to mania; so that
 the possibility of this happening represents a feature which is
 independent of the other characteristics in the symptomatology.
 
 Nevertheless I see no difficulty in assigning to the factor of the
 periodical rebellion of the ego against the ego ideal a share in both
 kinds of melancholia, the psychogenic as well as the spontaneous. In the
 spontaneous kind it may be supposed that the ego ideal is inclined to
 display a peculiar strictness, which then results automatically in its
 temporary suspension. In the psychogenic kind the ego would be incited
 to rebellion by ill-treatment on the part of its ideal--an ill-treatment
 which it encounters when there has been identification with a rejected
 object.
 
 
 
 
 XII
 
 POSTSCRIPT
 
 
 In the course of the enquiry which has just been brought to a
 provisional end we came across a number of side-paths which we avoided
 pursuing in the first instance but in which there was much that offered
 us promises of insight. We propose now to take up a few of the points
 that have been left on one side in this way.
 
 A. The distinction between identification of the ego with an object and
 replacement of the ego ideal by an object finds an interesting
 illustration in the two great artificial groups which we began by
 studying, the army and the Christian church.
 
 It is obvious that a soldier takes his superior, that is, really, the
 leader of the army, as his ideal, while he identifies himself with his
 equals, and derives from this community of their egos the obligations
 for giving mutual help and for sharing possessions which comradeship
 implies. But he becomes ridiculous if he tries to identify himself with
 the general. The soldier in _Wallensteins Lager_ laughs at the sergeant
 for this very reason:
 
     Wie er ruspert und wie er spuckt,
     Das habt ihr ihm glcklich abgeguckt![66]
 
 It is otherwise in the Catholic Church. Every Christian loves Christ as
 his ideal and feels himself united with all other Christians by the tie
 of identification. But the Church requires more of him. He has also to
 identify himself with Christ and love all other Christians as Christ
 loved them. At both points, therefore, the Church requires that the
 position of the libido which is given by a group formation should be
 supplemented. Identification has to be added where object-choice has
 taken place, and object love where there is identification. This
 addition evidently goes beyond the constitution of the group. One can be
 a good Christian and yet be far from the idea of putting oneself in
 Christ's place and of having like him an all-embracing love for mankind.
 One need not think oneself capable, weak mortal that one is, of the
 Saviour's largeness of soul and strength of love. But this further
 development in the distribution of libido in the group is probably the
 factor upon which Christianity bases its claim to have reached a higher
 ethical level.
 
 B. We have said that it would be possible to specify the point in the
 mental development of man at which the advance from group to individual
 psychology was also achieved by the individual members of the group.[67]
 
 For this purpose we must return for a moment to the scientific myth of
 the father of the primal horde. He was later on exalted into the creator
 of the world, and with justice, for he had produced all the sons who
 composed the first group. He was the ideal of each one of them, at once
 feared and honoured, a fact which led later to the idea of taboo. These
 many individuals eventually banded themselves together, killed him and
 cut him in pieces. None of the group of victors could take his place,
 or, if one of them did, the battles began afresh, until they understood
 that they must all renounce their father's heritage. They then formed
 the totemistic community of brothers, all with equal rights and united
 by the totem prohibitions which were to preserve and to expiate the
 memory of the murder. But the dissatisfaction with what had been
 achieved still remained, and it became the source of new developments.
 The persons who were united in this group of brothers gradually came
 towards a revival of the old state of things at a new level. Man became
 once more the chief of a family, and broke down the prerogatives of the
 gynaecocracy which had become established during the fatherless period.
 As a compensation for this he may at that time have acknowledged the
 mother deities, whose priests were castrated for the mother's
 protection, after the example that had been given by the father of the
 primal horde. And yet the new family was only a shadow of the old one;
 there were numbers of fathers and each one was limited by the rights of
 the others.
 
 It was then, perhaps, that some individual, in the exigency of his
 longing, may have been moved to free himself from the group and take
 over the father's part. He who did this was the first epic poet; and the
 advance was achieved in his imagination. This poet disguised the truth
 with lies in accordance with his longing. He invented the heroic myth.
 The hero was a man who by himself had slain the father--the father who
 still appeared in the myth as a totemistic monster. Just as the father
 had been the boy's first ideal, so in the hero who aspires to the
 father's place the poet now created the first ego ideal. The transition
 to the hero was probably afforded by the youngest son, the mother's
 favourite, whom she had protected from paternal jealousy, and who, in
 the era of the primal horde, had been the father's successor. In the
 lying poetic fancies of prehistoric times the woman, who had been the
 prize of battle and the allurement to murder, was probably turned into
 the seducer and instigator to the crime.
 
 The hero claims to have acted alone in accomplishing the deed, which
 certainly only the horde as a whole would have ventured upon. But, as
 Rank has observed, fairy tales have preserved clear traces of the facts
 which were disavowed. For we often find in them that the hero who has to
 carry out some difficult task (usually a youngest son, and not
 infrequently one who has represented himself to the father surrogate as
 being stupid, that is to say, harmless)--we often find, then, that this
 hero can carry out his task only by the help of a crowd of small
 animals, such as bees or ants. These would be the brothers in the primal
 horde, just as in the same way in dream symbolism insects or vermin
 signify brothers and sisters (contemptuously, considered as babies).
 Moreover every one of the tasks in myths and fairy tales is easily
 recognisable as a substitute for the heroic deed.
 
 The myth, then, is the step by which the individual emerges from group
 psychology. The first myth was certainly the psychological, the hero
 myth; the explanatory nature myth must have followed much later. The
 poet who had taken this step and had in this way set himself free from
 the group in his imagination, is nevertheless able (as Rank has further
 observed) to find his way back to it in reality. For he goes and relates
 to the group his hero's deeds which he has invented. At bottom this hero
 is no one but himself. Thus he lowers himself to the level of reality,
 and raises his hearers to the level of imagination. But his hearers
 understand the poet, and, in virtue of their having the same relation of
 longing towards the primal father, they can identify themselves with the
 hero.[68]
 
 The lie of the heroic myth culminates in the deification of the hero.
 Perhaps the deified hero may have been earlier than the Father God and
 may have been a precursor to the return of the primal father as a deity.
 The series of gods, then, would run chronologically: Mother
 Goddess--Hero--Father God. But it is only with the elevation of the
 never forgotten primal father that the deity acquires the features that
 we still recognise in him to-day.[69]
 
 C. A great deal has been said in this paper about directly sexual
 instincts and those that are inhibited in their aims, and it may be
 hoped that this distinction will not meet with too much resistance. But
 a detailed discussion of the question will not be out of place, even if
 it only repeats what has to a great extent already been said before.
 
 The development of the libido in children has made us acquainted with
 the first but also the best example of sexual instincts which are
 inhibited in their aims. All the feelings which a child has towards its
 parents and those who look after it pass by an easy transition into the
 wishes which give expression to the child's sexual tendencies. The child
 claims from these objects of its love all the signs of affection which
 it knows of; it wants to kiss them, touch them, and look at them; it is
 curious to see their genitals, and to be with them when they perform
 their intimate excremental functions; it promises to marry its mother or
 nurse--whatever it may understand by that; it proposes to itself to bear
 its father a child, etc. Direct observation, as well as the subsequent
 analytic investigation of the residue of childhood, leave no doubt as to
 the complete fusion of tender and jealous feelings and of sexual
 intentions, and show us in what a fundamental way the child makes the
 person it loves into the object of all its incompletely centred sexual
 tendencies.[70]
 
 This first configuration of the child's love, which in typical cases is
 co-ordinated with the Oedipus complex, succumbs, as we know, from the
 beginning of the period of latency onwards to a wave of repression. Such
 of it as is left over shows itself as a purely tender emotional tie,
 which relates to the same people, but is no longer to be described as
 'sexual'. Psycho-analysis, which illuminates the depths of mental life,
 has no difficulty in showing that the sexual ties of the earliest years
 of childhood also persist, though repressed and unconscious. It gives us
 courage to assert that wherever we come across a tender feeling it is
 the successor to a completely 'sensual' object tie with the person in
 question or rather with that person's prototype (or _imago_). It cannot
 indeed disclose to us without a special investigation whether in a given
 case this former complete sexual current still exists under repression
 or whether it has already been exhausted. To put it still more
 precisely: it is quite certain that it is still there as a form and
 possibility, and can always be charged with cathectic energy and put
 into activity again by means of regression; the only question is (and it
 cannot always be answered) what degree of cathexis and operative force
 it still has at the present moment. Equal care must be taken in this
 connection to avoid two sources of error--the Scylla of under-estimating
 the importance of the repressed unconscious, and the Charybdis of
 judging the normal entirely by the standards of the pathological.
 
 A psychology which will not or cannot penetrate the depths of what is
 repressed regards tender emotional ties as being invariably the
 expression of tendencies which have no sexual aim, even though they are
 derived from tendencies which have such an aim.[71]
 
 We are justified in saying that they have been diverted from these
 sexual aims, even though there is some difficulty in giving a
 representation of such a diversion of aim which will conform to the
 requirements of metapsychology. Moreover, those instincts which are
 inhibited in their aims always preserve some few of their original
 sexual aims; even an affectionate devotee, even a friend or an admirer,
 desires the physical proximity and the sight of the person who is now
 loved only in the 'Pauline' sense. If we choose, we may recognise in
 this diversion of aim a beginning of the _sublimation_ of the sexual
 instincts, or on the other hand we may fix the limits of sublimation at
 some more distant point. Those sexual instincts which are inhibited in
 their aims have a great functional advantage over those which are
 uninhibited. Since they are not capable of really complete
 satisfaction, they are especially adapted to create permanent ties;
 while those instincts which are directly sexual incur a loss of energy
 each time they are satisfied, and must wait to be renewed by a fresh
 accumulation of sexual libido, so that meanwhile the object may have
 been changed. The inhibited instincts are capable of any degree of
 admixture with the uninhibited; they can be transformed back into them,
 just as they arose out of them. It is well known how easily erotic
 wishes develop out of emotional relations of a friendly character, based
 upon appreciation and admiration, (compare Molire's 'Embrassez-moi pour
 l'amour du grec'), between a master and a pupil, between a performer and
 a delighted listener, and especially in the case of women. In fact the
 growth of emotional ties of this kind, with their purposeless
 beginnings, provides a much frequented pathway to sexual object-choice.
 Pfister, in his _Frmmigkeit des Grafen von Zinzendorf_,[72] has given
 an extremely clear and certainly not an isolated example of how easily
 even an intense religious tie can revert to ardent sexual excitement. On
 the other hand it is also very usual for directly sexual tendencies,
 short-lived in themselves, to be transformed into a lasting and purely
 tender tie; and the consolidation of a passionate love marriage rests
 to a large extent upon this process.
 
 We shall naturally not be surprised to hear that the sexual tendencies
 that are inhibited in their aims arise out of the directly sexual ones
 when inner or outer obstacles make the sexual aims unattainable. The
 repression during the period of latency is an inner obstacle of this
 kind--or rather one which has become inner. We have assumed that the
 father of the primal horde owing to his sexual intolerance compelled all
 his sons to be abstinent, and thus forced them into ties that were
 inhibited in their aims, while he reserved for himself freedom of sexual
 enjoyment and in this way remained without ties. All the ties upon which
 a group depends are of the character of instincts that are inhibited in
 their aims. But here we have approached the discussion of a new subject,
 which deals with the relation between directly sexual instincts and the
 formation of groups.
 
 D. The last two remarks will have prepared us for finding that directly
 sexual tendencies are unfavourable to the formation of groups. In the
 history of the development of the family there have also, it is true,
 been group relations of sexual love (group marriages); but the more
 important sexual love became for the ego, and the more it developed the
 characteristics of being in love, the more urgently it required to be
 limited to two people--_una cum uno_--as is prescribed by the nature of
 the genital aim. Polygamous inclinations had to be content to find
 satisfaction in a succession of changing objects.
 
 Two people coming together for the purpose of sexual satisfaction, in so
 far as they seek for solitude, are making a demonstration against the
 herd instinct, the group feeling. The more they are in love, the more
 completely they suffice for each other. The rejection of the group's
 influence is manifested in the shape of a sense of shame. The extremely
 violent feelings of jealousy are summoned up in order to protect the
 sexual object-choice from being encroached upon by a group tie. It is
 only when the tender, that is, the personal, factor of a love relation
 gives place entirely to the sensual one, that it is possible for two
 people to have sexual intercourse in the presence of others or for there
 to be simultaneous sexual acts in a group as occurs at an orgy. But at
 that point a regression has taken place to an early stage in sexual
 relations, at which being in love as yet played no part, and all sexual
 objects were judged to be of equal value, somewhat in the sense of
 Bernard Shaw's malicious aphorism to the effect that being in love means
 greatly exaggerating the difference between one woman and another.
 
 There are abundant indications that being in love only made its
 appearance late on in the sexual relations between men and women; so
 that the opposition between sexual love and group ties is also a late
 development. Now it may seem as though this assumption were incompatible
 with our myth of the primal family. For it was after all by their love
 for their mothers and sisters that the troop of brothers was, as we have
 supposed, driven to parricide; and it is difficult to imagine this love
 as being anything but unbroken and primitive--that is, as an intimate
 union of the tender and the sensual. But further consideration resolves
 this objection into a confirmation. One of the reactions to the
 parricide was after all the institution of totemistic exogamy; the
 prohibition of any sexual relation with those women of the family who
 had been tenderly loved since childhood. In this way a wedge was driven
 in between a man's tender and sensual feelings, one still firmly fixed
 in his erotic life to-day.[73] As a result of this exogamy the sensual
 needs of men had to be satisfied with strange and unloved women.
 
 In the great artificial groups, the church and the army, there is no
 room for woman as a sexual object. The love relation between men and
 women remains outside these organisations. Even where groups are formed
 which are composed of both men and women the distinction between the
 sexes plays no part. There is scarcely any sense in asking whether the
 libido which keeps groups together is of a homosexual or of a
 heterosexual nature, for it is not differentiated according to the
 sexes, and particularly shows a complete disregard for the aims of the
 genital organisation of the libido.
 
 Even in a person who has in other respects become absorbed in a group
 the directly sexual tendencies preserve a little of his individual
 activity. If they become too strong they disintegrate every group
 formation. The Catholic Church had the best of motives for recommending
 its followers to remain unmarried and for imposing celibacy upon its
 priests; but falling in love has often driven even priests to leave the
 church. In the same way love for women breaks through the group ties of
 race, of national separation, and of the social class system, and it
 thus produces important effects as a factor in civilization. It seems
 certain that homosexual love is far more compatible with group ties,
 even when it takes the shape of uninhibited sexual tendencies--a
 remarkable fact, the explanation of which might carry us far.
 
 The psycho-analytic investigation of the psycho-neuroses has taught us
 that their symptoms are to be traced back to directly sexual tendencies
 which are repressed but still remain active. We can complete this
 formula by adding to it: or, to tendencies inhibited in their aims,
 whose inhibition has not been entirely successful or has made room for
 a return to the repressed sexual aim. It is in accordance with this that
 a neurosis should make its victim asocial and should remove him from the
 usual group formations. It may be said that a neurosis has the same
 disintegrating effect upon a group as being in love. On the other hand
 it appears that where a powerful impetus has been given to group
 formation, neuroses may diminish and at all events temporarily
 disappear. Justifiable attempts have also been made to turn this
 antagonism between neuroses and group formation to therapeutic account.
 Even those who do not regret the disappearance of religious illusions
 from the civilized world of to-day will admit that so long as they were
 in force they offered those who were bound by them the most powerful
 protection against the danger of neurosis. Nor is it hard to discern in
 all the ties with mystico-religious or philosophico-religious sects and
 communities the manifestation of distorted cures of all kinds of
 neuroses. All of this is bound up with the contrast between directly
 sexual tendencies and those which are inhibited in their aims.
 
 If he is left to himself, a neurotic is obliged to replace by his own
 symptom formations the great group formations from which he is excluded.
 He creates his own world of imagination for himself, his religion, his
 own system of delusions, and thus recapitulates the institutions of
 humanity in a distorted way which is clear evidence of the dominating
 part played by the directly sexual tendencies.[74]
 
 E. In conclusion, we will add a comparative estimate, from the
 standpoint of the libido theory, of the states with which we have been
 concerned, of being in love, of hypnosis, of group formation, and of the
 neurosis.
 
 _Being in love_ is based upon the simultaneous presence of directly
 sexual tendencies and of sexual tendencies that are inhibited in their
 aims, so that the object draws a part of the narcissistic ego-libido to
 itself. It is a condition in which there is only room for the ego and
 the object.
 
 _Hypnosis_ resembles being in love in being limited to these two
 persons, but it is based entirely upon sexual tendencies that are
 inhibited in their aims and substitutes the object for the ego ideal.
 
 _The group_ multiplies this process; it agrees with hypnosis in the
 nature of the instincts which hold it together, and in the replacement
 of the ego ideal by the object; but to this it adds identification with
 other individuals, which was perhaps originally made possible by their
 having the same relation to the object.
 
 Both states, hypnosis and group formation, are an inherited deposit from
 the phylogenesis of the human libido--hypnosis in the form of a
 predisposition, and the group, besides this, as a direct survival. The
 replacement of the directly sexual tendencies by those that are
 inhibited in their aims promotes in both states a separation between the
 ego and the ego ideal, a separation with which a beginning has already
 been made in the state of being in love.
 
 _The neurosis_ stands outside this series. It also is based upon a
 peculiarity in the development of the human libido--the twice repeated
 start made by the directly sexual function, with an intervening period
 of latency.[75] To this extent it resembles hypnosis and group formation
 in having the character of a regression, which is absent from being in
 love. It makes its appearance wherever the advance from directly sexual
 instincts to those that are inhibited in their aims has not been
 completely successful; and it represents a _conflict_ between those
 instincts which have been received into the ego after having passed
 through this development and those portions of the same instincts which,
 like other instinctive desires that have been completely repressed,
 strive, from the repressed unconscious, to attain direct satisfaction.
 The neurosis is extraordinarily rich in content, for it embraces all
 possible relations between the ego and the object--both those in which
 the object is retained and others in which it is abandoned or erected
 inside the ego itself--and also the conflicting relations between the
 ego and its ego ideal.
 
 
 
 
 INDEX
 
 
 _Abraham_, 62, 108.
 
 Affectivity. _See under_ Emotion.
 
 Altruism, 57.
 
 Ambivalence, 18, 55, 61.
 
 Anaclitic type, 60.
 
 Archaic inheritance, 10, 99.
 
 Army 42-6, 89, 94, 110, 122.
 
 Autistic mental acts, 2.
 
 
 _Bernheim_, 35, 100
 
 _Bleuler_, 2.
 
 Brothers, 43, 114.
   in Christ, 43.
   Community of, 90, 112, 122.
 
 _Brugeilles_, 34.
 
 
 _Caesar_, 44.
 
 Cathexis, 18, 20, 28, 117.
   Object-, 48, 58, 60-1, 71-2, 76.
 
 Catholic Church, 42-3, 111, 123.
 
 Celibacy of priests, 123.
 
 Censorship of dreams, 16, 69.
 
 Chieftains, Mana in, 96.
 
 Children, 14, 16, 18-19, 30, 67 82, 91.
   Dread in, 83, 85-6.
   Parents and, 54, 86, 116.
   Sexual object of, 72, 116.
   Unconscious of, 18.
 
 _Christ_, 42-5, 50, 111.
   Equal love of, 50.
   Identification with, 111.
 
 Church, 42-3, 89, 94, 110-11, 122-3.
 
 Commander-in-Chief, 42-5.
 
 Conflict, 18, 107, 126.
 
 Conscience, 10, 28, 68-9, 75, 79
   Social, 88.
 
 Contagion, Emotional, 10-13, 27, 34-5, 46-7.
 
 Crowd, 1, 3, 26, 92.
 
 
 Danger, Effect on groups, 46-9.
 
 _Darwin_, 90.
 
 Delusions:
   of inferiority, 107.
   of observation, 69.
 
 Devotion to abstract idea, 17, 75.
 
 Doubt:
   absence in groups, 15-16
   interpretation in dreams, 15-16.
 
 Dread:
   Children's, 83, 85-6.
   in a group, 46-8, 50.
   in an individual, 47-8.
   Neurotic, 48.
   of society, 10.
   Panic, 45-9.
 
 Dream, 20, 69, 104.
   Interpretation of doubt and uncertainty in, 15-16.
   symbolism, 114.
 
 Duty, Sense of, 84, 88, 95.
 
 
 Ego, 10, 18-19, 62-70, 74, 84, 93, 100-9, 120, 125-7.
   Relations between ego ideal and, 68-70, 103, 105-10.
   Relations between object and, 62-70, 74-6, 108-10.
 
 Ego ideal, 68-70, 74-7, 80, 100-3, 105-10, 113, 126-7.
   Abrogation of the, 105.
   Hypnotist in the place of, 77.
   Object as substitute for, 74-6, 80, 103, 110.
   Relations between ego and, 68-70, 103, 105-10.
   Testing reality of things, 77.
   The first, 113.
 
 Egoism, 57.
 
 Emotion:
   Ambivalent, 18, 55.
   Charge of, 28.
   Contagion of. _See_ Contagion.
   Intensification of, in groups, 16, 23, 27-30, 33, 46, 81.
   Primitive induction of, 27, 34, 46-7.
   Tender, 72-3, 78, 116-17.
 
 Emotional tie, 40, 43, 45, 52-3, 59-60, 64-5, 81, 88, 91, 94, 100, 117-20.
   Cessation of, 46-9.
 
 Empathy, relation to identification, 66, 70.
 
 Enthusiasm, in groups, 25.
 
 Envy, 87-8.
 
 Equality, demand for, 88, 89.
 
 Eros, 38-40.
 
 Esprit de corps, origin of, 87.
 
 Ethical:
   conduct of a group, 18.
   level of Christianity, 111.
   standards of individual, 24-5.
 
 
 Fairy tales, the hero in, 114.
 
 Family, 70, 95, 100, 113, 120.
   a group formation, 95.
   and Christian community, 43.
   and social instinct, 3.
   Primal, 122.
 
 Fascination, 11, 13, 21, 75.
 
 Father, 43, 92, 98-9.
   Equal love of, 95.
   God, 115.
   Identification with, 60-2.
   Object tie with, 62.
   Primal, 92, 94-5, 99-100, 112-13, 115, 120.
     Deification of, 93, 115.
     Killing the, 94, 112-13, 122.
   Surrogate, 43, 114.
 
 _Federn, P._, 50.
 
 _Felszeghy, Bela v._, 48.
 
 _Ferenczi_, 76, 98.
 
 Festivals, 105.
 
 Folk-lore, 25.
 
 Folk-song, 25.
 
 French Revolution, 26.
 
 Function:
   for testing reality, 20, 77.
   (Instanz), 15.
 
 
 Gemeingeist, origin of, 87.
 
 Genital organisation, 19.
 
 God, 85, 96.
   Father, 115.
 
 Gregariousness, 83-4, 92.
 
 Group:
   Artificial, 41-2, 52, 82, 89, 94, 110, 122.
   Different kinds of, 26, 41.
   Disintegration of, 49-51.
   Dread in, 47.
   Equality in, 89.
   feeling, 86-7, 121.
   Heightened affectivity in. _See under_ Emotion.
   ideal, 100, 102.
   Intellectual capacity of, 14, 18, 23, 25, 29, 31, 33, 81.
   Intensification of emotion in. _See under_ Emotion.
   Leaders of. _See under_ Leader.
   Libidinal structure of, 37, 40, 44-5, 47, 51, 53-4, 70, 79-80, 102-3.
   marriages, 120.
   Mental change of the individual in, 6-14, 33-4, 45, 56, 81, 102.
   mind, 3, 5-27, 40, 49, 82.
   Organisation in, 26, 30-1, 33, 41-2, 80, 82, 90.
   Primitive, 31, 33, 41, 80.
   psychological character of, 6-32.
   psychology, 1-4, 6, 25-6, 33-4, 37, 45, 53, 59, 92-4, 101, 112, 114.
   Revolutionary, 26.
   Sexual instincts and, 120.
   spirit, 37.
   Stable, 26, 41, 84, 101.
   Suggestibility of, 11, 13, 35, 84-5.
   Transient, 25, 41, 84, 101.
 
 Guilt, Sense of, 20, 63, 65, 84, 106.
 
 Gynaecocracy, 113.
 
 
 Hatred, 53, 56.
 
 _Hebbel_, 49.
 
 Herd, 83-5, 89.
   instinct, 3, 83-6, 105, 121.
 
 Hero, 17, 113-15.
 
 Homosexuality, 57, 66-7, 94, 123.
 
 Horde Primal, 89-95, 99, 113-14, 120.
   Father of the. _See under_ Father.
 
 Hypnosis, 10-13, 20-1, 77-9, 81, 95-100, 125-6.
   a group of two, 78, 100.
   and sleep, 79, 98.
   of terror, 79.
 
 Hypnotist, 13, 77, 95-9.
 
 Hysteria, Identification in, 63-5.
 
 
 Idealisation, 74.
   Identification, 59-70, 75-6, 84, 86-9, 94, 101-3, 111, 125.
   Ambivalent, 61.
   in hysterical symptom, 63-5.
   Regression of object-choice to, 64.
   with a lost or rejected object, 67-8, 108-9.
   with Christ, 111.
   with the father, 60-2.
   with the hero, 115.
   with the leader, 110-11.
 
 Imitation, 34-5, 65, 70.
 
 Individual:
   a member of many groups, 101.
   Dread in, 47-8.
   Mental change in a group, 6-14, 33-4, 45, 56, 81, 102.
   Psychology, 1-2, 92-3, 112, 114.
 
 Induction of Emotion, 27, 34, 46-7.
 
 Infection, mental, 64-65.
 
 Inferiority, Delusions of, 57, 106-7.
 
 Inheritance, archaic, 10, 99.
 
 Inhibition:
   Collective, of intellectual functioning, 23, 33.
   Removal of, 17, 28, 33.
 
 Instinct:
   Herd, 3, 83-6, 105, 121.
   inhibited in aim, 72-3, 78, 115-26.
   Life and death, 56.
   Love, 37, 39, 58.
   Nutrition, 85.
   Primary, 84-5.
   Self-preservative, 34, 85.
   Sexual, 19, 39, 56, 71-8, 85-5, 94, 115-26.
   Social, 3.
   unhibited in aim, 73, 77-8, 94, 115-26.
   Unconscious, 10.
 
 Intellectual ability, lowering of,
   in groups, 14, 18, 23, 25, 29, 31, 33, 81.
 
 Introjection, of object into ego, 65, 67-8, 76.
 
 
 Jealousy, 121.
 
 
 Kings, Mana in, 96.
 
 _Krakovi, B. Jnr._, 23.
 
 _Kroeger_, 90.
 
 
 Language, 25, 38, 71.
 
 Latency, period of, 72, 117, 120, 126.
 
 Leader, 20-2, 41, 44-5, 78, 82, 85, 89, 92, 99, 110.
   Abstractions as substitutes for, 53.
   Equal love of, 93, 95.
   Identification with, 110-11.
   Killing the, 90.
   Loss of, 49.
   Negative, 53.
   Prestige of, 21-2.
   the group ideal, 100, 102, 110.
   Tie with, 49, 52, 66.
 
 _Le Bon_, 5-25, 29, 34, 82, 84, 100-1.
 
 Libidinal:
   structure of the group, 37, 40, 44-5, 47, 53, 70, 79-80, 102-3.
   The word, 44.
   ties, 44, 56-8, 65, 93, 100.
   in the group, 45, 51, 54.
 
 Libido, 33-40, 44, 57, 79, 83, 102, 111, 116, 119, 123, 126.
   Narcissistic, 58, 74, 93, 104, 125.
   Oral phase of, 61.
   theory, 57, 83, 125.
   Unification of, 19.
   Withdrawal of, 108.
 
 Love, 37-40, 42, 73, 87, 108, 122.
   a factor of civilisation, 57, 93.
   and character formation, 94, 118-20.
   and hatred, 56.
   Being in, 58, 71-9, 120-1, 124-6.
   Child's, 116-17.
   Christ's, 43.
   Equal, 42, 50, 89, 93.
   Pauline, 118.
   Self-. _See under_ Narcissism.
   Sensual, 71-3, 78, 117.
   Sexual, 37-8, 57, 120-2.
   Sublimated homosexual, 57.
   The word, 37-9, 71.
   Unhappy, 75.
   Unsensual, 73.
 
 
 _McDougall_, 1, 26-31, 34-6, 46-7, 49, 84.
 
 Magical power of words, 19.
 
 Magnetic influence, 11.
 
 Magnetism, animal, 96.
 
 Mana, 96.
 
 Mania, 106-9.
 
 _Marcuszewicz_, 68.
 
 Marriage, 54, 120.
 
 Melancholia, 68, 106-9.
 
 Metapsychology, 63, 118.
 
 _Moede, Walter_, 24.
 
 _Molire_, 119.
 
 Morality, Totemism the origin of, 90.
 
 Mother deities, 113, 115.
 
 Multicellularity, 7, 32, 83.
 
 Myth, 113-15.
 
 
 _Nachmansohn_, 39.
 
 Names, Taboo upon, 19.
 
 _Napoleon_, 44.
 
 Narcissism, 2, 38, 54-8, 69, 74-5, 93, 94, 104.
 
 _Nestroy_, 49.
 
 Neurosis, 18, 20, 37, 44, 58, 63, 103-4, 123-26.
 
 _Nietzsche_, 93.
 
 Nutrition, Instinct of, 84.
 
 
 Object, 57-8, 62, 68, 74, 87, 93, 104, 125, 127.
   cathexis, 48, 58, 60-1, 71-2, 76.
   Change of, 18, 119, 121.
   Child's, 72.
   -choice, 54, 62, 64, 74, 111, 119, 121.
   Eating the, 61-62.
   Hyper-cathexis of, 76.
   Identification with ego, 108.
   Less or Renunciation of, 68, 108.
   -love, 56, 63, 74, 111.
   Relations with the ego, 65, 67-8, 70, 76.
   Sexual, 67, 72-3, 116.
   Substituted for ego ideal, 74, 80, 103, 125.
 
 Observation, delusions of, 69.
 
 Oedipus complex, 60-61, 63, 66, 117.
   Inverted, 62.
 
 Oral phase of organisation of the libido, 61.
 
 Organisation in groups, 26, 30-1, 33, 41-2, 80, 82, 90.
 
 Orgy, 121.
 
 
 Panic, 45-9.
 
 Pan-sexualism, 39.
 
 _Paul, Saint_, 39, 118.
 
 _Pfister_, 39, 119.
 
 _Plato_, 38.
 
 Poet, the first epic, 113-114.
 
 Power, 9, 15, 28.
   of leaders, 21.
   of words, 19.
 
 Prestige, 21-2, 34.
 
 Primitive peoples, 14, 18-19, 24, 92, 96, 105.
 
 Psycho-Analysis, 4, 7, 14, 18, 36, 38-9, 59-60, 84, 97.
 
 Psychology:
   Group, 1-4, 6, 25-6, 33-4, 37, 45, 53, 59, 92, 94, 101.
   Group and individual, 1-2, 92-93, 112, 114.
 
 Psychoses, 66, 103.
 
 Puberty, 67, 72-73.
 
 
 Races, repugnance between related, 55.
 
 _Rank, Otto_, 112, 114.
 
 Rapport, 97.
 
 Reality:
   Function for testing, 20, 77.
   Contrast between Objective and Psychological, 20.
 
 Regression, 82, 91, 117, 121, 126.
 
 Religion, 51, 90.
   Wars of, 51.
 
 Repressed:
   Sexual tendencies, 74, 117, 123-4.
   The, 10, 104, 117-18, 126.
 
 Repression, 9, 54, 64-5, 69, 72, 84, 95, 105, 117, 120.
 
 Resistance, 84, 104.
 
 Responsibility, Sense of, 9-10, 29-30.
 
 _Richter, Konrad_, 36.
 
 
 _Sachs, Hanns_, 16, 115.
 
 _Schopenhauer_, 54.
 
 Self-:
   consciousness, 30-1.
   depreciation, 107.
   love. _See under_ Narcissism.
   observation, 69.
   preservation, 15, 34, 84-5.
   sacrifice, 11, 38, 75.
 
 Sex, 39.
 
 Sexual:
   act, 92, 121.
   aims, 58, 72.
     Diversion of instinct from, 58.
     Infantile, 72.
     Obstacles to, 120.
   life, 19, 72.
   over-estimation, 53-5.
   Tendencies, Inhibited and uninhibited. 72-3, 77-8, 94, 115-16, 125-26.
   union, 37-8.
 
 _Shaw, Bernard_, 121.
 
 _Sidis, Boris_, 84
 
 _Sighele_, 24-5.
 
 _Simmel, E._, 44.
 
 Sleep, 98, 104.
   and hypnosis, 98.
 
 _Smith, Robertson_, 70.
 
 Social:
   duties, 88, 95.
   relations, 2-3, 57.
 
 Socialistic tie, 51.
 
 Society, 24, 26, 28, 90.
   Dread of, 10.
 
 Sociology. _See under_ Group Psychology.
 
 Speech, 84.
 
 Sublimated:
   devotion, 17, 75.
   homosexual love, 57.
 
 Sublimation, 118.
 
 Suggestibility, 11, 13, 35, 84-5.
 
 Suggestion, 12-13, 17, 29, 34-7, 40, 82, 95, 99, 102.
   Counter-, 35.
   Definition for, 100.
   Mutual, 12, 27, 34, 82.
 
 Superman, 93.
 
 
 Taboo, 19, 96, 112.
 
 _Tarde_, 34.
 
 Totemism, 90, 112-13.
 
 Totemistic:
   clan, 95.
   community of brothers, 112.
   exogamy, 122.
 
 Tradition, 17, 21.
   of the group, 31.
   of the individual, 32.
 
 Transference, 97-8.
 
 _Trotter_, 32, 83-5, 89, 105.
 
 
 Uncanniness, 95, 99.
 
 Uncertainty, absence in groups, 15-16.
   interpretation in dreams, 15-16.
 
 Unconscious, 8, 10, 12, 14-16, 18, 23-4, 64, 67, 72, 97, 100, 104.
   Groups led by, 14.
   instincts, 10.
   _Le Bon's_, 10, 14, 24.
   of children, 18, 117.
   of neurotics, 18.
   Racial, 9.
 
 
 _Wallenstein_, 44.
 
 War neuroses, 44.
 
 War, The, 44.
 
 _Wilson, President_, 44.
 
 Wishes, Affective cathexis of, 20.
 
 Words, magical power of, 19.
 
 
 
 
 THE INTERNATIONAL PSYCHO-ANALYTICAL LIBRARY. Edited by ERNEST JONES
 
      No. 1. ADDRESSES ON PSYCHO-ANALYSIS. BY J.J. Putnam, M.D. Emeritus
      Professor of Neurology, Harvard University. With a Preface by Sigm.
      Freud, M.D., LL.D.
 
      No. 2. PSYCHO-ANALYSIS AND THE WAR NEUROSES. By Drs. S. Ferenczi
      (Budapest), Karl Abraham (Berlin), Ernst Simmel (Berlin) and Ernest
      Jones (London). Introduction by Prof. Sigm. Freud (Vienna).
 
      No. 3. THE PSYCHO-ANALYTIC STUDY OF THE FAMILY. By J. C. Flgel,
      B.A.
 
      No. 4. BEYOND THE PLEASURE PRINCIPLE. By Sigm. Freud M.D., LL.D.
      Authorized Translation from the second German Edition by C. J. M.
      Hubback.
 
      No. 5. ESSAYS IN APPLIED PSYCHO-ANALYSIS. By Ernest Jones M.D.
      President of the International Psycho-Analytical Association.
 
      No. 6. GROUP PSYCHOLOGY AND THE ANALYSIS OF THE EGO. By Sigm. Freud
      M.D., LL.D. Authorized Translation by James Strachey.
 
 
 THE INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF PSYCHO-ANALYSIS Directed by Sigm. Freud
 
 Official Organ of the INTERNATIONAL PSYCHO-ANALYTICAL ASSOCIATION
 
 Edited by Ernest Jones President of the Association
 
 With the Assistance of DOUGLAS BRYAN, J. C. FLGEL (London) A. A. BRILL,
 H. W. FRINK, C. P. OBERNDORF (New York)
 
 Issued Quarterly Subscription 30s. per Volume of Four Parts (c. 500 pp.)
 the parts not being sold separately.
 
 
 THE INTERNATIONAL PSYCHO-ANALYTICAL PRESS
 
 Printed by K. Liebel in Vienna, II. Groe Mohrengasse 23
 
 
 FOOTNOTES:
 
 [1] ['Group' is used throughout this translation as equivalent to the
 rather more comprehensive German '_Masse_'. The author uses this latter
 word to render both McDougall's 'group', and also Le Bon's '_foule_',
 which would more naturally be translated 'crowd' in English. For the
 sake of uniformity, however, 'group' has been preferred in this case as
 well, and has been substituted for 'crowd' even in the extracts from the
 English translation of Le Bon.--_Translator._.]
 
 [2] _The Crowd: a Study of the Popular Mind._ Fisher Unwin 12th.
 Impression, 1920.
 
 [3] [See footnote page 1.]
 
 [4] [References are to the English translation.--_Translator._]
 
 [5] [The German translation of Le Bon, quoted by the author, reads
 '_bewusster_'; the English translation has 'unconscious'; and the
 original French text '_inconscients_'.--_Translator._]
 
 [6] [The English translation reads 'which we ourselves ignore'--a
 misunderstanding of the French word '_ignores_'.--_Translator._]
 
 [7] There is some difference between Le Bon's view and ours owing to his
 concept of the unconscious not quite coinciding with the one adopted by
 psycho-analysis. Le Bon's unconscious more especially contains the most
 deeply buried features of the racial mind, which as a matter of fact
 lies outside the scope of psycho-analysis. We do not fail to recognize,
 indeed, that the ego's nucleus, which comprises the 'archaic
 inheritance' of the human mind, is unconscious; but in addition to this
 we distinguish the 'unconscious repressed', which arose from a portion
 of that inheritance. This concept of the repressed is not to be found in
 Le Bon.
 
 [8] Compare Schiller's couplet:
 
   Jeder, sieht man ihn einzeln, ist leidlich klug und verstndig;
         Sind sie in corpore, gleich wird euch ein Dummkopf daraus.
   [Everyone, seen by himself, is passably shrewd and discerning;
         When they're _in corpore_, then straightway you'll find he's an ass.]
 
 
 [9] 'Unconscious' is used here correctly by Le Bon in the descriptive
 sense, where it does not only mean the 'repressed'.
 
 [10] Compare _Totem und Tabu_, III., 'Animismus, Magie, und Allmacht der
 Gedanken.' [_Totem and Taboo._ New York, Moffat, 1918. London, Kegan
 Paul, 1919.]
 
 [11] [See footnote p. 69.]
 
 [12] In the interpretation of dreams, to which, indeed, we owe our best
 knowledge of unconscious mental life, we follow a technical rule of
 disregarding doubt and uncertainty in the narrative of the dream, and of
 treating every element of the manifest dream as being quite certain. We
 attribute doubt and uncertainty to the influence of the censorship to
 which the dream-work is subjected, and we assume that the primary
 dream-thoughts are not acquainted with doubt and uncertainty as critical
 processes. They may naturally be present, like everything else, as part
 of the content of the day's residue which leads to the dream. (See _Die
 Traumdeutung_, 6. Auflage, 1921, S. 386. [_The Interpretation of
 Dreams._ Allen and Unwin, 3rd. Edition, 1913, p. 409.])
 
 [13] The same extreme and unmeasured intensification of every emotion is
 also a feature of the affective life of children, and it is present as
 well in dream life. Thanks to the isolation of the single emotions in
 the unconscious, a slight annoyance during the day will express itself
 in a dream as a wish for the offending person's death, or a breath of
 temptation may give the impetus to the portrayal in the dream of a
 criminal action. Hanns Sachs has made an appropriate remark on this
 point: 'If we try to discover in consciousness all that the dream has
 made known to us of its bearing upon the present (upon reality), we need
 not be surprised that what we saw as a monster under the microscope of
 analysis now reappears as an infusorium.' (_Die Traumdeutung_, S. 457.
 [Translation p. 493.])
 
 [14] In young children, for instance, ambivalent emotional attitudes
 towards those who are nearest to them exist side by side for a long
 time, without either of them interfering with the expression of the
 other and contrary one. If eventually a conflict breaks out between the
 two, it often settled by the child making a change of object and
 displacing one of the ambivalent emotions on to a substitute. The
 history of the development of a neurosis in an adult will also show that
 a suppressed emotion may frequently persist for a long time in
 unconscious or even in conscious phantasies, the content of which
 naturally runs directly counter to some predominant tendency, and yet
 that this antagonism does not result in any proceedings on the part of
 the ego against what it has repudiated. The phantasy is tolerated for
 quite a long time, until suddenly one day, usually as a result of an
 increase in the affective cathexis [see footnote page 48] of the
 phantasy, a conflict breaks out between it and the ego with all the
 usual consequences. In the process of a child's development into a
 mature adult there is a more and more extensive integration of its
 personality, a co-ordination of the separate instinctive feelings and
 desires which have grown up in him independently of one another. The
 analogous process in the domain of sexual life has long been known to us
 as the co-ordination of all the sexual instincts into a definitive
 genital organisation. (_Drei Abhandlungen zur Sexualtheorie_, 1905.
 [_Three Contributions to the Sexual Theory._ Nervous and Mental Disease
 Monograph Series, No. 7, 1910.]) Moreover, that the unification of the
 ego is liable to the same interferences as that of the libido is shown
 by numerous familiar instances, such as that of men of science who have
 preserved their faith in the Bible, and the like.
 
 [15] See Totem and Tabu.
 
 [16] [See footnote p. 48.]
 
 [17] B. Krakovi, jun.: _Die Psychologie der Kollektivitten_.
 Translated [into German] from the Croatian by Siegmund von Posavec.
 Vukovar, 1915. See the body of the work as well as the bibliography.
 
 [18] See Walter Moede: 'Die Massen-und Sozialpsychologie im kritischen
 berblick.' Meumann and Scheibner's _Zeitschrift fr pdagogische
 Psychologie und experimentelle Pdagogik_. 1915, XVI.
 
 [19] Cambridge University Press, 1920.
 
 [20] _Instincts of the Herd in Peace and War._ Fisher Unwin, 1916.
 
 [21] Brugeilles: 'L'essence du phnomna social: la suggestion.' _Revue
 philosophique_, 1913, XXV.
 
 [22] Konrad Richter: 'Der deutsche S. Christoph.' Berlin, 1896, _Acta
 Germanica_, V, I.
 
 [23] [Literally:"Christopher bore Christ; Christ bore the whole world;
 Say, where did Christopher then put his foot?']
 
 [24] Thus, McDougall: 'A Note on Suggestion.' _Journal of Neurology and
 Psychopathology_, 1920, Vol. I, No. I.
 
 [25] Nachmansohn: 'Freuds Libidotheorie verglichen mit der Eroslehre
 Platos'. _Internationale Zeitschrift fr Psychoanalyse_, 1915, Bd. III;
 Pfister: 'Plato als Vorlufer der Psychoanalyse', ibid., 1921, Bd. VII.
 ['Plato: a Fore-Runner of Psycho-Analysis'. _International Journal of
 Psycho-Analysis_, 1922, Vol. III.]
 
 [26] 'Though I speak with the tongues of men and of angels, and have not
 love, I am become as sounding brass, or a tinkling cymbal.'
 
 [27] [An idiom meaning 'for their sake'. Literally: 'for love of
 them'.--_Translator._]
 
 [28] An objection will justly be raised against this conception of the
 libidinal [see next foot-note] structure of an army on the ground that
 no place has been found in it for such ideas as those of one's country,
 of national glory, etc., which are of such importance in holding an army
 together. The answer is that that is a different instance of a group
 tie, and no longer such a simple one; for the examples of great
 generals, like Caesar, Wallenstein, or Napoleon, show that such ideas
 are not indispensable to the existence of an army. We shall presently
 touch upon the possibility of a leading idea being substituted for a
 leader and upon the relations between the two. The neglect of this
 libidinal factor in an army, even when it is not the only factor
 operative, seems to be not merely a theoretical omission but also a
 practical danger. Prussian militarism, which was just as unpsychological
 as German science, may have had to suffer the consequences of this in
 the great war. We know that the war neuroses which ravaged the German
 army have been recognized as being a protest of the individual against
 the part he was expected to play in the army; and according to the
 communication of E. Simmel (_Kriegsneurosen and 'Psychisches Trauma'._
 Munich, 1918), the hard treatment of the men by their superiors may be
 considered as foremost among the motive forces of the disease. If the
 importance of the libido's claims on this score had been better
 appreciated, the fantastic promises of the American President's fourteen
 points would probably not have been believed so easily, and the splendid
 instrument would not have broken in the hands of the German leaders.
 
 [29] [Here and elsewhere the German 'libidins' is used simply as an
 adjectival derivative from the technical term '_Libido_'; 'libidinal' is
 accordingly introduced in the translation in order to avoid the
 highly-coloured connotation of the English 'libidinous'.--_Translator._]
 
 [30] ['Cathexis', from the Greek '', 'I occupy'. The German word
 '_Besetzung_' has become of fundamental importance in the exposition of
 psycho-analytical theory. Any attempt at a short definition or
 description is likely to be misleading, but speaking very loosely, we
 may say that 'cathexis' is used on the analogy of an electric charge,
 and that it means the concentration or accumulation of mental energy in
 some particular channel. Thus, when we speak of the existence in someone
 of a libidinal cathexis of an object, or, more shortly, of an
 object-cathexis, we mean that the libidinal energy is directed towards,
 or rather infused into, the idea (_Vorstellung_) of some object in the
 outer world. Readers who desire to obtain a more precise knowledge of
 the term are referred to the discussions in 'Zur Einfhrung des
 Narzissmus' and the essays on metapsychology in _Kleine Schriften zur
 Neurosenlehre_, Vierte Folge.--_Translator._]
 
 [31] See _Vorlesungen zur Einfhrung in die Psychoanalyse_. XXV, 3.
 Auflage, 1920. [_Introductory Lectures on Psycho-Analysis._ Lecture XXV.
 George Allen and Unwin, 1922.]
 
 [32] Compare Bela v. Felszeghy's interesting though somewhat fantastic
 paper 'Panik und Pankomplex'. _Imago_, 1920, Bd. VI.
 
 [33] Compare the explanation of similar phenomena after the abolition of
 the paternal authority of the sovereign given in P. Federn's _Die
 vaterlose Gesellschaft_. Vienna, Anzengruber-Verlag, 1919.
 
 [34] 'A company of porcupines crowded themselves very close together one
 cold winter's day so as to profit by one another's warmth and so save
 themselves from being frozen to death. But soon they felt one another's
 quills, which induced them to separate again. And now, when the need for
 warmth brought them nearer together again, the second evil arose once
 more. So that they were driven backwards and forwards from one trouble
 to the other, until they had discovered a mean distance at which they
 could most tolerably exist.' (_Parerga und Paralipomena_, II. Teil,
 XXXI., 'Gleichnisse und Parabeln'.)
 
 [35] Perhaps with the solitary exception of the relation of a mother to
 her son, which is based upon narcissism, is not disturbed by subsequent
 rivalry, and is reinforced by a rudimentary attempt at sexual
 object-choice.
 
 [36] In a recently published study, _Jenseits des Lustprinzips_ (1920)
 [_Beyond the Pleasure Principle_, International Psycho-Analytical
 Library, No. 4], I have attempted to connect the polarity of love and
 hatred with a hypothetical opposition between instincts of life and
 death, and to establish the sexual instincts as the purest examples of
 the former, the instincts of life.
 
 [37] See 'Zur Einfhrung des Narzissmus', 1914. _Kleine Schriften zur
 Neurosenlehre_, Vierte Folge, 1918.
 
 [38] [Literally, 'leaning-up-against type'; from the Greek '' 'I
 lean up against'. In the first phase of their development the sexual
 instincts have no independent means of finding satisfaction; they do so
 by propping themselves upon or 'leaning up against' the
 self-preservative instincts. The individual's first choice of a sexual
 object is said to be of the 'anaclitic type' when it follows this path;
 that is, when he choses as his first sexual object the same person who
 has satisfied his early non-sexual needs. For a full discussion of the
 anaclitic and narcissistic types of object-choice compare 'Zur
 Einfhrung des Narzissmus.--_Translator._]
 
 [39] See _Drei Abhandlungen zur Sexualtheorie_, and Abraham's
 'Untersuchungen ber die frheste prgenitale Entwicklungsstufe der
 Libido', _Internationale Zeitschrift fr Psychoanalyse_, 1916, Bd, IV;
 also included in his _Klinische Beitrge zur Psychoanalyse_
 (Internationale psychoanalytische Bibliothek. Nr. 10, 1921).
 
 [40] [_Kleine Schriften zur Neurosenlehre._ Zweite Folge.]
 
 [41] Marcuszewicz: 'Beitrag zum autistischen Denken bei Kindern.'
 _Internationale Zeitschrift fr Psychoanalyse_, 1920, Bd. VI.
 
 [42] ['Trauer und Melancholie.' _Kleine Schriften zur Neurosenlehre_,
 Vierte Folge, 1918.]
 
 [43] ['_Instanz_'--like 'instance' in the phrase 'court of first
 instance'--was originally a legal term. It is now used in the sense of
 one of a hierarchy of authorities or functions.--_Translator._]
 
 [44] 'Zur Einfhrung des Narzissmus', 'Trauer und Melancholie.'
 
 [45] 'Zur Einfhrung des Narzissmus.'
 
 [46] We are very well aware that we have not exhausted the nature of
 identification with these samples taken from pathology, and that we have
 consequently left part of the riddle of group formations untouched. A
 far more fundamental and comprehensive psychological analysis would have
 to intervene at this point. A path leads from identification by way of
 imitation to empathy, that is, to the comprehension of the mechanism by
 means of which we are enabled to take up any attitude at all towards
 another mental life. Moreover there is still much to be explained in the
 manifestations of existing identifications. These result among other
 things in a person limiting his aggressiveness towards those with whom
 he has identified himself, and in his sparing them and giving them help.
 The study of such identifications, like those, for instance, which lie
 at the root of clan feeling, led Robertson Smith to the surprising
 result that they rest upon the recognition of a common substance
 (_Kinship and Marriage_, 1885), and may even therefore be brought about
 by a meal eaten in common. This feature makes it possible to connect
 this kind of identification with the early history of the human family
 which I constructed in _Totem und Tabu_.
 
 [47] Cf. _Drei Abhandlungen zur Sexualtheorie_, l.c.
 
 [48] 'ber die allgemeinste Erniedrigung des Liebeslebens.' _Kleine
 Schriften zur Neurosenlehre_, Vierte Folge, 1918.
 
 [49] Cf. 'Metapsychologische Ergnzung zur Traumlehre.' _Kleine
 Schriften zur Neurosenlehre_, Vierte Folge, 1918.
 
 [50] W. Trotter: _Instincts of the Herd in Peace and War._ Fisher Unwin,
 1916.
 
 [51] See my essay _Jenseits des Lustprinzips_.
 
 [52] See the remarks upon Dread in _Vorlesungen zur Einfhrung in die
 Psychoanalyse_. XXV.
 
 [53] _Totem und Tabu._
 
 [54] What we have just described in our general characterisation of
 mankind must apply especially to the primal horde. The will of the
 individual was too weak; he did not venture upon action. No impulses
 whatever came into play except collective ones; there was only a common
 will, there were no single ones. An idea did not dare to turn itself
 into a volition unless it felt itself reinforced by a perception of its
 general diffusion. This weakness of the idea is to be explained by the
 strength of the emotional tie which is shared by all the members of the
 horde; but the similarity in the circumstances of their life and the
 absence of any private property assist in determining the uniformity of
 their individual mental acts. As we may observe with children and
 soldiers, common activity is not excluded even in the excremental
 functions. The one great exception is provided by the sexual act, in
 which a third person is at the best superfluous and in the extreme case
 is condemned to a state of painful expectancy. As to the reaction of the
 sexual need (for genital gratification) towards gregariousness, see
 below.
 
 [55] It may perhaps also be assumed that the sons, when they were driven
 out and separated from their father, advanced from identification with
 one another to homosexual object love, and in this way won freedom to
 kill their father.
 
 [56] 'Das Unheimliche.' _Imago_, 1919, Bd. V.
 
 [57] See _Totem und Tabu_ and the sources there quoted.
 
 [58] This situation, in which the subject's attitude is unconsciously
 directed towards the hypnotist, while he is consciously occupied with
 the monotonous and uninteresting perceptions, finds a parallel among the
 events of psycho-analytic treatment, which deserves to be mentioned
 here. At least once in the course of every analysis a moment comes when
 the patient obstinately maintains that just now positively nothing
 whatever occurs to his mind. His free associations come to a stop and
 the usual incentives for putting them in motion fail in their effect. As
 a result of pressure the patient is at last induced to admit that he is
 thinking of the view from the consulting-room window, of the wall-paper
 that he sees before him, or of the gas-lamp hanging from the ceiling.
 Then one knows at once that he has gone off into the transference and
 that he is engaged upon what are still unconscious thoughts relating to
 the physician; and one sees the stoppage in the patient's associations
 disappear, as soon as he has been given this explanation.
 
 [59] Ferenczi: 'Introjektion und bertragung.' _Jahrbuch der
 Psychoanalyse_, 1909, Bd. I [_Contributions to Psycho-Analysis._ Boston,
 Badger, 1916, Chapter II.]
 
 [60] It seems to me worth emphasizing the fact that the discussions in
 this section have induced us to give up Bernheim's conception of
 hypnosis and go back to the _naf_ earlier one. According to Bernheim
 all hypnotic phenomena are to be traced to the factor of suggestion,
 which is not itself capable of further explanation. We have come to the
 conclusion that suggestion is a partial manifestation of the state of
 hypnosis, and that hypnosis is solidly founded upon a predisposition
 which has survived in the unconscious from the early history of the
 human family.
 
 [61] 'Trauer und Melancholie.'
 
 [62] _Totem und Tabu._
 
 [63] Trotter traces repression back to the herd instinct. It is a
 translation of this into another form of expression rather than a
 contradiction when I say in my 'Einfhrung des Narzissmus' that on the
 part of the ego the construction of an ideal is the condition of
 repression.
 
 [64] Cf. Abraham: 'Anstze zur psychoanalytischen Erforschung und
 Behandlung des manisch-depressiven Irreseins', 1912, in _Klinische
 Beitrge zur Psychoanalyse_, 1921.
 
 [65] To speak more accurately, they conceal themselves behind the
 reproaches directed towards the person's own ego, and lend them the
 fixity, tenacity, and imperativeness which characterize the
 self-reproaches of a melancholiac.
 
 [66] [Literally: 'How he clears his throat and how he spits, that you
 have cleverly copied from him.']
 
 [67] What follows at this point was written under the influence of an
 exchange of ideas with Otto Rank.
 
 [68] Cf. Hanns Sachs: 'Gemeinsame Tagtrume', a summary made by the
 lecturer himself of a paper read at the Sixth Psycho-analytical
 Congress, held at the Hague in 1920. _Internationale Zeitschrift fr
 Psychoanalyse_, 1920, Bd. VI. ['Day-Dreams in Common'. _International
 Journal of Psycho-Analysis_, 1920, Vol. I.]
 
 [69] In this brief exposition I have made no attempt to bring forward
 any of the material existing in legends, myths, fairy tales, the history
 of manners, etc., in support of the construction.
 
 [70] Cf. _Drei Abhandlungen zur Sexualtheorie_.
 
 [71] Hostile feelings, which are a little more complicated in their
 construction, offer no exception to this rule.
 
 [72] [_Schriften zur angewandten Seelenkunde._ Heft 8. Vienna, Deuticke,
 1910.]
 
 [73] See 'ber die allgemeinste Erniedrigung des Liebeslebens.'
 
 [74] See _Totem und Tabu_, towards the end of Part II, 'Das Tabu und die
 Ambivalenz'.
 
 [75] See _Drei Abhandlungen zur Sexualtheorie_, 4. Auflage, 1920, S. 96.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 End of the Project Gutenberg EBook of Group Psychology and The Analysis of

 
 
 
 Produced by Chuck Greif, University of Michigan and the
 Online Distributed Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 THE INTERNATIONAL PSYCHO-ANALYTICAL LIBRARY
 No. 6
 
 
 
 
 GROUP PSYCHOLOGY
 AND
 THE ANALYSIS OF THE EGO
 
 BY
 SIGM. FREUD, M. D., LL. D.
 
 AUTHORIZED TRANSLATION
 BY
 JAMES STRACHEY
 
 [Illustration: colophon]
 
 THE INTERNATIONAL PSYCHO-ANALYTICAL PRESS
 LONDON MCMXXII VIENNA
 
 Copyright 1922
 
 
 
 
 TRANSLATOR'S NOTE
 
 
 A comparison of the following pages with the German original
 (_Massenpsychologie und Ich-Analyse_, Internationaler Psychoanalytischer
 Verlag, Vienna, 1921) will show that certain passages have been
 transferred in the English version from the text to the footnotes. This
 alteration has been carried out at the author's express desire.
 
 All technical terms have been translated in accordance with the Glossary
 to be published as a supplement to the _International Journal of
 Psycho-Analysis_.
 
 J. S.
 
 
 
 
 CONTENTS
 
 
                                                        Page
 
    I Introduction                                         1
 
   II Le Bon's Description of the Group Mind               5
 
  III Other Accounts of Collective Mental Life            23
 
   IV Suggestion and Libido                               33
 
    V Two Artificial Groups: the Church and the Army      41
 
   VI Further Problems and Lines of Work                  52
 
  VII Identification                                      60
 
 VIII Being in Love and Hypnosis                          71
 
   IX The Herd Instinct                                   81
 
    X The Group and the Primal Horde                      90
 
   XI A Differentiating Grade in the Ego                 101
 
  XII Postscript                                         110
 
 
 
 
 GROUP PSYCHOLOGY AND THE ANALYSIS OF THE EGO
 
 
 
 
 I
 
 INTRODUCTION
 
 
 The contrast between Individual Psychology and Social or Group[1]
 Psychology, which at a first glance may seem to be full of significance,
 loses a great deal of its sharpness when it is examined more closely. It
 is true that Individual Psychology is concerned with the individual man
 and explores the paths by which he seeks to find satisfaction for his
 instincts; but only rarely and under certain exceptional conditions is
 Individual Psychology in a position to disregard the relations of this
 individual to others. In the individual's mental life someone else is
 invariably involved, as a model, as an object, as a helper, as an
 opponent, and so from the very first Individual Psychology is at the
 same time Social Psychology as well--in this extended but entirely
 justifiable sense of the words.
 
 The relations of an individual to his parents and to his brothers and
 sisters, to the object of his love, and to his physician--in fact all
 the relations which have hitherto been the chief subject of
 psycho-analytic research--may claim to be considered as social
 phenomena; and in this respect they may be contrasted with certain other
 processes, described by us as 'narcissistic', in which the satisfaction
 of the instincts is partially or totally withdrawn from the influence of
 other people. The contrast between social and narcissistic--Bleuler
 would perhaps call them 'autistic'--mental acts therefore falls wholly
 within the domain of Individual Psychology, and is not well calculated
 to differentiate it from a Social or Group Psychology.
 
 The individual in the relations which have already been mentioned--to
 his parents and to his brothers and sisters, to the person he is in love
 with, to his friend, and to his physician--comes under the influence of
 only a single person, or of a very small number of persons, each one of
 whom has become enormously important to him. Now in speaking of Social
 or Group Psychology it has become usual to leave these relations on one
 side and to isolate as the subject of inquiry the influencing of an
 individual by a large number of people simultaneously, people with whom
 he is connected by something, though otherwise they may in many respects
 be strangers to him. Group Psychology is therefore concerned with the
 individual man as a member of a race, of a nation, of a caste, of a
 profession, of an institution, or as a component part of a crowd of
 people who have been organised into a group at some particular time for
 some definite purpose. When once natural continuity has been severed in
 this way, it is easy to regard the phenomena that appear under these
 special conditions as being expressions of a special instinct that is
 not further reducible, the social instinct ('herd instinct', 'group
 mind'), which does not come to light in any other situations. But we may
 perhaps venture to object that it seems difficult to attribute to the
 factor of number a significance so great as to make it capable by itself
 or arousing in our mental life a new instinct that is otherwise not
 brought into play. Our expectation is therefore directed towards two
 other possibilities: that the social instinct may not be a primitive one
 and insusceptible of dissection, and that it may be possible to discover
 the beginnings of its development in a narrower circle, such as that of
 the family.
 
 Although Group Psychology is only in its infancy, it embraces an immense
 number of separate issues and offers to investigators countless
 problems which have hitherto not even been properly distinguished from
 one another. The mere classification of the different forms of group
 formation and the description of the mental phenomena produced by them
 require a great expenditure of observation and exposition, and have
 already given rise to a copious literature. Anyone who compares the
 narrow dimensions of this little book with the extent of Group
 Psychology will at once be able to guess that only a few points chosen
 from the whole material are to be dealt with here. And they will in fact
 only be a few questions with which the depth-psychology of
 psycho-analysis is specially concerned.
 
 
 
 
 II
 
 LE BON'S DESCRIPTION OF THE GROUP MIND
 
 
 Instead of starting from a definition, it seems more useful to begin
 with some indication of the range of the phenomena under review, and to
 select from among them a few specially striking and characteristic facts
 to which our inquiry can be attached. We can achieve both of these aims
 by means of quotation from Le Bon's deservedly famous work _Psychologie
 des foules_.[2]
 
 Let us make the matter clear once again. If a Psychology, concerned with
 exploring the predispositions, the instincts, the motives and the aims
 of an individual man down to his actions and his relations with those
 who are nearest to him, had completely achieved its task, and had
 cleared up the whole of these matters with their inter-connections, it
 would then suddenly find itself confronted by a new task which would lie
 before it unachieved. It would be obliged to explain the surprising
 fact that under a certain condition this individual whom it had come to
 understand thought, felt, and acted in quite a different way from what
 would have been expected. And this condition is his insertion into a
 collection of people which has acquired the characteristic of a
 'psychological group'. What, then, is a 'group'? How does it acquire the
 capacity for exercising such a decisive influence over the mental life
 of the individual? And what is the nature of the mental change which it
 forces upon the individual?
 
 It is the task of a theoretical Group Psychology to answer these three
 questions. The best way of approaching them is evidently to start with
 the third. Observation of the changes in the individual's reactions is
 what provides Group Psychology with its material; for every attempt at
 an explanation must be preceded by a description of the thing that is to
 be explained.
 
 I will now let Le Bon speak for himself. He says: 'The most striking
 peculiarity presented by a psychological group[3] is the following.
 Whoever be the individuals that compose it, however like or unlike be
 their mode of life, their occupations, their character, or their
 intelligence, the fact that they have been transformed into a group puts
 them in possession of a sort of collective mind which makes them feel,
 think, and act in a manner quite different from that in which each
 individual of them would feel, think, and act were he in a state of
 isolation. There are certain ideas and feelings which do not come into
 being, or do not transform themselves into acts except in the case of
 individuals forming a group. The psychological group is a provisional
 being formed of heterogeneous elements, which for a moment are combined,
 exactly as the cells which constitute a living body form by their
 reunion a new being which displays characteristics very different from
 those possessed by each of the cells singly.' (p. 29.)[4]
 
 We shall take the liberty of interrupting Le Bon's exposition with
 glosses of our own, and shall accordingly insert an observation at this
 point. If the individuals in the group are combined into a unity, there
 must surely be something to unite them, and this bond might be precisely
 the thing that is characteristic of a group. But Le Bon does not answer
 this question; he goes on to consider the alteration which the
 individual undergoes when in a group and describes it in terms which
 harmonize well with the fundamental postulates of our own
 depth-psychology.
 
 'It is easy to prove how much the individual forming part of a group
 differs from the isolated individual, but it is less easy to discover
 the causes of this difference.
 
 'To obtain at any rate a glimpse of them it is necessary in the first
 place to call to mind the truth established by modern psychology, that
 unconscious phenomena play an altogether preponderating part not only in
 organic life, but also in the operations of the intelligence. The
 conscious life of the mind is of small importance in comparison with its
 unconscious life. The most subtle analyst, the most acute observer, is
 scarcely successful in discovering more than a very small number of the
 conscious[5] motives that determine his conduct. Our conscious acts are
 the outcome of an unconscious substratum created in the mind in the main
 by hereditary influences. This substratum consists of the innumerable
 common characteristics handed down from generation to generation, which
 constitute the genius of a race. Behind the avowed causes of our acts
 there undoubtedly lie secret causes that we do not avow, but behind
 these secret causes there are many others more secret still, of which we
 ourselves are ignorant.[6] The greater part of our daily actions are the
 result of hidden motives which escape our observation.' (p. 30.)
 
 Le Bon thinks that the particular acquirements of individuals become
 obliterated in a group, and that in this way their distinctiveness
 vanishes. The racial unconscious emerges; what is heterogeneous is
 submerged in what is homogeneous. We may say that the mental
 superstructure, the development of which in individuals shows such
 dissimilarities, is removed, and that the unconscious foundations, which
 are similar in everyone, stand exposed to view.
 
 In this way individuals in a group would come to show an average
 character. But Le Bon believes that they also display new
 characteristics which they have not previously possessed, and he seeks
 the reason for this in three different factors.
 
 'The first is that the individual forming part of a group acquires,
 solely from numerical considerations, a sentiment of invincible power
 which allows him to yield to instincts which, had he been alone, he
 would perforce have kept under restraint. He will be the less disposed
 to check himself from the consideration that, a group being anonymous,
 and in consequence irresponsible, the sentiment of responsibility which
 always controls individuals disappears entirely.' (p. 33.)
 
 From our point of view we need not attribute so much importance to the
 appearance of new characteristics. For us it would be enough to say that
 in a group the individual is brought under conditions which allow him to
 throw off the repressions of his unconscious instincts. The apparently
 new characteristics which he then displays are in fact the
 manifestations of this unconscious, in which all that is evil in the
 human mind is contained as a predisposition. We can find no difficulty
 in understanding the disappearance of conscience or of a sense of
 responsibility in these circumstances. It has long been our contention
 that 'dread of society [_soziale Angst_]' is the essence of what is
 called conscience.[7]
 
 'The second cause, which is contagion, also intervenes to determine the
 manifestation in groups of their special characteristics, and at the
 same time the trend they are to take. Contagion is a phenomenon of which
 it is easy to establish the presence, but that it is not easy to
 explain. It must be classed among those phenomena of a hypnotic order,
 which we shall shortly study. In a group every sentiment and act is
 contagious, and contagious to such a degree that an individual readily
 sacrifices his personal interest to the collective interest. This is an
 aptitude very contrary to his nature, and of which a man is scarcely
 capable, except when he makes part of a group.' (p. 33.)
 
 We shall later on base an important conjecture upon this last statement.
 
 'A third cause, and by far the most important, determines in the
 individuals of a group special characteristics which are quite contrary
 at times to those presented by the isolated individual. I allude to that
 suggestibility of which, moreover, the contagion mentioned above is only
 an effect.
 
 'To understand this phenomenon it is necessary to bear in mind certain
 recent physiological discoveries. We know to-day that by various
 processes an individual may be brought into such a condition that,
 having entirely lost his conscious personality, he obeys all the
 suggestions of the operator who has deprived him of it, and commits acts
 in utter contradiction with his character and habits. The most careful
 investigations seem to prove that an individual immersed for some length
 of time in a group in action soon finds himself--either in consequence
 of the magnetic influence given out by the group, or from some other
 cause of which we are ignorant--in a special state, which much resembles
 the state of fascination in which the hypnotised individual finds
 himself in the hands of the hypnotiser.... The conscious personality has
 entirely vanished; will and discernment are lost. All feelings and
 thoughts are bent in the direction determined by the hypnotiser.
 
 'Such also is approximately the state of the individual forming part of
 a psychological group. He is no longer conscious of his acts. In his
 case, as in the case of the hypnotised subject, at the same time that
 certain faculties are destroyed, others may be brought to a high degree
 of exaltation. Under the influence of a suggestion, he will undertake
 the accomplishment of certain acts with irresistible impetuosity. This
 impetuosity is the more irresistible in the case of groups than in that
 of the hypnotised subject, from the fact that, the suggestion being the
 same for all the individuals of the group, it gains in strength by
 reciprocity.' (p. 34.)
 
 'We see, then, that the disappearance of the conscious personality, the
 predominance of the unconscious personality, the turning by means of
 suggestion and contagion of feelings and ideas in an identical
 direction, the tendency to immediately transform the suggested ideas
 into acts; these, we see, are the principal characteristics of the
 individual forming part of a group. He is no longer himself, but has
 become an automaton who has ceased to be guided by his will.' (p. 35.)
 
 I have quoted this passage so fully in order to make it quite clear that
 Le Bon explains the condition of an individual in a group as being
 actually hypnotic, and does not merely make a comparison between the two
 states. We have no intention of raising any objection at this point, but
 wish only to emphasize the fact that the two last causes of an
 individual becoming altered in a group (the contagion and the heightened
 suggestibility) are evidently not on a par, since the contagion seems
 actually to be a manifestation of the suggestibility. Moreover the
 effects of the two factors do not seem to be sharply differentiated in
 the text of Le Bon's remarks. We may perhaps best interpret his
 statement if we connect the contagion with the effects of the individual
 members of the group upon one another, while we point to another source
 for those manifestations of suggestion in the group which are put on a
 level with the phenomena of hypnotic influence. But to what source? We
 cannot avoid being struck with a sense of deficiency when we notice that
 one of the chief elements of the comparison, namely the person who is to
 replace the hypnotist in the case of the group, is not mentioned in Le
 Bon's exposition. But he nevertheless distinguishes between this
 influence of fascination which remains plunged in obscurity and the
 contagious effect which the individuals exercise upon one another and by
 which the original suggestion is strengthened.
 
 Here is yet another important consideration for helping us to understand
 the individual in a group: 'Moreover, by the mere fact that he forms
 part of an organised group, a man descends several rungs in the ladder
 of civilisation. Isolated, he may be a cultivated individual; in a
 crowd, he is a barbarian--that is, a creature acting by instinct. He
 possesses the spontaneity, the violence, the ferocity, and also the
 enthusiasm and heroism of primitive beings.' (p. 36.) He then dwells
 especially upon the lowering in intellectual ability which an individual
 experiences when he becomes merged in a group.[8]
 
 Let us now leave the individual, and turn to the group mind, as it has
 been outlined by Le Bon. It shows not a single feature which a
 psycho-analyst would find any difficulty in placing or in deriving from
 its source. Le Bon himself shows us the way by pointing to its
 similarity with the mental life of primitive people and of children (p.
 40).
 
 A group is impulsive, changeable and irritable. It is led almost
 exclusively by the unconscious.[9] The impulses which a group obeys may
 according to circumstances be generous or cruel, heroic or cowardly, but
 they are always so imperious that no personal interest, not even that of
 self-preservation, can make itself felt (p. 41). Nothing about it is
 premeditated. Though it may desire things passionately, yet this is
 never so for long, for it is incapable of perseverance. It cannot
 tolerate any delay between its desire and the fulfilment of what it
 desires. It has a sense of omnipotence; the notion of impossibility
 disappears for the individual in a group.[10]
 
 A group is extraordinarily credulous and open to influence, it has no
 critical faculty, and the improbable does not exist for it. It thinks in
 images, which call one another up by association (just as they arise
 with individuals in states of free imagination), and whose agreement
 with reality is never checked by any reasonable function
 [_Instanz_].[11] The feelings of a group are always very simple and very
 exaggerated. So that a group knows neither doubt nor uncertainty.[12]
 
 It goes directly to extremes; if a suspicion is expressed, it is
 instantly changed into an incontrovertible certainty; a trace of
 antipathy is turned into furious hatred (p. 56).[13]
 
 Inclined as it itself is to all extremes, a group can only be excited by
 an excessive stimulus. Anyone who wishes to produce an effect upon it
 needs no logical adjustment in his arguments; he must paint in the most
 forcible colours, he must exaggerate, and he must repeat the same thing
 again and again.
 
 Since a group is in no doubt as to what constitutes truth or error, and
 is conscious, moreover, of its own great strength, it is as intolerant
 as it is obedient to authority. It respects force and can only be
 slightly influenced by kindness, which it regards merely as a form of
 weakness. What it demands of its heroes is strength, or even violence.
 It wants to be ruled and oppressed and to fear its masters.
 Fundamentally it is entirely conservative, and it has a deep aversion
 from all innovations and advances and an unbounded respect for tradition
 (p. 62).
 
 In order to make a correct judgement upon the morals of groups, one must
 take into consideration the fact that when individuals come together in
 a group all their individual inhibitions fall away and all the cruel,
 brutal and destructive instincts, which lie dormant in individuals as
 relics of a primitive epoch, are stirred up to find free gratification.
 But under the influence of suggestion groups are also capable of high
 achievements in the shape of abnegation, unselfishness, and devotion to
 an ideal. While with isolated individuals personal interest is almost
 the only motive force, with groups it is very rarely prominent. It is
 possible to speak of an individual having his moral standards raised by
 a group (p. 65). Whereas the intellectual capacity of a group is always
 far below that of an individual, its ethical conduct may rise as high
 above his as it may sink deep below it.
 
 Some other features in Le Bon's description show in a clear light how
 well justified is the identification of the group mind with the mind of
 primitive people. In groups the most contradictory ideas can exist side
 by side and tolerate each other, without any conflict arising from the
 logical contradiction between them. But this is also the case in the
 unconscious mental life of individuals, of children and of neurotics, as
 psycho-analysis has long pointed out.[14]
 
 A group, further, is subject to the truly magical power of words; they
 can evoke the most formidable tempests in the group mind, and are also
 capable of stilling them (p. 117). 'Reason and arguments are incapable
 of combating certain words and formulas. They are uttered with solemnity
 in the presence of groups, and as soon as they have been pronounced an
 expression of respect is visible on every countenance, and all heads are
 bowed. By many they are considered as natural forces, as supernatural
 powers.' (p. 117.) It is only necessary in this connection to remember
 the taboo upon names among primitive people and the magical powers which
 they ascribe to names and words.[15]
 
 And, finally, groups have never thirsted after truth. They demand
 illusions, and cannot do without them. They constantly give what is
 unreal precedence over what is real; they are almost as strongly
 influenced by what is untrue as by what is true. They have an evident
 tendency not to distinguish between the two (p. 77).
 
 We have pointed out that this predominance of the life of phantasy and
 of the illusion born of an unfulfilled wish is the ruling factor in the
 psychology of neuroses. We have found that what neurotics are guided by
 is not ordinary objective reality but psychological reality. A
 hysterical symptom is based upon phantasy instead of upon the repetition
 of real experience, and the sense of guilt in an obsessional neurosis is
 based upon the fact of an evil intention which was never carried out.
 Indeed, just as in dreams and in hypnosis, in the mental operations of a
 group the function for testing the reality of things falls into the
 background in comparison with the strength of wishes with their
 affective cathexis.[16]
 
 What Le Bon says on the subject of leaders of groups is less exhaustive,
 and does not enable us to make out an underlying principle so clearly.
 He thinks that as soon as living beings are gathered together in certain
 numbers, no matter whether they are a herd of animals or a collection of
 human beings, they place themselves instinctively under the authority
 of a chief (p. 134). A group is an obedient herd, which could never live
 without a master. It has such a thirst for obedience that it submits
 instinctively to anyone who appoints himself its master.
 
 Although in this way the needs of a group carry it half-way to meet the
 leader, yet he too must fit in with it in his personal qualities. He
 must himself be held in fascination by a strong faith (in an idea) in
 order to awaken the group's faith; he must possess a strong and imposing
 will, which the group, which has no will of its own, can accept from
 him. Le Bon then discusses the different kinds of leaders, and the means
 by which they work upon the group. On the whole he believes that the
 leaders make themselves felt by means of the ideas in which they
 themselves are fanatical believers.
 
 Moreover, he ascribes both to the ideas and to the leaders a mysterious
 and irresistible power, which he calls 'prestige'. Prestige is a sort of
 domination exercised over us by an individual, a work or an idea. It
 entirely paralyses our critical faculty, and fills us with astonishment
 and respect. It would seem to arouse a feeling like that of fascination
 in hypnosis (p. 148). He distinguishes between acquired or artificial
 and personal prestige. The former is attached to persons in virtue of
 their name, fortune and reputation, and to opinions, works of art, etc.,
 in virtue of tradition. Since in every case it harks back to the past,
 it cannot be of much help to us in understanding this puzzling
 influence. Personal prestige is attached to a few people, who become
 leaders by means of it, and it has the effect of making everything obey
 them as though by the operation of some magnetic magic. All prestige,
 however, is also dependent upon success, and is lost in the event of
 failure (p. 159).
 
 We cannot feel that Le Bon has brought the function of the leader and
 the importance of prestige completely into harmony with his brilliantly
 executed picture of the group mind.
 
 
 
 
 III
 
 OTHER ACCOUNTS OF COLLECTIVE MENTAL LIFE
 
 
 We have made use of Le Bon's description by way of introduction, because
 it fits in so well with our own Psychology in the emphasis which it lays
 upon unconscious mental life. But we must now add that as a matter of
 fact none of that author's statements bring forward anything new.
 Everything that he says to the detriment and depreciation of the
 manifestations of the group mind had already been said by others before
 him with equal distinctness and equal hostility, and has been repeated
 in unison by thinkers, statesmen and writers since the earliest periods
 of literature.[17] The two theses which comprise the most important of
 Le Bon's opinions, those touching upon the collective inhibition of
 intellectual functioning and the heightening of affectivity in groups,
 had been formulated shortly before by Sighele.[18] At bottom, all that
 is left over as being peculiar to Le Bon are the two notions of the
 unconscious and of the comparison with the mental life of primitive
 people, and even these had naturally often been alluded to before him.
 
 But, what is more, the description and estimate of the group mind as
 they have been given by Le Bon and the rest have not by any means been
 left undisputed. There is no doubt that all the phenomena of the group
 mind which have just been mentioned have been correctly observed, but it
 is also possible to distinguish other manifestations of the group
 formation, which operate in a precisely opposite sense, and from which a
 much higher opinion of the group mind must necessarily follow.
 
 Le Bon himself was prepared to admit that in certain circumstances the
 morals of a group can be higher than those of the individuals that
 compose it, and that only collectivities are capable of a high degree of
 unselfishness and devotion. 'While with isolated individuals personal
 interest is almost the only motive force, with groups it is very rarely
 prominent.' (p. 65.) Other writers adduce the fact that it is only
 society which prescribes any ethical standards at all for the
 individual, while he as a rule fails in one way or another to come up to
 its high demands. Or they point out that in exceptional circumstances
 there may arise in communities the phenomenon of enthusiasm, which has
 made the most splendid group achievements possible.
 
 As regards intellectual work it remains a fact, indeed, that great
 decisions in the realm of thought and momentous discoveries and
 solutions of problems are only possible to an individual, working in
 solitude. But even the group mind is capable of genius in intellectual
 creation, as is shown above all by language itself, as well as by
 folk-song, folk-lore and the like. It remains an open question,
 moreover, how much the individual thinker or writer owes to the
 stimulation of the group in which he lives, or whether he does more than
 perfect a mental work in which the others have had a simultaneous share.
 
 In face of these completely contradictory accounts, it looks as though
 the work of Group Psychology were bound to come to an ineffectual end.
 But it is easy to find a more hopeful escape from the dilemma. A number
 of very different formations have probably been merged under the term
 'group' and may require to be distinguished. The assertions of Sighele,
 Le Bon and the rest relate to groups of a short-lived character, which
 some passing interest has hastily agglomerated out of various sorts of
 individuals. The characteristics of revolutionary groups, and
 especially those of the great French Revolution, have unmistakably
 influenced their descriptions. The opposite opinions owe their origin to
 the consideration of those stable groups or associations in which
 mankind pass their lives, and which are embodied in the institutions of
 society. Groups of the first kind stand in the same sort of relation to
 those of the second as a high but choppy sea to a ground swell.
 
 McDougall, in his book on _The Group Mind_,[19] starts out from the same
 contradiction that has just been mentioned, and finds a solution for it
 in the factor of organisation. In the simplest case, he says, the
 'group' possesses no organisation at all or one scarcely deserving the
 name. He describes a group of this kind as a 'crowd'. But he admits that
 a crowd of human beings can hardly come together without possessing at
 all events the rudiments of an organisation, and that precisely in these
 simple groups many of the fundamental facts of Collective Psychology can
 be observed with special ease (p. 22). Before the members of a random
 crowd of people can constitute something in the nature of a group in the
 psychological sense of the word, a condition has to be fulfilled; these
 individuals must have something in common with one another, a common
 interest in an object, a similar emotional bias in some situation or
 other, and ('consequently', I should like to interpolate) 'some degree
 of reciprocal influence' (p. 23). The higher the degree of 'this mental
 homogeneity', the more readily do the individuals form a psychological
 group, and the more striking are the manifestations of a group mind.
 
 The most remarkable and also the most important result of the formation
 of a group is the 'exaltation or intensification of emotion' produced in
 every member of it (p. 24). In McDougall's opinion men's emotions are
 stirred in a group to a pitch that they seldom or never attain under
 other conditions; and it is a pleasurable experience for those who are
 concerned to surrender themselves so unreservedly to their passions and
 thus to become merged in the group and to lose the sense of the limits
 of their individuality. The manner in which individuals are thus carried
 away by a common impulse is explained by McDougall by means of what he
 calls the 'principle of direct induction of emotion by way of the
 primitive sympathetic response' (p. 25), that is, by means of the
 emotional contagion with which we are already familiar. The fact is that
 the perception of the signs of an emotional state is calculated
 automatically to arouse the same emotion in the person who perceives
 them. The greater the number of people in whom the same emotion can be
 simultaneously observed, the stronger does this automatic compulsion
 grow. The individual loses his power of criticism, and lets himself slip
 into the same emotion. But in so doing he increases the excitement of
 the other people, who had produced this effect upon him, and thus the
 emotional charge of the individuals becomes intensified by mutual
 interaction. Something is unmistakably at work in the nature of a
 compulsion to do the same as the others, to remain in harmony with the
 many. The coarser and simpler emotions are the more apt to spread
 through a group in this way (p. 39).
 
 This mechanism for the intensification of emotion is favoured by some
 other influences which emanate from groups. A group impresses the
 individual with a sense of unlimited power and of insurmountable peril.
 For the moment it replaces the whole of human society, which is the
 wielder of authority, whose punishments the individual fears, and for
 whose sake he has submitted to so many inhibitions. It is clearly
 perilous for him to put himself in opposition to it, and it will be
 safer to follow the example of those around him and perhaps even 'hunt
 with the pack'. In obedience to the new authority he may put his former
 'conscience' out of action, and so surrender to the attraction of the
 increased pleasure that is certainly obtained from the removal of
 inhibitions. On the whole, therefore, it is not so remarkable that we
 should see an individual in a group doing or approving things which he
 would have avoided in the normal conditions of life; and in this way we
 may even hope to clear up a little of the mystery which is so often
 covered by the enigmatic word 'suggestion'.
 
 McDougall does not dispute the thesis as to the collective inhibition of
 intelligence in groups (p. 41). He says that the minds of lower
 intelligence bring down those of a higher order to their own level. The
 latter are obstructed in their activity, because in general an
 intensification of emotion creates unfavourable conditions for sound
 intellectual work, and further because the individuals are intimidated
 by the group and their mental activity is not free, and because there is
 a lowering in each individual of his sense of responsibility for his own
 performances.
 
 The judgement with which McDougall sums up the psychological behaviour
 of a simple 'unorganised' group is no more friendly than that of Le Bon.
 Such a group 'is excessively emotional, impulsive, violent, fickle,
 inconsistent, irresolute and extreme in action, displaying only the
 coarser emotions and the less refined sentiments; extremely suggestible,
 careless in deliberation, hasty in judgment, incapable of any but the
 simpler and imperfect forms of reasoning; easily swayed and led,
 lacking in self-consciousness, devoid of self-respect and of sense of
 responsibility, and apt to be carried away by the consciousness of its
 own force, so that it tends to produce all the manifestations we have
 learnt to expect of any irresponsible and absolute power. Hence its
 behaviour is like that of an unruly child or an untutored passionate
 savage in a strange situation, rather than like that of its average
 member; and in the worst cases it is like that of a wild beast, rather
 than like that of human beings.' (p. 45.)
 
 Since McDougall contrasts the behaviour of a highly organised group with
 what has just been described, we shall be particularly interested to
 learn in what this organisation consists, and by what factors it is
 produced. The author enumerates five 'principal conditions' for raising
 collective mental life to a higher level.
 
 The first and fundamental condition is that there should be some degree
 of continuity of existence in the group. This may be either material or
 formal; the former, if the same individuals persist in the group for
 some time; and the latter, if there is developed within the group a
 system of fixed positions which are occupied by a succession of
 individuals.
 
 The second condition is that in the individual member of the group some
 definite idea should be formed of the nature, composition, functions and
 capacities of the group, so that from this he may develop an emotional
 relation to the group as a whole.
 
 The third is that the group should be brought into interaction (perhaps
 in the form of rivalry) with other groups similar to it but differing
 from it in many respects.
 
 The fourth is that the group should possess traditions, customs and
 habits, and especially such as determine the relations of its members to
 one another.
 
 The fifth is that the group should have a definite structure, expressed
 in the specialisation and differentiation of the functions of its
 constituents.
 
 According to McDougall, if these conditions are fulfilled, the
 psychological disadvantages of the group formation are removed. The
 collective lowering of intellectual ability is avoided by withdrawing
 the performance of intellectual tasks from the group and reserving them
 for individual members of it.
 
 It seems to us that the condition which McDougall designates as the
 'organisation' of a group can with more justification be described in
 another way. The problem consists in how to procure for the group
 precisely those features which were characteristic of the individual and
 which are extinguished in him by the formation of the group. For the
 individual, outside the primitive group, possessed his own continuity,
 his self-consciousness, his traditions and customs, his own particular
 functions and position, and kept apart from his rivals. Owing to his
 entry into an 'unorganised' group he had lost this distinctiveness for a
 time. If we thus recognise that the aim is to equip the group with the
 attributes of the individual, we shall be reminded of a valuable remark
 of Trotter's,[20] to the effect that the tendency towards the formation
 of groups is biologically a continuation of the multicellular character
 of all the higher organisms.
 
 
 
 
 IV
 
 SUGGESTION AND LIBIDO
 
 
 We started from the fundamental fact that an individual in a group is
 subjected through its influence to what is often a profound alteration
 in his mental activity. His emotions become extraordinarily intensified,
 while his intellectual ability becomes markedly reduced, both processes
 being evidently in the direction of an approximation to the other
 individuals in the group; and this result can only be reached by the
 removal of those inhibitions upon his instincts which are peculiar to
 each individual, and by his resigning those expressions of his
 inclinations which are especially his own. We have heard that these
 often unwelcome consequences are to some extent at least prevented by a
 higher 'organisation' of the group; but this does not contradict the
 fundamental fact of Group Psychology--the two theses as to the
 intensification of the emotions and the inhibition of the intellect in
 primitive groups. Our interest is now directed to discovering the
 psychological explanation of this mental change which is experienced by
 the individual in a group.
 
 It is clear that rational factors (such as the intimidation of the
 individual which has already been mentioned, that is, the action of his
 instinct of self-preservation) do not cover the observable phenomena.
 Beyond this what we are offered as an explanation by authorities upon
 Sociology and Group Psychology is always the same, even though it is
 given various names, and that is--the magic word 'suggestion'. Tarde
 calls it 'imitation'; but we cannot help agreeing with a writer who
 protests that imitation comes under the concept of suggestion, and is in
 fact one of its results.[21] Le Bon traces back all the puzzling
 features of social phenomena to two factors: the mutual suggestion of
 individuals and the prestige of leaders. But prestige, again, is only
 recognizable by its capacity for evoking suggestion. McDougall for a
 moment gives us an impression that his principle of 'primitive induction
 of emotion' might enable us to do without the assumption of suggestion.
 But on further consideration we are forced to perceive that this
 principle says no more than the familiar assertions about 'imitation' or
 'contagion', except for a decided stress upon the emotional factor.
 There is no doubt that something exists in us which, when we become
 aware of signs of an emotion in someone else, tends to make us fall into
 the same emotion; but how often do we not successfully oppose it, resist
 the emotion, and react in quite an opposite way? Why, therefore, do we
 invariably give way to this contagion when we are in a group? Once more
 we should have to say that what compels us to obey this tendency is
 imitation, and what induces the emotion in us is the group's suggestive
 influence. Moreover, quite apart from this, McDougall does not enable us
 to evade suggestion; we hear from him as well as from other writers that
 groups are distinguished by their special suggestibility.
 
 We shall therefore be prepared for the statement that suggestion (or
 more correctly suggestibility) is actually an irreducible, primitive
 phenomenon, a fundamental fact in the mental life of man. Such, too, was
 the opinion of Bernheim, of whose astonishing arts I was a witness in
 the year 1889. But I can remember even then feeling a muffled hostility
 to this tyranny of suggestion. When a patient who showed himself
 unamenable was met with the shout: 'What are you doing? _Vous vous
 contresuggestionnez!_', I said to myself that this was an evident
 injustice and an act of violence. For the man certainly had a right to
 counter-suggestions if they were trying to subdue him with suggestions.
 Later on my resistance took the direction of protesting against the view
 that suggestion, which explained everything, was itself to be preserved
 from explanation. Thinking of it, I repeated the old conundrum:[22]
 
             Christoph trug Christum,
             Christus trug die ganze Welt,
             Sag' wo hat Christoph
             Damals hin den Fuss gestellt?[23]
 
 Christophorus Christum, sed Christus sustulit orbem:
     Constiterit pedibus dic ubi Christophorus?
 
 Now that I once more approach the riddle of suggestion after having kept
 away from it for some thirty years, I find there is no change in the
 situation. To this statement I can discover only a single exception,
 which I need not mention, since it is one which bears witness to the
 influence of psycho-analysis. I notice that particular efforts are being
 made to formulate the concept of suggestion correctly, that is, to fix
 the conventional use of the name.[24] And this is by no means
 superfluous, for the word is acquiring a more and more extended use and
 a looser and looser meaning, and will soon come to designate any sort of
 influence whatever, just as in English, where 'to suggest' and
 'suggestion' correspond to our _nahelegen_ and _Anregung_. But there has
 been no explanation of the nature of suggestion, that is, of the
 conditions under which influence without adequate logical foundation
 takes place. I should not avoid the task of supporting this statement by
 an analysis of the literature of the last thirty years, if I were not
 aware that an exhaustive inquiry is being undertaken close at hand which
 has in view the fulfilment of this very task.
 
 Instead of this I shall make an attempt at using the concept of _libido_
 for the purpose of throwing light upon Group Psychology, a concept which
 has done us such good service in the study of psycho-neuroses.
 
 Libido is an expression taken from the theory of the emotions. We call
 by that name the energy (regarded as a quantitative magnitude, though
 not at present actually mensurable) of those instincts which have to do
 with all that may be comprised under the word 'love'. The nucleus of
 what we mean by love naturally consists (and this is what is commonly
 called love, and what the poets sing of) in sexual love with sexual
 union as its aim. But we do not separate from this--what in any case
 has a share in the name 'love'--on the one hand, self-love, and on the
 other, love for parents and children, friendship and love for humanity
 in general, and also devotion to concrete objects and to abstract ideas.
 Our justification lies in the fact that psycho-analytic research has
 taught us that all these tendencies are an expression of the same
 instinctive activities; in relations between the sexes these instincts
 force their way towards sexual union, but in other circumstances they
 are diverted from this aim or are prevented from reaching it, though
 always preserving enough of their original nature to keep their identity
 recognizable (as in such features as the longing for proximity, and
 self-sacrifice).
 
 We are of opinion, then, that language has carried out an entirely
 justifiable piece of unification in creating the word 'love' with its
 numerous uses, and that we cannot do better than take it as the basis of
 our scientific discussions and expositions as well. By coming to this
 decision, psycho-analysis has let loose a storm of indignation, as
 though it had been guilty of an act of outrageous innovation. Yet
 psycho-analysis has done nothing original in taking love in this 'wider'
 sense. In its origin, function, and relation to sexual love, the
 '_Eros_' of the philosopher Plato coincides exactly with the love force,
 the libido, of psycho-analysis, as has been shown in detail by
 Nachmansohn and Pfister;[25] and when the apostle Paul, in his famous
 epistle to the Corinthians, prizes love above all else, he certainly
 understands it in the same 'wider' sense.[26] But this only shows that
 men do not always take their great thinkers seriously, even when they
 profess most to admire them.
 
 Psycho-analysis, then, gives these love instincts the name of sexual
 instincts, a _potiori_ and by reason of their origin. The majority of
 'educated' people have taken their revenge by retorting upon
 psycho-analysis with the reproach of 'pan-sexualism'. Anyone who
 considers sex as something mortifying and humiliating to human nature is
 at liberty to make use of the more genteel expressions 'Eros' and
 'erotic'. I might have done so myself from the first and thus have
 spared myself much opposition. But I did not want to, for I like to
 avoid concessions to faint-heartedness. One can never tell where that
 road may lead one; one gives way first in words, and then little by
 little in substance too. I cannot see any merit in being ashamed of sex;
 the Greek word 'Eros', which is to soften the affront, is in the end
 nothing more than a translation of our German word _Liebe_ [love]; and
 finally, he who knows how to wait need make no concessions.
 
 We will try our fortune, then, with the supposition that love
 relationships (or, to use a more neutral expression, emotional ties)
 also constitute the essence of the group mind. Let us remember that the
 authorities make no mention of any such relations. What would correspond
 to them is evidently concealed behind the shelter, the screen, of
 suggestion. Our hypothesis finds support in the first instance from two
 passing thoughts. First, that a group is clearly held together by a
 power of some kind: and to what power could this feat be better ascribed
 than to Eros, who holds together everything in the world? Secondly, that
 if an individual gives up his distinctiveness in a group and lets its
 other members influence him by suggestion, it gives one the impression
 that he does it because he feels the need of being in harmony with them
 rather than in opposition to them--so that perhaps after all he does it
 '_ihnen zu Liebe_'.[27]
 
 
 
 
 V
 
 TWO ARTIFICIAL GROUPS: THE CHURCH AND THE ARMY
 
 
 We may recall from what we know of the morphology of groups that it is
 possible to distinguish very different kinds of groups and opposing
 lines in their development. There are very fleeting groups and extremely
 lasting ones; homogeneous ones, made up of the same sorts of
 individuals, and unhomogeneous ones; natural groups, and artificial
 ones, requiring an external force to keep them together; primitive
 groups, and highly organised ones with a definite structure. But for
 reasons which have yet to be explained we should like to lay particular
 stress upon a distinction to which the authorities have rather given too
 little attention; I refer to that between leaderless groups and those
 with leaders. And, in complete opposition to the usual practice, we
 shall not choose a relatively simple group formation as our point of
 departure, but shall begin with highly organised, lasting and artificial
 groups. The most interesting example of such structures are
 churches--communities of believers--and armies.
 
 A church and an army are artificial groups, that is, a certain external
 force is employed to prevent them from disintegrating and to check
 alterations in their structure. As a rule a person is not consulted or
 is given no choice, as to whether he wants to enter such a group; any
 attempt at leaving it is usually met with persecution or with severe
 punishment, or has quite definite conditions attached to it. It is quite
 outside our present interest to enquire why these associations need such
 special safeguards. We are only attracted by one circumstance, namely
 that certain facts, which are far more concealed in other cases, can be
 observed very clearly in those highly organised groups which are
 protected from dissolution in the manner that has been mentioned. In a
 church (and we may with advantage take the Catholic Church as a type) as
 well as in an army, however different the two may be in other respects,
 the same illusion holds good of there being a head--in the Catholic
 Church Christ, in an army its Commander-in-Chief--who loves all the
 individuals in the group with an equal love. Everything depends upon
 this illusion; if it were to be dropped, then both Church and army would
 dissolve, so far as the external force permitted them to. This equal
 love was expressly enunciated by Christ: 'Inasmuch as ye have done it
 unto one of the least of these my brethren, ye have done it unto me.' He
 stands to the individual members of the group of believers in the
 relation of a kind elder brother; he is their father surrogate. All the
 demands that are made upon the individual are derived from this love of
 Christ's. A democratic character runs through the Church, for the very
 reason that before Christ everyone is equal, and that everyone has an
 equal share in his love. It is not without a deep reason that the
 similarity between the Christian community and a family is invoked, and
 that believers call themselves brothers in Christ, that is, brothers
 through the love which Christ has for them. There is no doubt that the
 tie which unites each individual with Christ is also the cause of the
 tie which unites them with one another. The like holds good of an army.
 The Commander-in-Chief is a father who loves all his soldiers equally,
 and for that reason they are comrades among themselves. The army differs
 structurally from the Church in being built up of a series of such
 groups. Every captain is, as it were, the Commander-in-Chief and the
 father of his company, and so is every non-commissioned officer of his
 section. It is true that a similar hierarchy has been constructed in the
 Church, but it does not play the same part in it economically; for more
 knowledge and care about individuals may be attributed to Christ than
 to a human Commander-in-Chief.[28]
 
 It is to be noticed that in these two artificial groups each individual
 is bound by libidinal[29] ties on the one hand to the leader (Christ,
 the Commander-in-Chief) and on the other hand to the other members of
 the group. How these two ties are related to each other, whether they
 are of the same kind and the same value, and how they are to be
 described psychologically--these questions must be reserved for
 subsequent enquiry. But we shall venture even now upon a mild reproach
 against the authorities for not having sufficiently appreciated the
 importance of the leader in the psychology of the group, while our own
 choice of a first object for investigation has brought us into a more
 favourable position. It would appear as though we were on the right road
 towards an explanation of the principal phenomenon of Group
 Psychology--the individual's lack of freedom in a group. If each
 individual is bound in two directions by such an intense emotional tie,
 we shall find no difficulty in attributing to that circumstance the
 alteration and limitation which have been observed in his personality.
 
 A hint to the same effect, that the essence of a group lies in the
 libidinal ties existing in it, is also to be found in the phenomenon of
 panic, which is best studied in military groups. A panic arises if a
 group of that kind becomes disintegrated. Its characteristics are that
 none of the orders given by superiors are any longer listened to, and
 that each individual is only solicitous on his own account, and without
 any consideration for the rest. The mutual ties have ceased to exist,
 and a gigantic and senseless dread [_Angst_] is set free. At this point,
 again, the objection will naturally be made that it is rather the other
 way round; and that the dread has grown so great as to be able to
 disregard all ties and all feelings of consideration for others.
 McDougall has even (p. 24) made use of the case of panic (though not of
 military panic) as a typical instance of that intensification of emotion
 by contagion ('primary induction') upon which he lays so much emphasis.
 But nevertheless this rational method of explanation is here quite
 inadequate. The very question that needs explanation is why the dread
 has become so gigantic. The greatness of the danger cannot be
 responsible, for the same army which now falls a victim to panic may
 previously have faced equally great or greater danger with complete
 success; it is of the very essence of panic that it bears no relation to
 the danger that threatens, and often breaks out upon the most trivial
 occasions. If an individual in panic dread begins to be solicitous only
 on his own account, he bears witness in so doing to the fact that the
 emotional ties, which have hitherto made the danger seem small to him,
 have ceased to exist. Now that he is by himself in facing the danger,
 he may surely think it greater. The fact is, therefore, that panic dread
 presupposes a relaxation in the libidinal structure of the group and
 reacts to it in a justifiable manner, and the contrary view--that the
 libidinal ties of the group are destroyed owing to dread in the face of
 the danger--can be refuted.
 
 The contention that dread in a group is increased to enormous
 proportions by means of induction (contagion) is not in the least
 contradicted by these remarks. McDougall's view meets the case entirely
 when the danger is a really great one and when the group has no strong
 emotional ties--conditions which are fulfilled, for instance, when a
 fire breaks out in a theatre or a place of amusement. But the really
 instructive case and the one which can be best employed for our purposes
 is that mentioned above, in which a body of troops breaks into a panic
 although the danger has not increased beyond a degree that is usual and
 has often been previously faced. It is not to be expected that the usage
 of the word 'panic' should be clearly and unambiguously determined.
 Sometimes it is used to describe any collective dread, sometimes even
 dread in an individual when it exceeds all bounds, and often the name
 seems to be reserved for cases in which the outbreak of dread is not
 warranted by the occasion. If we take the word 'panic' in the sense of
 collective dread, we can establish a far-reaching analogy. Dread in an
 individual is provoked either by the greatness of a danger or by the
 cessation of emotional ties (libidinal cathexes[30]
 [_Libidobesetzungen_]); the latter is the case of neurotic dread.[31] In
 just the same way panic arises either owing to an increase of the common
 danger or owing to the disappearance of the emotional ties which hold
 the group together; and the latter case is analogous to that of neurotic
 dread.[32]
 
 Anyone who, like McDougall (l.c.), describes a panic as one of the
 plainest functions of the 'group mind', arrives at the paradoxical
 position that this group mind does away with itself in one of its most
 striking manifestations. It is impossible to doubt that panic means the
 disintegration of a group; it involves the cessation of all the feelings
 of consideration which the members of the group otherwise show one
 another.
 
 The typical occasion of the outbreak of a panic is very much as it is
 represented in Nestroy's parody of Hebbel's play about Judith and
 Holofernes. A soldier cries out: "The general has lost his head!" and
 thereupon all the Assyrians take to flight. The loss of the leader in
 some sense or other, the birth, of misgivings about him, brings on the
 outbreak of panic, though the danger remains the same; the mutual ties
 between the members of the group disappear, as a rule, at the same time
 as the tie with their leader. The group vanishes in dust, like a Bologna
 flask when its top is broken off.
 
 The dissolution of a religious group is not so easy to observe. A short
 time ago there came into my hands an English novel of Catholic origin,
 recommended by the Bishop of London, with the title _When It Was Dark_.
 It gave a clever and, as it seems to me, a convincing picture of such a
 possibility and its consequences. The novel, which is supposed to
 relate to the present day, tells how a conspiracy of enemies of the
 figure of Christ and of the Christian faith succeed in arranging for a
 sepulchre to be discovered in Jerusalem. In this sepulchre is an
 inscription, in which Joseph of Arimathaea confesses that for reasons of
 piety he secretly removed the body of Christ from its grave on the third
 day after its entombment and buried it in this spot. The resurrection of
 Christ and his divine nature are by this means disposed of, and the
 result of this archaeological discovery is a convulsion in European
 civilisation and an extraordinary increase in all crimes and acts of
 violence, which only ceases when the forgers' plot has been revealed.
 
 The phenomenon which accompanies the dissolution that is here supposed
 to overtake a religious group is not dread, for which the occasion is
 wanting. Instead of it ruthless and hostile impulses towards other
 people make their appearance, which, owing to the equal love of Christ,
 they had previously been unable to do.[33] But even during the kingdom
 of Christ those people who do not belong to the community of believers,
 who do not love him, and whom he does not love, stand outside this tie.
 Therefore a religion, even if it calls itself the religion of love,
 must be hard and unloving to those who do not belong to it.
 Fundamentally indeed every religion is in this same way a religion of
 love for all those whom it embraces; while cruelty and intolerance
 towards those who do not belong to it are natural to every religion.
 However difficult we may find it personally, we ought not to reproach
 believers too severely on this account; people who are unbelieving or
 indifferent are so much better off psychologically in this respect. If
 to-day that intolerance no longer shows itself so violent and cruel as
 in former centuries, we can scarcely conclude that there has been a
 softening in human manners. The cause is rather to be found in the
 undeniable weakening of religious feelings and the libidinal ties which
 depend upon them. If another group tie takes the place of the religious
 one--and the socialistic tie seems to be succeeding in doing so--, then
 there will be the same intolerance towards outsiders as in the age of
 the Wars of Religion; and if differences between scientific opinions
 could ever attain a similar significance for groups, the same result
 would again be repeated with this new motivation.
 
 
 
 
 VI
 
 FURTHER PROBLEMS AND LINES OF WORK
 
 
 We have hitherto considered two artificial groups and have found that
 they are dominated by two emotional ties. One of these, the tie with the
 leader, seems (at all events for these cases) to be more of a ruling
 factor than the other, which holds between the members of the group.
 
 Now much else remains to be examined and described in the morphology of
 groups. We should have to start from the ascertained fact that a mere
 collection of people is not a group, so long as these ties have not been
 established in it; but we should have to admit that in any collection of
 people the tendency to form a psychological group may very easily become
 prominent. We should have to give our attention to the different kinds
 of groups, more or less stable, that arise spontaneously, and to study
 the conditions of their origin and of their dissolution. We should above
 all be concerned with the distinction between groups which have a
 leader and leaderless groups. We should consider whether groups with
 leaders may not be the more primitive and complete, whether in the
 others an idea, an abstraction, may not be substituted for the leader (a
 state of things to which religious groups, with their invisible head,
 form a transition stage), and whether a common tendency, a wish in which
 a number of people can have a share, may not in the same way serve as a
 substitute. This abstraction, again, might be more or less completely
 embodied in the figure of what we might call a secondary leader, and
 interesting varieties would arise from the relation between the idea and
 the leader. The leader or the leading idea might also, so to speak, be
 negative; hatred against a particular person or institution might
 operate in just the same unifying way, and might call up the same kind
 of emotional ties as positive attachment. Then the question would also
 arise whether a leader is really indispensable to the essence of a
 group--and other questions besides.
 
 But all these questions, which may, moreover, have been dealt with in
 part in the literature of Group Psychology, will not succeed in
 diverting our interest from the fundamental psychological problems that
 confront us in the structure of a group. And our attention will first be
 attracted by a consideration which promises to bring us in the most
 direct way to a proof that libidinal ties are what characterize a
 group.
 
 Let us keep before our eyes the nature of the emotional relations which
 hold between men in general. According to Schopenhauer's famous simile
 of the freezing porcupines no one can tolerate a too intimate approach
 to his neighbour.[34]
 
 The evidence of psycho-analysis shows that almost every intimate
 emotional relation between two people which lasts for some
 time--marriage, friendship, the relations between parents and
 children[35]--leaves a sediment of feelings of aversion and hostility,
 which have first to be eliminated by repression. This is less disguised
 in the common wrangles between business partners or in the grumbles of a
 subordinate at his superior. The same thing happens when men come
 together in larger units. Every time two families become connected by a
 marriage, each of them thinks itself superior to or of better birth than
 the other. Of two neighbouring towns each is the other's most jealous
 rival; every little canton looks down upon the others with contempt.
 Closely related races keep one another at arm's length; the South German
 cannot endure the North German, the Englishman casts every kind of
 aspersion upon the Scotchman, the Spaniard despises the Portuguese. We
 are no longer astonished that greater differences should lead to an
 almost insuperable repugnance, such as the Gallic people feel for the
 German, the Aryan for the Semite, and the white races for the coloured.
 
 When this hostility is directed against people who are otherwise loved
 we describe it as ambivalence of feeling; and we explain the fact, in
 what is probably far too rational a manner, by means of the numerous
 occasions for conflicts of interest which arise precisely in such
 intimate relations. In the undisguised antipathies and aversions which
 people feel towards strangers with whom they have to do we may recognize
 the expression of self-love--of narcissism. This self-love works for the
 self-assertion of the individual, and behaves as though the occurrence
 of any divergence from his own particular lines of development involved
 a criticism of them and a demand for their alteration. We do not know
 why such sensitiveness should have been directed to just these details
 of differentiation; but it is unmistakable that in this whole connection
 men give evidence of a readiness for hatred, an aggressiveness, the
 source of which is unknown, and to which one is tempted to ascribe an
 elementary character.[36]
 
 But the whole of this intolerance vanishes, temporarily or permanently,
 as the result of the formation of a group, and in a group. So long as a
 group formation persists or so far as it extends, individuals behave as
 though they were uniform, tolerate other people's peculiarities, put
 themselves on an equal level with them, and have no feeling of aversion
 towards them. Such a limitation of narcissism can, according to our
 theoretical views, only be produced by one factor, a libidinal tie with
 other people. Love for oneself knows only one barrier--love for others,
 love for objects.[37] The question will at once be raised whether
 community of interest in itself, without any addition of libido, must
 not necessarily lead to the toleration of other people and to
 considerateness for them. This objection may be met by the reply that
 nevertheless no lasting limitation of narcissism is effected in this
 way, since this tolerance does not persist longer than the immediate
 advantage gained from the other people's collaboration. But the
 practical importance of the discussion is less than might be supposed,
 for experience has shown that in cases of collaboration libidinal ties
 are regularly formed between the fellow-workers which prolong and
 solidify the relation between them to a point beyond what is merely
 profitable. The same thing occurs in men's social relations as has
 become familiar to psycho-analytic research in the course of the
 development of the individual libido. The libido props itself upon the
 satisfaction of the great vital needs, and chooses as its first objects
 the people who have a share in that process. And in the development of
 mankind as a whole, just as in individuals, love alone acts as the
 civilizing factor in the sense that it brings a change from egoism to
 altruism. And this is true both of the sexual love for women, with all
 the obligations which it involves of sparing what women are fond of, and
 also of the desexualised, sublimated homosexual love for other men,
 which springs from work in common. If therefore in groups narcissistic
 self-love is subject to limitations which do not operate outside them,
 that is cogent evidence that the essence of a group formation consists
 in a new kind of libidinal ties among the members of the group.
 
 But our interest now leads us on to the pressing question as to what may
 be the nature of these ties which exist in groups. In the
 psycho-analytic study of neuroses we have hitherto been occupied almost
 exclusively with ties that unite with their objects those love instincts
 which still pursue directly sexual aims. In groups there can evidently
 be no question of sexual aims of that kind. We are concerned here with
 love instincts which have been diverted from their original aims, though
 they do not operate with less energy on that account. Now we have
 already observed within the range of the usual sexual object-cathexis
 [_Objektbesetzung_] phenomena which represent a diversion of the
 instinct from its sexual aim. We have described them as degrees of being
 in love, and have recognized that they involve a certain encroachment
 upon the ego. We shall now turn our attention more closely to these
 phenomena of being in love, in the firm expectation of finding in them
 conditions which can be transferred to the ties that exist in groups.
 But we should also like to know whether this kind of object-cathexis, as
 we know it in sexual life, represents the only manner of emotional tie
 with other people, or whether we must take other mechanisms of the sort
 into account. As a matter of fact we learn from psycho-analysis that
 there do exist other mechanisms for emotional ties, the so-called
 _identifications_, insufficiently-known processes and hard to describe,
 the investigation of which will for some time keep us away from the
 subject of Group Psychology.
 
 
 
 
 VII
 
 IDENTIFICATION
 
 
 Identification is known to psycho-analysis as the earliest expression of
 an emotional tie with another person. It plays a part in the early
 history of the Oedipus complex. A little boy will exhibit a special
 interest in his father; he would like to grow like him and be like him,
 and take his place everywhere. We may say simply that he takes his
 father as his ideal. This behaviour has nothing to do with a passive or
 feminine attitude towards his father (and towards males in general); it
 is on the contrary typically masculine. It fits in very well with the
 Oedipus complex, for which it helps to prepare the way.
 
 At the same time as this identification with his father, or a little
 later, the boy has begun to develop a true object-cathexis towards his
 mother according to the anaclitic type [_Anlehnungstypus_].[38] He then
 exhibits, therefore, two psychologically distinct ties: a
 straightforward sexual object-cathexis towards his mother and a typical
 identification towards his father. The two subsist side by side for a
 time without any mutual influence or interference. In consequence of the
 irresistible advance towards a unification of mental life they come
 together at last; and the normal Oedipus complex originates from their
 confluence. The little boy notices that his father stands in his way
 with his mother. His identification with his father then takes on a
 hostile colouring and becomes identical with the wish to replace his
 father in regard to his mother as well. Identification, in fact, is
 ambivalent from the very first; it can turn into an expression of
 tenderness as easily as into a wish for someone's removal. It behaves
 like a derivative of the first _oral_ phase of the organisation of the
 libido, in which the object that we long for and prize is assimilated by
 eating and is in that way annihilated as such. The cannibal, as we know,
 has remained at this standpoint; he has a devouring affection for his
 enemies and only devours people of whom he is fond.[39]
 
 The subsequent history of this identification with the father may easily
 be lost sight of. It may happen that the Oedipus complex becomes
 inverted, and that the father is taken as the object of a feminine
 attitude, an object from which the directly sexual instincts look for
 satisfaction; in that event the identification with the father has
 become the precursor of an object tie with the father. The same holds
 good, with the necessary substitutions, of the baby daughter as well.
 
 It is easy to state in a formula the distinction between an
 identification with the father and the choice of the father as an
 object. In the first case one's father is what one would like to _be_,
 and in the second he is what one would like to _have_. The distinction,
 that is, depends upon whether the tie attaches to the subject or to the
 object of the ego. The former is therefore already possible before any
 sexual object-choice has been made. It is much more difficult to give a
 clear metapsychological representation of the distinction. We can only
 see that identification endeavours to mould a person's own ego after the
 fashion of the one that has been taken as a 'model'.
 
 Let us disentangle identification as it occurs in the structure of a
 neurotic symptom from its rather complicated connections. Supposing that
 a little girl (and we will keep to her for the present) develops the
 same painful symptom as her mother--for instance, the same tormenting
 cough. Now this may come about in various ways. The identification may
 come from the Oedipus complex; in that case it signifies a hostile
 desire on the girl's part to take her mother's place, and the symptom
 expresses her object love towards her father, and brings about a
 realisation, under the influence of a sense of guilt, of her desire to
 take her mother's place: 'You wanted to be your mother, and now you
 _are_--anyhow as far as the pain goes'. This is the complete mechanism
 of the structure of a hysterical symptom. Or, on the other hand, the
 symptom may be the same as that of the person who is loved--(so, for
 instance, Dora in the 'Bruchstueck einer Hysterieanalyse'[40] imitated
 her father's cough); in that case we can only describe the state of
 things by saying that _identification has appeared instead of
 object-choice, and that object-choice has regressed to identification_.
 We have heard that identification is the earliest and original form of
 emotional tie; it often happens that under the conditions in which
 symptoms are constructed, that is, where there is repression and where
 the mechanisms of the unconscious are dominant, object-choice is turned
 back into identification--the ego, that is, assumes the characteristics
 of the object. It is noticeable that in these identifications the ego
 sometimes copies the person who is not loved and sometimes the one who
 is loved. It must also strike us that in both cases the identification
 is a partial and extremely limited one and only borrows a single trait
 from the person who is its object.
 
 There is a third particularly frequent and important case of symptom
 formation, in which the identification leaves any object relation to the
 person who is being copied entirely out of account. Supposing, for
 instance, that one of the girls in a boarding school has had a letter
 from someone with whom she is secretly in love which arouses her
 jealousy, and that she reacts to it with a fit of hysterics; then some
 of her friends who know about it will contract the fit, as we say, by
 means of mental infection. The mechanism is that of identification based
 upon the possibility or desire of putting oneself in the same
 situation. The other girls would like to have a secret love affair too,
 and under the influence of a sense of guilt they also accept the pain
 involved in it. It would be wrong to suppose that they take on the
 symptom out of sympathy. On the contrary, the sympathy only arises out
 of the identification, and this is proved by the fact that infection or
 imitation of this kind takes place in circumstances where even less
 pre-existing sympathy is to be assumed than usually exists between
 friends in a girls' school. One ego has perceived a significant analogy
 with another upon one point--in our example upon a similar readiness for
 emotion; an identification is thereupon constructed on this point, and,
 under the influence of the pathogenic situation, is displaced on to the
 symptom which the one ego has produced. The identification by means of
 the symptom has thus become the mark of a point of coincidence between
 the two egos which has to be kept repressed.
 
 What we have learned from these three sources may be summarised as
 follows. First, identification is the original form of emotional tie
 with an object; secondly, in a regressive way it becomes a substitute
 for a libidinal object tie, as it were by means of the introjection of
 the object into the ego; and thirdly, it may arise with every new
 perception of a common quality shared with some other person who is not
 an object of the sexual instinct. The more important this common
 quality is, the more successful may this partial identification become,
 and it may thus represent the beginning of a new tie.
 
 We already begin to divine that the mutual tie between members of a
 group is in the nature of an identification of this kind, based upon an
 important emotional common quality; and we may suspect that this common
 quality lies in the nature of the tie with the leader. Another suspicion
 may tell us that we are far from having exhausted the problem of
 identification, and that we are faced by the process which psychology
 calls 'empathy [_Einfuehlung_]' and which plays the largest part in our
 understanding of what is inherently foreign to our ego in other people.
 But we shall here limit ourselves to the immediate emotional effects of
 identification, and shall leave on one side its significance for our
 intellectual life.
 
 Psycho-analytic research, which has already occasionally attacked the
 more difficult problems of the psychoses, has also been able to exhibit
 identification to us in some other cases which are not immediately
 comprehensible. I shall treat two of these cases in detail as material
 for our further consideration.
 
 The genesis of male homosexuality in a large class of cases is as
 follows. A young man has been unusually long and intensely fixated upon
 his mother in the sense of the Oedipus complex. But at last, after the
 end of his puberty, the time comes for exchanging his mother for some
 other sexual object. Things take a sudden turn: the young man does not
 abandon his mother, but identifies himself with her; he transforms
 himself into her, and now looks about for objects which can replace his
 ego for him, and on which he can bestow such love and care as he has
 experienced from his mother. This is a frequent process, which can be
 confirmed as often as one likes, and which is naturally quite
 independent of any hypothesis that may be made as to the organic driving
 force and the motives of the sudden transformation. A striking thing
 about this identification is its ample scale; it remoulds the ego in one
 of its important features--in its sexual character--upon the model of
 what has hitherto been the object. In this process the object itself is
 renounced--whether entirely or in the sense of being preserved only in
 the unconscious is a question outside the present discussion.
 Identification with an object that is renounced or lost as a substitute
 for it, introjection of this object into the ego, is indeed no longer a
 novelty to us. A process of the kind may sometimes be directly observed
 in small children. A short time ago an observation of this sort was
 published in the _Internationale Zeitschrift fuer Psychoanalyse_. A child
 who was unhappy over the loss of a kitten declared straight out that now
 he himself was the kitten, and accordingly crawled about on all fours,
 would not eat at table, etc.[41]
 
 Another such instance of introjection of the object has been provided by
 the analysis of melancholia, an affection which counts among the most
 remarkable of its exciting causes the real or emotional loss of a loved
 object. A leading characteristic of these cases is a cruel
 self-depreciation of the ego combined with relentless self-criticism and
 bitter self-reproaches. Analyses have shown that this disparagement and
 these reproaches apply at bottom to the object and represent the ego's
 revenge upon it. The shadow of the object has fallen upon the ego, as I
 have said elsewhere.[42] The introjection of the object is here
 unmistakably clear.
 
 But these melancholias also show us something else, which may be of
 importance for our later discussions. They show us the ego divided,
 fallen into two pieces, one of which rages against the second. This
 second piece is the one which has been altered by introjection and which
 contains the lost object. But the piece which behaves so cruelly is not
 unknown to us either. It comprises the conscience, a critical faculty
 [_Instanz_][43] within the ego, which even in normal times takes up a
 critical attitude towards the ego, though never so relentlessly and so
 unjustifiably. On previous occasions we have been driven to the
 hypothesis[44] that some such faculty develops in our ego which may cut
 itself off from the rest of the ego and come into conflict with it. We
 have called it the 'ego ideal', and by way of functions we have ascribed
 to it self-observation, the moral conscience, the censorship of dreams,
 and the chief influence in repression. We have said that it is the heir
 to the original narcissism in which the childish ego found its
 self-sufficiency; it gradually gathers up from the influences of the
 environment the demands which that environment makes upon the ego and
 which the ego cannot always rise to; so that a man, when he cannot be
 satisfied with his ego itself, may nevertheless be able to find
 satisfaction in the ego ideal which has been differentiated out of the
 ego. In delusions of observation, as we have further shown, the
 disintegration of this faculty has become patent, and has thus revealed
 its origin in the influence of superior powers, and above all of
 parents.[45] But we have not forgotten to add that the amount of
 distance between this ego ideal and the real ego is very variable from
 one individual to another, and that with many people this
 differentiation within the ego does not go further than with children.
 
 But before we can employ this material for understanding the libidinal
 organisation of groups, we must take into account some other examples of
 the mutual relations between the object and the ego.[46]
 
 
 
 
 VIII
 
 BEING IN LOVE AND HYPNOSIS
 
 
 Even in its caprices the usage of language remains true to some kind of
 reality. Thus it gives the name of 'love' to a great many kinds of
 emotional relationship which we too group together theoretically as
 love; but then again it feels a doubt whether this love is real, true,
 actual love, and so hints at a whole scale of possibilities within the
 range of the phenomena of love. We shall have no difficulty in making
 the same discovery empirically.
 
 In one class of cases being in love is nothing more than object-cathexis
 on the part of the sexual instincts with a view to directly sexual
 satisfaction, a cathexis which expires, moreover, when this aim has been
 reached; this is what is called common, sensual love. But, as we know,
 the libidinal situation rarely remains so simple. It was possible to
 calculate with certainty upon the revival of the need which had just
 expired; and this must no doubt have been the first motive for
 directing a lasting cathexis upon the sexual object and for 'loving' it
 in the passionless intervals as well.
 
 To this must be added another factor derived from the astonishing course
 of development which is pursued by the erotic life of man. In his first
 phase, which has usually come to an end by the time he is five years
 old, a child has found the first object for his love in one or other of
 his parents, and all of his sexual instincts with their demand for
 satisfaction have been united upon this object. The repression which
 then sets in compels him to renounce the greater number of these
 infantile sexual aims, and leaves behind a profound modification in his
 relation to his parents. The child still remains tied to his parents,
 but by instincts which must be described as being 'inhibited in their
 aim [_zielgehemmte_]'. The emotions which he feels henceforward towards
 these objects of his love are characterized as 'tender'. It is well
 known that the earlier 'sensual' tendencies remain more or less strongly
 preserved in the unconscious, so that in a certain sense the whole of
 the original current continues to exist.[47]
 
 At puberty, as we know, there set in new and very strong tendencies with
 directly sexual aims. In unfavourable cases they remain separate, in the
 form of a sensual current, from the 'tender' emotional trends which
 persist. We are then faced by a picture the two aspects of which certain
 movements in literature take such delight in idealising. A man of this
 kind will show a sentimental enthusiasm for women whom he deeply
 respects but who do not excite him to sexual activities, and he will
 only be potent with other women whom he does not 'love' but thinks
 little of or even despises.[48] More often, however, the adolescent
 succeeds in bringing about a certain degree of synthesis between the
 unsensual, heavenly love and the sensual, earthly love, and his relation
 to his sexual object is characterised by the interaction of uninhibited
 instincts and of instincts inhibited in their aim. The depth to which
 anyone is in love, as contrasted with his purely sensual desire, may be
 measured by the size of the share taken by the inhibited instincts of
 tenderness.
 
 In connection with this question of being in love we have always been
 struck by the phenomenon of sexual over-estimation--the fact that the
 loved object enjoys a certain amount of freedom from criticism, and that
 all its characteristics are valued more highly than those of people who
 are not loved, or than its own were at a time when it itself was not
 loved. If the sensual tendencies are somewhat more effectively
 repressed or set aside, the illusion is produced that the object has
 come to be sensually loved on account of its spiritual merits, whereas
 on the contrary these merits may really only have been lent to it by its
 sensual charm.
 
 The tendency which falsifies judgement in this respect is that of
 _idealisation_. But this makes it easier for us to find our way about.
 We see that the object is being treated in the same way as our own ego,
 so that when we are in love a considerable amount of narcissistic libido
 overflows on to the object. It is even obvious, in many forms of love
 choice, that the object serves as a substitute for some unattained ego
 ideal of our own. We love it on account of the perfections which we have
 striven to reach for our own ego, and which we should now like to
 procure in this roundabout way as a means of satisfying our narcissism.
 
 If the sexual over-estimation and the being in love increase even
 further, then the interpretation of the picture becomes still more
 unmistakable. The tendencies whose trend is towards directly sexual
 satisfaction may now be pushed back entirely, as regularly happens, for
 instance, with the young man's sentimental passion; the ego becomes more
 and more unassuming and modest, and the object more and more sublime and
 precious, until at last it gets possession of the entire self-love of
 the ego, whose self-sacrifice thus follows as a natural consequence. The
 object has, so to speak, consumed the ego. Traits of humility, of the
 limitation of narcissism, and of self-injury occur in every case of
 being in love; in the extreme case they are only intensified, and as a
 result of the withdrawal of the sensual claims they remain in solitary
 supremacy.
 
 This happens especially easily with love that is unhappy and cannot be
 satisfied; for in spite of everything each sexual satisfaction always
 involves a reduction in sexual over-estimation. Contemporaneously with
 this 'devotion' of the ego to the object, which is no longer to be
 distinguished from a sublimated devotion to an abstract idea, the
 functions allotted to the ego ideal entirely cease to operate. The
 criticism exercised by that faculty is silent; everything that the
 object does and asks for is right and blameless. Conscience has no
 application to anything that is done for the sake of the object; in the
 blindness of love remorselessness is carried to the pitch of crime. The
 whole situation can be completely summarised in a formula: _The object
 has taken the place of the ego ideal._
 
 It is now easy to define the distinction between identification and such
 extreme developments of being in love as may be described as fascination
 or infatuation. In the former case the ego has enriched itself with the
 properties of the object, it has 'introjected' the object into itself,
 as Ferenczi expresses it. In the second case it is impoverished, it has
 surrendered itself to the object, it has substituted the object for its
 most important constituent. Closer consideration soon makes it plain,
 however, that this kind of account creates an illusion of
 contradistinctions that have no real existence. Economically there is no
 question of impoverishment or enrichment; it is even possible to
 describe an extreme case of being in love as a state in which the ego
 has introjected the object into itself. Another distinction is perhaps
 better calculated to meet the essence of the matter. In the case of
 identification the object has been lost or given up; it is then set up
 again inside the ego, and the ego makes a partial alteration in itself
 after the model of the lost object. In the other case the object is
 retained, and there is a hyper-cathexis of it by the ego and at the
 ego's expense. But here again a difficulty presents itself. Is it quite
 certain that identification presupposes that object-cathexis has been
 given up? Can there be no identification with the object retained? And
 before we embark upon a discussion of this delicate question, the
 perception may already be beginning to dawn on us that yet another
 alternative embraces the real essence of the matter, namely, _whether
 the object is put in the place of the ego or of the ego ideal_.
 
 From being in love to hypnosis is evidently only a short step. The
 respects in which the two agree are obvious. There is the same humble
 subjection, the same compliance, the same absence of criticism, towards
 the hypnotist just as towards the loved object. There is the same
 absorption of one's own initiative; no one can doubt that the hypnotist
 has stepped into the place of the ego ideal. It is only that everything
 is even clearer and more intense in hypnosis, so that it would be more
 to the point to explain being in love by means of hypnosis than the
 other way round. The hypnotist is the sole object, and no attention is
 paid to any but him. The fact that the ego experiences in a dream-like
 way whatever he may request or assert reminds us that we omitted to
 mention among the functions of the ego ideal the business of testing the
 reality of things.[49] No wonder that the ego takes a perception for
 real if its reality is vouched for by the mental faculty which
 ordinarily discharges the duty of testing the reality of things. The
 complete absence of tendencies which are uninhibited in their sexual
 aims contributes further towards the extreme purity of the phenomena.
 The hypnotic relation is the devotion of someone in love to an unlimited
 degree but with sexual satisfaction excluded; whereas in the case of
 being in love this kind of satisfaction is only temporarily kept back,
 and remains in the background as a possible aim at some later time.
 
 But on the other hand we may also say that the hypnotic relation is (if
 the expression is permissible) a group formation with two members.
 Hypnosis is not a good object for comparison with a group formation,
 because it is truer to say that it is identical with it. Out of the
 complicated fabric of the group it isolates one element for us--the
 behaviour of the individual to the leader. Hypnosis is distinguished
 from a group formation by this limitation of number, just as it is
 distinguished from being in love by the absence of directly sexual
 tendencies. In this respect it occupies a middle position between the
 two.
 
 It is interesting to see that it is precisely those sexual tendencies
 that are inhibited in their aims which achieve such lasting ties between
 men. But this can easily be understood from the fact that they are not
 capable of complete satisfaction, while sexual tendencies which are
 uninhibited in their aims suffer an extraordinary reduction through the
 discharge of energy every time the sexual aim is attained. It is the
 fate of sensual love to become extinguished when it is satisfied; for it
 to be able to last, it must from the first be mixed with purely tender
 components--with such, that is, as are inhibited in their aims--or it
 must itself undergo a transformation of this kind.
 
 Hypnosis would solve the riddle of the libidinal constitution of groups
 for us straight away, if it were not that it itself exhibits some
 features which are not met by the rational explanation we have hitherto
 given of it as a state of being in love with the directly sexual
 tendencies excluded. There is still a great deal in it which we must
 recognise as unexplained and mystical. It contains an additional element
 of paralysis derived from the relation between someone with superior
 power and someone who is without power and helpless--which may afford a
 transition to the hypnosis of terror which occurs in animals. The manner
 in which it is produced and its relationship to sleep are not clear; and
 the puzzling way in which some people are subject to it, while others
 resist it completely, points to some factor still unknown which is
 realised in it and which perhaps alone makes possible the purity of the
 attitudes of the libido which it exhibits. It is noticeable that, even
 when there is complete suggestive compliance in other respects, the
 moral conscience of the person hypnotized may show resistance. But this
 may be due to the fact that in hypnosis as it is usually practised some
 knowledge may be retained that what is happening is only a game, an
 untrue reproduction of another situation of far more importance to life.
 
 But after the preceding discussions we are quite in a position to give
 the formula for the libidinal constitution of groups: or at least of
 such groups as we have hitherto considered, namely, those that have a
 leader and have not been able by means of too much 'organisation' to
 acquire secondarily the characteristics of an individual. _A primary
 group of this kind is a number of individuals who have substituted one
 and the same object for their ego ideal and have consequently identified
 themselves with one another in their ego._ This condition admits of
 graphic representation:
 
 [Illustration]
 
 
 
 
 IX
 
 THE HERD INSTINCT
 
 
 We cannot for long enjoy the illusion that we have solved the riddle of
 the group with this formula. It is impossible to escape the immediate
 and disturbing recollection that all we have really done has been to
 shift the question on to the riddle of hypnosis, about which so many
 points have yet to be cleared up. And now another objection shows us our
 further path.
 
 It might be said that the intense emotional ties which we observe in
 groups are quite sufficient to explain one of their characteristics--the
 lack of independence and initiative in their members, the similarity in
 the reactions of all of them, their reduction, so to speak, to the level
 of group individuals. But if we look at it as a whole, a group shows us
 more than this. Some of its features--the weakness of intellectual
 ability, the lack of emotional restraint, the incapacity for moderation
 and delay, the inclination to exceed every limit in the expression of
 emotion and to work it off completely in the form of action--these and
 similar features, which we find so impressively described in Le Bon,
 show an unmistakable picture of a regression of mental activity to an
 earlier stage such as we are not surprised to find among savages or
 children. A regression of this sort is in particular an essential
 characteristic of common groups, while, as we have heard, in organized
 and artificial groups it can to a large extent be checked.
 
 We thus have an impression of a state in which an individual's separate
 emotion and personal intellectual act are too weak to come to anything
 by themselves and are absolutely obliged to wait till they are
 reinforced through being repeated in a similar way in the other members
 of the group. We are reminded of how many of these phenomena of
 dependence are part of the normal constitution of human society, of how
 little originality and personal courage are to be found in it, of how
 much every individual is ruled by those attitudes of the group mind
 which exhibit themselves in such forms as racial characteristics, class
 prejudices, public opinion, etc. The influence of suggestion becomes a
 greater riddle for us when we admit that it is not exercised only by the
 leader, but by every individual upon every other individual; and we must
 reproach ourselves with having unfairly emphasized the relation to the
 leader and with having kept the other factor of mutual suggestion too
 much in the background.
 
 After this encouragement to modesty, we shall be inclined to listen to
 another voice, which promises us an explanation based upon simpler
 grounds. Such a one is to be found in Trotter's thoughtful book upon the
 herd instinct, concerning which my only regret is that it does not
 entirely escape the antipathies that were set loose by the recent great
 war.[50]
 
 Trotter derives the mental phenomena that are described as occurring in
 groups from a herd instinct ('gregariousness'), which is innate in human
 beings just as in other species of animals. Biologically this
 gregariousness is an analogy to multicellularity and as it were a
 continuation of it. From the standpoint of the libido theory it is a
 further manifestation of the inclination, which proceeds from the
 libido, and which is felt by all living beings of the same kind, to
 combine in more and more comprehensive units.[51] The individual feels
 'incomplete' if he is alone. The dread shown by small children would
 seem already to be an expression of this herd instinct. Opposition to
 the herd is as good as separation from it, and is therefore anxiously
 avoided. But the herd turns away from anything that is new or unusual.
 The herd instinct would appear to be something primary, something
 'which cannot be split up'.
 
 Trotter gives as the list of instincts which he considers as primary
 those of self-preservation, of nutrition, of sex, and of the herd. The
 last often comes into opposition with the others. The feelings of guilt
 and of duty are the peculiar possessions of a gregarious animal. Trotter
 also derives from the herd instinct the repressive forces which
 psycho-analysis has shown to exist in the ego, and from the same source
 accordingly the resistances which the physician comes up against in
 psycho-analytic treatment. Speech owes its importance to its aptitude
 for mutual understanding in the herd, and upon it the identification of
 the individuals with one another largely rests.
 
 While Le Bon is principally concerned with typical transient group
 formations, and McDougall with stable associations, Trotter has chosen
 as the centre of his interest the most generalised form of assemblage in
 which man, that [Greek: zoon politikon], passes his life, and he gives
 us its psychological basis. But Trotter is under no necessity of tracing
 back the herd instinct, for he characterizes it as primary and not
 further reducible. Boris Sidis's attempt, to which he refers, at tracing
 the herd instinct back to suggestibility is fortunately superfluous as
 far as he is concerned; it is an explanation of a familiar and
 unsatisfactory type, and the converse proposition--that suggestibility
 is a derivative of the herd instinct--would seem to me to throw far more
 light on the subject.
 
 But Trotter's exposition, with even more justice than the others', is
 open to the objection that it takes too little account of the leader's
 part in a group, while we incline rather to the opposite judgement, that
 it is impossible to grasp the nature of a group if the leader is
 disregarded. The herd instinct leaves no room at all for the leader; he
 is merely thrown in along with the herd, almost by chance; it follows,
 too, that no path leads from this instinct to the need for a God; the
 herd is without a herdsman. But besides this Trotter's exposition can be
 undermined psychologically; that is to say, it can be made at all events
 probable that the herd instinct is not irreducible, that it is not
 primary in the same sense as the instinct of self-preservation and the
 sexual instinct.
 
 It is naturally no easy matter to trace the ontogenesis of the herd
 instinct. The dread which is shown by small children when they are left
 alone, and which Trotter claims as being already a manifestation of the
 instinct, nevertheless suggests more readily another interpretation. The
 dread relates to the child's mother, and later to other familiar
 persons, and it is the expression of an unfulfilled desire, which the
 child does not yet know how to deal with in any way except by turning
 it into dread.[52] Nor is the child's dread when it is alone pacified by
 the sight of any haphazard 'member of the herd', but on the contrary it
 is only brought into existence by the approach of a 'stranger' of this
 sort. Then for a long time nothing in the nature of herd instinct or
 group feeling is to be observed in children. Something like it grows up
 first of all, in a nursery containing many children, out of the
 children's relation to their parents, and it does so as a reaction to
 the initial envy with which the elder child receives the younger one.
 The elder child would certainly like to put its successor jealously
 aside, to keep it away from the parents, and to rob it of all its
 privileges; but in face of the fact that this child (like all that come
 later) is loved by the parents in just the same way, and in consequence
 of the impossibility of maintaining its hostile attitude without
 damaging itself, it is forced into identifying itself with the other
 children. So there grows up in the troop of children a communal or group
 feeling, which is then further developed at school. The first demand
 made by this reaction-formation is for justice, for equal treatment for
 all. We all know how loudly and implacably this claim is put forward at
 school. If one cannot be the favourite oneself, at all events nobody
 else shall be the favourite. This transformation--the replacing of
 jealousy by a group feeling in the nursery and classroom--might be
 considered improbable, if the same process could not later on be
 observed again in other circumstances. We have only to think of the
 troop of women and girls, all of them in love in an enthusiastically
 sentimental way, who crowd round a singer or pianist after his
 performance. It would certainly be easy for each of them to be jealous
 of the rest; but, in face of their numbers and the consequent
 impossibility of their reaching the aim of their love, they renounce it,
 and, instead of pulling out one another's hair, they act as a united
 group, do homage to the hero of the occasion with their common actions,
 and would probably be glad to have a share of his flowing locks.
 Originally rivals, they have succeeded in identifying themselves with
 one another by means of a similar love for the same object. When, as is
 usual, a situation in the field of the instincts is capable of various
 outcomes, we need not be surprised if the actual outcome is one which
 involves the possibility of a certain amount of satisfaction, while
 another, even though in itself more obvious, is passed over because the
 circumstances of life prevent its attaining this aim.
 
 What appears later on in society in the shape of _Gemeingeist_, _esprit
 de corps_, 'group spirit', etc., does not belie its derivation from what
 was originally envy. No one must want to put himself forward, every one
 must be the same and have the same. Social justice means that we deny
 ourselves many things so that others may have to do without them as
 well, or, what is the same thing, may not be able to ask for them. This
 demand for equality is the root of social conscience and the sense of
 duty. It reveals itself unexpectedly in the syphilitic's dread of
 infecting other people, which psycho-analysis has taught us to
 understand. The dread exhibited by these poor wretches corresponds to
 their violent struggles against the unconscious wish to spread their
 infection on to other people; for why should they alone be infected and
 cut off from so much? why not other people as well? And the same germ is
 to be found in the pretty anecdote of the judgement of Solomon. If one
 woman's child is dead, the other shall not have a live one either. The
 bereaved woman is recognized by this wish.
 
 Thus social feeling is based upon the reversal of what was first a
 hostile feeling into a positively-toned tie of the nature of an
 identification. So far as we have hitherto been able to follow the
 course of events, this reversal appears to be effected under the
 influence of a common tender tie with a person outside the group. We do
 not ourselves regard our analysis of identification as exhaustive, but
 it is enough for our present purpose that we should revert to this one
 feature--its demand that equalization shall be consistently carried
 through. We have already heard in the discussion of the two artificial
 groups, church and army, that their preliminary condition is that all
 their members should be loved in the same way by one person, the leader.
 Do not let us forget, however, that the demand for equality in a group
 applies only to its members and not to the leader. All the members must
 be equal to one another, but they all want to be ruled by one person.
 Many equals, who can identify themselves with one another, and a single
 person superior to them all--that is the situation that we find realised
 in groups which are capable of subsisting. Let us venture, then, to
 correct Trotter's pronouncement that man is a herd animal and assert
 that he is rather a horde animal, an individual creature in a horde led
 by a chief.
 
 
 
 
 X
 
 THE GROUP AND THE PRIMAL HORDE
 
 
 In 1912 I took up a conjecture of Darwin's to the effect that the
 primitive form of human society was that of a horde ruled over
 despotically by a powerful male. I attempted to show that the fortunes
 of this horde have left indestructible traces upon the history of human
 descent; and, especially, that the development of totemism, which
 comprises in itself the beginnings of religion, morality, and social
 organisation, is connected with the killing of the chief by violence and
 the transformation of the paternal horde into a community of
 brothers.[53] To be sure, this is only a hypothesis, like so many others
 with which archaeologists endeavour to lighten the darkness of
 prehistoric times--a 'Just-So Story', as it was amusingly called by a
 not unkind critic (Kroeger); but I think it is creditable to such a
 hypothesis if it proves able to bring coherence and understanding into
 more and more new regions.
 
 Human groups exhibit once again the familiar picture of an individual of
 superior strength among a troop of similar companions, a picture which
 is also contained in our idea of the primal horde. The psychology of
 such a group, as we know it from the descriptions to which we have so
 often referred--the dwindling of the conscious individual personality,
 the focussing of thoughts and feelings into a common direction, the
 predominance of the emotions and of the unconscious mental life, the
 tendency to the immediate carrying out of intentions as they emerge--all
 this corresponds to a state of regression to a primitive mental
 activity, of just such a sort as we should be inclined to ascribe to the
 primal horde.[54]
 
 Thus the group appears to us as a revival of the primal horde. Just as
 primitive man virtually survives in every individual, so the primal
 horde may arise once more out of any random crowd; in so far as men are
 habitually under the sway of group formation we recognise in it the
 survival of the primal horde. We must conclude that the psychology of
 the group is the oldest human psychology; what we have isolated as
 individual psychology, by neglecting all traces of the group, has only
 since come into prominence out of the old group psychology, by a gradual
 process which may still, perhaps, be described as incomplete. We shall
 later venture upon an attempt at specifying the point of departure of
 this development.
 
 Further reflection will show us in what respect this statement requires
 correction. Individual psychology must, on the contrary, be just as old
 as group psychology, for from the first there were two kinds of
 psychologies, that of the individual members of the group and that of
 the father, chief, or leader. The members of the group were subject to
 ties just as we see them to-day, but the father of the primal horde was
 free. His intellectual acts were strong and independent even in
 isolation, and his will needed no reinforcement from others. Consistency
 leads us to assume that his ego had few libidinal ties; he loved no one
 but himself, or other people only in so far as they served his needs. To
 objects his ego gave away no more than was barely necessary.
 
 He, at the very beginning of the history of mankind, was the _Superman_
 whom Nietzsche only expected from the future. Even to-day the members of
 a group stand in need of the illusion that they are equally and justly
 loved by their leader; but the leader himself need love no one else, he
 may be of a masterly nature, absolutely narcissistic, but self-confident
 and independent. We know that love puts a check upon narcissism, and it
 would be possible to show how, by operating in this way, it became a
 factor of civilisation.
 
 The primal father of the horde was not yet immortal, as he later became
 by deification. If he died, he had to be replaced; his place was
 probably taken by a youngest son, who had up to then been a member of
 the group like any other. There must therefore be a possibility of
 transforming group psychology into individual psychology; a condition
 must be discovered under which such a transformation is easily
 accomplished, just as it is possible for bees in case of necessity to
 turn a larva into a queen instead of into a worker. One can imagine only
 one possibility: the primal father had prevented his sons from
 satisfying their directly sexual tendencies; he forced them into
 abstinence and consequently into the emotional ties with him and with
 one another which could arise out of those of their tendencies that were
 inhibited in their sexual aim. He forced them, so to speak, into group
 psychology. His sexual jealousy and intolerance became in the last
 resort the causes of group psychology.[55]
 
 Whoever became his successor was also given the possibility of sexual
 satisfaction, and was by that means offered a way out of the conditions
 of group psychology. The fixation of the libido to woman and the
 possibility of satisfaction without any need for delay or accumulation
 made and end of the importance of those of his sexual tendencies that
 were inhibited in their aim, and allowed his narcissism always to rise
 to its full height. We shall return in a postscript to this connection
 between love and character formation.
 
 We may further emphasize, as being specially instructive, the relation
 that holds between the contrivance by means of which an artificial group
 is held together and the constitution of the primal horde. We have seen
 that with an army and a church this contrivance is the illusion that
 the leader loves all of the individuals equally and justly. But this is
 simply an idealistic remodelling of the state of affairs in the primal
 horde, where all of the sons knew that they were equally persecuted by
 the primal father, and feared him equally. This same recasting upon
 which all social duties are built up is already presupposed by the next
 form of human society, the totemistic clan. The indestructible strength
 of the family as a natural group formation rests upon the fact that this
 necessary presupposition of the father's equal love can have a real
 application in the family.
 
 But we expect even more of this derivation of the group from the primal
 horde. It ought also to help us to understand what is still
 incomprehensible and mysterious in group formations--all that lies
 hidden behind the enigmatic words hypnosis and suggestion. And I think
 it can succeed in this too. Let us recall that hypnosis has something
 positively uncanny about it; but the characteristic of uncanniness
 suggests something old and familiar that has undergone repression.[56]
 Let us consider how hypnosis is induced. The hypnotist asserts that he
 is in possession of a mysterious power which robs the subject of his own
 will, or, which is the same thing, the subject believes it of him. This
 mysterious power (which is even now often described popularly as animal
 magnetism) must be the same that is looked upon by primitive people as
 the source of taboo, the same that emanates from kings and chieftains
 and makes it dangerous to approach them (_mana_). The hypnotist, then,
 is supposed to be in possession of this power; and how does he manifest
 it? By telling the subject to look him in the eyes; his most typical
 method of hypnotising is by his look. But it is precisely the sight of
 the chieftain that is dangerous and unbearable for primitive people,
 just as later that of the Godhead is for mortals. Even Moses had to act
 as an intermediary between his people and Jehovah, since the people
 could not support the sight of God; and when he returned from the
 presence of God his face shone--some of the _mana_ had been transferred
 on to him, just as happens with the intermediary among primitive
 people.[57]
 
 It is true that hypnosis can also be evoked in other ways, for instance
 by fixing the eyes upon a bright object or by listening to a monotonous
 sound. This is misleading and has given occasion to inadequate
 physiological theories. As a matter of fact these procedures merely
 serve to divert conscious attention and to hold it riveted. The
 situation is the same as if the hypnotist had said to the subject: 'Now
 concern yourself exclusively with my person; the rest of the world is
 quite uninteresting.' It would of course be technically inexpedient for
 a hypnotist to make such a speech; it would tear the subject away from
 his unconscious attitude and stimulate him to conscious opposition. The
 hypnotist avoids directing the subject's conscious thoughts towards his
 own intentions, and makes the person upon whom he is experimenting sink
 into an activity in which the world is bound to seem uninteresting to
 him; but at the same time the subject is in reality unconsciously
 concentrating his whole attention upon the hypnotist, and is getting
 into an attitude of _rapport_, of transference on to him. Thus the
 indirect methods of hypnotising, like many of the technical procedures
 used in making jokes, have the effect of checking certain distributions
 of mental energy which would interfere with the course of events in the
 unconscious, and they lead eventually to the same result as the direct
 methods of influence by means of staring or stroking.[58]
 
 Ferenczi has made the true discovery that when a hypnotist gives the
 command to sleep, which is often done at the beginning of hypnosis, he
 is putting himself in the place of the subject's parents. He thinks that
 two sorts of hypnosis are to be distinguished: one coaxing and soothing,
 which he considers is modelled upon the mother, and another threatening,
 which is derived from the father.[59] Now the command to sleep in
 hypnosis means nothing more nor less than an order to withdraw all
 interest from the world and to concentrate it upon the person of the
 hypnotist. And it is so understood by the subject; for in this
 withdrawal of interest from the outer world lies the psychological
 characteristic of sleep, and the kinship between sleep and the state of
 hypnosis is based upon it.
 
 By the measures that he takes, then, the hypnotist awakens in the
 subject a portion of his archaic inheritance which had also made him
 compliant towards his parents and which had experienced an individual
 re-animation in his relation to his father; what is thus awakened is the
 idea of a paramount and dangerous personality, towards whom only a
 passive-masochistic attitude is possible, to whom one's will has to be
 surrendered,--while to be alone with him, 'to look him in the face',
 appears a hazardous enterprise. It is only in some such way as this that
 we can picture the relation of the individual member of the primal horde
 to the primal father. As we know from other reactions, individuals have
 preserved a variable degree of personal aptitude for reviving old
 situations of this kind. Some knowledge that in spite of everything
 hypnosis is only a game, a deceptive renewal of these old impressions,
 may however remain behind and take care that there is a resistance
 against any too serious consequences of the suspension of the will in
 hypnosis.
 
 The uncanny and coercive characteristics of group formations, which are
 shown in their suggestion phenomena, may therefore with justice be
 traced back to the fact of their origin from the primal horde. The
 leader of the group is still the dreaded primal father; the group still
 wishes to be governed by unrestricted force; it has an extreme passion
 for authority; in Le Bon's phrase, it has a thirst for obedience. The
 primal father is the group ideal, which governs the ego in the place of
 the ego ideal. Hypnosis has a good claim to being described as a group
 of two; there remains as a definition for suggestion--a conviction which
 is not based upon perception and reasoning but upon an erotic tie.[60]
 
 
 
 
 XI
 
 A DIFFERENTIATING GRADE IN THE EGO
 
 
 If we survey the life of an individual man of to-day, bearing in mind
 the mutually complementary accounts of group psychology given by the
 authorities, we may lose the courage, in face of the complications that
 are revealed, to attempt a comprehensive exposition. Each individual is
 a component part of numerous groups, he is bound by ties of
 identification in many directions, and he has built up his ego ideal
 upon the most various models. Each individual therefore has a share in
 numerous group minds--those of his race, of his class, of his creed, of
 his nationality, etc.--and he can also raise himself above them to the
 extent of having a scrap of independence and originality. Such stable
 and lasting group formations, with their uniform and constant effects,
 are less striking to an observer than the rapidly formed and transient
 groups from which Le Bon has made his brilliant psychological character
 sketch of the group mind. And it is just in these noisy ephemeral
 groups, which are as it were superimposed upon the others, that we are
 met by the prodigy of the complete, even though only temporary,
 disappearance of exactly what we have recognized as individual
 acquirements.
 
 We have interpreted this prodigy as meaning that the individual gives up
 his ego ideal and substitutes for it the group ideal as embodied in the
 leader. And we must add by way of correction that the prodigy is not
 equally great in every case. In many individuals the separation between
 the ego and the ego ideal is not very far advanced; the two still
 coincide readily; the ego has often preserved its earlier
 self-complacency. The selection of the leader is very much facilitated
 by this circumstance. He need only possess the typical qualities of the
 individuals concerned in a particularly clearly marked and pure form,
 and need only give an impression of greater force and of more freedom of
 libido; and in that case the need for a strong chief will often meet him
 half-way and invest him with a predominance to which he would otherwise
 perhaps have had no claim. The other members of the group, whose ego
 ideal would not, apart from this, have become embodied in his person
 without some correction, are then carried away with the rest by
 'suggestion', that is to say, by means of identification.
 
 We are aware that what we have been able to contribute towards the
 explanation of the libidinal structure of groups leads back to the
 distinction between the ego and the ego ideal and to the double kind of
 tie which this makes possible--identification, and substitution of the
 object for the ego ideal. The assumption of this kind of differentiating
 grade [_Stufe_] in the ego as a first step in an analysis of the ego
 must gradually establish its justification in the most various regions
 of psychology. In my paper 'Zur Einfuehrung des Narzissmus' I have put
 together all the pathological material that could at the moment be used
 in support of this separation. But it may be expected that when we
 penetrate deeper into the psychology of the psychoses its significance
 will be discovered to be far greater. Let us reflect that the ego now
 appears in the relation of an object to the ego ideal which has been
 developed out of it, and that all the interplay between an outer object
 and the ego as a whole, with which our study of the neuroses has made us
 acquainted, may possibly be repeated upon this new scene of action
 inside the ego.
 
 In this place I shall only follow up one of the consequences which seem
 possible from this point of view, thus resuming the discussion of a
 problem which I was obliged to leave unsolved elsewhere.[61] Each of the
 mental differentiations that we have become acquainted with represents a
 fresh aggravation of the difficulties of mental functioning, increases
 its instability, and may become the starting-point for its breakdown,
 that is, for the onset of a disease. Thus, by being born we have made
 the step from an absolutely self-sufficient narcissism to the perception
 of a changing outer world and to the beginnings of the discovery of
 objects. And with this is associated the fact that we cannot endure the
 new state of things for long, that we periodically revert from it, in
 our sleep, to our former condition of absence of stimulation and
 avoidance of objects. It is true, however, that in this we are following
 a hint from the outer world, which, by means of the periodical change of
 day and night, temporarily withdraws the greater part of the stimuli
 that affect us. The second example, which is pathologically more
 important, is not subject to any such qualification. In the course of
 our development we have effected a separation of our mental existence
 into a coherent ego and into an unconscious and repressed portion which
 is left outside it; and we know that the stability of this new
 acquisition is exposed to constant shocks. In dreams and in neuroses
 what is thus excluded knocks for admission at the gates, guarded though
 they are by resistances; and in our waking health we make use of special
 artifices for allowing what is repressed to circumvent the resistances
 and for receiving it temporarily into our ego to the increase of our
 pleasure. Wit and humour, and to some extent the comic in general, may
 be regarded in this light. Everyone acquainted with the psychology of
 the neuroses will think of similar examples of less importance; but I
 hasten on to the application I have in view.
 
 It is quite conceivable that the separation of the ego ideal from the
 ego cannot be borne for long either, and has to be temporarily undone.
 In all renunciations and limitations imposed upon the ego a periodical
 infringement of the prohibition is the rule; this indeed is shown by the
 institution of festivals, which in origin are nothing more nor less than
 excesses provided by law and which owe their cheerful character to the
 release which they bring.[62] The Saturnalia of the Romans and our
 modern carnival agree in this essential feature with the festivals of
 primitive people, which usually end in debaucheries of every kind and
 the transgression of what are at other times the most sacred
 commandments. But the ego ideal comprises the sum of all the limitations
 in which the ego has to acquiesce, and for that reason the abrogation of
 the ideal would necessarily be a magnificent festival for the ego, which
 might then once again feel satisfied with itself.[63]
 
 There is always a feeling of triumph when something in the ego coincides
 with the ego ideal. And the sense of guilt (as well as the sense of
 inferiority) can also be understood as an expression of tension between
 the ego and the ego ideal.
 
 It is well known that there are people the general colour of whose mood
 oscillates periodically from an excessive depression through some kind
 of intermediate state to an exalted sense of well-being. These
 oscillations appear in very different degrees of amplitude, from what is
 just noticeable to those extreme instances which, in the shape of
 melancholia and mania, make the most painful or disturbing inroads upon
 the life of the person concerned. In typical cases of this cyclical
 depression outer exciting causes do not seem to play any decisive part;
 as regards inner motives, nothing more (or nothing different) is to be
 found in these patients than in all others. It has consequently become
 the custom to consider these cases as not being psychogenic. We shall
 refer later on to those other exactly similar cases of cyclical
 depression which can nevertheless easily be traced back to mental
 traumata.
 
 Thus the foundation of these spontaneous oscillations of mood is
 unknown; we are without insight into the mechanism of the displacement
 of a melancholia by a mania. So we are free to suppose that these
 patients are people in whom our conjecture might find an actual
 application--their ego ideal might be temporarily resolved into their
 ego after having previously ruled it with especial strictness.
 
 Let us keep to what is clear: On the basis of our analysis of the ego it
 cannot be doubted that in cases of mania the ego and the ego ideal have
 fused together, so that the person, in a mood of triumph and
 self-satisfaction, disturbed by no self-criticism, can enjoy the
 abolition of his inhibitions, his feelings of consideration for others,
 and his self-reproaches. It is not so obvious, but nevertheless very
 probable, that the misery of the melancholiac is the expression of a
 sharp conflict between the two faculties of his ego, a conflict in which
 the ideal, in an excess of sensitiveness, relentlessly exhibits its
 condemnation of the ego in delusions of inferiority and in
 self-depreciation. The only question is whether we are to look for the
 causes of these altered relations between the ego and the ego ideal in
 the periodic rebellions, which we have postulated above, against the new
 institution, or whether we are to make other circumstances responsible
 for them.
 
 A change into mania is not an indispensable feature of the
 symptomatology of melancholic depression. There are simple melancholias,
 some in single and some in recurring attacks, which never show this
 development. On the other hand there are melancholias in which the
 exciting cause clearly plays an aetiological part. They are those which
 occur after the loss of a loved object, whether by death or as a result
 of circumstances which have necessitated the withdrawal of the libido
 from the object. A psychogenic melancholia of this sort can end in
 mania, and this cycle can be repeated several times, just as easily as
 in a case which appears to be spontaneous. Thus the state of things is
 somewhat obscure, especially as only a few forms and cases of
 melancholia have been submitted to psycho-analytical investigation.[64]
 So far we only understand those cases in which the object is given up
 because it has shown itself unworthy of love. It is then set up again
 inside the ego, by means of identification, and severely condemned by
 the ego ideal. The reproaches and attacks directed towards the object
 come to light in the shape of melancholic self-reproaches.[65]
 
 A melancholia of this kind may also end in a change to mania; so that
 the possibility of this happening represents a feature which is
 independent of the other characteristics in the symptomatology.
 
 Nevertheless I see no difficulty in assigning to the factor of the
 periodical rebellion of the ego against the ego ideal a share in both
 kinds of melancholia, the psychogenic as well as the spontaneous. In the
 spontaneous kind it may be supposed that the ego ideal is inclined to
 display a peculiar strictness, which then results automatically in its
 temporary suspension. In the psychogenic kind the ego would be incited
 to rebellion by ill-treatment on the part of its ideal--an ill-treatment
 which it encounters when there has been identification with a rejected
 object.
 
 
 
 
 XII
 
 POSTSCRIPT
 
 
 In the course of the enquiry which has just been brought to a
 provisional end we came across a number of side-paths which we avoided
 pursuing in the first instance but in which there was much that offered
 us promises of insight. We propose now to take up a few of the points
 that have been left on one side in this way.
 
 A. The distinction between identification of the ego with an object and
 replacement of the ego ideal by an object finds an interesting
 illustration in the two great artificial groups which we began by
 studying, the army and the Christian church.
 
 It is obvious that a soldier takes his superior, that is, really, the
 leader of the army, as his ideal, while he identifies himself with his
 equals, and derives from this community of their egos the obligations
 for giving mutual help and for sharing possessions which comradeship
 implies. But he becomes ridiculous if he tries to identify himself with
 the general. The soldier in _Wallensteins Lager_ laughs at the sergeant
 for this very reason:
 
     Wie er raeuspert und wie er spuckt,
     Das habt ihr ihm gluecklich abgeguckt![66]
 
 It is otherwise in the Catholic Church. Every Christian loves Christ as
 his ideal and feels himself united with all other Christians by the tie
 of identification. But the Church requires more of him. He has also to
 identify himself with Christ and love all other Christians as Christ
 loved them. At both points, therefore, the Church requires that the
 position of the libido which is given by a group formation should be
 supplemented. Identification has to be added where object-choice has
 taken place, and object love where there is identification. This
 addition evidently goes beyond the constitution of the group. One can be
 a good Christian and yet be far from the idea of putting oneself in
 Christ's place and of having like him an all-embracing love for mankind.
 One need not think oneself capable, weak mortal that one is, of the
 Saviour's largeness of soul and strength of love. But this further
 development in the distribution of libido in the group is probably the
 factor upon which Christianity bases its claim to have reached a higher
 ethical level.
 
 B. We have said that it would be possible to specify the point in the
 mental development of man at which the advance from group to individual
 psychology was also achieved by the individual members of the group.[67]
 
 For this purpose we must return for a moment to the scientific myth of
 the father of the primal horde. He was later on exalted into the creator
 of the world, and with justice, for he had produced all the sons who
 composed the first group. He was the ideal of each one of them, at once
 feared and honoured, a fact which led later to the idea of taboo. These
 many individuals eventually banded themselves together, killed him and
 cut him in pieces. None of the group of victors could take his place,
 or, if one of them did, the battles began afresh, until they understood
 that they must all renounce their father's heritage. They then formed
 the totemistic community of brothers, all with equal rights and united
 by the totem prohibitions which were to preserve and to expiate the
 memory of the murder. But the dissatisfaction with what had been
 achieved still remained, and it became the source of new developments.
 The persons who were united in this group of brothers gradually came
 towards a revival of the old state of things at a new level. Man became
 once more the chief of a family, and broke down the prerogatives of the
 gynaecocracy which had become established during the fatherless period.
 As a compensation for this he may at that time have acknowledged the
 mother deities, whose priests were castrated for the mother's
 protection, after the example that had been given by the father of the
 primal horde. And yet the new family was only a shadow of the old one;
 there were numbers of fathers and each one was limited by the rights of
 the others.
 
 It was then, perhaps, that some individual, in the exigency of his
 longing, may have been moved to free himself from the group and take
 over the father's part. He who did this was the first epic poet; and the
 advance was achieved in his imagination. This poet disguised the truth
 with lies in accordance with his longing. He invented the heroic myth.
 The hero was a man who by himself had slain the father--the father who
 still appeared in the myth as a totemistic monster. Just as the father
 had been the boy's first ideal, so in the hero who aspires to the
 father's place the poet now created the first ego ideal. The transition
 to the hero was probably afforded by the youngest son, the mother's
 favourite, whom she had protected from paternal jealousy, and who, in
 the era of the primal horde, had been the father's successor. In the
 lying poetic fancies of prehistoric times the woman, who had been the
 prize of battle and the allurement to murder, was probably turned into
 the seducer and instigator to the crime.
 
 The hero claims to have acted alone in accomplishing the deed, which
 certainly only the horde as a whole would have ventured upon. But, as
 Rank has observed, fairy tales have preserved clear traces of the facts
 which were disavowed. For we often find in them that the hero who has to
 carry out some difficult task (usually a youngest son, and not
 infrequently one who has represented himself to the father surrogate as
 being stupid, that is to say, harmless)--we often find, then, that this
 hero can carry out his task only by the help of a crowd of small
 animals, such as bees or ants. These would be the brothers in the primal
 horde, just as in the same way in dream symbolism insects or vermin
 signify brothers and sisters (contemptuously, considered as babies).
 Moreover every one of the tasks in myths and fairy tales is easily
 recognisable as a substitute for the heroic deed.
 
 The myth, then, is the step by which the individual emerges from group
 psychology. The first myth was certainly the psychological, the hero
 myth; the explanatory nature myth must have followed much later. The
 poet who had taken this step and had in this way set himself free from
 the group in his imagination, is nevertheless able (as Rank has further
 observed) to find his way back to it in reality. For he goes and relates
 to the group his hero's deeds which he has invented. At bottom this hero
 is no one but himself. Thus he lowers himself to the level of reality,
 and raises his hearers to the level of imagination. But his hearers
 understand the poet, and, in virtue of their having the same relation of
 longing towards the primal father, they can identify themselves with the
 hero.[68]
 
 The lie of the heroic myth culminates in the deification of the hero.
 Perhaps the deified hero may have been earlier than the Father God and
 may have been a precursor to the return of the primal father as a deity.
 The series of gods, then, would run chronologically: Mother
 Goddess--Hero--Father God. But it is only with the elevation of the
 never forgotten primal father that the deity acquires the features that
 we still recognise in him to-day.[69]
 
 C. A great deal has been said in this paper about directly sexual
 instincts and those that are inhibited in their aims, and it may be
 hoped that this distinction will not meet with too much resistance. But
 a detailed discussion of the question will not be out of place, even if
 it only repeats what has to a great extent already been said before.
 
 The development of the libido in children has made us acquainted with
 the first but also the best example of sexual instincts which are
 inhibited in their aims. All the feelings which a child has towards its
 parents and those who look after it pass by an easy transition into the
 wishes which give expression to the child's sexual tendencies. The child
 claims from these objects of its love all the signs of affection which
 it knows of; it wants to kiss them, touch them, and look at them; it is
 curious to see their genitals, and to be with them when they perform
 their intimate excremental functions; it promises to marry its mother or
 nurse--whatever it may understand by that; it proposes to itself to bear
 its father a child, etc. Direct observation, as well as the subsequent
 analytic investigation of the residue of childhood, leave no doubt as to
 the complete fusion of tender and jealous feelings and of sexual
 intentions, and show us in what a fundamental way the child makes the
 person it loves into the object of all its incompletely centred sexual
 tendencies.[70]
 
 This first configuration of the child's love, which in typical cases is
 co-ordinated with the Oedipus complex, succumbs, as we know, from the
 beginning of the period of latency onwards to a wave of repression. Such
 of it as is left over shows itself as a purely tender emotional tie,
 which relates to the same people, but is no longer to be described as
 'sexual'. Psycho-analysis, which illuminates the depths of mental life,
 has no difficulty in showing that the sexual ties of the earliest years
 of childhood also persist, though repressed and unconscious. It gives us
 courage to assert that wherever we come across a tender feeling it is
 the successor to a completely 'sensual' object tie with the person in
 question or rather with that person's prototype (or _imago_). It cannot
 indeed disclose to us without a special investigation whether in a given
 case this former complete sexual current still exists under repression
 or whether it has already been exhausted. To put it still more
 precisely: it is quite certain that it is still there as a form and
 possibility, and can always be charged with cathectic energy and put
 into activity again by means of regression; the only question is (and it
 cannot always be answered) what degree of cathexis and operative force
 it still has at the present moment. Equal care must be taken in this
 connection to avoid two sources of error--the Scylla of under-estimating
 the importance of the repressed unconscious, and the Charybdis of
 judging the normal entirely by the standards of the pathological.
 
 A psychology which will not or cannot penetrate the depths of what is
 repressed regards tender emotional ties as being invariably the
 expression of tendencies which have no sexual aim, even though they are
 derived from tendencies which have such an aim.[71]
 
 We are justified in saying that they have been diverted from these
 sexual aims, even though there is some difficulty in giving a
 representation of such a diversion of aim which will conform to the
 requirements of metapsychology. Moreover, those instincts which are
 inhibited in their aims always preserve some few of their original
 sexual aims; even an affectionate devotee, even a friend or an admirer,
 desires the physical proximity and the sight of the person who is now
 loved only in the 'Pauline' sense. If we choose, we may recognise in
 this diversion of aim a beginning of the _sublimation_ of the sexual
 instincts, or on the other hand we may fix the limits of sublimation at
 some more distant point. Those sexual instincts which are inhibited in
 their aims have a great functional advantage over those which are
 uninhibited. Since they are not capable of really complete
 satisfaction, they are especially adapted to create permanent ties;
 while those instincts which are directly sexual incur a loss of energy
 each time they are satisfied, and must wait to be renewed by a fresh
 accumulation of sexual libido, so that meanwhile the object may have
 been changed. The inhibited instincts are capable of any degree of
 admixture with the uninhibited; they can be transformed back into them,
 just as they arose out of them. It is well known how easily erotic
 wishes develop out of emotional relations of a friendly character, based
 upon appreciation and admiration, (compare Moliere's 'Embrassez-moi pour
 l'amour du grec'), between a master and a pupil, between a performer and
 a delighted listener, and especially in the case of women. In fact the
 growth of emotional ties of this kind, with their purposeless
 beginnings, provides a much frequented pathway to sexual object-choice.
 Pfister, in his _Froemmigkeit des Grafen von Zinzendorf_,[72] has given
 an extremely clear and certainly not an isolated example of how easily
 even an intense religious tie can revert to ardent sexual excitement. On
 the other hand it is also very usual for directly sexual tendencies,
 short-lived in themselves, to be transformed into a lasting and purely
 tender tie; and the consolidation of a passionate love marriage rests
 to a large extent upon this process.
 
 We shall naturally not be surprised to hear that the sexual tendencies
 that are inhibited in their aims arise out of the directly sexual ones
 when inner or outer obstacles make the sexual aims unattainable. The
 repression during the period of latency is an inner obstacle of this
 kind--or rather one which has become inner. We have assumed that the
 father of the primal horde owing to his sexual intolerance compelled all
 his sons to be abstinent, and thus forced them into ties that were
 inhibited in their aims, while he reserved for himself freedom of sexual
 enjoyment and in this way remained without ties. All the ties upon which
 a group depends are of the character of instincts that are inhibited in
 their aims. But here we have approached the discussion of a new subject,
 which deals with the relation between directly sexual instincts and the
 formation of groups.
 
 D. The last two remarks will have prepared us for finding that directly
 sexual tendencies are unfavourable to the formation of groups. In the
 history of the development of the family there have also, it is true,
 been group relations of sexual love (group marriages); but the more
 important sexual love became for the ego, and the more it developed the
 characteristics of being in love, the more urgently it required to be
 limited to two people--_una cum uno_--as is prescribed by the nature of
 the genital aim. Polygamous inclinations had to be content to find
 satisfaction in a succession of changing objects.
 
 Two people coming together for the purpose of sexual satisfaction, in so
 far as they seek for solitude, are making a demonstration against the
 herd instinct, the group feeling. The more they are in love, the more
 completely they suffice for each other. The rejection of the group's
 influence is manifested in the shape of a sense of shame. The extremely
 violent feelings of jealousy are summoned up in order to protect the
 sexual object-choice from being encroached upon by a group tie. It is
 only when the tender, that is, the personal, factor of a love relation
 gives place entirely to the sensual one, that it is possible for two
 people to have sexual intercourse in the presence of others or for there
 to be simultaneous sexual acts in a group as occurs at an orgy. But at
 that point a regression has taken place to an early stage in sexual
 relations, at which being in love as yet played no part, and all sexual
 objects were judged to be of equal value, somewhat in the sense of
 Bernard Shaw's malicious aphorism to the effect that being in love means
 greatly exaggerating the difference between one woman and another.
 
 There are abundant indications that being in love only made its
 appearance late on in the sexual relations between men and women; so
 that the opposition between sexual love and group ties is also a late
 development. Now it may seem as though this assumption were incompatible
 with our myth of the primal family. For it was after all by their love
 for their mothers and sisters that the troop of brothers was, as we have
 supposed, driven to parricide; and it is difficult to imagine this love
 as being anything but unbroken and primitive--that is, as an intimate
 union of the tender and the sensual. But further consideration resolves
 this objection into a confirmation. One of the reactions to the
 parricide was after all the institution of totemistic exogamy; the
 prohibition of any sexual relation with those women of the family who
 had been tenderly loved since childhood. In this way a wedge was driven
 in between a man's tender and sensual feelings, one still firmly fixed
 in his erotic life to-day.[73] As a result of this exogamy the sensual
 needs of men had to be satisfied with strange and unloved women.
 
 In the great artificial groups, the church and the army, there is no
 room for woman as a sexual object. The love relation between men and
 women remains outside these organisations. Even where groups are formed
 which are composed of both men and women the distinction between the
 sexes plays no part. There is scarcely any sense in asking whether the
 libido which keeps groups together is of a homosexual or of a
 heterosexual nature, for it is not differentiated according to the
 sexes, and particularly shows a complete disregard for the aims of the
 genital organisation of the libido.
 
 Even in a person who has in other respects become absorbed in a group
 the directly sexual tendencies preserve a little of his individual
 activity. If they become too strong they disintegrate every group
 formation. The Catholic Church had the best of motives for recommending
 its followers to remain unmarried and for imposing celibacy upon its
 priests; but falling in love has often driven even priests to leave the
 church. In the same way love for women breaks through the group ties of
 race, of national separation, and of the social class system, and it
 thus produces important effects as a factor in civilization. It seems
 certain that homosexual love is far more compatible with group ties,
 even when it takes the shape of uninhibited sexual tendencies--a
 remarkable fact, the explanation of which might carry us far.
 
 The psycho-analytic investigation of the psycho-neuroses has taught us
 that their symptoms are to be traced back to directly sexual tendencies
 which are repressed but still remain active. We can complete this
 formula by adding to it: or, to tendencies inhibited in their aims,
 whose inhibition has not been entirely successful or has made room for
 a return to the repressed sexual aim. It is in accordance with this that
 a neurosis should make its victim asocial and should remove him from the
 usual group formations. It may be said that a neurosis has the same
 disintegrating effect upon a group as being in love. On the other hand
 it appears that where a powerful impetus has been given to group
 formation, neuroses may diminish and at all events temporarily
 disappear. Justifiable attempts have also been made to turn this
 antagonism between neuroses and group formation to therapeutic account.
 Even those who do not regret the disappearance of religious illusions
 from the civilized world of to-day will admit that so long as they were
 in force they offered those who were bound by them the most powerful
 protection against the danger of neurosis. Nor is it hard to discern in
 all the ties with mystico-religious or philosophico-religious sects and
 communities the manifestation of distorted cures of all kinds of
 neuroses. All of this is bound up with the contrast between directly
 sexual tendencies and those which are inhibited in their aims.
 
 If he is left to himself, a neurotic is obliged to replace by his own
 symptom formations the great group formations from which he is excluded.
 He creates his own world of imagination for himself, his religion, his
 own system of delusions, and thus recapitulates the institutions of
 humanity in a distorted way which is clear evidence of the dominating
 part played by the directly sexual tendencies.[74]
 
 E. In conclusion, we will add a comparative estimate, from the
 standpoint of the libido theory, of the states with which we have been
 concerned, of being in love, of hypnosis, of group formation, and of the
 neurosis.
 
 _Being in love_ is based upon the simultaneous presence of directly
 sexual tendencies and of sexual tendencies that are inhibited in their
 aims, so that the object draws a part of the narcissistic ego-libido to
 itself. It is a condition in which there is only room for the ego and
 the object.
 
 _Hypnosis_ resembles being in love in being limited to these two
 persons, but it is based entirely upon sexual tendencies that are
 inhibited in their aims and substitutes the object for the ego ideal.
 
 _The group_ multiplies this process; it agrees with hypnosis in the
 nature of the instincts which hold it together, and in the replacement
 of the ego ideal by the object; but to this it adds identification with
 other individuals, which was perhaps originally made possible by their
 having the same relation to the object.
 
 Both states, hypnosis and group formation, are an inherited deposit from
 the phylogenesis of the human libido--hypnosis in the form of a
 predisposition, and the group, besides this, as a direct survival. The
 replacement of the directly sexual tendencies by those that are
 inhibited in their aims promotes in both states a separation between the
 ego and the ego ideal, a separation with which a beginning has already
 been made in the state of being in love.
 
 _The neurosis_ stands outside this series. It also is based upon a
 peculiarity in the development of the human libido--the twice repeated
 start made by the directly sexual function, with an intervening period
 of latency.[75] To this extent it resembles hypnosis and group formation
 in having the character of a regression, which is absent from being in
 love. It makes its appearance wherever the advance from directly sexual
 instincts to those that are inhibited in their aims has not been
 completely successful; and it represents a _conflict_ between those
 instincts which have been received into the ego after having passed
 through this development and those portions of the same instincts which,
 like other instinctive desires that have been completely repressed,
 strive, from the repressed unconscious, to attain direct satisfaction.
 The neurosis is extraordinarily rich in content, for it embraces all
 possible relations between the ego and the object--both those in which
 the object is retained and others in which it is abandoned or erected
 inside the ego itself--and also the conflicting relations between the
 ego and its ego ideal.
 
 
 
 
 INDEX
 
 
 _Abraham_, 62, 108.
 
 Affectivity. _See under_ Emotion.
 
 Altruism, 57.
 
 Ambivalence, 18, 55, 61.
 
 Anaclitic type, 60.
 
 Archaic inheritance, 10, 99.
 
 Army 42-6, 89, 94, 110, 122.
 
 Autistic mental acts, 2.
 
 
 _Bernheim_, 35, 100
 
 _Bleuler_, 2.
 
 Brothers, 43, 114.
   in Christ, 43.
   Community of, 90, 112, 122.
 
 _Brugeilles_, 34.
 
 
 _Caesar_, 44.
 
 Cathexis, 18, 20, 28, 117.
   Object-, 48, 58, 60-1, 71-2, 76.
 
 Catholic Church, 42-3, 111, 123.
 
 Celibacy of priests, 123.
 
 Censorship of dreams, 16, 69.
 
 Chieftains, Mana in, 96.
 
 Children, 14, 16, 18-19, 30, 67 82, 91.
   Dread in, 83, 85-6.
   Parents and, 54, 86, 116.
   Sexual object of, 72, 116.
   Unconscious of, 18.
 
 _Christ_, 42-5, 50, 111.
   Equal love of, 50.
   Identification with, 111.
 
 Church, 42-3, 89, 94, 110-11, 122-3.
 
 Commander-in-Chief, 42-5.
 
 Conflict, 18, 107, 126.
 
 Conscience, 10, 28, 68-9, 75, 79
   Social, 88.
 
 Contagion, Emotional, 10-13, 27, 34-5, 46-7.
 
 Crowd, 1, 3, 26, 92.
 
 
 Danger, Effect on groups, 46-9.
 
 _Darwin_, 90.
 
 Delusions:
   of inferiority, 107.
   of observation, 69.
 
 Devotion to abstract idea, 17, 75.
 
 Doubt:
   absence in groups, 15-16
   interpretation in dreams, 15-16.
 
 Dread:
   Children's, 83, 85-6.
   in a group, 46-8, 50.
   in an individual, 47-8.
   Neurotic, 48.
   of society, 10.
   Panic, 45-9.
 
 Dream, 20, 69, 104.
   Interpretation of doubt and uncertainty in, 15-16.
   symbolism, 114.
 
 Duty, Sense of, 84, 88, 95.
 
 
 Ego, 10, 18-19, 62-70, 74, 84, 93, 100-9, 120, 125-7.
   Relations between ego ideal and, 68-70, 103, 105-10.
   Relations between object and, 62-70, 74-6, 108-10.
 
 Ego ideal, 68-70, 74-7, 80, 100-3, 105-10, 113, 126-7.
   Abrogation of the, 105.
   Hypnotist in the place of, 77.
   Object as substitute for, 74-6, 80, 103, 110.
   Relations between ego and, 68-70, 103, 105-10.
   Testing reality of things, 77.
   The first, 113.
 
 Egoism, 57.
 
 Emotion:
   Ambivalent, 18, 55.
   Charge of, 28.
   Contagion of. _See_ Contagion.
   Intensification of, in groups, 16, 23, 27-30, 33, 46, 81.
   Primitive induction of, 27, 34, 46-7.
   Tender, 72-3, 78, 116-17.
 
 Emotional tie, 40, 43, 45, 52-3, 59-60, 64-5, 81, 88, 91, 94, 100, 117-20.
   Cessation of, 46-9.
 
 Empathy, relation to identification, 66, 70.
 
 Enthusiasm, in groups, 25.
 
 Envy, 87-8.
 
 Equality, demand for, 88, 89.
 
 Eros, 38-40.
 
 Esprit de corps, origin of, 87.
 
 Ethical:
   conduct of a group, 18.
   level of Christianity, 111.
   standards of individual, 24-5.
 
 
 Fairy tales, the hero in, 114.
 
 Family, 70, 95, 100, 113, 120.
   a group formation, 95.
   and Christian community, 43.
   and social instinct, 3.
   Primal, 122.
 
 Fascination, 11, 13, 21, 75.
 
 Father, 43, 92, 98-9.
   Equal love of, 95.
   God, 115.
   Identification with, 60-2.
   Object tie with, 62.
   Primal, 92, 94-5, 99-100, 112-13, 115, 120.
     Deification of, 93, 115.
     Killing the, 94, 112-13, 122.
   Surrogate, 43, 114.
 
 _Federn, P._, 50.
 
 _Felszeghy, Bela v._, 48.
 
 _Ferenczi_, 76, 98.
 
 Festivals, 105.
 
 Folk-lore, 25.
 
 Folk-song, 25.
 
 French Revolution, 26.
 
 Function:
   for testing reality, 20, 77.
   (Instanz), 15.
 
 
 Gemeingeist, origin of, 87.
 
 Genital organisation, 19.
 
 God, 85, 96.
   Father, 115.
 
 Gregariousness, 83-4, 92.
 
 Group:
   Artificial, 41-2, 52, 82, 89, 94, 110, 122.
   Different kinds of, 26, 41.
   Disintegration of, 49-51.
   Dread in, 47.
   Equality in, 89.
   feeling, 86-7, 121.
   Heightened affectivity in. _See under_ Emotion.
   ideal, 100, 102.
   Intellectual capacity of, 14, 18, 23, 25, 29, 31, 33, 81.
   Intensification of emotion in. _See under_ Emotion.
   Leaders of. _See under_ Leader.
   Libidinal structure of, 37, 40, 44-5, 47, 51, 53-4, 70, 79-80, 102-3.
   marriages, 120.
   Mental change of the individual in, 6-14, 33-4, 45, 56, 81, 102.
   mind, 3, 5-27, 40, 49, 82.
   Organisation in, 26, 30-1, 33, 41-2, 80, 82, 90.
   Primitive, 31, 33, 41, 80.
   psychological character of, 6-32.
   psychology, 1-4, 6, 25-6, 33-4, 37, 45, 53, 59, 92-4, 101, 112, 114.
   Revolutionary, 26.
   Sexual instincts and, 120.
   spirit, 37.
   Stable, 26, 41, 84, 101.
   Suggestibility of, 11, 13, 35, 84-5.
   Transient, 25, 41, 84, 101.
 
 Guilt, Sense of, 20, 63, 65, 84, 106.
 
 Gynaecocracy, 113.
 
 
 Hatred, 53, 56.
 
 _Hebbel_, 49.
 
 Herd, 83-5, 89.
   instinct, 3, 83-6, 105, 121.
 
 Hero, 17, 113-15.
 
 Homosexuality, 57, 66-7, 94, 123.
 
 Horde Primal, 89-95, 99, 113-14, 120.
   Father of the. _See under_ Father.
 
 Hypnosis, 10-13, 20-1, 77-9, 81, 95-100, 125-6.
   a group of two, 78, 100.
   and sleep, 79, 98.
   of terror, 79.
 
 Hypnotist, 13, 77, 95-9.
 
 Hysteria, Identification in, 63-5.
 
 
 Idealisation, 74.
   Identification, 59-70, 75-6, 84, 86-9, 94, 101-3, 111, 125.
   Ambivalent, 61.
   in hysterical symptom, 63-5.
   Regression of object-choice to, 64.
   with a lost or rejected object, 67-8, 108-9.
   with Christ, 111.
   with the father, 60-2.
   with the hero, 115.
   with the leader, 110-11.
 
 Imitation, 34-5, 65, 70.
 
 Individual:
   a member of many groups, 101.
   Dread in, 47-8.
   Mental change in a group, 6-14, 33-4, 45, 56, 81, 102.
   Psychology, 1-2, 92-3, 112, 114.
 
 Induction of Emotion, 27, 34, 46-7.
 
 Infection, mental, 64-65.
 
 Inferiority, Delusions of, 57, 106-7.
 
 Inheritance, archaic, 10, 99.
 
 Inhibition:
   Collective, of intellectual functioning, 23, 33.
   Removal of, 17, 28, 33.
 
 Instinct:
   Herd, 3, 83-6, 105, 121.
   inhibited in aim, 72-3, 78, 115-26.
   Life and death, 56.
   Love, 37, 39, 58.
   Nutrition, 85.
   Primary, 84-5.
   Self-preservative, 34, 85.
   Sexual, 19, 39, 56, 71-8, 85-5, 94, 115-26.
   Social, 3.
   unhibited in aim, 73, 77-8, 94, 115-26.
   Unconscious, 10.
 
 Intellectual ability, lowering of,
   in groups, 14, 18, 23, 25, 29, 31, 33, 81.
 
 Introjection, of object into ego, 65, 67-8, 76.
 
 
 Jealousy, 121.
 
 
 Kings, Mana in, 96.
 
 _Kra[)s]kovi[)c], B. Jnr._, 23.
 
 _Kroeger_, 90.
 
 
 Language, 25, 38, 71.
 
 Latency, period of, 72, 117, 120, 126.
 
 Leader, 20-2, 41, 44-5, 78, 82, 85, 89, 92, 99, 110.
   Abstractions as substitutes for, 53.
   Equal love of, 93, 95.
   Identification with, 110-11.
   Killing the, 90.
   Loss of, 49.
   Negative, 53.
   Prestige of, 21-2.
   the group ideal, 100, 102, 110.
   Tie with, 49, 52, 66.
 
 _Le Bon_, 5-25, 29, 34, 82, 84, 100-1.
 
 Libidinal:
   structure of the group, 37, 40, 44-5, 47, 53, 70, 79-80, 102-3.
   The word, 44.
   ties, 44, 56-8, 65, 93, 100.
   in the group, 45, 51, 54.
 
 Libido, 33-40, 44, 57, 79, 83, 102, 111, 116, 119, 123, 126.
   Narcissistic, 58, 74, 93, 104, 125.
   Oral phase of, 61.
   theory, 57, 83, 125.
   Unification of, 19.
   Withdrawal of, 108.
 
 Love, 37-40, 42, 73, 87, 108, 122.
   a factor of civilisation, 57, 93.
   and character formation, 94, 118-20.
   and hatred, 56.
   Being in, 58, 71-9, 120-1, 124-6.
   Child's, 116-17.
   Christ's, 43.
   Equal, 42, 50, 89, 93.
   Pauline, 118.
   Self-. _See under_ Narcissism.
   Sensual, 71-3, 78, 117.
   Sexual, 37-8, 57, 120-2.
   Sublimated homosexual, 57.
   The word, 37-9, 71.
   Unhappy, 75.
   Unsensual, 73.
 
 
 _McDougall_, 1, 26-31, 34-6, 46-7, 49, 84.
 
 Magical power of words, 19.
 
 Magnetic influence, 11.
 
 Magnetism, animal, 96.
 
 Mana, 96.
 
 Mania, 106-9.
 
 _Marcuszewicz_, 68.
 
 Marriage, 54, 120.
 
 Melancholia, 68, 106-9.
 
 Metapsychology, 63, 118.
 
 _Moede, Walter_, 24.
 
 _Moliere_, 119.
 
 Morality, Totemism the origin of, 90.
 
 Mother deities, 113, 115.
 
 Multicellularity, 7, 32, 83.
 
 Myth, 113-15.
 
 
 _Nachmansohn_, 39.
 
 Names, Taboo upon, 19.
 
 _Napoleon_, 44.
 
 Narcissism, 2, 38, 54-8, 69, 74-5, 93, 94, 104.
 
 _Nestroy_, 49.
 
 Neurosis, 18, 20, 37, 44, 58, 63, 103-4, 123-26.
 
 _Nietzsche_, 93.
 
 Nutrition, Instinct of, 84.
 
 
 Object, 57-8, 62, 68, 74, 87, 93, 104, 125, 127.
   cathexis, 48, 58, 60-1, 71-2, 76.
   Change of, 18, 119, 121.
   Child's, 72.
   -choice, 54, 62, 64, 74, 111, 119, 121.
   Eating the, 61-62.
   Hyper-cathexis of, 76.
   Identification with ego, 108.
   Less or Renunciation of, 68, 108.
   -love, 56, 63, 74, 111.
   Relations with the ego, 65, 67-8, 70, 76.
   Sexual, 67, 72-3, 116.
   Substituted for ego ideal, 74, 80, 103, 125.
 
 Observation, delusions of, 69.
 
 Oedipus complex, 60-61, 63, 66, 117.
   Inverted, 62.
 
 Oral phase of organisation of the libido, 61.
 
 Organisation in groups, 26, 30-1, 33, 41-2, 80, 82, 90.
 
 Orgy, 121.
 
 
 Panic, 45-9.
 
 Pan-sexualism, 39.
 
 _Paul, Saint_, 39, 118.
 
 _Pfister_, 39, 119.
 
 _Plato_, 38.
 
 Poet, the first epic, 113-114.
 
 Power, 9, 15, 28.
   of leaders, 21.
   of words, 19.
 
 Prestige, 21-2, 34.
 
 Primitive peoples, 14, 18-19, 24, 92, 96, 105.
 
 Psycho-Analysis, 4, 7, 14, 18, 36, 38-9, 59-60, 84, 97.
 
 Psychology:
   Group, 1-4, 6, 25-6, 33-4, 37, 45, 53, 59, 92, 94, 101.
   Group and individual, 1-2, 92-93, 112, 114.
 
 Psychoses, 66, 103.
 
 Puberty, 67, 72-73.
 
 
 Races, repugnance between related, 55.
 
 _Rank, Otto_, 112, 114.
 
 Rapport, 97.
 
 Reality:
   Function for testing, 20, 77.
   Contrast between Objective and Psychological, 20.
 
 Regression, 82, 91, 117, 121, 126.
 
 Religion, 51, 90.
   Wars of, 51.
 
 Repressed:
   Sexual tendencies, 74, 117, 123-4.
   The, 10, 104, 117-18, 126.
 
 Repression, 9, 54, 64-5, 69, 72, 84, 95, 105, 117, 120.
 
 Resistance, 84, 104.
 
 Responsibility, Sense of, 9-10, 29-30.
 
 _Richter, Konrad_, 36.
 
 
 _Sachs, Hanns_, 16, 115.
 
 _Schopenhauer_, 54.
 
 Self-:
   consciousness, 30-1.
   depreciation, 107.
   love. _See under_ Narcissism.
   observation, 69.
   preservation, 15, 34, 84-5.
   sacrifice, 11, 38, 75.
 
 Sex, 39.
 
 Sexual:
   act, 92, 121.
   aims, 58, 72.
     Diversion of instinct from, 58.
     Infantile, 72.
     Obstacles to, 120.
   life, 19, 72.
   over-estimation, 53-5.
   Tendencies, Inhibited and uninhibited. 72-3, 77-8, 94, 115-16, 125-26.
   union, 37-8.
 
 _Shaw, Bernard_, 121.
 
 _Sidis, Boris_, 84
 
 _Sighele_, 24-5.
 
 _Simmel, E._, 44.
 
 Sleep, 98, 104.
   and hypnosis, 98.
 
 _Smith, Robertson_, 70.
 
 Social:
   duties, 88, 95.
   relations, 2-3, 57.
 
 Socialistic tie, 51.
 
 Society, 24, 26, 28, 90.
   Dread of, 10.
 
 Sociology. _See under_ Group Psychology.
 
 Speech, 84.
 
 Sublimated:
   devotion, 17, 75.
   homosexual love, 57.
 
 Sublimation, 118.
 
 Suggestibility, 11, 13, 35, 84-5.
 
 Suggestion, 12-13, 17, 29, 34-7, 40, 82, 95, 99, 102.
   Counter-, 35.
   Definition for, 100.
   Mutual, 12, 27, 34, 82.
 
 Superman, 93.
 
 
 Taboo, 19, 96, 112.
 
 _Tarde_, 34.
 
 Totemism, 90, 112-13.
 
 Totemistic:
   clan, 95.
   community of brothers, 112.
   exogamy, 122.
 
 Tradition, 17, 21.
   of the group, 31.
   of the individual, 32.
 
 Transference, 97-8.
 
 _Trotter_, 32, 83-5, 89, 105.
 
 
 Uncanniness, 95, 99.
 
 Uncertainty, absence in groups, 15-16.
   interpretation in dreams, 15-16.
 
 Unconscious, 8, 10, 12, 14-16, 18, 23-4, 64, 67, 72, 97, 100, 104.
   Groups led by, 14.
   instincts, 10.
   _Le Bon's_, 10, 14, 24.
   of children, 18, 117.
   of neurotics, 18.
   Racial, 9.
 
 
 _Wallenstein_, 44.
 
 War neuroses, 44.
 
 War, The, 44.
 
 _Wilson, President_, 44.
 
 Wishes, Affective cathexis of, 20.
 
 Words, magical power of, 19.
 
 
 
 
 THE INTERNATIONAL PSYCHO-ANALYTICAL LIBRARY. Edited by ERNEST JONES
 
      No. 1. ADDRESSES ON PSYCHO-ANALYSIS. BY J.J. Putnam, M.D. Emeritus
      Professor of Neurology, Harvard University. With a Preface by Sigm.
      Freud, M.D., LL.D.
 
      No. 2. PSYCHO-ANALYSIS AND THE WAR NEUROSES. By Drs. S. Ferenczi
      (Budapest), Karl Abraham (Berlin), Ernst Simmel (Berlin) and Ernest
      Jones (London). Introduction by Prof. Sigm. Freud (Vienna).
 
      No. 3. THE PSYCHO-ANALYTIC STUDY OF THE FAMILY. By J. C. Fluegel,
      B.A.
 
      No. 4. BEYOND THE PLEASURE PRINCIPLE. By Sigm. Freud M.D., LL.D.
      Authorized Translation from the second German Edition by C. J. M.
      Hubback.
 
      No. 5. ESSAYS IN APPLIED PSYCHO-ANALYSIS. By Ernest Jones M.D.
      President of the International Psycho-Analytical Association.
 
      No. 6. GROUP PSYCHOLOGY AND THE ANALYSIS OF THE EGO. By Sigm. Freud
      M.D., LL.D. Authorized Translation by James Strachey.
 
 
 THE INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF PSYCHO-ANALYSIS Directed by Sigm. Freud
 
 Official Organ of the INTERNATIONAL PSYCHO-ANALYTICAL ASSOCIATION
 
 Edited by Ernest Jones President of the Association
 
 With the Assistance of DOUGLAS BRYAN, J. C. FLUeGEL (London) A. A. BRILL,
 H. W. FRINK, C. P. OBERNDORF (New York)
 
 Issued Quarterly Subscription 30s. per Volume of Four Parts (c. 500 pp.)
 the parts not being sold separately.
 
 
 THE INTERNATIONAL PSYCHO-ANALYTICAL PRESS
 
 Printed by K. Liebel in Vienna, II. Grosse Mohrengasse 23
 
 
 FOOTNOTES:
 
 [1] ['Group' is used throughout this translation as equivalent to the
 rather more comprehensive German '_Masse_'. The author uses this latter
 word to render both McDougall's 'group', and also Le Bon's '_foule_',
 which would more naturally be translated 'crowd' in English. For the
 sake of uniformity, however, 'group' has been preferred in this case as
 well, and has been substituted for 'crowd' even in the extracts from the
 English translation of Le Bon.--_Translator._.]
 
 [2] _The Crowd: a Study of the Popular Mind._ Fisher Unwin 12th.
 Impression, 1920.
 
 [3] [See footnote page 1.]
 
 [4] [References are to the English translation.--_Translator._]
 
 [5] [The German translation of Le Bon, quoted by the author, reads
 '_bewusster_'; the English translation has 'unconscious'; and the
 original French text '_inconscients_'.--_Translator._]
 
 [6] [The English translation reads 'which we ourselves ignore'--a
 misunderstanding of the French word '_ignorees_'.--_Translator._]
 
 [7] There is some difference between Le Bon's view and ours owing to his
 concept of the unconscious not quite coinciding with the one adopted by
 psycho-analysis. Le Bon's unconscious more especially contains the most
 deeply buried features of the racial mind, which as a matter of fact
 lies outside the scope of psycho-analysis. We do not fail to recognize,
 indeed, that the ego's nucleus, which comprises the 'archaic
 inheritance' of the human mind, is unconscious; but in addition to this
 we distinguish the 'unconscious repressed', which arose from a portion
 of that inheritance. This concept of the repressed is not to be found in
 Le Bon.
 
 [8] Compare Schiller's couplet:
 
   Jeder, sieht man ihn einzeln, ist leidlich klug und verstaendig;
         Sind sie in corpore, gleich wird euch ein Dummkopf daraus.
   [Everyone, seen by himself, is passably shrewd and discerning;
         When they're _in corpore_, then straightway you'll find he's an ass.]
 
 
 [9] 'Unconscious' is used here correctly by Le Bon in the descriptive
 sense, where it does not only mean the 'repressed'.
 
 [10] Compare _Totem und Tabu_, III., 'Animismus, Magie, und Allmacht der
 Gedanken.' [_Totem and Taboo._ New York, Moffat, 1918. London, Kegan
 Paul, 1919.]
 
 [11] [See footnote p. 69.]
 
 [12] In the interpretation of dreams, to which, indeed, we owe our best
 knowledge of unconscious mental life, we follow a technical rule of
 disregarding doubt and uncertainty in the narrative of the dream, and of
 treating every element of the manifest dream as being quite certain. We
 attribute doubt and uncertainty to the influence of the censorship to
 which the dream-work is subjected, and we assume that the primary
 dream-thoughts are not acquainted with doubt and uncertainty as critical
 processes. They may naturally be present, like everything else, as part
 of the content of the day's residue which leads to the dream. (See _Die
 Traumdeutung_, 6. Auflage, 1921, S. 386. [_The Interpretation of
 Dreams._ Allen and Unwin, 3rd. Edition, 1913, p. 409.])
 
 [13] The same extreme and unmeasured intensification of every emotion is
 also a feature of the affective life of children, and it is present as
 well in dream life. Thanks to the isolation of the single emotions in
 the unconscious, a slight annoyance during the day will express itself
 in a dream as a wish for the offending person's death, or a breath of
 temptation may give the impetus to the portrayal in the dream of a
 criminal action. Hanns Sachs has made an appropriate remark on this
 point: 'If we try to discover in consciousness all that the dream has
 made known to us of its bearing upon the present (upon reality), we need
 not be surprised that what we saw as a monster under the microscope of
 analysis now reappears as an infusorium.' (_Die Traumdeutung_, S. 457.
 [Translation p. 493.])
 
 [14] In young children, for instance, ambivalent emotional attitudes
 towards those who are nearest to them exist side by side for a long
 time, without either of them interfering with the expression of the
 other and contrary one. If eventually a conflict breaks out between the
 two, it often settled by the child making a change of object and
 displacing one of the ambivalent emotions on to a substitute. The
 history of the development of a neurosis in an adult will also show that
 a suppressed emotion may frequently persist for a long time in
 unconscious or even in conscious phantasies, the content of which
 naturally runs directly counter to some predominant tendency, and yet
 that this antagonism does not result in any proceedings on the part of
 the ego against what it has repudiated. The phantasy is tolerated for
 quite a long time, until suddenly one day, usually as a result of an
 increase in the affective cathexis [see footnote page 48] of the
 phantasy, a conflict breaks out between it and the ego with all the
 usual consequences. In the process of a child's development into a
 mature adult there is a more and more extensive integration of its
 personality, a co-ordination of the separate instinctive feelings and
 desires which have grown up in him independently of one another. The
 analogous process in the domain of sexual life has long been known to us
 as the co-ordination of all the sexual instincts into a definitive
 genital organisation. (_Drei Abhandlungen zur Sexualtheorie_, 1905.
 [_Three Contributions to the Sexual Theory._ Nervous and Mental Disease
 Monograph Series, No. 7, 1910.]) Moreover, that the unification of the
 ego is liable to the same interferences as that of the libido is shown
 by numerous familiar instances, such as that of men of science who have
 preserved their faith in the Bible, and the like.
 
 [15] See Totem and Tabu.
 
 [16] [See footnote p. 48.]
 
 [17] B. Kra[)s]kovi[)c], jun.: _Die Psychologie der Kollektivitaeten_.
 Translated [into German] from the Croatian by Siegmund von Posavec.
 Vukovar, 1915. See the body of the work as well as the bibliography.
 
 [18] See Walter Moede: 'Die Massen-und Sozialpsychologie im kritischen
 Ueberblick.' Meumann and Scheibner's _Zeitschrift fuer paedagogische
 Psychologie und experimentelle Paedagogik_. 1915, XVI.
 
 [19] Cambridge University Press, 1920.
 
 [20] _Instincts of the Herd in Peace and War._ Fisher Unwin, 1916.
 
 [21] Brugeilles: 'L'essence du phenomena social: la suggestion.' _Revue
 philosophique_, 1913, XXV.
 
 [22] Konrad Richter: 'Der deutsche S. Christoph.' Berlin, 1896, _Acta
 Germanica_, V, I.
 
 [23] [Literally:"Christopher bore Christ; Christ bore the whole world;
 Say, where did Christopher then put his foot?']
 
 [24] Thus, McDougall: 'A Note on Suggestion.' _Journal of Neurology and
 Psychopathology_, 1920, Vol. I, No. I.
 
 [25] Nachmansohn: 'Freuds Libidotheorie verglichen mit der Eroslehre
 Platos'. _Internationale Zeitschrift fuer Psychoanalyse_, 1915, Bd. III;
 Pfister: 'Plato als Vorlaeufer der Psychoanalyse', ibid., 1921, Bd. VII.
 ['Plato: a Fore-Runner of Psycho-Analysis'. _International Journal of
 Psycho-Analysis_, 1922, Vol. III.]
 
 [26] 'Though I speak with the tongues of men and of angels, and have not
 love, I am become as sounding brass, or a tinkling cymbal.'
 
 [27] [An idiom meaning 'for their sake'. Literally: 'for love of
 them'.--_Translator._]
 
 [28] An objection will justly be raised against this conception of the
 libidinal [see next foot-note] structure of an army on the ground that
 no place has been found in it for such ideas as those of one's country,
 of national glory, etc., which are of such importance in holding an army
 together. The answer is that that is a different instance of a group
 tie, and no longer such a simple one; for the examples of great
 generals, like Caesar, Wallenstein, or Napoleon, show that such ideas
 are not indispensable to the existence of an army. We shall presently
 touch upon the possibility of a leading idea being substituted for a
 leader and upon the relations between the two. The neglect of this
 libidinal factor in an army, even when it is not the only factor
 operative, seems to be not merely a theoretical omission but also a
 practical danger. Prussian militarism, which was just as unpsychological
 as German science, may have had to suffer the consequences of this in
 the great war. We know that the war neuroses which ravaged the German
 army have been recognized as being a protest of the individual against
 the part he was expected to play in the army; and according to the
 communication of E. Simmel (_Kriegsneurosen and 'Psychisches Trauma'._
 Munich, 1918), the hard treatment of the men by their superiors may be
 considered as foremost among the motive forces of the disease. If the
 importance of the libido's claims on this score had been better
 appreciated, the fantastic promises of the American President's fourteen
 points would probably not have been believed so easily, and the splendid
 instrument would not have broken in the hands of the German leaders.
 
 [29] [Here and elsewhere the German 'libidinoes' is used simply as an
 adjectival derivative from the technical term '_Libido_'; 'libidinal' is
 accordingly introduced in the translation in order to avoid the
 highly-coloured connotation of the English 'libidinous'.--_Translator._]
 
 [30] ['Cathexis', from the Greek 'katecho', 'I occupy'. The German word
 '_Besetzung_' has become of fundamental importance in the exposition of
 psycho-analytical theory. Any attempt at a short definition or
 description is likely to be misleading, but speaking very loosely, we
 may say that 'cathexis' is used on the analogy of an electric charge,
 and that it means the concentration or accumulation of mental energy in
 some particular channel. Thus, when we speak of the existence in someone
 of a libidinal cathexis of an object, or, more shortly, of an
 object-cathexis, we mean that the libidinal energy is directed towards,
 or rather infused into, the idea (_Vorstellung_) of some object in the
 outer world. Readers who desire to obtain a more precise knowledge of
 the term are referred to the discussions in 'Zur Einfuehrung des
 Narzissmus' and the essays on metapsychology in _Kleine Schriften zur
 Neurosenlehre_, Vierte Folge.--_Translator._]
 
 [31] See _Vorlesungen zur Einfuehrung in die Psychoanalyse_. XXV, 3.
 Auflage, 1920. [_Introductory Lectures on Psycho-Analysis._ Lecture XXV.
 George Allen and Unwin, 1922.]
 
 [32] Compare Bela v. Felszeghy's interesting though somewhat fantastic
 paper 'Panik und Pankomplex'. _Imago_, 1920, Bd. VI.
 
 [33] Compare the explanation of similar phenomena after the abolition of
 the paternal authority of the sovereign given in P. Federn's _Die
 vaterlose Gesellschaft_. Vienna, Anzengruber-Verlag, 1919.
 
 [34] 'A company of porcupines crowded themselves very close together one
 cold winter's day so as to profit by one another's warmth and so save
 themselves from being frozen to death. But soon they felt one another's
 quills, which induced them to separate again. And now, when the need for
 warmth brought them nearer together again, the second evil arose once
 more. So that they were driven backwards and forwards from one trouble
 to the other, until they had discovered a mean distance at which they
 could most tolerably exist.' (_Parerga und Paralipomena_, II. Teil,
 XXXI., 'Gleichnisse und Parabeln'.)
 
 [35] Perhaps with the solitary exception of the relation of a mother to
 her son, which is based upon narcissism, is not disturbed by subsequent
 rivalry, and is reinforced by a rudimentary attempt at sexual
 object-choice.
 
 [36] In a recently published study, _Jenseits des Lustprinzips_ (1920)
 [_Beyond the Pleasure Principle_, International Psycho-Analytical
 Library, No. 4], I have attempted to connect the polarity of love and
 hatred with a hypothetical opposition between instincts of life and
 death, and to establish the sexual instincts as the purest examples of
 the former, the instincts of life.
 
 [37] See 'Zur Einfuehrung des Narzissmus', 1914. _Kleine Schriften zur
 Neurosenlehre_, Vierte Folge, 1918.
 
 [38] [Literally, 'leaning-up-against type'; from the Greek 'anaklino' 'I
 lean up against'. In the first phase of their development the sexual
 instincts have no independent means of finding satisfaction; they do so
 by propping themselves upon or 'leaning up against' the
 self-preservative instincts. The individual's first choice of a sexual
 object is said to be of the 'anaclitic type' when it follows this path;
 that is, when he choses as his first sexual object the same person who
 has satisfied his early non-sexual needs. For a full discussion of the
 anaclitic and narcissistic types of object-choice compare 'Zur
 Einfuehrung des Narzissmus.--_Translator._]
 
 [39] See _Drei Abhandlungen zur Sexualtheorie_, and Abraham's
 'Untersuchungen ueber die frueheste praegenitale Entwicklungsstufe der
 Libido', _Internationale Zeitschrift fuer Psychoanalyse_, 1916, Bd, IV;
 also included in his _Klinische Beitraege zur Psychoanalyse_
 (Internationale psychoanalytische Bibliothek. Nr. 10, 1921).
 
 [40] [_Kleine Schriften zur Neurosenlehre._ Zweite Folge.]
 
 [41] Marcuszewicz: 'Beitrag zum autistischen Denken bei Kindern.'
 _Internationale Zeitschrift fuer Psychoanalyse_, 1920, Bd. VI.
 
 [42] ['Trauer und Melancholie.' _Kleine Schriften zur Neurosenlehre_,
 Vierte Folge, 1918.]
 
 [43] ['_Instanz_'--like 'instance' in the phrase 'court of first
 instance'--was originally a legal term. It is now used in the sense of
 one of a hierarchy of authorities or functions.--_Translator._]
 
 [44] 'Zur Einfuehrung des Narzissmus', 'Trauer und Melancholie.'
 
 [45] 'Zur Einfuehrung des Narzissmus.'
 
 [46] We are very well aware that we have not exhausted the nature of
 identification with these samples taken from pathology, and that we have
 consequently left part of the riddle of group formations untouched. A
 far more fundamental and comprehensive psychological analysis would have
 to intervene at this point. A path leads from identification by way of
 imitation to empathy, that is, to the comprehension of the mechanism by
 means of which we are enabled to take up any attitude at all towards
 another mental life. Moreover there is still much to be explained in the
 manifestations of existing identifications. These result among other
 things in a person limiting his aggressiveness towards those with whom
 he has identified himself, and in his sparing them and giving them help.
 The study of such identifications, like those, for instance, which lie
 at the root of clan feeling, led Robertson Smith to the surprising
 result that they rest upon the recognition of a common substance
 (_Kinship and Marriage_, 1885), and may even therefore be brought about
 by a meal eaten in common. This feature makes it possible to connect
 this kind of identification with the early history of the human family
 which I constructed in _Totem und Tabu_.
 
 [47] Cf. _Drei Abhandlungen zur Sexualtheorie_, l.c.
 
 [48] 'Ueber die allgemeinste Erniedrigung des Liebeslebens.' _Kleine
 Schriften zur Neurosenlehre_, Vierte Folge, 1918.
 
 [49] Cf. 'Metapsychologische Ergaenzung zur Traumlehre.' _Kleine
 Schriften zur Neurosenlehre_, Vierte Folge, 1918.
 
 [50] W. Trotter: _Instincts of the Herd in Peace and War._ Fisher Unwin,
 1916.
 
 [51] See my essay _Jenseits des Lustprinzips_.
 
 [52] See the remarks upon Dread in _Vorlesungen zur Einfuehrung in die
 Psychoanalyse_. XXV.
 
 [53] _Totem und Tabu._
 
 [54] What we have just described in our general characterisation of
 mankind must apply especially to the primal horde. The will of the
 individual was too weak; he did not venture upon action. No impulses
 whatever came into play except collective ones; there was only a common
 will, there were no single ones. An idea did not dare to turn itself
 into a volition unless it felt itself reinforced by a perception of its
 general diffusion. This weakness of the idea is to be explained by the
 strength of the emotional tie which is shared by all the members of the
 horde; but the similarity in the circumstances of their life and the
 absence of any private property assist in determining the uniformity of
 their individual mental acts. As we may observe with children and
 soldiers, common activity is not excluded even in the excremental
 functions. The one great exception is provided by the sexual act, in
 which a third person is at the best superfluous and in the extreme case
 is condemned to a state of painful expectancy. As to the reaction of the
 sexual need (for genital gratification) towards gregariousness, see
 below.
 
 [55] It may perhaps also be assumed that the sons, when they were driven
 out and separated from their father, advanced from identification with
 one another to homosexual object love, and in this way won freedom to
 kill their father.
 
 [56] 'Das Unheimliche.' _Imago_, 1919, Bd. V.
 
 [57] See _Totem und Tabu_ and the sources there quoted.
 
 [58] This situation, in which the subject's attitude is unconsciously
 directed towards the hypnotist, while he is consciously occupied with
 the monotonous and uninteresting perceptions, finds a parallel among the
 events of psycho-analytic treatment, which deserves to be mentioned
 here. At least once in the course of every analysis a moment comes when
 the patient obstinately maintains that just now positively nothing
 whatever occurs to his mind. His free associations come to a stop and
 the usual incentives for putting them in motion fail in their effect. As
 a result of pressure the patient is at last induced to admit that he is
 thinking of the view from the consulting-room window, of the wall-paper
 that he sees before him, or of the gas-lamp hanging from the ceiling.
 Then one knows at once that he has gone off into the transference and
 that he is engaged upon what are still unconscious thoughts relating to
 the physician; and one sees the stoppage in the patient's associations
 disappear, as soon as he has been given this explanation.
 
 [59] Ferenczi: 'Introjektion und Uebertragung.' _Jahrbuch der
 Psychoanalyse_, 1909, Bd. I [_Contributions to Psycho-Analysis._ Boston,
 Badger, 1916, Chapter II.]
 
 [60] It seems to me worth emphasizing the fact that the discussions in
 this section have induced us to give up Bernheim's conception of
 hypnosis and go back to the _naif_ earlier one. According to Bernheim
 all hypnotic phenomena are to be traced to the factor of suggestion,
 which is not itself capable of further explanation. We have come to the
 conclusion that suggestion is a partial manifestation of the state of
 hypnosis, and that hypnosis is solidly founded upon a predisposition
 which has survived in the unconscious from the early history of the
 human family.
 
 [61] 'Trauer und Melancholie.'
 
 [62] _Totem und Tabu._
 
 [63] Trotter traces repression back to the herd instinct. It is a
 translation of this into another form of expression rather than a
 contradiction when I say in my 'Einfuehrung des Narzissmus' that on the
 part of the ego the construction of an ideal is the condition of
 repression.
 
 [64] Cf. Abraham: 'Ansaetze zur psychoanalytischen Erforschung und
 Behandlung des manisch-depressiven Irreseins', 1912, in _Klinische
 Beitraege zur Psychoanalyse_, 1921.
 
 [65] To speak more accurately, they conceal themselves behind the
 reproaches directed towards the person's own ego, and lend them the
 fixity, tenacity, and imperativeness which characterize the
 self-reproaches of a melancholiac.
 
 [66] [Literally: 'How he clears his throat and how he spits, that you
 have cleverly copied from him.']
 
 [67] What follows at this point was written under the influence of an
 exchange of ideas with Otto Rank.
 
 [68] Cf. Hanns Sachs: 'Gemeinsame Tagtraeume', a summary made by the
 lecturer himself of a paper read at the Sixth Psycho-analytical
 Congress, held at the Hague in 1920. _Internationale Zeitschrift fuer
 Psychoanalyse_, 1920, Bd. VI. ['Day-Dreams in Common'. _International
 Journal of Psycho-Analysis_, 1920, Vol. I.]
 
 [69] In this brief exposition I have made no attempt to bring forward
 any of the material existing in legends, myths, fairy tales, the history
 of manners, etc., in support of the construction.
 
 [70] Cf. _Drei Abhandlungen zur Sexualtheorie_.
 
 [71] Hostile feelings, which are a little more complicated in their
 construction, offer no exception to this rule.
 
 [72] [_Schriften zur angewandten Seelenkunde._ Heft 8. Vienna, Deuticke,
 1910.]
 
 [73] See 'Ueber die allgemeinste Erniedrigung des Liebeslebens.'
 
 [74] See _Totem und Tabu_, towards the end of Part II, 'Das Tabu und die
 Ambivalenz'.
 
 [75] See _Drei Abhandlungen zur Sexualtheorie_, 4. Auflage, 1920, S. 96.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 End of the Project Gutenberg EBook of Group Psychology and The Analysis of

 
 
 
 Produced by Chuck Greif and the Online Distributed
 Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net (This file was
 produced from images available at The Internet Archive)
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 [Illustration: SCHWIND, _The Dream of the Prisoner_
 
 See page 109 for analysis]
 
 
 
 
 A General Introduction
 to
 Psychoanalysis
 
 BY
 PROF. SIGMUND FREUD, LL.D.
 
 AUTHORIZED TRANSLATION
 WITH A PREFACE
 
 BY
 G. STANLEY HALL
 PRESIDENT, CLARK UNIVERSITY
 
 HORACE LIVERIGHT
 PUBLISHER NEW YORK
 
 Published, 1920, by
 HORACE LIVERIGHT, INC.
 
 _Printed in the United States of America_
 
 COPYRIGHT, 1920, BY EDWARD L. BERNAYS
 
 
 
 
 PREFACE
 
 
 Few, especially in this country, realize that while Freudian themes have
 rarely found a place on the programs of the American Psychological
 Association, they have attracted great and growing attention and found
 frequent elaboration by students of literature, history, biography,
 sociology, morals and aesthetics, anthropology, education, and religion.
 They have given the world a new conception of both infancy and
 adolescence, and shed much new light upon characterology; given us a new
 and clearer view of sleep, dreams, reveries, and revealed hitherto
 unknown mental mechanisms common to normal and pathological states and
 processes, showing that the law of causation extends to the most
 incoherent acts and even verbigerations in insanity; gone far to clear
 up the _terra incognita_ of hysteria; taught us to recognize morbid
 symptoms, often neurotic and psychotic in their germ; revealed the
 operations of the primitive mind so overlaid and repressed that we had
 almost lost sight of them; fashioned and used the key of symbolism to
 unlock many mysticisms of the past; and in addition to all this,
 affected thousands of cures, established a new prophylaxis, and
 suggested new tests for character, disposition, and ability, in all
 combining the practical and theoretic to a degree salutary as it is
 rare.
 
 These twenty-eight lectures to laymen are elementary and almost
 conversational. Freud sets forth with a frankness almost startling the
 difficulties and limitations of psychoanalysis, and also describes its
 main methods and results as only a master and originator of a new school
 of thought can do. These discourses are at the same time simple and
 almost confidential, and they trace and sum up the results of thirty
 years of devoted and painstaking research. While they are not at all
 controversial, we incidentally see in a clearer light the distinctions
 between the master and some of his distinguished pupils. A text like
 this is the most opportune and will naturally more or less supersede all
 other introductions to the general subject of psychoanalysis. It
 presents the author in a new light, as an effective and successful
 popularizer, and is certain to be welcomed not only by the large and
 growing number of students of psychoanalysis in this country but by the
 yet larger number of those who wish to begin its study here and
 elsewhere.
 
 The impartial student of Sigmund Freud need not agree with all his
 conclusions, and indeed, like the present writer, may be unable to make
 sex so all-dominating a factor in the psychic life of the past and
 present as Freud deems it to be, to recognize the fact that he is the
 most original and creative mind in psychology of our generation. Despite
 the frightful handicap of the _odium sexicum_, far more formidable today
 than the _odium theologicum_, involving as it has done for him lack of
 academic recognition and even more or less social ostracism, his views
 have attracted and inspired a brilliant group of minds not only in
 psychiatry but in many other fields, who have altogether given the world
 of culture more new and pregnant _appercus_ than those which have come
 from any other source within the wide domain of humanism.
 
 A former student and disciple of Wundt, who recognizes to the full his
 inestimable services to our science, cannot avoid making certain
 comparisons. Wundt has had for decades the prestige of a most
 advantageous academic chair. He founded the first laboratory for
 experimental psychology, which attracted many of the most gifted and
 mature students from all lands. By his development of the doctrine of
 apperception he took psychology forever beyond the old associationism
 which had ceased to be fruitful. He also established the independence of
 psychology from physiology, and by his encyclopedic and always thronged
 lectures, to say nothing of his more or less esoteric seminary, he
 materially advanced every branch of mental science and extended its
 influence over the whole wide domain of folklore, mores, language, and
 primitive religion. His best texts will long constitute a thesaurus
 which every psychologist must know.
 
 Again, like Freud, he inspired students who went beyond him (the
 Wurzburgers and introspectionists) whose method and results he could not
 follow. His limitations have grown more and more manifest. He has little
 use for the unconscious or the abnormal, and for the most part he has
 lived and wrought in a preevolutionary age and always and everywhere
 underestimated the genetic standpoint. He never transcends the
 conventional limits in dealing, as he so rarely does, with sex. Nor does
 he contribute much likely to be of permanent value in any part of the
 wide domain of affectivity. We cannot forbear to express the hope that
 Freud will not repeat Wundt's error in making too abrupt a break with
 his more advanced pupils like Adler or the Zurich group. It is rather
 precisely just the topics that Wundt neglects that Freud makes his chief
 corner-stones, viz., the unconscious, the abnormal, sex, and affectivity
 generally, with many genetic, especially ontogenetic, but also
 phylogenetic factors. The Wundtian influence has been great in the past,
 while Freud has a great present and a yet greater future.
 
 In one thing Freud agrees with the introspectionists, viz., in
 deliberately neglecting the "physiological factor" and building on
 purely psychological foundations, although for Freud psychology is
 mainly unconscious, while for the introspectionists it is pure
 consciousness. Neither he nor his disciples have yet recognized the aid
 proffered them by students of the autonomic system or by the
 distinctions between the epicritic and protopathic functions and organs
 of the cerebrum, although these will doubtless come to have their due
 place as we know more of the nature and processes of the unconscious
 mind.
 
 If psychologists of the normal have hitherto been too little disposed to
 recognize the precious contributions to psychology made by the cruel
 experiments of Nature in mental diseases, we think that the
 psychoanalysts, who work predominantly in this field, have been somewhat
 too ready to apply their findings to the operations of the normal mind;
 but we are optomistic enough to believe that in the end both these
 errors will vanish and that in the great synthesis of the future that
 now seems to impend our science will be made vastly richer and deeper on
 the theoretical side and also far more practical than it has ever been
 before.
 
 G. STANLEY HALL.
 
 Clark University,
 April, 1920.
 
 
 
 
 CONTENTS
 
 
 PART ONE
 
 _The Psychology of Errors_
 
 PAGE
 
 PREFACE    G. Stanley Hall                                             V
 
 LECTURE
 
 I. INTRODUCTION                                                        1
 
 II. THE PSYCHOLOGY OF ERRORS                                          10
 
 III. THE PSYCHOLOGY OF ERRORS--(_Continued_)                          23
 
 IV. THE PSYCHOLOGY OF ERRORS--(_Conclusion_)                          41
 
 
 PART TWO
 
 _The Dream_
 
 V. DIFFICULTIES AND PRELIMINARY APPROACH                              63
 
 VI. HYPOTHESIS AND TECHNIQUE OF INTERPRETATION                        78
 
 VII. MANIFEST DREAM CONTENT AND LATENT DREAM THOUGHT                  90
 
 VIII. DREAMS OF CHILDHOOD                                            101
 
 IX. THE DREAM CENSOR                                                 110
 
 X. SYMBOLISM IN THE DREAM                                            122
 
 XI. THE DREAM-WORK                                                   141
 
 XII. ANALYSES OF SAMPLE DREAMS                                       153
 
 XIII. ARCHAIC REMNANTS AND INFANTILISM IN THE DREAM                  167
 
 XIV. WISH FULFILLMENT                                                180
 
 XV. DOUBTFUL POINTS AND CRITICISM                                    194
 
 
 PART THREE
 
 _General Theory of the Neuroses_
 
 XVI. PSYCHOANALYSIS AND PSYCHIATRY                                   209
 
 XVII. THE MEANING OF THE SYMPTOMS                                    221
 
 XVIII. TRAUMATIC FIXATION--THE UNCONSCIOUS                           236
 
 XIX. RESISTANCE AND SUPPRESSION                                      248
 
 XX. THE SEXUAL LIFE OF MAN                                           262
 
 XXI. DEVELOPMENT OF THE LIBIDO AND SEXUAL ORGANIZATIONS              277
 
 XXII. THEORIES OF DEVELOPMENT AND REGRESSION--ETIOLOGY               294
 
 XXIII. THE DEVELOPMENT OF THE SYMPTOMS                               311
 
 XXIV. ORDINARY NERVOUSNESS                                           328
 
 XXV. FEAR AND ANXIETY                                                340
 
 XXVI. THE LIBIDO THEORY AND NARCISM                                  356
 
 XXVII. TRANSFERENCE                                                  372
 
 XXVIII. ANALYTICAL THERAPY                                           388
 
 INDEX                                                                403
 
 
 
 
 PART I
 
 THE PSYCHOLOGY OF ERRORS
 
 
 
 
 FIRST LECTURE
 
 INTRODUCTION
 
 
 I do not know how familiar some of you may be, either from your reading
 or from hearsay, with psychoanalysis. But, in keeping with the title of
 these lectures--_A General Introduction to Psychoanalysis_--I am obliged
 to proceed as though you knew nothing about this subject, and stood in
 need of preliminary instruction.
 
 To be sure, this much I may presume that you do know, namely, that
 psychoanalysis is a method of treating nervous patients medically. And
 just at this point I can give you an example to illustrate how the
 procedure in this field is precisely the reverse of that which is the
 rule in medicine. Usually when we introduce a patient to a medical
 technique which is strange to him we minimize its difficulties and give
 him confident promises concerning the result of the treatment. When,
 however, we undertake psychoanalytic treatment with a neurotic patient
 we proceed differently. We hold before him the difficulties of the
 method, its length, the exertions and the sacrifices which it will cost
 him; and, as to the result, we tell him that we make no definite
 promises, that the result depends on his conduct, on his understanding,
 on his adaptability, on his perseverance. We have, of course, excellent
 motives for conduct which seems so perverse, and into which you will
 perhaps gain insight at a later point in these lectures.
 
 Do not be offended, therefore, if, for the present, I treat you as I
 treat these neurotic patients. Frankly, I shall dissuade you from coming
 to hear me a second time. With this intention I shall show what
 imperfections are necessarily involved in the teaching of psychoanalysis
 and what difficulties stand in the way of gaining a personal judgment. I
 shall show you how the whole trend of your previous training and all
 your accustomed mental habits must unavoidably have made you opponents
 of psychoanalysis, and how much you must overcome in yourselves in
 order to master this instinctive opposition. Of course I cannot predict
 how much psychoanalytic understanding you will gain from my lectures,
 but I can promise this, that by listening to them you will not learn how
 to undertake a psychoanalytic treatment or how to carry one to
 completion. Furthermore, should I find anyone among you who does not
 feel satisfied with a cursory acquaintance with psychoanalysis, but who
 would like to enter into a more enduring relationship with it, I shall
 not only dissuade him, but I shall actually warn him against it. As
 things now stand, a person would, by such a choice of profession, ruin
 his every chance of success at a university, and if he goes out into the
 world as a practicing physician, he will find himself in a society which
 does not understand his aims, which regards him with suspicion and
 hostility, and which turns loose upon him all the malicious spirits
 which lurk within it.
 
 However, there are always enough individuals who are interested in
 anything which may be added to the sum total of knowledge, despite such
 inconveniences. Should there be any of this type among you, and should
 they ignore my dissuasion and return to the next of these lectures, they
 will be welcome. But all of you have the right to know what these
 difficulties of psychoanalysis are to which I have alluded.
 
 First of all, we encounter the difficulties inherent in the teaching and
 exposition of psychoanalysis. In your medical instruction you have been
 accustomed to visual demonstration. You see the anatomical specimen, the
 precipitate in the chemical reaction, the contraction of the muscle as
 the result of the stimulation of its nerves. Later the patient is
 presented to your senses; the symptoms of his malady, the products of
 the pathological processes, in many cases even the cause of the disease
 is shown in isolated state. In the surgical department you are made to
 witness the steps by which one brings relief to the patient, and are
 permitted to attempt to practice them. Even in psychiatry, the
 demonstration affords you, by the patient's changed facial play, his
 manner of speech and his behavior, a wealth of observations which leave
 far-reaching impressions. Thus the medical teacher preponderantly plays
 the role of a guide and instructor who accompanies you through a museum
 in which you contract an immediate relationship to the exhibits, and in
 which you believe yourself to have been convinced through your own
 observation of the existence of the new things you see.
 
 Unfortunately, everything is different in psychoanalysis. In
 psychoanalysis nothing occurs but the interchange of words between the
 patient and the physician. The patient talks, tells of his past
 experiences and present impressions, complains, confesses his wishes and
 emotions. The physician listens, tries to direct the thought processes
 of the patient, reminds him of things, forces his attention into certain
 channels, gives him explanations and observes the reactions of
 understanding or denial which he calls forth in the patient. The
 uneducated relatives of our patients--persons who are impressed only by
 the visible and tangible, preferably by such procedure as one sees in
 the moving picture theatres--never miss an opportunity of voicing their
 scepticism as to how one can "do anything for the malady through mere
 talk." Such thinking, of course, is as shortsighted as it is
 inconsistent. For these are the very persons who know with such
 certainty that the patients "merely imagine" their symptoms. Words were
 originally magic, and the word retains much of its old magical power
 even to-day. With words one man can make another blessed, or drive him
 to despair; by words the teacher transfers his knowledge to the pupil;
 by words the speaker sweeps his audience with him and determines its
 judgments and decisions. Words call forth effects and are the universal
 means of influencing human beings. Therefore let us not underestimate
 the use of words in psychotherapy, and let us be satisfied if we may be
 auditors of the words which are exchanged between the analyst and his
 patient.
 
 But even that is impossible. The conversation of which the
 psychoanalytic treatment consists brooks no auditor, it cannot be
 demonstrated. One can, of course, present a neurasthenic or hysteric to
 the students in a psychiatric lecture. He tells of his complaints and
 symptoms, but of nothing else. The communications which are necessary
 for the analysis are made only under the conditions of a special
 affective relationship to the physician; the patient would become dumb
 as soon as he became aware of a single impartial witness. For these
 communications concern the most intimate part of his psychic life,
 everything which as a socially independent person he must conceal from
 others; these communications deal with everything which, as a harmonious
 personality, he will not admit even to himself.
 
 You cannot, therefore, "listen in" on a psychoanalytic treatment. You
 can only hear of it. You will get to know psychoanalysis, in the
 strictest sense of the word, only by hearsay. Such instruction even at
 second hand, will place you in quite an unusual position for forming a
 judgment. For it is obvious that everything depends on the faith you are
 able to put in the instructor.
 
 Imagine that you are not attending a psychiatric, but an historical
 lecture, and that the lecturer is telling you about the life and martial
 deeds of Alexander the Great. What would be your reasons for believing
 in the authenticity of his statements? At first sight, the condition of
 affairs seems even more unfavorable than in the case of psychoanalysis,
 for the history professor was as little a participant in Alexander's
 campaigns as you were; the psychoanalyst at least tells you of things in
 connection with which he himself has played some role. But then the
 question turns on this--what set of facts can the historian marshal in
 support of his position? He can refer you to the accounts of ancient
 authors, who were either contemporaries themselves, or who were at least
 closer to the events in question; that is, he will refer you to the
 books of Diodor, Plutarch, Arrian, etc. He can place before you pictures
 of the preserved coins and statues of the king and can pass down your
 rows a photograph of the Pompeiian mosaics of the battle of Issos. Yet,
 strictly speaking, all these documents prove only that previous
 generations already believed in Alexander's existence and in the reality
 of his deeds, and your criticism might begin anew at this point. You
 will then find that not everything recounted of Alexander is credible,
 or capable of proof in detail; yet even then I cannot believe that you
 will leave the lecture hall a disbeliever in the reality of Alexander
 the Great. Your decision will be determined chiefly by two
 considerations; firstly, that the lecturer has no conceivable motive for
 presenting as truth something which he does not himself believe to be
 true, and secondly, that all available histories present the events in
 approximately the same manner. If you then proceed to the verification
 of the older sources, you will consider the same data, the possible
 motives of the writers and the consistency of the various parts of the
 evidence. The result of the examination will surely be convincing in the
 case of Alexander. It will probably turn out differently when applied
 to individuals like Moses and Nimrod. But what doubts you might raise
 against the credibility of the psychoanalytic reporter you will see
 plainly enough upon a later occasion.
 
 At this point you have a right to raise the question, "If there is no
 such thing as objective verification of psychoanalysis, and no
 possibility of demonstrating it, how can one possibly learn
 psychoanalysis and convince himself of the truth of its claims?" The
 fact is, the study is not easy and there are not many persons who have
 learned psychoanalysis thoroughly; but nevertheless, there is a feasible
 way. Psychoanalysis is learned, first of all, from a study of one's
 self, through the study of one's own personality. This is not quite what
 is ordinarily called self-observation, but, at a pinch, one can sum it
 up thus. There is a whole series of very common and universally known
 psychic phenomena, which, after some instruction in the technique of
 psychoanalysis, one can make the subject matter of analysis in one's
 self. By so doing one obtains the desired conviction of the reality of
 the occurrences which psychoanalysis describes and of the correctness of
 its fundamental conception. To be sure, there are definite limits
 imposed on progress by this method. One gets much further if one allows
 himself to be analyzed by a competent analyst, observes the effect of
 the analysis on his own ego, and at the same time makes use of the
 opportunity to become familiar with the finer details of the technique
 of procedure. This excellent method is, of course, only practicable for
 one person, never for an entire class.
 
 There is a second difficulty in your relation to psychoanalysis for
 which I cannot hold the science itself responsible, but for which I must
 ask you to take the responsibility upon yourselves, ladies and
 gentlemen, at least in so far as you have hitherto pursued medical
 studies. Your previous training has given your mental activity a
 definite bent which leads you far away from psychoanalysis. You have
 been trained to reduce the functions of an organism and its disorders
 anatomically, to explain them in terms of chemistry and physics and to
 conceive them biologically, but no portion of your interest has been
 directed to the psychic life, in which, after all, the activity of this
 wonderfully complex organism culminates. For this reason psychological
 thinking has remained strange to you and you have accustomed yourselves
 to regard it with suspicion, to deny it the character of the scientific,
 to leave it to the laymen, poets, natural philosophers and mystics. Such
 a delimitation is surely harmful to your medical activity, for the
 patient will, as is usual in all human relationships, confront you first
 of all with his psychic facade; and I am afraid your penalty will be
 this, that you will be forced to relinquish a portion of the therapeutic
 influence to which you aspire, to those lay physicians, nature-cure
 fakers and mystics whom you despise.
 
 I am not overlooking the excuse, whose existence one must admit, for
 this deficiency in your previous training. There is no philosophical
 science of therapy which could be made practicable for your medical
 purpose. Neither speculative philosophy nor descriptive psychology nor
 that so-called experimental psychology which allies itself with the
 physiology of the sense organs as it is taught in the schools, is in a
 position to teach you anything useful concerning the relation between
 the physical and the psychical or to put into your hand the key to the
 understanding of a possible disorder of the psychic functions. Within
 the field of medicine, psychiatry does, it is true, occupy itself with
 the description of the observed psychic disorders and with their
 grouping into clinical symptom-pictures; but in their better hours the
 psychiatrists themselves doubt whether their purely descriptive account
 deserves the name of a science. The symptoms which constitute these
 clinical pictures are known neither in their origin, in their mechanism,
 nor in their mutual relationship. There are either no discoverable
 corresponding changes of the anatomical organ of the soul, or else the
 changes are of such a nature as to yield no enlightenment. Such psychic
 disturbances are open to therapeutic influence only when they can be
 identified as secondary phenomena of an otherwise organic affection.
 
 Here is the gap which psychoanalysis aims to fill. It prepares to give
 psychiatry the omitted psychological foundation, it hopes to reveal the
 common basis from which, as a starting point, constant correlation of
 bodily and psychic disturbances becomes comprehensible. To this end, it
 must divorce itself from every anatomical, chemical or physiological
 supposition which is alien to it. It must work throughout with purely
 psychological therapeutic concepts, and just for that reason I fear
 that it will at first seem strange to you.
 
 I will not make you, your previous training, or your mental bias share
 the guilt of the next difficulty. With two of its assertions,
 psychoanalysis offends the whole world and draws aversion upon itself.
 One of these assertions offends an intellectual prejudice, the other an
 aesthetic-moral one. Let us not think too lightly of these prejudices;
 they are powerful things, remnants of useful, even necessary,
 developments of mankind. They are retained through powerful affects, and
 the battle against them is a hard one.
 
 The first of these displeasing assertions of psychoanalysis is this,
 that the psychic processes are in themselves unconscious, and that those
 which are conscious are merely isolated acts and parts of the total
 psychic life. Recollect that we are, on the contrary, accustomed to
 identify the psychic with the conscious. Consciousness actually means
 for us the distinguishing characteristic of the psychic life, and
 psychology is the science of the content of consciousness. Indeed, so
 obvious does this identification seem to us that we consider its
 slightest contradiction obvious nonsense, and yet psychoanalysis cannot
 avoid raising this contradiction; it cannot accept the identity of the
 conscious with the psychic. Its definition of the psychic affirms that
 they are processes of the nature of feeling, thinking, willing; and it
 must assert that there is such a thing as unconscious thinking and
 unconscious willing. But with this assertion psychoanalysis has
 alienated, to start with, the sympathy of all friends of sober science,
 and has laid itself open to the suspicion of being a fantastic mystery
 study which would build in darkness and fish in murky waters. You,
 however, ladies and gentlemen, naturally cannot as yet understand what
 justification I have for stigmatizing as a prejudice so abstract a
 phrase as this one, that "the psychic is consciousness." You cannot know
 what evaluation can have led to the denial of the unconscious, if such a
 thing really exists, and what advantage may have resulted from this
 denial. It sounds like a mere argument over words whether one shall say
 that the psychic coincides with the conscious or whether one shall
 extend it beyond that, and yet I can assure you that by the acceptance
 of unconscious processes you have paved the way for a decisively new
 orientation in the world and in science.
 
 Just as little can you guess how intimate a connection this initial
 boldness of psychoanalysis has with the one which follows. The next
 assertion which psychoanalysis proclaims as one of its discoveries,
 affirms that those instinctive impulses which one can only call sexual
 in the narrower as well as in the wider sense, play an uncommonly large
 role in the causation of nervous and mental diseases, and that those
 impulses are a causation which has never been adequately appreciated.
 Nay, indeed, psychoanalysis claims that these same sexual impulses have
 made contributions whose value cannot be overestimated to the highest
 cultural, artistic and social achievements of the human mind.
 
 According to my experience, the aversion to this conclusion of
 psychoanalysis is the most significant source of the opposition which it
 encounters. Would you like to know how we explain this fact? We believe
 that civilization was forged by the driving force of vital necessity, at
 the cost of instinct-satisfaction, and that the process is to a large
 extent constantly repeated anew, since each individual who newly enters
 the human community repeats the sacrifices of his instinct-satisfaction
 for the sake of the common good. Among the instinctive forces thus
 utilized, the sexual impulses play a significant role. They are thereby
 sublimated, i.e., they are diverted from their sexual goals and directed
 to ends socially higher and no longer sexual. But this result is
 unstable. The sexual instincts are poorly tamed. Each individual who
 wishes to ally himself with the achievements of civilization is exposed
 to the danger of having his sexual instincts rebel against this
 sublimation. Society can conceive of no more serious menace to its
 civilization than would arise through the satisfying of the sexual
 instincts by their redirection toward their original goals. Society,
 therefore, does not relish being reminded of this ticklish spot in its
 origin; it has no interest in having the strength of the sexual
 instincts recognized and the meaning of the sexual life to the
 individual clearly delineated. On the contrary, society has taken the
 course of diverting attention from this whole field. This is the reason
 why society will not tolerate the above-mentioned results of
 psychoanalytic research, and would prefer to brand it as aesthetically
 offensive and morally objectionable or dangerous. Since, however, one
 cannot attack an ostensibly objective result of scientific inquiry with
 such objections, the criticism must be translated to an intellectual
 level if it is to be voiced. But it is a predisposition of human nature
 to consider an unpleasant idea untrue, and then it is easy to find
 arguments against it. Society thus brands what is unpleasant as untrue,
 denying the conclusions of psychoanalysis with logical and pertinent
 arguments. These arguments originate from affective sources, however,
 and society holds to these prejudices against all attempts at
 refutation.
 
 However, we may claim, ladies and gentlemen, that we have followed no
 bias of any sort in making any of these contested statements. We merely
 wished to state facts which we believe to have been discovered by
 toilsome labor. And we now claim the right unconditionally to reject the
 interference in scientific research of any such practical
 considerations, even before we have investigated whether the
 apprehension which these considerations are meant to instil are
 justified or not.
 
 These, therefore, are but a few of the difficulties which stand in the
 way of your occupation with psychoanalysis. They are perhaps more than
 enough for a beginning. If you can overcome their deterrent impression,
 we shall continue.
 
 
 
 
 SECOND LECTURE
 
 THE PSYCHOLOGY OF ERRORS
 
 
 We begin with an investigation, not with hypotheses. To this end we
 choose certain phenomena which are very frequent, very familiar and very
 little heeded, and which have nothing to do with the pathological,
 inasmuch as they can be observed in every normal person. I refer to the
 errors which an individual commits--as for example, errors of speech in
 which he wishes to say something and uses the wrong word; or those which
 happen to him in writing, and which he may or may not notice; or the
 case of misreading, in which one reads in the print or writing something
 different from what is actually there. A similar phenomenon occurs in
 those cases of mishearing what is said to one, where there is no
 question of an organic disturbance of the auditory function. Another
 series of such occurrences is based on forgetfulness--but on a
 forgetfulness which is not permanent, but temporary, as for instance
 when one cannot think of a name which one knows and always recognizes;
 or when one forgets to carry out a project at the proper time but which
 one remembers again later, and therefore has only forgotten for a
 certain interval. In a third class this characteristic of transience is
 lacking, as for example in mislaying things so that they cannot be found
 again, or in the analogous case of losing things. Here we are dealing
 with a kind of forgetfulness to which one reacts differently from the
 other cases, a forgetfulness at which one is surprised and annoyed,
 instead of considering it comprehensible. Allied with these phenomena is
 that of erroneous ideas--in which the element of transience is again
 prominent, inasmuch as for a while one believes something which, before
 and after that time, one knows to be untrue--and a number of similar
 phenomena of different designations.
 
 These are all occurrences whose inner connection is expressed in the
 use of the same prefix of designation.[1] They are almost all
 unimportant, generally temporary and without much significance in the
 life of the individual. It is only rarely that one of them, such as the
 phenomenon of losing things, attains to a certain practical importance.
 For that reason also they do not attract much attention, they arouse
 only weak affects.
 
 It is, therefore, to these phenomena that I would now direct your
 attention. But you will object, with annoyance: "There are so many
 sublime riddles in the external world, just as there are in the narrower
 world of the psychic life, and so many wonders in the field of psychic
 disturbances which demand and deserve elucidation, that it really seems
 frivolous to waste labor and interest on such trifles. If you can
 explain to us how an individual with sound eyes and ears can, in broad
 daylight, see and hear things that do not exist, or why another
 individual suddenly believes himself persecuted by those whom up to that
 time he loved best, or defend, with the most ingenious arguments,
 delusions which must seem nonsense to any child, then we will be willing
 to consider psychoanalysis seriously. But if psychoanalysis can do
 nothing better than to occupy us with the question of why a speaker used
 the wrong word, or why a housekeeper mislaid her keys, or such trifles,
 then we know something better to do with our time and interest."
 
 My reply is: "Patience, ladies and gentlemen. I think your criticism is
 not on the right track. It is true that psychoanalysis cannot boast that
 it has never occupied itself with trifles. On the contrary, the objects
 of its observations are generally those simple occurrences which the
 other sciences have thrown aside as much too insignificant, the waste
 products of the phenomenal world. But are you not confounding, in your
 criticism, the sublimity of the problems with the conspicuousness of
 their manifestations? Are there not very important things which under
 certain circumstances, and at certain times, can betray themselves only
 by very faint signs? I could easily cite a great many instances of this
 kind. From what vague signs, for instance, do the young gentlemen of
 this audience conclude that they have won the favor of a lady? Do you
 await an explicit declaration, an ardent embrace, or does not a glance,
 scarcely perceptible to others, a fleeting gesture, the prolonging of a
 hand-shake by one second, suffice? And if you are a criminal lawyer, and
 engaged in the investigation of a murder, do you actually expect the
 murderer to leave his photograph and address on the scene of the crime,
 or would you, of necessity, content yourself with fainter and less
 certain traces of that individual? Therefore, let us not undervalue
 small signs; perhaps by means of them we will succeed in getting on the
 track of greater things. I agree with you that the larger problems of
 the world and of science have the first claim on our interest. But it is
 generally of little avail to form the definite resolution to devote
 oneself to the investigation of this or that problem. Often one does not
 know in which direction to take the next step. In scientific research it
 is more fruitful to attempt what happens to be before one at the moment
 and for whose investigation there is a discoverable method. If one does
 that thoroughly without prejudice or predisposition, one may, with good
 fortune, and by virtue of the connection which links each thing to every
 other (hence also the small to the great) discover even from such modest
 research a point of approach to the study of the big problems."
 
 Thus would I answer, in order to secure your attention for the
 consideration of these apparently insignificant errors made by normal
 people. At this point, we will question a stranger to psychoanalysis and
 ask him how he explains these occurrences.
 
 His first answer is sure to be, "Oh, they are not worth an explanation;
 they are merely slight accidents." What does he mean by this? Does he
 mean to assert that there are any occurrences so insignificant that they
 fall out of the causal sequence of things, or that they might just as
 well be something different from what they are? If any one thus denies
 the determination of natural phenomena at one such point, he has
 vitiated the entire scientific viewpoint. One can then point out to him
 how much more consistent is the religious point of view, when it
 explicitly asserts that "No sparrow falls from the roof without God's
 special wish." I imagine our friend will not be willing to follow his
 first answer to its logical conclusion; he will interrupt and say that
 if he were to study these things he would probably find an explanation
 for them. He will say that this is a case of slight functional
 disturbance, of an inaccurate psychic act whose causal factors can be
 outlined. A man who otherwise speaks correctly may make a slip of the
 tongue--when he is slightly ill or fatigued; when he is excited; when
 his attention is concentrated on something else. It is easy to prove
 these statements. Slips of the tongue do really occur with special
 frequency when one is tired, when one has a headache or when one is
 indisposed. Forgetting proper names is a very frequent occurrence under
 these circumstances. Many persons even recognize the imminence of an
 indisposition by the inability to recall proper names. Often also one
 mixes up words or objects during excitement, one picks up the wrong
 things; and the forgetting of projects, as well as the doing of any
 number of other unintentional acts, becomes conspicuous when one is
 distracted; in other words, when one's attention is concentrated on
 other things. A familiar instance of such distraction is the professor
 in _Fliegende Bltter_, who takes the wrong hat because he is thinking
 of the problems which he wishes to treat in his next book. Each of us
 knows from experience some examples of how one can forget projects which
 one has planned and promises which one has made, because an experience
 has intervened which has preoccupied one deeply.
 
 This seems both comprehensible and irrefutable. It is perhaps not very
 interesting, not as we expected it to be. But let us consider this
 explanation of errors. The conditions which have been cited as necessary
 for the occurrence of these phenomena are not all identical. Illness and
 disorders of circulation afford a physiological basis. Excitement,
 fatigue and distraction are conditions of a different sort, which one
 could designate as psycho-physiological. About these latter it is easy
 to theorize. Fatigue, as well as distraction, and perhaps also general
 excitement, cause a scattering of the attention which can result in the
 act in progress not receiving sufficient attention. This act can then be
 more easily interrupted than usual, and may be inexactly carried out. A
 slight illness, or a change in the distribution of blood in the central
 organ of the nervous system, can have the same effect, inasmuch as it
 influences the determining factor, the distribution of attention, in a
 similar way. In all cases, therefore, it is a question of the effects of
 a distraction of the attention, caused either by organic or psychic
 factors.
 
 But this does not seem to yield much of interest for our psychoanalytic
 investigation. We might even feel tempted to give up the subject. To be
 sure, when we look more closely we find that not everything squares
 with this attention theory of psychological errors, or that at any rate
 not everything can be directly deduced from it. We find that such errors
 and such forgetting occur even when people are not fatigued, distracted
 or excited, but are in every way in their normal state; unless, in
 consequence of these errors, one were to attribute to them an excitement
 which they themselves do not acknowledge. Nor is the mechanism so simple
 that the success of an act is assured by an intensification of the
 attention bestowed upon it, and endangered by its diminution. There are
 many acts which one performs in a purely automatic way and with very
 little attention, but which are yet carried out quite successfully. The
 pedestrian who scarcely knows where he is going, nevertheless keeps to
 the right road and stops at his destination without having gone astray.
 At least, this is the rule. The practiced pianist touches the right keys
 without thinking of them. He may, of course, also make an occasional
 mistake, but if automatic playing increased the likelihood of errors, it
 would be just the virtuoso whose playing has, through practice, become
 most automatic, who would be the most exposed to this danger. Yet we
 see, on the contrary, that many acts are most successfully carried out
 when they are not the objects of particularly concentrated attention,
 and that the mistakes occur just at the point where one is most anxious
 to be accurate--where a distraction of the necessary attention is
 therefore surely least permissible. One could then say that this is the
 effect of the "excitement," but we do not understand why the excitement
 does not intensify the concentration of attention on the goal that is so
 much desired. If in an important speech or discussion anyone says the
 opposite of what he means, then that can hardly be explained according
 to the psycho-physiological or the attention theories.
 
 There are also many other small phenomena accompanying these errors,
 which are not understood and which have not been rendered comprehensible
 to us by these explanations. For instance, when one has temporarily
 forgotten a name, one is annoyed, one is determined to recall it and is
 unable to give up the attempt. Why is it that despite his annoyance the
 individual cannot succeed, as he wishes, in directing his attention to
 the word which is "on the tip of his tongue," and which he instantly
 recognizes when it is pronounced to him? Or, to take another example,
 there are cases in which the errors multiply, link themselves together,
 substitute for each other. The first time one forgets an appointment;
 the next time, after having made a special resolution not to forget it,
 one discovers that one has made a mistake in the day or hour. Or one
 tries by devious means to remember a forgotten word, and in the course
 of so doing loses track of a second name which would have been of use in
 finding the first. If one then pursues this second name, a third gets
 lost, and so on. It is notorious that the same thing can happen in the
 case of misprints, which are of course to be considered as errors of the
 typesetter. A stubborn error of this sort is said to have crept into a
 Social-Democratic paper, where, in the account of a certain festivity
 was printed, "Among those present was His Highness, the Clown Prince."
 The next day a correction was attempted. The paper apologized and said,
 "The sentence should, of course, have read 'The Clown Prince.'" One
 likes to attribute these occurrences to the printer's devil, to the
 goblin of the typesetting machine, and the like--figurative expressions
 which at least go beyond a psycho-physiological theory of the misprint.
 
 I do not know if you are acquainted with the fact that one can provoke
 slips of the tongue, can call them forth by suggestion, as it were. An
 anecdote will serve to illustrate this. Once when a novice on the stage
 was entrusted with the important role in _The Maid of Orleans_ of
 announcing to the King, "Conntable sheathes his sword," the star played
 the joke of repeating to the frightened beginner during the rehearsal,
 instead of the text, the following, "Comfortable sends back his
 steed,"[2] and he attained his end. In the performance the unfortunate
 actor actually made his dbut with this distorted announcement; even
 after he had been amply warned against so doing, or perhaps just for
 that reason.
 
 These little characteristics of errors are not exactly illuminated by
 the theory of diverted attention. But that does not necessarily prove
 the whole theory wrong. There is perhaps something missing, a complement
 by the addition of which the theory would be made completely
 satisfactory. But many of the errors themselves can be regarded from
 another aspect.
 
 Let us select slips of the tongue, as best suited to our purposes. We
 might equally well choose slips of the pen or of reading. But at this
 point, we must make clear to ourselves the fact that so far we have
 inquired only as to when and under what conditions one's tongue slips,
 and have received an answer on this point only. One can, however, direct
 one's interest elsewhere and ask why one makes just this particular slip
 and no other; one can consider what the slip results in. You must
 realize that as long as one does not answer this question--does not
 explain the effect produced by the slip--the phenomenon in its
 psychological aspect remains an accident, even if its physiological
 explanation has been found. When it happens that I commit a slip of the
 tongue, I could obviously make any one of an infinite number of slips,
 and in place of the one right word say any one of a thousand others,
 make innumerable distortions of the right word. Now, is there anything
 which forces upon me in a specific instance just this one special slip
 out of all those which are possible, or does that remain accidental and
 arbitrary, and can nothing rational be found in answer to this question?
 
 Two authors, Meringer and Mayer (a philologist and a psychiatrist) did
 indeed in 1895 make the attempt to approach the problem of slips of the
 tongue from this side. They collected examples and first treated them
 from a purely descriptive standpoint. That, of course, does not yet
 furnish any explanation, but may open the way to one. They
 differentiated the distortions which the intended phrase suffered
 through the slip, into: interchanges of positions of words, interchanges
 of parts of words, perseverations, compoundings and substitutions. I
 will give you examples of these authors' main categories. It is a case
 of interchange of the first sort if someone says "the Milo of Venus"
 instead of "the Venus of Milo." An example of the second type of
 interchange, "I had a blush of rood to the head" instead of "rush of
 blood"; a perseveration would be the familiar misplaced toast, "I ask
 you to join me in hiccoughing the health of our chief."[3] These three
 forms of slips are not very frequent. You will find those cases much
 more frequent in which the slip results from a drawing together or
 compounding of syllables; for example, a gentleman on the street
 addresses a lady with the words, "If you will allow me, madame, I should
 be very glad to _inscort_ you."[4] In the compounded word there is
 obviously besides the word "escort," also the word "insult" (and
 parenthetically we may remark that the young man will not find much
 favor with the lady). As an example of the substitution, Meringer and
 Mayer cite the following: "A man says, 'I put the specimens in the
 letterbox,' instead of 'in the hot-bed,' and the like."[5]
 
 The explanation which the two authors attempt to formulate on the basis
 of this collection of examples is peculiarly inadequate. They hold that
 the sounds and syllables of words have different values, and that the
 production and perception of more highly valued syllables can interfere
 with those of lower values. They obviously base this conclusion on the
 cases of fore-sounding and perseveration which are not at all frequent;
 in other cases of slips of the tongue the question of such sound
 priorities, if any exist, does not enter at all. The most frequent cases
 of slips of the tongue are those in which instead of a certain word one
 says another which resembles it; and one may consider this resemblance
 sufficient explanation. For example, a professor says in his initial
 lecture, "I am not _inclined_ to evaluate the merits of my
 predecessor."[6] Or another professor says, "In the case of the female
 genital, despite many _temptations_ ... I mean many attempts ...
 etc."[7]
 
 The most common, and also the most conspicuous form of slips of the
 tongue, however, is that of saying the exact opposite of what one meant
 to say. In such cases, one goes far afield from the problem of sound
 relations and resemblance effects, and can cite, instead of these, the
 fact that opposites have an obviously close relationship to each other,
 and have particularly close relations in the psychology of association.
 There are historical examples of this sort. A president of our House of
 Representatives once opened the assembly with the words, "Gentlemen, I
 declare a quorum present, and herewith declare the assembly _closed_."
 
 Similar, in its trickiness, to the relation of opposites is the effect
 of any other facile association which may under certain circumstances
 arise most inopportunely. Thus, for instance, there is the story which
 relates that on the occasion of a festivity in honor of the marriage of
 a child of H. Helmholtz with a child of the well-known discoverer and
 captain of industry, W. Siemon, the famous physiologist Dubois-Reymond
 was asked to speak. He concluded his undoubtedly sparkling toast with
 the words, "Success to the new firm--Siemens and--Halski!" That, of
 course, was the name of the well-known old firm. The association of the
 two names must have been about as easy for a native of Berlin as "Weber
 and Fields" to an American.
 
 Thus we must add to the sound relations and word resemblances the
 influence of word associations. But that is not all. In a series of
 cases, an explanation of the observed slip is unsuccessful unless we
 take into account what phrase had been said or even thought previously.
 This again makes it a case of perseveration of the sort stressed by
 Meringer, but of a longer duration. I must admit, I am on the whole of
 the impression that we are further than ever from an explanation of
 slips of the tongue!
 
 However, I hope I am not wrong when I say that during the above
 investigation of these examples of slips of the tongue, we have all
 obtained a new impression on which it will be of value to dwell. We
 sought the general conditions under which slips of the tongue occur, and
 then the influences which determine the kind of distortion resulting
 from the slip, but we have in no way yet considered the effect of the
 slip of the tongue in itself, without regard to its origin. And if we
 should decide to do so we must finally have the courage to assert, "In
 some of the examples cited, the product of the slip also makes sense."
 What do we mean by "it makes sense"? It means, I think, that the product
 of the slip has itself a right to be considered as a valid psychic act
 which also has its purpose, as a manifestation having content and
 meaning. Hitherto we have always spoken of errors, but now it seems as
 if sometimes the error itself were quite a normal act, except that it
 has thrust itself into the place of some other expected or intended act.
 
 In isolated cases this valid meaning seems obvious and unmistakable.
 When the president with his opening words closes the session of the
 House of Representatives, instead of opening it, we are inclined to
 consider this error meaningful by reason of our knowledge of the
 circumstances under which the slip occurred. He expects no good of the
 assembly, and would be glad if he could terminate it immediately. The
 pointing out of this meaning, the interpretation of this error, gives us
 no difficulty. Or a lady, pretending to admire, says to another, "I am
 sure you must have messed up this charming hat yourself."[8] No
 scientific quibbles in the world can keep us from discovering in this
 slip the idea "this hat is a mess." Or a lady who is known for her
 energetic disposition, relates, "My husband asked the doctor to what
 diet he should keep. But the doctor said he didn't need any diet, he
 should eat and drink whatever _I_ want." This slip of tongue is quite an
 unmistakable expression of a consistent purpose.
 
 Ladies and gentlemen, if it should turn out that not only a few cases of
 slips of the tongue and of errors in general, but the larger part of
 them, have a meaning, then this meaning of errors of which we have
 hitherto made no mention, will unavoidably become of the greatest
 interest to us and will, with justice, force all other points of view
 into the background. We could then ignore all physiological and
 psycho-physiological conditions and devote ourselves to the purely
 psychological investigations of the sense, that is, the meaning, the
 purpose of these errors. To this end therefore we will not fail,
 shortly, to study a more extensive compilation of material.
 
 But before we undertake this task, I should like to invite you to follow
 another line of thought with me. It has repeatedly happened that a poet
 has made use of slips of the tongue or some other error as a means of
 poetic presentation. This fact in itself must prove to us that he
 considers the error, the slip of the tongue for instance, as meaningful;
 for he creates it on purpose, and it is not a case of the poet
 committing an accidental slip of the pen and then letting his pen-slip
 stand as a tongue-slip of his character. He wants to make something
 clear to us by this slip of the tongue, and we may examine what it is,
 whether he wishes to indicate by this that the person in question is
 distracted or fatigued. Of course, we do not wish to exaggerate the
 importance of the fact that the poet did make use of a slip to express
 his meaning. It could nevertheless really be a psychic accident, or
 meaningful only in very rare cases, and the poet would still retain the
 right to infuse it with meaning through his setting. As to their poetic
 use, however, it would not be surprising if we should glean more
 information concerning slips of the tongue from the poet than from the
 philologist or the psychiatrist.
 
 Such an example of a slip of the tongue occurs in _Wallenstein_
 (_Piccolomini_, Act 1, Scene 5). In the previous scene, Max Piccolomini
 has most passionately sided with the Herzog, and dilated ardently on the
 blessings of peace which disclosed themselves to him during the trip on
 which he accompanied Wallenstein's daughter to the camp. He leaves his
 father and the courtier, Questenberg, plunged in deepest consternation.
 And then the fifth scene continues:
 
   Q.
 
     Alas! Alas! and stands it so?
     What friend! and do we let him go away
     In this delusion--let him go away?
     Not call him back immediately, not open
     His eyes upon the spot?
 
   OCTAVIO.
 
     (_Recovering himself out of a deep study_)
 
     He has now opened mine,
     And I see more than pleases me.
 
   Q.
 
     What is it?
 
   OCTAVIO.
 
     A curse on this journey!
 
   Q.
 
     But why so? What is it?
 
   OCTAVIO.
 
     Come, come along, friend! I must follow up
     The ominous track immediately. Mine eyes
     Are opened now, and I must use them. Come!
 
     (_Draws Q. on with him._)
 
   Q.
 
     What now? Where go you then?
 
   OCTAVIO.
 
     (_Hastily._) To _her_ herself
 
   Q.
 
     To--
 
   OCTAVIO.
 
     (_Interrupting him and correcting himself._)
 
     To the duke. Come, let us go--.
 
 Octavio meant to say, "To him, to the lord," but his tongue slips and
 through his words "_to her_" he betrays to us, at least, the fact that
 he had quite clearly recognized the influence which makes the young war
 hero dream of peace.
 
 A still more impressive example was found by O. Rank in Shakespeare. It
 occurs in the _Merchant of Venice_, in the famous scene in which the
 fortunate suitor makes his choice among the three caskets; and perhaps I
 can do no better than to read to you here Rank's short account of the
 incident:
 
 "A slip of the tongue which occurs in Shakespeare's _Merchant of
 Venice_, Act III, Scene II, is exceedingly delicate in its poetic
 motivation and technically brilliant in its handling. Like the slip in
 _Wallenstein_ quoted by Freud (_Psychopathology of Everyday Life_, 2d
 ed., p. 48), it shows that the poets well know the meaning of these
 errors and assume their comprehensibility to the audience. Portia, who
 by her father's wish has been bound to the choice of a husband by lot,
 has so far escaped all her unfavored suitors through the fortunes of
 chance. Since she has finally found in Bassanio the suitor to whom she
 is attached, she fears that he, too, will choose the wrong casket. She
 would like to tell him that even in that event he may rest assured of
 her love, but is prevented from so doing by her oath. In this inner
 conflict the poet makes her say to the welcome suitor:
 
   PORTIA:
 
     I pray you tarry; pause a day or two,
     Before you hazard; for, in choosing wrong
     I lose your company; therefore, forbear a while:
     There's something tells me, (but it is not love)
     I would not lose you: * * *
     * * * I could teach you
     How to choose right, but then I am forsworn,
     So will I never be: so may you miss me;
     But if you do, you'll make me wish a sin
     That I had been forsworn. Beshrew your eyes.
     They have o'erlook'd me, and divided me;
     One half of me is yours, the other half _yours_,
     _Mine own_, I would say: but if mine, then yours,
     And so all yours.
 
 Just that, therefore, which she meant merely to indicate faintly to him
 or really to conceal from him entirely, namely that even before the
 choice of the lot she was his and loved him, this the poet--with
 admirable psychological delicacy of feeling--makes apparent by her slip;
 and is able, by this artistic device, to quiet the unbearable
 uncertainty of the lover, as well as the equal suspense of the audience
 as to the issue of the choice."
 
 Notice, at the end, how subtly Portia reconciles the two declarations
 which are contained in the slip, how she resolves the contradiction
 between them and finally still manages to keep her promise:
 
     "* * * but if mine, then yours,
      And so all yours."
 
 Another thinker, alien to the field of medicine, accidentally disclosed
 the meaning of errors by an observation which has anticipated our
 attempts at explanation. You all know the clever satires of Lichtenberg
 (1742-1749), of which Goethe said, "Where he jokes, there lurks a
 problem concealed." Not infrequently the joke also brings to light the
 solution of the problem. Lichtenberg mentions in his jokes and satiric
 comments the remark that he always read "Agamemnon" for "angenommen,"[9]
 so intently had he read Homer. Herein is really contained the whole
 theory of misreadings.
 
 At the next session we will see whether we can agree with the poets in
 their conception of the meaning of psychological errors.
 
 
 
 
 THIRD LECTURE
 
 THE PSYCHOLOGY OF ERRORS--(_Continued_)
 
 
 At the last session we conceived the idea of considering the error, not
 in its relation to the intended act which it distorted, but by itself
 alone, and we received the impression that in isolated instances it
 seems to betray a meaning of its own. We declared that if this fact
 could be established on a larger scale, then the meaning of the error
 itself would soon come to interest us more than an investigation of the
 circumstances under which the error occurs.
 
 Let us agree once more on what we understand by the "meaning" of a
 psychic process. A psychic process is nothing more than the purpose
 which it serves and the position which it holds in a psychic sequence.
 We can also substitute the word "purpose" or "intention" for "meaning"
 in most of our investigations. Was it then only a deceptive appearance
 or a poetic exaggeration of the importance of an error which made us
 believe that we recognized a purpose in it?
 
 Let us adhere faithfully to the illustrative example of slips of the
 tongue and let us examine a larger number of such observations. We then
 find whole categories of cases in which the intention, the meaning of
 the slip itself, is clearly manifest. This is the case above all in
 those examples in which one says the opposite of what one intended. The
 president said, in his opening address, "I declare the meeting closed."
 His intention is certainly not ambiguous. The meaning and purpose of his
 slip is that he wants to terminate the meeting. One might point the
 conclusion with the remark "he said so himself." We have only taken him
 at his word. Do not interrupt me at this point by remarking that this is
 not possible, that we know he did not want to terminate the meeting but
 to open it, and that he himself, whom we have just recognized as the
 best judge of his intention, will affirm that he meant to open it. In so
 doing you forget that we have agreed to consider the error entirely by
 itself. Its relation to the intention which it distorts is to be
 discussed later. Otherwise you convict yourself of an error in logic by
 which you smoothly conjure away the problem under discussion; or "beg
 the question," as it is called in English.
 
 In other cases in which the speaker has not said the exact opposite of
 what he intended, the slip may nevertheless express an antithetical
 meaning. "I am not _inclined_ to appreciate the merits of my
 predecessor." "_Inclined_" is not the opposite of "_in a position to_,"
 but it is an open betrayal of intent in sharpest contradiction to the
 attempt to cope gracefully with the situation which the speaker is
 supposed to meet.
 
 In still other cases the slip simply adds a second meaning to the one
 intended. The sentence then sounds like a contradiction, an
 abbreviation, a condensation of several sentences. Thus the lady of
 energetic disposition, "He may eat and drink whatever _I_ please." The
 real meaning of this abbreviation is as though the lady had said, "He
 may eat and drink whatever he pleases. But what does it matter what _he_
 pleases! It is _I_ who do the pleasing." Slips of the tongue often give
 the impression of such an abbreviation. For example, the anatomy
 professor, after his lecture on the human nostril, asks whether the
 class has thoroughly understood, and after a unanimous answer in the
 affirmative, goes on to say: "I can hardly believe that is so, since the
 people who understand the human nostril can, even in a city of millions,
 be counted on _one finger_--I mean, on the fingers of one hand." The
 abbreviated sentence here also has its meaning: it expresses the idea
 that there is only one person who thoroughly understands the subject.
 
 In contrast to these groups of cases are those in which the error does
 not itself express its meaning, in which the slip of the tongue does not
 in itself convey anything intelligible; cases, therefore, which are in
 sharpest opposition to our expectations. If anyone, through a slip of
 the tongue, distorts a proper name, or puts together an unusual
 combination of syllables, then this very common occurrence seems already
 to have decided in the negative the question of whether all errors
 contain a meaning. Yet closer inspection of these examples discloses the
 fact that an understanding of such a distortion is easily possible,
 indeed, that the difference between these unintelligible cases and the
 previous comprehensible ones is not so very great.
 
 A man who was asked how his horse was, answered, "Oh, it may _stake_--it
 may take another month." When asked what he really meant to say, he
 explained that he had been thinking that it was a _sorry_ business and
 the coming together of "_take_" and "_sorry_" gave rise to "_stake_."
 (Meringer and Mayer.)
 
 Another man was telling of some incidents to which he had objected, and
 went on, "and then certain facts were _re-filed_." Upon being
 questioned, he explained that he meant to stigmatize these facts as
 "_filthy_." "_Revealed_" and "_filthy_" together produced the peculiar
 "_re-filled_." (Meringer and Mayer.)
 
 You will recall the case of the young man who wished to "_inscort_" an
 unknown lady. We took the liberty of resolving this word construction
 into the two words "_escort_" and "_insult_," and felt convinced of this
 interpretation without demanding proof of it. You see from these
 examples that even slips can be explained through the concurrence, the
 interference, of two speeches of different intentions. The difference
 arises only from the fact that in the one type of slip the intended
 speech completely crowds out the other, as happens in those slips where
 the opposite is said, while in the other type the intended speech must
 rest content with so distorting or modifying the other as to result in
 mixtures which seem more or less intelligible in themselves.
 
 We believe that we have now grasped the secret of a large number of
 slips of the tongue. If we keep this explanation in mind we will be able
 to understand still other hitherto mysterious groups. In the case of the
 distortion of names, for instance, we cannot assume that it is always an
 instance of competition between two similar, yet different names. Still,
 the second intention is not difficult to guess. The distorting of names
 occurs frequently enough not as a slip of the tongue, but as an attempt
 to give the name an ill-sounding or debasing character. It is a familiar
 device or trick of insult, which persons of culture early learned to do
 without, though they do not give it up readily. They often clothe it in
 the form of a joke, though, to be sure, the joke is of a very low order.
 Just to cite a gross and ugly example of such a distortion of a name, I
 mention the fact that the name of the President of the French Republic,
 _Poincar_, has been at times, lately, transformed into
 "_Schweinskarr_." It is therefore easy to assume that there is also
 such an intention to insult in the case of other slips of the tongue
 which result in the distortion of a name. In consequence of our
 adherence to this conception, similar explanations force themselves upon
 us, in the case of slips of the tongue whose effect is comical or
 absurd. "I call upon you to _hiccough_ the health of our chief."[10]
 Here the solemn atmosphere is unexpectedly disturbed by the introduction
 of a word that awakens an unpleasant image; and from the prototype of
 certain expressions of insult and offense we cannot but suppose that
 there is an intention striving for expression which is in sharp contrast
 to the ostensible respect, and which could be expressed about as
 follows, "You needn't believe this. I'm not really in earnest. I don't
 give a whoop for the fellow--etc." A similar trick which passes for a
 slip of the tongue is that which transforms a harmless word into one
 which is indecent and obscene.[11]
 
 We know that many persons have this tendency of intentionally making
 harmless words obscene for the sake of a certain lascivious pleasure it
 gives them. It passes as wit, and we always have to ask about a person
 of whom we hear such a thing, whether he intended it as a joke or
 whether it occurred as a slip of the tongue.
 
 Well, here we have solved the riddle of errors with relatively little
 trouble! They are not accidents, but valid psychic acts. They have their
 meaning; they arise through the collaboration--or better, the mutual
 interference--of two different intentions. I can well understand that at
 this point you want to swamp me with a deluge of questions and doubts to
 be answered and resolved before we can rejoice over this first result of
 our labors. I truly do not wish to push you to premature conclusions.
 Let us dispassionately weigh each thing in turn, one after the other.
 
 What would you like to say? Whether I think this explanation is valid
 for all cases of slips of the tongue or only for a certain number?
 Whether one can extend this same conception to all the many other
 errors--to mis-reading, slips of the pen, forgetting, picking up the
 wrong object, mislaying things, etc? In the face of the psychic nature
 of errors, what meaning is left to the factors of fatigue, excitement,
 absent-mindedness and distraction of attention? Moreover, it is easy to
 see that of the two competing meanings in an error, one is always
 public, but the other not always. But what does one do in order to guess
 the latter? And when one believes one has guessed it, how does one go
 about proving that it is not merely a probable meaning, but that it is
 the only correct meaning? Is there anything else you wish to ask? If
 not, then I will continue. I would remind you of the fact that we really
 are not much concerned with the errors themselves, but we wanted only to
 learn something of value to psychoanalysis from their study. Therefore,
 I put the question: What are these purposes or tendencies which can thus
 interfere with others, and what relation is there between the
 interfering tendencies and those interfered with? Thus our labor really
 begins anew, after the explanation of the problem.
 
 Now, is this the explanation of all tongue slips? I am very much
 inclined to think so and for this reason, that as often as one
 investigates a case of a slip of the tongue, it reduces itself to this
 type of explanation. But on the other hand, one cannot prove that a slip
 of the tongue cannot occur without this mechanism. It may be so; for our
 purposes it is a matter of theoretical indifference, since the
 conclusions which we wish to draw by way of an introduction to
 psychoanalysis remain untouched, even if only a minority of the cases of
 tongue slips come within our conception, which is surely not the case. I
 shall anticipate the next question, of whether or not we may extend to
 other types of errors what we have gleaned from slips of the tongue, and
 answer it in the affirmative. You will convince yourselves of that
 conclusion when we turn our attention to the investigation of examples
 of pen slips, picking up wrong objects, etc. I would advise you,
 however, for technical reasons, to postpone this task until we shall
 have investigated the tongue slip itself more thoroughly.
 
 The question of what meaning those factors which have been placed in the
 foreground by some authors,--namely, the factors of circulatory
 disturbances, fatigue, excitement, absent-mindedness, the theory of the
 distraction of attention--the question of what meaning those factors can
 now have for us if we accept the above described psychic mechanism of
 tongue slips, deserves a more detailed answer. You will note that we do
 not deny these factors. In fact, it is not very often that
 psychoanalysis denies anything which is asserted on the other side. As a
 rule psychoanalysis merely adds something to such assertions and
 occasionally it does happen that what had hitherto been overlooked, and
 was newly added by psychoanalysis, is just the essential thing. The
 influence on the occurrence of tongue slips of such physiological
 predispositions as result from slight illness, circulatory disturbances
 and conditions of fatigue, should be acknowledged without more ado.
 Daily personal experience can convince you of that. But how little is
 explained by such an admission! Above all, they are not necessary
 conditions of the errors. Slips of the tongue are just as possible when
 one is in perfect health and normal condition. Bodily factors,
 therefore, have only the value of acting by way of facilitation and
 encouragement to the peculiar psychic mechanism of a slip of the tongue.
 
 To illustrate this relationship, I once used a simile which I will now
 repeat because I know of no better one as substitute. Let us suppose
 that some dark night I go past a lonely spot and am there assaulted by a
 rascal who takes my watch and purse; and then, since I did not see the
 face of the robber clearly, I make my complaint at the nearest police
 station in the following words: "Loneliness and darkness have just
 robbed me of my valuables." The police commissioner could then say to
 me: "You seem to hold an unjustifiably extreme mechanistic conception.
 Let us rather state the case as follows: Under cover of darkness, and
 favored by the loneliness, an unknown robber seized your valuables. The
 essential task in your case seems to me to be to discover the robber.
 Perhaps we can then take his booty from him again."
 
 Such psycho-physiological moments as excitement, absent-mindedness and
 distracted attention, are obviously of small assistance to us for the
 purpose of explanation. They are mere phrases, screens behind which we
 will not be deterred from looking. The question is rather what in such
 cases has caused the excitement, the particular diversion of attention.
 The influence of syllable sounds, word resemblances and the customary
 associations which words arouse should also be recognized as having
 significance. They facilitate the tongue slip by pointing the path which
 it can take. But if I have a path before me, does that fact as a matter
 of course determine that I will follow it? After all, I must have a
 stimulus to make me decide for it, and, in addition, a force which
 carries me forward on this path. These sound and word relationships
 therefore serve also only to facilitate the tongue slip, just as the
 bodily dispositions facilitate them; they cannot give the explanation
 for the word itself. Just consider, for example, the fact that in an
 enormously large number of cases, my lecturing is not disturbed by the
 fact that the words which I use recall others by their sound
 resemblance, that they are intimately associated with their opposites,
 or arouse common associations. We might add here the observation of the
 philosopher Wundt, that slips of the tongue occur when, in consequence
 of bodily fatigue, the tendency to association gains the upper hand over
 the intended speech. This would sound very plausible if it were not
 contradicted by experiences which proved that from one series of cases
 of tongue-slips bodily stimuli were absent, and from another, the
 association stimuli were absent.
 
 However, your next question is one of particular interest to me, namely:
 in what way can one establish the existence of the two mutually
 antagonistic tendencies? You probably do not suspect how significant
 this question is. It is true, is it not, that one of the two tendencies,
 the tendency which suffers the interference, is always unmistakable? The
 person who commits the error is aware of it and acknowledges it. It is
 the other tendency, what we call the interfering tendency, which causes
 doubt and hesitation. Now we have already learned, and you have surely
 not forgotten, that these tendencies are, in a series of cases, equally
 plain. That is indicated by the effect of the slip, if only we have the
 courage to let this effect be valid in itself. The president who said
 the opposite of what he meant to say made it clear that he wanted to
 open the meeting, but equally clear that he would also have liked to
 terminate it. Here the meaning is so plain that there is nothing left to
 be interpreted. But the other cases in which the interfering tendency
 merely distorts the original, without bringing itself to full
 expression--how can one guess the interfering meaning from the
 distortion?
 
 By a very sure and simple method, in the first series of cases, namely,
 by the same method by which one establishes the existence of the
 meaning interfered with. The latter is immediately supplied by the
 speaker, who instantly adds the originally intended expression. "It may
 _stake_--no, it may _take_ another month." Now we likewise ask him to
 express the interfering meaning; we ask him: "Now, why did you first say
 _stake_?" He answers, "I meant to say--'This is a _sorry_ business.'"
 And in the other case of the tongue slip--_re-filed_--the subject also
 affirms that he meant to say "It is a _fil-thy_ business," but then
 moderated his expression and turned it into something else. Thus the
 discovery of the interfering meaning was here as successful as the
 discovery of the one interfered with. Nor did I unintentionally select
 as examples cases which were neither related nor explained by me or by a
 supporter of my theories. Yet a certain investigation was necessary in
 both cases in order to obtain the solution. One had to ask the speaker
 why he made this slip, what he had to say about it. Otherwise he might
 perhaps have passed it by without seeking to explain it. When
 questioned, however, he furnished the explanation by means of the first
 thing that came to his mind. And now you see, ladies and gentlemen, that
 this slight investigation and its consequence are already a
 psychoanalysis, and the prototype of every psychoanalytic investigation
 which we shall conduct more extensively at a later time.
 
 Now, am I unduly suspicious if I suspect that at the same moment in
 which psychoanalysis emerges before you, your resistance to
 psychoanalysis also raises its head? Are you not anxious to raise the
 objection that the information given by the subject we questioned, and
 who committed the slip, is not proof sufficient? He naturally has the
 desire, you say, to meet the challenge, to explain the slip, and hence
 he says the first thing he can think of if it seems relevant. But that,
 you say, is no proof that this is really the way the slip happened. It
 might be so, but it might just as well be otherwise, you say. Something
 else might have occurred to him which might have fitted the case just as
 well and better.
 
 It is remarkable how little respect, at bottom, you have for a psychic
 fact! Imagine that someone has decided to undertake the chemical
 analysis of a certain substance, and has secured a sample of the
 substance, of a certain weight--so and so many milligrams. From this
 weighed sample certain definite conclusions can be drawn. Do you think
 it would ever occur to a chemist to discredit these conclusions by the
 argument that the isolated substance might have had some other weight?
 Everyone yields to the fact that it was just this weight and no other,
 and confidently builds his further conclusions upon that fact. But when
 you are confronted by the psychic fact that the subject, when
 questioned, had a certain idea, you will not accept that as valid, but
 say some other idea might just as easily have occurred to him! The
 trouble is that you believe in the illusion of psychic freedom and will
 not give it up. I regret that on this point I find myself in complete
 opposition to your views.
 
 Now you will relinquish this point only to take up your resistance at
 another place. You will continue, "We understand that it is the peculiar
 technique of psychoanalysis that the solution of its problems is
 discovered by the analyzed subject himself. Let us take another example,
 that in which the speaker calls upon the assembly 'to _hiccough_ the
 health of their chief.' The interfering idea in this case, you say, is
 the insult. It is that which is the antagonist of the expression of
 conferring an honor. But that is mere interpretation on your part, based
 on observations extraneous to the slip. If in this case you question the
 originator of the slip, he will not affirm that he intended an insult,
 on the contrary, he will deny it energetically. Why do you not give up
 your unverifiable interpretation in the face of this plain objection?"
 
 Yes, this time you struck a hard problem. I can imagine the unknown
 speaker. He is probably an assistant to the guest of honor, perhaps
 already a minor official, a young man with the brightest prospects. I
 will press him as to whether he did not after all feel conscious of
 something which may have worked in opposition to the demand that he do
 honor to the chief. What a fine success I'll have! He becomes impatient
 and suddenly bursts out on me, "Look here, you'd better stop this
 cross-examination, or I'll get unpleasant. Why, you'll spoil my whole
 career with your suspicions. I simply said '_auf_-gestossen' instead of
 '_an_-gestossen,' because I'd already said '_auf_' twice in the same
 sentence. It's the thing that Meringer calls a perservation, and there's
 no other meaning that you can twist out of it. Do you understand me?
 That's all." H'm, this is a surprising reaction, a really energetic
 denial. I see that there is nothing more to be obtained from the young
 man, but I also remark to myself that he betrays a strong personal
 interest in having his slip mean nothing. Perhaps you, too, agree that
 it is not right for him immediately to become so rude over a purely
 theoretical investigation, but, you will conclude, he really must know
 what he did and did not mean to say.
 
 Really? Perhaps that's open to question nevertheless.
 
 But now you think you have me. "So that is your technique," I hear you
 say. "When the person who has committed a slip gives an explanation
 which fits your theory, then you declare him the final authority on the
 subject. 'He says so himself!' But if what he says does not fit into
 your scheme, then you suddenly assert that what he says does not count,
 that one need not believe him."
 
 Yet that is certainly true. I can give you a similar case in which the
 procedure is apparently just as monstrous. When a defendant confesses to
 a deed, the judge believes his confession. But if he denies it, the
 judge does not believe him. Were it otherwise, there would be no way to
 administer the law, and despite occasional miscarriages you must
 acknowledge the value of this system.
 
 Well, are you then the judge, and is the person who committed the slip a
 defendant before you? Is a slip of the tongue a crime?
 
 Perhaps we need not even decline this comparison. But just see to what
 far-reaching differences we have come by penetrating somewhat into the
 seemingly harmless problems of the psychology of errors, differences
 which at this stage we do not at all know how to reconcile. I offer you
 a preliminary compromise on the basis of the analogy of the judge and
 the defendant. You will grant me that the meaning of an error admits of
 no doubt when the subject under analysis acknowledges it himself. I in
 turn will admit that a direct proof for the suspected meaning cannot be
 obtained if the subject denies us the information; and, of course, that
 is also the case when the subject is not present to give us the
 information. We are, then, as in the case of the legal procedure,
 dependent on circumstances which make a decision at one time seem more,
 and at another time, less probable to us. At law, one has to declare a
 defendant guilty on circumstantial evidence for practical reasons. We
 see no such necessity; but neither are we forced to forego the use of
 these circumstances. It would be a mistake to believe that a science
 consists of nothing but conclusively proved theorems, and any such
 demand would be unjust. Only a person with a mania for authority, a
 person who must replace his religious catechism with some other, even
 though it be scientific, would make such a demand. Science has but few
 apodeictic precepts in its catechism; it consists chiefly of assertions
 which it has developed to certain degrees of probability. It is actually
 a symptom of scientific thinking if one is content with these
 approximations of certainty and is able to carry on constructive work
 despite the lack of the final confirmation.
 
 But where do we get the facts for our interpretations, the circumstances
 for our proof, when the further remarks of the subject under analysis do
 not themselves elucidate the meaning of the error? From many sources.
 First of all, from the analogy with phenomena extraneous to the
 psychology of errors; as, for example, when we assert that the
 distortion of a name as a slip of the tongue has the same insulting
 significance as an intentional name distortion. We get them also from
 the psychic situation in which the error occurred, from our knowledge of
 the character of the person who committed the error, from the
 impressions which that person received before making the error, and to
 which he may possibly have reacted with this error. As a rule, what
 happens is that we find the meaning of the error according to general
 principles. It is then only a conjecture, a suggestion as to what the
 meaning may be, and we then obtain our proof from examination of the
 psychic situation. Sometimes, too, it happens that we have to wait for
 subsequent developments, which have announced themselves, as it were,
 through the error, in order to find our conjecture verified.
 
 I cannot easily give you proof of this if I have to limit myself to the
 field of tongue slips, although even here there are a few good examples.
 The young man who wished to "_inscort_" the lady is certainly shy; the
 lady whose husband may eat and drink whatever _she_ wants I know to be
 one of those energetic women who know how to rule in the home. Or take
 the following case: At a general meeting of the Concordia Club, a young
 member delivers a vehement speech in opposition, in the course of which
 he addresses the officers of the society as: "Fellow committee
 lenders." We will conjecture that some conflicting idea militated in him
 against his opposition, an idea which was in some way based on a
 connection with money lending. As a matter of fact, we learn from our
 informant that the speaker was in constant money difficulties, and had
 attempted to raise a loan. As a conflicting idea, therefore, we may
 safely interpolate the idea, "Be more moderate in your opposition, these
 are the same people who are to grant you the loan."
 
 But I can give you a wide selection of such circumstantial proof if I
 delve into the wide field of other kinds of error.
 
 If anyone forgets an otherwise familiar proper name, or has difficulty
 in retaining it in his memory despite all efforts, then the conclusion
 lies close at hand, that he has something against the bearer of this
 name and does not like to think of him. Consider in this connection the
 following revelation of the psychic situation in which this error
 occurs:
 
 "A Mr. Y. fell in love, without reciprocation, with a lady who soon
 after married a Mr. X. In spite of the fact that Mr. Y. has known Mr. X.
 a long time, and even has business relations with him, he forgets his
 name over and over again, so that he found it necessary on several
 occasions to ask other people the man's name when he wanted to write to
 Mr. X."[12]
 
 Mr. Y. obviously does not want to have his fortunate rival in mind under
 any condition. "Let him never be thought of."
 
 Another example: A lady makes inquiries at her doctor's concerning a
 mutual acquaintance, but speaks of her by her maiden name. She has
 forgotten her married name. She admits that she was much displeased by
 the marriage, and could not stand this friend's husband.[13]
 
 Later we shall have much to say in other relations about the matter of
 forgetting names. At present we are predominantly interested in the
 psychic situation in which the lapse of memory occurs.
 
 The forgetting of projects can quite commonly be traced to an
 antagonistic current which does not wish to carry out the project. We
 psychoanalysts are not alone in holding this view, but this is the
 general conception to which all persons subscribe the daily affairs, and
 which they first deny in theory. The patron who makes apologies to his
 proteg, saying that he has forgotten his requests, has not squared
 himself with his proteg. The proteg immediately thinks: "There's
 nothing to that; he did promise but he really doesn't want to do it."
 Hence, daily life also proscribes forgetting, in certain connections,
 and the difference between the popular and the psychoanalytic conception
 of these errors appears to be removed. Imagine a housekeeper who
 receives her guest with the words: "What, you come to-day? Why, I had
 totally forgotten that I had invited you for to-day"; or the young man
 who might tell his sweetheart that he had forgotten to keep the
 rendezvous which they planned. He is sure not to admit it, it were
 better for him to invent the most improbable excuses on the spur of the
 moment, hindrances which prevented him from coming at that time, and
 which made it impossible for him to communicate the situation to her. We
 all know that in military matters the excuse of having forgotten
 something is useless, that it protects one from no punishment; and we
 must consider this attitude justified. Here we suddenly find everyone
 agreed that a certain error is significant, and everyone agrees what its
 meaning is. Why are they not consistent enough to extend this insight to
 the other errors, and fully to acknowledge them? Of course, there is
 also an answer to this.
 
 If the meaning of this forgetting of projects leaves room for so little
 doubt among laymen, you will be less surprised to find that poets make
 use of these errors in the same sense. Those of you who have seen or
 read Shaw's _Caesar and Cleopatra_ will recall that Caesar, when
 departing in the last scene, is pursued by the idea that there was
 something more he intended to do, but that he had forgotten it. Finally
 he discovers what it is: to take leave of Cleopatra. This small device
 of the author is meant to ascribe to the great Caesar a superiority
 which he did not possess, and to which he did not at all aspire. You can
 learn from historical sources that Caesar had Cleopatra follow him to
 Rome, and that she was staying there with her little Caesarion when
 Caesar was murdered, whereupon she fled the city.
 
 The cases of forgetting projects are as a rule so clear that they are of
 little use for our purpose, i.e., discovering in the psychic situation
 circumstantial evidence of the meaning of the error. Let us, therefore,
 turn to a particularly ambiguous and untransparent error, that of losing
 and mislaying objects. That we ourselves should have a purpose in losing
 an object, an accident frequently so painful, will certainly seem
 incredible to you. But there are many instances similar to the
 following: A young man loses the pencil which he had liked very much.
 The day before he had received a letter from his brother-in-law, which
 concluded with the words, "For the present I have neither the
 inclination nor the time to be a party to your frivolity and your
 idleness."[14] It so happened that the pencil had been a present from
 this brother-in-law. Without this coincidence we could not, of course,
 assert that the loss involved any intention to get rid of the gift.
 Similar cases are numerous. Persons lose objects when they have fallen
 out with the donors, and no longer wish to be reminded of them. Or
 again, objects may be lost if one no longer likes the things themselves,
 and wants to supply oneself with a pretext for substituting other and
 better things in their stead. Letting a thing fall and break naturally
 shows the same intention toward that object. Can one consider it
 accidental when a school child just before his birthday loses, ruins or
 breaks his belongings, for example his school bag or his watch?
 
 He who has frequently experienced the annoyance of not being able to
 find something which he has himself put away, will also be unwilling to
 believe there was any intent behind the loss. And yet the examples are
 not at all rare in which the attendant circumstances of the mislaying
 point to a tendency temporarily or permanently to get rid of the object.
 Perhaps the most beautiful example of this sort is the following: A
 young man tells me: "A few years ago a misunderstanding arose in my
 married life. I felt my wife was too cool and even though I willingly
 acknowledged her excellent qualities, we lived without any tenderness
 between us. One day she brought me a book which she had thought might
 interest me. I thanked her for this attention, promised to read the
 book, put it in a handy place, and couldn't find it again. Several
 months passed thus, during which I occasionally remembered this mislaid
 book and tried in vain to find it. About half a year later my beloved
 mother, who lived at a distance from us, fell ill. My wife left the
 house in order to nurse her mother-in-law. The condition of the patient
 became serious, and gave my wife an opportunity of showing her best
 side. One evening I came home filled with enthusiasm and gratitude
 toward my wife. I approached my writing desk, opened a certain drawer
 with no definite intention but as if with somnambulistic certainty, and
 the first thing I found is the book so long mislaid."
 
 With the cessation of the motive, the inability to find the mislaid
 object also came to an end.
 
 Ladies and gentlemen, I could increase this collection of examples
 indefinitely. But I do not wish to do so here. In my _Psychopathology of
 Everyday Life_ (first published in 1901), you will find only too many
 instances for the study of errors.[15]
 
 All these examples demonstrate the same thing repeatedly: namely, they
 make it seem probable that errors have a meaning, and show how one may
 guess or establish that meaning from the attendant circumstances. I
 limit myself to-day because we have confined ourselves to the purpose of
 profiting in the preparation for psychoanalysis from the study of these
 phenomena. I must, however, still go into two additional groups of
 observations, into the accumulated and combined errors and into the
 confirmation of our interpretations by means of subsequent developments.
 
 The accumulated and combined errors are surely the fine flower of their
 species. If we were interested only in proving that errors may have a
 meaning, we would limit ourselves to the accumulated and combined errors
 in the first place, for here the meaning is unmistakable, even to the
 dullest intelligence, and can force conviction upon the most critical
 judgment. The accumulation of manifestations betrays a stubbornness such
 as could never come about by accident, but which fits closely the idea
 of design. Finally, the interchange of certain kinds of error with each
 other shows us what is the important and essential element of the error,
 not its form or the means of which it avails itself, but the purpose
 which it serves and which is to be achieved by the most various paths.
 Thus I will give you a case of repeated forgetting. Jones recounts that
 he once allowed a letter to lie on his writing desk several days for
 reasons quite unknown. Finally he made up his mind to mail it; but it
 was returned from the dead letter office, for he had forgotten to
 address it. After he had addressed it he took it to the post office, but
 this time without a stamp. At this point he finally had to admit to
 himself his aversion against sending the letter at all.
 
 In another case a mistake is combined with mislaying an object. A lady
 is traveling to Rome with her brother-in-law, a famous artist. The
 visitor is much fted by the Germans living in Rome, and receives as a
 gift, among other things, a gold medal of ancient origin. The lady is
 vexed by the fact that her brother-in-law does not sufficiently
 appreciate the beautiful object. After she leaves her sister and reaches
 her home, she discovers when unpacking that she has brought with
 her--how, she does not know--the medal. She immediately informs her
 brother-in-law of this fact by letter, and gives him notice that she
 will send the medal back to Rome the next day. But on the following day,
 the medal has been so cleverly mislaid that it can neither be found nor
 sent, and at this point it begins to dawn upon the lady that her
 "absent-mindedness" means, namely, that she wants to keep the object for
 herself.[16]
 
 I have already given you an example of a combination of forgetfulness
 and error in which someone first forgot a rendezvous and then, with the
 firm intention of not forgetting it a second time, appeared at the wrong
 hour. A quite analogous case was told me from his own experience, by a
 friend who pursues literary interests in addition to his scientific
 ones. He said: "A few years ago I accepted the election to the board of
 a certain literary society, because I hoped that the society could at
 some time be of use to me in helping obtain the production of my drama,
 and, despite my lack of interest, I took part in the meetings every
 Friday. A few months ago I received the assurance of a production in the
 theatre in F., and since that time it happens regularly that I forget
 the meetings of that society. When I read your article on these things,
 I was ashamed of my forgetfulness, reproached myself with the meanness
 of staying away now that I no longer need these people and determined to
 be sure not to forget next Friday. I kept reminding myself of this
 resolution until I carried it out and stood before the door of the
 meeting room. To my astonishment, it was closed, the meeting was already
 over; for I had mistaken the day. It was already Saturday."
 
 It would be tempting enough to collect similar observations, but I will
 go no further; I will let you glance instead upon those cases in which
 our interpretation has to wait for its proof upon future developments.
 
 The chief condition of these cases is conceivably that the existing
 psychic situation is unknown to us or inaccessible to our inquiries. At
 that time our interpretation has only the value of a conjecture to which
 we ourselves do not wish to grant too much weight. Later, however,
 something happens which shows us how justified was our interpretation
 even at that time. I was once the guest of a young married couple and
 heard the young wife laughingly tell of a recent experience, of how on
 the day after her return from her honeymoon she had hunted up her
 unmarried sister again in order to go shopping with her, as in former
 times, while her husband went to his business. Suddenly she noticed a
 gentleman on the other side of the street, and she nudged her sister,
 saying, "Why look, there goes Mr. K." She had forgotten that this
 gentleman was her husband of some weeks' standing. I shuddered at this
 tale but did not dare to draw the inference. The little anecdote did not
 occur to me again until a year later, after this marriage had come to a
 most unhappy end.
 
 A. Maeder tells of a lady who, the day before her wedding, forgot to try
 on her wedding dress and to the despair of the dressmaker only
 remembered it later in the evening. He adds in connection with this
 forgetfulness the fact that she divorced her husband soon after. I know
 a lady now divorced from her husband, who, in managing her fortune,
 frequently signed documents with her maiden name, and this many years
 before she really resumed it. I know of other women who lost their
 wedding rings on their honeymoon and also know that the course of the
 marriage gave a meaning to this accident. And now one more striking
 example with a better termination. It is said that the marriage of a
 famous German chemist did not take place because he forgot the hour of
 the wedding, and instead of going to the church went to the laboratory.
 He was wise enough to rest satisfied with this one attempt, and died
 unmarried at a ripe old age.
 
 Perhaps the idea has also come to you that in these cases mistakes have
 taken the place of the _Omina_ or omens of the ancients. Some of the
 _Omina_ really were nothing more than mistakes; for example, when a
 person stumbled or fell down. Others, to be sure, bore the
 characteristics of objective occurrences rather than that of subjective
 acts. But you would not believe how difficult it sometimes is to decide
 in a specific instance whether the act belongs to the one or the other
 group. It so frequently knows how to masquerade as a passive experience.
 
 Everyone of us who can look back over a longer or shorter life
 experience will probably say that he might have spared himself many
 disappointments and painful surprises if he had found the courage and
 decision to interpret as omens the little mistakes which he made in his
 intercourse with people, and to consider them as indications of the
 intentions which were still being kept secret. As a rule, one does not
 dare do this. One would feel as though he were again becoming
 superstitious via a detour through science. But not all omens come true,
 and you will understand from our theories that they need not all come
 true.
 
 
 
 
 FOURTH LECTURE
 
 THE PSYCHOLOGY OF ERRORS--(_Conclusion_)
 
 
 We may certainly put it down as the conclusion of our labors up to this
 point that errors have a meaning, and we may make this conclusion the
 basis of our further investigations. Let me stress the fact once more
 that we do not assert--and for our purposes need not assert--that every
 single mistake which occurs is meaningful, although I consider that
 probable. It will suffice us if we prove the presence of such a meaning
 with relative frequency in the various forms of errors. These various
 forms, by the way, behave differently in this respect. In the cases of
 tongue slips, pen slips, etc., the occurrences may take place on a
 purely physiological basis. In the group based on forgetfulness
 (forgetting names or projects, mislaying objects, etc.) I cannot believe
 in such a basis. There does very probably exist a type of case in which
 the loss of objects should be recognized as unintentional. Of the
 mistakes which occur in daily life, only a certain portion can in any
 way be brought within our conception. You must keep this limitation in
 mind when we start henceforth from the assumption that mistakes are
 psychic acts and arise through the mutual interference of two
 intentions.
 
 Herein we have the first result of psychoanalysis. Psychology hitherto
 knew nothing of the occurrence of such interferences and the possibility
 that they might have such manifestations as a consequence. We have
 widened the province of the world of psychic phenomena quite
 considerably, and have brought into the province of psychology phenomena
 which formerly were not attributed to it.
 
 Let us tarry a moment longer over the assertion that errors are psychic
 acts. Does such an assertion contain more than the former declaration
 that they have a meaning? I do not believe so. On the contrary, it is
 rather more indefinite and open to greater misunderstanding. Everything
 which can be observed about the psychic life will on occasion be
 designated as a psychic phenomenon. But it will depend on whether the
 specific psychic manifestations resulted directly from bodily, organic,
 material influences, in which case their investigation will not fall
 within the province of psychology, or whether it was more immediately
 the result of other psychic occurrences back of which, somewhere, the
 series of organic influences then begins. We have the latter condition
 of affairs before us when we designate a phenomenon as a psychic
 manifestation, and for that reason it is more expedient to put our
 assertion in this form: the phenomena are meaningful; they have a
 meaning. By "meaning" we understand significance, purpose, tendency and
 position in a sequence of psychic relations.
 
 There are a number of other occurrences which are very closely related
 to errors, but which this particular name no longer fits. We call them
 _accidental and symptomatic_ acts. They also have the appearance of
 being unmotivated, the appearance of insignificance and unimportance,
 but in addition, and more plainly, of superfluity. They are
 differentiated from errors by the absence of another intention with
 which they collide and by which they are disturbed. On the other side
 they pass over without a definite boundary line into the gestures and
 movements which we count among expressions of the emotions. Among these
 accidental acts belong all those apparently playful, apparently
 purposeless performances in connection with our clothing, parts of our
 body, objects within reach, as well as the omission of such
 performances, and the melodies which we hum to ourselves. I venture the
 assertion that all these phenomena are meaningful and capable of
 interpretation in the same way as are the errors, that they are small
 manifestations of other more important psychic processes, valid psychic
 acts. But I do not intend to linger over this new enlargement of the
 province of psychic phenomena, but rather to return to the topic of
 errors, in the consideration of which the important psychoanalytic
 inquiries can be worked out with far greater clarity.
 
 The most interesting questions which we formulated while considering
 errors, and which we have not yet answered, are, I presume, the
 following: We said that the errors are the result of the mutual
 interference of two different intentions, of which the one can be called
 the intention interfered with, and the other the interfering intention.
 The intentions interfered with give rise to no further questions, but
 concerning the others we want to know, firstly, what kind of intentions
 are these which arise as disturbers of others, and secondly, in what
 proportions are the interfering related to the interfered?
 
 Will you permit me again to take the slip of the tongue as
 representative of the whole species and allow me to answer the second
 question before the first?
 
 The interfering intention in the tongue slip may stand in a significant
 relation to the intention interfered with, and then the former contains
 a contradiction of the latter, correcting or supplementing it. Or, to
 take a less intelligible and more interesting case, the interfering
 intention has nothing to do with the intention interfered with.
 
 Proofs for the first of the two relations we can find without trouble in
 the examples which we already know and in others similar to those. In
 almost all cases of tongue slips where one says the contrary of what he
 intended, where the interfering intention expresses the antithesis of
 the intention interfered with, the error is the presentation of the
 conflict between two irreconcilable strivings. "I declare the meeting
 opened, but would rather have it closed," is the meaning of the
 president's slip. A political paper which has been accused of
 corruptibility, defends itself in an article meant to reach a climax in
 the words: "Our readers will testify that we have always interceded for
 the good of all in the most _disinterested_ manner." But the editor who
 had been entrusted with the composition of the defence, wrote, "in the
 most _interested_ manner." That is, he thinks "To be sure, I have to
 write this way, but I know better." A representative of the people who
 urges that the Kaiser should be told the truth "_rckhaltlos_," hears an
 inner voice which is frightened by his boldness, and which through a
 slip changes the "_rckhaltlos_" into "_rckgratlos_."[17]
 
 In the examples familiar to you, which give the impression of
 contraction and abbreviation, it is a question of a correction, an
 addition or continuation by which the second tendency manifests itself
 together with the first. "Things were revealed, but better say it right
 out, they were _filthy_, therefore, things were _refiled_."[18] "The
 people who understand this topic can be counted on the _fingers of one
 hand_, but no, there is really only _one_ who understands it; therefore,
 counted _on one finger_." Or, "My husband may eat and drink whatever
 _he_ wants. But you know very well that _I_ don't permit him to want
 anything; therefore he may eat and drink whatever _I want_." In all
 these cases, therefore, the slip arises from the content of the
 intention itself, or is connected with it.
 
 The other type of relationship between the two interfering intentions
 seems strange. If the interfering intention has nothing to do with the
 content of the one interfered with, where then does it come from and how
 does it happen to make itself manifest as interference just at that
 point? The observation which alone can furnish an answer here,
 recognizes the fact that the interference originates in a thought
 process which has just previously occupied the person in question and
 which then has that after-effect, irrespective of whether it has already
 found expression in speech or not. It is therefore really to be
 designated as perseveration, but not necessarily as the perseveration of
 spoken words. Here also there is no lack of an associative connection
 between the interfering and the interfered with, yet it is not given in
 the content, but artificially restored, often by means of forced
 connecting links.
 
 Here is a simple example of this, which I myself observed. In our
 beautiful Dolomites, I meet two Viennese ladies who are gotten up as
 tourists. I accompany them a short distance and we discuss the
 pleasures, but also the difficulties of the tourist's mode of life. One
 lady admits this way of spending the day entails much discomfort. "It is
 true," she says, "that it is not at all pleasant, when one has tramped
 all day in the sun, and waist and shirt are soaked through." At this
 point in this sentence she suddenly has to overcome a slight hesitancy.
 Then she continues: "But then, when one gets _nach Hose_, and can
 change...."[19] We did not analyze this slip, but I am sure you can
 easily understand it. The lady wanted to make the enumeration more
 complete and to say, "Waist, shirt and drawers." From motives of
 propriety, the mention of the drawers (Hose) was suppressed, but in the
 next sentence of quite independent content the unuttered word came to
 light as a distortion of the similar word, house (Hause).
 
 Now we can turn at last to the long delayed main question, namely, what
 kind of intentions are these which get themselves expressed in an
 unusual way as interferences of others, intentions within whose great
 variety we wish nevertheless to find what is common to them all! If we
 examine a series of them to this end, we will soon find that they divide
 themselves into three groups. In the first group belong the cases in
 which the interfering tendency is known to the speaker, and which,
 moreover, was felt by him before the slip. Thus, in the case of the slip
 "_refilled_," the speaker not only admits that he agreed with the
 judgment "_filthy_," on the incidents in question, but also that he had
 the intention (which he later abandoned) of giving it verbal expression.
 A second group is made up of those cases in which the interfering
 tendency is immediately recognized by the subject as his own, but in
 which he is ignorant of the fact that the interfering tendency was
 active in him just before the slip. He therefore accepts our
 interpretation, yet remains to a certain extent surprised by it.
 Examples of this situation can perhaps more easily be found among errors
 other than slips of the tongue. In a third group the interpretation of
 the interfering intention is energetically denied by the speaker. He not
 only denies that the interfering tendency was active in him before the
 slip, but he wants to assert that it was at all times completely alien
 to him. Will you recall the example of "hiccough," and the absolutely
 impolite disavowal which I received at the hands of this speaker by my
 disclosure of the interfering intention. You know that so far we have no
 unity in our conception of these cases. I pay no attention to the
 toastmaster's disavowal and hold fast to my interpretation; while you, I
 am sure, are yet under the influence of his repudiation and are
 considering whether one ought not to forego the interpretation of such
 slips, and let them pass as purely physiological acts, incapable of
 further analysis. I can imagine what it is that frightens you off. My
 interpretation draws the conclusion that intentions of which he himself
 knows nothing may manifest themselves in a speaker, and that I can
 deduce them from the circumstances. You hesitate before so novel a
 conclusion and one so full of consequences. I understand that, and
 sympathize with you to that extent. But let us make one thing clear: if
 you want consistently to carry through the conception of errors which
 you have derived from so many examples, you must decide to accept the
 above conclusion, even though it be unpleasant. If you cannot do so, you
 must give up that understanding of errors which you have so recently
 won.
 
 Let us tarry a while over the point which unites the three groups, which
 is common to the three mechanisms of tongue slips. Fortunately, that is
 unmistakable. In the first two groups the interfering tendency is
 recognized by the speaker; in the first there is the additional fact
 that it showed itself immediately before the slip. In both cases,
 however, _it was suppressed. The speaker had made up his mind not to
 convert the interfering tendency into speech and then the slip of the
 tongue occurred; that is to say, the suppressed tendency obtains
 expression against the speaker's will, in that it changes the expression
 of the intention which he permits, mixes itself with it or actually puts
 itself in its place._ This is, then, the mechanism of the tongue slip.
 
 From my point of view, I can also best harmonize the processes of the
 third group with the mechanism here described. I need only assume that
 these three groups are differentiated by the different degrees of
 effectiveness attending the suppression of an intention. In the first
 group, the intention is present and makes itself perceptible before the
 utterance of the speaker; not until then does it suffer the suppression
 for which it indemnifies itself in the slip. In the second group the
 suppression extends farther. The intention is no longer perceptible
 before the subject speaks. It is remarkable that the interfering
 intention is in no way deterred by this from taking part in the
 causation of the slip. Through this fact, however, the explanation of
 the procedure in the third group is simplified for us. I shall be so
 bold as to assume that in the error a tendency can manifest itself which
 has been suppressed for even a longer time, perhaps a very long time,
 which does not become perceptible and which, therefore, cannot be
 directly denied by the speaker. But leave the problem of the third
 group; from the observation of the other cases, you most draw the
 conclusion that _the suppression of the existing intention to say
 something is the indispensable condition of the occurrence of a slip_.
 
 We may now claim that we have made further progress in understanding
 errors. We know not only that they are psychic acts, in which we can
 recognize meaning and purpose, and that they arise through the mutual
 interference of two different intentions, but, in addition, we know that
 one of these intentions must have undergone a certain suppression in
 order to be able to manifest itself through interference with the other.
 The interfering intention must itself first be interfered with before it
 can become interfering. Naturally, a complete explanation of the
 phenomena which we call errors is not attained to by this. We
 immediately see further questions arising, and suspect in general that
 there will be more occasions for new questions as we progress further.
 We might, for example, ask why the matter does not proceed much more
 simply. If there is an existing purpose to suppress a certain tendency
 instead of giving it expression, then this suppression should be so
 successful that nothing at all of the latter comes to light; or it could
 even fail, so that the suppressed tendency attains to full expression.
 But errors are compromise formations. They mean some success and some
 failure for each of the two purposes. The endangered intention is
 neither completely suppressed nor does it, without regard to individual
 cases, come through wholly intact. We can imagine that special
 conditions must be existent for the occurrence of such interference or
 compromise formations, but then we cannot even conjecture what sort they
 may be. Nor do I believe that we can uncover these unknown circumstances
 through further penetration into the study of errors. Rather will it be
 necessary thoroughly to examine other obscure fields of psychic life.
 Only the analogies which we there encounter can give us the courage to
 draw those assumptions which are requisite to a more fundamental
 elucidation of errors. And one thing more. Even working with small
 signs, as we have constantly been in the habit of doing in this
 province, brings its dangers with it. There is a mental disease,
 combined paranoia, in which the utilization of such small signs is
 practiced without restriction and I naturally would not wish to give it
 as my opinion that these conclusions, built up on this basis, are
 correct throughout. We can be protected from such dangers only by the
 broad basis of our observations, by the repetition of similar
 impressions from the most varied fields of psychic life.
 
 We will therefore leave the analysis of errors here. But may I remind
 you of one thing more: keep in mind, as a prototype, the manner in which
 we have treated these phenomena. You can see from these examples what
 the purposes of our psychology are. We do not wish merely to describe
 the phenomena and to classify them, but to comprehend them as signs of a
 play of forces in the psychic, as expressions of tendencies striving to
 an end, tendencies which work together or against one another. We seek a
 dynamic conception of psychic phenomena. The perceived phenomena must,
 in our conception, give way to those strivings whose existence is only
 assumed.
 
 Hence we will not go deeper into the problem of errors, but we can still
 undertake an expedition through the length of this field, in which we
 will rencounter things familiar to us, and will come upon the tracks of
 some that are new. In so doing we will keep to the division which we
 made in the beginning of our study, of the three groups of tongue slips,
 with the related forms of pen slips, misreadings, mishearings,
 forgetfulness with its subdivisions according to the forgotten object
 (proper names, foreign words, projects, impressions), and the other
 faults of mistaking, mislaying and losing objects. Errors, in so far as
 they come into our consideration, are grouped in part with
 forgetfulness, in part with mistakes.
 
 We have already spoken in such detail of tongue slips, and yet there are
 still several points to be added. Linked with tongue slips are smaller
 effective phenomena which are not entirely without interest. No one
 likes to make a slip of the tongue; often one fails to hear his own
 slip, though never that of another. Tongue slips are in a certain sense
 infectious; it is not at all easy to discuss tongue slips without
 falling into slips of the tongue oneself. The most trifling forms of
 tongue slips are just the ones which have no particular illumination to
 throw on the hidden psychic processes, but are nevertheless not
 difficult to penetrate in their motivation. If, for example, anyone
 pronounces a long vowel as a short, in consequence of an interference no
 matter how motivated, he will for that reason soon after lengthen a
 short vowel and commit a new slip in compensation for the earlier one.
 The same thing occurs when one has pronounced a double vowel unclearly
 and hastily; for example, an "eu" or an "oi" as "ei." The speaker tries
 to correct it by changing a subsequent "ei" or "eu" to "oi." In this
 conduct the determining factor seems to be a certain consideration for
 the hearer, who is not to think that it is immaterial to the speaker how
 he treats his mother tongue. The second, compensating distortion
 actually has the purpose of making the hearer conscious of the first,
 and of assuring him that it also did not escape the speaker. The most
 frequent and most trifling cases of slips consist in the contractions
 and foresoundings which show themselves in inconspicuous parts of
 speech. One's tongue slips in a longer speech to such an extent that the
 last word of the intended speech is said too soon. That gives the
 impression of a certain impatience to be finished with the sentence and
 gives proof in general of a certain resistance to communicating this
 sentence or speech as a whole. Thus we come to borderline cases in which
 the differences between the psychoanalytic and the common physiological
 conception of tongue slips are blended. We assume that in these cases
 there is a tendency which interferes with the intention of the speech.
 But it can only announce that it is present, and not what its own
 intention is. The interference which it occasions then follows some
 sound influences or associative relationship, and may be considered as a
 distraction of attention from the intended speech. But neither this
 disturbance of attention nor the associative tendency which has been
 activated, strikes the essence of the process. This hints, however, at
 the existence of an intention which interferes with the purposed speech,
 an intention whose nature cannot (as is possible in all the more
 pronounced cases of tongue slips) this time be guessed from its effects.
 
 Slips of the pen, to which I now turn, are in agreement with those of
 the tongue to the extent that we need expect to gain no new points of
 view from them. Perhaps we will be content with a small gleaning. Those
 very common little slips of the pen--contractions, anticipations of
 later words, particularly of the last words--again point to a general
 distaste for writing, and to an impatience to be done; the pronounced
 effects of pen slips permit the nature and purpose of the interfering
 tendency to be recognized. One knows in general that if one finds a
 slip of the pen in a letter everything was not as usual with the writer.
 What was the matter one cannot always establish. The pen slip is
 frequently as little noticed by the person who makes it as the tongue
 slip. The following observation is striking: There are some persons who
 have the habit of always rereading a letter they have written before
 sending it. Others do not do so. But if the latter make an exception and
 reread the letter, they always have the opportunity of finding and
 correcting a conspicuous pen slip. How can that be explained? This looks
 as if these persons knew that they had made a slip of the pen while
 writing the letter. Shall we really believe that such is the case?
 
 There is an interesting problem linked with the practical significance
 of the pen slip. You may recall the case of the murderer H., who made a
 practice of obtaining cultures of the most dangerous disease germs from
 scientific institutions, by pretending to be a bacteriologist, and who
 used these cultures to get his close relatives out of the way in this
 most modern fashion. This man once complained to the authorities of such
 an institution about the ineffectiveness of the culture which had been
 sent to him, but committed a pen slip and instead of the words, "in my
 attempts on mice and guinea pigs," was plainly written, "in my attempts
 on people."[20] This slip even attracted the attention of the doctors at
 the institution, but so far as I know, they drew no conclusion from it.
 Now what do you think? Might not the doctors better have accepted the
 slip as a confession and instituted an investigation through which the
 murderer's handiwork would have been blocked in time? In this case was
 not ignorance of our conception of errors to blame for an omission of
 practical importance? Well, I am inclined to think that such a slip
 would surely seem very suspicious to me, but a fact of great importance
 stands in the way of its utilization as a confession. The thing is not
 so simple. The pen slip is surely an indication, but by itself it would
 not have been sufficient to instigate an investigation. That the man is
 preoccupied with the thought of infecting human beings, the slip
 certainly does betray, but it does not make it possible to decide
 whether this thought has the value of a clear plan of injury or merely
 of a phantasy having no practical consequence. It is even possible that
 the person who made such a slip will deny this phantasy with the best
 subjective justification and will reject it as something entirely alien
 to him. Later, when we give our attention to the difference between
 psychic and material reality, you will understand these possibilities
 even better. Yet this is again a case in which an error later attained
 unsuspected significance.
 
 In misreading, we encounter a psychic situation which is clearly
 differentiated from that of the tongue slips or pen slips. The one of
 the two rival tendencies is here replaced by a sensory stimulus and
 perhaps for that reason is less resistant. What one is reading is not a
 production of one's own psychic activity, as is something which one
 intends to write. In a large majority of cases, therefore, the
 misreading consists in a complete substitution. One substitutes another
 word for the word to be read, and there need be no connection in meaning
 between the text and the product of the misreading. In general, the slip
 is based upon a word resemblance. Lichtenberg's example of reading
 "_Agamemnon_" for "_angenommen_"[21] is the best of this group. If one
 wishes to discover the interfering tendency which causes the misreading,
 one may completely ignore the misread text and can begin the analytic
 investigation with the two questions: What is the first idea that occurs
 in free association to the product of the misreading, and, in what
 situation did the misreading occur? Now and then a knowledge of the
 latter suffices by itself to explain the misreading. Take, for example,
 the individual who, distressed by certain needs, wanders about in a
 strange city and reads the word "_Closethaus_" on a large sign on the
 first floor of a house. He has just time to be surprised at the fact
 that the sign has been nailed so high up when he discovers that,
 accurately observed, the sign reads "_Corset-haus_." In other cases the
 misreadings which are independent of the text require a penetrating
 analysis which cannot be accomplished without practice and confidence in
 the psychoanalytic technique. But generally it is not a matter of much
 difficulty to obtain the elucidation of a misreading. The substituted
 word, as in the example, "_Agamemnon_," betrays without more ado the
 thought sequence from which the interference results. In war times, for
 instance, it is very common for one to read into everything which
 contains a similar word structure, the names of the cities, generals and
 military expressions which are constantly buzzing around us. In this
 way, whatever interests and preoccupies one puts itself in the place of
 that which is foreign or uninteresting. The after-effects of thoughts
 blur the new perceptions.
 
 There are other types of misreadings, in which the text itself arouses
 the disturbing tendency, by means of which it is then most often changed
 into its opposite. One reads something which is undesired; analysis then
 convinces one that an intensive wish to reject what has been read should
 be made responsible for the alteration.
 
 In the first mentioned and more frequent cases of misreading, two
 factors are neglected to which we gave an important role in the
 mechanism of errors: the conflict of two tendencies and the suppression
 of one which then indemnifies itself by producing the error. Not that
 anything like the opposite occurs in misreading, but the importunity of
 the idea content which leads to misreading is nevertheless much more
 conspicuous than the suppression to which the latter may previously have
 been subjected. Just these two factors are most tangibly apparent in the
 various situations of errors of forgetfulness.
 
 Forgetting plans is actually uniform in meaning; its interpretation is,
 as we have heard, not denied even by the layman. The tendency
 interfering with the plan is always an antithetical intention, an
 unwillingness concerning which we need only discover why it does not
 come to expression in a different and less disguised manner. But the
 existence of this unwillingness is not to be doubted. Sometimes it is
 possible even to guess something of the motives which make it necessary
 for this unwillingness to disguise itself, and it always achieves its
 purpose by the error resulting from the concealment, while its rejection
 would be certain were it to present itself as open contradiction. If an
 important change in the psychic situation occurs between the formulation
 of the plan and its execution, in consequence of which the execution of
 the plan does not come into question, then the fact that the plan was
 forgotten is no longer in the class of errors. One is no longer
 surprised at it, and one understands that it would have been superfluous
 to have remembered the plan; it was then permanently or temporarily
 effaced. Forgetting a plan can be called an error only when we have no
 reason to believe there was such an interruption.
 
 The cases of forgetting plans are in general so uniform and transparent
 that they do not interest us in our investigation. There are two points,
 however, from which we can learn something new. We have said that
 forgetting, that is, the non-execution of a plan, points to an antipathy
 toward it. This certainly holds, but, according to the results of our
 investigations, the antipathy may be of two sorts, direct and indirect.
 What is meant by the latter can best be explained by one or two
 examples. If a patron forgets to say a good word for his proteg to a
 third person, it may be because the patron is not really very much
 interested in the proteg, therefore, has no great inclination to
 commend him. It is, at any rate, in this sense that the proteg will
 construe his patron's forgetfulness. But the matter may be more
 complicated. The patron's antipathy to the execution of the plan may
 originate in another quarter and fasten upon quite a different point. It
 need not have anything to do with the proteg, but may be directed
 toward the third person to whom the good word was to have been said.
 Thus, you see what doubts here confront the practical application of our
 interpretation. The proteg, despite a correct interpretation of the
 forgetfulness, stands in danger of becoming too suspicious, and of doing
 his patron a grave injustice. Or, if an individual forgets a rendezvous
 which he has made, and which he had resolved to keep, the most frequent
 basis will certainly be the direct aversion to encountering this person.
 But analysis might here supply the information that the interfering
 intention was not directed against that person, but against the place in
 which they were to have met, and which was avoided because of a painful
 memory associated with it. Or, if one forgets to mail a letter, the
 counter-intention may be directed against the content of that letter,
 yet this does not in any way exclude the possibility that the letter is
 harmless in itself, and only subject to the counter-intention because
 something about it reminds the writer of another letter written
 previously, which, in fact, did afford a basis for the antipathy. One
 can say in such a case that the antipathy has here transferred itself
 from that former letter where it was justified to the present one in
 which it really has no meaning. Thus you see that one must always
 exercise restraint and caution in the application of interpretations,
 even though the interpretations are justified. That which is
 psychologically equivalent may nevertheless in practice be very
 ambiguous.
 
 Phenomena such as these will seem very unusual to you. Perhaps you are
 inclined to assume that the "indirect" antipathy is enough to
 characterize the incident as pathological. Yet I can assure you that it
 also occurs in a normal and healthy setting. I am in no way willing to
 admit the unreliability of our analytic interpretation. After all, the
 above-discussed ambiguity of plan-forgetting exists only so long as we
 have not attempted an analysis of the case, and are interpreting it only
 on the basis of our general suppositions. When we analyze the person in
 question, we discover with sufficient certainty in each case whether or
 not it is a direct antipathy, or what its origin is otherwise.
 
 A second point is the following: when we find in a large majority of
 cases that the forgetting of a plan goes back to an antipathy, we gain
 courage to extend this solution to another series of cases in which the
 analyzed person does not confirm, but denies, the antipathy which we
 inferred. Take as an example the exceedingly frequent incidents of
 forgetting to return books which one has borrowed, or forgetting to pay
 one's bills or debts. We will be so bold as to accuse the individual in
 question of intending to keep the books and not to pay the debts, while
 he will deny such an intention but will not be in a position to give us
 any other explanation of his conduct. Thereupon we insist that he has
 the intention, only he knows nothing about it; all we need for our
 inference is to have the intention betray itself through the effect of
 the forgetfulness. The subject may then repeat that he had merely
 forgotten it. You now recognize the situation as one in which we once
 before found ourselves. If we wish to be consistent in our
 interpretation, an interpretation which has been proved as manifold as
 it is justified, we will be unavoidably forced to the conclusion that
 there are tendencies in a human being which can become effective without
 his being conscious of them. By so doing, however, we place ourselves in
 opposition to all the views which prevail in daily life and in
 psychology.
 
 Forgetting proper names and foreign names as well as foreign words can
 be traced in the same manner to a counter-intention which aims either
 directly or indirectly at the name in question. I have already given you
 an example of such direct antipathy. The indirect causation, however, is
 particularly frequent and generally necessitates careful analysis for
 its determination. Thus, for example, in war times which force us to
 sacrifice so many of our former inclinations, the ability to recall
 proper names also suffers severely in consequence of the most peculiar
 connections. A short time ago it happened that I could not reproduce the
 name of that harmless Moravian city of Bisenz, and analysis showed that
 no direct dislike was to blame, but rather the sound resemblance to the
 name of the Bisenzi palace in Orrieto, in which I used to wish I might
 live. As a motive for the antagonism to remembering the name, we here
 encounter for the first time a principle which will later disclose to us
 its whole tremendous significance in the causation of neurotic symptoms,
 viz., the aversion on the part of the memory to remembering anything
 which is connected with unpleasant experience and which would revive
 this unpleasantness by a reproduction. This intention of avoiding
 unpleasantness in recollections of other psychic acts, the psychic
 flight from unpleasantness, we may recognize as the ultimate effective
 motive not only for the forgetting of names, but also for many other
 errors, such as omissions of action, etc.
 
 Forgetting names does, however, seem to be especially facilitated
 psycho-physiologically and therefore also occurs in cases in which the
 interference of an unpleasantness-motive cannot be established. If
 anyone once has a tendency to forget names, you can establish by
 analytical investigation that he not only loses names because he himself
 does not like them, or because they remind him of something he does not
 like, but also because the same name in his mind belongs to another
 chain of associations, with which he has more intimate relations. The
 name is anchored there, as it were, and denied to the other associations
 activated at the moment. If you will recall the tricks of mnemonic
 technique you will ascertain with some surprise that one forgets names
 in consequence of the same associations which one otherwise purposely
 forms in order to save them from being forgotten. The most conspicuous
 example of this is afforded by proper names of persons, which
 conceivably enough must have very different psychic values for different
 people. For example, take a first name, such as Theodore. To one of you
 it will mean nothing special, to another it means the name of his
 father, brother, friend, or his own name. Analytic experience will then
 show you that the first person is not in danger of forgetting that a
 certain stranger bears this name, while the latter will be constantly
 inclined to withhold from the stranger this name which seems reserved
 for intimate relationships. Let us now assume that this associative
 inhibition can come into contact with the operation of the
 unpleasantness-principle, and in addition with an indirect mechanism,
 and you will be in a position to form a correct picture of the
 complexity of causation of this temporary name-forgetting. An adequate
 analysis that does justice to the facts, however, will completely
 disclose these complications.
 
 Forgetting impressions and experiences shows the working of the tendency
 to keep unpleasantness from recollection much more clearly and
 conclusively than does the forgetting of names. It does not, of course,
 belong in its entirety to the category of errors, but only in so far as
 it seems to us conspicuous and unjustified, measured by the measuring
 stick of our accustomed conception--thus, for example, where the
 forgetfulness strikes fresh or important impressions or impressions
 whose loss tears a hole in the otherwise well-remembered sequence. Why
 and how it is in general that we forget, particularly why and how we
 forget experiences which have surely left the deepest impressions, such
 as the incidents of our first years of childhood, is quite a different
 problem, in which the defense against unpleasant associations plays a
 certain role but is far from explaining everything. That unpleasant
 impressions are easily forgotten is an indubitable fact. Various
 psychologists have observed it, and the great Darwin was so struck by it
 that he made the "golden rule" for himself of writing down with
 particular care observations which seemed unfavorable to his theory,
 since he had convinced himself that they were just the ones which would
 not stick in his memory.
 
 Those who hear for the first time of this principle of defense against
 unpleasant recollections by means of forgetting, seldom fail to raise
 the objection that they, on the contrary, have had the experience that
 just the painful is hard to forget, inasmuch as it always comes back to
 mind to torture the person against his will--as, for example, the
 recollection of an insult or humiliation. This fact is also correct, but
 the objection is not valid. It is important that one begin betimes to
 reckon with the fact that the psychic life is the arena of the struggles
 and exercises of antagonistic tendencies, or, to express it in
 non-dynamic terminology, that it consists of contradictions and paired
 antagonisms. Information concerning one specific tendency is of no avail
 for the exclusion of its opposite; there is room for both of them. It
 depends only on how the opposites react upon each other, what effects
 will proceed from the one and what from the other.
 
 Losing and mislaying objects is of especial interest to us because of
 the ambiguity and the multiplicity of tendencies in whose services the
 errors may act. The common element in all cases is this, that one wished
 to lose something. The reasons and purposes thereof vary. One loses an
 object when it has become damaged, when one intends to replace it with a
 better one, when one has ceased to like it, when it came from a person
 whose relations to one have become strained, or when it was obtained
 under circumstances of which one no longer wishes to think. The same
 purpose may be served by letting the object fall, be damaged or broken.
 In the life of society it is said to have been found that unwelcome and
 illegitimate children are much more often frail than those born in
 wedlock. To reach this result we do not need the coarse technique of the
 so-called angel-maker. A certain remissness in the care of the child is
 said to suffice amply. In the preservation of objects, the case might
 easily be the same as with the children.
 
 But things may be singled out for loss without their having forfeited
 any of their value, namely, when there exists the intention to sacrifice
 something to fate in order to ward off some other dreaded loss. Such
 exorcisings of fate are, according to the findings of analysis, still
 very frequent among us; therefore, the loss of things is often a
 voluntary sacrifice. In the same way losing may serve the purposes of
 obstinacy or self-punishment. In short, the more distant motivation of
 the tendency to get rid of a thing oneself by means of losing it is not
 overlooked.
 
 Mistakes, like other errors, are often used to fulfill wishes which one
 ought to deny oneself. The purpose is thus masked as fortunate
 accident; for instance, one of our friends once took the train to make a
 call in the suburbs, despite the clearest antipathy to so doing, and
 then, in changing cars, made the mistake of getting into the train which
 took him back to the city. Or, if on a trip one absolutely wants to make
 a longer stay at a half-way station, one is apt to overlook or miss
 certain connections, so that he is forced to make the desired
 interruption to the trip. Or, as once happened to a patient of mine whom
 I had forbidden to call up his fiance on the telephone, "by mistake"
 and "absent-mindedly" he asked for a wrong number when he wanted to
 telephone to me, so that he was suddenly connected with the lady. A
 pretty example and one of practical significance in making a direct
 mistake is the observation of an engineer at a preliminary hearing in a
 damage suit:
 
 "Some time ago I worked with several colleagues in the laboratory of a
 high school on a series of complicated elasticity experiments, a piece
 of work which we had undertaken voluntarily but which began to take more
 time than we had expected. One day as I went into the laboratory with my
 colleague F., the latter remarked how unpleasant it was to him to lose
 so much time that day, since he had so much to do at home. I could not
 help agreeing with him, and remarked half jokingly, alluding to an
 incident of the previous week: 'Let's hope that the machine gives out
 again so that we can stop work and go home early.'
 
 "In the division of labor it happened that F. was given the regulation
 of the valve of the press, that is to say, he was, by means of a
 cautious opening of the valve, to let the liquid pressure from the
 accumulator flow slowly into the cylinder of the hydraulic press. The
 man who was directing the job stood by the manometer (pressure gauge)
 and when the right pressure had been reached called out in a loud voice:
 'Stop.' At this command F. seized the valve and turned with all his
 might--to the left! (All valves, without exception, close to the right.)
 Thereby the whole pressure of the accumulator suddenly became effective
 in the press, a strain for which the connecting pipes are not designed,
 so that a connecting pipe immediately burst--quite a harmless defect,
 but one which nevertheless forced us to drop work for the day and go
 home.
 
 "It is characteristic, by the way, that some time afterward when we were
 discussing this occurrence, my friend F. had no recollection whatever
 of my remark, which I could recall with certainty."
 
 From this point you may reach the conjecture that it is not harmless
 accident which makes the hands of your domestics such dangerous enemies
 to your household property. But you can also raise the question whether
 it is always an accident when one damages himself and exposes his own
 person to danger. There are interests the value of which you will
 presently be able to test by means of the analysis of observations.
 
 Ladies and gentlemen, this is far from being all that might be said
 about errors. There is indeed much left to investigate and to discuss.
 But I am satisfied if, from our investigations to date, your previous
 views are somewhat shaken and if you have acquired a certain degree of
 liberality in the acceptance of new ones. For the rest, I must content
 myself with leaving you face to face with an unclear condition of
 affairs. We cannot prove all our axioms by the study of errors and,
 indeed, are by no means solely dependent on this material. The great
 value of errors for our purpose lies in the fact that they are very
 frequent phenomena that can easily be observed on oneself and the
 occurrence of which do not require a pathological condition. I should
 like to mention just one more of your unanswered questions before
 concluding: "If, as we have seen in many examples, people come so close
 to understanding errors and so often act as though they penetrated their
 meaning, how is it possible that they can so generally consider them
 accidental, senseless and meaningless, and can so energetically oppose
 their psychoanalytic elucidation?"
 
 You are right; that is conspicuous and demands an explanation. I shall
 not give this explanation to you, however, but shall guide you slowly to
 the connecting links from which the explanation will force itself upon
 you without any aid from me.
 
 
 
 
 II
 
 THE DREAM
 
 
 
 
 FIFTH LECTURE
 
 THE DREAM
 
 _Difficulties and Preliminary Approach_
 
 
 One day the discovery was made that the disease symptoms of certain
 nervous patients have a meaning.[22] Thereupon the psychoanalytic method
 of therapy was founded. In this treatment it happened that the patients
 also presented dreams in place of their symptoms. Herewith originated
 the conjecture that these dreams also have a meaning.
 
 We will not, however, pursue this historical path, but enter upon the
 opposite one. We wish to discover the meaning of dreams as preparation
 for the study of the neuroses. This inversion is justified, for the
 study of dreams is not only the best preparation for that of the
 neuroses, but the dream itself is also a neurotic symptom, and in fact
 one which possesses for us the incalculable advantage of occurring in
 all normals. Indeed, if all human beings were well and would dream, we
 could gain from their dreams almost all the insight to which the study
 of the neuroses has led.
 
 Thus it is that the dream becomes the object of psychoanalytic
 research--again an ordinary, little-considered phenomenon, apparently of
 no practical value, like the errors with which, indeed, it shares the
 character of occurring in normals. But otherwise the conditions are
 rather less favorable for our work. Errors had been neglected only by
 science, which had paid little attention to them; but at least it was no
 disgrace to occupy one's self with them. People said there are indeed
 more important things, but perhaps something may come of it.
 Preoccupation with the dream, however, is not merely impractical and
 superfluous, but actually ignominious; it carries the odium of the
 unscientific, awakens the suspicion of a personal leaning towards
 mysticism. The idea of a physician busying himself with dreams when even
 in neuropathology and psychiatry there are matters so much more
 serious--tumors the size of apples which incapacitate the organ of the
 psyche, hemorrhages, and chronic inflammations in which one can
 demonstrate changes in the tissues under the microscope! No, the dream
 is much too trifling an object, and unworthy of Science.
 
 And besides, it is a condition which in itself defies all the
 requirements of exact research--in dream investigation one is not even
 sure of one's object. A delusion, for example, presents itself in clear
 and definite outlines. "I am the Emperor of China," says the patient
 aloud. But the dream? It generally cannot be related at all. If anyone
 relates a dream, has he any guarantee that he has told it correctly, and
 not changed it during the telling, or invented an addition which was
 forced by the indefiniteness of his recollection? Most dreams cannot be
 remembered at all, are forgotten except for small fragments. And upon
 the interpretation of such material shall a scientific psychology or
 method of treatment for patients be based?
 
 A certain excess in judgment may make us suspicious. The objections to
 the dream as an object of research obviously go too far. The question of
 insignificance we have already had to deal with in discussing errors. We
 said to ourselves that important matters may manifest themselves through
 small signs. As concerns the indefiniteness of the dream, it is after
 all a characteristic like any other. One cannot prescribe the
 characteristics of an object. Moreover, there are clear and definite
 dreams. And there are other objects of psychiatric research which suffer
 from the same trait of indefiniteness, e.g., many compulsion ideas, with
 which even respectable and esteemed psychiatrists have occupied
 themselves. I might recall the last case which occurred in my practice.
 The patient introduced himself to me with the words, "I have a certain
 feeling as though I had harmed or had wished to harm some living
 thing--a child?--no, more probably a dog--perhaps pushed it off a
 bridge--or something else." We can overcome to some degree the
 difficulty of uncertain recollection in the dream if we determine that
 exactly what the dreamer tells us is to be taken as his dream, without
 regard to anything which he has forgotten or may have changed in
 recollection. And finally, one cannot make so general an assertion as
 that the dream is an unimportant thing. We know from our own experience
 that the mood in which one wakes up after a dream may continue
 throughout the whole day. Cases have been observed by physicians in
 which a psychosis begins with a dream and holds to a delusion which
 originated in it. It is related of historical personages that they drew
 their inspiration for important deeds from dreams. So we may ask whence
 comes the contempt of scientific circles for the dream?
 
 I think it is the reaction to their over-estimation in former times.
 Reconstruction of the past is notoriously difficult, but this much we
 may assume with certainty--if you will permit me the jest--that our
 ancestors of 3000 years ago and more, dreamed much in the way we do. As
 far as we know, all ancient peoples attached great importance to dreams
 and considered them of practical value. They drew omens for the future
 from dreams, sought premonitions in them. In those days, to the Greeks
 and all Orientals, a campaign without dream interpreters must have been
 as impossible as a campaign without an aviation scout to-day. When
 Alexander the Great undertook his campaign of conquests, the most famous
 dream interpreters were in attendance. The city of Tyrus, which was then
 still situated on an island, put up so fierce a resistance that
 Alexander considered the idea of raising the siege. Then he dreamed one
 night of a satyr dancing as if in triumph; and when he laid his dream
 before his interpreters he received the information that the victory
 over the city had been announced to him. He ordered the attack and took
 Tyrus. Among the Etruscans and the Romans other methods of discovering
 the future were in use, but the interpretation of dreams was practical
 and esteemed during the entire Hellenic-Roman period. Of the literature
 dealing with the topic at least the chief work has been preserved to us,
 namely, the book of Artemidoros of Daldis, who is supposed to have lived
 during the lifetime of the Emperor Hadrian. How it happened subsequently
 that the art of dream interpretation was lost and the dream fell into
 discredit, I cannot tell you. Enlightenment cannot have had much part in
 it, for the Dark Ages faithfully preserved things far more absurd than
 the ancient dream interpretation. The fact is, the interest in dreams
 gradually deteriorated into superstition, and could assert itself only
 among the ignorant. The latest misuse of dream interpretation in our day
 still tries to discover in dreams the numbers which are going to be
 drawn in the small lottery. On the other hand, the exact science of
 to-day has repeatedly dealt with dreams, but always only with the
 purpose of applying its physiological theories to the dream. By
 physicians, of course, the dream was considered as a non-psychic act, as
 the manifestation of somatic irritations in the psychic life. Binz
 (1876) pronounced the dream "a bodily process, in all cases useless, in
 many actually pathological, above which the world-soul and immortality
 are raised as high as the blue ether over the weed-grown sands of the
 lowest plain." Maury compared it with the irregular twitchings of St.
 Vitus' Dance in contrast to the co-ordinated movements of the normal
 person. An old comparison makes the content of the dream analogous to
 the tones which the "ten fingers of a musically illiterate person would
 bring forth if they ran over the keys of the instrument."
 
 Interpretation means finding a hidden meaning. There can be no question
 of interpretation in such an estimation of the dream process. Look up
 the description of the dream in Wundt, Jodl and other newer
 philosophers. You will find an enumeration of the deviations of dream
 life from waking thought, in a sense disparaging to the dream. The
 description points out the disintegration of association, the suspension
 of the critical faculty, the elimination of all knowledge, and other
 signs of diminished activity. The only valuable contribution to the
 knowledge of the dream which we owe to exact science pertains to the
 influence of bodily stimuli, operative during sleep, on the content of
 the dream. There are two thick volumes of experimental researches on
 dreams by the recently deceased Norwegian author, J. Mourly Vold,
 (translated into German in 1910 and 1912), which deal almost solely with
 the consequences of changes in the position of the limbs. They are
 recommended as the prototype of exact dream research. Now can you
 imagine what exact science would say if it discovered that we wish to
 attempt to find the meaning of dreams? It may be it has already said it,
 but we will not allow ourselves to be frightened off. If errors can have
 a meaning, the dream can, too, and errors in many cases have a meaning
 which has escaped exact science. Let us confess to sharing the prejudice
 of the ancients and the common people, and let us follow in the
 footsteps of the ancient dream interpreters.
 
 First of all, we must orient ourselves in our task, and take a bird's
 eye view of our field. What is a dream? It is difficult to say in one
 sentence. But we do not want to attempt any definition where a reference
 to the material with which everyone is familiar suffices. Yet we ought
 to select the essential element of the dream. How can that be found?
 There are such monstrous differences within the boundary which encloses
 our province, differences in every direction. The essential thing will
 very probably be that which we can show to be common to all dreams.
 
 Well, the first thing which is common to all dreams is that we are
 asleep during their occurrence. The dream is apparently the psychic life
 during sleep, which has certain resemblances to that of the waking
 condition, and on the other hand is distinguished from it by important
 differences. That was noted even in Aristotle's definition. Perhaps
 there are other connections obtaining between the dream and sleep. One
 can be awakened by a dream, one frequently has a dream when he wakes
 spontaneously or is forcibly awakened from sleep. The dream then seems
 to be an intermediate condition between sleeping and waking. Thus we are
 referred to the problem of sleep. What, then, is sleep?
 
 That is a physiological or biological problem concerning which there is
 still much controversy. We can form no decision on the point, but I
 think we may attempt a psychological characterization of sleep. Sleep is
 a condition in which I wish to have nothing to do with the external
 world, and have withdrawn my interest from it. I put myself to sleep by
 withdrawing myself from the external world and by holding off its
 stimuli. I also go to sleep when I am fatigued by the external world.
 Thus, by going to sleep, I say to the external world, "Leave me in
 peace, for I wish to sleep." Conversely, the child says, "I won't go to
 bed yet, I am not tired, I want to have some more fun." The biological
 intention of sleep thus seems to be recuperation; its psychological
 character, the suspension of interest in the external world. Our
 relation to the world into which we came so unwillingly, seems to
 include the fact that we cannot endure it without interruption. For this
 reason we revert from time to time to the pre-natal existence, that is,
 to the intra-uterine existence. At least we create for ourselves
 conditions quite similar to those obtaining at that time--warmth,
 darkness and the absence of stimuli. Some of us even roll ourselves
 into tight packages and assume in sleep a posture very similar to the
 intra-uterine posture. It seems as if the world did not wholly possess
 us adults, it has only two-thirds of our life, we are still one-third
 unborn. Each awakening in the morning is then like a new birth. We also
 speak of the condition after sleep with the words, "I feel as though I
 had been born anew," by which we probably form a very erroneous idea of
 the general feeling of the newly born. It may be assumed that the
 latter, on the contrary, feel very uncomfortable. We also speak of birth
 as "seeing the light of day." If that be sleep, then the dream is not on
 its program at all, rather it seems an unwelcome addition. We think,
 too, that dreamless sleep is the best and only normal sleep. There
 should be no psychic activity in sleep; if the psyche stirs, then just
 to that extent have we failed to reduplicate the foetal condition;
 remainders of psychic activity could not be completely avoided. These
 remainders are the dream. Then it really does seem that the dream need
 have no meaning. It was different in the case of errors; they were
 activities of the waking state. But when I am asleep, have quite
 suspended psychic activity and have suppressed all but certain of its
 remainders, then it is by no means inevitable that these remainders have
 a meaning. In fact, I cannot make use of this meaning, in view of the
 fact that the rest of my psyche is asleep. This must, of course, be a
 question only of twitching, like spasmodic reactions, a question only of
 psychic phenomena such as follow directly upon somatic stimulation. The
 dream, therefore, appears to be the sleep-disturbing remnant of the
 psychic activity of waking life, and we may make the resolution promptly
 to abandon a theme which is so ill-adapted to psychoanalysis.
 
 However, even if the dream is superfluous, it exists nevertheless and we
 may try to give an account of its existence. Why does not the psyche go
 to sleep? Probably because there is something which gives it no rest.
 Stimuli act upon the psyche, and it must react to them. The dream,
 therefore, is the way in which the psyche reacts to the stimuli acting
 upon it in the sleeping condition. We note here a point of approach to
 the understanding of the dream. We can now search through different
 dreams to discover what are the stimuli which seek to disturb the sleep
 and which are reacted to with dreams. Thus far we might be said to have
 discovered the first common element.
 
 Are there other common elements? Yes, it is undeniable that there are,
 but they are much more difficult to grasp and describe. The psychic
 processes of sleep, for example, have a very different character from
 those of waking. One experiences many things in the dream, and believes
 in them, while one really has experienced nothing but perhaps the one
 disturbing stimulus. One experiences them predominantly in visual
 images; feelings may also be interspersed in the dream as well as
 thoughts; the other senses may also have experiences, but after all the
 dream experiences are predominantly pictures. A part of the difficulty
 of dream telling comes from the fact that we have to transpose these
 pictures into words. "I could draw it," the dreamer says frequently,
 "but I don't know how to say it." That is not really a case of
 diminished psychic activity, like that of the feeble-minded in
 comparison with the highly gifted; it is something qualitatively
 different, but it is difficult to say wherein the difference lies. G. T.
 Fechner once hazarded the conjecture that the scene in which dreams are
 played is a different one from that of the waking perceptual life. To be
 sure, we do not understand this, do not know what we are to think of it,
 but the impression of strangeness which most dreams make upon us does
 really bear this out. The comparison of the dream activity with the
 effects of a hand untrained in music also fails at this point. The
 piano, at least, will surely answer with the same tones, even if not
 with melodies, as soon as by accident one brushes its keys. Let us keep
 this second common element of all dreams carefully in mind, even though
 it be not understood.
 
 Are there still further traits in common? I find none, and see only
 differences everywhere, differences indeed in the apparent length as
 well as the definiteness of the activities, participation of effects,
 durability, etc. All this really is not what we might expect of a
 compulsion-driven, irresistible, convulsive defense against a stimulus.
 As concerns the dimensions of dreams, there are very short ones which
 contain only one picture or a few, one thought--yes, even one word
 only--, others which are uncommonly rich in content, seem to dramatize
 whole novels and to last very long. There are dreams which are as plain
 as an experience itself, so plain that we do not recognize them as
 dreams for a long time after waking; others which are indescribably
 weak, shadowy and vague; indeed in one and the same dream, the
 overemphasized and the scarcely comprehensible, indefinite parts may
 alternate with each other. Dreams may be quite meaningful or at least
 coherent, yes, even witty, fantastically beautiful. Others, again, are
 confused, as if feeble-minded, absurd, often actually mad. There are
 dreams which leave us quite cold, others in which all the effects come
 to expression--pain deep enough for tears, fear strong enough to waken
 us, astonishment, delight, etc. Dreams are generally quickly forgotten
 upon waking, or they may hold over a day to such an extent as to be
 faintly and incompletely remembered in the evening. Others, for example,
 the dreams of childhood, are so well preserved that they stay in the
 memory thirty years later, like fresh experiences. Dreams, like
 individuals, may appear a single time, and never again, or they may
 repeat themselves unchanged in the same person, or with small
 variations. In short, this nightly psychic activity can avail itself of
 an enormous repertoire, can indeed compass everything which the psychic
 accomplishes by day, but yet the two are not the same.
 
 One might try to give an account of this many-sidedness of the dream by
 assuming that it corresponds to different intermediate stages between
 sleeping and waking, different degrees of incomplete sleep. Yes, but in
 that case as the psyche nears the waking state, the conviction that it
 is a dream ought to increase along with the value, content and
 distinctiveness of the dream product, and it would not happen that
 immediately beside a distinct and sensible dream fragment a senseless
 and indistinct one would occur, to be followed again by a goodly piece
 of work. Surely the psyche could not change its degree of somnolence so
 quickly. This explanation thus avails us nothing; at any rate, it cannot
 be accepted offhand.
 
 Let us, for the present, give up the idea of finding the meaning of the
 dream and try instead to clear a path to a better understanding of the
 dream by means of the elements common to all dreams. From the relation
 of dreams to the sleeping condition, we concluded that the dream is the
 reaction to a sleep-disturbing stimulus. As we have heard, this is the
 only point upon which exact experimental psychology can come to our
 assistance; it gives us the information that stimuli applied during
 sleep appear in the dream. There have been many such investigations
 carried out, including that of the above mentioned Mourly Vold. Indeed,
 each of us must at some time have been in a position to confirm this
 conclusion by means of occasional personal observations. I shall choose
 certain older experiments for presentation. Maury had such experiments
 made on his own person. He was allowed to smell cologne while dreaming.
 He dreamed that he was in Cairo in the shop of Johann Marina Farina, and
 therewith were linked further extravagant adventures. Or, he was
 slightly pinched in the nape of the neck; he dreamed of having a mustard
 plaster applied, and of a doctor who had treated him in childhood. Or, a
 drop of water was poured on his forehead. He was then in Italy,
 perspired profusely, and drank the white wine of Orvieto.
 
 What strikes us about these experimentally induced dreams we may perhaps
 be able to comprehend still more clearly in another series of stimulated
 dreams. Three dreams have been recounted by a witty observer,
 Hildebrand, all of them reactions to the sound of the alarm clock:
 
 "I go walking one spring morning and saunter through the green fields to
 a neighboring village. There I see the inhabitants in gala attire, their
 hymn books under their arms, going church-ward in great numbers. To be
 sure, this is Sunday, and the early morning service will soon begin. I
 decide to attend, but since I am somewhat overheated, decide to cool off
 in the cemetery surrounding the church. While I am there reading several
 inscriptions, I hear the bell ringer ascend the tower, and now see the
 little village church bell which is to give the signal for the beginning
 of the service. The bell hangs a good bit longer, then it begins to
 swing, and suddenly its strokes sound clear and penetrating, so clear
 and penetrating that they make an end of--my sleep. The bell-strokes,
 however, come from my alarm clock.
 
 "A second combination. It is a clear winter day. The streets are piled
 high with snow. I agree to go on a sleighing party, but must wait a long
 time before the announcement comes that the sleigh is at the door. Then
 follow the preparations for getting in--the fur coat is put on, the
 footwarmer dragged forth--and finally I am seated in my place. But the
 departure is still delayed until the reins give the waiting horses the
 tangible signal. Now they pull; the vigorously shaken bells begin their
 familiar Janizary music so powerfully that instantly the spider web of
 the dream is torn. Again it is nothing but the shrill tone of the alarm
 clock.
 
 "And still a third example. I see a kitchen maid walking along the
 corridor to the dining room with some dozens of plates piled high. The
 pillar of porcelain in her arms seems to me in danger of losing its
 balance. 'Take care!' I warn her. 'The whole load will fall to the
 ground.' Naturally, the inevitable retort follows: one is used to that,
 etc., and I still continue to follow the passing figure with
 apprehensive glances. Sure enough, at the threshold she stumbles--the
 brittle dishes fall and rattle and crash over the floor in a thousand
 pieces. But--the endless racket is not, as I soon notice, a real
 rattling, but really a ringing and with this ringing, as the awakened
 subject now realizes, the alarm has performed its duty."
 
 These dreams are very pretty, quite meaningful, not at all incoherent,
 as dreams usually are. We will not object to them on that score. That
 which is common to them all is that the situation terminates each time
 in a noise, which one recognizes upon waking up as the sound of the
 alarm. Thus we see here how a dream originates, but also discover
 something else. The dream does not recognize the alarm--indeed the alarm
 does not appear in the dream--the dream replaces the alarm sound with
 another, it interprets the stimulus which interrupts the sleep, but
 interprets it each time in a different way. Why? There is no answer to
 this question, it seems to be something arbitrary. But to understand the
 dream means to be able to say why it has chosen just this sound and no
 other for the interpretation of the alarm-clock stimulus. In quite
 analogous fashion, we must raise the objection to the Maury experiment
 that we see well enough that the stimulus appears in the dream, but that
 we do not discover why it appears in just this form; and that the form
 taken by the dream does not seem to follow from the nature of the
 sleep-disturbing stimulus. Moreover, in the Maury experiments a mass of
 other dream material links itself to the direct stimulus product; as,
 for example, the extravagant adventures in the cologne dream, for which
 one can give no account.
 
 Now I shall ask you to consider the fact that the waking dreams offer by
 far the best chances for determining the influence of external
 sleep-disturbing stimuli. In most of the other cases it will be more
 difficult. One does not wake up in all dreams, and in the morning, when
 one remembers the dream of the night, how can one discover the
 disturbing stimulus which was perhaps in operation at night? I did
 succeed once in subsequently establishing such a sound stimulus, though
 naturally only in consequence of special circumstances. I woke up one
 morning in a place in the Tyrolese Mountains, with the certainty that I
 had dreamt the Pope had died. I could not explain the dream, but then my
 wife asked me: "Did you hear the terrible bell ringing that broke out
 early this morning from all the churches and chapels?" No, I had heard
 nothing, my sleep is a sound one, but thanks to this information I
 understood my dream. How often may such stimuli incite the sleeper to
 dream without his knowing of them afterward? Perhaps often, perhaps
 infrequently; when the stimulus can no longer be traced, one cannot be
 convinced of its existence. Even without this fact we have given up
 evaluating the sleep disturbing stimuli, since we know that they can
 explain only a little bit of the dream, and not the whole dream
 reaction.
 
 But we need not give up this whole theory for that reason. In fact, it
 can be extended. It is clearly immaterial through what cause the sleep
 was disturbed and the psyche incited to dream. If the sensory stimulus
 is not always externally induced, it may be instead a stimulus
 proceeding from the internal organs, a so-called somatic stimulus. This
 conjecture is obvious, and it corresponds to the most popular conception
 of the origin of dreams. Dreams come from the stomach, one often hears
 it said. Unfortunately it may be assumed here again that the cases are
 frequent in which the somatic stimulus which operated during the night
 can no longer be traced after waking, and has thus become unverifiable.
 But let us not overlook the fact that many recognized experiences
 testify to the derivation of dreams from the somatic stimulus. It is in
 general indubitable that the condition of the internal organs can
 influence the dream. The relation of many a dream content to a
 distention of the bladder or to an excited condition of the genital
 organs, is so clear that it cannot be mistaken. From these transparent
 cases one can proceed to others in which, from the content of the dream,
 at least a justifiable conjecture may be made that such somatic stimuli
 have been operative, inasmuch as there is something in this content
 which may be conceived as elaboration, representation, interpretation
 of the stimuli. The dream investigator Schirmer (1861) insisted with
 particular emphasis on the derivation of the dream from organic stimuli,
 and cited several splendid examples in proof. For example, in a dream he
 sees "two rows of beautiful boys with blonde hair and delicate
 complexions stand opposite each other in preparation for a fight, fall
 upon each other, seize each other, take up the old position again, and
 repeat the whole performance;" here the interpretation of these rows of
 boys as teeth is plausible in itself, and it seems to become convincing
 when after this scene the dreamer "pulls a long tooth out of his jaws."
 The interpretation of "long, narrow, winding corridors" as intestinal
 stimuli, seems sound and confirms Schirmer's assertion that the dream
 above all seeks to represent the stimulus-producing organ by means of
 objects resembling it.
 
 Thus we must be prepared to admit that the internal stimuli may play the
 same role in the dream as the external. Unfortunately, their evaluation
 is subject to the same difficulties as those we have already
 encountered. In a large number of cases the interpretation of the
 stimuli as somatic remains uncertain and undemonstrable. Not all dreams,
 but only a certain portion of them, arouse the suspicion that an
 internal organic stimulus was concerned in their causation. And finally,
 the internal stimuli will be as little able as the external sensory
 stimuli to explain any more of the dream than pertains to the direct
 reaction to the stimuli. The origin, therefore, of the rest of the dream
 remains obscure.
 
 Let us, however, notice a peculiarity of dream life which becomes
 apparent in the study of these effects of stimuli. The dream does not
 simply reproduce the stimulus, but it elaborates it, it plays upon it,
 places it in a sequence of relationships, replaces it with something
 else. That is a side of dream activity which must interest us because it
 may lead us closer to the nature of the dream. If one does something
 under stimulation, then this stimulation need not exhaust the act.
 Shakespeare's _Macbeth_, for example, is a drama created on the occasion
 of the coronation of the King who for the first time wore upon his head
 the crown symbolizing the union of three countries. But does this
 historical occasion cover the content of the drama, does it explain its
 greatness and its riddle? Perhaps the external and internal stimuli,
 acting upon the sleeper, are only the incitors of the dream, of whose
 nature nothing is betrayed to us from our knowledge of that fact.
 
 The other element common to dreams, their psychic peculiarity, is on the
 one hand hard to comprehend, and on the other hand offers no point for
 further investigation. In dreams we perceive a thing for the most part
 in visual forms. Can the stimuli furnish a solution for this fact? Is it
 actually the stimulus which we experience? Why, then, is the experience
 visual when optic stimulation incited the dream only in the rarest
 cases? Or can it be proved, when we dream speeches, that during sleep a
 conversation or sounds resembling it reached our ear? This possibility I
 venture decisively to reject.
 
 If, from the common elements of dreams, we get no further, then let us
 see what we can do with their differences. Dreams are often senseless,
 blurred, absurd; but there are some that are meaningful, sober,
 sensible. Let us see if the latter, the sensible dreams, can give some
 information concerning the senseless ones. I will give you the most
 recent sensible dream which was told me, the dream of a young man: "I
 was promenading in Krtner Street, met Mr. X. there, whom I accompanied
 for a bit, and then I went to a restaurant. Two ladies and a gentleman
 seated themselves at my table. I was annoyed at this at first, and would
 not look at them. Then I did look, and found that they were quite
 pretty." The dreamer adds that the evening before the dream he had
 really been in Krtner Street, which is his usual route, and that he had
 met Mr. X. there. The other portion of the dream is no direct
 reminiscence, but bears a certain resemblance to a previous experience.
 Or another meaningful dream, that of a lady. "Her husband asks, 'Doesn't
 the piano need tuning?' She: 'It is not worth while; it has to be newly
 lined.'" This dream reproduces without much alteration a conversation
 which took place the day before between herself and her husband. What
 can we learn from these two sober dreams? Nothing but that you find them
 to be reproductions of daily life or ideas connected therewith. This
 would at least be something if it could be stated of all dreams. There
 is no question, however, that this applies to only a minority of dreams.
 In most dreams there is no sign of any connection with the previous day,
 and no light is thereby cast on the senseless and absurd dream. We know
 only that we have struck a new problem. We wish to know not only what it
 is that the dream says, but when, as in our examples, the dream speaks
 plainly, we also wish to know why and wherefore this recent experience
 is repeated in the dream.
 
 I believe you are as tired as I am of continuing attempts like these. We
 see, after all, that the greatest interest in a problem is inadequate if
 one does not know a path which will lead to a solution. Up to this point
 we have not found this path. Experimental psychology gave us nothing but
 a few very valuable pieces of information concerning the meaning of
 stimuli as dream incitors. We need expect nothing from philosophy except
 that lately it has taken haughtily to pointing out to us the
 intellectual inferiority of our object. Let us not apply to the occult
 sciences for help. History and popular tradition tell us that the dream
 is meaningful and significant; it sees into the future. Yet that is hard
 to accept and surely not demonstrable. Thus our first efforts end in
 entire helplessness.
 
 Unexpectedly we get a hint from a quarter toward which we have not yet
 looked. Colloquial usage--which after all is not an accidental thing but
 the remnant of ancient knowledge, though it should not be made use of
 without caution--our speech, that is to say, recognizes something which
 curiously enough it calls "day dreaming." Day dreams are phantasies.
 They are very common phenomena, again observable in the normal as well
 as in the sick, and access to their study is open to everyone in his own
 person. The most conspicuous feature about these phantastic productions
 is that they have received the name "day dreams," for they share neither
 of the two common elements of dreams. Their name contradicts the
 relation to the sleeping condition, and as regards the second common
 element, one does not experience or hallucinate anything, one only
 imagines it. One knows that it is a phantasy, that one is not seeing but
 thinking the thing. These day dreams appear in the period before
 puberty, often as early as the last years of childhood, continue into
 the years of maturity, are then either given up or retained through
 life. The content of these phantasies is dominated by very transparent
 motives. They are scenes and events in which the egoistic, ambitious and
 power-seeking desires of the individual find satisfaction. With young
 men the ambition phantasies generally prevail; in women, the erotic,
 since they have banked their ambition on success in love. But often
 enough the erotic desire appears in the background with men too; all the
 heroic deeds and incidents are after all meant only to win the
 admiration and favor of women. Otherwise these day dreams are very
 manifold and undergo changing fates. They are either, each in turn,
 abandoned after a short time and replaced by a new one, or they are
 retained, spun out into long stories, and adapted to changes in daily
 circumstances. They move with the time, so to speak, and receive from it
 a "time mark" which testifies to the influence of the new situation.
 They are the raw material of poetic production, for out of his day
 dreams the poet, with certain transformations, disguises and omissions,
 makes the situations which he puts into his novels, romances and dramas.
 The hero of the day dreams, however, is always the individual himself,
 either directly or by means of a transparent identification with
 another.
 
 Perhaps day dreams bear this name because of the similarity of their
 relation to reality, in order to indicate that their content is as
 little to be taken for real as that of dreams. Perhaps, however, this
 identity of names does nevertheless rest on a characteristic of the
 dream which is still unknown to us, perhaps even one of those
 characteristics which we are seeking. It is possible, on the other hand,
 that we are wrong in trying to read a meaning into this similarity of
 designation. Yet that can only be cleared up later.
 
 
 
 
 SIXTH LECTURE
 
 THE DREAM
 
 _Hypothesis and Technique of Interpretation_
 
 
 We must find a new path, a new method, in order to proceed with the
 investigation of the dream. I shall now make an obvious suggestion. Let
 us assume as a hypothesis for everything which follows, that _the dream
 is not a somatic but a psychic phenomenon_. You appreciate the
 significance of that statement, but what justification have we for
 making it? None; but that alone need not deter us from making it. The
 matter stands thus: If the dream is a somatic phenomenon, it does not
 concern us. It can be of interest to us only on the supposition that it
 is a _psychic_ phenomenon. Let us therefore work upon that assumption in
 order to see what comes of it. The result of our labor will determine
 whether we are to hold to this assumption and whether we may, in fact,
 consider it in turn a result. What is it that we really wish to achieve,
 to what end are we working? It is what one usually seeks to attain in
 the sciences, an understanding of phenomena, the creation of
 relationships between them, and ultimately, if possible, the extension
 of our control over them.
 
 Let us then proceed with the work on the assumption that the dream is a
 psychic phenomenon. This makes it an achievement and expression of the
 dreamer, but one that tells us nothing, one that we do not understand.
 What do you do when I make a statement you do not understand? You ask
 for an explanation, do you not? Why may we not do the same thing here,
 _ask the dreamer to give us the meaning of his dream_?
 
 If you will remember, we were in this same situation once before. It was
 when we were investigating errors, a case of a slip of the tongue.
 Someone said: "_Da sind dinge zum vorschwein gekommen_," whereupon we
 asked--no, luckily, not we, but others, persons in no way associated
 with psychoanalysis--these persons asked him what he meant by this
 unintelligible talk. He immediately answered that he had intended to say
 "_Das waren schweinereien_," but that he had suppressed this intention,
 in favor of the other, more gentle "_Da sind dinge zum vorschein
 gekommen_."[23] I explained to you at the time that this inquiry was
 typical of every psychoanalytical investigation, and now you understand
 that psychoanalysis follows the technique, as far as possible, of having
 the subjects themselves discover the solutions of their riddles. The
 dreamer himself, then, is to tell us the meaning of his dream.
 
 It is common knowledge, however, that this is not such an easy matter
 with dreams. In the case of slips, our method worked in a number of
 cases, but we encountered some where the subject did not wish to say
 anything--in fact, indignantly rejected the answer that we suggested.
 Instances of the first method are entirely lacking in the case of
 dreams; the dreamer always says he knows nothing. He cannot deny our
 interpretation, for we have none. Shall we then give up the attempt?
 Since he knows nothing and we know nothing and a third person surely
 knows nothing, it looks as though there were no possibility of
 discovering anything. If you wish, discontinue the investigation. But if
 you are of another mind, you can accompany me on the way. For I assure
 you, it is very possible, in fact, probable, that the dreamer does know
 what his dream means, but does _not know that he knows, and therefore
 believes he does not know_.
 
 You will point out to me that I am again making an assumption, the
 second in this short discourse, and that I am greatly reducing the
 credibility of my claim. On the assumption that the dream is a psychic
 phenomenon, on the further assumption that there are unconscious things
 in man which he knows without knowing that he knows, etc.--we need only
 realize clearly the intrinsic improbability of each of these two
 assumptions, and we shall calmly turn our attention from the conclusions
 to be derived from such premises.
 
 Yet, ladies and gentlemen, I have not invited you here to delude you or
 to conceal anything from you. I did, indeed, announce a _General
 Introduction to Psychoanalysis_, but I did not intend the title to
 convey that I was an oracle, who would show you a finished product with
 all the difficulties carefully concealed, all the gaps filled in and all
 the doubts glossed over, so that you might peacefully believe you had
 learned something new. No, precisely because you are beginners, I wanted
 to show you our science as it is, with all its hills and pitfalls,
 demands and considerations. For I know that it is the same in all
 sciences, and must be so in their beginnings particularly. I know, too,
 that teaching as a rule endeavors to hide these difficulties and these
 incompletely developed phases from the student. But that will not do in
 psychoanalysis. I have, as a matter of fact, made two assumptions, one
 within the other, and he who finds the whole too troublesome and too
 uncertain or is accustomed to greater security or more elegant
 derivations, need go no further with us. What I mean is, he should leave
 psychological problems entirely alone, for it must be apprehended that
 he will not find the sure and safe way he is prepared to go,
 traversable. Then, too, it is superfluous for a science that has
 something to offer to plead for auditors and adherents. Its results must
 create its atmosphere, and it must then bide its time until these have
 attracted attention to themselves.
 
 I would warn those of you, however, who care to continue, that my two
 assumptions are not of equal worth. The first, that the dream is a
 psychic phenomenon, is the assumption we wish to prove by the results of
 our work. The other has already been proved in another field, and I take
 the liberty only of transferring it from that field to our problem.
 
 Where, in what field of observation shall we seek the proof that there
 is in man a knowledge of which he is not conscious, as we here wish to
 assume in the case of the dreamer? That would be a remarkable, a
 surprising fact, one which would change our understanding of the psychic
 life, and which would have no need to hide itself. To name it would be
 to destroy it, and yet it pretends to be something real, a contradiction
 in terms. Nor does it hide itself. It is no result of the fact itself
 that we are ignorant of its existence and have not troubled sufficiently
 about it. That is just as little our fault as the fact that all these
 psychological problems are condemned by persons who have kept away from
 all observations and experiments which are decisive in this respect.
 
 The proof appeared in the field of hypnotic phenomena. When, in the year
 1889, I was a witness to the extraordinarily enlightening demonstrations
 of Siebault and Bernheim in Nancy, I witnessed also the following
 experiment: If one placed a man in the somnambulistic state, allowed him
 to have all manner of hallucinatory experience, and then woke him up, it
 appeared in the first instance that he knew nothing about what had
 happened during his hypnotic sleep. Bernheim then directly invited him
 to relate what had happened to him during the hypnosis. He maintained he
 was unable to recall anything. But Bernheim insisted, he persisted, he
 assured him he did know, that he must recall, and, incredible though it
 may seem, the man wavered, began to rack his memory, recalled in a
 shadowy way first one of the suggested experiences, then another; the
 recollection became more and more complete and finally was brought forth
 without a gap. The fact that he had this knowledge finally, and that he
 had had no experiences from any other source in the meantime, permits
 the conclusion that he knew of these recollections in the beginning.
 They were merely inaccessible, he did not know that he knew them; he
 believed he did not know them. This is exactly what we suspect in the
 dreamer.
 
 I trust you are taken by surprise by the establishment of this fact, and
 that you will ask me why I did not refer to this proof before in the
 case of the slips, where we credited the man who made a mistake in
 speech with intentions he knew nothing about and which he denied. "If a
 person believes he knows nothing concerning experiences, the memory of
 which, however, he retains," you might say, "it is no longer so
 improbable that there are also other psychic experiences within him of
 whose existence he is ignorant. This argument would have impressed us
 and advanced us in the understanding of errors." To be sure, I might
 then have referred to this but I reserved it for another place, where it
 was more necessary. Errors have in a measure explained themselves, have,
 in part, furnished us with the warning that we must assume the existence
 of psychic processes of which we know nothing, for the sake of the
 connection of the phenomena. In dreams we are compelled to look to other
 sources for explanations; and besides, I count on the fact that you will
 permit the inference I draw from hypnotism more readily in this
 instance. The condition in which we make mistakes most seem to you to
 be the normal one. It has no similarity to the hypnotic. On the other
 hand, there is a clear relationship between the hypnotic state and
 sleep, which is the essential condition of dreams. Hypnotism is known as
 artificial sleep; we say to the person whom we hypnotize, "Sleep," and
 the suggestions which we throw out are comparable to the dreams of
 natural sleep. The psychical conditions are in both cases really
 analogous. In natural sleep we withdraw our attention from the entire
 outside world; in the hypnotic, on the other hand, from the whole world
 with the exception of the one person who has hypnotized us, with whom we
 remain in touch. Furthermore, the so-called nurse's sleep in which the
 nurse remains in touch with the child, and can be waked only by him, is
 a normal counterpart of hypnotism. The transference of one of the
 conditions of hypnotism to natural sleep does not appear to be such a
 daring proceeding. The inferential assumption that there is also present
 in the case of the dreamer a knowledge of his dream, a knowledge which
 is so inaccessible that he does not believe it himself, does not seem to
 be made out of whole cloth. Let us note that at this point there appears
 a third approach to the study of the dream; from the sleep-disturbing
 stimuli, from the day-dreams, and now in addition, from the suggested
 dreams of the hypnotic state.
 
 Now we return, perhaps with increased faith, to our problem. Apparently
 it is very probable that the dreamer knows of his dream; the question
 is, how to make it possible for him to discover this knowledge, and to
 impart it to us? We do not demand that he give us the meaning of his
 dream at once, but he will be able to discover its origin, the thought
 and sphere of interest from which it springs. In the case of the errors,
 you will remember, the man was asked how he happened to use the wrong
 word, "_vorschwein_," and his next idea gave us the explanation. Our
 dream technique is very simple, an imitation of this example. We again
 ask how the subject happened to have the dream, and his next statement
 is again to be taken as an explanation. We disregard the distinction
 whether the dreamer believes or does not believe he knows, and treat
 both cases in the same way.
 
 This technique is very simple indeed, but I am afraid it will arouse
 your sharpest opposition. You will say, "a new assumption. The third!
 And the most improbable of all! If I ask the dreamer what he considers
 the explanation of his dream to be, his very next association is to be
 the desired explanation? But it may be he thinks of nothing at all, or
 his next thought may be anything at all. We cannot understand upon what
 we can base such anticipation. This, really, is putting too much faith
 in a situation where a slightly more critical attitude would be more
 suitable. Furthermore, a dream is not an isolated error, but consists of
 many elements. To which idea should we pin our faith?"
 
 You are right in all the non-essentials. A dream must indeed be
 distinguished from a word slip, even in the number of its elements. The
 technique is compelled to consider this very carefully. Let me suggest
 that we separate the dream into its elements, and carry on the
 investigation of each element separately; then the analogy to the
 word-slip is again set up. You are also correct when you say that in
 answer to the separate dream elements no association may occur to the
 dreamer. There are cases in which we accept this answer, and later you
 will hear what those cases are. They are, oddly enough, cases in which
 we ourselves may have certain associations. But in general we shall
 contradict the dreamer when he maintains he has no associations. We
 shall insist that he must have some association and--we shall be
 justified. He will bring forth some association, any one, it makes no
 difference to us. He will be especially facile with certain information
 which might be designated as historical. He will say, "that is something
 that happened yesterday" (as in the two "prosaic" dreams with which we
 are acquainted); or, "that reminds me of something that happened
 recently," and in this manner we shall notice that the act of
 associating the dreams with recent impressions is much more frequent
 than we had at first supposed. Finally, the dreamer will remember
 occurrences more remote from the dream, and ultimately even events in
 the far past.
 
 But in the essential matters you are mistaken. If you believe that we
 assume arbitrarily that the dreamer's next association will disclose
 just what we are seeking, or must lead to it, that on the contrary the
 association is just as likely to be entirely inconsequential, and
 without any connection with what we are seeking, and that it is an
 example of my unbounded optimism to expect anything else, then you are
 greatly mistaken. I have already taken the liberty of pointing out that
 in each one of you there is a deep-rooted belief in psychic freedom and
 volition, a belief which is absolutely unscientific, and which must
 capitulate before the claims of a determinism that controls even the
 psychic life. I beg of you to accept it as a fact that only this one
 association will occur to the person questioned. But I do not put one
 belief in opposition to another. It can be proved that the association,
 which the subject produces, is not voluntary, is not indeterminable, not
 unconnected with what we seek. Indeed, I discovered long ago--without,
 however, laying too much stress on the discovery--that even experimental
 psychology has brought forth this evidence.
 
 I ask you to give your particular attention to the significance of this
 subject. If I invite a person to tell me what occurs to him in relation
 to some certain element of his dream I am asking him to abandon himself
 to free association, _controlled by a given premise_. This demands a
 special delimitation of the attention, quite different from cogitation,
 in fact, exclusive of cogitation. Many persons put themselves into such
 a state easily; others show an extraordinarily high degree of
 clumsiness. There is a higher level of free association again, where I
 omit this original premise and designate only the manner of the
 association, e.g., rule that the subject freely give a proper name or a
 number. Such an association would be more voluntary, more
 indeterminable, than the one called forth by our technique. But it can
 be shown that it is strongly determined each time by an important inner
 mental set which, at the moment at which it is active, is unknown to us,
 just as unknown as the disturbing tendencies in the case of errors and
 the provocative tendencies in the case of accidental occurrences.
 
 I, and many others after me, have again and again instigated such
 investigations for names and numbers which occur to the subject without
 any restraint, and have published some results. The method is the
 following: Proceeding from the disclosed names, we awaken continuous
 associations which then are no longer entirely free, but rather are
 limited as are the associations to the dream elements, and this is true
 until the impulse is exhausted. By that time, however, the motivation
 and significance of the free name associations is explained. The
 investigations always yield the same results, the information often
 covers a wealth of material and necessitates lengthy elaboration. The
 associations to freely appearing numbers are perhaps the most
 significant. They follow one another so quickly and approach a hidden
 goal with such inconceivable certainty, that it is really startling. I
 want to give you an example of such a name analysis, one that, happily,
 involves very little material.
 
 In the course of my treatment of a young man, I referred to this subject
 and mentioned the fact that despite the apparent volition it is
 impossible to have a name occur which does not appear to be limited by
 the immediate conditions, the peculiarities of the subject, and the
 momentary situation. He was doubtful, and I proposed that he make such
 an attempt immediately. I know he has especially numerous relations of
 every sort with women and girls, and so am of the opinion that he will
 have an unusually wide choice if he happens to think of a woman's name.
 He agrees. To my astonishment, and perhaps even more to his, no
 avalanche of women's names descends upon my head, but he is silent for a
 time, and then admits that a single name has occurred to him--and no
 other: _Albino_. How extraordinary, but what associations have you with
 this name? How many albinoes do you know? Strangely enough, he knew no
 albinoes, and there were no further associations with the name. One
 might conclude the analysis had proved a failure; but no--it was already
 complete; no further association was necessary. The man himself had
 unusually light coloring. In our talks during the cure I had frequently
 called him an albino in fun. We were at the time occupied in determining
 the feminine characteristics of his nature. He himself was the Albino,
 who at that moment was to him the most interesting feminine person.
 
 In like manner, melodies, which come for no reason, show themselves
 conditioned by and associated with a train of thought which has a right
 to occupy one, yet of whose activity one is unconscious. It is easily
 demonstrable that the attraction to the melody is associated with the
 text, or its origin. But I must take the precaution not to include in
 this assertion really musical people, with whom, as it happens, I have
 had no experience. In their cases the musical meaning of the melody may
 have occasioned its occurrence. More often the first reason holds. I
 know of a young man who for a time was actually haunted by the really
 charming melody of the song of Paris, from _The Beautiful Helen_, until
 the analysis brought to his attention the fact that at that time his
 interest was divided between an Ida and a Helen.
 
 If then the entirely unrestrained associations are conditioned in such a
 manner and are arranged in a distinct order, we are justified in
 concluding that associations with a single condition, that of an
 original premise, or starting point, may be conditioned to no less
 degree. The investigation does in fact show that aside from the
 conditioning which we have established by the premise, a second farther
 dependence is recognizable upon powerful affective thoughts, upon cycles
 of interest and complexes of whose influence we are ignorant, therefore
 unconscious at the time.
 
 Associations of this character have been the subject matter of very
 enlightening experimental investigations, which have played a noteworthy
 role in the history of psychoanalysis. The Wundt school proposed the
 so-called association-experiment, wherein the subject is given the task
 of answering in the quickest possible time, with any desired reaction,
 to a given stimulus-word. It is then possible to study the interval of
 time that elapses between the stimulus and the reaction, the nature of
 the answer given as reaction, the possible mistake in a subsequent
 repetition of the same attempt, and similar matters. The Zurich School
 under the leadership of Bleuler and Jung, gave the explanation of the
 reactions following the association-experiment, by asking the subject to
 explain a given reaction by means of further associations, in the cases
 where there was anything extraordinary in the reaction. It then became
 apparent that these extraordinary reactions were most sharply determined
 by the complexes of the subject. In this matter Bleuler and Jung built
 the first bridge from experimental psychology to psychoanalysis.
 
 Thus instructed, you will be able to say, "We recognize now that free
 associations are predetermined, not voluntary, as we had believed. We
 admit this also as regards the associations connected with the elements
 of the dream, but that is not what we are concerned with. You maintain
 that the associations to the dream element are determined by the unknown
 psychic background of this very element. We do not think that this is a
 proven fact. We expect, to be sure, that the association to the dream
 element will clearly show itself through one of the complexes of the
 dreamer, but what good is that to us? That does not lead us to
 understand the dream, but rather, as in the case of the
 association-experiment, to a knowledge of the so-called complexes. What
 have these to do with the dream?"
 
 You are right, but you overlook one point, in fact, the very point
 because of which I did not choose the association-experiment as the
 starting point for this exposition. In this experiment the one
 determinate of the reaction, viz., the stimulus word, is voluntarily
 chosen. The reaction is then an intermediary between this stimulus word
 and the recently aroused complex of the subject. In the dream the
 stimulus word is replaced by something that itself has its origin in the
 psychic life of the dreamer, in sources unknown to him, hence very
 likely itself a product of the complex. It is not an altogether
 fantastic hypothesis, then, that the more remote associations, even
 those that are connected with the dream element, are determined by no
 other complex than the one which determines the dream element itself,
 and will lead to the disclosure of the complex.
 
 Let me show you by another case that the situation is really as we
 expect it to be. Forgetting proper names is really a splendid example
 for the case of dream analysis; only here there is present in one person
 what in the dream interpretation is divided between two persons. Though
 I have forgotten a name temporarily I still retain the certainty that I
 know the name; that certainty which we could acquire for the dreamer
 only by way of the Bernheim experiment. The forgotten name, however, is
 not accessible. Cogitation, no matter how strenuous, does not help.
 Experience soon tells me that. But I am able each time to find one or
 more substitute names for the forgotten name. If such a substitute name
 occurs to me spontaneously then the correspondence between this
 situation and that of the dream analysis first becomes evident. Nor is
 the dream element the real thing, but only a substitute for something
 else, for what particular thing I do not know, but am to discover by
 means of the dream analysis. The difference lies only in this, that in
 forgetting a name I recognize the substitute automatically as
 unsuitable, while in the dream element we must acquire this
 interpretation with great labor. When a name is forgotten, too, there
 is a way to go from the substitute to the unknown reality, to arrive at
 the forgotten name. If I centre my attention on the substitute name and
 allow further associations to accumulate, I arrive in a more or less
 roundabout way at the forgotten name, and discover that the spontaneous
 substitute names, together with those called up by me, have a certain
 connection with the forgotten name, were conditioned by it.
 
 I want to show you an analysis of this type. One day I noticed that I
 could not recall the name of the little country in the Riviera of which
 Monte Carlo is the capital. It is very annoying, but it is true. I steep
 myself in all my knowledge about this country, think of Prince Albert,
 of the house of Lusignan, of his marriages, his preference for deep-sea
 study, and anything else I can think of, but to no avail. So I give up
 the thinking, and in place of the lost name allow substitute names to
 suggest themselves. They come quickly--Monte Carlo itself, then
 Piedmont, Albania, Montevideo, Colico. Albania is the first to attract
 my attention, it is replaced by Montenegro, probably because of the
 contrast between black and white. Then I see that four of these
 substitutes contain the same syllable _mon_. I suddenly have the
 forgotten word, and cry aloud, "_Monaco_." The substitutes really
 originated in the forgotten word, the four first from the first
 syllable, the last brings back the sequence of syllables and the entire
 final syllable. In addition, I am also able easily to discover what it
 was that took the name from my memory for a time. Monaco is also the
 Italian name of Munich; this latter town exerted the inhibiting
 influence.
 
 The example is pretty enough, but too simple. In other cases we must add
 to the first substitute names a long line of associations, and then the
 analogy to the dream interpretation becomes clearer. I have also had
 such experiences. Once when a stranger invited me to drink Italian wine
 with him, it so happened in the hostelry that he forgot the name of the
 wine he had intended to order just because he had retained a most
 pleasant memory of it. Out of a profusion of dissimilar substitute
 associations which came to him in the place of the forgotten name, I was
 able to conclude that the memory of some one named Hedwig had deprived
 him of the name of the wine, and he actually confirmed not only that he
 had first tasted this wine in the company of a Hedwig, but he also, as
 a result of this declaration, recollected the name again. He was at the
 time happily married, and this Hedwig belonged to former times, not now
 recalled with pleasure.
 
 What is possible in forgetting names must work also in dream
 interpretation, viz., making the withheld actuality accessible by means
 of substitutions and through connecting associations. As exemplified by
 name-forgetting, we may conclude that in the case of the associations to
 the dream element they will be determined as well by the dream element
 as by its unknown essential. Accordingly, we have advanced a few steps
 in the formulation of our dream technique.
 
 
 
 
 SEVENTH LECTURE
 
 THE DREAM
 
 _Manifest Dream Content and Latent Dream Thought_
 
 
 We have not studied the problem of errors in vain. Thanks to our efforts
 in this field, under the conditions known to you, we have evolved two
 different things, a conception of the elements of the dream and a
 technique for dream interpretation. The conception of the dream element
 goes to show something unreal, a substitute for something else, unknown
 to the dreamer, similar to the tendency of errors, a substitute for
 something the dreamer knows but cannot approach. We hope to transfer the
 same conception to the whole dream, which consists of just such
 elements. Our method consists of calling up, by means of free
 associations, other substitute formations in addition to these elements,
 from which we divine what is hidden.
 
 Let me ask you to permit a slight change in our nomenclature which will
 greatly increase the flexibility of our vocabulary. Instead of hidden,
 unapproachable, unreal, let us give a truer description and say
 inaccessible or unknown to the consciousness of the dreamer. By this we
 mean only what the connection with the lost word or with the interfering
 intention of the error can suggest to you, namely, unconscious _for the
 time being_. Naturally in contrast to this we may term _conscious_ the
 elements of the dream itself and the substitute formations just gained
 by association. As yet there is absolutely no theoretical construction
 implied in this nomenclature. The use of the word unconscious as a
 suitable and intelligible descriptive epithet is above criticism.
 
 If we transfer our conception from a single element to the entire dream,
 we find that the dream as a whole is a distorted substitute for
 something else, something unconscious. To discover this unconscious
 thing is the task of dream interpretation. From this, three important
 rules, which we must observe in the work of dream interpretation, are
 straightway derived:
 
 1. What the dream seems to say, whether it be sensible or absurd, clear
 or confused is not our concern, since it can under no condition be that
 unconscious content we are seeking. Later we shall have to observe an
 obvious limitation of this rule. 2. The awakening of substitute
 formations for each element shall be the sole object of our work. We
 shall not reflect on these, test their suitability or trouble how far
 they lead away from the element of the dream. 3. We shall wait until the
 hidden unconscious we are seeking appears of itself, as the missing word
 _Monaco_ in the experiment which we have described.
 
 Now we can understand, too, how unimportant it is how much, how little,
 above all, how accurately or how indifferently the dream is remembered.
 For the dream which is remembered is not the real one, but a distorted
 substitute, which is to help us approach the real dream by awakening
 other substitute formations and by making the unconscious in the dream
 conscious. Therefore if our recollection of the dream was faulty, it has
 simply brought about a further distortion of this substitute, a
 distortion which cannot, however, be unmotivated.
 
 One can interpret one's own dreams as well as those of others. One
 learns even more from these, for the process yields more proof. If we
 try this, we observe that something impedes the work. Haphazard ideas
 arise, but we do not let them have their way. Tendencies to test and to
 choose make themselves felt. As an idea occurs, we say to ourselves "No,
 that does not fit, that does not belong here"; of a second "that is too
 senseless"; of a third, "this is entirely beside the point"; and one can
 easily observe how the ideas are stifled and suppressed by these
 objections, even before they have become entirely clear. On the one
 hand, therefore, too much importance is attached to the dream elements
 themselves; on the other, the result of free association is vitiated by
 the process of selection. If you are not interpreting the dream alone,
 if you allow someone else to interpret it for you, you will soon
 discover another motive which induces you to make this forbidden choice.
 At times you say to yourself, "No, this idea is too unpleasant, I either
 will not or cannot divulge this."
 
 Clearly these objections are a menace to the success of our work. We
 must guard against them, in our own case by the firm resolve not to give
 way to them; and in the interpretation of the dreams of others by making
 the hard and fast rule for them, never to omit any idea from their
 account, even if one of the following four objections should arise: that
 is, if it should seem too unimportant, absurd, too irrelevant or too
 embarrassing to relate. The dreamer promises to obey this rule, but it
 is annoying to see how poorly he keeps his promise at times. At first we
 account for this by supposing that in spite of the authoritative
 assurance which has been given to the dreamer, he is not impressed with
 the importance of free association, and plan perhaps to win his
 theoretic approval by giving him papers to read or by sending him to
 lectures which are to make him a disciple of our views concerning free
 association. But we are deterred from such blunders by the observation
 that, in one's own case, where convictions may certainly be trusted, the
 same critical objections arise against certain ideas, and can only be
 suppressed subsequently, upon second thought, as it were.
 
 Instead of becoming vexed at the disobedience of the dreamer, these
 experiences can be turned to account in teaching something new,
 something which is the more important the less we are prepared for it.
 We understand that the task of interpreting dreams is carried on against
 a certain _resistance_ which manifests itself by these critical
 objections. This resistance is independent of the theoretical conviction
 of the dreamer. Even more is apparent. We discover that such a critical
 objection is never justified. On the contrary, those ideas which we are
 so anxious to suppress, prove _without exception_ to be the most
 important, the most decisive, in the search for the unconscious. It is
 even a mark of distinction if an idea is accompanied by such an
 objection.
 
 This resistance is something entirely new, a phenomenon which we have
 found as a result of our hypotheses although it was not originally
 included in them. We are not too pleasantly surprised by this new factor
 in our problem. We suspect that it will not make our work any easier. It
 might even tempt us to abandon our entire work in connection with the
 dream. Such an unimportant thing as the dream and in addition such
 difficulties instead of a smooth technique! But from another point of
 view, these same difficulties may prove fascinating, and suggest that
 the work is worth the trouble. Whenever we try to penetrate to the
 hidden unconscious, starting out from the substitute which the dream
 element represents, we meet with resistance. Hence, we are justified in
 supposing that something of weight must be hidden behind the substitute.
 What other reason could there be for the difficulties which are
 maintained for purposes of concealment? If a child does not want to open
 his clenched fist, he is certainly hiding something he ought not to
 have.
 
 Just as soon as we bring the dynamic representation of resistance into
 our consideration of the case, we must realize that this factor is
 something quantitatively variable. There may be greater or lesser
 resistances and we are prepared to see these differences in the course
 of our work. We may perhaps connect this with another experience found
 in the work of dream interpretation. For sometimes only one or two ideas
 serve to carry us from the dream element to its unconscious aspect,
 while at other times long chains of associations and the suppression of
 many critical objections are necessary. We shall note that these
 variations are connected with the variable force of resistance. This
 observation is probably correct. If resistance is slight, then the
 substitute is not far removed from the unconscious, but strong
 resistance carries with it a great distortion of the unconscious and in
 addition a long journey back to it.
 
 Perhaps the time has come to take a dream and try out our method to see
 if our faith in it shall be confirmed. But which dream shall we choose?
 You cannot imagine how hard it is for me to decide, and at this point I
 cannot explain the source of the difficulty. Of course, there must be
 dreams which, as a whole, have suffered slight distortion, and it would
 be best to start with one of these. But which dreams are the least
 distorted? Those which are sensible and not confused, of which I have
 already given you two examples? This would be a gross misunderstanding.
 Testing shows that these dreams have suffered by distortion to an
 exceptionally high degree. But if I take the first best dream,
 regardless of certain necessary conditions, you would probably be very
 much disappointed. Perhaps we should have to note such an abundance of
 ideas in connection with single elements of dream that it would be
 absolutely impossible to review the work in perspective. If we write the
 dream out and confront it with the written account of all the ideas
 which arise in connection with it, these may easily amount to a
 reiteration of the text of the dream. It would therefore seem most
 practical to choose for analysis several short dreams of which each one
 can at least reveal or confirm something. This is what we shall decide
 upon, provided experience should not point out where we shall really
 find slightly distorted dreams.
 
 But I know of another way to simplify matters, one which, moreover, lies
 in our path. Instead of attempting the interpretation of entire dreams,
 we shall limit ourselves to single dream elements and by observing a
 series of examples we shall see how these are explained by the
 application of our method.
 
 1. A lady relates that as a child she often dreamt "_that God had a
 pointed paper hat on his head_." How do you expect to understand that
 without the help of the dreamer? Why, it sounds quite absurd. It is no
 longer absurd when the lady testifies that as a child she was frequently
 made to wear such a hat at the table, because she could not help
 stealing glances at the plates of her brothers and sisters to see if one
 of them had gotten more than she. The hat was therefore supposed to act
 as a sort of blinder. This explanation was moreover historic, and given
 without the least difficulty. The meaning of this fragment and of the
 whole brief dream, is clear with the help of a further idea of the
 dreamer. "Since I had heard that God was all-knowing and all-seeing,"
 she said, "the dream can only mean that I know everything and see
 everything just as God does, even when they try to prevent me." This
 example is perhaps too simple.
 
 2. A sceptical patient has a longer dream, in which certain people
 happen to tell her about my book concerning laughter and praise it
 highly. Then something is mentioned about a certain "_'canal,' perhaps
 another book in which 'canal' occurs, or something else with the word
 'canal' ... she doesn't know ... it is all confused_."
 
 Now you will be inclined to think that the element "canal" will evade
 interpretation because it is so vague. You are right as to the supposed
 difficulty, but it is not difficult because it is vague, but rather it
 is vague for a different reason, the same reason which also makes the
 interpretation difficult. The dreamer can think of nothing concerning
 the word canal, I naturally can think of nothing. A little while later,
 as a matter of fact on the next day, she tells me that something
 occurred to her that _may perhaps_ be related to it, a joke that she has
 heard. On a ship between Dover and Calais a well-known author is
 conversing with an Englishman, who quoted the following proverb in a
 certain connection: "_Du sublime au ridicule, il n'y a qu'un pas_."[24]
 The author answers, "_Oui, le pas de Calais_,"[25] with which he wishes
 to say that he finds France sublime and England ridiculous. But the
 "_Pas de Calais_" is really a canal, namely, the English Channel. Do I
 think that this idea has anything to do with the dream? Certainly, I
 believe that it really gives the solution to the puzzling dream
 fragments. Or can you doubt that this joke was already present in the
 dream, as the unconscious factor of the element, "canal." Can you take
 it for granted that it was subsequently added to it? The idea testifies
 to the scepticism which is concealed behind her obtrusive admiration,
 and the resistance is probably the common reason for both phenomena, for
 the fact that the idea came so hesitatingly and that the decisive
 element of the dream turned out to be so vague. Kindly observe at this
 point the relation of the dream element to its unconscious factor. It is
 like a small part of the unconscious, like an allusion to it; through
 its isolation it became quite unintelligible.
 
 3. A patient dreams, in the course of a longer dream: "_Around a table
 of peculiar shape several members of his family are sitting, etc._" In
 connection with this table, it occurs to him that he saw such a piece of
 furniture during a visit to a certain family. Then his thoughts
 continue: In this family a peculiar relation had existed between father
 and son, and soon he adds to this that as a matter of fact the same
 relation exists between himself and his father. The table is therefore
 taken up into the dream to designate this parallel.
 
 This dreamer had for a long time been familiar with the claims of dream
 interpretation. Otherwise he might have taken exception to the fact that
 so trivial a detail as the shape of a table should be taken as the
 basis of the investigation. As a matter of fact we judge nothing in the
 dream as accidental or indifferent, and we expect to reach our
 conclusion by the explanation of just such trivial and unmotivated
 details. Perhaps you will be surprised that the dream work should arouse
 the thought "we are in exactly the same position as they are," just by
 the choice of the table. But even this becomes clear when you learn that
 the name of the family in question is _Tischler_. By permitting his own
 family to sit at such a table, he intends to express that they too are
 _Tischler_. Please note how, in relating such a dream interpretation,
 one must of necessity become indiscreet. Here you have arrived at one of
 the difficulties in the choice of examples that I indicated before. I
 could easily have substituted another example for this one, but would
 probably have avoided this indiscretion at the cost of committing
 another one in its place.
 
 The time has come to introduce two new terms, which we could have used
 long ago. We shall call that which the dream relates, the manifest
 content of the dream; that which is hidden, which we can only reach by
 the analysis of ideas we shall call latent dream thoughts. We may now
 consider the connection between the manifest dream content and the
 latent dream thoughts as they are revealed in these examples. Many
 different connections can exist. In examples 1 and 2 the manifest
 content is also a constituent part of the latent thought, but only a
 very small part of it. A small piece of a great composite psychic
 structure in the unconscious dream thought has penetrated into the
 manifest dream, like a fragment of it, or in other cases, like an
 allusion to it, like a catchword or an abbreviation in the telegraphic
 code. The interpretation must mould this fragment, or indication, into a
 whole, as was done most successfully in example 2. One sort of
 distortion of which the dream mechanism consists is therefore
 substitution by means of a fragment or an allusion. In the third,
 moreover, we must recognize another relation which we shall see more
 clearly and distinctly expressed in the following examples:
 
 4. The dreamer "_pulls a certain woman of his acquaintance from behind a
 bed_." He finds the meaning of this dream element himself by his first
 association. It means: This woman "has a pull" with him.[26]
 
 5. Another man dreams that "_his brother is in a closet_." The first
 association substitutes _clothes-press_ for closet, and the second gives
 the meaning: his brother is _close-pressed_ for money.[27]
 
 6. The dreamer "_climbs a mountain from the top of which he has an
 extraordinarily distant view_." This sounds quite sensible; perhaps
 there is nothing about it that needs interpretation, and it is simply
 necessary to find out which reminiscence this dream touches upon and why
 it was recalled. But you are mistaken; it is evident that this dream
 requires interpretation as well as any other which is confused. For no
 previous mountain climbing of his own occurs to the dreamer, but he
 remembers that an acquaintance of his is publishing a "_Rundschau_,"
 which deals with our relation to the furthermost parts of the earth. The
 latent dream thought is therefore in this case an identification of the
 dreamer with the "_Rundschauer_."
 
 Here you find a new type of connection between the manifest content and
 the latent dream element. The former is not so much a distortion of the
 latter as a representation of it, a plastic concrete perversion that is
 based on the sound of the word. However, it is for this very reason
 again a distortion, for we have long ago forgotten from which concrete
 picture the word has arisen, and therefore do not recognize it by the
 image which is substituted for it. If you consider that the manifest
 dream consists most often of visual images, and less frequently of
 thoughts and words, you can imagine that a very particular significance
 in dream formation is attached to this sort of relation. You can also
 see that in this manner it becomes possible to create substitute
 formations for a great number of abstract thoughts in the manifest
 dream, substitutions that serve the purpose of further concealment all
 the same. This is the technique of our picture puzzle. What the origin
 is of the semblance of wit which accompanies such representations is a
 particular question which we need not touch upon at this time.
 
 A fourth type of relation between the manifest and the latent dream
 cannot be dealt with until its cue in the technique has been given. Even
 then I shall not have given you a complete enumeration, but it will be
 sufficient for our purpose.
 
 Have you the courage to venture upon the interpretation of an entire
 dream? Let us see if we are well enough equipped for this undertaking.
 Of course, I shall not choose one of the most obscure, but one
 nevertheless that shows in clear outline the general characteristics of
 a dream.
 
 A young woman who has been married for many years dreams: "_She is
 sitting in the theatre with her husband; one side of the orchestra is
 entirely unoccupied. Her husband tells her that Elise L. and her
 bridegroom had also wished to come, but had only been able to procure
 poor seats, three for_ 1 _Fl.,_ 50 _Kr. and those of course they could
 not take. She thinks this is no misfortune for them._"
 
 The first thing that the dreamer has to testify is that the occasion for
 the dream is touched upon in its manifest content. Her husband had
 really told her that Elise L., an acquaintance of about her age, had
 become engaged. The dream is the reaction to this news. We already know
 that in the case of many dreams it is easy to trace such a cause to the
 preceding day, and that the dreamer often gives these deductions without
 any difficulty. The dreamer also places at our disposal further
 information for other parts of the manifest dream content. Whence the
 detail that one side of the orchestra is unoccupied? It is an allusion
 to an actual occurrence of the previous week. She had made up her mind
 to go to a certain performance and had procured tickets in advance, so
 much in advance that she had been forced to pay a preference tax.[28]
 When she arrived at the theatre, she saw how needless had been her
 anxiety, for _one side of the orchestra was almost empty_. She could
 have bought the tickets on the day of the performance itself. Her
 husband would not stop teasing her about her excessive haste. Whence the
 1 Fl. 50 Kr.? From a very different connection that has nothing to do
 with the former, but which also alludes to an occurrence of the previous
 day. Her sister-in-law had received 150 florins as a present from her
 husband, and knew no better, the poor goose, than to hasten to the
 jeweler and spend the money on a piece of jewelry. Whence the number 3?
 She can think of nothing in connection with this unless one stresses the
 association that the bride, Elise L., is only three months younger than
 she herself, who has been married for almost ten years. And the
 absurdity of buying three tickets for two people? She says nothing of
 this, and indeed denies all further associations or information.
 
 But she has given us so much material in her few associations, that it
 becomes possible to derive the latent dream thought from it. It must
 strike us that in her remarks concerning the dream, time elements which
 constitute a common element in the various parts of this material appear
 at several points. She attended to the tickets _too soon_, took them
 _too hastily_, so that she had to pay more than usual for them; her
 sister-in-law likewise _hastened_ to carry her money to the jeweler's to
 buy a piece of jewelry, just as if she might _miss_ it. Let us add to
 the expressions "_too early_," "_precipitately_," which are emphasized
 so strongly, the occasion for the dream, namely, that her friend only
 three months younger than herself had even now gotten a good husband,
 and the criticism expressed in the condemnation of her sister-in-law,
 that it was _foolish_ to hurry so. Then the following construction of
 the latent dream thought, for which the manifest dream is a badly
 distorted substitute, comes to us almost spontaneously:
 
 "How _foolish_ it was of me to hurry so in marrying! Elise's example
 shows me that I could have gotten a husband later too." (The
 precipitateness is represented by her own behavior in buying the
 tickets, and that of her sister-in-law in purchasing jewelry. Going to
 the theatre was substituted for getting married. This appears to have
 been the main thought; and perhaps we may continue, though with less
 certainty, because the analysis in these parts is not supported by
 statements of the dreamer.) "And I would have gotten 100 times as much
 for my money." (150 Fl. is 100 times as much as 1 Fl. 50 Kr.). If we
 might substitute the dowry for the money, then it would mean that one
 buys a husband with a dowry; the jewelry as well as the poor seats would
 represent the husband. It would be even more desirable if the fragment
 "3 seats" had something to do with a husband. But our understanding does
 not penetrate so far. We have only guessed that the dream expresses her
 _disparagement_ of her own husband, and her regret at having _married so
 early_.
 
 It is my opinion that we are more surprised and confused than satisfied
 by the result of this first dream interpretation. We are swamped by more
 impressions than we can master. We see that the teachings of dream
 interpretation are not easily exhausted. Let us hasten to select those
 points that we recognize as giving us new, sound insight.
 
 In the first place, it is remarkable that in the latent thought the main
 emphasis falls on the element of haste; in the manifest dream there is
 absolutely no mention of this to be found. Without the analysis we
 should not have had any idea that this element was of any importance at
 all. So it seems possible that just the main thing, the central point of
 the unconscious thoughts, may be absent in the manifest dream. Because
 of this, the original impression in the dream must of necessity be
 entirely changed. Secondly: In the dream there is a senseless
 combination, 3 for 1 Fl. 50 Kr.; in the dream thought we divine the
 sentence, "It was senseless (to marry so early)." Can one deny that this
 thought, "It was senseless," was represented in the manifest dream by
 the introduction of an absurd element? Thirdly: Comparison will show
 that the relation between the manifest and latent elements is not
 simple, certainly not of such a sort that a manifest element is always
 substituted for the latent. There must rather be a quantitative
 relationship between the two groups, according to which a manifest
 element may represent several latent ones, or a latent element
 represented by several manifest elements.
 
 Much that is surprising might also be said of the sense of the dream and
 the dreamer's reaction to it. She acknowledges the interpretation but
 wonders at it. She did not know that she disparaged her husband so, and
 she did not know why she should disparage him to such a degree. There is
 still much that is incomprehensible. I really believe that we are not
 yet fully equipped for dream interpretation, and that we must first
 receive further instruction and preparation.
 
 
 
 
 EIGHTH LECTURE
 
 THE DREAM
 
 _Dreams of Childhood_
 
 
 We think we have advanced too rapidly. Let us go back a little. Before
 our last attempt to overcome the difficulties of dream distortion
 through our technique, we had decided that it would be best to avoid
 them by limiting ourselves only to those dreams in which distortion is
 either entirely absent or of trifling importance, if there are such. But
 here again we digress from the history of the evolution of our
 knowledge, for as a matter of fact we become aware of dreams entirely
 free of distortion only after the consistent application of our method
 of interpretation and after complete analysis of the distorted dream.
 
 The dreams we are looking for are found in children. They are short,
 clear, coherent, easy to understand, unambiguous, and yet unquestionable
 dreams. But do not think that all children's dreams are like this. Dream
 distortion makes its appearance very early in childhood, and dreams of
 children from five to eight years of age have been recorded that showed
 all the characteristics of later dreams. But if you will limit
 yourselves to the age beginning with conscious psychic activity, up to
 the fourth or fifth year, you will discover a series of dreams that are
 of a so-called infantile character. In a later period of childhood you
 will be able to find some dreams of this nature occasionally. Even among
 adults, dreams that closely resemble the typically infantile ones occur
 under certain conditions.
 
 From these children's dreams we gain information concerning the nature
 of dreams with great ease and certainty, and we hope it will prove
 decisive and of universal application.
 
 1. For the understanding of these dreams we need no analysis, no
 technical methods. We need not question the child that is giving an
 account of his dream. But one must add to this a story taken from the
 life of the child. An experience of the previous day will always explain
 the dream to us. The dream is a sleep-reaction of psychic life upon
 these experiences of the day.
 
 We shall now consider a few examples so that we may base our further
 deductions upon them.
 
 _a_). A boy of 22 months is to present a basket of cherries as a
 birthday gift. He plainly does so very unwillingly, although they
 promise him that he will get some of them himself. The next morning he
 relates as his dream, "_Hermann eat all cherries_."
 
 _b_). A little girl of three and a quarter years makes her first trip
 across a lake. At the landing she does not want to leave the boat and
 cries bitterly. The time of the trip seems to her to have passed
 entirely too rapidly. The next morning she says, "_Last night I rode on
 the lake_." We may add the supplementary fact that this trip lasted
 longer.
 
 _c_). A boy of five and a quarter years is taken on an excursion into
 the Escherntal near Hallstatt. He had heard that Hallstatt lay at the
 foot of the Dachstein, and had shown great interest in this mountain.
 From his home in Aussee there was a beautiful view of the Dachstein, and
 with a telescope one could discern the Simonyhtte upon it. The child
 had tried again and again to see it through the telescope, with what
 result no one knew. He started on the excursion in a joyously expectant
 mood. Whenever a new mountain came in sight the boy asked, "Is that the
 Dachstein?" The oftener this question was answered in the negative, the
 more moody he became; later he became entirely silent and would not take
 part in a small climb to a waterfall. They thought he was overtired, but
 the next morning, he said quite happily, "_Last night I dreamed that we
 were in the Simonyhtte_." It was with this expectation, therefore, that
 he had taken part in the excursion. The only detail he gave was one he
 had heard before, "you had to climb steps for six hours."
 
 These three dreams will suffice for all the information we desire.
 
 2. We see that children's dreams are not meaningless; they are
 _intelligible, significant, psychic acts_. You will recall what I
 represented to you as the medical opinion concerning the dream, the
 simile of untrained fingers wandering aimlessly over the keys of the
 piano. You cannot fail to see how decidedly these dreams of childhood
 are opposed to this conception. But it would be strange indeed if the
 child brought forth complete psychic products in sleep, while the adult
 in the same condition contents himself with spasmodic reactions. Indeed,
 we have every reason to attribute the more normal and deeper sleep to
 the child.
 
 3. Dream distortion is lacking in these dreams, therefore they need no
 interpretation. The manifest and latent dreams are merged. _Dream
 distortion is therefore not inherent in the dream._ I may assume that
 this relieves you of a great burden. But upon closer consideration we
 shall have to admit of a tiny bit of distortion, a certain
 differentiation between manifest dream content and latent dream thought,
 even in these dreams.
 
 4. The child's dream is a reaction to an experience of the day, which
 has left behind it a regret, a longing or an unfulfilled desire. _The
 dream brings about the direct unconcealed fulfillment of this wish._ Now
 recall our discussions concerning the importance of the role of external
 or internal bodily stimuli as disturbers of sleep, or as dream
 producers. We learned definite facts about this, but could only explain
 a very small number of dreams in this way. In these children's dreams
 nothing points to the influence of such somatic stimuli; we cannot be
 mistaken, for the dreams are entirely intelligible and easy to survey.
 But we need not give up the theory of physical causation entirely on
 this account. We can only ask why at the outset we forgot that besides
 the physical stimuli there are also psychic sleep-disturbing stimuli.
 For we know that it is these stimuli that commonly cause the disturbed
 sleep of adults by preventing them from producing the ideal condition of
 sleep, the withdrawal of interest from the world. The dreamer does not
 wish to interrupt his life, but would rather continue his work with the
 things that occupy him, and for this reason he does not sleep. The
 unfulfilled wish, to which he reacts by means of the dream, is the
 psychic sleep-disturbing stimulus for the child.
 
 5. From this point we easily arrive at an explanation of the function of
 the dream. The dream, as a reaction to the psychic stimulus, must have
 the value of a release of this stimulus which results in its elimination
 and in the continuation of sleep. We do not know how this release is
 made possible by the dream, but we note that _the dream is not a
 disturber of sleep_, as calumny says, _but a guardian of sleep, whose
 duty it is to quell disturbances_. It is true, we think we would have
 slept better if we had not dreamt, but here we are wrong; as a matter of
 fact, we would not have slept at all without the help of the dream. That
 we have slept so soundly is due to the dream alone. It could not help
 disturbing us slightly, just as the night watchman often cannot avoid
 making a little noise while he drives away the rioters who would awaken
 us with their noise.
 
 6. One main characteristic of the dream is that a wish is its source,
 and that the content of the dream is the gratification of this wish.
 Another equally constant feature is that the dream does not merely
 express a thought, but also represents the fulfillment of this wish in
 the form of a hallucinatory experience. "_I should like to travel on the
 lake_," says the wish that excites the dream; the dream itself has as
 its content "_I travel on the lake_." One distinction between the latent
 and manifest dream, a distortion of the latent dream thought, therefore
 remains even in the case of these simple children's dreams, namely, _the
 translation of the thought into experience_. In the interpretation of
 the dream it is of utmost importance that this change be traced back. If
 this should prove to be an extremely common characteristic of the dream,
 then the above mentioned dream fragment, "_I see my brother in a
 closet_" could not be translated, "_My brother is close-pressed_," but
 rather, "I wish that my brother were close-pressed, _my brother should
 be close-pressed_." Of the two universal characteristics of the dream we
 have cited, the second plainly has greater prospects of unconditional
 acknowledgment than the first. Only extensive investigation can
 ascertain that the cause of the dream must always be a wish, and cannot
 also be an anxiety, a plan or a reproach; but this does not alter the
 other characteristic, that the dream does not simply reproduce the
 stimulus but by experiencing it anew, as it were, removes, expells and
 settles it.
 
 7. In connection with these characteristics of the dream we can again
 resume the comparison between the dream and the error. In the case of
 the latter we distinguish an interfering tendency and one interfered
 with, and the error is the compromise between the two. The dream fits
 into the same scheme. The tendency interfered with, in this case, can
 be no other than that of sleep. For the interfering tendency we
 substitute the psychic stimulus, the wish which strives for its
 fulfillment, let us say, for thus far we are not familiar with any other
 sleep-disturbing psychic stimulus. In this instance also the dream is
 the result of compromise. We sleep, and yet we experience the removal of
 a wish; we gratify the wish, but at the same time continue to sleep.
 Both are partly carried out and partly given up.
 
 8. You will remember that we once hoped to gain access to the
 understanding of the dream problem by the fact that certain very
 transparent phantasy formations are called _day dreams_. Now these day
 dreams are actual wish fulfillments, fulfillments of ambitious or erotic
 wishes with which we are familiar; but they are conscious, and though
 vividly imagined, they are never hallucinatory experiences. In this
 instance, therefore, the less firmly established of the two main
 characteristics of the dream holds, while the other proves itself
 entirely dependent upon the condition of sleep and impossible to the
 waking state. In colloquial usage, therefore, there is a presentment of
 the fact that the fulfillment of a wish is a main characteristic of the
 dream. Furthermore, if the experience in the dream is a transformed
 representation only made possible by the condition of sleep--in other
 words, a sort of nocturnal day dream--then we can readily understand
 that the occurrence of phantasy formations can release the nocturnal
 stimulus and bring satisfaction. For day dreaming is an activity closely
 bound up in gratification and is, indeed, pursued only for this reason.
 
 Not only this but other colloquial usages also express the same feeling.
 Well-known proverbs say, "The pig dreams of acorns, the goose of maize,"
 or ask, "Of what does the hen dream? Of millet." So the proverb descends
 even lower than we do, from the child to the animal, and maintains that
 the content of a dream is the satisfaction of a need. Many turns of
 speech seem to point to the same thing--"dreamlike beauty," "I should
 never have dreamed of that," "in my wildest dreams I hadn't imagined
 that." This is open partisanship on the part of colloquial usage. For
 there are also dreams of fear and dreams of embarrassing or indifferent
 content, but they have not been drawn into common usage. It is true that
 common usage recognizes "bad" dreams, but still the dream plainly
 connotates to it only the beautiful wish fulfillment. There is indeed
 no proverb that tells us that the pig or the goose dreams of being
 slaughtered.
 
 Of course it is unbelievable that the wish-fulfillment characteristic
 has not been noted by writers on the dream. Indeed, this was very often
 the case, but none of them thought of acknowledging this characteristic
 as universal and of making it the basis of an explanation of the dream.
 We can easily imagine what may have deterred them and shall discuss it
 subsequently.
 
 See what an abundance of information we have gained, with almost no
 effort, from the consideration of children's dreams--the function of the
 dream as a guardian of sleep; its origin from two rival tendencies, of
 which the one, the longing for sleep, remains constant, while the other
 tries to satisfy a psychic stimulus; the proof that the dream is a
 significant psychic act; its two main characteristics: wish fulfillment
 and hallucinatory experience. And we were almost able to forget that we
 are engaged in psychoanalysis. Aside from its connection with errors our
 work has no specific connotation. Any psychologist, who is entirely
 ignorant of the claims of psychoanalysis, could have given this
 explanation of children's dreams. Why has no one done so?
 
 If there were only infantile dreams, our problem would be solved, our
 task accomplished, and that without questioning the dreamer, or
 approaching the unconscious, and without taking free association into
 consideration. The continuation of our task plainly lies in this
 direction. We have already repeatedly had the experience that
 characteristics that at first seemed universally true, have subsequently
 held good only for a certain kind and for a certain number of dreams. It
 is therefore for us to decide whether the common characteristics which
 we have gathered from children's dreams can be applied universally,
 whether they also hold for those dreams that are not transparent, whose
 manifest content shows no connection with wishes left over from the
 previous day. We think that these dreams have undergone considerable
 distortion and for this reason are not to be judged superficially. We
 also suspect that for the explanation of this distortion we shall need
 the psychoanalytic method which we could dispense with in the
 understanding of children's dreams.
 
 There is at any rate a class of dreams that are undistorted, and, just
 like children's dreams, are easily recognizable as wish fulfillments. It
 is those that are called up throughout life by the imperative needs of
 the body--hunger, thirst, sexual desire--hence wish fulfillments in
 reaction to internal physical stimuli. For this reason, I have noted the
 dream of a young girl, that consisted of a menu following her name (Anna
 F......, strawberry, huckleberry, egg-dish, pap), as a reaction to an
 enforced day of fasting on account of a spoiled stomach, which was
 directly traceable to the eating of the fruits twice mentioned in the
 dream. At the same time, the grandmother, whose age added to that of her
 grandchild would make a full seventy, had to go without food for a day
 on account of kidney-trouble, and dreamed the same night that she had
 been invited out and that the finest tid-bits had been set before her.
 Observations with prisoners who are allowed to go hungry, or with people
 who suffer privations on travels or expeditions, show that under these
 conditions the dreams regularly deal with the satisfaction of these
 needs. Otto Nordenskjold, in his book _Antarctic_ (1904), testifies to
 the same thing concerning his crew, who were ice-bound with him during
 the winter (Vol. 1, page 336). "Very significant in determining the
 trend of our inmost thoughts were our dreams, which were never more
 vivid and numerous than just at this time. Even those of our comrades
 who ordinarily dreamed but seldom, now had long stories to tell, when in
 the morning we exchanged our latest experiences in that realm of
 phantasy. All of them dealt with that outside world that now was so far
 away from us, but often they fitted into our present condition. Food and
 drink were most often the pivots about which our dreams revolved. One of
 us, who excelled in going to great dinners in his sleep, was most happy
 whenever he could tell us in the morning that he attended a dinner of
 three courses; another one dreamed of tobacco, whole mountains of
 tobacco; still another dreamed of a ship that came along on the open
 sea, under full sail. One other dream deserves mention: The postman
 comes with the mail and gives a long explanation of why it is so late;
 he had delivered it to the wrong address and only after great trouble on
 his part had succeeded in getting it back. Of course one occupies
 himself with even more impossible things in sleep, but in nearly all the
 dreams that I myself dreamed or heard tell of, the lack of phantasy was
 quite striking. It would surely be of great psychological interest if
 all these dreams were recorded. It is easy to understand how we longed
 for sleep, since it could offer us everything for which each one of us
 felt the most burning desire." I quote further from Du Prel. "Mungo
 Park, who during a trip in Africa was almost exhausted, dreamed without
 interruption of the fertile valleys and fields of his home. Trenck,
 tortured by hunger in the redoubt at Magdeburg, likewise saw himself
 surrounded by wonderful meals, and George Back, who took part in
 Franklin's first expedition, dreamed regularly and consistently of
 luxurious meals when, as a result of terrible privations, he was nearly
 dead of hunger."
 
 A man who feels great thirst at night after enjoying highly seasoned
 food for supper, often dreams that he is drinking. It is of course
 impossible to satisfy a rather strong desire for food or drink by means
 of the dream; from such a dream one awakes thirsty and must now drink
 real water. The effect of the dream is in this case practically
 trifling, but it is none the less clear that it was called up for the
 purpose of maintaining the sleep in spite of the urgent impulse to awake
 and to act. Dreams of satisfaction often overcome needs of a lesser
 intensity.
 
 In a like manner, under the influence of sexual stimuli, the dream
 brings about satisfaction that shows noteworthy peculiarities. As a
 result of the characteristic of the sexual urge which makes it somewhat
 less dependent upon its object than hunger and thirst, satisfaction in a
 dream of pollution may be an actual one, and as a result of difficulties
 to be mentioned later in connection with the object, it happens
 especially often that the actual satisfaction is connected with confused
 or distorted dream content. This peculiarity of the dream of pollution,
 as O. Rank has observed, makes it a fruitful subject to pursue in the
 study of dream distortion. Moreover, all dreams of desire of adults
 usually contain something besides satisfaction, something that has its
 origin in the sources of the purely psychic stimuli, and which requires
 interpretation to render it intelligible.
 
 Moreover we shall not maintain that the wish-fulfillment dreams of the
 infantile kind occur in adults only as reactions to the known imperative
 desires. We also know of short clear dreams of this sort under the
 influence of dominating situations that arise from unquestionably
 psychic sources. As, for example, in dreams of impatience, whenever a
 person has made preparations for a journey, for a theatrical
 performance, for a lecture or for a visit, and now dreams of the
 anticipated fulfillment of his expectations, and so arrives at his goal
 the night before the actual experience, in the theatre or in
 conversation with his host. Or the well-named dreams of comfort, when a
 person who likes to prolong his sleep, dreams that he is already up, is
 washing himself, or is already in school, while as a matter of fact he
 continues sleeping, hence would rather get up in a dream than in
 reality. The desire for sleep which we have recognized as a regular part
 of the dream structure becomes intense in these dreams and appears in
 them as the actual shaping force of the dream. The wish for sleep
 properly takes its place beside other great physical desires.
 
 At this point I refer you to a picture by Schwind, from the Schack
 Gallery in Munich, so that you may see how rightly the artist has
 conceived the origin of a dream from a dominating situation. It is the
 _Dream of a Prisoner_,[29] which can have no other subject than his
 release. It is a very neat stroke that the release should be effected
 through the window, for the ray of light that awakens the prisoner comes
 through the same window. The gnomes standing one above the other
 probably represent the successive positions which he himself had to take
 in climbing to the height of the window, and I do not think I am
 mistaken or that I attribute too much preconcerted design to the artist,
 by noting that the uppermost of the gnomes, who is filing the grating
 (and so does what the prisoner would like to do) has the features of the
 prisoner.
 
 In all other dreams except those of children and those of the infantile
 type, distortion, as we have said, blocks our way. At the outset we
 cannot ascertain whether they are also wish fulfillments, as we suspect;
 from their manifest content we cannot determine from what psychic
 stimulus they derive their origin, and we cannot prove that they also
 are occupied in doing away with the stimulus and in satisfying it. They
 must probably be interpreted, that is, translated; their distortion must
 be annulled; their manifest content replaced by their latent thought
 before we can judge whether what we have found in children's dreams may
 claim a universal application for all dreams.
 
 
 
 
 NINTH LECTURE
 
 THE DREAM
 
 _The Dream Censor_
 
 
 We have learned to know the origin, nature and function of the dream
 from the study of children's dreams. _Dreams are the removal of
 sleep-disturbing psychic stimuli by way of hallucinated satisfaction._
 Of adults' dreams, to be sure, we could explain only one group, what we
 characterized as dreams of an infantile type. As to the others we know
 nothing as yet, nor do we understand them. For the present, however, we
 have obtained a result whose significance we do not wish to
 under-estimate. Every time a dream is completely comprehensible to us,
 it proves to be an hallucinated wish-fulfillment. This coincidence
 cannot be accidental, nor is it an unimportant matter.
 
 We conclude, on the basis of various considerations and by analogy to
 the conception of mistakes, that another type of dream is a distorted
 substitute for an unknown content and that it must first be led back to
 that content. Our next task is the investigation and the understanding
 of this dream distortion.
 
 Dream distortion is the thing which makes the dream seem strange and
 incomprehensible to us. We want to know several things about it;
 firstly, whence it comes, its dynamics; secondly, what it does; and
 finally, how it does it. We can say at this point that dream distortion
 is the product of the dream work, that is, of the mental functioning of
 which the dream itself is the conscious symptom. Let us describe the
 dream work and trace it back to the forces which work upon it.
 
 And now I shall ask you to listen to the following dream. It was
 recorded by a lady of our profession, and according to her, originated
 with a highly cultivated and respected lady of advanced age. No analysis
 of this dream was made. Our informant remarks that to a psychoanalyst
 it needs no interpretation. The dreamer herself did not interpret it,
 but she judged and condemned it as if she understood its interpretation.
 For she said concerning it: "That a woman of fifty should dream such
 abominable, stupid stuff--a woman who has no other thought, day and
 night, than to care for her child!"
 
 And now follows the dreams of the "_services of love_." "She goes into
 Military Hospital No. 1, and says to the sentry at the gate, that she
 must speak to the chief physician ... (she mentions a name which is not
 familiar to her), as she wants to offer her service to the hospital. She
 stresses the word 'service,' so love services. Since she is an old lady
 he lets her pass after some hesitation. But instead of reaching the
 chief physician, she finds herself in a large somber room in which there
 are many officers and army doctors sitting and standing around a long
 table. She turns with her proposal to a staff doctor who, after a few
 words, soon understands her. The words of her speech in the dream are,
 'I and numerous other women and girls of Vienna are ready for the
 soldiers, troops, and officers, without distinction....' Here in the
 dream follows a murmuring. That the idea is, however, correctly
 understood by those present she sees from the semi-embarrassed, somewhat
 malicious expressions of the officers. The lady then continues, 'I know
 that our decision sounds strange, but we are in bitter earnest. The
 soldier in the field is not asked either whether or not he wants to
 die.' A moment of painful silence follows. The staff doctor puts his arm
 around her waist and says, 'Madame, let us assume that it really came to
 that ...' (murmurs). She withdraws from his arm with the thought, 'They
 are all alike!' and answers, 'My heavens, I am an old woman, and perhaps
 will never be confronted with that situation; one consideration,
 moreover, must be kept in mind: the consideration of age, which prevents
 an older woman from ... with a very young boy ... (murmurs) ... that
 would be horrible.' The staff doctor, 'I understand perfectly.' Several
 officers, among them one who had paid court to her in her youth, laugh
 loudly, and the lady asks to be conducted to the chief physician, whom
 she knows, so that everything may be arranged. At this she realizes with
 great dismay that she does not know his name. The staff officer,
 nevertheless, very politely and respectfully shows her the way to the
 second story, up a very narrow winding iron stairway which leads to the
 upper story directly from the door of the room. In going up she hears an
 officer say, 'That is a tremendous decision irrespective of whether a
 woman is young or old; all honor to her!'
 
 "With the feeling that she is merely doing her duty, she goes up an
 endless staircase."
 
 This dream she repeats twice in the course of a few weeks, with--as the
 lady notices--quite insignificant and very senseless changes.
 
 This dream corresponds in its structure to a day dream. It has few gaps,
 and many of its individual points might have been elucidated as to
 content through inquiry, which, as you know, was omitted. The
 conspicuous and interesting point for us, however, is that the dream
 shows several gaps, gaps not of recollection, but of original content.
 In three places the content is apparently obliterated, the speeches in
 which these gaps occur are interrupted by murmurs. Since we have
 performed no analysis, we have, strictly speaking, also no right to make
 any assertion about the meaning of the dream. Yet there are intimations
 given from which something may be concluded. For example, the phrase
 "services of love," and above all the bits of speech which immediately
 precede the murmurs, demand a completion which can have but one meaning.
 If we interpolate these, then the phantasy yields as its content the
 idea that the dreamer is ready, as an act of patriotic duty, to offer
 her person for the satisfaction of the erotic desires of the army,
 officers as well as troops. That certainly is exceedingly shocking, it
 is an impudent libidinous phantasy, but--it does not occur in the dream
 at all. Just at the point where consistency would demand this
 confession, there is a vague murmur in the manifest dream, something is
 lost or suppressed.
 
 I hope you will recognize the inevitability of the conclusion that it is
 the shocking character of these places in the dream that was the motive
 for their suppression. Yet where do you find a parallel for this state
 of affairs? In these times you need not seek far. Take up any political
 paper and you will find that the text is obliterated here and there, and
 that in its place shimmers the white of the paper. You know that that is
 the work of the newspaper censor. In these blank spaces something was
 printed which was not to the liking of the censorship authorities, and
 for that reason it was crossed out. You think that it is a pity, that it
 probably was the most interesting part, it was "the best part."
 
 In other places the censorship did not touch the completed sentence. The
 author foresaw what parts might be expected to meet with the objection
 of the censor, and for that reason he softened them by way of
 prevention, modified them slightly, or contented himself with innuendo
 and allusion to what really wanted to flow from his pen. Thus the sheet,
 it is true, has no blank spaces, but from certain circumlocutions and
 obscurities of expression you will be able to guess that thoughts of the
 censorship were the restraining motive.
 
 Now let us keep to this parallel. We say that the omitted dream
 speeches, which were disguised by a murmuring, were also sacrifices to a
 censorship. We actually speak of a _dream censor_ to which we may
 ascribe a contributing part in the dream distortion. Wherever there are
 gaps in the manifest dream, it is the fault of the dream censor. Indeed,
 we should go further, and recognize each time as a manifestation of the
 dream censor, those places at which a dream element is especially faint,
 indefinitely and doubtfully recalled among other, more clearly
 delineated portions. But it is only rarely that this censorship
 manifests itself so undisguisedly, so naively one may say, as in the
 example of the dream of the "services of love." Far more frequently the
 censorship manifests itself according to the second type, through the
 production of weakenings, innuendoes, allusions instead of direct
 truthfulness.
 
 For a third type of dream censorship I know of no parallel in the
 practice of newspaper censorship, yet it is just this type that I can
 demonstrate by the only dream example which we have so far analyzed. You
 will remember the dream of the "three bad theatre tickets for one florin
 and a half." In the latent thoughts of this dream, the element
 "_precipitately, too soon_," stood in the foreground. It means: "It was
 foolish to marry so _early_, it was also foolish to buy theatre tickets
 so _early_, it was ridiculous of the sister-in-law to spend her money so
 _hastily_, merely to buy an ornament." Nothing of this central element
 of the dream thought was evident in the manifest dream. In the latter,
 going to the theatre and getting the tickets were shoved into the
 foreground. Through this displacement of the emphasis, this regrouping
 of the elements of the content, the manifest dream becomes so dissimilar
 from the latent dream thoughts that no one would suspect the latter
 behind the former. This displacement of emphasis is a favorite device of
 the dream distortion and gives the dream that strangeness which makes
 the dreamer himself unwilling to recognize it as his own production.
 
 Omission, modification, regrouping of the material, these, then, are the
 effects of the dream censor and the devices of dream distortion. The
 dream censorship itself is the author, or one of the authors, of the
 dream distortion whose investigation now occupies us. Modification and
 rearrangement we are already accustomed to summarize as _displacement_.
 
 After these remarks concerning the effects of the dream censor, let us
 now turn to their dynamics. I hope you will not consider the expression
 too anthropomorphically, and picture the dream censor as a severe little
 manikin who lives in a little brain chamber and there performs his
 duties; nor should you attempt to localize him too much, to think of a
 brain center from which his censoring influence emanates, and which
 would cease with the injury or extirpation of this center. For the
 present, the term "dream censor" is no more than a very convenient
 phrase for a dynamic relationship. This phrase does not prevent us from
 asking by what tendencies such influence is exerted and upon which
 tendencies it works; nor will we be surprised to discover that we have
 already encountered the dream censor before, perhaps without recognizing
 him.
 
 For such was actually the case. You will remember that we had a
 surprising experience when we began to apply our technique of free
 association. We then began to feel that some sort of a resistance
 blocked our efforts to proceed from the dream element to the unconscious
 element for which the former is the substitute. This resistance, we
 said, may be of varying strength, enormous at one time, quite negligible
 at another. In the latter case we need cross only a few intermediate
 steps in our work of interpretation. But when the resistance is strong,
 then we must go through a long chain of associations, are taken far
 afield and must overcome all the difficulties which present themselves
 as critical objections to the association technique. What we met with in
 the work of interpretation, we must now bring into the dream work as
 the dream censor. The resistance to interpretation is nothing but the
 objectivation of the dream censor. The latter proves to us that the
 force of the censor has not spent itself in causing the dream
 distortion, has not since been extinguished, but that this censorship
 continues as a permanent institution with the purpose of preserving the
 distortion. Moreover, just as in the interpretation the strength of the
 resistance varied with each element, so also the distortion produced by
 the censor in the same dream is of varying magnitude for each element.
 If one compares the manifest with the latent dream one sees that certain
 isolated latent elements have been practically eliminated, others more
 or less modified, and still others left unchanged, indeed, have perhaps
 been taken over into the dream content with additional strength.
 
 But we wanted to discover what purposes the censorship serves and
 against which tendencies it acts. This question, which is fundamental to
 the understanding of the dream, indeed perhaps to human life, is easily
 answered if we look over a series of those dreams which have been
 analyzed. The tendencies which the censorship exercises are those which
 are recognized by the waking judgment of the dreamer, those with which
 he feels himself in harmony. You may rest assured that when you reject
 an accurate interpretation of a dream of your own, you do so with the
 same motives with which the dream censor works, the motives with which
 it produces the dream distortion and makes the interpretation necessary.
 Recall the dream of our fifty-year old lady. Without having interpreted
 it, she considers her dream abominable, would have been still more
 outraged if our informant had told her anything about the indubitable
 meaning; and it is just on account of this condemnation that the
 shocking spots in her dream were replaced by a murmur.
 
 The tendencies, however, against which the dream censor directs itself,
 must now be described from the standpoint of this instance. One can say
 only that these tendencies are of an objectionable nature throughout,
 that they are shocking from an ethical, aesthetic and social point of
 view, that they are things one does not dare even to think, or thinks of
 only with abhorrence. These censored wishes which have attained to a
 distorted expression in the dream, are above all expressions of a
 boundless, reckless egoism. And indeed, the personal ego occurs in
 every dream to play the major part in each of them, even if it can
 successfully disguise itself in the manifest content. This _sacro
 egoismo_ of the dream is surely not unconnected with the sleep-inducing
 cessation of psychic activity which consists, it should be noted, in the
 withdrawal of interest from the entire external world.
 
 The ego which has been freed of all ethical restraints feels itself in
 accord with all the demands of the sexual striving, with those demands
 which have long since been condemned by our aesthetic rearing, demands
 of such a character that they resist all our moral demands for
 restraint. The pleasure-striving--the libido, as we term it--chooses its
 objects without inhibitions, and indeed, prefers those that are
 forbidden. It chooses not only the wife of another, but, above all,
 those incestuous objects declared sacred by the agreement of
 mankind--the mother and sister in the man's case, the father and brother
 in the woman's. Even the dream of our fifty-year old lady is an
 incestuous one, its libido unmistakably directed toward her son. Desires
 which we believe to be far from human nature show themselves strong
 enough to arouse dreams. Hate, too, expends itself without restraint.
 Revenge and murderous wishes toward those standing closest to the
 dreamer are not unusual, toward those best beloved in daily life, toward
 parents, brothers and sisters, toward one's spouse and one's own
 children. These censored wishes seem to arise from a veritable hell; no
 censorship seems too harsh to be applied against their waking
 interpretation.
 
 But do not reproach the dream itself for this evil content. You will
 not, I am sure, forget that the dream is charged with the harmless,
 indeed the useful function of guarding sleep from disturbance. This evil
 content, then, does not lie in the nature of the dream. You know also
 that there are dreams which can be recognized as the satisfaction of
 justified wishes and urgent bodily needs. These, to be sure, undergo no
 dream distortion. They need none. They can satisfy their function
 without offending the ethical and aesthetic tendencies of the ego. And
 will you also keep in mind the fact that the amount of dream distortion
 is proportional to two factors. On the one hand, the worse the
 censorable wish, the greater the distortion; on the other hand, however,
 the stricter the censor himself is at any particular time the greater
 the distortion will be also. A young, strictly reared and prudish girl
 will, by reason of those factors, disfigure with an inexorable
 censorship those dream impulses which we physicians, for example, and
 which the dreamer herself ten years later, would recognize as
 permissible, harmless, libidinous desires.
 
 Besides, we are far from being at the point where we can allow ourselves
 to be shocked by the results of our work of interpretation. I think we
 are not yet quite adept at it; and above all there lies upon us the
 obligation to secure it against certain attacks. It is not at all
 difficult to "find a hitch" in it. Our dream interpretations were made
 on the hypotheses we accepted a little while ago, that the dream has
 some meaning, that from the hypnotic to the normal sleep one may carry
 over the idea of the existence at such times of an unconscious psychic
 activity, and that all associations are predetermined. If we had come to
 plausible results on the basis of these hypotheses, we would have been
 justified in concluding that the hypotheses were correct. But what is to
 be done when the results are what I have just pictured them to be? Then
 it surely is natural to say, "These results are impossible, foolish, at
 least very improbable, hence there must have been something wrong with
 the hypotheses. Either the dream is no psychic phenomenon after all, or
 there is no such thing as unconscious mental activity in the normal
 condition, or our technique has a gap in it somewhere. Is that not a
 simpler and more satisfying conclusion than the abominations which we
 pretend to have disclosed on the basis of our suppositions?"
 
 Both, I answer. It is a simpler as well as a more satisfying conclusion,
 but not necessarily more correct for that reason. Let us take our time,
 the matter is not yet ripe for judgment. Above all we can strengthen the
 criticism against our dream interpretation still further. That its
 conclusions are so unpleasant and unpalatable is perhaps of secondary
 importance. A stronger argument is the fact that the dreamers to whom we
 ascribe such wish-tendencies from the interpretation of their dreams
 reject the interpretations most emphatically, and with good reason.
 "What," says the one, "you want to prove to me by this dream that I
 begrudged the sums which I spent for my sister's trousseau and my
 brother's education? But indeed that can't be so. Why I work only for my
 sister, I have no interest in life but to fulfill my duties toward her,
 as being the oldest child, I promised our blessed mother I would." Or a
 woman says of her dream, "You mean to say that I wish my husband were
 dead! Why, that is simply revolting, nonsense. It isn't only that we
 have the happiest possible married life, you probably won't believe me
 when I tell you so, but his death would deprive me of everything else
 that I own in the world." Or another will tell us, "You mean that I have
 sensual desires toward my sister? That is ridiculous. I am not in the
 least fond of her. We don't get along and I haven't exchanged a word
 with her in years." We might perhaps ignore this sort of thing if the
 dreamers did not confirm or deny the tendencies ascribed to them; we
 could say that they are matters which the dreamers do not know about
 themselves. But that the dreamers should feel the exact opposite of the
 ascribed wish, and should be able to prove to us the dominance of the
 opposite tendency--this fact must finally disconcert us. Is it not time
 to lay aside the whole work of the dream interpretation as something
 whose results reduce it to absurdity?
 
 By no means; this stronger argument breaks down when we attack it
 critically. Assuming that there are unconscious tendencies in the
 psychic life, nothing is proved by the ability of the subject to show
 that their opposites dominate his conscious life. Perhaps there is room
 in the psychic life even for antithetical tendencies, for contradictions
 which exist side by side, yes, possibly it is just the dominance of the
 one impulse which is the necessary condition for the unconsciousness of
 its opposite. The first two objections raised against our work hold
 merely that the results of dream interpretation are not simple, and very
 unpleasant. In answer to the first of these, one may say that for all
 your enthusiasm for the simple solution, you cannot thereby solve a
 single dream problem. To do so you must make up your mind to accept the
 fact of complicated relationships. And to the second of these objections
 one may say that you are obviously wrong to use a preference or a
 dislike as the basis for a scientific judgment. What difference does it
 make if the results of the dream interpretation seem unpleasant, even
 embarrassing and disgusting to you? "That doesn't prevent them from
 existing," as I used to hear my teacher Charcot say in similar cases,
 when I was a young doctor. One must be humble, one must keep personal
 preferences and antipathies in the background, if one wishes to
 discover the realities of the world. If a physicist can prove to you
 that the organic life of this planet must, within a short period of
 time, become completely extinct, do you also venture to say to him,
 "That cannot be so. This prospect is too unpleasant." On the contrary,
 you will be silent until another physicist proves some error in the
 assumptions or calculations of the first. If you reject the unpleasant,
 you are repeating the mechanism of dream construction instead of
 understanding and mastering it.
 
 Perhaps you will promise to overlook the repulsive character of the
 censored dream-wishes, and will take refuge in the argument that it is
 improbable, after all, that so wide a field be given over to the evil in
 the constitution of man. But does your own experience justify you in
 saying that? I will not discuss the question of how you may estimate
 yourselves, but have you found so much good will among your superiors
 and rivals, so much chivalry among your enemies, so little envy in their
 company, that you feel yourselves in duty bound to enter a protest
 against the part played by the evil of egoism in human nature? Are you
 ignorant of how uncontrolled and undependable the average human being is
 in all the affairs of sex life? Or do you not know that all the
 immoralities and excesses of which we dream nightly are crimes committed
 daily by waking persons? What else does psychoanalysis do here but
 confirm the old saying of Plato, that the good people are those who
 content themselves with dreaming what the others, the bad people, really
 do?
 
 And now turn your attention from the individual case to the great war
 devastating Europe. Think of the amount of brutality, the cruelty and
 the lies allowed to spread over the civilized world. Do you really
 believe that a handful of conscienceless egoists and corruptionists
 could have succeeded in setting free all these evil spirits, if the
 millions of followers did not share in the guilt? Do you dare under
 these circumstances to break a lance for the absence of evil from the
 psychic constitution of mankind?
 
 You will reproach me with judging the war one-sidedly, you will say that
 it has also brought forth all that is most beautiful and noble in
 mankind, its heroic courage, its self-sacrifice, its social feeling.
 Certainly, but do not at this point allow yourselves to become guilty of
 the injustice which has so often been perpetrated against
 psychoanalysis, of reproaching it with denying one thing because it was
 asserting another. It is not our intention to deny the noble strivings
 of human nature, nor have we ever done anything to deprecate their
 value. On the contrary, I show you not only the censored evil
 dream-wishes, but also the censor which suppresses them and renders them
 unrecognizable. We dwell on the evil in mankind with greater emphasis
 only because others deny it, a method whereby the psychic life of
 mankind does not become better, but merely incomprehensible. When,
 however, we give up this one-sided ethical estimate, we shall surely be
 able to find a more accurate formula for the relationship of the evil to
 the good in human nature.
 
 And thus the matter stands. We need not give up the conclusions to which
 our labors in dream interpretation lead us even though we must consider
 those conclusions strange. Perhaps we can approach their understanding
 later by another path. For the present, let us repeat: dream distortion
 is a consequence of the censorship practised by accredited tendencies of
 the ego against those wish-impulses that are in any way shocking,
 impulses which stir in us nightly during sleep. Why these wish-impulses
 come just at night, and whence they come--these are questions which will
 bear considerable investigation.
 
 It would be a mistake, however, to omit to mention, with fitting
 emphasis, another result of these investigations. The dream wishes which
 try to disturb our sleep are not known to us, in fact we learn of them
 first through the dream interpretation. Therefore, they may be described
 as "at that time" unconscious in the sense above defined. But we can go
 beyond this and say that they are more than merely "at that time"
 unconscious. The dreamer to be sure denies their validity, as we have
 seen in so many cases, even after he has learned of their existence by
 means of the interpretation. The situation is then repeated which we
 first encountered in the interpretation of the tongue slip "hiccough"
 where the toastmaster was outraged and assured us that neither then nor
 ever before had he been conscious of disrespectful impulse toward his
 chief. This is repeated with every interpretation of a markedly
 distorted dream, and for that reason attains a significance for our
 conception. We are now prepared to conclude that there are processes and
 tendencies in the psychic life of which one knows nothing at all, has
 known nothing for some time, might, in fact, perhaps never have known
 anything. The unconscious thus receives a new meaning for us; the idea
 of "at present" or "at a specific time" disappears from its conception,
 for it can also mean _permanently_ unconscious, not merely _latent at
 the time_. Obviously we shall have to learn more of this at another
 session.
 
 
 
 
 TENTH LECTURE
 
 THE DREAM
 
 _Symbolism in the Dream_
 
 
 We have discovered that the distortion of dreams, a disturbing element
 in our work of understanding them, is the result of a censorious
 activity which is directed against the unacceptable of the unconscious
 wish-impulses. But, of course, we have not maintained that censorship is
 the only factor which is to blame for the dream distortion, and we may
 actually make the discovery in a further study of the dream that other
 items play a part in this result. That is, even if the dream censorship
 were eliminated we might not be in a position to understand the dreams;
 the actual dream still might not be identical with the latent dream
 thought.
 
 This other item which makes the dream unintelligible, this new addition
 to dream distortion, we discover by considering a gap in our technique.
 I have already admitted that for certain elements of the dream, no
 associations really occur to the person being analyzed. This does not
 happen so often as the dreamers maintain; in many cases the association
 can be forced by persistence. But still there are certain instances in
 which no association is forthcoming, or if forced does not furnish what
 we expected. When this happens in the course of a psychoanalytic
 treatment, then a particular meaning may be attached thereto, with which
 we have nothing to do here. It also occurs, however, in the
 interpretation of the dreams of a normal person or in interpreting one's
 own dreams. Once a person is convinced that in these cases no amount of
 forcing of associations will avail, he will finally make the discovery
 that the unwished-for contingency occurs regularly in certain dream
 elements, and he will begin to recognize a new order of things there,
 where at first he believed he had come across a peculiar exception to
 our technique.
 
 In this way we are tempted to interpret these silent dream elements
 ourselves, to undertake their translation by the means at hand. The fact
 that every time we trust to this substitution we obtain a satisfactory
 meaning is forced upon us; until we resolve upon this decision the dream
 remains meaningless, its continuity is broken. The accumulation of many
 similar cases tends to give the necessary certainty to our first timid
 attempts.
 
 I am expounding all this in rather a schematic manner, but this is
 permissible for purposes of instruction, and I am not trying to
 misstate, but only to simplify matters.
 
 In this manner we derive constant translations for a whole series of
 dream elements just as constant translations are found in our popular
 dream books for all the things we dream. But do not forget that in our
 association technique we never discover constant substitutes for the
 dream elements.
 
 You will say at once that this road to interpretation appears far more
 uncertain and open to objection than the former methods of free
 association. But a further fact is to be taken into consideration. After
 one has gathered a sufficient number of such constant substitutes
 empirically, he will say that of his own knowledge he should actually
 have denied that these items of dream interpretation could really be
 understood without the associations of the dreamer. The facts that force
 us to recognize their meaning will appear in the second half of our
 analysis.
 
 We call such a constant relationship between a dream element and its
 interpretation _symbolic_. The dream element is itself a _symbol_ of the
 unconscious dream thought. You will remember that previously, when we
 were investigating the relationship between dream elements and their
 actuality, I drew three distinctions, viz., that of the part of the
 whole, that of the allusion, and that of the imagery. I then announced
 that there was a fourth, but did not name it. This fourth is the
 symbolic relationship here introduced. Very interesting discussions
 center about this, and we will now consider them before we express our
 own particular observations on symbolism. Symbolism is perhaps the most
 noteworthy chapter of dream study.
 
 In the first place, since symbols are permanent or constant
 translations, they realize, in a certain measure, the ideal of ancient
 as well as popular dream interpretation, an ideal which by means of our
 technique we had left behind. They permit us in certain cases to
 interpret a dream without questioning the dreamer who, aside from this,
 has no explanation for the symbol. If the interpreter is acquainted with
 the customary dream symbols and, in addition, with the dreamer himself,
 the conditions under which the latter lives and the impressions he
 received before having the dream, it is often possible to interpret a
 dream without further information--to translate it "right off the bat."
 Such a trick flatters the interpreter and impresses the dreamer; it
 stands out as a pleasurable incident in the usual arduous course of
 cross-examining the dreamer. But do not be misled. It is not our
 function to perform tricks. Interpretation based on a knowledge of
 symbols is not a technique that can replace the associative technique,
 or even compare with it. It is a supplement to the associative
 technique, and furnishes the latter merely with transplanted, usable
 results. But as regards familiarity with the dreamer's psychic
 situation, you must consider the fact that you are not limited to
 interpreting the dreams of acquaintances; that as a rule you are not
 acquainted with the daily occurrences which act as the stimuli for the
 dreams, and that the associations of the subject furnish you with a
 knowledge of that very thing we call the psychic situation.
 
 Furthermore, it is very extraordinary, particularly in view of
 circumstances to be mentioned later, that the most vehement opposition
 has been voiced against the existence of the symbolic relationship
 between the dream and the unconscious. Even persons of judgment and
 position, who have otherwise made great progress in psychoanalysis, have
 discontinued their support at this point. This is the more remarkable
 since, in the first place, symbolism is neither peculiar to the dream
 nor characteristic of it, and since in the second place, symbolism in
 the dream was not discovered through psychoanalysis, although the latter
 is not poor otherwise in making startling discoveries. The discoverer of
 dream symbolism, if we insist on a discovery in modern times, was the
 philosopher K. A. Scherner (1861). Psychoanalysis affirmed Scherner's
 discovery and modified it considerably.
 
 Now you will want to know something of the nature of dream symbolism,
 and to hear some examples. I shall gladly impart to you what I know, but
 I admit that our knowledge is not so complete as we could desire it to
 be.
 
 The nature of the symbol relationship is a comparison, but not any
 desired comparison. One suspects a special prerequisite for this
 comparison, but is unable to say what it is. Not everything to which we
 are able to compare an object or an occurrence occurs in the dream as
 its symbol; on the other hand, the dream does not symbolize anything we
 may choose, but only specific elements of the dream thought. There are
 limitations on both sides. It must be admitted that the idea of the
 symbol cannot be sharply delimited at all times--it mingles with the
 substitution, dramatization, etc., even approaches the allusion. In one
 series of symbols the basic comparison is apparent to the senses. On the
 other hand, there are other symbols which raise the question of where
 the similarity, the "something intermediate" of this suspected
 comparison is to be sought. We may discover it by more careful
 consideration, or it may remain hidden to us. Furthermore, it is
 extraordinary, if the symbol is a comparison, that this comparison is
 not revealed by the association, that the dreamer is not acquainted with
 the comparison, that he makes use of it without knowing of its
 existence. Indeed, the dreamer does not even care to admit the validity
 of this comparison when it is pointed out to him. So you see, a symbolic
 relationship is a comparison of a very special kind, the origin of which
 is not yet clearly understood by us. Perhaps later we may find
 references to this unknown factor.
 
 The number of things that find symbolic representation in the dream is
 not great--the human body as a whole, parents, children, brothers and
 sisters, birth, death, nakedness and a few others. The only typical,
 that is, regular representation of the human person as a whole is in the
 form of a _house_, as was recognized by Scherner who, indeed, wished to
 credit this symbol with an overwhelming significance which it does not
 deserve. It occurs in dreams that a person, now lustful, now frightened,
 climbs down the fronts of houses. Those with entirely smooth walls are
 men; but those which are provided with projections and balconies to
 which one can hold on, are women. Parents appear in the dream as _king_
 and _queen_, or other persons highly respected. The dream in this
 instance is very pious. It treats children, and brothers and sisters,
 less tenderly; they are symbolized as _little animals_ or _vermin_.
 Birth is almost regularly represented by some reference to _water_;
 either one plunges into the water or climbs out of it, or rescues
 someone from the water, or is himself rescued from it, i.e., there is a
 mother-relation to the person. Death is replaced in the dream by _taking
 a journey, riding in a train_; _being dead, by various darksome, timid
 suggestions_; _nakedness, by clothes_ and _uniforms_. You see here how
 the lines between symbolic and suggestive representation merge one into
 another.
 
 In contrast to the paucity of this enumeration, it is a striking fact
 that the objects and subject matter of another sphere are represented by
 an extraordinarily rich symbolism. This is the sphere of the sexual
 life, the genitals, the sex processes and sexual intercourse. The great
 majority of symbols in the dream are sex symbols. A remarkable
 disproportion results from this fact. The designated subject matters are
 few, their symbols extraordinarily profuse, so that each of these
 objects can be expressed by any number of symbols of almost equal value.
 In the interpretation something is disclosed that arouses universal
 objection. The symbol interpretations, in contrast to the many-sidedness
 of the dream representations, are very monotonous--this displeases all
 who deal with them; but what is one to do?
 
 Since this is the first time in these lectures that we speak of the
 sexual life, I must tell you the manner in which I intend to handle this
 theme. Psychoanalysis sees no reason for hiding matters or treating them
 by innuendo, finds no necessity of being ashamed of dealing with this
 important subject, believes it is proper and decent to call everything
 by its correct name, and hopes most effectively in this manner to ward
 off disturbing or salacious thoughts. The fact that I am talking before
 a mixed audience can make no difference on this point. Just as there is
 no special knowledge either for the Delphic oracle or for flappers, so
 the ladies present among you have, by their appearance in this lecture
 hall, made it clear that they wish to be considered on the same basis as
 the men.
 
 The dream has a number of representations for the male genital that may
 be called symbolic, and in which the similarity of the comparison is,
 for the most part, very enlightening. In the first place, the holy
 figure 3 is a symbolical substitute for the entire male genital. The
 more conspicuous and more interesting part of the genital to both sexes,
 the male organ, has symbolical substitute in objects of like form, those
 which are long and upright, such as _sticks_, _umbrellas_, _poles_,
 _trees_, etc. It is also symbolized by objects that have the
 characteristic, in common with it, of penetration into the body and
 consequent injury, hence pointed _weapons_ of every type, _knives_,
 _daggers_, _lances_, _swords_, and in the same manner _firearms_,
 _guns_, _pistols_ and the _revolver_, which is so suitable because of
 its shape. In the troubled dream of the young girl, pursuit by a man
 with a knife or a firearm plays a big role. This, probably the most
 frequent dream symbolism, is easily translatable. Easily comprehensible,
 too, is the substitution for the male member of objects out of which
 water flows: _faucets_, _water cans_, _fountains_, as well as its
 representation by other objects that have the power of elongation, such
 as _hanging lamps_, _collapsible pencils_, etc. That _pencils_,
 _quills_, _nail files_, _hammers_ and other _instruments_ are
 undoubtedly male symbols is a fact connected with a conception of the
 organ, which likewise is not far to seek.
 
 The extraordinary characteristic of the member of being able to raise
 itself against the force of gravity, one of the phenomena of erection,
 leads to symbolic representations by _balloons_, _aeroplanes_, and more
 recently, _Zeppelins_. The dream has another far more expressive way of
 symbolizing erection. It makes the sex organ the essential part of the
 whole person and pictures the person himself as _flying_. Do not feel
 disturbed because the dreams of flying, often so beautiful, and which we
 all have had, must be interpreted as dreams of general sexual
 excitement, as erection dreams. P. Federn, among the psychoanalytical
 students, has confirmed this interpretation beyond any doubt, and even
 Mourly Vold, much praised for his sobriety, who carried on his dream
 experiments with artificial positions of the arms and legs, and who was
 really opposed to psychoanalysis--perhaps knew nothing about
 psychoanalysis--has come to the same conclusion as a result of his
 research. It is no objection to this conclusion that women may have the
 same dreams of flying. Remember that our dreams act as wish-fulfillments,
 and that the wish to be a man is often present in women, consciously or
 unconsciously. And the fact that it is possible for a woman to realize
 this wish by the same sensation as a man does, will not mislead anyone
 acquainted with anatomy. There is a small organ in the genitals of a
 woman similar to that of the male, and this small organ, the clitoris,
 even in childhood, and in the years before sexual intercourse, plays
 the same role as does the large organ of the male.
 
 To the less comprehensible male sex-symbols belong certain _reptiles_
 and _fish_, notably the famous symbol of the _snake_. Why _hats_ and
 _cloaks_ should have been turned to the same use is certainly difficult
 to discover, but their symbolic meaning leaves no room for doubt. And
 finally the question may be raised whether possibly the substitution of
 some other member as a representation for the male organ may not be
 regarded as symbolic. I believe that one is forced to this conclusion by
 the context and by the female counterparts.
 
 The female genital is symbolically represented by all those objects
 which share its peculiarity of enclosing a space capable of being filled
 by something--viz., by _pits_, _caves_, and _hollows_, by _pitchers_ and
 _bottles_, by _boxes_ and _trunks_, _jars_, _cases_, _pockets_, etc. The
 _ship_, too, belongs in this category. Many symbols represent the womb
 of the mother rather than the female genital, as _wardrobes_, _stoves_,
 and primarily a _room_. The room-symbolism is related to the
 house-symbol, _doors_ and _entrances_ again become symbolic of the
 genital opening. But materials, too, are symbols of the woman--_wood_,
 _paper_, and objects that are made of these materials, such as _tables_
 and _books_. Of animals, at least the _snail_ and _mussel_ are
 unmistakably recognizable as symbols for the female; of parts of the
 body the _mouth_ takes the place of the genital opening, while
 _churches_ and _chapels_ are structural symbolisms. As you see, all of
 these symbols are not equally comprehensible.
 
 The breasts must be included in the genitals, and like the larger
 hemispheres of the female body are represented by _apples_, _peaches_
 and _fruits_ in general. The pubic hair growth of both sexes appears in
 the dream as _woods_ and _bushes_. The complicated topography of the
 female genitals accounts for the fact that they are often represented as
 scenes with _cliffs_, _woods_ and _water_, while the imposing mechanism
 of the male sex apparatus leads to the use of all manner of very
 complicated _machinery_, difficult to describe.
 
 A noteworthy symbol of the female genital is also the _jewel-casket_;
 _jewels_ and _treasure_ are also representatives of the beloved person
 in the dream; _sweets_ frequently occur as representatives of sexual
 delights. The satisfaction in one's own genital is suggested by all
 types of _play_, in which may be included _piano-playing_. Exquisite
 symbolic representations of _onanism_ are _sliding_ and _coasting_ as
 well as _tearing off a branch_. A particularly remarkable dream symbol
 is that of having _one's_ _teeth fall out_, or _having them pulled_.
 Certainly its most immediate interpretation is castration as a
 punishment for onanism. Special representations for the relations of the
 sexes are less numerous in the dream than we might have expected from
 the foregoing. Rhythmic activities, such as _dancing_, _riding_ and
 _climbing_ may be mentioned, also harrowing experiences, such as _being
 run over_. One may include certain _manual activities_, and, of course,
 _being threatened with weapons_.
 
 You must not imagine that either the use or the translation of these
 symbols is entirely simple. All manner of unexpected things are
 continually happening. For example, it seems hardly believable that in
 these symbolic representations the sex differences are not always
 sharply distinguished. Many symbols represent a genital in general,
 regardless of whether male or female, e.g., the _little child_, the
 _small son_ or _daughter_. It sometimes occurs that a predominantly male
 symbol is used for a female genital, or vice versa. This is not
 understood until one has acquired an insight into the development of the
 sexual representations of mankind. In many instances this double meaning
 of symbols may be only apparent; the most striking of the symbols, such
 as _weapons_, _pockets_ and _boxes_ are excluded from this bisexual
 usage.
 
 I should now like to give a summary, from the point of view of the
 symbols rather than of the thing represented, of the field out of which
 the sex symbols are for the most part taken, and then to make a few
 remarks about the symbols which have points in common that are not
 understood. An obscure symbol of this type is the _hat_, perhaps
 headdress on the whole, and is usually employed as a male
 representation, though at times as a female. In the same way the _cloak_
 represents a man, perhaps not always the genital aspect. You are at
 liberty to ask, why? The _cravat_, which is suspended and is not worn by
 women, is an unmistakable male symbol. _White laundry_, all _linen_, in
 fact, is female. _Dresses_, _uniforms_ are, as we have already seen,
 substitutes for nakedness, for body-formation; the _shoe_ or _slipper_
 is a female genital. _Tables_ and _wood_ have already been mentioned as
 puzzling but undoubtedly female symbols. _Ladders_, _ascents_, _steps_
 in relation to their mounting, are certainly symbols of sexual
 intercourse. On closer consideration we see that they have the rhythm of
 walking as a common characteristic; perhaps, too, the heightening of
 excitement and the shortening of the breath, the higher one mounts.
 
 We have already spoken of _natural scenery_ as a representation of the
 female genitals. _Mountains_ and _cliffs_ are symbols of the male organ;
 the _garden_ a frequent symbol of the female genitals. _Fruit_ does not
 stand for the child, but for the breasts. _Wild animals_ signify
 sensually aroused persons, or further, base impulses, passions.
 _Blossoms_ and _flowers_ represent the female genitals, or more
 particularly, virginity. Do not forget that the blossoms are really the
 genitals of the plants.
 
 We already know the _room_ as a symbol. The representation may be
 extended in that the windows, entrances and exits of the room take on
 the meaning of the body openings. Whether the room is _open_ or _closed_
 is a part of this symbolism, and the _key_ that opens it is an
 unmistakable male symbol.
 
 This is the material of dream symbolism. It is not complete and might be
 deepened as well as extended. But I am of the opinion it will seem more
 than enough to you, perhaps will make you reluctant. You will ask, "Do I
 really live in the midst of sex symbols? Are all the objects that
 surround me, all the clothes I put on, all the things that I touch,
 always sex symbols, and nothing else?" There really are sufficient
 grounds for such questions, and the first is, "Where, in fact, are we to
 find the meaning of these dream symbols if the dreamer himself can give
 no information concerning them, or at best can give only incomplete
 information?"
 
 My answer is: "From many widely different sources, from fairy tales and
 myths, jokes and farces, from folklore, that is, the knowledge of the
 customs, usages, sayings and songs of peoples, from the poetic and
 vulgar language. Everywhere we find the same symbolism and in many of
 these instances we understand them without further information. If we
 follow up each of these sources separately we shall find so many
 parallels to the dream symbolism that we must believe in the correctness
 of our interpretations."
 
 The human body, we have said, is, according to Scherner, frequently
 symbolized in the dream by the house. Continuing this representation,
 the windows, doors and entrances are the entrances into the body
 cavities, the facades are smooth or provided with balconies and
 projections to which to hold. The same symbolism is to be found in our
 daily speech when we greet a good friend as "_old house_" or when we say
 of someone, "We'll hit him in the _belfry_," or maintain of another that
 he's not quite right in the _upper story_. In anatomy the body openings
 are sometimes called the _body-portals_.
 
 The fact that we meet our parents in the dream as imperial or royal
 persons is at first surprising. But it has its parallel in the fairy
 tale. Doesn't it begin to dawn upon us that the many fairy tales which
 begin "Once upon a time there was a _king_ and a _queen_" intend nothing
 else than, "Once there was a _father_ and a _mother_?" In our families
 we refer to our children as _princes_, the eldest as the _crown-prince_.
 The king usually calls himself the _father of the country_. We playfully
 designate little children as _worms_, and say, sympathetically, "_poor
 little worm_."
 
 Let us return to the symbolism of the house. When we use the projections
 of the house to hold ourselves on to in the dream, are we not reminded
 of the familiar colloquialism about persons with well-developed breasts:
 "She has something to _hold onto_"? The folk express this in still
 another way when it says, "there's lots of _wood in front of her
 house_"; as though it wished to come to the aid of our interpretation
 that wood is a feminine, maternal symbol.
 
 In addition to wood there are others. We might not understand how this
 material has come to be a substitute for the maternal, the feminine.
 Here our comparison of languages may be helpful. The German word _Holz_
 (wood) is said to be from the same stem as the Greek word, ,
 which means stuff, raw material. This is an example of the case, not
 entirely unusual, where a general word for material finally is
 exclusively used for some special material. There is an island in the
 ocean, known by the name of Madeira. The Portuguese gave it this name at
 the time of its discovery because it was at that time entirely covered
 with forests, for in the language of the Portuguese, Madeira means
 _wood_. You will recognize, however, that Madeira, is nothing else than
 the slightly changed Latin word _materia_ which again has the general
 meaning of _material_ Material is derived from _mater_, mother. The
 material out of which something is made, is at the same time its
 mother-part. In the symbolic use of wood for woman, mother, this ancient
 conception still lives.
 
 Birth is regularly expressed in dreams by some connection with water;
 one plunges into the water, or comes out of the water, which means one
 gives birth to, or is born. Now let us not forget that this symbol may
 refer in two ways to the truths of evolutionary history. Not alone have
 all land-mammals, including the ancestors of man, developed out of water
 animals--this is the ultimate fact--but every single mammal, every human
 being, lived the first part of his existence in the water--namely, lived
 in the body of his mother as an embryo in the amniotic fluid and came
 out of the water at the time of his birth. I do not wish to maintain
 that the dreamer knows this, on the contrary I hold that he does not
 have to know. The dreamer very likely knows some things because of the
 fact that he was told about them in his childhood, and for that very
 reason I maintain that this knowledge has played no part in the
 construction of his symbols. He was told in childhood that the stork
 brought him--but where did it get him? Out of a lake, out of the
 well--again, out of the water. One of my patients to whom such
 information had been given, a little count, disappeared for a whole
 afternoon. Finally he was discovered lying at the edge of the palace
 lake, his little face bent above the water and earnestly peering into it
 to see if he could not see the little children at the bottom.
 
 In the myths of the birth of the hero, which O. Rank submitted to
 comparative examination,--the oldest is that of King Sargon of Agade,
 about 2800 B.C.--exposure in the water and rescue from water play a
 predominating role. Rank has recognized that these are representations
 of birth, analogous to those customary in dreams. When a person in his
 dream rescues another from the water, the latter becomes his mother, or
 just plainly mother; in the myth a person who rescues a child out of the
 water professes herself as the real mother of the child. In a well-known
 joke the intelligent Jewish boy is asked who was the mother of Moses. He
 answered without hesitation, the Princess. But no, he is told, she only
 took him out of the water. "That's what _she says_," is his reply, and
 thereby he shows that he has found the correct interpretation of the
 myth.
 
 Leaving on a trip represents death in the dream. Likewise it is the
 custom in the nursery when a child asks where someone who has died, and
 whom he misses, may be, to say to him that the absent one has taken a
 trip. Again I should like to deny the truth of the belief that the dream
 symbol originates in this evasion used for the benefit of children. The
 poet makes use of the same symbol when he speaks of the Hereafter as
 "that undiscovered bourne from which no _traveler_ returns." Even in
 everyday speech it is customary to refer to the last journey. Every
 person acquainted with ancient rite knows how seriously, for example,
 the Egyptians considered the portrayal of a journey to the land of the
 dead. There still exist many copies of the "death book" which was given
 to the mummy for this journey as a sort of Baedeker. Since the burial
 places have been separated from the living quarters, the last journey of
 the dead person has become a reality.
 
 In the same manner the genital symbolism is just as little peculiar to
 the dream alone. Every one of you has perhaps at some time or other been
 so unkind as to call some woman an "_old casket_" without perhaps being
 aware that he was using a genital symbol. In the New Testament one may
 read "Woman is a weak _vessel_." The Holy Scriptures of the Jews, so
 nearly poetic in their style, are filled with sex-symbolic expressions
 which have not always been correctly understood, and the true
 construction of which, in the _Song of Songs_, for example, has led to
 many misunderstandings. In the later Hebraic literature the
 representation of woman as a house, the door taking the place of the sex
 opening, is very widespread. The man complains, for instance, when he
 discovers a lack of virginity, that he has found _the door open_. The
 symbol of the table for woman is also known to this literature. The
 woman says of her husband, "I set the table for him, _but he upset it_."
 Lame children are supposed to result from the fact that the man has
 _overturned the table_. I take these examples from a work by L. Levy of
 Brnn, _The Sexual Symbolism of the Bible and the Talmud_.
 
 That ships, too, represent women in dreams is a belief derived from the
 etymologists, who maintain "ship" was originally the name of an earthen
 vessel and is the same word as _Schaff_ (to create). The Greek myth of
 Periander of Corinth and his wife Melissa is proof that the stove or
 oven is a woman, and a womb. When, according to Herodotus, the tyrant
 entreated the shade of his beloved wife, whom, however, he had murdered
 in a fit of jealousy, for some sign of its identity, the deceased
 identified herself by the reminder that he, _Periander_, _had thrust his
 bread into a cold oven_, as a disguise for an occurrence that could have
 been known to no other person. In the _Anthropophyteia_ published by F.
 S. Krauss, an indispensable source book for everything that has to do
 with the sex life of nations, we read that in a certain German region it
 is commonly said of a woman who has just been delivered of a child,
 "_Her oven has caved in_." The making of a fire and everything connected
 therewith is filled through and through with sex symbolism. The flame is
 always the male genital, the fireplace, the hearth, is the womb of the
 woman.
 
 If you have often wondered why it is that landscapes are so often used
 to represent the female genitals in the dream, then let the mythologist
 teach you the role Mother Earth has played in the symbolisms and cults
 of ancient times. You may be tempted to say that a room represents a
 woman in the dream because of the German colloquialism which uses the
 term _Frauenzimmer_ instead of _Frau_, in other words, it substitutes
 for the human person the idea of that room that is set aside for her
 exclusive use. In like manner we speak of the _Sublime Porte_, and mean
 the Sultan and his government; furthermore, the name of the ancient
 Egyptian ruler, Pharaoh, means nothing other than "great court room."
 (In the ancient Orient the court yards between the double gates of the
 town were the gathering places of the people, in the same manner as the
 market place was in the classical world.) What I mean is, this
 derivation is far too superficial. It seems more probable to me that the
 room, as the space surrounding man, came to be the symbol of woman. We
 have seen that the house is used in such a representation; from
 mythology and poetry we may take the _city_, _fortress_, _palace_,
 _citadel_, as further symbols of woman. The question may easily be
 decided by the dreams of those persons who do not speak German and do
 not understand it. In the last few years my patients have been
 predominantly foreign-language speaking, and I think I can recall that
 in their dreams as well the room represents woman, even where they had
 no analogous usages in their languages. There are still other signs
 which show that the symbolization is not limited by the bounds of
 language, a fact that even the old dream investigator, Schubert (1862)
 maintained. Since none of my dreamers were totally ignorant of German I
 must leave this differentiation to those psychoanalysts who can gather
 examples in other lands where the people speak but one language.
 
 Among the symbol-representations of the male genital there is scarcely
 one that does not recur in jokes or in vulgar or poetical usage,
 especially among the old classical poets. Not alone do those symbols
 commonly met with in dreams appeal here, but also new ones, e.g., the
 working materials of various performances, foremost of which is the
 incantation. Furthermore, we approach in the symbolic representation of
 the male a very extended and much discussed province, which we shall
 avoid for economic reasons. I should like to make a few remarks,
 however, about one of the unclassified symbols--the figure 3. Whether or
 not this figure derives its holiness from its symbolic meaning may
 remain undecided. But it appears certain that many objects which occur
 in nature as three-part things derive their use as coats-of-arms and
 emblems from such symbolic meaning, e.g., the clover, likewise the
 three-part French lily, (fleur-de-lys), and the extraordinary
 coats-of-arms of two such widely separated islands as Sicily and the
 Isle of Man, where the Triskeles (three partly bended knees, emerging
 from a central point) are merely said to be the portrayal in a different
 form of the male genitals. Copies of the male member were used in
 antiquity as the most powerful charms (_Apotropaea_) against evil
 influences, and this is connected with the fact that the lucky amulets
 of our own time may one and all be recognized as genital or sex-symbols.
 Let us study such a collection, worn in the form of little silver
 pendants: the four-leaf clover, a pig, a mushroom, a horse-shoe, a
 ladder, a chimney-sweep. The four-leaf clover, it seems, has usurped the
 place of the three-leaf clover, which is really more suitable as a
 symbol; the pig is an ancient symbol of fertility; the mushroom is an
 unquestionable penis symbol--there are mushrooms that derive their
 systematic names from their unmistakable similarity to the male member
 (Phallus impudicus); the horseshoe recalls the contour of the female
 genital opening; and the chimney sweep who carries a ladder belongs in
 this company because he carries on that trade with which the
 sex-intercourse is vulgarly compared (_cf._ the _Anthropophyteia_). We
 have already become acquainted with his ladder as a sex symbol in the
 dream; the German usage is helpful here, it shows us how the verb "to
 mount"[30] is made use of in an exquisite sexual sense. We use the
 expressions "_to run after women_," which literally translated would be
 "_to climb after women_," and "_an old climber_."[31] In French, where
 "_step_" is "_la marche_" we find that the analogous expression for a
 man about town is "_un vieux marcheur_." It is apparently not unknown in
 this connection that the sexual intercourse of many of the larger
 animals requires a mounting, _a climbing upon_ the female.
 
 The tearing off of a branch as the symbolic representation of onanism is
 not alone in keeping with the vulgar representation of the fact of
 onanism, but has far-reaching mythological parallels. Especially
 noteworthy, however, is the representation of onanism, or rather the
 punishment therefor, castration, by the falling out or pulling out of
 teeth, because there is a parallel in folk-lore which is probably known
 to the fewest dreamers. It does not seem at all questionable to me that
 the practice of circumcision common among so many peoples is an
 equivalent and a substitute for castration. And now we are informed that
 in Australia certain primitive tribes practice circumcision as a rite of
 puberty (the ceremony in honor of the boy's coming of age), while
 others, living quite near, have substituted for this act the striking
 out of a tooth.
 
 I end my exposition with these examples. They are only examples. We know
 more about these matters, and you may well imagine how much richer and
 how much more interesting such a collection would appear if made, not by
 amateurs like ourselves, but by real experts in mythology, anthropology,
 philology and folk-lore. We are compelled to draw a few conclusions
 which cannot be exhaustive, but which give us much food for thought.
 
 In the first place, we are faced by the fact that the dreamer has at his
 disposal a symbolic means of expression of which he is unconscious
 while awake, and does not recognize when he sees. That is as remarkable
 as if you should make the discovery that your chambermaid understands
 Sanskrit, although you know she was born in a Bohemian village and never
 learned the language. It is not easy to harmonize this fact with our
 psychological views. We can only say that the dreamer's knowledge of
 symbolism is unconscious, that it is a part of his unconscious mental
 life. We make no progress with this assumption. Until now it was only
 necessary to admit of unconscious impulses, those about which one knew
 nothing, either for a period of time or at all times. But now we deal
 with something more; indeed, with unknown knowledge, with thought
 relationships, comparisons between unlike objects which lead to this,
 that one constant may be substituted for another. These comparisons are
 not made anew each time, but they lie ready, they are complete for all
 time. That is to be concluded from the fact of their agreement in
 different persons, agreement despite differences in language.
 
 But whence comes the knowledge of these symbol-relationships? The usages
 of language cover only a small part of them. The dreamer is for the most
 part unacquainted with the numerous parallels from other sources; we
 ourselves must first laboriously gather them together.
 
 Secondly, these symbolic representations are peculiar neither to the
 dreamer nor to the dream work by means of which they become expressed.
 We have learned that mythology and fairy-tales make use of the same
 symbolism, as well as do the people in their sayings and songs, the
 ordinary language of every day, and poetic phantasy. The field of
 symbolism is an extraordinarily large one, and dream symbolism is but a
 small part thereof. It is not even expedient to approach the whole
 problem from the dream side. Many of the symbols that are used in other
 places do not occur in the dream at all, or at best only very seldom.
 Many of the dream symbols are to be found in other fields only very
 rarely, as you have seen. One gets the impression that he is here
 confronted with an ancient but no longer existent method of expression,
 of which various phases, however, continue in different fields, one
 here, one there, a third, perhaps in a slightly altered form, in several
 fields. I am reminded of the phantasy of an interesting mental
 defective, who had imagined a fundamental language, of which all these
 symbolic representations were the remains.
 
 Thirdly, you must have noticed that symbolism in these other fields is
 by no means sex symbolism solely, while in the dream the symbols are
 used almost entirely to express sexual objects and processes. Nor is
 this easily explained. Is it possible that symbols originally sexual in
 their meaning later came to have other uses, and that this was the
 reason perhaps for the weakening of the symbolic representation to one
 of another nature? These questions are admittedly unanswerable if one
 has dealt only with dream-symbolism. One can only adhere to the
 supposition that there is an especially intimate connection between true
 symbols and things sexual.
 
 An important indication of this has been given us recently. A
 philologist, H. Sperber (Upsala) who works independently of
 psychoanalysis, advanced the theory that sexual needs have played the
 largest part in the origin and development of languages. The first
 sounds served as means of communication, and called the sexual partner;
 the further development of the roots of speech accompanied the
 performance of the primitive man's work. This work was communal and
 progressed to the accompaniment of rhythmically repeated word sounds. In
 that way a sexual interest was transferred to the work. The primitive
 man made work acceptable at the same time that he used it as an
 equivalent and substitute for sex-activity. The word thus called forth
 by the common labor had two meanings, designating the sex-act as well as
 the equivalent labor-activity. In time the word became disassociated
 from its sexual significance and became fixed on this work. Generations
 later the same thing happened to a new word that once had sexual
 significance and came to be used for a new type of work. In this manner
 a number of word-roots were formed, all of sexual origin, and all of
 which had lost their sexual significance. If the description sketched
 here approximates the truth, it opens up the possibility for an
 understanding of the dream symbolism. We can understand how it is that
 in the dream, which preserves something of these most ancient
 conditions, there are so extraordinarily many symbols for the sexual,
 and why, in general, weapons and implements always stand for the male,
 materials and things manufactured, for the female. Symbolic
 relationships would be the remnants of the old word-identity; things
 which once were called by the same names as the genitals can now appear
 in the dream as symbols for them.
 
 From our parallels to dream symbolization you may also learn to
 appreciate what is the character of psychoanalysis which makes it a
 subject of general interest, which is true of neither psychology nor
 psychiatry. Psychoanalytic work connects with so many other scientific
 subjects, the investigation of which promises the most pertinent
 discoveries, with mythology, with folk-lore, with racial psychology and
 with religion. You will understand how a journal can have grown on
 psychoanalytic soil, the sole purpose of which is the furtherance of
 these relationships. This is the _Imago_ founded in 1912 and edited by
 Hanns Sachs and Otto Rank. In all of these relations, psychoanalysis is
 first and foremost the giving, less often the receiving, part. Indeed it
 derives benefit from the fact that its unusual teachings are
 substantiated by their recurrence in other fields, but on the whole it
 is psychoanalysis that provides the technical procedure and the point of
 view, the use of which will prove fruitful in those other fields. The
 psychic life of the human individual provides us, upon psychoanalytic
 investigation, with explanations with which we are able to solve many
 riddles in the life of humanity, or at least show these riddles in their
 proper light.
 
 Furthermore, I have not even told you under what conditions we are able
 to get the deepest insight into that suppositious "fundamental
 language," or from which field we gain the most information. So long as
 you do not know this you cannot appreciate the entire significance of
 the subject. This field is the neurotic, its materials, the symptoms and
 other expressions of the nervous patient, for the explanation and
 treatment of which psychoanalysis was devised.
 
 My fourth point of view returns to our premise and connects up with our
 prescribed course. We said, even if there were no such thing as dream
 censorship, the dream would still be hard to understand, for we would
 then be confronted with the task of translating the symbol-language of
 the dream into the thought of our waking hours. Symbolism is a second
 and independent item of dream distortion, in addition to dream
 censorship. It is not a far cry to suppose that it is convenient for
 the dream censorship to make use of symbolism since both lead to the
 same end, to making the dream strange and incomprehensible.
 
 Whether or not in the further study of the dream we shall hit upon a new
 item that influences dream distortion, remains to be seen. I should not
 like to leave the subject of dream symbolism without once more touching
 upon the curious fact that it arouses such strong opposition in the case
 of educated persons, in spite of the fact that symbolism in myth,
 religion, art and speech is undoubtedly so prevalent. Is not this again
 because of its relationship to sexuality?
 
 
 
 
 ELEVENTH LECTURE
 
 THE DREAM
 
 
 _The Dream-Work_
 
 If you have mastered dream censorship and symbolic representation, you
 are, to be sure, not yet adept in dream distortion, but you are
 nevertheless in a position to understand most dreams. For this you
 employ two mutually supplementary methods, call up the associations of
 the dreamer until you have penetrated from the substitute to the actual,
 and from your own knowledge supply the meaning for the symbol. Later we
 shall discuss certain uncertainties which show themselves in this
 process.
 
 We are now in a position to resume work which we attempted, with very
 insufficient means at an earlier stage, when we studied the relation
 between the manifest dream elements and their latent actualities, and in
 so doing established four such main relationships: that of a part of the
 whole, that of approach or allusion, the symbolic relationship and
 plastic word representation. We shall now attempt the same on a larger
 scale, by comparing the manifest dream content as a whole, with the
 latent dream which we found by interpretation.
 
 I hope you will never again confuse these two. If you have achieved
 this, you have probably accomplished more in the understanding of the
 dream than the majority of the readers of my _Interpretation of Dreams_.
 Let me remind you once more that this process, which changes the latent
 into the manifest dream, is called _dream-work_. Work which proceeds in
 the opposite direction, from the manifest dream to the latent, is our
 _work of interpretation_. The work of interpretation attempts to undo
 the dream-work. Infantile dreams that are recognized as evident wish
 fulfillments nevertheless have undergone some dream-work, namely, the
 transformation of the wish into reality, and generally, too, of thoughts
 into visual pictures. Here we need no interpretation, but only a
 retracing of these transformations. Whatever dream-work has been added
 to other dreams, we call _dream distortion_, and this can be annulled by
 our work of interpretation.
 
 The comparison of many dream interpretations has rendered it possible
 for me to give you a coherent representation of what the dream-work does
 with the material of the latent dream. I beg of you, however, not to
 expect to understand too much of this. It is a piece of description that
 should be listened to with calm attention.
 
 The first process of the dream-work is _condensation_. By this we
 understand that the manifest dream has a smaller content than the latent
 one, that is, it is a sort of abbreviated translation of the latter.
 Condensation may occasionally be absent, but as a rule it is present,
 often to a very high degree. The opposite is never true, that is, it
 never occurs that the manifest dream is more extensive in scope and
 content than the latent. Condensation occurs in the following ways: 1.
 Certain latent elements are entirely omitted; 2. only a fragment of the
 many complexes of the latent dream is carried over into the manifest
 dream; 3. latent elements that have something in common are collected
 for the manifest dream and are fused into a whole.
 
 If you wish, you may reserve the term "condensation" for this last
 process alone. Its effects are particularly easy to demonstrate. From
 your own dreams you will doubtless recall the fusion of several persons
 into one. Such a compound person probably looks like A., is dressed like
 B., does something that one remembers of C., but in spite of this one is
 conscious that he is really D. By means of this compound formation
 something common to all four people is especially emphasized. One can
 make a compound formation of events and of places in the same way as of
 people, provided always that the single events and localities have
 something in common which the latent dream emphasizes. It is a sort of
 new and fleeting concept of formation, with the common element as its
 kernel. This jumble of details that has been fused together regularly
 results in a vague indistinct picture, as though you had taken several
 pictures on the same film.
 
 The shaping of such compound formations must be of great importance to
 the dream-work, for we can prove, (by the choice of a verbal expression
 for a thought, for instance) that the common elements mentioned above
 are purposely manufactured where they originally do not exist. We have
 already become acquainted with such condensation and compound
 formations; they played an important part in the origin of certain cases
 of slips of the tongue. You recall the young man who wished to _inscort_
 a woman. Furthermore, there are jokes whose technique may be traced to
 such a condensation. But entirely aside from this, one may maintain that
 this appearance of something quite unknown in the dream finds its
 counterpart in many of the creations of our imagination which fuse
 together component parts that do not belong together in experience, as
 for example the centaurs, and the fabulous animals of old mythology or
 of Boecklin's pictures. For creative imagination can invent nothing new
 whatsoever, it can only put together certain details normally alien to
 one another. The peculiar thing, however, about the procedure of the
 dream-work is the following: The material at the disposal of the
 dream-work consists of thoughts, thoughts which may be offensive and
 unacceptable, but which are nevertheless correctly formed and expressed.
 These thoughts are transformed into something else by the dream-work,
 and it is remarkable and incomprehensible that this translation, this
 rendering, as it were, into another script or language, employs the
 methods of condensation and combination. For a translation usually
 strives to respect the discriminations expressed in the text, and to
 differentiate similar things. The dream-work, on the contrary, tries to
 fuse two different thoughts by looking, just as the joke does, for an
 ambiguous word which shall act as a connecting link between the two
 thoughts. One need not attempt to understand this feature of the case at
 once, but it may become significant for the conception of the
 dream-work.
 
 Although condensation renders the dream opaque, one does not get the
 impression that it is an effect of dream censorship. One prefers to
 trace it back to mechanical or economic conditions; but censorship
 undoubtedly has a share in the process.
 
 The results of condensation may be quite extraordinary. With its help,
 it becomes possible at times to collect quite unrelated latent thought
 processes into one manifest dream, so that one can arrive at an
 apparently adequate interpretation, and at the same time conceive a
 possible further interpretation.
 
 The consequence of condensation for the relation between latent and
 manifest dreams is the fact that no simple relations can exist between
 the elements of the one and the other. A manifest element corresponds
 simultaneously to several latent ones, and vice versa, a latent element
 may partake of several manifest ones, an interlacing, as it were. In the
 interpretation of the dream it also becomes evident that the
 associations to a single element do not necessarily follow one another
 in orderly sequence. Often we must wait until the entire dream is
 interpreted.
 
 Dream-work therefore accomplishes a very unusual sort of transcription
 of dream thoughts, not a translation word for word, or sign for sign,
 not a selection according to a set rule, as if all the consonants of a
 word were given and the vowels omitted; nor is it what we might call
 substitution, namely, the choice of one element to take the place of
 several others. It is something very different and much more
 complicated.
 
 The second process of the dream-work is _displacement_. Fortunately we
 are already prepared for this, since we know that it is entirely the
 work of dream censorship. The two evidences of this are firstly, that a
 latent element is not replaced by one of its constituent parts but by
 something further removed from it, that is, by a sort of allusion;
 secondly, that the psychic accent is transferred from an important
 element to another that is unimportant, so that the dream centers
 elsewhere and seems strange.
 
 Substitution by allusion is known to our conscious thinking also, but
 with a difference. In conscious thinking the allusion must be easily
 intelligible, and the substitute must bear a relation to the actual
 content. Jokes, too, often make use of allusion; they let the condition
 of content associations slide and replace it by unusual external
 associations, such as resemblances in sound, ambiguity of words, etc.
 They retain, however, the condition of intelligibility; the joke would
 lose all its effect if the allusion could not be traced back to the
 actual without any effort whatsoever. The allusion of displacement has
 freed itself of both these limitations. Its connection with the element
 which it replaces is most external and remote, is unintelligible for
 this reason, and if it is retraced, its interpretation gives the
 impression of an unsuccessful joke or of a forced, far-fetched
 explanation. For the dream censor has only then accomplished its
 purpose, when it has made the path of return from the allusion to the
 original undiscoverable.
 
 The displacement of emphasis is unheard of as a means of expressing
 thoughts. In conscious thinking we occasionally admit it to gain a comic
 effect. I can probably give you an idea of the confusion which this
 produces by reminding you of the story of the blacksmith who had
 committed a capital crime. The court decided that the penalty for the
 crime must be paid, but since he was the only blacksmith in the village
 and therefore indispensable, while there were three tailors, one of the
 latter was hung in his stead.
 
 The third process of the dream-work is the most interesting from a
 psychological point of view. It consists of the _translation_ of
 thoughts into visual images. Let us bear in mind that by no means all
 dream thoughts undergo this translation; many of them retain their form
 and appear in the manifest dream also as thought or consciousness;
 moreover, visual images are not the only form into which thoughts are
 translated. They are, however, the foundation of the dream fabric; this
 part of the dream work is, as we already know, the second most constant,
 and for single dream elements we have already learned to know "plastic
 word representation."
 
 It is evident that this process is not simple. In order to get an idea
 of its difficulties you must pretend that you have undertaken the task
 of replacing a political editorial in a newspaper by a series of
 illustrations, that you have suffered an atavistic return from the use
 of the alphabet to ideographic writing. Whatever persons or concrete
 events occur in this article you will be able to replace easily by
 pictures, perhaps to your advantage, but you will meet with difficulties
 in the representation of all abstract words and all parts of speech
 denoting thought relationships, such as particles, conjunctions, etc.
 With the abstract words you could use all sorts of artifices. You will,
 for instance, try to change the text of the article into different words
 which may sound unusual, but whose components will be more concrete and
 more adapted to representation. You will then recall that most abstract
 words were concrete before their meaning paled, and will therefore go
 back to the original concrete significance of these words as often as
 possible, and so you will be glad to learn that you can represent the
 "possession" of an object by the actual physical straddling of it.[32]
 The dream work does the same thing. Under such circumstances you can
 hardly demand accuracy of representation. You will also have to allow
 the dream-work to replace an element that is as hard to depict as for
 instance, broken faith, by another kind of rupture, a broken leg.[33] In
 this way you will be able to smooth away to some extent the crudity of
 imagery when the latter is endeavoring to replace word expression.
 
 In the representation of parts of speech that denote thought relations,
 such as _because_, _therefore_, _but_, etc., you have no such aids;
 these constituent parts of the text will therefore be lost in your
 translation into images. In the same way, the dream-work resolves the
 content of the dream thought into its raw material of objects and
 activities. You may be satisfied if the possibility is vouchsafed you to
 suggest certain relations, not representable in themselves, in a more
 detailed elaboration of the image. In quite the same way the dream-work
 succeeds in expressing much of the content of the latent dream thought
 in the formal peculiarities of the manifest dream, in its clearness or
 vagueness, in its division into several parts, etc. The number of
 fragmentary dreams into which the dream is divided corresponds as a rule
 to the number of main themes, of thought sequences in the latent dream;
 a short preliminary dream often stands as an introduction or a
 motivation to the complementary dream which follows; a subordinate
 clause in dream thought is represented in the manifest dream as an
 interpolated change of scene, etc. The form of the dream is itself,
 therefore, by no means without significance and challenges
 interpretation. Different dreams of the same night often have the same
 meaning, and testify to an increasing effort to control a stimulus of
 growing urgency. In a single dream a particularly troublesome element
 may be represented by "duplicates," that is, by numerous symbols.
 
 By continually comparing dream thought with the manifest dream that
 replaces it, we learn all sorts of things for which we were not
 prepared, as for instance, the fact that even the nonsense and absurdity
 of the dream have meaning. Yes, on this point the opposition between the
 medical and psychoanalytic conception of the dream reaches a climax not
 previously achieved. According to the former, the dream is senseless
 because the dreaming psychic activity has lost all power of critical
 judgment; according to our theory, on the other hand, the dream becomes
 senseless, whenever a critical judgment, contained in the dream thought,
 wishes to express the opinion: "It is nonsense." The dream which you all
 know, about the visit to the theatre (three tickets 1 Fl. 50 Kr.) is a
 good example of this. The opinion expressed here is: "It was _nonsense_
 to marry so early."
 
 In the same way, we discover in interpretation what is the significance
 of the doubts and uncertainties so often expressed by the dreamer as to
 whether a certain element really occurred in the dream; whether it was
 this or something else. As a rule these doubts and uncertainties
 correspond to nothing in the latent dream thought; they are occasioned
 throughout by the working of the dream censor and are equivalent to an
 unsuccessful attempt at suppression.
 
 One of the most surprising discoveries is the manner in which the
 dream-work deals with those things which are opposed to one another in
 the latent dream. We already know that agreements in the latent material
 are expressed in the manifest dream by condensations. Now oppositions
 are treated in exactly the same way as agreements and are, with special
 preference, expressed by the same manifest element. An element in a
 manifest dream, capable of having an opposite, may therefore represent
 itself as well as its opposite, or may do both simultaneously; only the
 context can determine which translation is to be chosen. It must follow
 from this that the particle "no" cannot be represented in the dream, at
 least not unambiguously.
 
 The development of languages furnishes us with a welcome analogy for
 this surprising behavior on the part of the dream work. Many scholars
 who do research work in languages have maintained that in the oldest
 languages opposites--such as strong, weak; light, dark; big,
 little--were expressed by the same root word. (_The Contradictory Sense
 of Primitive Words._) In old Egyptian, _ken_ originally meant both
 strong and weak. In conversation, misunderstanding in the use of such
 ambiguous words was avoided by the tone of voice and by accompanying
 gestures, in writing by the addition of so-called determinatives, that
 is, by a picture that was itself not meant to be expressed. Accordingly,
 if ken meant strong, the picture of an erect little man was placed after
 the alphabetical signs, if _ken_, _weak_, was meant, the picture of a
 cowering man followed. Only later, by slight modifications of the
 original word, were two designations developed for the opposites which
 it denoted. In this way, from _ken_ meaning both strong and weak, there
 was derived a _ken_, strong, and a _ken_, weak. It is said that not only
 the most primitive languages in their last developmental stage, but also
 the more recent ones, even the living tongues of to-day have retained
 abundant remains of this primitive opposite meaning. Let me give you a
 few illustrations of this taken from C. Abel (1884).
 
 In Latin there are still such words of double meaning:
 
 _altus_--high, deep, and _sacer_, sacred, accursed.
 
 As examples of modifications of the same root, I cite:
 
 _clamare_--to scream, _clam_--quiet, still, secret;
 
 _siccus_--dry, _succus_--juice.
 
 And from the German:
 
 _Stimme_--voice, _stumm_--dumb.
 
 The comparison of related tongues yields a wealth of examples:
 
 English: _lock_; German: _Loch_--hole, _Lcke_--gap.
 
 English: _cleave_; German: _kleben_--to stick, to adhere.
 
 The English _without_, is to-day used to mean "not with"; that "with"
 had the connotation of deprivation as well as that of apportioning, is
 apparent from the compounds: _withdraw_, _withhold_. The German
 _wieder_, again, closely resembles this.
 
 Another peculiarity of dream-work finds it prototype in the development
 of language. It occurred in ancient Egyptian as well as in other later
 languages that the sequence of sounds of the words was transposed to
 denote the same fundamental idea. The following are examples from
 English and German:
 
 _Topf_--_pot_; _boat_--_tub_; _hurry_--_Ruhe_ (rest, quiet).
 
 _Balken_ (beam)--_Kloben_ (mallet)--_club_.
 
 From the Latin and the German:
 
 _capere_ (to seize)--_packen_ (to seize, to grasp).
 
 Inversions such as occur here in the single word are effected in a very
 different way by the dream-work. We already know the inversion of the
 sense, substitution by the opposite. Besides there are inversions of
 situations, of relations between two people, and so in dreams we are in
 a sort of topsy-turvy world. In a dream it is frequently the rabbit that
 shoots the hunter. Further inversion occurs in the sequence of events,
 so that in the dream the cause is placed after the effect. It is like a
 performance in a third-rate theatre, where the hero falls before the
 shot which kills him is fired from the wings. Or there are dreams in
 which the whole sequence of the elements is inverted, so that in the
 interpretation one must take the last first, and the first last, in
 order to obtain a meaning. You will recall from our study of dream
 symbolism that to go or fall into the water means the same as to come
 out of it, namely, to give birth to, or to be born, and that mounting
 stairs or a ladder means the same as going down. The advantage that
 dream distortions may gain from such freedom of representation, is
 unmistakable.
 
 These features of the dream-work may be called _archaic_. They are
 connected with ancient systems of expression, ancient languages and
 literatures, and involve the same difficulties which we shall deal with
 later in a critical connection.
 
 Now for some other aspects of the matter. In the dream-work it is
 plainly a question of translating the latent thoughts, expressed in
 words, into psychic images, in the main, of a visual kind. Now our
 thoughts were developed from such psychic images; their first material
 and the steps which led up to them were psychic impressions, or to be
 more exact, the memory images of these psychic impressions. Only later
 were words attached to these and then combined into thoughts. The
 dream-work therefore puts the thoughts through a _regressive_ treatment,
 that is, one that retraces the steps in their development. In this
 regression, all that has been added to the thoughts as a new
 contribution in the course of the development of the memory pictures
 must fall away.
 
 This, then, is the dream-work. In view of the processes that we have
 discovered about it, our interest in the manifest dream was forced into
 the background. I shall, however, devote a few remarks to the latter,
 since it is after all the only thing that is positively known to us.
 
 It is natural that the manifest dream should lose its importance for us.
 It must be a matter of indifference to us whether it is well composed or
 resolved into a series of disconnected single images. Even when its
 exterior seems to be significant, we know that it has been developed by
 means of dream distortion and may have as little organic connection with
 the inner content of the dream as the facade of an Italian church has
 with its structure and ground plan. At other times this facade of the
 dream, too, has its significance, in that it reproduces with little or
 no distortion an important part of the latent dream thought. But we
 cannot know this before we have put the dream through a process of
 interpretation and reached a decision as to what amount of distortion
 has taken place. A similar doubt prevails when two elements in the dream
 seem to have been brought into close relations to one another. This may
 be a valuable hint, suggesting that we may join together those manifest
 thoughts which correspond to the elements in the latent dream; yet at
 other times we are convinced that what belongs together in thought has
 been torn apart in the dream.
 
 As a general rule we must refrain from trying to explain one part of the
 manifest dream by another, as if the dream were coherently conceived and
 pragmatically represented. At the most it is comparable to a Breccian
 stone, produced by the fusion of various minerals in such a way that the
 markings it shows are entirely different from those of the original
 mineral constituents. There is actually a part of the dream-work, the
 so-called _secondary treatment_, whose function it is to develop
 something unified, something approximately coherent from the final
 products of the dream-work. In so doing the material is often arranged
 in an entirely misleading sense and insertions are made wherever it
 seems necessary.
 
 On the other hand, we must not over-estimate the dream-work, nor
 attribute too much to it. The processes which we have enumerated tell
 the full tale of its functioning; beyond condensing, displacing,
 representing plastically, and then subjecting the whole to a secondary
 treatment, it can do nothing. Whatever of judgment, of criticism, of
 surprise, and of deduction are to be found in the dream are not products
 of the dream-work and are only very seldom signs of afterthoughts about
 the dream, but are generally parts of the latent dream thought, which
 have passed over into the manifest dream, more or less modified and
 adapted to the context. In the matter of composing speeches, the
 dream-work can also do nothing. Except for a few examples, the speeches
 in the dream are imitations and combinations of speeches heard or made
 by oneself during the day, and which have been introduced into the
 latent thought, either as material or as stimuli for the dream. Neither
 can the dream pose problems; when these are found in the dream, they are
 in the main combinations of numbers, semblances of examples that are
 quite absurd or merely copies of problems in the latent dream thought.
 Under these conditions it is not surprising that the interest which has
 attached itself to the dream-work is soon deflected from it to the
 latent dream thoughts which are revealed in more or less distorted form
 in the manifest dream. It is not justifiable, however, to have this
 change go so far that in a theoretical consideration one regularly
 substitutes the latent dream thought for the dream itself, and
 maintains of the latter what can hold only for the former. It is odd
 that the results of psychoanalysis should be misused for such an
 exchange. "Dream" can mean nothing but the result of the dream-work,
 that is, the _form_ into which the latent dream thoughts have been
 translated by the dream-work.
 
 Dream-work is a process of a very peculiar sort, the like of which has
 hitherto not been discovered in psychic life. These condensations,
 displacements, regressive translations of thoughts into pictures, are
 new discoveries which richly repay our efforts in the field of
 psychoanalysis. You will realize from the parallel to the dream-work,
 what connections psychoanalytic studies will reveal with other fields,
 especially with the development of speech and thought. You can only
 surmise the further significance of these connections when you hear that
 the mechanism of the dream structure is the model for the origin of
 neurotic symptoms.
 
 I know too that we cannot as yet estimate the entire contribution that
 this work has made to psychology. We shall only indicate the new proofs
 that have been given of the existence of unconscious psychic acts--for
 such are the latent dream thoughts--and the unexpectedly wide approach
 to the understanding of the unconscious psychic life that dream
 interpretation opens up to us.
 
 The time has probably come, however, to illustrate separately, by
 various little examples of dreams, the connected facts for which you
 have been prepared.
 
 
 
 
 TWELFTH LECTURE
 
 THE DREAM
 
 _Analysis of Sample Dreams_
 
 
 I hope you will not be disappointed if I again lay before you excerpts
 from dream analyses instead of inviting you to participate in the
 interpretation of a beautiful long dream. You will say that after so
 much preparation you ought to have this right, and that after the
 successful interpretation of so many thousands of dreams it should long
 ago have become possible to assemble a collection of excellent dream
 samples with which we could demonstrate all our assertions concerning
 dream-work and dream thoughts. Yes, but the difficulties which stand in
 the way of the fulfillment of your wish are too many.
 
 First of all, I must confess to you that no one practices dream
 interpretation as his main occupation. When does one interpret dreams?
 Occasionally one can occupy himself with the dream of some friend,
 without any special purpose, or else he may work with his own dreams for
 a time in order to school himself in psychoanalytic method; most often,
 however, one deals with the dreams of nervous individuals who are
 undergoing analytic treatment. These latter dreams are excellent
 material, and in no way inferior to those of normal persons, but one is
 forced by the technique of the treatment to subordinate dream analysis
 to therapeutic aims and to pass over a large number of dreams after
 having derived something from them that is of use in the treatment. Many
 dreams we meet with during the treatment are, as a matter of fact,
 impossible of complete analysis. Since they spring from the total mass
 of psychic material which is still unknown to us, their understanding
 becomes possible only after the completion of the cure. Besides, to tell
 you such dreams would necessitate the disclosure of all the secrets
 concerning a neurosis. That will not do for us, since we have taken the
 dream as preparation for the study of the neuroses.
 
 I know you would gladly leave this material, and would prefer to hear
 the dreams of healthy persons, or your own dreams explained. But that is
 impossible because of the content of these dreams. One can expose
 neither himself, nor another whose confidence he has won, so
 inconsiderately as would result from a thorough interpretation of his
 dreams--which, as you already know, refer to the most intimate things of
 his personality. In addition to this difficulty, caused by the nature of
 the material, there is another that must be considered when
 communicating a dream. You know the dream seems strange even to the
 dreamer himself, let alone to one who does not know the dreamer. Our
 literature is not poor in good and detailed dream analyses. I myself
 have published some in connection with case histories. Perhaps the best
 example of a dream interpretation is the one published by O. Rank, being
 two related dreams of a young girl, covering about two pages of print,
 the analysis covering seventy-six pages. I would need about a whole
 semester in order to take you through such a task. If we select a longer
 or more markedly distorted dream, we have to make so many explanations,
 we must make use of so many free associations and recollections, must go
 into so many bypaths, that a lecture on the subject would be entirely
 unsatisfactory and inconclusive. So I must ask you to be content with
 what is more easily obtained, with the recital of small bits of dreams
 of neurotic persons, in which we may be able to recognize this or that
 isolated fact. Dream symbols are the most easily demonstrable, and after
 them, certain peculiarities of regressive dream representations.[34] I
 shall tell you why I considered each of the following dreams worthy of
 communication.
 
 1. A dream, consisting of only two brief pictures: "_The dreamer's uncle
 is smoking a cigarette, although it is Saturday. A woman caresses him as
 though he were her child._"
 
 In commenting on the first picture, the dreamer (a Jew) remarks that his
 uncle is a pious man who never did, and never would do, anything so
 sinful as smoking on the Sabbath. As to the woman of the second picture,
 he has no free associations other than his mother. These two pictures or
 thoughts should obviously be brought into connection with each other,
 but how? Since he expressly rules out the reality of his uncle's action,
 then it is natural to interpolate an "if." "_If_ my uncle, that pious
 man, should smoke a cigarette on Saturday, then I could also permit my
 mother's caresses." This obviously means that the mother's caresses are
 prohibited, in the same manner as is smoking on Saturday, to a pious
 Jew. You will recall, I told you that all relations between the dream
 thoughts disappear in the dream-work, that these relations are broken up
 into their raw material, and that it is the task of interpretation to
 re-interpolate the omitted connections.
 
 2. Through my publications on dreams I have become, in certain respects,
 the public consultant on matters pertaining to dreams, and for many
 years I have been receiving communications from the most varied sources,
 in which dreams are related to me or presented to me for my judgment. I
 am of course grateful to all those persons who include with the story of
 the dream, enough material to make an interpretation possible, or who
 give such an interpretation themselves. It is in this category that the
 following dream belongs, the dream of a Munich physician in the year
 1910. I select it because it goes to show how impossible of
 understanding a dream generally is before the dreamer has given us what
 information he has about it. I suspect that at bottom you consider the
 ideal dream interpretation that in which one simply inserts the meaning
 of the symbols, and would like to lay aside the technique of free
 association to the dream elements. I wish to disabuse your minds of this
 harmful error.
 
 "On July 13, 1910, toward morning, I dreamed _that I was bicycling down
 a street in Tbingen, when a brown Dachshund tore after me and caught me
 by the heel. A bit further on I get off, seat myself on a step, and
 begin to beat the beast, which has clenched its teeth tight._ (_I feel
 no discomfort from the biting or the whole scene._) _Two elderly ladies
 are sitting opposite me and watching me with grins on their faces. Then
 I wake up and, as so often happens to me, the whole dream becomes
 perfectly clear to me in this moment of transition to the waking
 state._"
 
 Symbols are of little use in this case. The dreamer, however, informs
 us, "I lately fell in love with a girl, just from seeing her on the
 street, but had no means of becoming acquainted with her. The most
 pleasant means might have been the Dachshund, since I am a great lover
 of animals, and also felt that the girl was in sympathy with this
 characteristic." He also adds that he repeatedly interfered in the
 fights of scuffling dogs with great dexterity and frequently to the
 great amazement of the spectators. Thus we learn that the girl, who
 pleased him, was always accompanied by this particular dog. This girl,
 however, was disregarded in the manifest dream, and there remained only
 the dog which he associates with her. Perhaps the elderly ladies who
 simpered at him took the place of the girl. The remainder of what he
 tells us is not enough to explain this point. Riding a bicycle in the
 dream is a direct repetition of the remembered situation. He had never
 met the girl with the dog except when he was on his bicycle.
 
 3. When anyone has lost a loved one, he produces dreams of a special
 sort for a long time afterward, dreams in which the knowledge of death
 enters into the most remarkable compromises with the desire to have the
 deceased alive again. At one time the deceased is dead and yet continues
 to live on because he does not know that he is dead, and would die
 completely only if he knew it; at another time he is half dead and half
 alive, and each of these conditions has its particular signs. One cannot
 simply label these dreams nonsense, for to come to life again is no more
 impossible in the dream than, for example, it is in the fairy story, in
 which it occurs as a very frequent fate. As far as I have been able to
 analyze such dreams, I have always found them to be capable of a
 sensible solution, but that the pious wish to recall the deceased to
 life goes about expressing itself by the oddest methods. Let me tell you
 such a dream, which seems queer and senseless enough, and analysis of
 which will show you many of the points for which you have been prepared
 by our theoretical discussions. The dream is that of a man who had lost
 his father many years previously.
 
 "_Father is dead, but has been exhumed and looks badly. He goes on
 living, and the dreamer does everything to prevent him from noticing
 that fact._" Then the dream goes on to other things, apparently
 irrelevant.
 
 The father is dead, that we know. That he was exhumed is not really
 true, nor is the truth of the rest of the dream important. But the
 dreamer tells us that when he came back from his father's funeral, one
 of his teeth began to ache. He wanted to treat this tooth according to
 the Jewish precept, "If thy tooth offend thee, pluck it out," and betook
 himself to the dentist. But the latter said, "One does not simply pull a
 tooth out, one must have patience with it. I shall inject something to
 kill the nerve. Come again in three days and then I will take it out."
 
 "This 'taking it out'," says the dreamer suddenly, "is the exhuming."
 
 Is the dreamer right? It does not correspond exactly, only
 approximately, for the tooth is not taken out, but something that has
 died off is taken out of it. But after our other experiences we are
 probably safe in believing that the dream work is capable of such
 inaccuracies. It appears that the dreamer condensed, fused into one, his
 dead father and the tooth that was killed but retained. No wonder then,
 that in the manifest dream something senseless results, for it is
 impossible for everything that is said of the tooth to fit the father.
 What is it that serves as something intermediate between tooth and
 father and makes this condensation possible?
 
 This interpretation must be correct, however, for the dreamer says that
 he is acquainted with the saying that when one dreams of losing a tooth
 it means that one is going to lose a member of his family.
 
 We know that this popular interpretation is incorrect, or at least is
 correct only in a scurrilous sense. For that reason it is all the more
 surprising to find this theme thus touched upon in the background of
 other portions of the dream content.
 
 Without any further urging, the dreamer now begins to tell of his
 father's illness and death as well as of his relations with him. The
 father was sick a long time, and his care and treatment cost him, the
 son, much money. And yet it was never too much for him, he never grew
 impatient, never wished it might end soon. He boasts of his true Jewish
 piety toward his father, of rigid adherence to the Jewish precepts. But
 are you not struck by a contradiction in the thoughts of the dream? He
 had identified tooth with father. As to the tooth he wanted to follow
 the Jewish precept that carries out its own judgment, "pull it out if it
 causes pain and annoyance." He had also been anxious to follow the
 precept of the law with regard to his father, which in this case,
 however, tells him to disregard trouble and expense, to take all the
 burdens upon himself and to let no hostile intent arise toward the
 object which causes the pain. Would not the agreement be far more
 compelling if he had really developed feelings toward his father similar
 to those about his sick tooth; that is, had he wished that a speedy
 death should put an end to that superfluous, painful and expensive
 existence?
 
 I do not doubt that this was really his attitude toward his father
 during the latter's extended illness, and that his boastful assurances
 of filial piety were intended to distract his attention from these
 recollections. Under such circumstances, the death-wish directed toward
 the parent generally becomes active, and disguises itself in phrases of
 sympathetic consideration such as, "It would really be a blessed release
 for him." But note well that we have here overcome an obstacle in the
 latent dream thoughts themselves. The first part of these thoughts was
 surely unconscious only temporarily, that is to say, during the
 dream-work, while the inimical feelings toward the father might have
 been permanently unconscious, dating perhaps from childhood,
 occasionally slipping into consciousness, shyly and in disguise, during
 his father's illness. We can assert this with even greater certainty of
 other latent thoughts which have made unmistakable contributions to the
 dream content. To be sure, none of these inimical feelings toward the
 father can be discovered in the dream. But when we search a childhood
 history for the root of such enmity toward the father, we recollect that
 fear of the father arises because the latter, even in the earliest
 years, opposes the boy's sex activities, just as he is ordinarily forced
 to oppose them again, after puberty, for social motives. This relation
 to the father applies also to our dreamer; there had been mixed with his
 love for him much respect and fear, having its source in early sex
 intimidation.
 
 From the onanism complex we can now explain the other parts of the
 manifest dream. "_He looks badly_" does, to be sure, allude to another
 remark of the dentist, that it looks badly to have a tooth missing in
 that place; but at the same time it refers to the "looking badly" by
 which the young man betrayed, or feared to betray, his excessive sexual
 activity during puberty. It was not without lightening his own heart
 that the dreamer transposed the bad looks from himself to his father in
 the manifest content, an inversion of the dream work with which you are
 familiar. "_He goes on living since then_," disguises itself with the
 wish to have him alive again as well as with the promise of the dentist
 that the tooth will be preserved. A very subtle phrase, however, is the
 following: "The dreamer does everything _to prevent him_ (_the father_)
 _from noticing the fact_," a phrase calculated to lead us to conclude
 that he is dead. Yet the only meaningful conclusion is again drawn from
 the onanism complex, where it is a matter of course for the young man to
 do everything in order to hide his sex life from his father. Remember,
 in conclusion, that we were constantly forced to interpret the so-called
 tooth-ache dreams as dreams dealing with the subject of onanism and the
 punishment that is feared.
 
 You now see how this incomprehensible dream came into being, by the
 creation of a remarkable and misleading condensation, by the fact that
 all the ideas emerge from the midst of the latent thought process, and
 by the creation of ambiguous substitute formations for the most hidden
 and, at the time, most remote of these thoughts.
 
 4. We have tried repeatedly to understand those prosaic and banal dreams
 which have nothing foolish or repulsive about them, but which cause us
 to ask: "Why do we dream such unimportant stuff?" So I shall give you a
 new example of this kind, three dreams belonging together, all of which
 were dreamed in the same night by a young woman.
 
 (_a_). "_She it going through the hall of her house and strikes her head
 against the low-hanging chandelier, so that her head bleeds._"
 
 She has no reminiscence to contribute, nothing that really happened. The
 information she gives leads in quite another direction. "You know how
 badly my hair is falling out. Mother said to me yesterday, 'My child, if
 it goes on like this, you will have a head like the cheek of a
 buttock.'" Thus the head here stands for the other part of the body. We
 can understand the chandelier symbolically without other help; all
 objects that can be lengthened are symbols of the male organ. Thus the
 dream deals with a bleeding at the lower end of the body, which results
 from its collision with the male organ. This might still be ambiguous;
 her further associations show that it has to do with her belief that
 menstrual bleeding results from sexual intercourse with a man, a bit of
 sexual theory believed by many immature girls.
 
 (_b_). "_She sees a deep hole in the vineyard which she knows was made
 by pulling out a tree._" Herewith her remark that "_she misses the
 tree_." She means that she did not see the tree in the dream, but the
 same phrase serves to express another thought which symbolic
 interpretation makes completely certain. The dream deals with another
 bit of the infantile sex theory, namely, with the belief that girls
 originally had the same genitals as boys and that the later conformation
 resulted from castration (pulling out of a tree).
 
 (_c_). "_She is standing in front of the drawer of her writing table,
 with which she is so familiar that she knows immediately if anybody has
 been through it._" The writing-table drawer, like every drawer, chest,
 or box, stands for the female genital. She knows that one can recognize
 from the genital the signs of sexual intercourse (and, as she thinks,
 even of any contact at all) and she has long been afraid of such a
 conviction. I believe that the accent in all these dreams is to be laid
 upon the idea of _knowing_. She is reminded of the time of her childish
 sexual investigations, the results of which made her quite proud at the
 time.
 
 5. Again a little bit of symbolism. But this time I must first describe
 the psychic situation in a short preface. A man who spent the night with
 a woman describes his partner as one of those motherly natures whose
 desire for a child irresistibly breaks through during intercourse. The
 circumstances of their meeting, however, necessitated a precaution
 whereby the fertilizing discharge of semen is kept away from the womb.
 Upon awaking after this night, the woman tells the following dream:
 
 "_An officer with a red cap follows her on the street. She flees from
 him, runs up the staircase, and he follows after her. Breathlessly she
 reaches her apartment and slams and locks the door behind her. He
 remains outside and as she looks through a peephole she sees him sitting
 outside on a bench and weeping._"
 
 You undoubtedly recognize in the pursuit by an officer with a red cap,
 and the breathless stair climbing, the representation of the sexual act.
 The fact that the dreamer locks herself in against the pursuer may serve
 as an example of that inversion which is so frequently used in dreams,
 for in reality it was the man who withdrew before the completion of the
 act. In the same way her grief has been transposed to the partner, it is
 he who weeps in the dream, whereby the discharge of the semen is also
 indicated.
 
 You must surely have heard that in psychoanalysis it is always
 maintained that all dreams have a sexual meaning. Now you yourselves are
 in a position to form a judgment as to the incorrectness of this
 reproach. You have become acquainted with the wish-fulfillment dreams,
 which deal with the satisfying of the plainest needs, of hunger, of
 thirst, of longing for freedom, the dreams of convenience and of
 impatience and likewise the purely covetous and egoistic dreams. But
 that the markedly distorted dreams preponderantly--though again not
 exclusively--give expression to sex wishes, is a fact you may certainly
 keep in mind as one of the results of psychoanalytical research.
 
 6. I have a special motive for piling up examples of the use of symbols
 in dreams. At our first meeting I complained of how hard it is, when
 lecturing on psychoanalysis, to demonstrate the facts in order to awaken
 conviction; and you very probably have come to agree with me since then.
 But the various assertions of psychoanalysis are so closely linked that
 one's conviction can easily extend from one point to a larger part of
 the whole. We might say of psychoanalysis that if we give it our little
 finger it promptly demands the whole hand. Anyone who was convinced by
 the explanation of errors can no longer logically disbelieve in all the
 rest of psychoanalysis. A second equally accessible point of approach is
 furnished by dream symbolism. I shall give you a dream, already
 published, of a peasant woman, whose husband is a watchman and who has
 certainly never heard anything about dream symbolism and psychoanalysis.
 You may then judge for yourselves whether its explanation with the help
 of sex symbols can be called arbitrary and forced.
 
 "_Then someone broke into her house and she called in fright for a
 watchman. But the latter had gone companionably into a church together
 with two 'beauties.' A number of steps led up to the church. Behind the
 church was a hill, and on its crest a thick forest. The watchman was
 fitted out with a helmet, gorget and a cloak. He had a full brown beard.
 The two were going along peacefully with the watchman, had sack-like
 aprons bound around their hips. There was a path from the church to the
 hill. This was overgrown on both sides with grass and underbrush that
 kept getting thicker and that became a regular forest on the crest of
 the hill._"
 
 You will recognize the symbols without any difficulty. The male genital
 is represented by a trinity of persons, the female by a landscape with a
 chapel, hill and forest. Again you encounter steps as the symbol of the
 sexual act. That which is called a hill in the dream has the same name
 in anatomy, namely, _mons veneris_, the mount of Venus.
 
 7. I have another dream which can be solved by means of inserting
 symbols, a dream that is remarkable and convincing because the dreamer
 himself translated all the symbols, even though he had had no
 preliminary knowledge of dream interpretation. This situation is very
 unusual and the conditions essential to its occurrence are not clearly
 known.
 
 "_He is going for a walk with his father in some place which must be the
 Prater_,[35] _for one can see the rotunda and before it a smaller
 building to which is anchored a captive balloon, which, however, seems
 fairly slack. His father asks him what all that is for; he wonders at it
 himself but explains it to his father. Then they come to a courtyard in
 which there lies spread out a big sheet of metal. His father wants to
 break off a big piece of it for himself but first looks about him to see
 if anyone might see him. He says to him that all he needs to do is to
 tell the inspector and then he can take some without more ado. There are
 steps leading from this courtyard down into a pit, the walls of which
 are upholstered with some soft material rather like a leather arm chair.
 At the end of this pit is a longish platform and then a new pit
 begins...._"
 
 The dreamer himself interprets as follows: "The rotunda is my genital,
 the balloon in front of it is my penis, of whose slackness I have been
 complaining." Thus one may translate in more detail, that the rotunda is
 the posterior--a part of the body which the child regularly considers as
 part of the genital--while the smaller building before it is the
 scrotum. In the dream his father asks him what all that is for; that is
 to say, he asks the object and function of the genitals. It is easy to
 turn this situation around so that the dreamer is the one who does the
 asking. Since no such questioning of the father ever took place in real
 life, we must think of the thought of this dream as a wish or consider
 it in the light of a supposition, "If I had asked father for sexual
 enlightenment." We will find the continuation of this idea in another
 place shortly.
 
 The courtyard, in which the sheet metal lies spread out, is not to be
 considered primarily as symbolical but refers to the father's place of
 business. For reasons of discretion I have substituted the "sheet metal"
 for another material with which the father deals, without changing
 anything in the literal wording of the dream. The dreamer entered his
 father's business and took great offense at the rather dubious practices
 upon which the profits depended to a large extent. For this reason the
 continuation of the above idea of the dream might be expressed as "if I
 had asked him, he would only have deceived me as he deceives his
 customers." The dreamer himself gives us the second meaning of "breaking
 off the metal," which serves to represent the commercial dishonesty. He
 says it means masturbation. Not only have we long since become familiar
 with this symbol, but the fact also is in agreement. The secrecy of
 masturbation is expressed by means of its opposite--"It can be safely
 done openly." Again our expectations are fulfilled by the fact that
 masturbatory activity is referred to as the father's, just as the
 questioning was in the first scene of the dream. Upon being questioned
 he immediately gives the interpretation of the pit as the vagina on
 account of the soft upholstering of its walls. I will add arbitrarily
 that the "going down" like the more usual "going up" is meant to
 describe the sexual intercourse in the vagina.
 
 Such details as the fact that the first pit ends in a platform and then
 a new one begins, he explains himself as having been taken from his own
 history. He practiced intercourse for a while, then gave it up on
 account of inhibitions, and now hopes to be able to resume it as a
 result of the treatment.
 
 8. The two following dreams are those of a foreigner, of very polygamous
 tendencies, and I give them to you as proof for the claim that one's ego
 appears in every dream, even in those in which it is disguised in the
 manifest content. The trunks in the dream are a symbol for woman.
 
 (_a_). "_He is to take a trip, his luggage is placed on a carriage to
 be taken to the station, and there are many trunks piled up, among which
 are two big black ones like sample trunks. He says, consolingly, to
 someone, 'Well, they are only going as far as the station with us.'_"
 
 In reality he does travel with a great deal of luggage, but he also
 brings many tales of women with him when he comes for treatment. The two
 black trunks stand for two dark women who play the chief part in his
 life at present. One of them wanted to travel to Vienna after him, but
 he telegraphed her not to, upon my advice.
 
 (_b_). A scene at the customs house: "_A fellow traveler opens his trunk
 and says indifferently while puffing a cigarette, 'There's nothing in
 here.' The customs official seems to believe him but delves into the
 trunk once more and finds something particularly forbidden. The traveler
 then says resignedly, 'Well, there's no help for it.'_"
 
 He himself is the traveler, I the customs official. Though otherwise
 very frank in his confessions, he has on this occasion tried to conceal
 from me a new relationship which he had struck up with a lady whom he
 was justified in believing that I knew. The painful situation of being
 convicted of this is transposed into a strange person so that he himself
 apparently is not present in the dream.
 
 9. The following is an example of a symbol which I have not yet
 mentioned:
 
 "_He meets his sister in company with two friends who are themselves
 sisters. He extends his hand to both of them but not to his sister._"
 
 This is no allusion to a real occurrence. His thoughts instead lead him
 back to a time when his observations made him wonder why a girl's
 breasts develop so late. The two sisters, therefore, are the breasts. He
 would have liked to touch them if only it had not been his sister.
 
 10. Let me add an example of a symbol of death in a dream:
 
 "_He is walking with two persons whose name he knows but has forgotten.
 By the time he is awake, over a very high, steep iron bridge. Suddenly
 the two people are gone and he sees a ghostly man with a cap, and clad
 in white. He asks this man whether he is the telegraph messenger.... No.
 Or is he a coachman? No. Then he goes on,_" and even in the dream he is
 in great fear. After waking he continues the dream by a phantasy in
 which the iron bridge suddenly breaks, and he plunges into the abyss.
 
 When the dreamer emphasizes the fact that certain individuals in a dream
 are unknown, that he has forgotten their names, they are generally
 persons standing in very close relationship to the dreamer. This dreamer
 has two sisters; if it be true, as his dream indicates, that he wished
 these two dead, then it would only be justice if the fear of death fell
 upon him for so doing. In connection with the telegraph messenger he
 remarks that such people always bring bad news. Judged by his uniform he
 might also have been the lamp-lighter, who, however, also extinguishes
 the lamps--in other words, as the spirit of death extinguishes the flame
 of life. The coachman reminds him of Uhland's poem of King Karl's ocean
 voyage and also of a dangerous lake trip with two companions in which he
 played the role of the king in the poem. In connection with the iron
 bridge he remembers a recent accident and the stupid saying "Life is a
 suspension bridge."
 
 11. The following may serve as another example of the representation of
 death in a dream: "_An unknown man leaves a black bordered visiting card
 for him._"
 
 12. The following dream will interest you for several reasons, though it
 is one arising from a neurotic condition among other things:
 
 "_He is traveling in a train. The train stops in an open field. He
 thinks it means that there is going to be an accident, that he must save
 himself, and he goes through all the compartments of the train and
 strikes dead everyone whom he meets, conductors, engine drivers, etc._"
 
 In connection with this he tells a story that one of his friends told
 him. An insane man was being transported in a private compartment in a
 certain place in Italy, but through some mistake another traveler was
 put in the same compartment. The insane man murdered his fellow
 passenger. Thus he identifies himself with this insane person and bases
 his right so to do upon a compulsive idea which was then torturing him,
 namely, he must "do away with all persons who knew of his failings." But
 then he himself finds a better motivation which gave rise to the dream.
 The day before, in the theatre, he again saw the girl whom he had
 expected to marry but whom he had left because she had given him cause
 for jealousy. With a capacity for intense jealousy such as he has, he
 would really be insane if he married. In other words, he considers her
 so untrustworthy that out of jealousy he would have to strike dead all
 the persons who stood in his way. Going through a series of rooms, of
 compartments in this case, we have already learned to recognize as the
 symbol of marriage (the opposite of monogamy).
 
 In connection with the train stopping in the open country and his fear
 of an accident, he tells the following: Once, when he was traveling in a
 train and it came to a sudden stop outside of a station, a young lady in
 the compartment remarked that perhaps there was going to be a collision,
 and that in that case the best precaution would be to pull one's legs
 up. But this "legs up" had also played a role in the many walks and
 excursions into the open which he had taken with the girl in that happy
 period in their first love. Thus it is a new argument for the idea that
 he would have to be crazy in order to marry her now. But from my
 knowledge of the situation I can assume with certainty that the wish to
 be as crazy as that nevertheless exists in him.
 
 
 
 
 THIRTEENTH LECTURE
 
 THE DREAM
 
 _Archaic Remnants and Infantilism in the Dream_
 
 
 Let us revert to our conclusion that the dream-work, under the influence
 of the dream censorship, transforms the latent dream thoughts into some
 other form of expression. The latent thoughts are no other than the
 conscious thoughts known to us in our waking hours; the new mode of
 expression is incomprehensible to us because of its many-sided features.
 We have said it extends back to conditions of our intellectual
 development which we have long progressed beyond, to the language of
 pictures, the symbol-representations, perhaps to those conditions which
 were in force before the development of our language of thought. So we
 called the mode of expression of the dream-work the archaic or
 regressive.
 
 You may conclude that as a result of the deeper study of the dream-work
 we gain valuable information about the rather unknown beginnings of our
 intellectual development. I trust this will be true, but this work has
 not, up to the present time, been undertaken. The antiquity into which
 the dream-work carries us back is of a double aspect, firstly, the
 individual antiquity, childhood; and, secondly (in so far as every
 individual in his childhood lives over again in some more or less
 abbreviated manner the entire development of the human race), also this
 antiquity, the philogenetic. That we shall be able to differentiate
 which part of the latent psychic proceeding has its source in the
 individual, and which part in the philogenetic antiquity is not
 improbable. In this connection it appears to me, for example, that the
 symbolic relations which the individual has never learned are ground for
 the belief that they should be regarded as a philogenetic inheritance.
 
 However, this is not the only archaic characteristic of the dream. You
 probably all know from your own experiences the peculiar amnesia, that
 is, loss of memory, concerning childhood. I mean the fact that the first
 years, to the fifth, sixth or eighth, have not left the same traces in
 our memory as have later experiences. One meets with individual persons,
 to be sure, who can boast of a continuous memory from the very beginning
 to the present day, but the other condition, that of a gap in the
 memory, is far more frequent. I believe we have not laid enough stress
 on this fact. The child is able to speak well at the age of two, it soon
 shows that it can become adjusted to the most complicated psychic
 situations, and makes remarks which years later are retold to it, but
 which it has itself entirely forgotten. Besides, the memory in the early
 years is more facile, because it is less burdened than in later years.
 Nor is there any reason for considering the memory-function as a
 particularly high or difficult psychic performance; in fact, the
 contrary is true, and you can find a good memory in persons who stand
 very low intellectually.
 
 As a second peculiarity closely related to the first, I must point out
 that certain well-preserved memories, for the most part formatively
 experienced, stand forth in this memory-void which surrounds the first
 years of childhood and do not justify this hypothesis. Our memory deals
 selectively with its later materials, with impressions which come to us
 in later life. It retains the important and discards the unimportant.
 This is not true of the retained childhood memories. They do not bespeak
 necessarily important experiences of childhood, not even such as from
 the viewpoint of the child need appear of importance. They are often so
 banal and intrinsically so meaningless that we ask ourselves in wonder
 why just these details have escaped being forgotten. I once endeavored
 to approach the riddle of childhood amnesia and the interrupted memory
 remnants with the help of analysis, and I arrived at the conclusion that
 in the case of the child, too, only the important has remained in the
 memory, except that by means of the process of condensation already
 known to you, and especially by means of distortion, the important is
 represented in the memory by something that appears unimportant. For
 this reason I have called these childhood memories "disguise-memories,"
 memories used to conceal; by means of careful analysis one is able to
 develop out of them everything that is forgotten.
 
 In psychoanalytic treatment we are regularly called upon to fill out the
 infantile memory gaps, and in so far as the cure is to any degree
 successful, we are able again to bring to light the content of the
 childhood years thus clouded in forgetfulness. These impressions have
 never really been forgotten, they have only been inaccessible, latent,
 have belonged to the unconscious. But sometimes they bob up out of the
 unconscious spontaneously, and, as a matter of fact, this is what
 happens in dreams. It is apparent that the dream life knows how to find
 the entrance to these latent, infantile experiences. Beautiful examples
 of this occur in literature, and I myself can present such an example. I
 once dreamed in a certain connection of a person who must have performed
 some service for me, and whom I clearly saw. He was a one-eyed man,
 short in stature, stout, his head deeply sunk into his neck. I concluded
 from the content that he was a physician. Luckily I was able to ask my
 mother, who was still living, how the physician in my birth-place, which
 I left when I was three years old, looked, and I learned from her that
 he had one eye, was short and stout, with his head sunk into his neck,
 and also learned at what forgotten mishap he had been of service to me.
 This control over the forgotten material of childhood years is, then, a
 further archaic tendency of the dream.
 
 The same information may be made use of in another of the puzzles that
 have presented themselves to us. You will recall how astonished people
 were when we came to the conclusion that the stimuli which gave rise to
 dreams were extremely bad and licentious sexual desires which have made
 dream-censorship and dream-distortion necessary. After we have
 interpreted such a dream for the dreamer and he, in the most favorable
 circumstances does not attack the interpretation itself, he almost
 always asks the question whence such a wish comes, since it seems
 foreign to him and he feels conscious of just the opposite sensations.
 We need not hesitate to point out this origin. These evil wish-impulses
 have their origin in the past, often in a past which is not too far
 away. It can be shown that at one time they were known and conscious,
 even if they no longer are so. The woman, whose dream is interpreted to
 mean that she would like to see her seventeen-year old daughter dead,
 discovers under our guidance that she in fact at one time entertained
 this wish. The child is the fruit of an unhappy marriage, which early
 ended in a separation. Once, while the child was still in the womb, and
 after a tense scene with her husband, she beat her body with her fists
 in a fit of anger, in order to kill the child. How many mothers who
 to-day love their children tenderly, perhaps too tenderly, received them
 unwillingly, and at the time wished that the life within them would not
 develop further; indeed, translated this wish into various actions,
 happily harmless. The later death-wish against some loved one, which
 seems so strange, also has its origin in early phases of the
 relationship to that person.
 
 The father, the interpretation of whose dream shows that he wishes for
 the death of his eldest and favorite child, must be reminded of the fact
 that at one time this wish was no stranger to him. While the child was
 still a suckling, this man, who was unhappy in his choice of a wife,
 often thought that if the little being that meant nothing to him would
 die, he would again be free, and would make better use of his freedom. A
 like origin may be found for a large number of similar hate impulses;
 they are recollections of something that belonged to the past, were once
 conscious and played their parts in the psychic life. You will wish to
 conclude therefrom that such wishes and such dreams cannot occur if such
 changes in the relationship to a person have not taken place; if such
 relationship was always of the same character. I am ready to admit this,
 only wish to warn you that you are to take into consideration not the
 exact terms of the dream, but the meaning thereof according to its
 interpretation. It may happen that the manifest dream of the death of
 some loved person has only made use of some frightful mask, that it
 really means something entirely different, or that the loved person
 serves as a concealing substitute for some other.
 
 But the same circumstances will call forth another, more difficult
 question. You say: "Granted this death wish was present at some time or
 other, and is substantiated by memory, yet this is no explanation. It is
 long outlived, to-day it can be present only in the unconscious and as
 an empty, emotionless memory, but not as a strong impulse. Why should it
 be recalled by the dream at all!" This question is justified. The
 attempt to answer it would lead us far afield and necessitate taking up
 a position in one of the most important points of dream study. But I
 must remain within the bounds of our discussion and practice restraint.
 Prepare yourselves for the temporary abstention. Let us be satisfied
 with the circumstantial proof that this outlived wish can be shown to
 act as a dream stimulator and let us continue the investigation to see
 whether or not other evil wishes admit of the same derivation out of the
 past.
 
 Let us continue with the removal or death-wish which most frequently can
 be traced back to the unbounded egoism of the dreamer. Such a wish can
 very often be shown to be the inciting cause of the dream. As often as
 someone has been in our way in life--and how often must this happen in
 the complicated relationships of life--the dream is ready to do away
 with him, be he father, mother, brother, sister, spouse, etc. We have
 wondered sufficiently over this evil tendency of human nature, and
 certainly were not predisposed to accept the authenticity of this result
 of dream interpretation without question. After it has once been
 suggested to us to seek the origin of such wishes in the past, we
 disclose immediately the period of the individual past in which such
 egoism and such wish-impulses, even as directed against those closest to
 the dreamer, are no longer strangers. It is just in these first years of
 childhood which later are hidden by amnesia, that this egoism frequently
 shows itself in most extreme form, and from which regular but clear
 tendencies thereto, or real remnants thereof, show themselves. For the
 child loves itself first, and later learns to love others, to sacrifice
 something of its ego for another. Even those persons whom the child
 seems to love from the very beginning, it loves at the outset because it
 has need of them, cannot do without them, in others words, out of
 egoistical motives. Not until later does the love impulse become
 independent of egoism. _In brief, egoism has taught the child to love._
 
 In this connection it is instructive to compare the child's regard for
 his brothers and sisters with that which he has for his parents. The
 little child does not necessarily love his brothers and sisters, often,
 obviously, he does not love them at all. There is no doubt that in them
 he hates his rivals and it is known how frequently this attitude
 continues for many years until maturity, and even beyond, without
 interruption. Often enough this attitude is superseded by a more tender
 feeling, or rather let us say glossed over, but the hostile feeling
 appears regularly to have been the earlier. It is most noticeable in
 children of from two and one-half to four or five years of age, when a
 new little brother or sister arrives. The latter is usually received in
 a far from friendly manner. Expressions such as "I don't want him! Let
 the stork take him away again," are very usual. Subsequently every
 opportunity is made use of to disparage the new arrival, and even
 attempts to do him bodily harm, direct attacks, are not unheard of. If
 the difference in age is less, the child learns of the existence of the
 rival with intense psychic activity, and accommodates himself to the new
 situation. If the difference in age is greater, the new child may awaken
 certain sympathies as an interesting object, as a sort of living doll,
 and if the difference is eight years or more, motherly impulses,
 especially in the case of girls, may come into play. But to be truthful,
 when we disclose in a dream the wish for the death of a mother or sister
 we need seldom find it puzzling and may trace its origin easily to early
 childhood, often enough, also, to the propinquity of later years.
 
 Probably no nurseries are free from mighty conflicts among the
 inhabitants. The motives are rivalry for the love of the parents,
 articles owned in common, the room itself. The hostile impulses are
 called forth by older as well as younger brothers and sisters. I believe
 it was Bernard Shaw who said: "If there is anyone who hates a young
 English lady more than does her mother, it is her elder sister." There
 is something about this saying, however, that arouses our antipathy. We
 can, at a pinch, understand hatred of brothers and sisters, and rivalry
 among them, but how may feelings of hatred force their way into the
 relationship between daughter and mother, parents and children?
 
 This relationship is without doubt the more favorable, even when looked
 at from the viewpoint of the child. This is in accord with our
 expectation; we find it much more offensive for love between parents and
 children to be lacking than for love between brothers and sisters. We
 have, so to speak, made something holy in the first instance which in
 the other case we permitted to remain profane. But daily observation can
 show us how frequently the feelings between parents and their grown
 children fail to come up to the ideal established by society, how much
 enmity exists and would find expression did not accumulations of piety
 and of tender impulse hold them back. The motives for this are
 everywhere known and disclose a tendency to separate those of the same
 sex, daughter from mother, father from son. The daughter finds in her
 mother the authority that hems in her will and that is entrusted with
 the task of causing her to carry out the abstention from sexual liberty
 which society demands; in certain cases also she is the rival who
 objects to being displaced. The same type of thing occurs in a more
 glaring manner between father and son. To the son the father is the
 embodiment of every social restriction, borne with such great
 opposition; the father bars the way to freedom of will, to early sexual
 satisfaction, and where there is family property held in common, to the
 enjoyment thereof. Impatient waiting for the death of the father grows
 to heights approximating tragedy in the case of a successor to the
 throne. Less strained is the relationship between father and daughter,
 mother and son. The latter affords the purest examples of an unalterable
 tenderness, in no way disturbed by egoistical considerations.
 
 Why do I speak of these things, so banal and so well known? Because
 there is an unmistakable disposition to deny their significance in life,
 and to set forth the ideal demanded by society as a fulfilled thing much
 oftener than it really is fulfilled. But it is preferable for psychology
 to speak the truth, rather than that this task should be left to the
 cynic. In any event, this denial refers only to actual life. The arts of
 narrative and dramatic poetry are still free to make use of the motives
 that result from a disturbance of this ideal.
 
 It is not to be wondered at that in the case of a large number of people
 the dream discloses the wish for the removal of the parents, especially
 the parent of the same sex. We may conclude that it is also present
 during waking hours, and that it becomes conscious even at times when it
 is able to mask itself behind another motive, as in the case of the
 dreamer's sympathy for his father's unnecessary sufferings in example 3.
 It is seldom that the enmity alone controls the relationship; much more
 often it recedes behind more tender impulses, by which it is suppressed,
 and must wait until a dream isolates it. That which the dream shows us
 in enlarged form as a result of such isolation, shrinks together again
 after it has been properly docketed in its relation to life as a result
 of our interpretation (H. Sachs). But we also find this dream wish in
 places where it has no connection with life, and where the adult, in his
 waking hours, would never recognize it. The reason for this is that the
 deepest and most uniform motive for becoming unfriendly, especially
 between persons of the same sex, has already made its influence felt in
 earliest childhood.
 
 I mean the love rivalry, with the especial emphasis of the sex
 character. The son, even as a small child, begins to develop an especial
 tenderness for his mother, whom he considers as his own property, and
 feels his father to be a rival who puts into question his individual
 possession; and in the same manner the little daughter sees in her
 mother a person who is a disturbing element in her tender relationship
 with her father, and who occupies a position that she could very well
 fill herself. One learns from these observations to what early years
 these ideas extend back--ideas which we designate as the
 _Oedipus-complex_, because this myth realizes with a very slightly
 weakened effect the two extreme wishes which grow out of the situation
 of the son--to kill his father and take his mother to wife. I do not
 wish to maintain that the Oedipus-complex covers entirely the relation
 of the child to its parents; this relation can be much more complicated.
 Furthermore, the Oedipus-complex is more or less well-developed; it may
 even experience a reversal, but it is a customary and very important
 factor in the psychic life of the child; and one tends rather to
 underestimate than to overestimate its influence and the developments
 which may follow from it. In addition, children frequently react to the
 Oedipus-idea through stimulation by the parents, who in the placing of
 their affection are often led by sex-differences, so that the father
 prefers the daughter, the mother the son; or again, where the marital
 affection has cooled, and this love is substituted for the outworn love.
 
 One cannot maintain that the world was very grateful to psychoanalytic
 research for its discovery of the Oedipus-complex. On the contrary, it
 called forth the strongest resistance on the part of adults; and persons
 who had neglected to take part in denying this proscribed or tabooed
 feeling-relationship later made good the omission by taking all value
 from the complex through false interpretations. According to my
 unchanged conviction there is nothing to deny and nothing to make more
 palatable. One should accept the fact, recognized by the Greek myth
 itself, as inevitable destiny. On the other hand, it is interesting that
 this Oedipus-complex, cast out of life, was yielded up to poetry and
 given the freest play. O. Rank has shown in a careful study how this
 very Oedipus-complex has supplied dramatic literature with a large
 number of motives in unending variations, derivations and disguises,
 also in distorted forms such as we recognize to be the work of a censor.
 We may also ascribe this Oedipus-complex to those dreamers who were so
 fortunate as to escape in later life these conflicts with their parents,
 and intimately associated therewith we find what we call the _castration
 complex_, the reaction to sexual intimidation or restriction, ascribed
 to the father, of early infantile sexuality.
 
 By applying our former researches to the study of the psychic life of
 the child, we may expect to find that the origin of other forbidden
 dream-wishes, of excessive sexual impulses, may be explained in the same
 manner. Thus we are moved to study the development of sex-life in the
 child also, and we discover the following from a number of sources: In
 the first place, it is a mistake to deny that the child has a sexual
 life, and to take it for granted that sexuality commences with the
 ripening of the genitals at the time of puberty. On the contrary--the
 child has from the very beginning a sexual life rich in content and
 differing in numerous respects from that which is later considered
 normal. What we call "perverse" in the life of the adult, differs from
 the normal in the following respects: first, in disregard for the
 dividing line of species (the gulf between man and animal); second,
 being insensible to the conventional feeling of disgust; third, the
 incest-limitation (being prohibited from seeking sexual satisfaction
 with near blood-relations); fourth, homosexuality, and fifth,
 transferring the role of the genitals to other organs and other parts of
 the body. None of these limitations exist in the beginning, but are
 gradually built up in the course of development and education. The
 little child is free from them. He knows no unbridgable chasm between
 man and animal; the arrogance with which man distinguishes himself from
 the animal is a later acquisition. In the beginning he is not disgusted
 at the sight of excrement, but slowly learns to be so disgusted under
 the pressure of education; he lays no special stress on the difference
 between the sexes, rather accredits to both the same genital formation;
 he directs his earliest sexual desires and his curiosity toward those
 persons closest to him, and who are dear to him for various reasons--his
 parents, brothers and sisters, nurses; and finally, you may observe in
 him that which later breaks through again, raised now to a love
 attraction, viz., that he does not expect pleasure from his sexual
 organs alone, but that many other parts of the body portray the same
 sensitiveness, are the media of analogous sensations, and are able to
 play the role of the genitals. The child may, then, be called
 "polymorphus perverse," and if he makes but slight use of all these
 impulses, it is, on the one hand, because of their lesser intensity as
 compared to later life, and on the other hand, because the bringing up
 of the child immediately and energetically suppresses all his sexual
 expressions. This suppression continues in theory, so to say, since the
 grown-ups are careful to control part of the childish sex-expressions,
 and to disguise another part by misrepresenting its sexual nature until
 they can deny the whole business. These are often the same persons who
 discourse violently against all the sexual faults of the child and then
 at the writing table defend the sexual purity of the same children.
 Where children are left to themselves or are under the influence of
 corruption, they often are capable of really conspicuous performances of
 perverse sexual activity. To be sure, the grown-ups are right in looking
 upon these things as "childish performances," as "play," for the child
 is not to be judged as mature and answerable either before the bar of
 custom or before the law, but these things do exist, they have their
 significance as indications of innate characteristics as well as causes
 and furtherances of later developments, they give us an insight into
 childhood sex-life and thereby into the sex life of man. When we
 rediscover in the background of our distorted dreams all these perverse
 wish-impulses, it means only that the dream has in this field traveled
 back to the infantile condition.
 
 Especially noteworthy among these forbidden wishes are those of incest,
 i.e., those directed towards sexual intercourse with parents and
 brothers and sisters. You know what antipathy society feels toward such
 intercourse, or at least pretends to feel, and what weight is laid on
 the prohibitions directed against it. The most monstrous efforts have
 been made to explain this fear of incest. Some have believed that it is
 due to evolutionary foresight on the part of nature, which is
 psychically represented by this prohibition, because inbreeding would
 deteriorate the race-character; others maintained that because of having
 lived together since early childhood the sexual desire is diverted from
 the persons under consideration. In both cases, furthermore, the
 incest-avoidance would be automatically assured, and it would be
 difficult to understand the need of strict prohibitions, which rather
 point to the presence of a strong desire. Psychoanalytic research has
 incontrovertibly shown that the incestuous love choice is rather the
 first and most customary choice, and that not until later is there any
 resistance, the source of which probably is to be found in the
 individual psychology.
 
 Let us sum up what our plunge into child psychology has given us toward
 the understanding of the dream. We found not only that the materials of
 forgotten childhood experiences are accessible to the dream, but we saw
 also that the psychic life of children, with all its peculiarities, its
 egoism, its incestuous love-choice, etc., continues, for the purposes of
 the dream, in the unconscious, and that the dream nightly leads us back
 to this infantile stage. Thus it becomes more certain _that the
 unconscious in our psychic life is the infantile_. The estranging
 impression that there is so much evil in man, begins to weaken. This
 frightful evil is simply the original, primitive, infantile side of
 psychic life, which we may find in action in children, which we overlook
 partly because of the slightness of its dimensions, partly because it is
 lightly considered, since we demand no ethical heights of the child.
 Since the dream regresses to this stage, it seems to have made apparent
 the evil that lies in us. But it is only a deceptive appearance by which
 we have allowed ourselves to be frightened. We are not so evil as we
 might suspect from the interpretation of dreams.
 
 If the evil impulses of the dream are merely infantilism, a return to
 the beginnings of our ethical development, since the dream simply makes
 children of us again in thinking and in feeling, we need not be ashamed
 of these evil dreams if we are reasonable. But being reasonable is only
 a part of psychic life. Many things are taking place there that are not
 reasonable, and so it happens that we are ashamed of such dreams, and
 unreasonably. We turn them over to the dream-censorship, are ashamed and
 angry if one of these dreams has in some unusual manner succeeded in
 penetrating into consciousness in an undistorted form, so that we must
 recognize it--in fact, we are at times just as ashamed of the distorted
 dream as we would be if we understood it. Just think of the scandalized
 opinion of the fine old lady about her uninterpreted dream of "services
 of love." The problem is not yet solved, and it is still possible that
 upon further study of the evil in the dream we shall come to some other
 decision and arrive at another valuation of human nature.
 
 As a result of the whole investigation we grasp two facts, which,
 however, disclose only the beginnings of new riddles, new doubts. First:
 the regression of dream-work is not only formal, it is also of greater
 import. It not only translates our thoughts into a primitive form of
 expression, but it reawakens the peculiarities of our primitive psychic
 life, the ancient predominance of the ego, the earliest impulses of our
 sexual life, even our old intellectual property, if we may consider the
 symbolic relations as such. And second: We must accredit all these
 infantilisms which once were governing, and solely governing, to the
 unconscious, about which our ideas now change and are broadened.
 Unconscious is no longer a name for what is at that time latent, the
 unconscious is an especial psychic realm with wish-impulses of its own,
 with its own method of expression and with a psychic mechanism peculiar
 to itself, all of which ordinarily are not in force. But the latent
 dream-thoughts, which we have solved by means of the dream-interpretation,
 are not of this realm. They are much more nearly the same as any we may
 have thought in our waking hours. Still they are unconscious; how does
 one solve this contradiction? We begin to see that a distinction must be
 made. Something that originates in our conscious life, and that shares
 its characteristics--we call it the day-remnants--combines in the
 dream-fabrication with something else out of the realm of the
 unconscious. Between these two parts the dream-work completes itself.
 The influencing of the day-remnants by the unconscious necessitates
 regression. This is the deepest insight into the nature of the dream
 that we are able to attain without having searched through further
 psychic realms. The time will soon come, however, when we shall clothe
 the unconscious character of the latent dream-thought with another name,
 which shall differentiate it from the unconscious out of the realm of
 the infantile.
 
 We may, to be sure, propound the question: what forces the psychological
 activity during sleep to such regression? Why do not the sleep
 disturbing psychic stimuli do the job without it? And if they must,
 because of the dream censorship, disguise themselves through old forms
 of expression which are no longer comprehensible, what is the use of
 giving new life to old, long-outgrown psychic stimuli, wishes and
 character types, that is, why the material regression in addition to the
 formal? The only satisfactory answer would be this, that only in this
 manner can a dream be built up, that dynamically the dream-stimulus can
 be satisfied only in this way. But for the time being we have no right
 to give such an answer.
 
 
 
 
 FOURTEENTH LECTURE
 
 THE DREAM
 
 _Wish Fulfillment_
 
 
 May I bring to your attention once more the ground we have already
 covered? How, when we met with dream distortion in the application of
 our technique, we decided to leave it alone for the time being, and set
 out to obtain decisive information about the nature of the dream by way
 of infantile dreams? How, then, armed with the results of this
 investigation, we attacked dream distortion directly and, I trust, in
 some measure overcame it? But we must remind ourselves that the results
 we found along the one way and along the other do not fit together as
 well as might be. It is now our task to put these two results together
 and balance them against one another.
 
 From both sources we have seen that the dream-work consists essentially
 in the transposition of thoughts into an hallucinatory experience. How
 that can take place is puzzling enough, but it is a problem of general
 psychology with which we shall not busy ourselves here. We have learned
 from the dreams of children that the purpose of the dream-work is the
 satisfaction of one of the sleep-disturbing psychic stimuli by means of
 a wish fulfillment. We were unable to make a similar statement
 concerning distorted dreams, until we knew how to interpret them. But
 from the very beginning we expected to be able to bring the distorted
 dreams under the same viewpoint as the infantile. The earliest
 fulfillment of this expectation led us to believe that as a matter of
 fact all dreams are the dreams of children and that they all work with
 infantile materials, through childish psychic stimuli and mechanics.
 Since we consider that we have conquered dream-distortion, we must
 continue the investigation to see whether our hypothesis of
 wish-fulfillment holds good for distorted dreams also.
 
 We very recently subjected a number of dreams to interpretation, but
 left wish-fulfillment entirely out of consideration. I am convinced that
 the question again and again occurred to you: "What about
 wish-fulfillment, which ostensibly is the goal of dream-work?" This
 question is important. It was, in fact, the question of our lay-critics.
 As you know, humanity has an instinctive antagonism toward intellectual
 novelties. The expression of such a novelty should immediately be
 reduced to its narrowest limits, if possible, comprised in a commonplace
 phrase. Wish-fulfillment has become that phrase for the new
 dream-science. The layman asks: "Where is the wish-fulfillment?"
 Immediately, upon having heard that the dream is supposed to be a
 wish-fulfillment, and indeed, by the very asking of the question, he
 answers it with a denial. He is at once reminded of countless
 dream-experiences of his own, where his aversion to the dream was
 enormous, so that the proposition of psychoanalytic dream-science seems
 very improbable to him. It is a simple matter to answer the layman that
 wish-fulfillment cannot be apparent in distorted dreams, but must be
 sought out, so that it is not recognized until the dream is interpreted.
 We know, too, that the wishes in these distorted dreams are prohibited
 wishes, are wishes rejected by the censor and that their existence lit
 the very cause of the dream distortion and the reason for the intrusion
 of the dream censor. But it is hard to convince the lay-critic that one
 may not seek the wish-fulfillment in the dream before the dream has been
 interpreted. This is continually forgotten. His sceptical attitude
 toward the theory of wish-fulfillment is really nothing more than a
 consequence of dream-censorship, a substitute and a result of the denial
 of this censored dream-wish.
 
 To be sure, even we shall find it necessary to explain to ourselves why
 there are so many dreams of painful content, and especially dreams of
 fear. We see here, for the first time, the problem of the affects in the
 dream, a problem worthy of separate investigation, but which
 unfortunately cannot be considered here. If the dream is a
 wish-fulfillment, painful experiences ought to be impossible in the
 dream; in that the lay-critics apparently are right. But three
 complications, not thought of by them, must be taken into consideration.
 
 First: It may be that the dream work has not been successful in creating
 a wish-fulfillment, so that a part of the painful effect of the
 dream-thought is left over for the manifest dream. Analysis should then
 show that these thoughts were far more painful even than the dream which
 was built out of them. This much may be proved in each instance. We
 admit, then, that the dream work has not achieved its purpose any more
 than the drink-dream due to the thirst-stimulus has achieved its purpose
 of satisfying the thirst. One remains thirsty, and must wake up in order
 to drink. But it was a real dream, it sacrificed nothing of its nature.
 We must say: "Although strength be lacking, let us praise the will to
 do." The clearly recognizable intention, at least, remains praiseworthy.
 Such cases of miscarriage are not unusual. A contributory cause is this,
 that it is so much more difficult for the dream work to change affect
 into content in its own sense; the affects often show great resistance,
 and thus it happens that the dream work has worked the painful content
 of the dream-thoughts over into a wish-fulfillment, while the painful
 affect continues in its unaltered form. Hence in dreams of this type the
 affect does not fit the content at all, and our critics may say the
 dream is so little a wish-fulfillment that a harmless content may be
 experienced as painful. In answer to this unintelligible remark we say
 that the wish-fulfillment tendency in the dream-work appears most
 prominent, because isolated, in just such dreams. The error is due to
 the fact that he who does not know neurotics imagines the connection
 between content and affect as all too intimate, and cannot, therefore,
 grasp the fact that a content may be altered without any corresponding
 change in the accompanying affect-expression.
 
 A second, far more important and more extensive consideration, equally
 disregarded by the layman, is the following: A wish-fulfillment
 certainly must bring pleasure--but to whom? Naturally, to him who has
 the wish. But we know from the dreamer that he stands in a very special
 relationship to his wishes. He casts them aside, censors them, he will
 have none of them. Their fulfillment gives him no pleasure, but only the
 opposite. Experience then shows that this opposite, which must still be
 explained, appears in the form of fear. The dreamer in his relation to
 his dream-wishes can be compared only to a combination of two persons
 bound together by some strong common quality. Instead of further
 explanations I shall give you a well-known fairy tale, in which you will
 again find the relationships I have mentioned. A good fairy promises a
 poor couple, husband and wife, to fulfill their first three wishes. They
 are overjoyed, and determine to choose their three wishes with great
 care. But the woman allows herself to be led astray by the odor of
 cooking sausages emanating from the next cottage, and wishes she had a
 couple of such sausages. Presto! they are there. This is the first
 wish-fulfillment. Now the husband becomes angry, and in his bitterness
 wishes that the sausages might hang from the end of her nose. This, too,
 is accomplished, and the sausages cannot be removed from their new
 location. So this is the second wish-fulfillment, but the wish is that
 of the husband. The wife is very uncomfortable because of the
 fulfillment of this wish. You know how the fairy tale continues. Since
 both husband and wife are fundamentally one, the third wish must be that
 the sausages be removed from the nose of the wife. We could make use of
 this fairy tale any number of times in various connections; here it
 serves only as an illustration of the possibility that the
 wish-fulfillment for the one personality may lead to an aversion on the
 part of the other, if the two do not agree with one another.
 
 It will not be difficult now to come to a better understanding of the
 anxiety-dream. We shall make one more observation, then we shall come to
 a conclusion to which many things lead. The observation is that the
 anxiety dreams often have a content which is entirely free from
 distortion and in which the censorship is, so to speak, eluded. The
 anxiety dream is ofttimes an undisguised wish-fulfillment, not, to be
 sure, of an accepted, but of a discarded wish. The anxiety development
 has stepped into the place of the censorship. While one may assert of
 the infantile dream that it is the obvious fulfillment of a wish that
 has gained admittance, and of the distorted dream that it is the
 disguised fulfillment of a suppressed wish, he must say of the anxiety
 dream that the only suitable formula is this, that it is the obvious
 fulfillment of a suppressed wish. Anxiety is the mark which shows that
 the suppressed wish showed itself stronger than the censorship, that it
 put through its wish-fulfillment despite the censorship, or was about to
 put it through. We understand that what is wish-fulfillment for the
 suppressed wish is for us, who are on the side of the dream-censor, only
 a painful sensation and a cause for antagonism. The anxiety which
 occurs in dreams is, if you wish, anxiety because of the strength of
 these otherwise suppressed wishes. Why this antagonism arises in the
 form of anxiety cannot be discovered from a study of the dream alone;
 one must obviously study anxiety from other sources.
 
 What holds true for the undistorted anxiety dream we may assume to be
 true also of those dreams which have undergone partial distortion, and
 of the other dreams of aversion whose painful impressions very probably
 denote approximations of anxiety. The anxiety dream is usually also a
 dream that causes waking; we habitually interrupt sleep before the
 suppressed wish of the dream has accomplished its entire fulfillment in
 opposition to the censorship. In this case the execution of the dream is
 unsuccessful, but this does not change its nature. We have likened the
 dream to the night watchman or sleep-defender who wishes to protect our
 sleep from being disturbed. The night watchman, too, sometimes wakes the
 sleeper when he feels himself too weak to drive away the disturbance or
 danger all by himself. Yet we are often able to remain asleep, even when
 the dream begins to become suspicious, and begins to assume the form of
 anxiety. We say to ourselves in our sleep: "It's only a dream," and we
 sleep on.
 
 When does it happen that the dream-wish is in a position to overpower
 this censorship? The conditions for this may be just as easily furnished
 by the dream-wish as by the dream-censorship. The wish may, for unknown
 reasons, become irresistible; but one gets the impression that more
 frequently the attitude of the dream censorship is to blame for this
 disarrangement in the relations of the forces. We have already heard
 that the censorship works with varying intensity in each single
 instance, that it handles each element with a different degree of
 strictness; now we should like to add the proposition that it is an
 extremely variable thing and does not exert equal force on every
 occasion against the same objectionable element. If on occasion the
 censorship feels itself powerless with respect to a dream-wish which
 threatens to over-ride it, then, instead of distortion, it makes use of
 the final means at its disposal, it destroys the sleep condition by the
 development of anxiety.
 
 And now it occurs to us that we know absolutely nothing yet as to why
 these evil, depraved wishes are aroused just at night, in order that
 they may disturb our sleep. The answer can only be an assumption which
 is based on the nature of the condition of sleep. During the day the
 heavy pressure of a censorship weighs upon these wishes, making it
 impossible, as a rule, for them to express themselves in any manner. At
 night, evidently, this censorship is withdrawn for the benefit of the
 single sleep-wish, in the same manner as are all the other interests of
 psychic life, or at least placed in a position of very minor importance.
 The forbidden wishes must thank this noctural deposition of the censor
 for being able to raise their heads again. There are nervous persons
 troubled with insomnia who admit that their sleeplessness was in the
 beginning voluntary. They did not trust themselves to fall asleep,
 because they were afraid of their dreams, that is, of the results due to
 a slackening of the censorship. So you can readily see that this
 withdrawal of the censor does not in itself signify rank carelessness.
 Sleep weakens our power to move; our evil intentions, even if they do
 begin to stir, can accomplish nothing but a dream, which for practical
 purposes is harmless, and the highly sensible remark of the sleepers, a
 night-time remark indeed, but not a part of the dream life, "it is only
 a dream," is reminiscent of this quieting circumstance. So let us grant
 this, and sleep on.
 
 If, thirdly, you recall the concept that the dreamer, struggling against
 his wishes, is to be compared to a summation of two separate persons, in
 some manner closely connected, you will be able to grasp the further
 possibility of how a thing which is highly unpleasant, namely,
 punishment, may be accomplished by wish-fulfillment. Here again the
 fairy tale of the three wishes can be of service to us: the sausages on
 the plate are the direct wish-fulfillment of the first person, the
 woman; the sausages at the end of her nose are the wish-fulfillment of
 the second person, the husband, but at the same time the punishment for
 the stupid wish of the woman. Among the neurotics we find again the
 motivation of the third wish, which remains in fairy tales only. There
 are many such punishment-tendencies in the psychic life of man; they are
 very powerful, and we may make them responsible for some of our painful
 dreams. Perhaps you now say that at this rate, not very much of the
 famed wish-fulfillment is left. But upon closer view you will admit
 that you are wrong. In contrast to the many-sided to be discussed, of
 what the dream might be--and, according to numerous authors, is--the
 solution (wish-fulfillment, anxiety-fulfillment, punishment-fulfillment)
 is indeed very restricted. That is why anxiety is the direct antithesis
 of the wish, why antitheses are so closely allied in association and why
 they occur together in the unconscious, as we have heard; and that is
 why punishment, too, is a wish-fulfillment of the other, the censoring
 person.
 
 On the whole, then, I have made no concessions to your protestation
 against the theory of wish-fulfillment. We are bound, however, to
 establish wish-fulfillment in every dream no matter how distorted, and
 we certainly do not wish to withdraw from this task. Let us go back to
 the dream, already interpreted, of the three bad theatre tickets for 1
 Fl. 50 Kr. from which we have already learned so much. I hope you still
 remember it. A lady who tells her husband during the day that her friend
 Elise, only three months younger than herself, has become engaged,
 dreams she is in the theatre with her husband. Half the parquet is
 empty. Her husband says, "Elise and her fianc wanted to go to the
 theatre, too, but couldn't because they could get only poor seats, three
 for one gulden and a half." She was of the opinion that that wasn't so
 unfortunate. We discovered that the dream-thought originated in her
 discontent at having married too soon, and the fact that she was
 dissatisfied with her husband. We may be curious as to the manner in
 which these thoughts have been worked over into a wish-fulfillment, and
 where their traces may be found in the manifest content. Now we know
 that the element "too soon, premature" is eliminated from the dream by
 the censor. The empty parquet is a reference to it. The puzzling "three
 for 1 Fl. 50 Kr." is now, with the help of symbolism which we have since
 learned, more understandable.[36] The "3" really means a husband, and
 the manifest element is easy to translate: to buy a husband for her
 dowry ("I could have bought one ten times better for my dowry"). The
 marriage is obviously replaced by going into the theatre. "Buying the
 tickets too soon" directly takes the place of the premature marriage.
 This substitution is the work of the wish-fulfillment. Our dreamer was
 not always so dissatisfied with her early marriage as she was on the day
 she received news of the engagement of her friend. At the time she was
 proud of her marriage and felt herself more favored than her friend.
 Naive girls have frequently confided to their friends after their
 engagement that soon they, too, will be able to go to all the plays
 hitherto forbidden, and see everything. The desire to see plays, the
 curiosity that makes its appearance here, was certainly in the beginning
 directed towards sex matters, the sex-life, especially the sex-life of
 the parents, and then became a strong motive which impelled the girl to
 an early marriage. In this way the visit to the theatre becomes an
 obvious representative substitute for being married. In the momentary
 annoyance at her early marriage she recalls the time when the early
 marriage was a wish-fulfillment for her, because she had satisfied her
 curiosity; and she now replaces the marriage, guided by the old
 wish-impulse, with the going to the theatre.
 
 We may say that we have not sought out the simplest example as proof of
 a hidden wish-fulfillment. We would have to proceed in analogous manner
 with other distorted dreams. I cannot do that for you, and simply wish
 to express the conviction that it will be successful everywhere. But I
 wish to continue along this theoretical line. Experience has taught me
 that it is one of the most dangerous phases of the entire dream science,
 and that many contradictions and misunderstandings are connected
 therewith. Besides, you are perhaps still under the impression that I
 have retracted a part of my declaration, in that I said that the dream
 is a fulfilled wish or its opposite, an actualized anxiety or
 punishment, and you will think this is the opportunity to compel further
 reservations of me. I have also heard complaints that I am too abrupt
 about things which appear evident to me, and that for that reason I do
 not present the thing convincingly enough.
 
 If a person has gone thus far with us in dream-interpretation, and
 accepted everything that has been offered, it is not unusual for him to
 call a halt at wish-fulfillment, and say, "Granted that in every
 instance the dream has a meaning, and that this meaning can be disclosed
 by psychoanalytic technique, why must this dream, despite all evidence
 to the contrary, always be forced into the formula of wish-fulfillment?
 Why might not the meaning of this nocturnal thought be as many-sided as
 thought is by day; why may not the dream in one case express a fulfilled
 wish, in another, as you yourself say, the opposite thereof, an
 actualized anxiety; or why may it not correspond to a resolution, a
 warning, a reflection with its pro's and con's, a reproach, a goad to
 conscience, an attempt to prepare oneself for a contemplated
 performance, etc? Why always nothing more than a wish, or at best, its
 opposite?"
 
 One might maintain that a difference of opinion on these points is of no
 great importance, so long as we are at one otherwise. We might say that
 it is enough to have discovered the meaning of the dream, and the way to
 recognize it; that it is a matter of no importance, if we have too
 narrowly limited this meaning. But this is not so. A misunderstanding of
 this point strikes at the nature of our knowledge of the dream, and
 endangers its worth for the understanding of neuroses. Then, too, that
 method of approach which is esteemed in the business world as genteel is
 out of place in scientific endeavors, and harmful.
 
 My first answer to the question why the dream may not be many-sided in
 its meaning is the usual one in such instances: I do not know why it
 should not be so. I would not be opposed to such a state of affairs. As
 far as I am concerned, it could well be true. Only one small matter
 prevents this broader and more comfortable explanation of the
 dream--namely, that as a matter of fact it isn't so. My second answer
 emphasizes the fact that the assumption that the dream corresponds to
 numerous forms of thought and intellectual operations is no stranger to
 me. In a story about a sick person I once reported a dream that occurred
 three nights running and then stopped, and I explained this suppression
 by saying that the dream corresponded to a resolution which had no
 reason to recur after having been carried out. More recently I published
 a dream which corresponded to a confession. How is it possible for me to
 contradict myself, and maintain that the dream is always only a
 fulfilled wish?
 
 I do that, because I do not wish to admit a stupid misunderstanding
 which might cost us the fruits of all our labors with regard to the
 dream, a misunderstanding which confuses the dream with the latent
 dream-thought and affirms of the dream something that applies
 specifically and solely to the latter. For it is entirely correct that
 the dream can represent, and be replaced by all those things we
 enumerated: a resolution, a warning, reflection, preparation, an attempt
 to solve a problem, etc. But if you look closely, you will recognize
 that all these things are true only of the latent dream thoughts, which
 have been changed about in the dream. You learn from the interpretation
 of the dreams that the person's unconscious thinking is occupied with
 such resolutions, preparations, reflections, etc., out of which the
 dream-work then builds the dream. If you are not at the time interested
 in the dream-work, but are very much interested in the unconscious
 thought-work of man, you eliminate the dream-work, and say of the dream,
 for all practical purposes quite correctly, that it corresponds to a
 warning, a resolution, etc. This often happens in psychoanalytic
 activity. People endeavor for the most part only to destroy the dream
 form, and to substitute in its place in the sequence the latent thoughts
 out of which the dream was made.
 
 Thus we learn, from the appreciation of the latent dream-thoughts, that
 all the highly complicated psychic acts we have enumerated can go on
 unconsciously, a result as wonderful as it is confusing.
 
 But to return, you are right only if you admit that you have made use of
 an abbreviated form of speech, and if you do not believe that you must
 connect the many-sidedness we have mentioned with the essence of the
 dream. When you speak of the dream you must mean either the manifest
 dream, i.e., the product of the dream-work, or at most the dream-work
 itself--that psychic occurrence which forms the manifest dream out of
 the latent dream thought. Any other use of the word is a confusion of
 concept that can only cause trouble. If your assertions refer to the
 latent thoughts back of the dream, say so, and do not cloud the problem
 of the dream by using such a faulty means of expression. The latent
 dream thoughts are the material which the dream-work remolds into the
 manifest dream. Why do you insist upon confusing the material with the
 work that makes use of it? Are you any better off than those who knew
 only the product of this work, and could explain neither where it came
 from nor how it was produced?
 
 The only essential thing in the dream is the dream-work that has had
 its influence upon the thought-material. We have no right to disregard
 it theoretically even if, in certain practical situations, we may fail
 to take it into account. Analytic observation, too, shows that the
 dream-work never limits itself to translating these thoughts in the
 archaic or regressive mode of expression known to you. Rather it
 regularly adds something which does not belong to the latent thoughts of
 waking, but which is the essential motive of dream-formation. This
 indispensable ingredient is at the same time the unconscious wish, for
 the fulfillment of which the dream content is rebuilt. The dream may be
 any conceivable thing, if you take into account only the thoughts
 represented by it, warning, resolution, preparation, etc.; it is also
 always the fulfillment of an unknown wish, and it is this only if you
 look upon it as the result of the dream-work. A dream is never itself a
 resolution, a warning, and no more--but always a resolution, etc.,
 translated into an archaic form of expression with the help of the
 unconscious wish, and changed about for the purpose of fulfilling this
 wish. The one characteristic, wish-fulfillment, is constant; the other
 may vary; it may itself be a wish at times, so that the dream, with the
 aid of an unconscious wish, presents as fulfilled a latent wish out of
 waking hours.
 
 I understand all this very well, but I do not know whether or not I
 shall be successful in making you understand it as well. I have
 difficulties, too, in proving it to you. This cannot be done without, on
 the one hand, careful analysis of many dreams, and on the other hand
 this most difficult and most important point of our conception of the
 dream cannot be set forth convincingly without reference to things to
 follow. Can you, in fact, believe that taking into consideration the
 intimate relationship of all things, one is able to penetrate deeply
 into the nature of one thing without having carefully considered other
 things of a very similar nature? Since we know nothing as yet about the
 closest relatives of the dream, neurotic symptoms, we must once again
 content ourselves with what has already been accomplished. I want to
 explain one more example to you, and propose a new viewpoint.
 
 Let us again take up that dream to which we have several times recurred,
 the dream of the three theatre tickets for 1 Fl. 50 Kr. I can assure you
 that I took this example quite unpremeditatedly at first. You are
 acquainted with the latent dream thoughts: annoyance, upon hearing that
 her friend had just now become engaged, at the thought that she herself
 had hurried so to be married; contempt for her husband; the idea that
 she might have had a better one had she waited. We also know the wish,
 which made a dream out of these thoughts--it is "curiosity to see,"
 being permitted to go to the theatre, very likely a derivation from the
 old curiosity finally to know just what happens when one is married.
 This curiosity, as is well known, regularly directs itself in the case
 of children to the sex-life of the parents. It is an impulse of
 childhood, and in so far as it persists later, an impulse whose roots
 reach back into the infantile. But that day's news played no part in
 awaking the curiosity, it awoke only annoyance and regret. This wish
 impulse did not have anything to do immediately with the latent dream
 thoughts, and we could fit the result of the dream interpretation into
 the analysis without considering the wish impulse at all. But then, the
 annoyance itself was not capable of producing the dream; a dream could
 not be derived from the thought: "It was stupid to marry so soon,"
 except by reviving the old wish finally to see what happens when one is
 married. The wish then formed the dream content, in that it replaced
 marriage by going to the theatre, and gave it the form of an earlier
 wish-fulfillment: "so now I may go to the theatre and see all the
 forbidden things, and you may not. I am married and you must wait." In
 such a manner the present situation was transposed into its opposite, an
 old triumph put into the place of the recent defeat. Added thereto was a
 satisfied curiosity amalgamated with a satisfied egoistic sense of
 rivalry. This satisfaction determines the manifest dream content in
 which she really is sitting in the theatre, and her friend was unable to
 get tickets. Those bits of dream content are affixed to this
 satisfaction situation as unfitting and inexplicable modifications,
 behind which the latent dream thoughts still hide. Dream interpretation
 must take into consideration everything that serves toward the
 representation of the wish-fulfillment and must reconstruct from these
 suggestions the painful latent dream-thought.
 
 The observation I now wish to make is for the purpose of drawing your
 attention to the latent, dream thoughts, now pushed to the fore. I beg
 of you not to forget first, that the dreamer is unconscious of them,
 second, they are entirely logical and continuous, so that they may be
 understood as a comprehensible reaction to the dream occasion, third,
 that they may have the value of any desired psychic impulse or
 intellectual operation. I shall now designate these thoughts more
 forcibly than before as "day-remnants"; the dreamer may acknowledge them
 or not. I now separate day-remnants and latent dream thoughts in
 accordance with our previous usage of calling everything that we
 discover in interpreting the dream "latent dream thoughts," while the
 day-remnants are only a part of the latent dream thoughts. Then our
 conception goes to show that something additional has been added to the
 day-remnants, something which also belonged to the unconscious, a strong
 but suppressed wish impulse, and it is this alone that has made possible
 the dream fabrication. The influence of this wish impulse on the
 day-remnants creates the further participation of the latent dream
 thoughts, thoughts which no longer appear rational and understandable in
 relation to waking life.
 
 In explaining the relationship of the day-remnants to the unconscious
 wish I have made use of a comparison which I can only repeat here. Every
 undertaking requires a capitalist, who defrays the expenses, and an
 entrepreneur, who has the idea and understands how to carry it out. The
 role of the capitalist in the dream fabrication is always played by the
 unconscious wish; it dispenses the psychic energy for dream-building.
 The actual worker is the day-remnant, which determines how the
 expenditure is to be made. Now the capitalist may himself have the idea
 and the particularized knowledge, or the entrepreneur may have the
 capital. This simplifies the practical situation, but makes its
 theoretical comprehension more difficult. In economics we always
 distinguish between the capitalist and the entrepreneur aspect in a
 single person, and thus we reconstruct the fundamental situation which
 was the point of departure for our comparison. In dream-fabrication the
 same variations occur. I shall leave their further development to you.
 
 We can go no further here, for you have probably long been disturbed by
 a reflection which deserves to be heard. Are the day-remnants, you ask,
 really unconscious in the same sense as the unconscious wish which is
 essential to making them suitable for the dream? You discern correctly.
 Here lies the salient point of the whole affair. They are not
 unconscious in the same sense. The dream wish belongs to a different
 unconsciousness, that which we have recognized as of infantile origin,
 fitted out with special mechanisms. It is entirely appropriate to
 separate these two types of unconsciousness and give them different
 designations. But let us rather wait until we have become acquainted
 with the field of neurotic symptoms. If people say one unconsciousness
 is fantastic, what will they say when we acknowledge that we arrived at
 our conclusions by using two kinds of unconsciousness?
 
 Let us stop here. Once more you have heard something incomplete; but is
 there not hope in the thought that this science has a continuation which
 will be brought to light either by ourselves or by those to follow? And
 have not we ourselves discovered a sufficient number of new and
 surprising things?
 
 
 
 
 FIFTEENTH LECTURE
 
 THE DREAM
 
 _Doubtful Points and Criticism_
 
 
 Let us not leave the subject of dreams before we have touched upon the
 most common doubts and uncertainties which have arisen in connection
 with the new ideas and conceptions we have discussed up to this point.
 The more attentive members of the audience probably have already
 accumulated some material bearing upon this.
 
 1. You may have received the impression that the results of our work of
 interpretation of the dream have left so much that is uncertain, despite
 our close adherence to technique, that a true translation of the
 manifest dream into the latent dream thoughts is thereby rendered
 impossible. In support of this you will point out that in the first
 place, one never knows whether a specific element of the dream is to be
 taken literally or symbolically, since those elements which are used
 symbolically do not, because of that fact, cease to be themselves. But
 if one has no objective standard by which to decide this, the
 interpretation is, as to this point, left to the discretion of the dream
 interpreter. Moreover, because of the way in which the dream work
 combines opposites, it is always uncertain whether a specific dream
 element is to be taken in the positive or the negative sense, whether it
 is to be understood as itself or as its opposite. Hence this is another
 opportunity for the exercise of the interpreter's discretion. In the
 third place, in consequence of the frequency with which every sort of
 inversion is practised in the dream, the dream interpreter is at liberty
 to assume such an inversion at any point of the dream he pleases. And
 finally you will say, you have heard that one is seldom sure that the
 interpretation which is found is the only possible one. There is danger
 of overlooking a thoroughly admissible second interpretation of the
 same dream. Under these circumstances, you will conclude there is a
 scope left for the discretion of the interpreter, the breadth of which
 seems incompatible with the objective accuracy of the results. Or you
 may also conclude that the fault does not rest with the dream but that
 the inadequacies of our dream interpretation result from errors in our
 conceptions and hypotheses.
 
 All your material is irreproachable, but I do not believe that it
 justifies your conclusions in two directions, namely, that dream
 interpretation as we practice it is sacrificed to arbitrariness and that
 the deficiency of our results makes the justification of our method
 doubtful. If you will substitute for the arbitrariness of the
 interpreter, his skill, his experience, his comprehension, I agree with
 you. We shall surely not be able to dispense with some such personal
 factor, particularly not in difficult tasks of dream interpretation. But
 this same state of affairs exists also in other scientific occupations.
 There is no way in which to make sure that one man will not wield a
 technique less well, or utilize it more fully, than another. What might,
 for example, impress you as arbitrariness in the interpretation of
 symbols, is compensated for by the fact that as a rule the connection of
 the dream thoughts among themselves, the connection of the dream with
 the life of the dreamer, and the whole psychic situation in which the
 dream occurs, chooses just one of the possible interpretations advanced
 and rejects the others as useless for its purposes. The conclusion drawn
 from the inadequacies of dream interpretation, that our hypotheses are
 wrong, is weakened by an observation which shows that the ambiguity and
 indefiniteness of the dream is rather characteristic and necessarily to
 be expected.
 
 Recollect that we said that the dream work translates the dream thoughts
 into primitive expressions analogous to picture writing. All these
 primitive systems of expression are, however, subject to such
 indefiniteness and ambiguities, but it does not follow that we are
 justified in doubting their usefulness. You know that the fusion of
 opposites by the dream-work is analogous to the so-called "antithetical
 meaning of primitive words," in the oldest languages. The philologist,
 R. Abel (1884), whom we have to thank for this point of view, admonishes
 us not to believe that the meaning of the communication which one
 person made to another when using such ambiguous words was necessarily
 unclear. Tone and gesture used in connection with the words would have
 left no room for doubt as to which of the two opposites the speaker
 intended to communicate. In writing, where gesture is lacking, it was
 replaced by a supplementary picture sign not intended to be spoken, as
 for example by the picture of a little man squatting lazily or standing
 erect, according to whether the ambiguous hieroglyphic was to mean
 "weak" or "strong." It was in this way that one avoided any
 misunderstanding despite the ambiguity of the sounds and signs.
 
 We recognize in the ancient systems of expression, e.g., the writings of
 those oldest languages, a number of uncertainties which we would not
 tolerate in our present-day writings. Thus in many Semitic writings only
 the consonants of words are indicated. The reader had to supply the
 omitted vowels according to his knowledge and the context. Hieroglyphic
 writing does not proceed in exactly this way, but quite similarly, and
 that is why the pronunciation of old Egyptian has remained unknown to
 us. The holy writings of the Egyptians contain still other
 uncertainties. For example, it is left to the discretion of the writer
 whether or not he shall arrange the pictures from right to left or from
 left to right. To be able to read we have to follow the rule that we
 must depend upon the faces of the figures, birds, and the like. The
 writer, however, could also arrange the picture signs in vertical rows,
 and in inscriptions on small objects he was guided by considerations of
 beauty and proportion further to change the order of the signs. Probably
 the most confusing feature of hieroglyphic writing is to be found in the
 fact that there is no space between words. The pictures stretch over the
 page at uniform distances from one another, and generally one does not
 know whether a sign belongs to what has gone before or is the beginning
 of a new word. Persian cuneiform writing, on the other hand, makes use
 of an oblique wedge sign to separate the words.
 
 The Chinese tongue and script is exceedingly old, but still used by four
 hundred million people. Please do not think I understand anything about
 it. I have only informed myself concerning it because I hoped to find
 analogies to the indefinite aspects of the dream. Nor was I
 disappointed. The Chinese language is filled with so many vagaries that
 it strikes terror into our hearts. It consists, as is well known, of a
 number of syllable sounds which are spoken singly or are combined in
 twos. One of the chief dialects has about four hundred such sounds. Now
 since the vocabulary of this dialect is estimated at about four thousand
 words, it follows that every sound has on an average of ten different
 meanings, some less but others, consequently, more. Hence there are a
 great number of ways of avoiding a multiplicity of meaning, since one
 cannot guess from the context alone which of the ten meanings of the
 syllable sound the speaker intended to convey to the hearer. Among them
 are the combining of two sounds into a compounded word and the use of
 four different "tones" with which to utter these syllables. For our
 purposes of comparison, it is still more interesting to note that this
 language has practically no grammar. It is impossible to say of a
 one-syllable word whether it is a noun, a verb, or an adjective, and we
 find none of those changes in the forms of the words by means of which
 we might recognize sex, number, ending, tense or mood. The language,
 therefore, might be said to consist of raw material, much in the same
 manner as our thought language is broken up by the dream work into its
 raw materials when the expressions of relationship are left out. In the
 Chinese, in all cases of vagueness the decision is left to the
 understanding of the hearer, who is guided by the context. I have
 secured an example of a Chinese saying which, literally translated,
 reads: "Little to be seen, much to wonder at." That is not difficult to
 understand. It may mean, "The less a man has seen, the more he finds to
 wonder at," or, "There is much to admire for the man who has seen
 little." Naturally, there is no need to choose between these two
 translations, which differ only in grammar. Despite these uncertainties,
 we are assured, the Chinese language is an extraordinarily excellent
 medium for the expression of thought. Vagueness does not, therefore,
 necessarily lead to ambiguity.
 
 Now we must certainly admit that the condition of affairs is far less
 favorable in the expression-system of the dream than in these ancient
 languages and writings. For, after all, these latter are really designed
 for communication, that is to say, they were always intended to be
 understood, no matter in what way and with what aids. But it is just
 this characteristic which the dream lacks. The dream does not want to
 tell anyone anything, it is no vehicle of communication, it is, on the
 contrary, constructed so as not to be understood. For that reason we
 must not be surprised or misled if we should discover that a number of
 the ambiguities and vagaries of the dream do not permit of
 determination. As the one specific gain of our comparison, we have only
 the realization that such uncertainties as people tried to make use of
 in objecting to the validity of our dream interpretation, are rather the
 invariable characteristic of all primitive systems of expression.
 
 How far the dream can really be understood can be determined only by
 practice and experience. My opinion is, that that is very far indeed,
 and the comparison of results which correctly trained analysts have
 gathered confirms my view. The lay public, even that part of the lay
 public which is interested in science, likes, in the face of the
 difficulties and uncertainties of a scientific task, to make what I
 consider an unjust show of its superior scepticism. Perhaps not all of
 you are acquainted with the fact that a similar situation arose in the
 history of the deciphering of the Babylonian-Assyrian inscriptions.
 There was a period then when public opinion went far in declaring the
 decipherors of cuneiform writing to be visionaries and the whole
 research a "fraud." But in the year 1857 the Royal Asiatic Society made
 a decisive test. It challenged the four most distinguished decipherors
 of cuneiform writing, Rawlinson, Hincks, Fox Talbot and Oppert, each to
 send to it in a sealed envelope his independent translation of a newly
 discovered inscription, and the Society was then able to testify, after
 having made a comparison of the four readings, that their agreement was
 sufficiently marked to justify confidence in what already had been
 accomplished, and faith in further progress. At this the mockery of the
 learned lay world gradually came to an end and the confidence in the
 reading of cuneiform documents has grown appreciably since then.
 
 2. A second series of objections is firmly grounded in the impression
 from which you too probably are not free, that a number of the solutions
 of dream interpretations which we find it necessary to make seem forced,
 artificial, far-fetched, in other words, violent or even comical or
 jocose. These comments are so frequent that I shall choose at random the
 latest example which has come to my attention. Recently, in free
 Switzerland, the director of a boarding-school was relieved of his
 position on account of his active interest in psychoanalysis. He raised
 objections and a Berne newspaper made public the judgment of the school
 authorities. I quote from that article some sentences which apply to
 psychoanalysis: "Moreover, we are surprised at the many far-fetched and
 artificial examples as found in the aforementioned book of Dr. Pfister
 of Zurich.... Thus, it certainly is a cause of surprise when the
 director of a boarding-school so uncritically accepts all these
 assertions and apparent proofs." These observations are offered as the
 decisions of "one who judges calmly." I rather think this calm is
 "artificial." Let us examine these remarks more closely in the hope that
 a little reflection and knowledge of the subject can be no detriment to
 calm judgment.
 
 It is positively refreshing to see how quickly and unerringly some
 individuals can judge a delicate question of abstruse psychology by
 first impressions. The interpretations seem to them far-fetched and
 forced, they do not please them, so the interpretations are wrong and
 the whole business of interpretation amounts to nothing. No fleeting
 thought ever brushes the other possibility, that these interpretations
 must appear as they are for good reasons, which would give rise to the
 further question of what these good reasons might be.
 
 The content thus judged generally relates to the results of
 displacement, with which you have become acquainted as the strongest
 device of the dream censor. It is with the help of displacements that
 the dream censor creates substitute-formations which we have designated
 as allusions. But they are allusions which are not easily recognized as
 such, and from which it is not easy to find one's way back to the
 original and which are connected with this original by means of the
 strangest, most unusual, most superficial associations. In all of these
 cases, however, it is a question of matters which are to be hidden,
 which were intended for concealment; this is what the dream censor aims
 to do. We must not expect to find a thing that has been concealed in its
 accustomed place in the spot where it belongs. In this respect the
 Commissions for the Surveillance of Frontiers now in office are more
 cunning than the Swiss school authorities. In their search for documents
 and maps they are not content to search through portfolios and letter
 cases but they also take into account the possibility that spies and
 smugglers might carry such severely proscribed articles in the most
 concealed parts of their clothing, where they certainly do not belong,
 as for example between the double soles of their boots. If the concealed
 objects are found in such a place, they certainly are very far-fetched,
 but nevertheless they have been "fetched."
 
 If we recognize that the most remote, the most extraordinary
 associations between the latent dream element and its manifest
 substitute are possible, associations appearing ofttimes comical,
 ofttimes witty, we follow in so doing a wealth of experience derived
 from examples whose solutions we have, as a rule, not found ourselves.
 Often it is not possible to give such interpretations from our own
 examples. No sane person could guess the requisite association. The
 dreamer either gives us the translation with one stroke by means of his
 immediate association--he can do this, for this substitute formation was
 created by his mind--or he provides us with so much material that the
 solution no longer demands any special astuteness but forces itself upon
 us as inevitable. If the dreamer does not help us in either of these two
 ways, then indeed the manifest element in question remains forever
 incomprehensible to us. Allow me to give you one more such example of
 recent occurrence. One of my patients lost her father during the time
 that she was undergoing treatment. Since then she has made use of every
 opportunity to bring him back to life in her dreams. In one of her
 dreams her father appears in a certain connection, of no further
 importance here, and says, "_It is a quarter past eleven, it is half
 past eleven, it is quarter of twelve_." All she can think of in
 connection with this curious incident is the recollection that her
 father liked to see his grown-up children appear punctually at the
 general meal hour. That very thing probably had some connection with the
 dream element, but permitted of no conclusion as to its source. Judging
 from the situation of the treatment at that time, there was a justified
 suspicion that a carefully suppressed critical rebellion against her
 loved and respected father played its part in this dream. Continuing her
 associations, and apparently far afield from topics relevant to the
 dream, the dreamer relates that yesterday many things of a
 psychological nature had been discussed in her presence, and that a
 relative made the remark: "The cave man (_Urmensch_) continues to live
 in all of us." Now we think we understand. That gave her an excellent
 opportunity of picturing her father as continuing to live. So in the
 dream she made of him a clockman (_Uhrmensch_) by having him announce
 the quarter-hours at noon time.
 
 You may not be able to disregard the similarity which this examples
 bears to a pun, and it really has happened frequently that the dreamer's
 pun is attributed to the interpreter. There are still other examples in
 which it is not at all easy to decide whether one is dealing with a joke
 or a dream. But you will recall that the same doubt confronted us when
 we were dealing with slips of the tongue. A man tells us a dream of his,
 that his uncle, while they were sitting in the latter's _auto_mobile,
 gave him a kiss. He very quickly supplies the interpretation himself. It
 means "_auto_-eroticism," (a term taken from the study of the libido, or
 love impulse, and designating satisfaction of that impulse without an
 external object). Did this man permit himself to make fun of us and give
 out as a dream a pun that occurred to him? I do not believe so; he
 really dreamed it. Whence comes the astounding similarity? This question
 at one time led me quite a ways from my path, by making it necessary for
 me to make a thorough investigation of the problem of humor itself. By
 so doing I came to the conclusion that the origin of wit lies in a
 foreconscious train of thought which is left for a moment to unconscious
 manipulation, from which it then emerges as a joke. Under the influence
 of the unconscious it experiences the workings of the mechanisms there
 in force, namely, of condensation and displacement, that is, of the same
 processes which we found active in the dream work, and it is to this
 agreement that we are to ascribe the similarity between wit and the
 dream, wherever it occurs. The unintentional "dream joke" has, however,
 none of the pleasure-giving quality of the ordinary joke. Why that is
 so, greater penetration into the study of wit may teach you. The "dream
 joke" seems a poor joke to us, it does not make us laugh, it leaves us
 cold.
 
 Here we are also following in the footsteps of ancient dream
 interpretation, which has left us, in addition to much that is useless,
 many a good example of dream interpretation we ourselves cannot
 surpass. I am now going to tell you a dream of historical importance
 which Plutarch and Artemidorus of Daldis both tell concerning Alexander
 the Great, with certain variations. When the King was engaged in
 besieging the city of Tyre (322 B.C.), which was being stubbornly
 defended, he once dreamed that he saw a dancing satyr. Aristandros, his
 dream interpreter, who accompanied the army, interpreted this dream for
 him by making of the word _Satyros_,  , "Thine is Tyre," and thus
 promising him a triumph over the city. Alexander allowed himself to be
 influenced by this interpretation to continue the siege, and finally
 captured Tyre. The interpretation, which seems artificial enough, was
 without doubt the correct one.
 
 3. I can imagine that it will make a special impression on you to hear
 that objections to our conception of the dream have been raised also by
 persons who, as psychoanalysts, have themselves been interested in the
 interpretation of dreams. It would have been too extraordinary if so
 pregnant an opportunity for new errors had remained unutilized, and
 thus, owing to comprehensible confusions and unjustified
 generalizations, there have been assertions made which, in point of
 incorrectness are not far behind the medical conception of dreams. One
 of these you already know. It is the declaration that the dream is
 occupied with the dreamer's attempts at adaptation to his present
 environment, and attempts to solve future problems, in other words, that
 the dream follows a "prospective tendency" (A. Maeder). We have already
 shown that this assertion is based upon a confusion of the dream with
 the latent thoughts of the dream, that as a premise it overlooks the
 existence of the dream-work. In characterizing that psychic activity
 which is unconscious and to which the latent thoughts of the dream
 belong, the above assertion is no novelty, nor is it exhaustive, for
 this unconscious psychic activity occupies itself with many other things
 besides preparation for the future. A much worse confusion seems to
 underlie the assurance that back of every dream one finds the
 "death-clause," or death-wish. I am not quite certain what this formula
 is meant to indicate, but I suppose that back of it is a confusion of
 the dream with the whole personality of the dreamer.
 
 An unjustified generalization, based on few good examples, is the
 pronouncement that every dream permits of two interpretations, one such
 as we have explained, the so-called psychoanalytic, and another, the
 so-called anagogical or mystical, which ignores the instinctive impulses
 and aims at a representation of the higher psychic functions (V.
 Silberer). There are such dreams, but you will try in vain to extend
 this conception to even a majority of the dreams. But after everything
 you have heard, the statement will seem very incomprehensible that all
 dreams can be interpreted bisexually, that is, as the concurrence of two
 tendencies which may be designated as male and female (A. Adler). To be
 sure, there are a few such dreams, and you may learn later that these
 are built up in the manner of certain hysterical symptoms. I mention all
 these newly discovered general characteristics of the dream in order to
 warn you against them or at least in order not to leave you in doubt as
 to how I judge them.
 
 4. At one time the objective value of dream research was called into
 question by the observation that patients undergoing analysis
 accommodate the content of their dreams to the favorite theories of
 their physicians, so that some dream predominantly of sexual impulses,
 others of the desire for power and still others even of rebirth (W.
 Stekel). The weight of this observation is diminished by the
 consideration that people dreamed before there was such a thing as a
 psychoanalytic treatment to influence their dreams, and that those who
 are now undergoing treatment were also in the habit of dreaming before
 the treatment was commenced. The meaning of this novel discovery can
 soon be recognized as a matter of course and as of no consequence for
 the theory of the dream. Those day-remnants which give rise to the dream
 are the overflow from the strong interest of the waking life. If the
 remarks of the physician and the stimuli which he gives have become
 significant to the patient under analysis, then they become a part of
 the day's remnants, can serve as psychic stimuli for the formation of a
 dream along with other, emotionally-charged, unsolved interests of the
 day, and operate much as do the somatic stimuli which act upon the
 sleeper during his sleep. Just like these other incitors of the dream,
 the sequence of ideas which the physician sets in motion may appear in
 the manifest content, or may be traced in the latent content of the
 dream. Indeed, we know that one can produce dreams experimentally, or to
 speak more accurately, one can insert into the dream a part of the
 dream material. Thus the analyst in influencing his patients, merely
 plays the role of an experimenter in the manner of Mourly Vold, who
 places the limbs of his subjects in certain positions.
 
 One can often influence the dreamer as to the _subject-matter_ of his
 dream, but one can never influence _what he will dream_ about it. The
 mechanism of the dream-work and the unconscious wish that is hidden in
 the dream are beyond the reach of all foreign influences. We already
 realized, when we evaluated the dreams caused by bodily stimuli, that
 the peculiarity and self-sufficiency of the dream life shows itself in
 the reaction with which the dream retorts to the bodily or physical
 stimuli which are presented. The statement here discussed, which aims to
 throw doubt upon the objectivity of dream research, is again based on a
 confusion--this time of the whole dream with the dream material.
 
 This much, ladies and gentlemen, I wanted to tell you concerning the
 problems of the dream. You will suspect that I have omitted a great
 deal, and have yourselves discovered that I had to be inconclusive on
 almost all points. But that is due to the relation which the phenomena
 of the dream have to those of the neuroses. We studied the dream by way
 of introduction to the study of the neuroses, and that was surely more
 correct than the reverse would have been. But just as the dream prepares
 us for the understanding of the neuroses, so in turn the correct
 evaluation of the dream can only be gained after a knowledge of neurotic
 phenomena has been won.
 
 I do not know what you will think about this, but I must assure you that
 I do not regret having taken so much of your interest and of your
 available time for the problems of the dream. There is no other field in
 which one can so quickly become convinced of the correctness of the
 assertions by which psychoanalysis stands or falls. It will take the
 strenuous labor of many months, even years, to show that the symptoms in
 a case of neurotic break-down have their meaning, serve a purpose, and
 result from the fortunes of the patient. On the other hand, the efforts
 of a few hours suffice in proving the same content in a dream product
 which at first seems incomprehensibly confused, and thereby to confirm
 all the hypotheses of psychoanalysis, the unconsciousness of psychic
 processes, the special mechanism which they follow, and the motive
 forces which manifest themselves in them. And if we associate the
 thorough analogy in the construction of the dream and the neurotic
 symptom with the rapidity of transformation which makes of the dreamer
 an alert and reasonable individual, we gain the certainty that the
 neurosis also is based only on a change in the balance of the forces of
 psychic life.
 
 
 
 
 III
 
 GENERAL THEORY OF THE NEUROSES
 
 
 
 
 SIXTEENTH LECTURE
 
 GENERAL THEORY OF THE NEUROSES
 
 _Psychoanalysis and Psychiatry_
 
 
 I am very glad to welcome you back to continue our discussions. I last
 lectured to you on the psychoanalytic treatment of errors and of the
 dream. To-day I should like to introduce you to an understanding of
 neurotic phenomena, which, as you soon will discover, have much in
 common with both of those topics. But I shall tell you in advance that I
 cannot leave you to take the same attitude toward me that you had
 before. At that time I was anxious to take no step without complete
 reference to your judgment. I discussed much with you, I listened to
 your objections, in short, I deferred to you and to your "normal common
 sense." That is no longer possible, and for a very simple reason. As
 phenomena, the dream and errors were not strange to you. One might say
 that you had as much experience as I, or that you could easily acquire
 as much. But neuroses are foreign to you; since you are not doctors
 yourselves you have had access to them only through what I have told
 you. Of what use is the best judgment if it is not supported by
 familiarity with the material in question?
 
 Do not, however, understand this as an announcement of dogmatic lectures
 which demand your unconditional belief. That would be a gross
 misunderstanding. I do not wish to convince you. I am out to stimulate
 your interest and shake your prejudices. If, in consequence of not
 knowing the facts, you are not in a position to judge, neither should
 you believe nor condemn. Listen and allow yourselves to be influenced by
 what I tell you. One cannot be so easily convinced; at least if he comes
 by convictions without effort, they soon prove to be valueless and
 unable to hold their own. He only has a right to conviction who has
 handled the same material for many years and who in so doing has gone
 through the same new and surprising experiences again and again. Why, in
 matters of intellect these lightning conversions, these momentary
 repulsions? Do you not feel that a _coup de foudre_, that love at first
 sight, originates in quite a different field, namely, in that of the
 emotions? We do not even demand that our patients should become
 convinced of and predisposed to psychoanalysis. When they do, they seem
 suspicious to us. The attitude we prefer in them is one of benevolent
 scepticism. Will you not also try to let the psychoanalytic conception
 develop in your mind beside the popular or "psychiatric"? They will
 influence each other, mutually measure their strength, and some day work
 themselves into a decision on your part.
 
 On the other hand, you must not think for a moment that what I present
 to you as the psychoanalytic conception is a purely speculative system.
 Indeed, it is a sum total of experiences and observations, either their
 direct expression or their elaboration. Whether this elaboration is done
 adequately and whether the method is justifiable will be tested in the
 further progress of the science. After two and a half decades, now that
 I am fairly advanced in years, I may say that it was particularly
 difficult, intensive and all-absorbing work which yielded these
 observations. I have often had the impression that our opponents were
 unwilling to take into consideration this objective origin of our
 statements, as if they thought it were only a question of subjective
 ideas arising haphazard, ideas to which another may oppose his every
 passing whim. This antagonistic behavior is not entirely comprehensible
 to me. Perhaps the physician's habit of steering clear of his neurotic
 patients and listening so very casually to what they have to say allows
 him to lose sight of the possibility of deriving anything valuable from
 his patients' communications, and therefore, of making penetrating
 observations on them. I take this opportunity of promising you that I
 shall carry on little controversy in the course of my lectures, least of
 all with individual controversialists. I have never been able to
 convince myself of the truth of the saying that controversy is the
 father of all things. I believe that it comes down to us from the Greek
 sophist philosophy and errs as does the latter through the overvaluation
 of dialectics. To me, on the contrary, it seems as if the so-called
 scientific criticism were on the whole unfruitful, quite apart from the
 fact that it is almost always carried on in a most personal spirit. For
 my part, up to a few years ago, I could even boast that I had entered
 into a regular scientific dispute with only one scholar (Lowenfeld, of
 Munich). The end of this was that we became friends and have remained
 friends to this day. But I did not repeat this attempt for a long time,
 because I was not certain that the outcome would be the same.
 
 Now you will surely judge that so to reject the discussion of literature
 must evidence stubborness, a very special obtuseness against objections,
 or, as the kindly colloquialisms of science have it, "a complete
 personal bias." In answer, I would say that should you attain to a
 conviction by such hard labor, you would thereby derive a certain right
 to sustain it with some tenacity. Furthermore, I should like to
 emphasize the fact that I have modified my views on certain important
 points in the course of my researches, changed them and replaced them by
 new ones, and that I naturally made a public statement of that fact each
 time. What has been the result of this frankness? Some paid no attention
 at all to my self-corrections and even to-day criticize me for
 assertions which have long since ceased to have the same meaning for me.
 Others reproach me for just this deviation, and on account of it declare
 me unreliable. For is anyone who has changed his opinions several times
 still trustworthy; is not his latest assertion, as well, open to error?
 At the same time he who holds unswervingly to what he has once said, or
 cannot be made to give it up quickly enough, is called stubborn and
 biased. In the face of these contradictory criticisms, what else can one
 do but be himself and act according to his own dictates? That is what I
 have decided to do, and I will not allow myself to be restrained from
 modifying and adapting my theories as the progress of my experience
 demands. In the basic ideas I have hitherto found nothing to change, and
 I hope that such will continue to be the case.
 
 Now I shall present to you the psychoanalytic conception of neurotic
 manifestations. The natural thing for me to do is to connect them to the
 phenomena we have previously treated, for the sake of their analogy as
 well as their contrast. I will select as symptomatic an act of frequent
 occurrence in my office hour. Of course, the analyst cannot do much for
 those who seek him in his medical capacity, and lay the woes of a
 lifetime before him in fifteen minutes. His deeper knowledge makes it
 difficult for him to deliver a snap decision as do other
 physicians--"There is nothing wrong with you"--and to give the advice,
 "Go to a watering-place for a while." One of our colleagues, in answer
 to the question as to what he did with his office patients, said,
 shrugging his shoulders, that he simply "fines them so many kronen for
 their mischief-making." So it will not surprise you to hear that even in
 the case of very busy analysts, the hours for consultation are not very
 crowded. I have had the ordinary door between my waiting room and my
 office doubled and strengthened by a covering of felt. The purpose of
 this little arrangement cannot be doubted. Now it happens over and over
 again that people who are admitted from my waiting room omit to close
 the door behind them; in fact, they almost always leave both doors open.
 As soon as I have noticed this I insist rather gruffly that he or she go
 back in order to rectify the omission, even though it be an elegant
 gentleman or a lady in all her finery. This gives an impression of
 misapplied pedantry. I have, in fact, occasionally discredited myself by
 such a demand, since the individual concerned was one of those who
 cannot touch even a door knob, and prefer as well to have their
 attendants spared this contact. But most frequently I was right, for he
 who conducts himself in this way, and leaves the door from the waiting
 room into the physician's consultation room open, belongs to the rabble
 and deserves to be received inhospitably. Do not, I beg you, defend him
 until you have heard what follows. For the fact is that this negligence
 of the patient's only occurs when he has been alone in the waiting room
 and so leaves an empty room behind him, never when others, strangers,
 have been waiting with him. If that latter is the case, he knows very
 well that it is in his interest not to be listened to while he is
 talking to the physician, and never omits to close both the doors with
 care.
 
 This omission of the patient's is so predetermined that it becomes
 neither accidental nor meaningless, indeed, not even unimportant, for,
 as we shall see, it throws light upon the relation of this patient to
 the physician. He is one of the great number of those who seek
 authority, who want to be dazzled, intimidated. Perhaps he had inquired
 by telephone as to what time he had best call, he had prepared himself
 to come on a crowd of suppliants somewhat like those in front of a
 branch milk station. He now enters an empty waiting room which is,
 moreover, most modestly furnished, and he is disappointed. He must
 demand reparation from the physician for the wasted respect that he had
 tendered him, and so he omits to close the door between the reception
 room and the office. By this, he means to say to the physician: "Oh,
 well, there is no one here anyway, and probably no one will come as long
 as I am here." He would also be quite unmannerly and supercilious during
 the consultation if his presumption were not at once restrained by a
 sharp reminder.
 
 You will find nothing in the analysis of this little symptomatic act
 which was not previously known to you. That is to say, it asserts that
 this act is not accidental, but has a motive, a meaning, a purpose, that
 it has its assignable connections psychologically, and that it serves as
 a small indication of a more important psychological process. But above
 all it implies that the process thus intimated is not known to the
 consciousness of the individual in whom it takes place, for none of the
 patients who left the two doors open would have admitted that they meant
 by this omission to show me their contempt. Some could probably recall a
 slight sense of disappointment at entering an empty waiting room, but
 the connection between this impression and the symptomatic act which
 followed--of these, his consciousness was surely not aware.
 
 Now let us place, side by side with this small analysis of a symptomatic
 act, an observation on a pathological case. I choose one which is fresh
 in my mind and which can also be described with relative brevity. A
 certain measure of minuteness of detail is unavoidable in any such
 account.
 
 A young officer, home on a short leave of absence, asked me to see his
 mother-in-law who, in spite of the happiest circumstances, was
 embittering her own and her people's existence by a senseless idea. I am
 introduced to a well preserved lady of fifty-three with pleasant, simple
 manners, who gives the following account without any hesitation: She is
 most happily married and lives in the country with her husband, who
 operates a large factory. She cannot say enough for the kind
 thoughtfulness of her husband. They had married for love thirty years
 ago, and since then there had never been a shadow, a quarrel or cause
 for jealousy. Now, even though her two children are well married, the
 husband and father does not yet want to retire, from a feeling of duty.
 A year ago there happened the incredible thing, incomprehensible to
 herself as well. She gave complete credence to an anonymous letter which
 accused her excellent husband of having an affair with a young girl--and
 since then her happiness is destroyed. The more detailed circumstances
 were somewhat as follows: She had a chambermaid with whom she had
 perhaps too often discussed intimate matters. This girl pursued another
 young woman with positively malicious enmity because the latter had
 progressed so much further in life, despite the fact that she was of no
 better origin. Instead of going into domestic service, the girl had
 obtained a business training, had entered the factory and in consequence
 of the short-handedness due to the drafting of the clerks into the army
 had advanced to a good position. She now lives in the factory itself,
 meets all the gentlemen socially, and is even addressed as "Miss." The
 girl who had remained behind in life was of course ready to speak all
 possible evil of her one-time schoolmate. One day our patient and her
 chambermaid were talking of an old gentleman who had been visiting at
 the house, and of whom it was known that he did not live with his wife,
 but kept another woman as his mistress. She does not know how it
 happened that she suddenly remarked, "That would be the most awful thing
 that could happen to me, if I should ever hear that my good husband also
 had a mistress." The next day she received an anonymous letter through
 the mail which, in a disguised handwriting, carried this very
 communication which she had conjured up. She concluded--it seems
 justifiably--that the letter was the handiwork of her malignant
 chambermaid, for the letter named as the husband's mistress the
 self-same woman whom the maid persecuted with her hatred. Our patient,
 in spite of the fact that she immediately saw through the intrigue and
 had seen enough in her town to know how little credence such cowardly
 denunciations deserve, was nevertheless at once prostrated by the
 letter. She became dreadfully excited and promptly sent for her husband
 in order to heap the bitterest reproaches upon him. Her husband
 laughingly denied the accusation and did the best that could be done. He
 called in the family physician, who was as well the doctor in attendance
 at the factory, and the latter added his efforts to quiet the unhappy
 woman. Their further procedure was also entirely reasonable. The
 chambermaid was dismissed, but the pretended rival was not. Since then,
 the patient claims she has repeatedly so far calmed herself as no longer
 to believe the contents of the anonymous letter, but this relief was
 neither thoroughgoing nor lasting. It was enough to hear the name of the
 young lady spoken or to meet her on the street in order to precipitate a
 new attack of suspicion, pain and reproach.
 
 This, now, is the case history of this good woman. It does not need much
 psychiatric experience to understand that her portrayal of her own case
 was, if anything, rather too mild in contrast to other nervous patients.
 The picture, we say, was dissimulated; in reality she had never overcome
 her belief in the accusation of the anonymous letter.
 
 Now what position does a psychiatrist take toward such a case? We
 already know what he would do in the case of the symptomatic act of the
 patient who does not close the doors to the waiting room. He declares it
 an accident without psychological interest, with which he need not
 concern himself. But this attitude cannot be maintained toward the
 pathological case of the jealous woman. The symptomatic act seems no
 great matter, but the symptom itself claims attention by reason of its
 gravity. It is bound up with intense subjective suffering while
 objectively it threatens to break up a home; therefore its claim to
 psychiatric interest cannot be put aside. The first endeavor of the
 psychiatrist is to characterize the symptom by some distinctive feature.
 The idea with which this woman torments herself cannot in itself be
 called nonsensical, for it does happen that elderly married men have
 affairs with young girls. But there is something else about it that is
 nonsensical and incredible. The patient has no reason beyond the
 declaration in the anonymous letter to believe that her tender and
 faithful husband belongs to this sort of married men, otherwise not
 uncommon. She knows that this letter in itself carries no proof; she can
 satisfactorily explain its origin; therefore she ought to be able to
 persuade herself that she has no reason to be jealous. Indeed she does
 this, but in spite of it she suffers every bit as much as she would if
 she acknowledged this jealousy as fully justified. We are agreed to call
 ideas of this sort, which are inaccessible to arguments based on logic
 or on facts, "_obsessions_." Thus the good lady suffers from an
 "_obsession of jealousy_" that is surely a distinctive characterization
 for this pathological case.
 
 Having reached this first certainty, our psychiatric interest will have
 become aroused. If we cannot do away with a delusion by taking reality
 into account, it can hardly have arisen from reality. But the delusion,
 what is its origin? There are delusions of the most widely varied
 content. Why is it that in our case the content should be jealousy? In
 what types of persons are obsessions liable to occur, and, in
 particular, obsessions of jealousy? We would like to turn to the
 psychiatrist with such questions, but here he leaves us in the lurch.
 There is only one of our queries which he heeds. He will examine the
 family history of this woman and _perhaps_ will give us the answer: "The
 people who develop obsessions are those in whose families similar and
 other psychic disturbances have repeatedly occurred." In other words, if
 this lady develops an obsession she does so because she was predisposed
 to it by reason of her heredity. That is certainly something, but is it
 all that we want to know? Is it all that was effective in causing this
 breakdown? Shall we be content to assume that it is immaterial,
 accidental and inexplicable why the obsession of jealousy develops
 rather than any other? And may we also accept this sentence about the
 dominance of the influence of heredity in its negative meaning, that is,
 that no matter what experiences came to this human being she was
 predestined to develop some kind of obsession? You will want to know why
 scientific psychiatry will give no further explanation. And I reply, "He
 is a rascal who gives more than he owns." The psychiatrist does not know
 of any path that leads him further in the explanation of such a case. He
 must content himself with the diagnosis and a prognosis which, despite a
 wealth of experience, is uncertain.
 
 Yet, can psychoanalysis do more at this point? Indeed yes! I hope to
 show you that even in so inaccessible a case as this it can discover
 something which makes the further understanding possible. May I ask you
 first to note the apparently insignificant fact that the patient
 actually provoked the anonymous letter which now supports her delusion.
 The day before, she announces to the intriguing chambermaid that if her
 husband were to have an affair with a young girl it would be the worst
 misfortune that could befall her. By so doing she really gave the maid
 the idea of sending her the anonymous letter. The obsession thus attains
 a certain independence from the letter; it existed in the patient
 beforehand--perhaps as a dread; or was it a wish? Consider, moreover,
 these additional details yielded by an analysis of only two hours. The
 patient was indeed most helpful when, after telling her story, she was
 urged to communicate her further thoughts, ideas and recollections. She
 declared that nothing came to her mind, that she had already told
 everything. After two hours the undertaking had really to be given up
 because she announced that she already felt cured and was sure that the
 morbid idea would not return. Of course, she said this because of this
 resistance and her fear of continuing the analysis. In these two hours,
 however, she had let fall certain remarks which made possible definite
 interpretation, indeed made it incontestable; and this interpretation
 throws a clear light on the origin of her obsession of jealousy. Namely,
 she herself was very much infatuated with a certain young man, the very
 same son-in-law upon whose urging she had come to consult me
 professionally. She knew nothing of this infatuation, or at least only a
 very little. Because of the existing relationship, it was very easy for
 this infatuation to masquerade under the guise of harmless tenderness.
 With all our further experience it is not difficult to feel our way
 toward an understanding of the psychic life of this honest woman and
 good mother. Such an infatuation, a monstrous, impossible thing, could
 not be allowed to become conscious. But it continued to exist and
 unconsciously exerted a heavy pressure. Something had to happen, some
 sort of relief had to be found and the mechanism of displacement which
 so constantly takes part in the origin of obsessional jealousy offered
 the most immediate mitigation. If not only she, old woman that she was,
 was in love with a young man but if also her old husband had an affair
 with a young girl, then she would be freed from the voice of her
 conscience which accused her of infidelity. The phantasy of her
 husband's infidelity was thus like a cooling salve on her burning wound.
 Of her own love she never became conscious, but the reflection of it,
 which would bring her such advantages, now became compulsive,
 obsessional and conscious. Naturally all arguments directed against the
 obsession were of no avail since they were directed only to the
 reflection, and not to the original force to which it owed its strength
 and which, unimpeachable, lay buried in the unconscious.
 
 Let us now piece together these fragments to see what a short and
 impeded psychoanalysis can nevertheless contribute to the understanding
 of this case. It is assumed of course that our inquiries were carefully
 conducted, a point which I cannot at this place submit to your judgment.
 In the first place, the obsession becomes no longer nonsensical nor
 incomprehensible, it is full of meaning, well motivated and an integral
 part of the patient's emotional experience. Secondly, it is a necessary
 reaction toward an unconscious psychological process, revealed in other
 ways, and it is to this very circumstance that it owes its obsessional
 nature, that is, its resistance to arguments based on logic or fact. In
 itself the obsession is something wished for, a kind of consolation.
 Finally, the experiences underlying the condition are such as
 unmistakably determine an obsession of jealousy and no other. You will
 also recognize the part played by the two important analogies in the
 analysis of the symptomatic act with reference to its meaning and intent
 and also to its relation to an unconscious factor in the situation.
 
 Naturally, we have not yet answered all the questions which may be put
 on the basis of this case. Rather the case bristles with further
 problems of a kind which we have not yet been able to solve in any way,
 and of others which could not be solved because of the disadvantage of
 the circumstances under which we were working. For example: why is this
 happily married woman open to an infatuation for her son-in-law, and why
 does the relief which could have been obtained in other ways come to her
 by way of this mirror-image, this projection of her own condition upon
 her husband? I trust you will not think that it is idle and wanton to
 open such problems. Already we have much material at our disposal for
 their possible solution. This woman is in that critical age when her
 sexual needs undergo a sudden and unwelcome exaggeration. This might in
 itself be sufficient. In addition, her good and faithful mate may for
 many years have been lacking in that sufficient sexual capacity which
 the well-preserved woman needs for her satisfaction. We have learned by
 experience to know that those very men whose faithfulness is thus placed
 beyond a doubt are most gentle in their treatment of their wives and
 unusually forbearing toward their nervous complaints. Furthermore, the
 fact that it was just the young husband of a daughter who became the
 object of her abnormal infatuation is by no means insignificant. A
 strong erotic attachment to the daughter, which in the last analysis
 leads back to the mother's sexual constitution, will often find a way to
 live on under such a disguise. May I perhaps remind you in this
 connection that the relationship between mother and son-in-law has
 seemed particularly delicate since all time and is one which among
 primitive peoples gave rise to very powerful taboos and avoidances.[37]
 It often transgresses our cultural standards positively as well as
 negatively. I cannot tell you of course which of these three factors
 were at work in our case; whether two of them only, or whether all of
 them coperated, for as you know I did not have the opportunity to
 continue the analysis beyond two hours.
 
 I realize at this point, ladies and gentlemen, that I have been speaking
 entirely of things for which your understanding was not prepared. I did
 this in order to carry through the comparison of psychiatry and
 psychoanalysis. May I now ask one thing of you? Have you noticed any
 contradiction between them? Psychiatry does not apply the technical
 methods of psychoanalysis, and neglects to look for any significance in
 the content of the obsession. Instead of first seeking out more specific
 and immediate causes, psychiatry refers us to the very general and
 remote source--heredity. But does this imply a contradiction, a conflict
 between them? Do they not rather supplement one another? For does the
 hereditary factor deny the significance of the experience, is it not
 rather true that both operate together in the most effective way? You
 must admit that there is nothing in the nature of psychiatric work which
 must repudiate psychoanalytic research. Therefore, it is the
 psychiatrists who oppose psychoanalysis, not psychiatry itself.
 Psychoanalysis stands in about the same relation to psychiatry as does
 histology to anatomy. The one studies the outer forms of organs, the
 other the closer structure of tissues and cells. A contradiction between
 two types of study, where one simplifies the other, is not easily
 conceivable. You know that anatomy to-day forms the basis of scientific
 medicine, but there was a time when the dissection of human corpses to
 learn the inner structure of the body was as much frowned upon as the
 practice of psychoanalysis, which seeks to ascertain the inner workings
 of the human soul, seems proscribed to-day. And presumably a not too
 distant time will bring us to the realization that a psychiatry which
 aspires to scientific depth is not possible without a real knowledge of
 the deeper unconscious processes in the psychic life.
 
 Perhaps this much-attacked psychoanalysis has now found some friends
 among you who are anxious to see it justify itself as well from another
 aspect, namely, the therapeutic side. You know that the therapy of
 psychiatry has hitherto not been able to influence obsessions. Can
 psychoanalysis perhaps do so, thanks to its insight into the mechanism
 of these symptoms? No, ladies and gentlemen, it cannot; for the present
 at least it is just as powerless in the face of these maladies as every
 other therapy. We can understand what it was that happened within the
 patient, but we have no means of making the patient himself understand
 this. In fact, I told you that I could not extend the analysis of the
 obsession beyond the first steps. Would you therefore assert that
 analysis is objectionable in such cases because it remains without
 result? I think not. We have the right, indeed we have the duty to
 pursue scientific research without regard to an immediate practical
 effect. Some day, though we do not know when or where, every little
 scrap of knowledge will have been translated into skill, even into
 therapeutic skill. If psychoanalysis were as unsuccessful in all other
 forms of nervous and psychological disease as it is in the case of the
 obsession, it would nevertheless remain fully justified as an
 irreplaceable method of scientific research. It is true that we would
 then not be in a position to practice it, for the human subjects from
 which we must learn, live and will in their own right; they must have
 motives of their own in order to assist in the work, but they would deny
 themselves to us. Therefore let me conclude this session by telling you
 that there are comprehensive groups of nervous diseases concerning which
 our better understanding has actually been translated into therapeutic
 power; moreover, that in disturbances which are most difficult to reach
 we can under certain conditions secure results which are second to none
 in the field of internal therapeutics.
 
 
 
 
 SEVENTEENTH LECTURE
 
 GENERAL THEORY OF THE NEUROSES
 
 _The Meaning of the Symptoms_
 
 
 In the last lecture I explained to you that clinical psychiatry concerns
 itself very little with the form under which the symptoms appear or with
 the burden they carry, but that it is precisely here that psychoanalysis
 steps in and shows that the symptom carries a meaning and is connected
 with the experience of the patient. The meaning of neurotic symptoms was
 first discovered by J. Breuer in the study and felicitous cure of a case
 of hysteria which has since become famous (1880-82). It is true that P.
 Janet independently reached the same result; literary priority must in
 fact be accorded to the French scholar, since Breuer published his
 observations more than a decade later (1893-95) during his period of
 collaboration with me. On the whole it may be of small importance to us
 who is responsible for this discovery, for you know that every discovery
 is made more than once, that none is made all at once, and that success
 is not meted out according to deserts. America is not named after
 Columbus. Before Breuer and Janet, the great psychiatrist Leuret
 expressed the opinion that even for the deliria of the insane, if we
 only understood how to interpret them, a meaning could be found. I
 confess that for a considerable period of time I was willing to estimate
 very highly the credit due to P. Janet in the explanation of neurotic
 symptoms, because he saw in them the expression of subconscious ideas
 (_ides inconscientes_) with which the patients were obsessed. But since
 then Janet has expressed himself most conservatively, as though he
 wanted to confess that the term "subconscious" had been for him nothing
 more than a mode of speech, a shift, "_une faon de parler_," by the use
 of which he had nothing definite in mind. I now no longer understand
 Janet's discussions, but I believe that he has needlessly deprived
 himself of high credit.
 
 The neurotic symptoms then have their meaning just like errors and the
 dream, and like these they are related to the lives of the persons in
 whom they appear. The importance of this insight into the nature of the
 symptom can best be brought home to you by way of examples. That it is
 borne out always and in all cases, I can only assert, not prove. He who
 gathers his own experience will be convinced of it. For certain reasons,
 however, I shall draw my instances not from hysteria, but from another
 fundamentally related and very curious neurosis concerning which I wish
 to say a few introductory words to you. This so-called compulsion
 neurosis is not so popular as the widely known hysteria; it is, if I may
 use the expression, not so noisily ostentatious, behaves more as a
 private concern of the patient, renounces bodily manifestations almost
 entirely and creates all its symptoms psychologically. Compulsion
 neurosis and hysteria are those forms of neurotic disease by the study
 of which psychoanalysis has been built up, and in whose treatment as
 well the therapy celebrates its triumphs. Of these the compulsion
 neurosis, which does not take that mysterious leap from the psychic to
 the physical, has through psychoanalytic research become more intimately
 comprehensible and transparent to us than hysteria, and we have come to
 understand that it reveals far more vividly certain extreme
 characteristics of the neuroses.
 
 The chief manifestations of compulsion neurosis are these: the patient
 is occupied by thoughts that in reality do not interest him, is moved by
 impulses that appear alien to him, and is impelled to actions which, to
 be sure, afford him no pleasure, but the performance of which he cannot
 possibly resist. The thoughts may be absurd in themselves or thoroughly
 indifferent to the individual, often they are absolutely childish and in
 all cases they are the result of strained thinking, which exhausts the
 patient, who surrenders himself to them most unwillingly. Against his
 will he is forced to brood and speculate as though it were a matter of
 life or death to him. The impulses, which the patient feels within
 himself, may also give a childish or ridiculous impression, but for the
 most part they bear the terrifying aspect of temptations to fearful
 crimes, so that the patient not only denies them, but flees from them in
 horror and protects himself from actual execution of his desires through
 inhibitory renunciations and restrictions upon his personal liberty. As
 a matter of fact he never, not a single time, carries any of these
 impulses into effect; the result is always that his evasion and
 precaution triumph. The patient really carries out only very harmless
 trivial acts, so-called compulsive acts, for the most part repetitions
 and ceremonious additions to the occupations of every-day life, through
 which its necessary performances--going to bed, washing, dressing,
 walking--become long-winded problems of almost insuperable difficulty.
 The abnormal ideas, impulses and actions are in nowise equally potent in
 individual forms and cases of compulsion neurosis; it is the rule,
 rather, that one or the other of these manifestations is the dominating
 factor and gives the name to the disease; that all these forms, however,
 have a great deal in common is quite undeniable.
 
 Surely this means violent suffering. I believe that the wildest
 psychiatric phantasy could not have succeeded in deriving anything
 comparable, and if one did not actually see it every day, one could
 hardly bring oneself to believe it. Do not think, however, that you give
 the patient any help when you coax him to divert himself, to put aside
 these stupid ideas and to set himself to something useful in the place
 of his whimsical occupations. This is just what he would like of his own
 accord, for he possesses all his senses, shares your opinion of his
 compulsion symptoms, in fact volunteers it quite readily. But he cannot
 do otherwise; whatever activities actually are released under compulsion
 neurosis are carried along by a driving energy, such as is probably
 never met with in normal psychic life. He has only one remedy--to
 transfer and change. In place of one stupid idea he can think of a
 somewhat milder absurdity, he can proceed from one precaution and
 prohibition to another, or carry through another ceremonial. He may
 shift, but he cannot annul the compulsion. One of the chief
 characteristics of the sickness is the instability of the symptoms; they
 can be shifted very far from their original form. It is moreover
 striking that the contrasts present in all psychological experience are
 so very sharply drawn in this condition. In addition to the compulsion
 of positive and negative content, an intellectual doubt makes itself
 felt that gradually attacks the most ordinary and assured certainties.
 All these things merge into steadily increasing uncertainty, lack of
 energy, curtailment of personal liberty, despite the fact that the
 patient suffering from compulsion neurosis is originally a most
 energetic character, often of extraordinary obstinacy, as a rule
 intellectually gifted above the average. For the most part he has
 attained a desirable stage of ethical development, is overconscientious
 and more than usually correct. You can imagine that it takes no
 inconsiderable piece of work to find one's way through this maze of
 contradictory characteristics and symptoms. Indeed, for the present our
 only object is to understand and to interpret some symptoms of this
 disease.
 
 Perhaps in reference to our previous discussions, you would like to know
 the position of present-day psychiatry to the problems of the compulsion
 neurosis. This is covered in a very slim chapter. Psychiatry gives names
 to the various forms of compulsion, but says nothing further concerning
 them. Instead it emphasizes the fact that those who show these symptoms
 are degenerates. That yields slight satisfaction, it is an ethical
 judgment, a condemnation rather than an explanation. We are led to
 suppose that it is in the unsound that all these peculiarities may be
 found. Now we do believe that persons who develop such symptoms must
 differ fundamentally from other people. But we would like to ask, are
 they more "degenerate" than other nervous patients, those suffering, for
 instance, from hysteria or other diseases of the mind? The
 characterization is obviously too general. One may even doubt whether it
 is at all justified, when one learns that such symptoms occur in
 excellent men and women of especially great and universally recognized
 ability. In general we glean very little intimate knowledge of the great
 men who serve us as models. This is due both to their own discretion and
 to the lying propensities of their biographers. Sometimes, however, a
 man is a fanatic disciple of truth, such as Emile Zola, and then we hear
 from him the strange compulsion habits from which he suffered all his
 life.[38]
 
 Psychiatry has resorted to the expedient of speaking of "superior
 degenerates." Very well--but through psychoanalysis we have learned that
 these peculiar compulsion symptoms may be permanently removed just like
 any other disease of normal persons. I myself have frequently succeeded
 in doing this.
 
 I will give you two examples only of the analysis of compulsion
 symptoms, one, an old observation, which cannot be replaced by anything
 more complete, and one a recent study. I am limiting myself to such a
 small number because in an account of this nature it is necessary to be
 very explicit and to enter into every detail.
 
 A lady about thirty years old suffered from the most severe compulsions.
 I might indeed have helped her if caprice of fortune had not destroyed
 my work--perhaps I will yet have occasion to tell you about it. In the
 course of each day the patient often executed, among others, the
 following strange compulsive act. She ran from her room into an
 adjoining one, placed herself in a definite spot beside a table which
 stood in the middle of the room, rang for her maid, gave her a trivial
 errand to do, or dismissed her without more ado, and then ran back
 again. This was certainly not a severe symptom of disease, but it still
 deserved to arouse curiosity. Its explanation was found, absolutely
 without any assistance on the part of the physician, in the very
 simplest way, a way to which no one can take exception. I hardly know
 how I alone could have guessed the meaning of this compulsive act, or
 have found any suggestion toward its interpretation. As often as I had
 asked the patient: "Why do you do this? Of what use is it?" she had
 answered, "I don't know." But one day after I had succeeded in
 surmounting a grave ethical doubt of hers she suddenly saw the light and
 related the history of the compulsive act. More than ten years prior she
 had married a man far older than herself, who had proved impotent on the
 bridal night. Countless times during the night he had run from his room
 to hers to repeat the attempt, but each time without success. In the
 morning he said angrily: "It is enough to make one ashamed before the
 maid who does the beds," and took a bottle of red ink that happened to
 be in the room, and poured its contents on the sheet, but not on the
 place where such a stain would have been justifiable. At first I did not
 understand the connection between this reminiscence and the compulsive
 act in question, for the only agreement I could find between them was in
 the running from one room into another,--possibly also in the appearance
 of the maid. Then the patient led me to the table in the second room and
 let me discover a large spot on the cover. She explained also that she
 placed herself at the table in such a way that the maid could not miss
 seeing the stain. Now it was no longer possible to doubt the intimate
 relation of the scene after her bridal night and her present compulsive
 act, but there were still a number of things to be learned about it.
 
 In the first place, it is obvious that the patient identifies herself
 with her husband, she is acting his part in her imitation of his running
 from one room into the other. We must then admit--if she holds to this
 role--that she replaces the bed and sheet by table and cover. This may
 seem arbitrary, but we have not studied dream symbolism in vain. In
 dreams also a table which must be interpreted as a bed, is frequently
 seen. "Bed and board" together represent married life, one may therefore
 easily be used to represent the other.
 
 The evidence that the compulsive act carries meaning would thus be
 plain; it appears as a representation, a repetition of the original
 significant scene. However, we are not forced to stop at this semblance
 of a solution; when we examine more closely the relation between these
 two people, we shall probably be enlightened concerning something of
 wider importance, namely, the purpose of the compulsive act. The nucleus
 of this purpose is evidently the summoning of the maid; to her she
 wishes to show the stain and refute her husband's remark: "It is enough
 to shame one before the maid." He--whose part she is playing--therefore
 feels no shame before the maid, hence the stain must be in the right
 place. So we see that she has not merely repeated the scene, rather she
 has amplified it, corrected it and "turned it to the good." Thereby,
 however, she also corrects something else,--the thing which was so
 embarrassing that night and necessitated the use of the red
 ink--impotence. The compulsive act then says: "No, it is not true, he
 did not have to be ashamed before the maid, he was not impotent." After
 the manner of a dream she represents the fulfillment of this wish in an
 overt action, she is ruled by the desire to help her husband over that
 unfortunate incident.
 
 Everything else that I could tell you about this case supports this clue
 more specifically; all that we otherwise know about her tends to
 strengthen this interpretation of a compulsive act incomprehensible in
 itself. For years the woman has lived separated from her husband and is
 struggling with the intention to obtain a legal divorce. But she is by
 no means free from him; she forces herself to remain faithful to him,
 she retires from the world to avoid temptation; in her imagination she
 excuses and idealizes him. The deepest secret of her malady is that by
 means of it she shields her husband from malicious gossip, justifies her
 separation from him, and renders possible for him a comfortable separate
 life. Thus the analysis of a harmless compulsive act leads to the very
 heart of this case and at the same time reveals no inconsiderable
 portion of the secret of the compulsion neurosis in general. I shall be
 glad to have you dwell upon this instance, as it combines conditions
 that one can scarcely demand in other cases. The interpretation of the
 symptoms was discovered by the patient herself in one flash, without the
 suggestion or interference of the analyst. It came about by the
 reference to an experience, which did not, as is usually the case,
 belong to the half-forgotten period of childhood, but to the mature life
 of the patient, in whose memory it had remained unobliterated. All the
 objections which critics ordinarily offer to our interpretation of
 symptoms fail in this case. Of course, we are not always so fortunate.
 
 And one thing more! Have you not observed how this insignificant
 compulsive act initiated us into the intimate life of the invalid? A
 woman can scarcely relate anything more intimate than the story of her
 bridal night, and is it without further significance that we just
 happened to come on the intimacies of her sexual life? It might of
 course be the result of the selection I have made in this instance. Let
 us not judge too quickly and turn our attention to the second instance,
 one of an entirely different kind, a sample of a frequently occurring
 variety, namely, the sleep ritual.
 
 A nineteen-year old, well-developed, gifted girl, an only child, who was
 superior to her parents in education and intellectual activity, had been
 wild and mischievous in her childhood, but has become very nervous
 during the last years without any apparent outward cause. She is
 especially irritable with her mother, always discontented, depressed,
 has a tendency toward indecision and doubt, and is finally forced to
 confess that she can no longer walk alone on public squares or wide
 thoroughfares. We shall not consider at length her complicated
 condition, which requires at least two diagnoses--agoraphobia and
 compulsion neurosis. We will dwell only upon the fact that this girl has
 also developed a sleep ritual, under which she allows her parents to
 suffer much discomfort. In a certain sense, we may say that every
 normal person has a sleep ritual, in other words that he insists on
 certain conditions, the absence of which hinders him from falling
 asleep; he has created certain observances by which he bridges the
 transition from waking to sleeping and these he repeats every evening in
 the same manner. But everything that the healthy person demands in order
 to obtain sleep is easily understandable and, above all, when external
 conditions necessitate a change, he adapts himself easily and without
 loss of time. But the pathological ritual is rigid, it persists by
 virtue of the greatest sacrifices, it also masks itself with a
 reasonable justification and seems, in the light of superficial
 observation, to differ from the normal only by exaggerated pedantry. But
 under closer observation we notice that the mask is transparent, for the
 ritual covers intentions that go far beyond this reasonable
 justification, and other intentions as well that are in direct
 contradiction to this reasonable justification. Our patient cites as the
 motive of her nightly precautions that she must have quiet in order to
 sleep; therefore she excludes all sources of noise. To accomplish this,
 she does two things: the large clock in her room is stopped, all other
 clocks are removed; not even the wrist watch on her night-table is
 suffered to remain. Flowerpots and vases are placed on her desk so that
 they cannot fall down during the night, and in breaking disturb her
 sleep. She knows that these precautions are scarcely justifiable for the
 sake of quiet; the ticking of the small watch could not be heard even if
 it should remain on the night-table, and moreover we all know that the
 regular ticking of a clock is conducive to sleep rather than disturbing.
 She does admit that there is not the least probability that flowerpots
 and vases left in place might of their own accord fall and break during
 the night. She drops the pretense of quiet for the other practice of
 this sleep ritual. She seems on the contrary to release a source of
 disturbing noises by the demand that the door between her own room and
 that of her parents remain half open, and she insures this condition by
 placing various objects in front of the open door. The most important
 observances concern the bed itself. The large pillow at the head of the
 bed may not touch the wooden back of the bed. The small pillow for her
 head must lie on the large pillow to form a rhomb; she then places her
 head exactly upon the diagonal of the rhomb. Before covering herself,
 the featherbed must be shaken so that its foot end becomes quite flat,
 but she never omits to press this down and redistribute the thickness.
 
 Allow me to pass over the other trivial incidents of this ritual; they
 would teach us nothing new and cause too great digression from our
 purpose. Do not overlook, however, the fact that all this does not run
 its course quite smoothly. Everything is pervaded by the anxiety that
 things have not been done properly; they must be examined, repeated. Her
 doubts seize first on one, then on another precaution, and the result is
 that one or two hours elapse during which the girl cannot and the
 intimidated parents dare not sleep.
 
 These torments were not so easily analyzed as the compulsive act of our
 former patient. In the working out of the interpretations I had to hint
 and suggest to the girl, and was met on her part either by positive
 denial or mocking doubt. This first reaction of denial, however, was
 followed by a time when she occupied herself of her own accord with the
 possibilities that had been suggested, noted the associations they
 called out, produced reminiscences, and established connections, until
 through her own efforts she had reached and accepted all
 interpretations. In so far as she did this, she desisted as well from
 the performance of her compulsive rules, and even before the treatment
 had ended she had given up the entire ritual. You must also know that
 the nature of present-day analysis by no means enables us to follow out
 each individual symptom until its meaning becomes clear. Rather it is
 necessary to abandon a given theme again and again, yet with the
 certainty that we will be led back to it in some other connection. The
 interpretation of the symptoms in this case, which I am about to give
 you, is a synthesis of results, which, with the interruptions of other
 work, needed weeks and months for their compilation.
 
 Our patient gradually learns to understand that she has banished clocks
 and watches from her room during the night because the clock is the
 symbol of the female genital. The clock, which we have learned to
 interpret as a symbol for other things also, receives this role of the
 genital organ through its relation to periodic occurrences at equal
 intervals. A woman may for instance be found to boast that her
 menstruation is as regular as clockwork. The special fear of our
 patient, however, was that the ticking of the clock would disturb her
 in her sleep. The ticking of the clock may be compared to the throbbing
 of the clitoris during sexual excitement. Frequently she had actually
 been awakened by this painful sensation and now this fear of an erection
 of the clitoris caused her to remove all ticking clocks during the
 night. Flowerpots and vases are, as are all vessels, also female
 symbols. The precaution, therefore, that they should not fall and break
 at night, was not without meaning. We know the widespread custom of
 breaking a plate or dish when an engagement is celebrated. The fragment
 of which each guest possesses himself symbolizes his renunciation of his
 claim to the bride, a renunciation which we may assume as based on the
 monogamous marriage law. Furthermore, to this part of her ceremonial our
 patient adds a reminiscence and several associations. As a child she had
 slipped once and fallen with a bowl of glass or clay, had cut her
 finger, and bled violently. As she grew up and learned the facts of
 sexual intercourse, she developed the fear that she might not bleed
 during her bridal night and so not prove to be a virgin. Her precaution
 against the breaking of vases was a rejection of the entire virginity
 complex, including the bleeding connected with the first cohabitation.
 She rejected both the fear to bleed and the contradictory fear not to
 bleed. Indeed her precautions had very little to do with a prevention of
 noise.
 
 One day she guessed the central idea of her ceremonial, when she
 suddenly understood her rule not to let the pillow come in contact with
 the bed. The pillows always had seemed a woman to her, the erect back of
 the bed a man. By means of magic, we may say, she wished to keep apart
 man and wife; it was her parents she wished to separate, so to prevent
 their marital intercourse. She had sought to attain the same end by more
 direct methods in earlier years, before the institution of her
 ceremonial. She had simulated fear or exploited a genuine timidity in
 order to keep open the door between the parents' bedroom and the
 nursery. This demand had been retained in her present ceremonial. Thus
 she had gained the opportunity of overhearing her parents, a proceeding
 which at one time subjected her to months of sleeplessness. Not content
 with this disturbance to her parents, she was at that time occasionally
 able to gain her point and sleep between father and mother in their
 very bed. Then "pillow" and "wooden wall" could really not come in
 contact. Finally when she became so big that her presence between the
 parents could not longer be borne comfortably, she consciously simulated
 fear and actually succeeded in changing places with her mother and
 taking her place at her father's side. This situation was undoubtedly
 the starting point for the phantasies, whose after-effects made
 themselves felt in her ritual.
 
 If a pillow represented a woman, then the shaking of the featherbed till
 all the feathers were lumped at one end, rounding it into a prominence,
 must have its meaning also. It meant the impregnation of the wife; the
 ceremonial, however, never failed to provide for the annulment, of this
 pregnancy by the flattening down of the feathers. Indeed, for years our
 patient had feared that the intercourse between her parents might result
 in another child which would be her rival. Now, where the large pillow
 represents a woman, the mother, then the small pillow could be nothing
 but the daughter. Why did this pillow have to be placed so as to form a
 rhomb; and why did the girl's head have to rest exactly upon the
 diagonal? It was easy to remind the patient that the rhomb on all walls
 is the rune used to represent the open female genital. She herself then
 played the part of the man, the father, and her head took the place of
 the male organ. (Cf. the symbol of beheading to represent castration.)
 
 Wild ideas, you will say, to run riot in the head of a virgin girl. I
 admit it, but do not forget that I have not created these ideas but
 merely interpreted them. A sleep ritual of this kind is itself very
 strange, and you cannot deny the correspondence between the ritual and
 the phantasies that yielded us the interpretation. For my part I am most
 anxious that you observe in this connection that no single phantasy was
 projected in the ceremonial, but a number of them had to be
 integrated,--they must have their nodal points somewhere in space.
 Observe also that the observance of the ritual reproduce the sexual
 desire now positively, now negatively, and serve in part as their
 rejection, again as their representation.
 
 It would be possible to make a better analysis of this ritual by
 relating it to other symptoms of the patient. But we cannot digress in
 that direction. Let the suggestion suffice that the girl is subject to
 an erotic attachment to her father, the beginning of which goes back to
 her earliest childhood. That perhaps is the reason for her unfriendly
 attitude toward her mother. Also we cannot escape the fact that the
 analysis of this symptom again points to the sexual life of the patient.
 The more we penetrate to the meaning and purpose of neurotic symptoms,
 the less surprising will this seem to us.
 
 By means of two selected illustrations I have demonstrated to you that
 neurotic symptoms carry just as much meaning as do errors and the dream,
 and that they are intimately connected with the experience of the
 patient. Can I expect you to believe this vitally significant statement
 on the strength of two examples? No. But can you expect me to cite
 further illustrations until you declare yourself convinced? That too is
 impossible, since considering the explicitness with which I treat each
 individual case, I would require a five-hour full semester course for
 the explanation of this one point in the theory of the neuroses. I must
 content myself then with having given you one proof for my assertion and
 refer you for the rest to the literature of the subject, above all to
 the classical interpretation of symptoms in Breuer's first case
 (hysteria) as well as to the striking clarification of obscure symptoms
 in the so-called dementia praecox by C. G. Jung, dating from the time
 when this scholar was still content to be a mere psychoanalyst--and did
 not yet want to be a prophet; and to all the articles that have
 subsequently appeared in our periodicals. It is precisely investigations
 of this sort which are plentiful. Psychoanalysts have felt themselves so
 much attracted by the analysis, interpretation and translation of
 neurotic symptoms, that by contrast they seem temporarily to have
 neglected other problems of neurosis.
 
 Whoever among you takes the trouble to look into the matter will
 undoubtedly be deeply impressed by the wealth of evidential material.
 But he will also encounter difficulties. We have learned that the
 meaning of a symptom is found in its relation to the experience of the
 patient. The more highly individualized the symptom is, the sooner we
 may hope to establish these relations. Therefore the task resolves
 itself specifically into the discovery for every nonsensical idea and
 useless action of a past situation wherein the idea had been justified
 and the action purposeful. A perfect example for this kind of symptom is
 the compulsive act of our patient who ran to the table and rang for the
 maid. But there are symptoms of a very different nature which are by no
 means rare. They must be called typical symptoms of the disease, for
 they are approximately alike in all cases, in which the individual
 differences disappear or shrivel to such an extent that it is difficult
 to connect them with the specific experiences of the patient and to
 relate them to the particular situations of his past. Let us again
 direct our attention to the compulsion neurosis. The sleep ritual of our
 second patient is already quite typical, but bears enough individual
 features to render possible what may be called an _historic_
 interpretation. But all compulsive patients tend to repeat, to isolate
 their actions from others and to subject them to a rhythmic sequence.
 Most of them wash too much. Agoraphobia (topophobia, fear of spaces), a
 malady which is no longer grouped with the compulsion neurosis, but is
 now called anxiety hysteria, invariably shows the same pathological
 picture; it repeats with exhausting monotony the same feature, the
 patient's fear of closed spaces, of large open squares, of long
 stretched streets and parkways, and their feeling of safety when
 acquaintances accompany them, when a carriage drives after them, etc. On
 this identical groundwork, however, the individual differences between
 the patients are superimposed--moods one might almost call them, which
 are sharply contrasted in the various cases. The one fears only narrow
 streets, the other only wide ones, the one can go out walking only when
 there are few people abroad, the other when there are many. Hysteria
 also, aside from its wealth of individual features, has a superfluity of
 common typical symptoms that appear to resist any facile historical
 methods of tracing them. But do not let us forget that it is by these
 typical symptoms that we get our bearings in reaching a diagnosis. When,
 in one case of hysteria we have finally traced back a typical symptom to
 an experience or a series of similar experiences, for instance followed
 back an hysterical vomiting to its origin in a succession of disgust
 impressions, another case of vomiting will confuse us by revealing an
 entirely different chain of experiences, seemingly just as effective. It
 seems almost as though hysterical patients must vomit for some reason as
 yet unknown, and that the historic factors, revealed by analysis, are
 chance pretexts, seized on as opportunity best offered to serve the
 purposes of a deeper need.
 
 Thus we soon reach the discouraging conclusion that although we can
 satisfactorily explain the individual neurotic symptom by relating it to
 an experience, our science fails us when it comes to the typical
 symptoms that occur far more frequently. In addition, remember that I am
 not going into all the detailed difficulties which come up in the course
 of resolutely hunting down an historic interpretation of the symptom. I
 have no intention of doing this, for though I want to keep nothing from
 you, and so paint everything in its true colors, I still do not wish to
 confuse and discourage you at the very outset of our studies. It is true
 that we have only begun to understand the interpretation of symptoms,
 but we wish to hold fast to the results we have achieved, and struggle
 forward step by step toward the mastery of the still unintelligible
 data. I therefore try to cheer you with the thought that a fundamental
 between the two kinds of symptoms can scarcely be assumed. Since the
 individual symptoms are so obviously dependent upon the experience of
 the patient, there is a possibility that the typical symptoms revert to
 an experience that is in itself typical and common to all humanity.
 Other regularly recurring features of neurosis, such as the repetition
 and doubt of the compulsion neurosis, may be universal reactions which
 are forced upon the patient by the very nature of the abnormal change.
 In short, we have no reason to be prematurely discouraged; we shall see
 what our further results will yield.
 
 We meet a very similar difficulty in the theory of dreams, which in our
 previous discussion of the dream I could not go into. The manifest
 content of dreams is most profuse and individually varied, and I have
 shown very explicitly what analysis may glean from this content. But
 side by side with these dreams there are others which may also be termed
 "typical" and which occur similarly in all people. These are dreams of
 identical content which offer the same difficulties for their
 interpretation as the typical symptom. They are the dreams of falling,
 flying, floating, swimming, of being hemmed in, of nakedness, and
 various other anxiety dreams that yield first one and then another
 interpretation for the different patients, without resulting in an
 explanation of their monotonous and typical recurrence. In the matter
 of these dreams also, we see a fundamental groundwork enriched by
 individual additions. Probably they as well can be fitted into the
 theory of dream life, built up on the basis of other dreams,--not
 however by straining the point, but by the gradual broadening of our
 views.
 
 
 
 
 EIGHTEENTH LECTURE
 
 GENERAL THEORY OF THE NEUROSES
 
 _Traumatic Fixation--The Unconscious_
 
 
 I said last time that we would not continue our work from the standpoint
 of our doubts, but on the basis of our results. We have not even touched
 upon two of the most interesting conclusions, derived equally from the
 same two sample analyses.
 
 In the first place, both patients give us the impression of being
 _fixated_ upon some very definite part of their past; they are unable to
 free themselves therefrom, and have therefore come to be completely
 estranged both from the present and the future. They are now isolated in
 their ailment, just as in earlier days people withdrew into monasteries
 there to carry along the burden of their unhappy fates. In the case of
 the first patient, it is her marriage with her husband, really
 abandoned, that has determined her lot. By means of her symptoms she
 continues to deal with her husband; we have learned to understand those
 voices which plead his case, which excuse him, exalt him, lament his
 loss. Although she is young and might be coveted by other men, she has
 seized upon all manner of real and imaginary (magic) precautions to
 safeguard her virtue for him. She will not appear before strangers, she
 neglects her personal appearance; furthermore, she cannot bring herself
 to get up readily from any chair on which she has been seated. She
 refuses to give her signature, and finally, since she is motivated by
 her desire not to let anyone have anything of hers, she is unable to
 give presents.
 
 In the case of the second patient, the young girl, it is an erotic
 attachment for her father that had established itself in the years prior
 to puberty, which plays the same role in her life. She also has arrived
 at the conclusion that she may not marry so long as she is sick. We may
 suspect she became ill in order that she need not marry, and that she
 might stay with her father.
 
 It is impossible to evade the question of how, in what manner, and
 driven by what motives, an individual may come by such a remarkable and
 unprofitable attitude toward life. Granted of course that this bearing
 is a general characteristic of neurosis, and not a special peculiarity
 of these two cases, it is nevertheless a general trait in every neurosis
 of very great importance in practice. Breuer's first hysterical patient
 was fixated in the same manner upon the time when she nursed her very
 sick father. In spite of her recuperation she has, in certain respects,
 since that time, been done with life; although she remained healthy and
 able, she did not enter on the normal life of women. In every one of our
 patients we may see, by the use of analysis, that in his
 disease-symptoms and their results he has gone back again into a
 definite period of his past. In the majority of cases he even chooses a
 very early phase of his life, sometime a childhood phase, indeed,
 laughable as it may appear, a phase of his very suckling existence.
 
 The closest analogies to these conditions of our neurotics are furnished
 by the types of sickness which the war has just now made so
 frequent--the so-called traumatic neuroses. Even before the war there
 were such cases after railroad collisions and other frightful
 occurrences which endangered life. The traumatic neuroses are,
 fundamentally, not the same as the spontaneous neuroses which we have
 been analysing and treating; moreover, we have not yet succeeded in
 bringing them within our hypotheses, and I hope to be able to make clear
 to you wherein this limitation lies. Yet on one point we may emphasize
 the existence of a complete agreement between the two forms. The
 traumatic neuroses show clear indications that they are grounded in a
 fixation upon the moment of the traumatic disaster. In their dreams
 these patients regularly live over the traumatic situation; where there
 are attacks of an hysterical type, which permit of an analysis, we learn
 that the attack approximates a complete transposition into this
 situation. It is as if these patients had not yet gotten through with
 the traumatic situation, as if it were actually before them as a task
 which was not yet mastered. We take this view of the matter in all
 seriousness; it shows the way to an _economic_ view of psychic
 occurrences. For the expression "traumatic" has no other than an
 economic meaning, and the disturbance permanently attacks the
 management of available energy. The traumatic experience is one which,
 in a very short space of time, is able to increase the strength of a
 given stimulus so enormously that its assimilation, or rather its
 elaboration, can no longer be effected by normal means.
 
 This analogy tempts us to classify as traumatic those experiences as
 well upon which our neurotics appear to be fixated. Thus the possibility
 is held out to us of having found a simple determining factor for the
 neurosis. It would then be comparable to a traumatic disease, and would
 arise from the inability to meet an overpowering emotional experience.
 As a matter of fact this reads like the first formula, by which Breuer
 and I, in 1893-1895, accounted theoretically for our new observations. A
 case such as that of our first patient, the young woman separated from
 her husband, is very well explained by this conception. She was not able
 to get over the unfeasibility of her marriage, and has not been able to
 extricate herself from this trauma. But our very next, that of the girl
 attached to her father, shows us that the formula is not sufficiently
 comprehensive. On the one hand, such baby love of a little girl for her
 father is so usual, and so often outlived that the designation
 "traumatic" would carry no significance; on the other hand, the history
 of the patient teaches us that this first erotic fixation apparently
 passed by harmlessly at the time, and did not again appear until many
 years later in the symptoms of the compulsion neurosis. We see
 complications before us, the existence of a greater wealth of
 determining factors in the disease, but we also suspect that the
 traumatic viewpoint will not have to be given up as wrong; rather it
 will have to subordinate itself when it is fitted into a different
 context.
 
 Here again we must leave the road we have been traveling. For the time
 being, it leads us no further and we have many other things to find out
 before we can go on again. But before we leave this subject let us note
 that the fixation on some particular phase of the past has bearings
 which extend far beyond the neurosis. Every neurosis contains such a
 fixation, but every fixation does not lead to a neurosis, nor fall into
 the same class with neuroses, nor even set the conditions for the
 development of a neurosis. Mourning is a type of emotional fixation on a
 theory of the past, which also brings with it the most complete
 alienation from the present and the future. But mourning is sharply
 distinguished from neuroses that may be designated as pathological forms
 of mourning.
 
 It also happens that men are brought to complete deadlock by a traumatic
 experience that has so completely shaken the foundations on which they
 have built their lives that they give up all interest in the present and
 future, and become completely absorbed in their retrospections; but
 these unhappy persons are not necessarily neurotic. We must not
 overestimate this one feature as a diagnostic for a neurosis, no matter
 how invariable and potent it may be.
 
 Now let us turn to the second conclusion of our analysis, which however
 we will hardly need to limit subsequently. We have spoken of the
 senseless compulsive activities of our first patient, and what intimate
 memories she disclosed as belonging to them; later we also investigated
 the connection between experience and symptom and thus discovered the
 purpose hidden behind the compulsive activity. But we have entirely
 omitted one factor that deserves our whole attention. As long as the
 patient kept repeating the compulsive activity she did not know that it
 was in any way related with the experience in question. The connection
 between the two was hidden from her, she truthfully answered that she
 did not know what compelled her to do this. Once, suddenly, under the
 influence of the cure, she hit upon the connection and was able to tell
 it to us. But still she did not know of the end in the service of which
 she performed the compulsive activities, the purpose to correct a
 painful part of the past and to place the husband, still loved by her,
 upon a higher level. It took quite a long time and a great deal of
 trouble for her to grasp and admit to me that such a motive alone could
 have been the motive force of the compulsive activity.
 
 The relation between the scene after the unhappy bridal night and the
 tender motive of the patient yield what we have called the meaning of
 the compulsive activity. But both the "whence" and the "why" remained
 hidden from her as long as she continued to carry out the compulsive
 act. Psychological processes had been going on within her for which the
 compulsive act found an expression. She could, in a normal frame of
 mind, observe their effect, but none of the psychological antecedents
 of her action had come to the knowledge of her consciousness. She had
 acted in just the same manner as a hypnotized person to whom Bernheim
 had given the injunction that five minutes after his awakening in the
 ward he was to open an umbrella, and he had carried out this order on
 awakening, but could give no motive for his so doing. We have exactly
 such facts in mind when we speak of the existence of _unconscious
 psychological processes_. Let anyone in the world account for these
 facts in a more correct scientific manner, and we will gladly withdraw
 completely our assumption of unconscious psychological processes. Until
 then, however, we shall continue to use this assumption, and when anyone
 wants to bring forward the objection that the unconscious can have no
 reality for science and is a mere makeshift, (_une faon de parler_), we
 must simply shrug our shoulders and reject his incomprehensible
 statement resignedly. A strange unreality which can call out such real
 and palpable effects as a compulsion symptom!
 
 In our second patient we meet with fundamentally the same thing. She had
 created a decree which she must follow: the pillow must not touch the
 head of the bed; yet she does not know how it originated, what its
 meaning is, nor to what motive it owes the source of its power. It is
 immaterial whether she looks upon it with indifference or struggles
 against it, storms against it, determines to overcome it. She must
 nevertheless follow it and carry out its ordinance, though she asks
 herself, in vain, why. One must admit that these symptoms of compulsion
 neurosis offer the clearest evidence for a special sphere of
 psychological activity, cut off from the rest. What else could be back
 of these images and impulses, which appear from one knows not where,
 which have such great resistance to all the influences of an otherwise
 normal psychic life; which give the patient himself the impression that
 here are super-powerful guests from another world, immortals mixing in
 the affairs of mortals. Neurotic symptoms lead unmistakably to a
 conviction of the existence of an unconscious psychology, and for that
 very reason clinical psychiatry, which recognizes only a conscious
 psychology, has no explanation other than that they are present as
 indications of a particular kind of degeneration. To be sure, the
 compulsive images and impulses are not themselves unconscious--no more
 so than the carrying out of the compulsive-acts escapes conscious
 observation. They would not have been symptoms had they not penetrated
 through into consciousness. But their psychological antecedents as
 disclosed by the analysis, the associations into which we place them by
 our interpretations, are unconscious, at least until we have made them
 known to the patient during the course of the analysis.
 
 Consider now, in addition, that the facts established in our two cases
 are confirmed in all the symptoms of all neurotic diseases, that always
 and everywhere the meaning of the symptoms is unknown to the sufferer,
 that analysis shows without fail that these symptoms are derivatives of
 unconscious experiences which can, under various favorable conditions,
 become conscious. You will understand then that in psychoanalysis we
 cannot do without this unconscious psyche, and are accustomed to deal
 with it as with something tangible. Perhaps you will also be able to
 understand how those who know the unconscious only as an idea, who have
 never analyzed, never interpreted dreams, or never translated neurotic
 symptoms into meaning and purpose, are most ill-suited to pass an
 opinion on this subject. Let us express our point of view once more. Our
 ability to give meaning to neurotic symptoms by means of analytic
 interpretation is an irrefutable indication of the existence of
 unconscious psychological processes--or, if you prefer, an irrefutable
 proof of the necessity for their assumption.
 
 But that is not all. Thanks to a second discovery of Breuer's, for which
 he alone deserves credit and which appears to me to be even more
 far-reaching, we are able to learn still more concerning the
 relationship between the unconscious and the neurotic symptom. Not alone
 is the meaning of the symptoms invariably hidden in the unconscious; but
 the very existence of the symptom is conditioned by its relation to this
 unconscious. You will soon understand me. With Breuer I maintain the
 following: Every time we hit upon a symptom we may conclude that the
 patient cherishes definite unconscious experiences which withhold the
 meaning of the symptoms. Vice versa, in order that the symptoms may come
 into being, it is also essential that this meaning be unconscious.
 Symptoms are not built up out of conscious experiences; as soon as the
 unconscious processes in question become conscious, the symptom
 disappears. You will at once recognize here the approach to our therapy,
 a way to make symptoms disappear. It was by these means that Breuer
 actually achieved the recovery of his patient, that is, freed her of her
 symptoms; he found a technique for bringing into her consciousness the
 unconscious experiences that carried the meaning of her symptoms, and
 the symptoms disappeared.
 
 This discovery of Breuer's was not the result of a speculation, but of a
 felicitous observation made possible by the coperation of the patient.
 You should therefore not trouble yourself to find things you already
 know to which you can compare these occurrences, rather you should
 recognize herein a new fundamental fact which in itself is capable of
 much wider application. Toward this further end permit me to go over
 this ground again in a different way.
 
 The symptom develops as a substitution for something else that has
 remained suppressed. Certain psychological experiences should normally
 have become so far elaborated that consciousness would have attained
 knowledge of them. This did not take place, however, but out of these
 interrupted and disturbed processes, imprisoned in the unconscious, the
 symptom arose. That is to say, something in the nature of an interchange
 had been effected; as often as therapeutic measures are successful in
 again reversing this transposition, psychoanalytic therapy solves the
 problem of the neurotic symptom.
 
 Accordingly, Breuer's discovery still remains the foundation of
 psychoanalytic therapy. The assertion that the symptoms disappear when
 one has made their unconscious connections conscious, has been borne out
 by all subsequent research, although the most extraordinary and
 unexpected complications have been met with in its practical execution.
 Our therapy does its work by means of changing the unconscious into the
 conscious, and is effective only in so far as it has the opportunity of
 bringing about this transformation.
 
 Now we shall make a hasty digression so that you do not by any chance
 imagine that this therapeutic work is too easy. From all we have learned
 so far, the neurosis would appear as the result of a sort of ignorance,
 the incognizance of psychological processes that we should know of. We
 would thus very closely approximate the well-known Socratic teachings,
 according to which evil itself is the result of ignorance. Now the
 experienced physician will, as a rule, discover fairly readily what
 psychic impulses in his several patients have remained unconscious.
 Accordingly it would seem easy for him to cure the patient by imparting
 this knowledge to him and freeing him of his ignorance. At least the
 part played by the unconscious meaning of the symptoms could easily be
 discovered in this manner, and it would only be in dealing with the
 relationship of the symptoms to the experiences of the patient that the
 physician would be handicapped. In the face of these experiences, of
 course, he is the ignorant one of the two, for he did not go through
 these experiences, and must wait until the patient remembers them and
 tells them to him. But in many cases this difficulty could be readily
 overcome. One can question the relatives of the patient concerning these
 experiences, and they will often be in a position to point out those
 that carry any traumatic significance; they may even be able to inform
 the analyst of experiences of which the patient knows nothing because
 they occurred in the very early years of his life. By a combination of
 such means it would seem that the pathogenic ignorance of the patient
 could be cleared up in a short time and without much trouble.
 
 If only that were all! We have made discoveries for which we were at
 first unprepared. Knowing and knowing is not always the same thing;
 there are various kinds of knowing that are psychologically by no means
 comparable. "_Il y a fagots et fagots_,"[39] as Molire says. The
 knowledge of the physician is not the same as that of the patient and
 cannot bring about the same results. The physician can gain no results
 by transferring his knowledge to the patient in so many words. This is
 perhaps putting it incorrectly, for though the transference does not
 result in dissolving the symptoms, it does set the analysis in motion,
 and calls out an energetic denial, the first sign usually that this has
 taken place. The patient has learned something that he did not know up
 to that time, the meaning of his symptoms, and yet he knows it as little
 as before. So we discover there is more than one kind of ignorance. It
 will require a deepening of our psychological insight to make clear to
 us wherein the difference lies. But our assertion nevertheless remains
 true that the symptoms disappear with the knowledge of their meaning.
 For there is only one limiting condition; the knowledge must be founded
 on an inner change in the patient which can be attained only through
 psychic labors directed toward a definite end. We have here been
 confronted by problems which will soon lead us to the elaboration of a
 dynamics of symptom formation.
 
 I must stop to ask you whether this is not all too vague and too
 complicated? Do I not confuse you by so often retracting my words and
 restricting them, spinning out trains of thought and then rejecting
 them? I should be sorry if this were the case. However, I strongly
 dislike simplification at the expense of truth, and am not averse to
 having you receive the full impression of how many-sided and complicated
 the subject is. I also think that there is no harm done if I say more on
 every point than you can at the moment make use of. I know that every
 hearer and reader arranges what is offered him in his own thoughts,
 shortens it, simplifies it and extracts what he wishes to retain. Within
 a given measure it is true that the more we begin with the more we have
 left. Let me hope that, despite all the by-play, you have clearly
 grasped the essential parts of my remarks, those about the meaning of
 symptoms, about the unconscious, and the relation between the two. You
 probably have also understood that our further efforts are to take two
 directions: first, the clinical problem--to discover how persons become
 sick, how they later on accomplish a neurotic adaptation toward life;
 secondly, a problem of psychic dynamics, the evolution of the neurotic
 symptoms themselves from the prerequisites of the neuroses. We will
 undoubtedly somewhere come on a point of contact for these two problems.
 
 I do not wish to go any further to-day, but since our time is not yet up
 I intend to call your attention to another characteristic of our two
 analyses, namely, the memory gaps or amnesias, whose full appreciation
 will be possible later. You have heard that it is possible to express
 the object of psychoanalytic treatment in a formula: all pathogenic
 unconscious experience must be transposed into consciousness. You will
 perhaps be surprised to learn that this formula can be replaced by
 another: all the memory gaps of the patient must be filled out, his
 amnesias must be abolished. Practically this amounts to the same thing.
 Therefore an important role in the development of his symptoms must be
 accredited to the amnesias of the neurotic. The analysis of our first
 case, however, will hardly justify this valuation of the amnesia. The
 patient has not forgotten the scene from which the compulsion act
 derives--on the contrary, she remembers it vividly, nor is there any
 other forgotten factor which comes into play in the development of these
 symptoms. Less clear, but entirely analogous, is the situation in the
 case of our second patient, the girl with the compulsive ritual. She,
 too, has not really forgotten the behavior of her early years, the fact
 that she insisted that the door between her bedroom and that of her
 parents be kept open, and that she banished her mother out of her place
 in her parents' bed. She recalls all this very clearly, although
 hesitatingly and unwillingly. Only one factor stands out strikingly in
 our first case, that though the patient carries out her compulsive act
 innumerable times, she is not once reminded of its similarity with the
 experience after the bridal-night; nor was this memory even suggested
 when by direct questions she was asked to search for its motivation. The
 same is true of the girl, for in her case not only her ritual, but the
 situation which provoked it, is repeated identically night after night.
 In neither case is there any actual amnesia, no lapse of memory, but an
 association is broken off which should have called out a reproduction, a
 revival in the memory. Such a disturbance is enough to bring on a
 compulsion neurosis. Hysteria, however, shows a different picture, for
 it is usually characterized by most grandiose amnesias. As a rule, in
 the analysis of each hysterical symptom, one is led back to a whole
 chain of impressions which, upon their recovery, are expressly
 designated as forgotten up to the moment. On the one hand this chain
 extends back to the earliest years of life, so that the hysterical
 amnesias may be regarded as the direct continuation of the infantile
 amnesias, which hides the beginnings of our psychic life from those of
 us who are normal. On the other hand, we discover with surprise that the
 most recent experiences of the patient are blurred by these losses of
 memory--that especially the provocations which favored or brought on the
 illness are, if not entirely wiped out by the amnesia, at least
 partially obliterated. Without fail important details have disappeared
 from the general picture of such a recent memory, or are placed by false
 memories. Indeed it happens almost regularly that just before the
 completion of an analysis, certain memories of recent experiences
 suddenly come to light. They had been held back all this time, and had
 left noticeable gaps in the context.
 
 We have pointed out that such a crippling of the ability to recall is
 characteristic of hysteria. In hysteria symptomatic conditions also
 arise (hysterical attacks) which need leave no trace in the memory. If
 these things do not occur in compulsion-neuroses, you are justified in
 concluding that these amnesias exhibit psychological characteristics of
 the hysterical change, and not a general trait of the neuroses. The
 significance of this difference will be more closely limited by the
 following observations. We have combined two things as the meaning of a
 symptom, its "whence," on the one hand, and its "whither" or "why," on
 the other. By these we mean to indicate the impressions and experiences
 whence the symptom arises, and the purpose the symptom serves. The
 "whence" of a symptom is traced back to impressions which have come from
 without, which have therefore necessarily been conscious at some time,
 but which may have sunk into the unconscious--that is, have been
 forgotten. The "why" of the symptom, its tendency, is in every case an
 endopsychic process, developed from within, which may or may not have
 become conscious at first, but could just as readily never have entered
 consciousness at all and have been unconscious from its inception. It
 is, after all, not so very significant that, as happens in the
 hysterias, amnesia has covered over the "whence" of the symptom, the
 experience upon which it is based; for it is the "why," the tendency of
 the symptom, which establishes its dependence on the unconscious, and
 indeed no less so in the compulsion neuroses than in hysteria. In both
 cases the "why" may have been unconscious from the very first.
 
 By thus bringing into prominence the unconscious in psychic life, we
 have raised the most evil spirits of criticism against psychoanalysis.
 Do not be surprised at this, and do not believe that the opposition is
 directed only against the difficulties offered by the conception of the
 unconscious or against the relative inaccessibility of the experiences
 which represent it. I believe it comes from another source. Humanity, in
 the course of time, has had to endure from the hands of science two
 great outrages against its naive self-love. The first was when humanity
 discovered that our earth was not the center of the universe, but only
 a tiny speck in a world-system hardly conceivable in its magnitude. This
 is associated in our minds with the name "Copernicus," although
 Alexandrian science had taught much the same thing. The second occurred
 when biological research robbed man of his apparent superiority under
 special creation, and rebuked him with his descent from the animal
 kingdom, and his ineradicable animal nature. This re-valuation, under
 the influence of Charles Darwin, Wallace and their predecessors, was not
 accomplished without the most violent opposition of their
 contemporaries. But the third and most irritating insult is flung at the
 human mania of greatness by present-day psychological research, which
 wants to prove to the "I" that it is not even master in its own home,
 but is dependent upon the most scanty information concerning all that
 goes on unconsciously in its psychic life. We psychoanalysts were
 neither the first, nor the only ones to announce this admonition to look
 within ourselves. It appears that we are fated to represent it most
 insistently and to confirm it by means of empirical data which are of
 importance to every single person. This is the reason for the widespread
 revolt against our science, the omission of all considerations of
 academic urbanity, and emancipation of the opposition from all
 restraints of impartial logic. We were compelled to disturb the peace of
 the world, in addition, in another manner, of which you will soon come
 to know.
 
 
 
 
 NINETEENTH LECTURE
 
 GENERAL THEORY OF THE NEUROSES
 
 _Resistance and Suppression_
 
 
 In order to progress in our understanding of the neuroses, we need new
 experiences and we are about to obtain two. Both are very remarkable and
 were at the time of their discovery, very surprising. You are, of
 course, prepared for both from our discussions of the past semester.
 
 In the first place: When we undertake to cure a patient, to free him
 from the symptoms of his malady, he confronts us with a vigorous,
 tenacious resistance that lasts during the whole time of the treatment.
 That is so peculiar a fact that we cannot expect much credence for it.
 The best thing is not to mention this fact to the patient's relatives,
 for they never think of it otherwise than as a subterfuge on our part in
 order to excuse the length or the failure of our treatment. The patient,
 moreover, produces all the phenomena of this resistance without even
 recognizing it as such; it is always a great advance to have brought him
 to the point of understanding this conception and reckoning with it.
 Just consider, this patient suffers from his symptoms and causes those
 about him to suffer with him. He is willing, moreover, to take upon
 himself so many sacrifices of time, money, effort and self-denial in
 order to be freed. And yet he struggles, in the very interests of his
 malady, against one who would help him. How improbable this assertion
 must sound! And yet it is so, and if we are reproached with its
 improbability, we need only answer that this fact is not without its
 analogies. Whoever goes to a dentist with an unbearable toothache may
 very well find himself thrusting away the dentist's arm when the man
 makes for his sick tooth with a pair of pincers.
 
 The resistance which the patient shows is highly varied, exceedingly
 subtle, often difficult to recognize, Protean-like in its manifold
 changes of form. It means that the doctor must become suspicious and be
 constantly on his guard against the patient. In psychoanalytic therapy
 we make use, as you know, of that technique which is already familiar to
 you from the interpretation of dreams. We tell the patient that without
 further reflection he should put himself into a condition of calm
 self-observation and that he must then communicate whatever results this
 introspection gives him--feelings, thoughts, reminiscences, in the order
 in which they appear to his mind. At the same time, we warn him
 expressly against yielding to any motive which would induce him to
 choose or exclude any of his thoughts as they arise, in whatever way the
 motive may be couched and however it may excuse him from telling us the
 thought: "that is too unpleasant," or "too indiscreet" for him to tell;
 or "it is too unimportant," or "it does not belong here," "it is
 nonsensical." We impress upon him the fact that he must skim only across
 the surface of his consciousness and must drop the last vestige of a
 critical attitude toward that which he finds. We finally inform him that
 the result of the treatment and above all its length is dependent on the
 conscientiousness with which he follows this basic rule of the analytic
 technique. We know, in fact, from the technique of interpreting dreams,
 that of all the random notions which may occur, those against which such
 doubts are raised are invariably the ones to yield the material which
 leads to the uncovering of the unconscious.
 
 The first reaction we call out by laying down this basic technical rule
 is that the patient directs his entire resistance against it. The
 patient tries in every way to escape its requirements. First he will
 declare that he cannot think of anything, then, that so much comes to
 his mind that it is impossible to seize on anything definite. Then we
 discover with no slight displeasure that he has yielded to this or that
 critical objection, for he betrays himself by the long pauses which he
 allows to occur in his speaking. He then confesses that he really cannot
 bring himself to this, that he is ashamed to; he prefers to let this
 motive get the upper hand over his promise. He may say that he did think
 of something but that it concerns someone else and is for that reason
 exempt. Or he says that what he just thought of is really too trivial,
 too stupid and too foolish. I surely could not have meant that he should
 take such thoughts into account. Thus it goes on, with untold
 variations, in the face of which we continually reiterate that "telling
 everything" really means telling everything.
 
 One can scarcely find a patient who does not make the attempt to reserve
 some province for himself against the intrusion of the analysis. One
 patient, whom I must reckon among the most highly intelligent, thus
 concealed an intimate love relation for weeks; and when he was asked to
 explain this infringement of our inviolable rule, he defended his action
 with the argument that he considered this one thing was his private
 affair. Naturally, analytic treatment cannot countenance such right of
 sanctuary. One might as well try in a city like Vienna to allow an
 exception to be made of great public squares like the Hohe Markt or the
 Stephans Platz and say that no one should be arrested in those
 places--and then attempt to round up some particular wrong-doer. He will
 be found nowhere but in those sanctuaries. I once brought myself around
 to permit such an exception in the case of a man on whose capacity for
 work a great deal depended, and who was bound by his oath of service,
 which forbade him to tell anyone of certain things. To be sure, he was
 satisfied with the results--but not I; I resolved never to repeat such
 an attempt under these conditions.
 
 Compulsion neurotics are exceedingly adept at making this technical rule
 almost useless by bringing to bear all their over-conscientiousness and
 their doubts upon it. Patients suffering from anxiety-hysteria sometimes
 succeed in reducing it to absurdity by producing only notions so remote
 from the thing sought for that analysis is quite unprofitable. But it is
 not my intention to go into the way in which these technical
 difficulties may be met. It is enough to know that finally, by means of
 resolution and perseverance, we do succeed in wresting a certain amount
 of obedience from the patient toward this basic rule of the technique;
 the resistance then makes itself felt in other ways. It appears in the
 form of an intellectual resistance, battles by means of arguments, and
 makes use of all difficulties and improbabilities which a normal yet
 uninstructed thinking is bound to find in the theory of analysis. Then
 we hear from one voice alone the same criticisms and objections which
 thunder about us in mighty chorus in the scientific literature.
 Therefore the critics who shout to us from outside cannot tell us
 anything new. It is a veritable tempest in a teapot. Still the patient
 can be argued with, he is anxious to persuade us to instruct him, to
 teach him, to lead him to the literature, so that he may continue
 working things out for himself. He is very ready to become an adherent
 of psychoanalysis on condition that analysis spare him personally. But
 we recognize this curiosity as a resistance, as a diversion from our
 special objects, and we meet it accordingly. In those patients who
 suffer from compulsion neuroses, we must expect the resistance to
 display special tactics. They frequently allow the analysis to take its
 way, so that it may succeed in throwing more and more light on the
 problems of the case, but we finally begin to wonder how it is that this
 clearing up brings with it no practical progress, no diminution of the
 symptom. Then we may discover that the resistance has entrenched itself
 in the doubts of the compulsion neurosis itself and in this position is
 able successfully to resist our efforts. The patient has said something
 like this to himself: "This is all very nice and interesting. And I
 would be glad to continue it. It would affect my malady considerably if
 it were true. But I don't believe that it is true and as long as I don't
 believe it, it has nothing to do with my sickness." And so it may go on
 for a long time until one finally has shaken this position itself; it is
 then that the decisive battle takes place.
 
 The intellectual resistances are not the worst, one can always get ahead
 of them. But the patient can also put up resistances, within the limits
 of the analysis, whose conquest belongs to the most difficult tasks of
 our technique. Instead of recalling, he actually goes again through the
 attitudes and emotions of his previous life which, by means of the
 so-called "transference," can be utilized as resistances to the
 physician and the treatment. If the patient is a man, he takes this
 material as a rule from his relations to his father, in whose place he
 now puts the physician, and in so doing constructs a resistance out of
 his struggle for independence of person and opinion; out of his ambition
 to equal or to excel his father; out of his unwillingness to assume the
 burden of gratitude a second time in his life. For long times at a
 stretch one receives the impression that the patient desires to put the
 physician in the wrong and to let him feel his helplessness by
 triumphing over him, and that this desire has completely replaced his
 better intention of making an end to his sickness. Women are adepts at
 exploiting, for the purposes of the resistance, a tender, erotically
 tinged transference to the physician. When this leaning attains a
 certain intensity, all interest for the actual situation of the
 treatment is lost, together with every sense of the responsibility which
 was assumed by undertaking it. The never-failing jealousy as well as the
 embitterment over the inevitable repudiation, however gently effected,
 all must serve to spoil the personal understanding between patient and
 physician and thus to throw out one of the most powerful propelling
 forces of the analysis.
 
 Resistances of this sort must not be narrow-mindedly condemned. They
 contain so much of the most important material of the patient's past and
 reproduce it in such a convincing manner, that they become of the
 greatest aid to the analysis, if a skillful technique is able to turn
 them in the right direction. It is only remarkable that this material is
 at first always in the service of the resistance, for which it serves as
 a barrier against the treatment. One can also say that here are traits
 of character, adjustments of the ego which were mobilized in order to
 defeat the attempted change. We are thus able to learn how these traits
 arose under the conditions of the neurosis, as a reaction to its
 demands, and to see features more clearly in this character which could
 otherwise not have shown up so clearly or at least not to this extent,
 and which one may therefore designate as latent. You must also not get
 the impression that we see an unforeseen endangering of the analytic
 influence in the appearance of these resistances. On the contrary, we
 know that these resistances must come to light; we are dissatisfied only
 when we do not provoke them in their full strength and so make them
 plain to the patient Indeed, we at last understand that overcoming these
 resistances is the essential achievement of analysis and is that portion
 of the work which alone assures us that we have accomplished something
 with the patient.
 
 You must also take into account the fact that any accidental occurrences
 which arise during the treatment will be made use of by the patient as a
 disturbance--every diverting incident, every statement about analysis
 from an inimical authority in his circle, any chance illness or any
 organic affection which complicates the neurosis; indeed, he even uses
 every improvement of his condition as a motive for abating his efforts.
 You will then have gained an approximate, though still an incomplete
 picture of the forms and devices of the resistance which must be met
 and overcome in the course of every analysis. I have given this point
 such detailed consideration because I am about to inform you that our
 dynamic conception of the neurosis is based on this experience with the
 resistance of neurotic patients against the banishment of their
 symptoms. Breuer and I both originally practiced psycho-therapy by means
 of hypnosis. Breuer's first patient was treated throughout under a
 condition of hypnotic suggestibility, and I at first followed his
 example. I admit that my work at that time progressed easily and
 agreeably and also took much less time. But the results were capricious
 and not permanent; therefore I finally gave up hypnotism. Then only did
 I realize that no insight into the forces which produce these diseases
 was possible as long as one used hypnotism. The condition of hypnosis
 could prevent the physician from realizing the existence of a
 resistance. Hypnosis drives back the resistance and frees a certain
 field for the work of analysis, but similarly to the doubt in the
 compulsion neurosis, in so doing it clogs the boundaries of this field
 till they become impenetrable. That is why I can say that true
 psychoanalysis began when the help of hypnotism was renounced.
 
 But if the establishment of the resistance thus becomes a matter of such
 importance, then surely we must give our caution full rein, and follow
 up any doubts as to whether we are not all too ready in our assumption
 of their existence. Perhaps there really are neurotic cases in which
 associations appear for other reasons, perhaps the arguments against our
 hypothesis really deserve more consideration and we are unjustified in
 conveniently rejecting all intellectual criticisms of analysis as a
 resistance. Indeed, ladies and gentlemen, but our judgment was by no
 means readily arrived at. We had opportunity to observe every critical
 patient from the first sign of the resistance till after its
 disappearance. In the course of the treatment, the resistance is
 moreover constantly changing in intensity. It is always on the increase
 as we approach a new theme, is strongest at the height of its
 elaboration, and dies down again when this theme has been abandoned.
 Furthermore, unless we have made some unusual and awkward technical
 error, we never have to deal with the full measure of resistance of
 which the patient is capable. We could therefore convince ourselves that
 the same man took up and discarded his critical attitude innumerable
 times in the course of the analysis. Whenever we are on the point of
 bringing before his consciousness some piece of unconscious material
 which is especially painful to him, then he is critical in the extreme.
 Even though he had previously understood and accepted a great deal,
 nevertheless all record of these gains seems now to have been wiped out.
 He may, in his desire to resist at any cost, present a picture of
 veritable emotional feeblemindedness. If one succeeds in helping him to
 overcome this new resistance, then he regains his insight and his
 understanding. Thus his criticism is not an independent function to be
 respected as such; it plays the role of handy-man to his emotional
 attitude and is guided by his resistance. If something displeases him,
 he can defend himself against it very ingeniously and appear most
 critical. But if something strikes his fancy, then he may show himself
 easily convinced. Perhaps none of us are very different, and the patient
 under analysis shows this dependence of the intellect on the emotional
 life so plainly only because, under the analysis, he is so hard pressed.
 
 In what way shall we now account for the observation that the patient so
 energetically resists our attempts to rid him of his symptoms and to
 make his psychic processes function in a normal way? We tell ourselves
 that we have here come up against strong forces which oppose any change
 in the condition; furthermore, that these forces must be identical with
 those which originally brought about the condition. Some process must
 have been functional in the building up of these symptoms, a process
 which we can now reconstruct by means of our experiences in solving the
 meaning of the symptoms. We already know from Breuer's observations that
 the existence of a symptom presupposes that some psychic process was not
 carried to its normal conclusion, so that it could not become conscious.
 The symptom is the substitute for that which did not take place. Now we
 know where the forces whose existence we suspect must operate. Some
 violent antagonism must have been aroused to prevent the psychic process
 in question from reaching consciousness, and it therefore remained
 unconscious. As an unconscious thought it had the power to create a
 symptom. The same struggle during the analytic treatment opposes anew
 the efforts to carry this unconscious thought over into consciousness.
 This process we felt as a resistance. That pathogenic process which is
 made evident to us through the resistance, we will name _repression_.
 
 We are now ready to obtain a more definite idea of this process of
 repression. It is the preliminary condition for the formation of
 symptoms; it is also a thing for which we have no parallel. If we take
 as prototype an impulse, a psychological process which is striving to
 convert itself into action, we know that it may succumb before a
 rejection, which we call "repudiation" or "condemnation." In the course
 of this struggle, the energy which the impulse had at its disposal was
 withdrawn from it, it becomes powerless; yet it may subsist in the form
 of a memory. The whole process of decision occurs with the full
 knowledge of the ego. The state of affairs is very different if we
 imagine that this same impulse has been subjected to repression. In that
 case, it would retain its energy and there would be no memory of it
 left; in addition, the process of repression would be carried out
 without the knowledge of the ego. Through this comparison, however, we
 have come no nearer understanding the nature of repression.
 
 I now go into the theoretical ideas which alone have shown themselves
 useful in making the conception of repression more definite. It is above
 all necessary that we progress from a purely descriptive meaning of the
 word "unconscious" to its more systematic meaning; that is, we come to a
 point where we must call the consciousness or unconsciousness of a
 psychic process only one of its attributes, an attribute which is,
 moreover, not necessarily unequivocal. If such a process remained
 unconscious, then this separation from consciousness is perhaps only an
 indication of the fate to which it has submitted and not this fate
 itself. To bring this home to us more vividly, let us assume that every
 psychological process--with one exception, which I will go into
 later--first exists in an unconscious state or phase and only goes over
 from this into a conscious phase, much as a photographic picture is
 first a negative and then becomes a picture by being printed. But not
 every negative need become a positive, and just as little is it
 necessary that every unconscious psychological process should be changed
 into a conscious one. We find it advantageous to express ourselves as
 follows: Any particular process belongs in the first place to the
 psychological system of the unconscious; from this system it can under
 certain conditions go over into the system of the conscious. The crudest
 conception of these systems is the one which is most convenient for us,
 namely, a representation in space. We will compare the system of the
 unconscious to a large ante-chamber, in which the psychic impulses rub
 elbows with one another, as separate beings. There opens out of this
 ante-chamber another, a smaller room, a sort of parlor, which
 consciousness occupies. But on the threshold between the two rooms there
 stands a watchman; he passes on the individual psychic impulses, censors
 them, and will not let them into the parlor if they do not meet with his
 approval. You see at once that it makes little difference whether the
 watchman brushes a single impulse away from the threshold, or whether he
 drives it out again after it has already entered the parlor. It is a
 question here only of the extent of his watchfulness, and the timeliness
 of his judgment. Still working with this simile, we proceed to a further
 elaboration of our nomenclature. The impulses in the ante-chamber of the
 unconscious cannot be seen by the conscious, which is in the other room;
 therefore for the time being they must remain unconscious. When they
 have succeeded in pressing forward to the threshold, and have been sent
 back by the watchman, then they are unsuitable for consciousness and we
 call them _suppressed_. Those impulses, however, which the watchman has
 permitted to cross the threshold have not necessarily become conscious;
 for this can happen only if they have been successful in attracting to
 themselves the glance of the conscious. We therefore justifiably call
 this second room the system of the _fore-conscious_. In this way the
 process of becoming conscious retains its purely descriptive sense.
 Suppression then, for any individual impulse, consists in not being able
 to get past the watchman from the system of the unconscious to that of
 the fore-conscious. The watchman himself is long since known to us; we
 have met him as the resistance which opposed us when we attempted to
 release the suppression through analytic treatment.
 
 Now I know you will say that these conceptions are as crude as they are
 fantastic, and not at all permissible in a scientific discussion. I know
 they are crude--indeed, we even know that they are incorrect, and if we
 are not very much mistaken we have a better substitute for them in
 readiness. Whether they will continue then to appear so fantastic to you
 I do not know. For the time being, they are useful conceptions, similar
 to the manikin _Ampre_ who swims in the stream of the electric current.
 In so far as they are helpful in the understanding of our observation,
 they are by no means to be despised. I should like to assure you that
 these crude assumptions go far in approximating the actual
 situation--the two rooms, the watchman on the threshold between the two,
 and consciousness at the end of the second room in the role of an
 onlooker. I should also like to hear you admit that our
 designations--_unconscious_, _fore-conscious_, and _conscious_ are much
 less likely to arouse prejudice, and are easier to justify than others
 that have been used or suggested--such as _sub-conscious_,
 _inter-conscious_, _between-conscious_, etc.
 
 This becomes all the more important to me if you should warn me that
 this arrangement of the psychic apparatus, such as I have assumed in the
 explanation of neurotic symptoms, must be generally applicable and must
 hold for normal functioning as well. In that, of course, you are right.
 We cannot follow this up at present, but our interest in the psychology
 of the development of the symptom must be enormously increased if
 through the study of pathological conditions we have the prospect of
 finding a key to the normal psychic occurrences which have been so well
 concealed.
 
 You will probably recognize what it is that supports our assumptions
 concerning these two systems and their relation to consciousness. The
 watchman between the unconscious and the fore-conscious is none other
 than the censor under whose control we found the manifest dream to
 obtain its form. The residue of the day's experiences, which we found
 were the stimuli which set off the dream, are fore-conscious materials
 which at night, during sleep, had come under the influence of
 unconscious and suppressed wishes. Borne along by the energy of the
 wish, these stimuli were able to build the latent dream. Under the
 control of the unconscious system this material was worked over, went
 through an elaboration and displacement such as the normal psychic life
 or, better said, the fore-conscious system, either does not know at all
 or tolerates only exceptionally. In our eyes the characteristics of each
 of the two systems were betrayed by this difference in their
 functioning. The dependent relation between the fore-conscious and the
 conscious was to us only an indication that it must belong to one of the
 two systems. The dream is by no means a pathological phenomenon; it may
 appear in every healthy person under the conditions of sleep. Any
 assumption as to the structure of the psychic apparatus which covers the
 development of both the dream and the neurotic symptom has also an
 undeniable claim to be taken into consideration in any theory of normal
 psychic life.
 
 So much, then, for suppression. It is, however, only a prerequisite for
 the evolution of the symptom. We know that the symptom serves as a
 substitute for a process kept back by suppression. Yet it is no simple
 matter to bridge this gap between the suppression and the evolution of
 the substitute. We have first to answer several questions on other
 aspects of the problem concerning the suppression and its
 substantiation: What kind of psychological stimuli are at the basis of
 the suppression; by what forces is it achieved; for what motives? On
 these matters we have only one insight that we can go by. We learned in
 the investigation of resistance that it grows out of the forces of the
 "I," in other words from obvious and latent traits of character. It must
 be from the same traits also that suppression derived support; at least
 they played a part in its development. All further knowledge is still
 withheld from us.
 
 A second observation, for which I have already prepared, will help us
 further at this point. By means of analysis we can assign one very
 general purpose to the neurotic symptom. This is of course nothing new
 to you. I have already shown it to you in the two cases of neuroses.
 But, to be sure, what is the significance of two cases! You have the
 right to demand that it be shown to you innumerable times. But I am
 unable to do this. Here again your own experience must step in, or your
 belief, which may in this matter rely upon the unanimous account of all
 psychoanalysts.
 
 You will remember that in these two cases, whose symptoms we subjected
 to searching investigation, the analysis introduced us to the most
 intimate sexual life of these patients. In the first case, moreover, we
 could identify with unusual clearness the purpose or tendency of the
 symptoms under investigation. Perhaps in the second case it was
 slightly covered by another factor--one we will consider later. Now, the
 same thing that we saw in these two examples we would see in all other
 cases that we subjected to analysis. Each time, through analysis, we
 would be introduced to the sexual wishes and experiences of the patient,
 and every time we would have to conclude that their symptoms served the
 same purpose. This purpose shows itself to be the satisfaction of sexual
 wishes; the symptoms serve as a sexual satisfaction for the patient,
 they are a substitute for such satisfactions as they miss in reality.
 
 Recall the compulsive act of our first patient. The woman longs for her
 intensely beloved husband, with whom she cannot share her life because
 of his shortcoming and weaknesses. She feels she must remain true to
 him, she can give his place to no one else. Her compulsive symptom
 affords her that for which she pines, ennobles her husband, denies and
 corrects his weaknesses,--above all, his impotence. This symptom is
 fundamentally a wish-fulfillment, exactly as is a dream; moreover, it is
 what a dream not always is, an erotic wish-fulfillment. In the case of
 our second patient you can see that one of the component purposes of her
 ceremonial was the prevention of the intercourse of her parents or the
 hindrance of the creation of a new child thereby. You have perhaps also
 guessed that essentially she strove to put herself in the place of her
 mother. Here again we find the removal of disturbances to sexual
 satisfaction and the fulfillment of personal sexual wishes. We shall
 soon turn to the complications of whose existence we have given you
 several indications.
 
 I do not want to make reservations as to the universal applicability of
 these declarations later on, and therefore I wish to call to your
 attention the fact that everything that I say here about suppression,
 symptom-development and symptom-interpretation has been learned from
 three types of neuroses--anxiety-hysteria, conversion-hysteria, and
 compulsion-neuroses--and for the time being is relevant to these forms
 only. These three conditions, which we are in the habit of combining
 into one group under the name of "_transference neuroses_," also limit
 the field open to psychoanalytic therapy. The other neuroses have not
 been nearly so well studied by psychoanalysis,--in one group, in fact,
 the impossibility of therapeutic influence has been the reason for the
 neglect. But you must not forget that psychoanalysis is still a very
 young science, that it demands much time and care in preparation for it,
 that not long ago it was still in the cradle, so to speak. Yet at all
 points we are about to penetrate into the understanding of those other
 conditions which are not transference neuroses. I hope I shall still be
 able to speak to you of the developments that our assumptions and
 results have undergone by being correlated with this new material, and
 to show you that these further studies have not led to contradictions
 but rather to the production of still greater uniformity. Granted that
 everything, then, that has been said here, holds good for the three
 transference neuroses, allow me to add a new bit of information to the
 evaluation of its symptoms. A comparative investigation into the causes
 of the disease discloses a result that may be confined into the formula:
 in some way or other these patients fell ill through _self-denial_ when
 reality withheld from them the satisfaction of their sexual wishes. You
 recognize how excellently well these two results are found to agree. The
 symptoms must be understood, then, as a substitute satisfaction for that
 which is missed in life.
 
 To be sure, there are all kinds of objections possible to the
 declaration that neurotic symptoms are substitutes for sexual
 satisfaction. I shall still go into two of them today. If you yourself
 have analytically examined a fairly large number of neurotics you will
 perhaps gravely inform me that in one class of cases this is not at all
 applicable, the symptoms appear rather to have the opposite purpose, to
 exclude sexual satisfaction, or discontinue it. I shall not deny the
 correctness of your interpretation. The psychoanalytic content has a
 habit of being more complicated than we should like to have it. Had it
 been so simple, perhaps we should have had no need for psychoanalysis to
 bring it to light. As a matter of fact, some of the traits of the
 ceremonial of our second patient may be recognized as of this ascetic
 nature, inimical to sexual satisfaction; for example, the fact that she
 removes the clocks, which have the magic qualities of preventing nightly
 erections, or that she tries to prevent the falling and breaking of
 vessels, which symbolizes a protection of her virginity. In other cases
 of bed-ceremonials which I was able to analyze, this negative character
 was far more evident; the ceremonial might consist throughout of
 protective regulations against sexual recollections and temptations. On
 the other hand, we have often discovered in psychoanalysis that
 opposites do not mean contradictions. We might extend our assertion and
 say the symptoms purpose either a sexual satisfaction or a guard against
 it; that in hysteria the positive wish-fulfillment takes precedence,
 while in the compulsion neuroses the negative, ascetic characteristics
 have the ascendancy. We have not yet been able to speak of that aspect
 of the mechanism of the symptoms, their two-sidedness, or polarity,
 which enables them to serve this double purpose, both the sexual
 satisfaction and its opposite. The symptoms are, as we shall see,
 compromise results, arising from the integration of two opposed
 tendencies; they represent not only the suppressed force but also the
 suppressing factor, which was originally potent in bringing about the
 negation. The result may then favor either one side or the other, but
 seldom is one of the influences entirely lacking. In cases of hysteria,
 the meeting of the two purposes in the same symptom is most often
 achieved. In compulsion-neuroses, the two parts often become distinct;
 the symptom then has a double meaning, it consists of two actions, one
 following the other, one releasing the other. It will not be so easy to
 put aside a further misgiving. If you should look over a large number of
 symptom-interpretations, you would probably judge offhand that the
 conception of a sexual substitute-satisfaction has been stretched to its
 utmost limits in these cases. You will not hesitate to emphasize that
 these symptoms offer nothing in the way of actual satisfaction, that
 often enough they are limited to giving fresh life to sensations or
 phantasies from some sexual complex. Further, you will declare that the
 apparent sexual satisfaction so often shows a childish and unworthy
 character, perhaps approximates an act of onanism, or is reminiscent of
 filthy naughtiness, habits that are already forbidden and broken in
 childhood. Finally, you will express your surprise that one should
 designate as a sexual satisfaction appetites which can only be described
 as horrible or ghastly, even unnatural. As to these last points, we
 shall come to no agreement until we have submitted man's sexual life to
 a thorough investigation, and thus ascertained what one is justified in
 calling sexual.
 
 
 
 
 TWENTIETH LECTURE
 
 GENERAL THEORY OF THE NEUROSES
 
 _The Sexual Life of Man_
 
 
 One might think we could take for granted what we are to understand by
 the term "sexual." Of course, the sexual is the indecent, which we must
 not talk about. I have been told that the pupils of a famous
 psychiatrist once took the trouble to convince their teacher that the
 symptoms of hysteria very frequently represent sexual matters. With this
 intention they took him to the bedside of a woman suffering from
 hysteria, whose attacks were unmistakable imitations of the act of
 delivery. He, however, threw aside their suggestion with the remark, "a
 delivery is nothing sexual." Assuredly, a delivery need not under all
 circumstances be indecent.
 
 I see that you take it amiss that I jest about such serious matters. But
 this is not altogether a jest. In all seriousness, it is not altogether
 easy to define the concept "sexual." Perhaps the only accurate
 definition would be everything that is connected with the difference
 between the two sexes; but this you may find too general and too
 colorless. If you emphasize the sexual act as the central factor, you
 might say that everything is sexual which seeks to obtain sensual
 excitement from the body and especially from the sexual organs of the
 opposite sex, and which aims toward the union of the genitals and the
 performance of the sexual act. But then you are really very close to the
 comparison of sexual and indecent, and the act of delivery is not
 sexual. But if you think of the function of reproduction as the nucleus
 of sexuality you are in danger of excluding a number of things that do
 not aim at reproduction but are certainly sexual, such as onanism or
 even kissing. But we are prepared to realize that attempts at definition
 always lead to difficulties; let us give up the attempt to achieve the
 unusual in our particular case. We may suspect that in the development
 of the concept "sexual" something occurred which resulted in a false
 disguise. On the whole, we are quite well oriented as to what people
 call sexual.
 
 The inclusion of the following factors in our concept "sexual" amply
 suffices for all practical purposes in ordinary life: the contrast
 between the sexes, the attainment of sexual excitement, the function of
 reproduction, the characteristic of an indecency that must be kept
 concealed. But this is no longer satisfactory to science. For through
 careful examinations, rendered possible only by the sacrifices and the
 unselfishness of the subjects, we have come in contact with groups of
 human beings whose sexual life deviates strikingly from the average. One
 group among them, the "perverse," have, as it were, crossed off the
 difference between the sexes from their program. Only the same sex can
 arouse their sexual desires; the other sex, even the sexual parts, no
 longer serve as objects for their sexual desires, and in extreme cases,
 become a subject for disgust. They have to that extent, of course,
 foregone any participation in reproduction. We call such persons
 homosexual or inverted. Often, though not always, they are men and women
 of high physical, intellectual and ethical development, who are affected
 only with this one portentous abnormality. Through their scientific
 leaders they proclaim themselves to be a special species of mankind, "a
 third sex," which shares equal rights with the two other sexes. Perhaps
 we shall have occasion to examine their claims critically. Of course
 they are not, as they would like to claim, the "elect" of humanity, but
 comprise just as many worthless second-rate individuals as those who
 possess a different sexual organization.
 
 At any rate, this type among the perverse seek to achieve the same ends
 with the object of their desires as do normal people. But in the same
 group there exists a long succession of abnormal individuals whose
 sexual activities are more and more alien to what seems desirable to the
 sensible person. In their manifold strangeness they seem comparable only
 to the grotesque freaks that P. Breughel painted as the temptation of
 Saint Anthony, or the forgotten gods and believers that G. Flaubert
 pictures in the long procession that passes before his pious penitent.
 This ill-assorted array fairly clamors for orderly classification if it
 is not to bewilder our senses. We first divide them, on the one hand,
 into those whose sexual object has changed, as is the case with
 homosexualists, and, on the other, those whose sexual aim has changed.
 Those of the first group have dispensed with the mutual union of the
 genital organs, and have, as one of the partners of the act, replaced
 the genitals by another organ or part of the body; they have thus
 overcome both the short-comings of organic structure and the usual
 disgust involved. There are others of this group who still retain the
 genitals as their object, but not by virtue of their sexual function;
 they participate for anatomic reasons or rather by reason of their
 proximity. By means of these individuals we realize that the functions
 of excretion, which in the education of the child are hushed away as
 indecent, still remain capable of drawing complete sexual interest on
 themselves. There are still others who have relinquished the genitals
 entirely as an objective, have raised another part of the body to serve
 as the goal of their desire; the woman's breast, the foot, the tress of
 hair. There are also the fetishists, to whom the body part means
 nothing, who are gratified by a garment, a piece of white linen, a shoe.
 And finally there are persons who seek the whole object but with certain
 peculiar or horrible demands: even those who covet a defenseless corpse
 for instance, which they themselves must criminally compel to satisfy
 their desire. But enough of these horrors.
 
 Foremost in the second grouping are those perverted ones who have placed
 as the end of their sexual desire performances normally introductory or
 preparatory to it. They satisfy their desire by their eyes and hands.
 They watch or attempt to watch the other individual in his most intimate
 doings, or uncover those portions of their own bodies which they should
 conceal in the vague expectation of being rewarded by a similar
 procedure on the other person's part. Here also belong the enigmatic
 sadists, whose affectionate strivings know no other goal than to cause
 their object pain and agony, varying all the way from humiliating
 suggestions to the harshest physical ill-treatment. As if to balance the
 scale, we have on the other hand the masochists, whose sole satisfaction
 consists in suffering every variety of humiliation and torture, symbolic
 and real, at the hands of the beloved one. There are still others who
 combine and confuse a number of these abnormal conditions. Moreover, in
 both these groups there are those who seek sexual satisfaction in
 reality, and others who are content merely to imagine such
 gratification, who need no actual object at all, but can supplant it by
 their own fantastic creations.
 
 There can be not the least doubt that the sexual activities of these
 individuals are actually found in the absurdities, caprices and horrors
 that we have examined. Not only do they themselves conceive them as
 adequate substitutes, but we must recognize that they take the same
 place in their lives that normal sex gratification occupies in ours, and
 for which they bring the same sacrifices, often incommensurate with
 their ends. It is perfectly possible to trace along broad lines as well
 as in detail in what way these abnormalities follow the normal procedure
 and how they diverge from it. You will also find the characteristic of
 indecency which belongs to the sexual act in these vagaries, only that
 it is therein magnified to the disreputable.
 
 Ladies and gentlemen, what attitude are we to assume to these unusual
 varieties of sex gratification? Nothing at all is achieved by the mere
 expression of indignation and personal disgust and by the assurance that
 we do not share these lusts. That is not our concern. We have here a
 field of observation like any other. Moreover, the evasion that these
 persons are merely rarities, curiosities, is easily refuted. On the
 contrary, we are dealing with very frequent and widespread phenomena.
 If, however, we are told that we must not permit them to influence our
 views on sexual life, since they are all aberrations of the sexual
 instinct, we must meet this with a serious answer. If we fail to
 understand these abnormal manifestations of sexuality and are unable to
 relate them to the normal sexual life, then we cannot understand normal
 sexuality. It is, in short, our unavoidable task to account
 theoretically for all the potentialities of the perversions we have gone
 over and to explain their relation to the so-called normal sexuality.
 
 A penetrating insight due to Ivan Bloch and two new experimental results
 will help us in this task. Bloch takes exception to the point of view
 which sees in a perversion a "sign of degeneration"; he proves that such
 deviations from the aim of the sexual instinct, such loose relations to
 the object of sexuality, have occurred at all times, among the most
 primitive and the most highly civilized peoples, and have occasionally
 achieved toleration and general recognition. The two experimental
 results were obtained in the course of psychoanalytic investigations of
 neurotics; they will undoubtedly exert a decided influence on our
 conceptions of sexual perversion.
 
 We have stated that the neurotic symptoms are substitutions for sexual
 satisfactions, and I have given you to understand that the proof of this
 assertion by means of the analysis of symptoms encounters many
 difficulties. For this statement is only justifiable if, under the term
 "sexual satisfactions," we include the so-called perverse sexual ends,
 since with surprising frequency we find symptoms which can be
 interpreted only in the light of their activity. The claim of rareness
 made by the homosexualists or the inverted immediately collapses when we
 learn that in the case of no single neurotic do we fail to obtain
 evidence of homosexual tendencies, and that in a considerable number of
 symptoms we find the expression of this latent inversion. Those who call
 themselves homosexualists are the conscious and manifest inverts, but
 their number is as nothing before the latent homosexualists. We are
 forced to regard the desire for an object of one's own sex as a
 universal aberration of erotic life and to cede increasing importance to
 it. Of course the differences between manifest homosexuality and the
 normal attitude are not thus erased; their practical importance
 persists, but their theoretic value is greatly decreased. Paranoia, a
 disturbance which cannot be counted among the transference-neuroses,
 must in fact be assumed as arising regularly from the attempt to ward
 off powerful homosexual tendencies. Perhaps you will recall that one of
 our patients under her compulsive symptoms acted the part of a man,
 namely that of her own estranged husband; the production of such
 symptoms, impersonating the actions of men, is very common to neurotic
 women. Though this cannot be ascribed directly to homosexuality, it is
 certainly concerned with its prerequisites.
 
 You are probably acquainted with the fact that the neurosis of hysteria
 may manifest its symptoms in all organic systems and may therefore
 disturb all functions. Analysis shows that in these symptoms there are
 expressed all those tendencies termed perverse, which seek to represent
 the genitals through other organs. These organs behave as substitute
 genitals; through the study of hysteric symptoms we have come to the
 conclusion that aside from their functional activities, the organs of
 the body have a sexual significance, and that the performance of their
 functions is disturbed if the sexual factor claims too much attention.
 Countless sensations and innervations, which appear as symptoms of
 hysteria, in organs apparently not concerned with sexuality, are thus
 discovered as bound up with the fulfillment of perverse sexual desires
 through the transference of sex instincts to other organs. These
 symptoms bring home to us the extent to which the organs used in the
 consumption of food and in excretion may become the bearers of sexual
 excitement. We see repeated here the same picture which the perversions
 have openly and unmistakably lain before us; in hysteria, however, we
 must make the detour of interpreting symptoms, and in this case the
 perverse sexual tendencies must be ascribed not to the conscious but to
 the unconscious life of the individual.
 
 Among the many symptoms manifested in compulsion neurosis, the most
 important are those produced by too powerful sadistic tendencies, i.e.,
 sexual tendencies with perverted aim. These symptoms, in accordance with
 the structure of compulsion neurosis, serve primarily as a rejection of
 these desires, or they express a struggle between satisfaction and
 rejection. In this struggle, the satisfaction is never excessively
 curtailed; it achieves its results in the patient's behavior in a
 roundabout way, by preference turning against his own person in
 self-inflicted torture. Other forms of neurosis, characterized by
 intensive worry, are the expression of an exaggerated sexualization of
 acts that are ordinarily only preparatory to sexual satisfactions; such
 are the desires to see, to touch, to investigate. Here is thus explained
 the great importance of the fear of contact and also of the compulsion
 to wash. An unbelievably large portion of compulsion acts may, in the
 form of disguised repetitions and modifications, be traced back to
 onanism, admittedly the only uniform action which accompanies the most
 varied flights of the sexual imagination.
 
 It would cost me very little effort to interweave far more closely the
 relation between perversion and neurosis, but I believe that what I have
 said is sufficient for our purposes. We must avoid the error of
 overestimating the frequency and intensity of perverse inclinations in
 the light of these interpretations of symptoms. You have heard that a
 neurosis may develop from the denial of normal sexual satisfactions.
 Through this actual denial the need is forced into the abnormal paths
 of sex excitement. You will later obtain a better insight into the way
 this happens. You certainly understand, that through such "_collateral_"
 hindrance, the perverse tendencies must become more powerful than they
 would have been if no actual obstacle had been put in the way of a
 normal sexual satisfaction. As a matter of fact, a similar influence may
 be recognized in manifest perversions. In many cases, they are provoked
 or motivated by the fact that too great difficulties stand in the way of
 normal sexual satisfactions, owing to temporary circumstances or to the
 permanent institutions of society. In other cases, to be sure, the
 perverse tendencies are entirely independent of such conditions; they
 are, as it were, the normal kind of sexual life for the individual in
 question.
 
 Perhaps you are momentarily under the impression that we have confused
 rather than clarified the relation between normal and perverse
 sexuality. But keep in mind this consideration. If it is true that a
 hindrance or withholding of normal sexual satisfaction will bring out
 perverse tendencies in persons who have not previously shown them, we
 must assume that these persons must have harbored tendencies akin to
 perversities--or, if you will, perversities in latent form. This brings
 us to the second experimental conclusion of which I spoke, namely, that
 psychoanalytic investigation found it necessary to concern itself with
 the sexual life of the child, since, in the analysis of symptoms,
 reminiscences and ideas reverted to the early years of childhood.
 Whatever we revealed in this manner was corroborated point by point
 through the direct observation of children. The result was the
 recognition that all inclinations to perversion have their origin in
 childhood, that children have tendencies toward them all and practice
 them in a measure corresponding to their immaturity. Perverse sexuality,
 in brief, is nothing more than magnified infantile sexuality divided
 into its separate tendencies.
 
 Now you will certainly see these perversions in another light and no
 longer ignore their relation to the sexual life of man, at the cost, I
 do not doubt, of surprises and incongruities painful to your emotions.
 At first you will undoubtedly be disposed to deny everything--the fact
 that children have something which may be termed sexual life, the truth
 of our observations and the justification of our claim to see in the
 behavior of children any relation to what is condemned in later years
 as perversity. Permit me first to explain to you the cause of your
 reluctance and then to present to you the sum of our observations. It is
 biologically improbable, even absurd, to assume that children have no
 sexual life--sexual excitements, desires, and some sort of
 satisfaction--but that they develop it suddenly between the ages of
 twelve and fourteen. This would be just as improbable from the viewpoint
 of biology as to say that they were not born with genitals but developed
 them only in the period of puberty. The new factor which becomes active
 in them at the time is the function of reproduction, which avails itself
 for its own purposes of all the physical and psychic material already
 present. You commit the error of confusing sexuality with reproduction
 and thereby block the road to the understanding of sexuality, and of
 perversions and neuroses as well. This error is a prejudice. Oddly
 enough its source is the fact that you yourselves were children, and as
 children succumbed to the influence of education. One of the most
 important educational tasks which society must assume is the control,
 the restriction of the sexual instinct when it breaks forth as an
 impulse toward reproduction; it must be subdued to an individual will
 that is identical with the mandates of society. In its own interests,
 accordingly, society would postpone full development until the child has
 reached a certain stage of intellectual maturity, for education
 practically ceases with the complete emergence of the sexual impulse.
 Otherwise the instinct would burst all bounds and the work of culture,
 achieved with such difficulty, would be shattered. The task of
 restraining this sexuality is never easy; it succeeds here too poorly
 and there too well. The motivating force of human society is
 fundamentally economic; since there is not sufficient nourishment to
 support its members without work on their part, the number of these
 members must be limited and their energies diverted from sexual activity
 to labor. Here, again, we have the eternal struggle for life that has
 persisted from prehistoric times to the present.
 
 Experience must have shown educators that the task of guiding the sexual
 will of the new generation can be solved only by influencing the early
 sexual life of the child, the period preparatory to puberty, not by
 awaiting the storm of puberty. With this intention almost all infantile
 sex activities are forbidden to the child or made distasteful to him;
 the ideal goal has been to render the life of the child asexual. In the
 course of time it has really come to be considered asexual, and this
 point of view has actually been proclaimed by science. In order not to
 contradict our belief and intentions, we ignore the sexual activity of
 the child--no slight thing, at that--or are content to interpret it
 differently. The child is supposed to be pure and innocent, and whoever
 says otherwise may be condemned as a shameless blasphemer of the tender
 and sacred feelings of humanity.
 
 The children are the only ones who do not join in carrying out these
 conventions, who assert their animal rights, who prove again and again
 that the road to purity is still before them. It is strange that those
 who deny the sexuality of children, do not therefore slacken in their
 educational efforts but rather punish severely the manifestations of the
 very thing they maintain does not exist, and call it "childish
 naughtiness." Theoretically it is highly interesting to observe that the
 period of life which offers most striking evidence against the biased
 conception of asexual childhood, is the time up to five or six years of
 age; after that everything is enveloped by a veil of amnesia, which is
 rent apart only by thorough scientific investigation; it may previously
 have given way partially in certain forms of dreams.
 
 Now I shall present to you what is most easily recognizable in the
 sexual life of the child. At first, for the sake of convenience let me
 explain to you the conception of the libido. Libido, analogous to
 hunger, is the force through which the instinct, here the sex instinct
 (as in the case of hunger it is the instinct to eat) expresses itself.
 Other conceptions, such as sexual excitement and satisfaction, require
 no elucidation. You will easily see that interpretation plays the
 greatest part in disclosing the sexuality of the suckling; in fact you
 will probably cite this as an objection. These interpretations proceed
 from a foundation of analytic investigation that trace backwards from a
 given symptom. The suckling reveals the first sexual impulses in
 connection with other functions necessary for life. His chief interest,
 as you know, is directed toward the taking in of food; when it has
 fallen asleep at its mother's breast, fully satisfied, it bears the
 expression of blissful content that will come back again in later life
 after the experience of the sexual orgasm. That of course would be too
 slight evidence to form the basis of a conclusion. But we observe that
 the suckling wishes to repeat the act of taking in food without actually
 demanding more food; he is therefore no longer urged by hunger. We say
 he is sucking, and the fact that after this he again falls asleep with a
 blissful expression shows us that the act of sucking in itself has
 yielded him satisfaction. As you know, he speedily arranges matters so
 that he cannot fall asleep without sucking. Dr. Lindner, an old
 pediatrist in Budapest, was the first one to ascertain the sexual nature
 of this procedure. Persons attending to the child, who surely make no
 pretensions to a theoretic attitude, seem to judge sucking in a similar
 manner. They do not doubt that it serves a pleasurable satisfaction,
 term it naughty, and force the child to relinquish it against his will,
 and if he will not do so of his own accord, through painful measures.
 And so we learn that the suckling performs actions that have no object
 save the obtaining of a sensual gratification. We believe that this
 gratification is first experienced during the taking in of food, but
 that he speedily learns to separate it from this condition. The
 gratification can only be attributed to the excitation of the mouth and
 lips, hence we call these parts of the body _erogenous zones_ and the
 pleasure derived from sucking, _sexual_. Probably we shall have to
 discuss the justification of this name.
 
 If the suckling could express himself, he would probably recognize the
 act of sucking at his mother's breast as the most important thing in
 life. He is not so far wrong, for in this one act he satisfies two great
 needs of life. With no small degree of surprise we learn through
 psychoanalysis how much of the physical significance of this act is
 retained through life. The sucking at the mother's breast becomes the
 term of departure for all of sexual life, the unattained ideal of later
 sex gratification, to which the imagination often reverts in times of
 need. The mother's breast is the first object for the sexual instinct; I
 can scarcely bring home to you how significant this object is for
 centering on the sexual object in later life, what profound influence it
 exerts upon the most remote domains of psychic life through evolution
 and substitution. The suckling, however, soon relinquishes it and fills
 its place by a part of his own body. The child sucks his thumb or his
 own tongue. Thereby he renders himself independent of the consent of the
 outer world in obtaining his sensual satisfactions, and moreover
 increases the excitement by including a second zone of his body. The
 erogenous zones are not equally satisfactory; it is therefore an
 important experience when, as Dr. Lindner puts it, the child while
 touching his own body discovers the especially excitable genitals, and
 so finds the way from sucking to onanism.
 
 Through the evaluation of sucking we become acquainted with two decisive
 characteristics of infantile sexuality. It arises in connection with the
 satisfaction of great organic needs and behaves _auto-erotically_, that
 is to say, it seeks and finds it objects on its own body. What is most
 clearly discernible during the taking in of food is partially repeated
 during excretion. We conclude that the nursling experiences pleasure
 during the excretion of urine and the contents of the intestine and that
 he soon strives to arrange these acts in a way to secure the greatest
 possible amount of satisfaction by the corresponding excitement of the
 erogenous membrane zones. Lou Andreas, with her delicate perceptions,
 has shown how at this point the outer world first intervenes as a
 hindrance, hostile to the child's desire for satisfaction--the first
 vague suggestion of outer and inner conflicts. He may not let his
 excretions pass from him at a moment agreeable to him, but only when
 other persons set the time. To induce him to renounce these sources of
 satisfaction, everything relating to these functions is declared
 indecent and must be concealed. Here, for the first time, he is to
 exchange pleasure for social dignity. His own relation to his excretions
 is originally quite different. He experiences no disgust toward his
 faeces, values them as a part of his body from which he does not part
 lightly, for he uses them as the first "present" he can give to persons
 he esteems particularly. Even after education has succeeded in
 alienating him from these tendencies, he transfers the evaluation of the
 faeces to the "present" and to "money." On the other hand, he appears to
 regard his achievements in urination with especial pride.
 
 I know that you have been wanting to interrupt me for a long time and to
 cry: "Enough of these monstrosities! Excretion a source of sexual
 gratification that even the suckling exploits! Faeces a valuable
 substance! The anus a sort of genital! We do not believe it, but we
 understand why children's physicians and pedagogues have decidedly
 rejected psychoanalysis and its results." No, you have merely forgotten
 that it was my intention to present to you infantile sexuality in
 connection with the facts of sexual perversion. Why should you not know
 that in the case of many grown-ups, homosexuals as well as
 heterosexuals, the locus of intercourse is transferred from the normal
 to a more remote portion of the body. And that there are many
 individuals who confess to a pleasurable sensation of no slight degree
 in the emptying of the bowels during their entire lives! Children
 themselves will confirm their interest in the act of defecation and the
 pleasure in watching the defecation of another, when they are a few
 years older and capable of giving expression to their feelings. Of
 course, if these children have previously been systematically
 intimidated, they will understand all too well the wisdom of preserving
 silence on the subject. As for the other things that you do not wish to
 believe, let me refer you to the results of analysis and the direct
 observation of children, and you will realize that it is difficult not
 to see these things or to see them in a different light. I do not even
 object to making the relation between child-sexuality and sexual
 perversion quite obvious to you. It is really only natural; if the child
 has sexual life at all, it must necessarily be perverse, because aside
 from a few hazy illusions, the child does not know how sexuality gives
 rise to reproduction. The common characteristic of all perversions, on
 the other hand, is that they have abandoned reproduction as their aim.
 We term sexual activity perverse when it has renounced the aim of
 reproduction and follows the pursuit of pleasure as an independent goal.
 And so you realize that the turning point in the development of sexual
 life lies in its subjugation to the purpose of reproduction. Everything
 this side of the turning point, everything that has given up this
 purpose and serves the pursuit of pleasure alone, must carry the term
 "perverse" and as such be regarded with contempt.
 
 Permit me, therefore, to continue with my brief presentation of
 infantile sexuality. What I have told you about two organic systems I
 could supplement by a discussion of all the others. The sexual life of
 the child exhausts itself in the exercise of a series of partial
 instincts which seek, independently of one another, to gain satisfaction
 from his own body or from an external object. Among these organs the
 genitals speedily predominate. There are persons who continue the
 pursuit of satisfaction by means of their own genitals, without the aid
 of another genital or object, uninterruptedly from the onanism of the
 suckling to the onanism of necessity which arises in puberty, and even
 indefinitely beyond that. The theme of onanism alone would occupy us for
 a long period of time; it offers material for diverse observations.
 
 In spite of my inclination to shorten the theme, I must tell you
 something about the sexual curiosity of children. It is most
 characteristic for child sexuality and significant for the study of
 neurotic symptoms. The sexual curiosity of children begins very early,
 sometimes before the third year. It is not connected with the
 differences of sexes, which means nothing to the child, since the boy,
 at any rate, ascribes the same male genital to both sexes. When the boy
 first discovers the primary sexual structure of the female, he tries at
 first to deny the evidence of his senses, for he cannot conceive a human
 being who lacks the part of his body that is of such importance to him.
 Later he is terrified at the possibility revealed to him and he feels
 the influence of all the former threats, occasioned by his intensive
 preoccupation with his little organ. He becomes subject to the
 domination of the castration complex, the formation of which plays an
 important part in the development of his character, provided he remains
 healthy; of his neurosis, if he becomes diseased; of his resistance, if
 he is treated analytically. We know that the little girl feels injured
 on account of her lack of a large, visible penis, envies the boy his
 possession, and primarily from this motive desires to be a man. This
 wish manifests itself subsequently in neurosis, arising from some
 failure in her role as a woman. During childhood, the clitoris of the
 girl is the equivalent of the penis; it is especially excitable, the
 zone where auto-erotic satisfaction is achieved. In the transition to
 womanhood it is most important that the sensations of the clitoris are
 completely transferred at the right time to the entrance of the vagina.
 In cases of so-called sexual anesthesia of women the clitoris has
 obstinately retained its excitability.
 
 The sexual interest of children generally turns first to the mystery of
 birth--the same problem that is the basis of the questions asked by the
 sphinx of Thebes. This curiosity is for the most part aroused by the
 selfish fear of the arrival of a new child. The answer which the
 nursery has ready for the child, that the stork brings children, is
 doubted far more frequently than we imagine, even by very young
 children. The feeling that he has been cheated out of the truth by
 grown-ups, contributes greatly to the child's sense of solitude and to
 his independent development. But the child is not capable of solving
 this problem unaided. His undeveloped sexual constitution restricts his
 ability to understand. At first he assumes that children are produced by
 a special substance in one's food and does not know that only women can
 bear children. Later he learns of this limitation and relinquishes the
 derivation of children from food--a supposition retained in the
 fairy-tale. The growing child soon notices that the father plays some
 part in reproduction, but what it is he cannot guess. If, by chance, he
 is witness of a sexual act, he sees in it an attempt to subjugate, a
 scuffle, the sadistic miscomprehension of coitus; he does not however
 relate this act immediately to the evolution of the child. When he
 discovers traces of blood on the bedsheets or on the clothing of his
 mother, he considers them the proof of an injury inflicted by the
 father. During the latter part of childhood, he imagines that the sexual
 organ of the man plays an important part in the evolution of children,
 but can ascribe only the function of urination to that part of his body.
 
 From the very outset children unite in believing that the birth of the
 child takes place through the anus; that the child therefore appears as
 a ball of faeces. After anal interests have been proven valueless, he
 abandons this theory and assumes that the navel opens or that the region
 between the two breasts is the birthplace of the child. In this way the
 curious child approaches the knowledge of sexual facts, which, clouded
 by his ignorance, he often fails to see. In the years prior to puberty
 he generally receives an incomplete, disparaging explanation which often
 causes traumatic consequences.
 
 You have probably heard that the conception "sexual" is unduly expanded
 by psychoanalysis in order that it may maintain the hypothesis that all
 neuroses are due to sexual causes and that the meaning of the symptoms
 is sexual. You are now in a position to judge whether or not this
 expansion is unjustifiable. We have expanded the conception sexual only
 to include the sexual life of children and of perverse persons. That is
 to say, we have restablished its proper boundaries. Outside of
 psychoanalysis sexuality means only a very limited thing: normal sexual
 life in the service of reproduction.
 
 
 
 
 TWENTY-FIRST LECTURE
 
 GENERAL THEORY OF THE NEUROSES
 
 _Development of the Libido and Sexual Organizations_
 
 
 I am under the impression that I did not succeed in convincing you of
 the significance of perversions for our conception of sexuality. I
 should therefore like to clarify and add as much as I can.
 
 It was not only perversions that necessitated an alteration of our
 conception of sexuality, which aroused such vehement contradiction. The
 study of infantile sexuality did a great deal more along that line, and
 its close correspondence to the perversions became decisive for us. But
 the origin of the expressions of infantile sexuality, unmistakable as
 they are in later years of childhood, seem to be lost in obscurity.
 Those who disregard the history of evolution and analytic coherence,
 will dispute the potency of the sexual factor and will infer the agency
 of generalized forces. Do not forget that as yet we have no generally
 acknowledged criterion for identifying the sexual nature of an
 occurrence, unless we assume that we can find it in a relation to the
 functions of reproduction, and this we must reject as too narrow. The
 biological criteria, such as the periodicities of twenty-three and
 twenty-eight days, suggested by W. Fliess, are by no means established;
 the specific chemical nature which we can possibly assume for sexual
 occurrences is still to be discovered. The sexual perversions of adults,
 on the other hand, are tangible and unambiguous. As their generally
 accepted nomenclature shows, they are undoubtedly sexual in character;
 whether we designate them as signs of degeneration, or otherwise, no one
 has yet had the courage to place them outside the phenomena of sex. They
 alone justify the assertion that sexuality and reproduction are not
 coincident, for it is clear that all of them disavow the goal of
 reproduction.
 
 This brings me to an interesting parallel. While "conscious" and
 "psychic" were generally considered to be identical, we had to make an
 essay to widen our conception of the "psychic" to recognize as psychic
 something that was not conscious. Analogously, when "sexual" and
 "related to reproduction" (or, in shorter form, "genital") has been
 generally considered identical, psychoanalysis must admit as "sexual"
 such things as are not "genital," things which have nothing to do with
 reproduction. It is only a formal analogy, but it does not lack a deeper
 basis.
 
 But if the existence of sexual perversions is such a compelling
 argument, why has it not long ago had its effect, and settled the
 question? I really am unable to say. It appears to be because the sexual
 perversions are subject to a peculiar ban that extends even into theory,
 and stands in the way of their scientific appreciation. It seems as if
 no one could forget that they are not only revolting, but even
 unnatural, dangerous; as if they had a seductive influence and that at
 bottom one had to stifle a secret envy of those who enjoyed them. As the
 count who passes judgment in the famous Tannhauser parody admits:
 
     "And in the mount of Venus, his honor slipped his mind,
      It's odd that never happens to people of our kind."
 
 Truthfully speaking, the perverts are rather poor devils who atone most
 bitterly for the satisfaction they attain with such difficulty.
 
 What makes the perverse activity unmistakably sexual, despite all the
 strangeness of its object, is that the act in perverse satisfaction most
 frequently is accompanied by a complete orgasm, and by an ejaculation of
 the genital product. Of course, this is only true in the case of adults;
 with children orgasms and genital excretions are hardly possible; they
 are replaced by rudiments which, again, are not recognized as truly
 sexual.
 
 In order to complete the appreciation of sexual perversions, I have
 something to add. Condemned as they are, sharply as they are contrasted
 with the normal sexual activity, simple observation shows that rarely is
 normal sex-life entirely free from one or another of the perverse
 traits. Even the kiss can be claimed to be perverse, for it consists in
 the union of two erogenous mouth zones in place of the respective
 genitals. But no one outlaws it as perverse, it is, on the contrary,
 admitted in theatrical performances as a modified suggestion of the
 sexual act. This very kissing may easily become a complete perversion
 if it results in such intensity that it is immediately followed by an
 emission and orgasm--a thing that is not at all unusual. Further, we can
 learn that handling and gazing upon the object becomes an essential
 prerequisite to sexual pleasure; that some, in the height of sexual
 excitation, pinch and bite, that the greatest excitation is not always
 called forth in lovers by the genitals, but rather by other parts of the
 body, and so forth. There is no sense in considering persons with single
 traits of this kind abnormal, and counting them among the perverts.
 Rather, we recognize more and more clearly that the essential nature of
 perversion does not consist in overstepping the sexual aim, nor in a
 substitution for the genitals, not even in the variety of objects, but
 simply in the exclusiveness with which these deviations are carried out
 and by means of which the sexual act that serves reproduction is pushed
 aside. When the perverse activities serve to prepare or heighten the
 normal sexual act, they are really no longer perversions. To be sure,
 the chasm between normal and perverse sexuality is practically bridged
 by such facts. The natural result is that normal sexuality takes its
 origin from something existing prior to it, since certain components of
 this material are thrown out and others are combined in order to make
 them subject to a new aim--that of reproduction.
 
 Before we make use of our knowledge of perversions to concentrate anew
 and with clearer perspective on the study of infantile sexuality, I must
 call your attention to an important difference between the two. Perverse
 sexuality is as a rule extraordinarily centralized, its whole action is
 directed toward one, usually an isolated, goal. A partial instinct has
 the upper hand. It is either the only one that can be demonstrated or it
 has subjected the others to its purposes. In this respect there is no
 difference between normal and perverse sexuality other than that the
 ruling partial instincts, and with them the sexual goals, are different.
 In the one case as well as in the other there is, so to say, a well
 organized tyranny, excepting that here one family and there another has
 appropriated all the power to itself. Infantile sexuality, on the other
 hand, is on the whole devoid of such centralization and organization,
 its individual component impulses are of equal power, and each
 independently goes in search of the acquisition of pleasurable
 excitement. The lack as well as the presence of centralization fit in
 well with the fact that both the perverse and the normal sexuality
 originated from the infantile. There are also cases of perverse
 sexuality that have much more similarity with the infantile, where,
 independently of one another, numerous partial instincts have forced
 their way, insisted on their aims, or rather perpetuated them. In these
 cases it is more correct to speak of infantilism of sexual life than of
 perversions.
 
 Thus prepared we can consider a question which we certainly shall not be
 spared. People will say to us: "Why are you so set on including within
 sexuality those manifestations of childhood, out of which the sexual
 later develops, but which, according to your own admission, are of
 uncertain origin? Why are you not satisfied rather with the
 physiological description, and simply say that even in the suckling one
 may notice activities, such as sucking objects or holding back
 excrements, which show us that he strives towards an _organic pleasure_?
 In that way you would have avoided the estranging conception of sexual
 life in the tiniest child." I have nothing to say against organic
 pleasure; I know that the most extreme excitement of the sexual union is
 only an organic pleasure derived from the activity of the genitals. But
 can you tell me when this organic pleasure, originally not
 differentiated, acquires the sexual character that it undoubtedly does
 possess in the later phases of development? Do you know more about the
 "organic pleasure" than about sexuality? You will answer, the sexual
 character is acquired when the genitals begin to play their role; sexual
 means genital. You will even reject the contrary evidence of the
 perversions by confronting me with the statement that in most
 perversions it is a matter of achieving the genital orgasm, although by
 other means than a union of the genitals. You would really command a
 much better position if you did not regard as characteristic of the
 sexual that untenable relation to reproduction seen in the perversions,
 if you replaced it by activity of the genitals. Then we no longer differ
 very widely; the genital organs merely replace other organs. What do you
 make of the numerous practices which show you that the genitals may be
 represented by other organs in the attainment of gratification, as is
 the case in the normal kiss, or the perverse practices of "fast life,"
 or the symptoms of hysteria? In these neuroses it is quite usual for
 stimulations, sensations and innervations, even the process of erection,
 which is localized in the genitals, to be transferred to other distant
 parts of the body, so that you have nothing to which you can hold as
 characteristics of the sexual. You will have to decide to follow my
 example and expand the designation "sexual" to include the strivings of
 early childhood toward organic pleasure.
 
 Now, for my justification, I should like you to give me the time for two
 more considerations. As you know, we call the doubtful and indefinable
 pleasure activities of earliest childhood sexual because our analysis of
 the symptoms leads us to them by way of material that is undeniably
 sexual. We admit that it need not for that reason in itself be sexual.
 But take an analogous case. Suppose there were no way to observe the
 development of two dicotyledonous plants from their seeds--the apple
 tree and the bean. In both cases, however, imagine it possible to follow
 their evolution from the fully developed plant backwards to the first
 seedling with two leaf-divisions. The two little leaves are
 indistinguishable, in both cases they look exactly alike. Shall I
 conclude from this that they really are the same and that the specific
 differences between an apple tree and bean plant do not appear until
 later in the history of the plant? Or is it biologically more correct to
 believe that this difference is already present in the seedling,
 although the two little leaves show no differences? We do the same thing
 when we term as sexual the pleasure derived from the activities of the
 suckling. Whether each and every organic enjoyment may be called sexual,
 or if besides the sexual there is another that does not deserve this
 name, is a matter I cannot discuss here. I know too little about organic
 pleasure and its conditions, and will not be at all surprised if the
 retrogressive character of the analysis leads us back finally to a
 generalized factor.
 
 One thing more. You have on the whole gained very little for what you
 are so anxious to maintain, the sexual purity of the child, even when
 you can convince me that the activities of the suckling had better not
 be called sexual. For from the third year on, there is no longer any
 doubt concerning the presence of a sexual life in the child. At this
 time the genitals already begin to become active; there is perhaps
 regularly a period of infantile masturbation, in other words, a
 gratification by means of the genitals. The psychic and social
 expressions of the sexual life are no longer absent; choice of an
 object, affectionate preference for certain persons, indeed, a leaning
 toward one of the two sexes, jealousy--all these have been established
 independently by unprejudiced observation, prior to the advent of
 psychoanalysis, and confirmed by every careful observer. You will say
 that you had no doubt as to the early awakening of affection, you will
 take issue only with its sexual nature. Children between the ages of
 three and eight have already learned to hide these things, but if you
 look sharply you can always gather sufficient evidence of the "sexual"
 purpose of this affection. What escapes you will be amply supplied by
 investigation. The sexual goals of this period of life are most
 intimately connected with the contemporaneous sexual theories, of which
 I have given you some examples. The perverse nature of some of these
 goals is the result of the constitutional immaturity of the child, who
 has not yet discovered the goal of the act of copulation.
 
 From about the sixth or the eighth year on a pause in, and reversion of,
 sexual development is noticeable, which in the cases that reach the
 highest cultural standard deserves the name of a latent period. The
 latent period may also fail to appear and there need not be an
 interruption of sexual activity and sexual interests at any period. Most
 of the experiences and impulses prior to the latent period then fall
 victim to the infantile amnesia, the forgetting we have already
 discussed, which cloaks our earliest childhood and makes us strangers to
 it. In every psychoanalysis we are confronted with the task of leading
 this forgotten period of life back into memory; one cannot resist the
 supposition that the beginning of sexual life it contains furnishes the
 motive for this forgetting, namely, that this forgetting is a result of
 suppression.
 
 The sexual life of the child shows from the third year that it has much
 in common with that of the adult; it is distinguished from the latter,
 as we already know, by the lack of stable organization under the primacy
 of the genitals, by the unavoidable traits of perversion, and,
 naturally, by the far lesser intensity of the whole impulse.
 Theoretically the most interesting phases of the sexual development or,
 as we would rather say, the libido-development, so far as theory is
 concerned, lie back of this period. This development is so rapidly gone
 through that perhaps it would never have been possible for direct
 observation to grasp its fleeting pictures. Psychoanalytic investigation
 of the neuroses has for the first time made it possible to discover more
 remote phases of the libido-development. These are, to be sure, nothing
 but constructions, but if you wish to carry on psychoanalysis in a
 practical way you will find that they are necessary and valuable
 constructions. You will soon understand why pathology may disclose
 conditions which we would have overlooked in the normal object.
 
 We can now declare what form the sexual life of the child takes before
 the primacy of the genitals is established. This primacy is prepared in
 the first infantile epoch prior to the latent period, and is
 continuously organized from puberty on. There is in this early period a
 sort of loose organization, which we shall call _pre-genital_. In the
 foreground of this phase, however, the partial instincts of the genitals
 are not prominent, rather the _sadistic_ and _anal_. The contrast
 between _masculine_ and _feminine_ plays no part as yet, its place is
 taken by the contrast between _active_ and _passive_, which we may
 designate as the forerunner of sexual polarity, with which it is later
 fused. That which appears masculine to us in the activity of this phase,
 observed from the standpoint of the later genital stage, is the
 expression of an instinct to mastery, which may border on cruelty.
 Impulses with passive goals attach themselves to the erogenous zone of
 the rectal opening. Most important at this time, curiosity and the
 instinct to watch are powerful. The genital really takes part in the
 sexual life only in its role as excretory organ for the bladder. Objects
 are not lacking to the partial impulses of this period, but they do not
 necessarily combine into a single object. The sadistico-anal
 organization is the step antecedent to the phase of genital primacy. A
 more penetrating study furnishes proof how much of this is retained for
 the later and final form, and in what ways its partial instincts are
 forced into line under the new genital organization. Back of the
 sadistico-anal phase of libido-development, we get a view of an earlier,
 even more primitive phase of organization, in which the erogenous
 mouth-zone plays the chief role. You may surmise that the sexual
 activity of sucking belongs to it, and may wonder at the intuition of
 the ancient Egyptians, whose art characterized the child, as well as
 the god Horus, with the finger in his month. Abraham only recently
 published material concerning the traces which this primitive oral phase
 has left upon the sexual life of later years.
 
 I can surmise that these details about sexual organization have burdened
 your mind more than they have informed you. Perhaps I have again gone
 into detail too much. But be patient; what you have heard will become
 more valuable through the uses to which it is later put. Keep well in
 mind the impression that sexual life, as we call it, the function, of
 the libido, does not make its appearance as a completed whole, nor does
 it develop in its own image, but goes through a series of successive
 phases which are not similar to each other. In fact, it is a
 developmental sequence, like that from the grub to the butterfly. The
 turning point of the development is the subordination of all sexual
 partial-instincts to the primacy of the genitals, and thereby the
 subjection of sexuality to the function of reproduction. Originally it
 is a diffused sexual life, one which consists of independent activities
 of single partial instincts which strive towards organic gratification.
 This anarchy is modified by approaches to pre-genital organization,
 first of all the sadistico-anal phase, prior to this the oral phase,
 which is perhaps the most primitive. Added to this there are the various
 processes, as yet not well known, which carry over one organization
 level to the later and more advanced phase. The significance, for the
 understanding of the neuroses, of the long evolutionary path of the
 libido which carries it over so many grades we shall discuss on another
 occasion.
 
 Today we shall look at another angle of the development, namely the
 relation of the partial instinct to the object. We shall make a hurried
 survey of this development in order to spend more time upon a relatively
 later product. Some of the components of the sex instincts have had an
 object from the very beginning and hold fast to it; such are the
 instinct to mastery (sadism), curiosity, and the impulse to watch. Other
 impulses which are more clearly attached to specific erogenous zones of
 the body have this object only in the beginning, as long as they adhere
 to the functions which are not sexual; they release this object when
 they free themselves from these non-sexual functions. The first object
 of the oral component of the sexual impulse is the mother's breast,
 which satisfies the hunger of the infant. By the act of sucking, the
 erotic component which is also satisfied by the sucking becoming
 independent, it gives up the foreign object and replaces it by some part
 of its own body. The oral impulse becomes _auto-erotic_, just as the
 anal and other erogenous impulses are from the very beginning. Further
 development, to express it most briefly, has two goals--first, to give
 up auto-eroticism, and, again, to substitute for the object of one's own
 body a foreign object; second, to unify the different objects into a
 single impulse, replace them by a single object. To be sure, that can
 happen only if this single object is itself complete, a body similar to
 one's own. Nor can it be consummated without leaving behind as useless a
 large number of the auto-erotic instinctive impulses.
 
 The processes of finding the object are rather involved, and have as yet
 had no comprehensive exposition. For our purpose, let us emphasize the
 fact that when the process has come to a temporary cessation in the
 childhood years, before the latent period, the object it has found is
 seen to be practically identical with the first object derived from its
 relation to the object of the oral pleasure impulse. It is, if not the
 mother's breast, the mother herself. We call the mother the first
 _object of love_. For we speak of love when we emphasize the psychic
 side of sex-impulses, and disregard or for a moment wish to forget the
 fundamental physical or "sensual" demands of the instincts. At the time
 when the mother becomes the object of love, the psychic work of
 suppression which withdraws the knowledge of a part of his sexual goal
 from his consciousness has already begun in the child. The selection of
 the mother as the object of love involves everything we understand by
 the Oedipus complex which has come to have such great significance in
 the psychoanalytic explanation of neuroses, and which has had no small
 part in arousing opposition to psychoanalysis.
 
 Here is a little experience which took place during the present war: A
 brave young disciple of psychoanalysis is a doctor at the German front
 somewhere in Poland, and attracts the attention of his colleagues by the
 fact that he occasionally exercises an unexpected influence in the case
 of a patient. Upon being questioned he admits that he works by means of
 psychoanalysis and is finally induced to impart his knowledge to his
 colleagues. Every evening the physicians of the corps, colleagues and
 superiors, gather in order to listen to the inmost secrets of analysis.
 For a while this goes on nicely, but after he has told his audience of
 the Oedipus-complex, a superior rises and says he does not believe it,
 that it is shameful for the lecturer to tell such things to them, brave
 men who are fighting for their fatherland, and who are the fathers of
 families, and he forbade the continuation of the lectures. This was the
 end.
 
 Now you will be impatient to discover what this frightful
 Oedipus-complex consists of. The name tells you. You all know the Greek
 myth of King Oedipus, who is destined by the fates to kill his father,
 and take his mother to wife, who does everything to escape the oracle
 and then does penance by blinding himself when he discovers that he has,
 unknowingly, committed these two sins. I trust many of you have
 yourselves experienced the profound effect of the tragedy in which
 Sophocles handles this material. The work of the Attic poet presents the
 manner in which the deed of Oedipus, long since accomplished, is finally
 brought to light by an artistically prolonged investigation,
 continuously fed with new evidence; thus far it has a certain similarity
 to the process of psychoanalysis. In the course of the dialogue it
 happens that the infatuated mother-wife, Jocasta, opposes the
 continuation of the investigation. She recalls that many men have
 dreamed that they have cohabited with their mothers, but one should lay
 little stress on dreams. We do not lay little stress on dreams, least of
 all typical dreams such as occur to many men, and we do not doubt that
 this dream mentioned by Jocasta is intimately connected with the strange
 and frightful content of the myth.
 
 It is surprising that Sophocles' tragedy does not call forth much
 greater indignation and opposition on the part of the audience, a
 reaction similar to, and far more justified, than the reaction to our
 simple military physician. For it is a fundamentally immoral play, it
 dispenses with the moral responsibility of men, it portrays godlike
 powers as instigators of guilt, and shows the helplessness of the moral
 impulses of men which contend against sin. One might easily suppose that
 the burden of the myth purposed accusation against the gods and Fate,
 and in the hands of the critical Euripides, always at odds with the
 gods, it would probably have become such an accusation. But there is no
 trace of this in the work of the believer Sophocles. A pious sophistry
 which asserts that the highest morality is to bow to the will of the
 gods, even if they command a crime, helps him over the difficulty. I do
 not think that this moral constitutes the power of the drama, but so far
 as the effect goes, that is unimportant; the listener does not react to
 it, but to the secret meaning and content of the myth. He reacts as
 though through self-analysis he had recognized in himself the
 Oedipus-complex, and had unmasked the will of the gods, as well as the
 oracle, as sublime disguises of his own unconsciousness. It is as though
 he remembered the wish to remove his father, and in his place to take
 his mother to wife, and must be horrified at his own desires. He also
 understands the voice of the poet as if it were telling him: "You revolt
 in vain against your responsibility, and proclaim in vain the efforts
 you have made to resist these criminal purposes. In spite of these
 efforts, you are guilty, for you have not been able to destroy the
 criminal purposes, they will persist unconsciously in you." And in that
 there is psychological truth. Even if man has relegated his evil
 impulses to the unconscious, and would tell himself that he is no longer
 answerable for them, he will still be compelled to experience this
 responsibility as a feeling of guilt which he cannot trace to its
 source.
 
 It is not to be doubted for a moment that one may recognize in the
 Oedipus-complex one of the most important sources for the consciousness
 of guilt with which neurotics are so often harassed. But furthermore, in
 a study of the origins of religion and morality of mankind which I
 published in 1913, under the title of _Totem and Taboo_, the idea was
 brought home to me that perhaps mankind as a whole has, at the beginning
 of its history, come by its consciousness of guilt, the final source of
 religion and morality, through the Oedipus-complex. I should like to say
 more on this subject, but perhaps I had better not. It is difficult to
 turn away from this subject now that I have begun speaking of it, but we
 must return to individual psychology.
 
 What does direct observation of the child at the time of the selection
 of its object, before the latent period, show us concerning the
 Oedipus-complex? One may easily see that the little man would like to
 have the mother all to himself, that he finds the presence of his
 father disturbing, he becomes irritated when the latter permits himself
 to show tenderness towards the mother, and expresses his satisfaction
 when the father is away or on a journey. Frequently he expresses his
 feelings directly in words, promises the mother he will marry her. One
 may think this is very little in comparison with the deeds of Oedipus,
 but it is actually enough, for it is essentially the same thing. The
 observation is frequently clouded by the circumstance that the same
 child at the same time, on other occasions, gives evidence of great
 tenderness towards its father; it is only that such contradictory, or
 rather, _ambivalent_ emotional attitudes as would lead to a conflict in
 the case of an adult readily take their place side by side in a child,
 just as later on they permanently exist in the unconscious. You might
 wish to interpose that the behavior of the child springs from egoistic
 motives and does not justify the setting up of an erotic complex. The
 mother provides for all the necessities of the child, and it is
 therefore to the child's advantage that she troubles herself for no one
 else. This, too, is correct, but it will soon be clear that in this, as
 in similar situations, the egoistic interest offers only the opportunity
 upon which the erotic impulse seizes. If the little one shows the most
 undisguised sexual curiosity about his mother, if he wants to sleep with
 her at night, insists upon being present while she is dressing, or
 attempts to caress her, as the mother can so often ascertain and
 laughingly relates, it is undoubtedly due to the erotic nature of the
 attachment to his mother. We must not forget that the mother shows the
 same care for her little daughter without achieving the same effect, and
 that the father often vies with her in caring for the boy without being
 able to win the same importance in his eyes as the mother. In short, it
 is clear that the factor of sex-preference cannot be eliminated from the
 situation by any kind of criticism. From the standpoint of egoistic
 interest it would merely be stupid of the little fellow not to tolerate
 two persons in his services rather than only one.
 
 I have, as you will have noticed, described only the relation of the boy
 to his father and mother. As far as the little girl is concerned, the
 process is the same with the necessary modifications. The affectionate
 devotion to the father, the desire to set aside the mother as
 superfluous and to take her place, a coquetry which already works with
 all the arts of later womanhood, give such a charming picture,
 especially in the baby girl, that we are apt to forget its seriousness,
 and the grave consequences which may result from this infantile
 situation. Let us not fail to add that frequently the parents themselves
 exert a decisive influence over the child in the wakening of the Oedipus
 attitude, in that they themselves follow a sex preference when there are
 a number of children. The father in the most unmistakable manner shows
 preference for the daughter, while the mother is most affectionate
 toward the son. But even this factor cannot seriously undermine the
 spontaneous character of the childish Oedipus-complex. The
 Oedipus-complex expands and becomes a family-complex when other children
 appear. It becomes the motive force, revived by the sense of personal
 injury, which causes the child to receive its brothers and sisters with
 aversion and to wish to remove them without more ado. It is much more
 frequent for the children to express these feelings of hatred than those
 arising from the parent-complex. If such a wish is fulfilled, and death
 takes away the undesired increase in the family, after a short while we
 may discover through analysis what an important experience this death
 was for the child, even though he had not remembered it. The child
 forced into second place by the birth of a little brother or sister, and
 for the first time practically isolated from his mother, is loathe to
 forgive her for this; feelings which we would call extreme bitterness in
 an adult are aroused in him and often become the basis of a lasting
 estrangement. We have already mentioned that sexual curiosity with all
 its consequences usually grows out of these experiences of the child.
 With the growing up of these brothers and sisters the relation to them
 undergoes the most significant changes. The boy may take his sister as
 the object for his love, to replace his faithless mother; situations of
 dangerous rivalry, which are of vast importance for later life, arise
 even in the nursery among numerous brothers who court the affection of a
 younger sister. A little girl finds in her older brother a substitute
 for her father, who no longer acts towards her with the same affection
 as in former years, or she takes a younger sister as a substitute for
 the child that she vainly wished of her father.
 
 Such things, and many more of a similar character, are shown by the
 direct observation of children and the consideration of their vivid
 childish recollections, which are not influenced by the analysis. You
 will conclude, among other things, that the position of a child in the
 sequence of his brothers and sisters is of utmost importance for the
 entire course of his later life, a factor which should be considered in
 every biography. In the face of these explanations that are found with
 so little effort, you will hardly recall without smiling the scientific
 explanations for the prohibition of incest. What inventions! By living
 together from early childhood the sexual attraction must have been
 diverted from these members of the family who are of opposite sex, or a
 biological tendency against in-breeding finds its psychic equivalent in
 an innate dread of incest! In this no account is taken of the fact that
 there would be no need of so unrelenting a prohibition by law and
 morality if there were any natural reliable guards against the
 temptation of incest. Just the opposite is true. The first choice of an
 object among human beings is regularly an incestuous one, in the man
 directed toward the mother and sister, and the most stringent laws are
 necessary to prevent this persisting infantile tendency from becoming
 active. Among the primitive races the prohibitions against incest are
 much more stringent than ours, and recently Th. Reik showed in a
 brilliant paper that the puberty-rites of the savages, which represent a
 rebirth, have the significance of loosing the incestuous bonds of the
 boy to his mother, and of establishing the reconciliation with the
 father.
 
 Mythology teaches that incest, apparently so abhorred by men, is
 permitted to the gods without further thought, and you may learn from
 ancient history that incestuous marriage with his sister was holy
 prescript for the person of the ruler (among the ancient Pharaohs and
 the Incas of Peru). We have here a privilege denied the common herd.
 
 Incest with his mother is one of the sins of Oedipus, patricide the
 other. It might also be mentioned that these are the two great sins
 which the first social-religious institution of mankind, totemism,
 abhors. Let us turn from the direct observation of the child to analytic
 investigation of the adult neurotic. What does analysis yield to the
 further knowledge of the Oedipus-complex? This is easily told. It shows
 the patient up in the light of the myth; it shows that each of these
 neurotics was himself an Oedipus or, what amounts to the same thing,
 became a Hamlet in the reaction to the complex. To be sure, the analytic
 representation of the Oedipus-complex enlarges upon and is a coarser
 edition of the infantile sketch. The hatred of the father, the
 death-wish with regard to him, are no longer timidly suggested, the
 affection for the mother recognizes the goal of possessing her for a
 wife. Dare we really accredit these horrible and extreme feelings to
 those tender childhood years, or does analysis deceive us by bringing in
 some new element? It is not difficult to discover this. Whenever an
 account of past events is given, be it written even by a historian, we
 must take into account the fact that inadvertently something has been
 interpolated from the present and from intervening times into the past;
 so that the entire picture is falsified. In the case of the neurotic it
 is questionable whether this interpolation is entirely unintentional or
 not; we shall later come to learn its motives and must justify the fact
 of "imagining back" into the remote past. We also easily discover that
 hatred of the father is fortified by numerous motives which originate in
 later times and circumstances, since the sexual wishes for the mother
 are cast in forms which are necessarily foreign to the child. But it
 would be a vain endeavor to explain the whole of the Oedipus-complex by
 "imagining back," and as related to later times. The infantile nucleus
 and more or less of what has been added to it continues to exist and may
 be verified by the direct observation of the child.
 
 The clinical fact which we meet with in penetrating the form of the
 Oedipus-complex as established by analysis, is of the greatest practical
 importance. We learn that at the period of puberty, when the sexual
 instinct first asserts its demands in full strength, the old incestuous
 and familiar objects are again taken up and seized anew by the libido.
 The infant's choice of an object was feeble, but it nevertheless set the
 direction for the choice of an object in puberty. At that time very
 intense emotional experiences are brought into play and directed towards
 the Oedipus-complex, or utilized in the reaction to it. However, since
 their presuppositions have become unsupportable, they must in large part
 remain outside of consciousness. From this time on the human individual
 must devote himself to the great task of freeing himself from his
 parents, and only after he has freed himself can he cease to be a child,
 and become a member of the social community. The task confronting the
 son consists of freeing himself from his libidinous wishes towards his
 mother and utilizing them in the quest for a really foreign object for
 his love. He must also effect a reconciliation with his father, if he
 has stayed hostile to him, or if in the reaction to his infantile
 opposition he has become subject to his domination, he must now free
 himself from this pressure. These tasks are set for every man; it is
 noteworthy how seldom their solution is ideally achieved, i.e., how
 seldom the solution is psychologically as well as socially correct.
 Neurotics, however, find no solution whatever; the son remains during
 his whole life subject to the authority of his father, and is not able
 to transfer his libido to a foreign sexual object. Barring the
 difference in the specific relation, the same fate may befall the
 daughter. In this sense the Oedipus-complex is correctly designated as
 the nucleus of the neurosis.
 
 You can imagine how rapidly I am reviewing a great number of conditions
 which are associated with the Oedipus-complex, of practical as well as
 of theoretical importance. I cannot enter upon their variations or
 possible inversions. Of its less immediate relations I only wish to
 indicate the influence which the Oedipus-complex has been found to exert
 on literary production. In a valuable book, Otto Rank has shown that the
 dramatists of all times have taken their materials principally from the
 Oedipus-and incest-complexes, with their variations and disguises.
 Moreover, we will not forget to mention that the two guilty wishes of
 Oedipus were recognized long before the time of psychoanalysis as the
 true representatives of the unrestrained life of impulses. Among the
 writings of the encyclopedist Diderot we find a famous dialogue, _The
 Nephew of Ramau_, which no less a person than Goethe has translated into
 German. In this you may read the remarkable sentence: "_If the little
 savage were left to himself he would preserve all his imbecility, he
 would unite the passions of a man of thirty to the unreasonableness of
 the child in the cradle; he would twist his father's neck and bed with
 his mother_."
 
 There is also one other thing of which I must needs speak. The
 mother-wife of Oedipus shall not have reminded us of the dream in vain.
 Do you still remember the result of our dream analysis, that the wishes
 out of which the dream is constructed so frequently are of a perverse,
 incestuous nature, or disclose an enmity toward near and beloved
 relatives the existence of which had never been suspected? At the time
 we did not trace the sources of these evil impulses. Now you may see
 them for yourselves. They represent the disposition made in early
 infancy of the libidinous energy, with the objects, long since given up
 in conscious life, to which it had once clung, which are now shown at
 night to be still present and in a certain sense capable of activity.
 But since all people have such perverse, incestuous and murderous
 dreams, and not the neurotics alone, we may conclude that even those who
 are normal have passed through the same evolutionary development,
 through the perversions and the direction of the libidio toward the
 objects of the Oedipus-complex. This, then, is the way of normal
 development, upon which the neurotics merely enlarge. They show in
 cruder form what dream analysis exposes in the healthy dreamer as well.
 Accordingly here is one of the motives which led us to deal with the
 study of the dream before we considered the neurotic symptom.
 
 
 
 
 TWENTY-SECOND LECTURE
 
 GENERAL THEORY OF THE NEUROSES
 
 _Theories of Development and Regression--Etiology_
 
 
 We have learned that the libidio goes through an extensive development
 before it can enter the service of reproduction in a way which may be
 regarded as normal. Now I wish to present to you what importance this
 fact possesses for the causation of neuroses.
 
 I believe we are in harmony with the teachings of general pathology in
 assuming that this development involves two dangers, inhibition and
 regression. In other words, with the universal tendency of biological
 processes toward variation, it must necessarily happen that not all
 preparatory phases of a given function are equally well passed through
 or accomplished with comparable thoroughness. Certain components of a
 function may be permanently held back in an early stage of development
 and the complete development is therefore retarded to a certain extent.
 
 Let us seek analogies for these processes from other fields. If a whole
 people leaves its dwellings to seek a new home, as frequently happened
 in the early periods of the history of mankind, their entire number will
 certainly not reach the new destination. Setting aside other losses,
 small groups or associations of these wandering peoples would stop on
 the way, and, while the majority passes on, they would settle down at
 these way-stations. Or, to seek a more appropriate comparison: You know
 that in the most highly evolved mammals, the male seminal glands, which
 originally are located in the far depths of the abdominal cavity, begin
 to wander during a certain period of intra-uterine life until they reach
 a position almost immediately under the skin of the pelvic extremity. In
 the case of a number of male individuals, one of the paired glands may
 as a result of this wandering remain in the pelvic cavity, or may be
 permanently located in the canal through which both glands must pass in
 their journey, or finally the canal itself may stay open permanently
 instead of growing together with the seminal glands after the change of
 position has taken place normally. When, as a young student, I was doing
 my first piece of scientific research under the direction of von Brcke,
 I was working on the dorsal nerve-roots in the spinal cord of a small
 fish very archaic in form. I discovered that the nerve ganglia of these
 roots grow out from large cells which lie in the grey matter of the
 dorsal column, a condition no longer true of other vertebrates. But I
 soon discovered that such nerve cells are found outside the grey matter
 all the way to the so-called spinal ganglion of the dorsal root. From
 this I concluded that the cells of this group of ganglia had traveled
 from the spinal cord to the roots of the nerves. This same result is
 attested by embryology. In this little fish, however, the entire path of
 the journey was traceable by the cells that had remained behind. Closer
 observation will easily reveal to you the weak points of these
 comparisons. Therefore let me simply say that with reference to every
 single sexual impulse, I consider it possible for several of its
 components to be held back in the earlier stages of development while
 other components have worked themselves out to completion. You will
 realize that we think of every such impulse as a current continuously
 driving on from the very beginning of life, and that our resolving it
 into individual movements which follow separately one upon the other is
 to a certain extent artificial. Your impression that these concepts
 require further clarification is correct, but an attempt would lead to
 too great digression. Before we pass on, however, let us agree to call
 this arrest of a partial impulse in an early stage of development, a
 _fixation_ of the instinct.
 
 _Regression_ is the second danger of this development by stages. Even
 those components which have achieved a degree of progress may readily
 turn backward to these earlier stages. Having attained to this later and
 more highly developed form, the impulse is forced to a regression when
 it encounters great external difficulties in the exercise of its
 function, and accordingly cannot reach the goal which will satisfy its
 strivings. We can obviously assume that fixation and regression are not
 independent of each other. The stronger the fixations in the process of
 development prove to be, the more readily will the function evade
 external difficulties by a regression back to those fixations, and the
 less capable will the fully developed function be to withstand the
 hindrances that stand in the way of its exercise. Remember that if a
 people in its wandering has left large groups at certain way-stations,
 it is natural for those who have gone on to return to these stations if
 they are beaten or encounter a mighty foe. The more they have left on
 the way, however, the greater is their chance of defeat.
 
 For your comprehension of the neuroses it is necessary to keep in mind
 this connection between fixation and regression. This will give you a
 secure hold upon the question of the cause of neuroses--of the etiology
 of neuroses--which we shall soon consider.
 
 For the present we have still to discuss various aspects of regression.
 With the knowledge you have gained concerning the development of the
 function of libido, you must expect two kinds of regression: incestuous
 return to the first libidinous objects and return of the entire sexual
 organization to an earlier stage of development. Both occur in the
 transference neuroses and play an important part in its mechanism.
 Especially is the return to the first incestuous objects of libido a
 feature that the neurotic exhibits with positively tiresome regularity.
 We could say far more about regression of libido if we took into
 consideration another group of neuroses: neurotic narcism. But we cannot
 do this now. These conditions give us a clue to other stages of
 development of the function of libido, which have not been mentioned
 previously, and correspondingly show new kinds of regression. But I
 think the most important task before me at this point is to warn you not
 to confuse _regression_ and _suppression_, and aid you to see clearly
 the connection between the two processes. Suppression, as you know, is
 the process by which an act capable of becoming conscious, in other
 words, an act that belongs to the fore-conscious system, is rendered
 unconscious and accordingly is thrust back into the unconscious system.
 Similarly we speak of suppression when the unconscious psychic act never
 has been admitted into the adjoining fore-conscious system but is
 arrested by the censor at the threshold. Kindly observe that the
 conception of suppression has nothing to do with sexuality. It describes
 a purely psychological process, which could better be characterized by
 terming it _localized_. By that we mean that it is concerned with the
 spatial relationships within the psyche, or if we drop this crude
 metaphor, with building up the psychological apparatus out of separate,
 psychic systems.
 
 Through these comparisons we observe that up to this point we have not
 used the word regression in its general, but in a very special sense. If
 you accord it the general meaning of return from a higher to a lower
 stage of development you must include suppression as a form of
 regression, for suppression may also be described as the reversion to an
 earlier and lower stage in the development of a psychic act. Only in
 regard to suppression, this tendency to revert is not necessarily
 involved, for when a psychic act is held back in the early unconscious
 stage we also term it suppression in a dynamic sense. Suppression is a
 localized and dynamic conception, regression purely descriptive. What up
 this point we have called regression and considered in its relation to
 fixation, was only the return of libido to former stages of its
 development. The nature of this latter conception is entirely distinct
 and independent of suppression. We cannot call the libido regressions
 purely psychical processes and do not know what localization in the
 psychological apparatus we should assign to them. Even though the libido
 exerts a most powerful influence on psychic life, its organic
 significance is still the most conspicuous.
 
 Discussions of this sort, gentlemen, are bound to be somewhat dry. To
 render them more vivid and impressive, let us return to clinical
 illustrations. You know that hysteria and compulsion-neurosis are the
 two chief factors in the group of transference neuroses. In hysteria,
 libidinous return to primary, incestuous sexual objects is quite
 regular, but regression to a former stage of sexual organization very
 rare. In the mechanism of hysteria suppression plays the chief part. If
 you will permit me to supplement our previous positive knowledge of this
 neurosis by a constructive suggestion, I could describe the state of
 affairs in this manner: the union of the partial instincts under the
 domination of the genitals is accomplished, but its results encounter
 the opposition of the fore-conscious system which, of course, is bound
 up with consciousness. Genital organization, therefore, may stand for
 the unconscious but not for the fore-conscious. Through this rejection
 on the part of the fore-conscious, a situation arises which in certain
 aspects is similar to the condition existing before the genitals had
 attained their primacy. Of the two libido regressions, the regression to
 a former stage of sexual organization is by far the more conspicuous.
 Since it is lacking in hysteria and our entire conception of the
 neuroses is still too much dominated by the study of hysteria which
 preceded it in point of time, the meaning of libido regression became
 clearer to us much later than that of repression. Let us be prepared to
 widen and change our attitude still more when we consider other
 narcistic neuroses besides compulsion-neurosis and hysteria in our
 discussion.
 
 In contrast to this, regression of libido in compulsion-neurosis turns
 back most conspicuously to the earlier sadistico-anal organization,
 which accordingly becomes the most significant factor expressed by the
 symptoms. Under these conditions the love impulse must mask itself as a
 sadistic impulse. The compulsion idea must therefore be reinterpreted.
 Isolated from other superimposed factors, which though they are not
 accidental are also indispensable, it no longer reads: "I want to murder
 you"; rather it says "I want to enjoy you in love." Add to this, that
 simultaneously regression of the object has also set in, so that this
 impulse is invariably directed toward the nearest and dearest persons,
 and you can imagine with what horror the patient thinks of these
 compulsion ideas and how alien they appear to his conscious perception.
 In the mechanism of these neuroses, suppression, too, assumes an
 important part, which it is not easy to explain in a superficial
 discussion of this sort. Regression of the libido without suppression
 would never result in neurosis but would finally end in perversion. This
 makes it obvious that suppression is the process most characteristic of
 neurosis, and typifies it most perfectly. Perhaps I shall at some future
 time have the opportunity of presenting to you our knowledge of the
 mechanism of perversions and then you will see that here also things do
 not work themselves out as simply as we should best like to construe
 them.
 
 You will most readily reconcile yourself with these elucidations of
 fixation and regression, when you consider them as a preface to the
 investigation of the etiology of neuroses. Towards this I have only
 advanced a single fact: that people become neurotically ill when the
 possibility of satisfying their libido is removed, ill with "denial," as
 I expressed myself, and that their symptoms are the substitutes for the
 denied gratification. Of course, that does not mean that every denial of
 libidinous satisfaction makes every person neurotic, but merely that in
 all cases known of neurosis, the factor of denial was traceable. The
 syllogism therefore cannot be reversed. You also understand, I trust,
 that this statement is not supposed to reveal the entire secret of the
 etiology of neurosis, but only emphasizes an important and indispensable
 condition.
 
 Now, we do not know, in the further discussion of this statement,
 whether to emphasize the nature of denial or the individuality of the
 person affected by it. Denial is very rarely complete and absolute; to
 cause a pathological condition, the specific gratification desired by
 the particular person in question must be withheld, the certain
 satisfaction of which he alone is capable. On the whole there are many
 ways of enduring abstinence from libidinous gratification without
 succumbing to a neurosis by reason thereof. Above all we know of people
 who are able to endure abstinence without doing themselves injury; they
 are not happy under the circumstances, they are filled with yearning,
 but they do not become ill. Furthermore, we must take into consideration
 that the impulses of the sex instinct are extraordinarily _plastic_, if
 I may use that term in this connection. One thing may take the place of
 the other; one may assume the other's intensity; if reality refuses the
 one gratification, the satisfaction of another may offer full
 compensation. The sexual impulses are like a network of communicating
 channels filled with fluids; they are this in spite of their subjugation
 to the primacy of the genitals, though I realize it is difficult to
 unite these two ideas in one conception. The component impulses of
 sexuality as well as the total sexual desire, which represents their
 aggregate, show a marked ability to change their object, to exchange it,
 for instance, for one more easily attainable. This displacement and the
 readiness to accept substitutes must exert powerful influences in
 opposition to the pathological effect of abstinence. Among these
 processes which resist the ill effects of abstinence, one in particular
 has won cultural significance. Sexual desire relinquishes either its
 goal of partial gratification of desire, or the goal of desire toward
 reproduction, and adopts another aim, genetically related to the
 abandoned one, save that it is no longer sexual but must be termed
 social. This process is called "sublimation," and in adopting this
 process we subscribe to the general standard which places social aims
 above selfish sexual desires. Sublimation is, as a matter of fact, only
 a special case of the relation of sexual to non-sexual desires. We shall
 have occasion to talk more about this later in another connection.
 
 Now your impression will be that abstinence has become an insignificant
 factor, since there are so many methods of enduring it. Yet this is not
 the case, for its pathological power is unimpaired. The remedies are
 generally not sufficient. The measure of unsatisfied libido which the
 average human being can stand is limited. The plasticity and freedom of
 movement of libido is by no means retained to the same extent by all
 individuals; sublimation can, moreover, never account for more than a
 certain small fraction of the libido, and finally most people possess
 the capacity for sublimation only to a very slight degree. The most
 important of these limitations clearly lies in the adaptability of the
 libido, as it renders the gratification of the individual dependent upon
 the attainment of only a very few aims and objects. Kindly recall that
 incomplete development of the libido leaves extensive and possibly even
 numerous libido fixations in earlier developmental phases of the
 processes of sexual organization and object-finding, and that these
 phases are usually not capable of affording a real gratification. You
 will then recognize libido fixation as the second powerful factor which
 together with abstinence constitutes the causative factors of the
 illness. We may abbreviate schematically and say that libido fixation
 represents the internal disposing factor, abstinence the accidental
 external factor of the etiology of neurosis.
 
 I seize the opportunity to warn you of taking sides in a most
 unnecessary conflict. In scientific affairs it is a popular proceeding
 to emphasize a part of the truth in place of the whole truth and to
 combat all the rest, which has lost none of its verity, in the name of
 that fraction. In this way various factions have already separated out
 from the movement of psychoanalysis; one faction recognizes only the
 egoistic impulses and denies the sexual, another appreciates the
 influence of objective tasks in life, but ignores the part played by the
 individual past, and so on. Here is occasion for a similar antithesis
 and subject for dispute: are neuroses _exogenous_ or _endogenous_
 diseases, are they the inevitable results of a special constitution or
 the product of certain harmful (traumatic) impressions; in particular,
 are they called forth by libido fixation (and the sexual constitution
 which goes with this) or through the pressure of forbearance? This
 dilemma seems to me no whit wiser than another I could present to you:
 is the child created through the generation of the father or the
 conception of the mother? Both factors are equally essential, you will
 answer very properly. The conditions which cause neuroses are very
 similar if not precisely the same. For the consideration of the causes
 of neuroses, we may arrange neurotic diseases in a series, in which two
 factors, sexual constitution and experience, or, if you wish,
 libido-fixation and self-denial, are represented in such a way that one
 increases as the other decreases. At one end of the series are the
 extreme cases, of which you can say with full conviction: These persons
 would have become ill because of the peculiar development of their
 libido, no matter what they might have experienced, no matter how gently
 life might have treated them. At the other end are cases which would
 call forth the reversed judgment, that the patients would undoubtedly
 have escaped illness if life had not thrust certain conditions upon
 them. But in the intermediate cases of the series, predisposing sexual
 constitution and subversive demands of life combine. Their sexual
 constitution would not have given rise to neurosis if the victims had
 not had such experiences, and their experiences would not have acted
 upon them traumatically if the conditions of the libido had been
 otherwise. Within this series I may grant a certain preponderance to the
 weight carried by the predisposing factors, but this admission, too,
 depends upon the boundaries within which you wish to delimit
 nervousness.
 
 Allow me to suggest that you call such series _complementary series_. We
 shall have occasion to establish other series of this sort.
 
 The tenacity with which the libido clings to certain tendencies and
 objects, the so-called _adhesiveness_ of the libido, appears to us as an
 independent factor, individually variable, the determining conditions of
 which are completely unknown to us, but the importance of which for the
 etiology of the neuroses we can no longer underestimate. At the same
 time we must not overestimate the closeness of this interrelation. A
 similar adhesiveness of the libido occurs--for unknown reasons--in
 normal persons under various conditions, and is a determining factor in
 the perverse, who are in a certain sense the opposite of nervous. Before
 the period of psychoanalysis, it was known (Binet) that the anamnesia of
 the perverse is often traced back to an early impression--an abnormality
 in the tendency of the instinct or its choice of object--and it is to
 this that the libido of the individual has clung for life. Frequently it
 is hard to say how such an impression becomes capable of attracting the
 libido so intensively. I shall give you a case of this kind which I
 observed myself. A man, to whom the genital and all other sex stimuli of
 woman now mean nothing, who in fact can only be thrown into an
 irresistible sexual excitation by the sight of a shoe on a foot of a
 certain form, is able to recall an experience he had in his sixth year,
 which proved decisive for the fixation of his libido. One day he sat on
 a stool beside his governess, who was to give him an English lesson. She
 was an old, shriveled, unbeautiful girl with washed-out blue eyes and a
 pug nose, who on this day, because of some injury, had put a velvet
 slipper on her foot and stretched it out on a footstool; the leg itself
 she had most decorously covered. After a diffident attempt at normal
 sexual activity, undertaken during puberty, such a thin sinewy foot as
 his governess' had become the sole object of his sexuality; and the man
 was irresistibly carried away if other features, reminiscent of the
 English governess, appeared in conjunction with the foot. Through this
 fixation of the libido the man did not become neurotic but perverse, a
 foot fetishist, as we say. So you see that, although exaggerated and
 premature fixation of the libido is indispensable for the causation of
 neuroses, its sphere of action exceeds the limits of neuroses
 immeasurably. This condition also, taken by itself, is no more decisive
 than abstinence.
 
 And so the problem of the cause of neuroses seems to become more
 complicated. Psychoanalytic investigation does, in fact, acquaint us
 with a new factor, not considered in our etiological series, which is
 recognized most easily in those cases where permanent well-being is
 suddenly disturbed by an attack of neurosis. These individuals regularly
 show signs of contradiction between their wishes, or, as we are wont to
 say, indication of psychic _conflict_. A part of their personality
 represents certain wishes, another rebels against them and resists
 them. A neurosis cannot come into existence without such conflict. This
 may seem to be of small significance. You know that our psychic life is
 continually agitated by conflicts for which we must find a solution.
 Certain conditions, therefore, must exist to make such a conflict
 pathological. We want to know what these conditions are, what psychic
 powers form the background for these pathological conflicts, what
 relation the conflict bears to the causative factors.
 
 I hope I shall be able to give you satisfactory answers to these
 questions even if I must make them schematically brief. Self-denial
 gives rise to conflict, for libido deprived of its gratification is
 forced to seek other means and ends. A pathogenic conflict arises when
 these other means and ends arouse the disfavor of one part of the
 personality, and a veto ensues which makes the new mode of gratification
 impossible for the time being. This is the point of departure for the
 development of the symptoms, a process which we shall consider later.
 The rejected libidinous desires manage to have their own way, through
 circuitous byways, but not without catering to the objections through
 the observance of certain symptom-formation; the symptoms are the new or
 substitute satisfaction which the condition of self-denial has made
 necessary.
 
 We can express the significance of the psychic conflict in another way,
 by saying: the _outer_ self-denial, in order to become pathological,
 must be supplemented by an _inner_ self-denial. Outer denial removes one
 possibility of gratification, inner denial would like to exclude another
 possibility, and it is this second possibility which becomes the center
 of the ensuing conflict. I prefer this form of presentation because it
 possesses secret content. It implies the probability that the inner
 impediment found its origin in the prehistoric stage of human
 development in real external hindrances.
 
 What powers are these which interpose objections to libidinous desire,
 who are the other parties to the pathological conflict? They are, in the
 widest sense, the non-sexual impulses. We call them comprehensively the
 "ego impulses"; psychoanalysis of transference neuroses does not grant
 us ready access to their further investigation, but we learn to know
 them, in a measure, through the resistance they offer to analysis. The
 pathological struggle is waged between ego-impulses and sexual impulses.
 In a series of cases it appears as though conflict could exist between
 various purely sexual desires; but that is really the same thing, for of
 the two sexual desires involved in the conflict, one is always
 considerate of the ego, while the other demands that the ego be denied,
 and so it remains a conflict between the ego and sexuality.
 
 Again and again when psychoanalysis claimed that psychological event was
 the result of sexual impulses, indignant protest was raised that in
 psychic life there were other impulses and interests besides the sexual,
 that everything could not be derived from sexuality, etc. Well, it is a
 great pleasure to share for once the opinion of one's opponents.
 Psychoanalysis never forgot that non-sexual impulses exist. It insisted
 on the decided distinction between sexual and ego-impulses and
 maintained in the face of every objection not that neuroses arise from
 sexuality, but that they owe their origin to the conflict between
 sexuality and the ego. Psychoanalysis can have no reasonable motive for
 denying the existence or significance of ego-impulses, even though it
 investigates the influence sexual impulses play in illness and in life.
 Only it has been destined to deal primarily with sexual impulses,
 because transference neuroses have furnished the readiest access to
 their investigation, and because it had become obligatory to study what
 others had neglected.
 
 It does not follow, either, that psychoanalysis has never occupied
 itself at all with the non-sexual side of personality. The very
 distinction of the ego from sexuality has shown most clearly that the
 ego-impulses also pass through a significant development, which is by no
 means entirely independent of the development of the libido, nor does it
 fail to exert a reaction upon it. To be sure, we know much less about
 the evolution of the ego than about libido development, for so far only
 the study of narcistic neuroses has promised to throw light on the
 structure of the ego. There is extant the notable attempt of Ferenczi to
 construct theoretically the stages of ego development, and furthermore
 we already possess two fixed points from which to proceed in our
 evolution of this development. We do not dream of asserting that the
 libidinous interests of a person are from the outset opposed to the
 interests of self-preservation; in every stage, rather, the ego will
 strive to remain in harmony with its sexual organization at that time,
 and accommodate itself thereto. The succession of the separate phases
 of development of libido probably follows a prescribed program; but we
 cannot deny that this sequence can be influenced by the ego, and that a
 certain parallelism of the phases of development of the ego and the
 libido may also be assumed. Indeed, the disturbance of this parallelism
 could become a pathological factor. One of the most important insights
 we have to gain is the nature of the attitude which the ego exhibits
 when an intensive fixation of its libido is left behind in one stage of
 its development. It may countenance the fixation and accordingly become
 perverse or, what amounts to the same thing, become infantile. Or it may
 be averse to this attachment of the libido, the result of which is that
 wherever the libido is subject to _fixation_, there the ego undergoes
 _suppression_.
 
 In this way we reach the conclusion that the third factor of the
 etiology of neuroses is the tendency to _conflict_, upon which the
 development both of the ego and libido are dependent. Our insight into
 the causation of the neuroses has therefore been amplified. First, the
 most generalized factor, self-denial, then the fixation of the libido,
 by which it is forced into certain directions, and thirdly, the tendency
 to conflict in the development of the ego, which has rejected libidinous
 impulses of this kind. The state of affairs is therefore not so confused
 and difficult to see through, as you may have imagined it to be in the
 course of my explanation. But of course we are to discover that we have
 not, as yet, reached the end. We must add still a new factor and further
 analyze one we already know.
 
 To show you the influence of ego development in the formation of a
 conflict, and so to give an illustration of the causation of neuroses, I
 should like to cite an example which, although it is entirely imaginary,
 is not far removed from probability in any respect. Drawing upon the
 title of a farce by Nestroy, I shall label this example "On the ground
 floor and in the first story." The janitor lives on the ground floor,
 while the owner of the house, a rich, distinguished man, occupies the
 first story. Both have children, and we shall assume that the owner
 permits his little daughter to play unwatched with the child of the
 people. Then it may easily happen that the games of the children become
 "naughty," that is, they assume a sexual character; they play "father
 and mother," watch each other in the performance of intimate
 performances and mutually stimulate their genitals. The janitor's
 daughter, who, in spite of her five or six years of age, has had
 occasion to make observations on the sexuality of adults, probably
 played the part of the seducer. These experiences, even though they be
 of short duration, are sufficient to set in motion certain sexual
 impulses in both children, which continue in the form of onanism for
 several years after the common games have ceased. So far the
 consequences are similar; the final result will be very different. The
 janitor's daughter will continue onanism possibly to the commencement of
 her periods, abandon it then without difficulty, not many years later
 find a lover, perhaps bear a child, choose this or that path of life,
 which may likely enough make of her a popular artist who ends as an
 aristocrat. Perhaps the outcome will be less brilliant, but at any rate
 she will work out her life, free from neurosis, unharmed by her
 premature sexual activity. Very different is the effect on the other
 child. Even while she is very young she will realize vaguely that she
 has done wrong. In a short while, perhaps only after a violent struggle,
 she will renounce the gratification of onanism, yet still retain an
 undercurrent of depression in her attitude. If, during her early
 childhood, she chances to learn something about sexual intercourse, she
 will turn away in explicable disgust and seek to remain innocent.
 Probably she is at the time subjected anew to an irresistible impulse to
 onanism, of which she does not dare to complain. When the time arrives
 for her to find favor in the eyes of a man, a neurosis will suddenly
 develop and cheat her out of marriage and the joy of life. When analysis
 succeeds in gaining insight into this neurosis, it will reveal that this
 well-bred, intelligent girl of high ideals, has completely suppressed
 her sexual desires, but that unconsciously they cling to the meager
 experiences she had with the friend of her childhood.
 
 The difference of these two destinies, arising from the same experience,
 is due to the fact that one ego has experienced development while the
 other has not. The janitor's daughter in later years looks upon sexual
 intercourse as the same natural and harmless thing it had seemed in her
 childhood. The owner's daughter had experienced the influence of
 education and had recognized its claims. Thus stimulated, her ego had
 forged its ideals of womanly purity and lack of desire which, however,
 could not agree with any sexual activity; her intellectual development
 had made unworthy her interest in the woman's part she was to play. This
 higher moral and intellectual evolution of her ego was in conflict with
 the claims of her sexuality.
 
 I should like to consider today one more point in the development of the
 ego, partly because it opens wide vistas, partly because it will justify
 the sharp, perhaps unnatural line of division we are wont to draw
 between sexual and ego impulses. In estimating the several developments
 of ego and of libido, we must emphasize an aspect which has not
 frequently been appreciated heretofore. Both the ego and the libido are
 fundamentally heritages, abbreviated repetitions of an evolution which
 mankind has, in the course of long periods of time, traversed from
 primeval ages. The libido shows its phylogenetic origin most readily, I
 should say. Recall, if you please, that in one class of animals the
 genital apparatus is closely connected with the mouth, that in another
 it cannot be separated from the excretory apparatus, and in others it is
 attached to organs of locomotion. Of all these things you will find a
 most fascinating description in the valuable book of W. Blsche. Animals
 portray, so to speak, all kinds of perversions which have become set as
 their permanent sexual organizations. In man this phylogenetic aspect is
 partly clouded by the circumstance that these activities, although
 fundamentally inherited, are achieved anew in individual development,
 presumably because the same conditions still prevail and still continue
 to exert their influence on each personality. I should say that
 originally they served to call forth an activity, where they now serve
 only as a stimulus for recollection. There is no doubt that in addition
 the course of development in each individual, which has been innately
 determined, may be disturbed or altered from without by recent
 influences. That power which has forced this development upon mankind,
 and which today maintains the identical pressure, is indeed known to us:
 it is the same self-denial enforced by the realities--or, given its big
 and actual name, _Necessity_, the struggle for existence, the .
 This has been a severe teacher, but under him we have become potent. The
 neurotics are those children upon whom this severity has had a bad
 effect--but there is risk in all education. This appreciation of the
 struggle of life as the moving force of development need not prejudice
 us against the importance of "innate tendencies in evolution" if their
 existence can be proved.
 
 It is worth noting that sexual instincts and instincts of
 self-preservation do not behave similarly when they are confronted with
 the necessities of actuality. It is easier to educate the instincts of
 self-preservation and everything that is connected with them; they
 speedily learn to adapt themselves to necessity and to arrange their
 development in accordance with the mandates of fact. That is easy to
 understand, for they cannot procure the objects they require in any
 other way; without these objects the individual must perish. The sex
 instincts are more difficult to educate because at the outset they do
 not suffer from the need of an object. As they are related almost
 parasitically to the other functions of the body and gratify themselves
 auto-erotically by way of their own body, they are at first withdrawn
 from the educational influence of real necessity. In most people, they
 maintain themselves in some way or other during the entire course of
 life as those characteristics of obstinacy and inaccessibility to
 influence which are generally collectively called unreasonableness. The
 education of youth generally comes to an end when the sexual demands are
 aroused to their full strength. Educators know this and act accordingly;
 but perhaps the results of psychoanalysis will influence them to
 transfer the greatest emphasis to the education of the early years, of
 childhood, beginning with the suckling. The little human being is
 frequently a finished product in his fourth or fifth year, and only
 reveals gradually in later years what has long been ready within him.
 
 To appreciate the full significance of the aforementioned difference
 between the two groups of instincts, we must digress considerably and
 introduce a consideration which we must needs call _economic_. Thereby
 we enter upon one of the most important but unfortunately one of the
 most obscure domains of psychoanalysis. We ask ourselves whether a
 fundamental purpose is recognizable in the workings of our psychological
 apparatus, and answer immediately that this purpose is the pursuit of
 pleasurable excitement. It seems as if our entire psychological activity
 were directed toward gaining pleasurable stimulation, toward avoiding
 painful ones; that it is regulated automatically by the _principle of
 pleasure_. Now we should like to know, above all, what conditions cause
 the creation of pleasure and pain, but here we fall short. We may only
 venture to say that pleasurable excitation _in some way_ involves
 lessening, lowering or obliterating the amount of stimuli present in the
 psychic apparatus. This amount, on the other hand, is increased by pain.
 Examination of the most intense pleasurable excitement accessible to
 man, the pleasure which accompanies the performance of the sexual act,
 leaves small doubt on this point. Since such processes of pleasure are
 concerned with the destinies of quantities of psychic excitation or
 energy, we call considerations of this sort economic. It thus appears
 that we can describe the tasks and performances of the psychic apparatus
 in different and more generalized terms than by the emphasis of the
 pursuit of pleasure. We may say that the psychic apparatus serves the
 purpose of mastering and bringing to rest the mass of stimuli and the
 stimulating forces which approach it. The sexual instincts obviously
 show their aim of pleasurable excitement from the beginning to the end
 of their development; they retain this original function without much
 change. The ego instincts strive at first for the same thing. But
 through the influence of their teacher, necessity, the ego instincts
 soon learn to adduce some qualification to the principle of pleasure.
 The task of avoiding pain becomes an objective almost comparable to the
 gain of pleasure; the ego learns that its direct gratification is
 unavoidably withheld, the gain of pleasurable excitement postponed, that
 always a certain amount of pain must be borne and certain sources of
 pleasure entirely relinquished. This educated ego has become
 "reasonable." It is no longer controlled by the principle of pleasure,
 but by the _principle of fact_, which at bottom also aims at pleasure,
 but pleasure which is postponed and lessened by considerations of fact.
 
 The transition from the pleasure principle to that of fact is the most
 important advance in the development of the ego. We already know that
 the sexual instincts pass through this stage unwillingly and late. We
 shall presently learn the consequence to man of the fact that his
 sexuality admits of such a loose relation to the external realities of
 his life. Yet one more observation belongs here. Since the ego of man
 has, like the libido, its history of evolution, you will not be
 surprised to hear that there are "ego-regressions," and you will want to
 know what role this return of the ego to former phases of development
 plays in neurotic disease.
 
 
 
 
 TWENTY-THIRD LECTURE
 
 GENERAL THEORY OF THE NEUROSES
 
 _The Development of the Symptoms_
 
 
 In the layman's eyes the symptom shows the nature of the disease, and
 cure means removal of symptoms. The physician, however, finds it
 important to distinguish the symptoms from the disease and recognizes
 that doing away with the symptoms is not necessarily curing the disease.
 Of course, the only tangible thing left over after the removal of the
 symptoms is the capacity to build new symptoms. Accordingly, for the
 time being, let us accept the layman's viewpoint and consider the
 understanding of the symptoms as equivalent to the understanding of the
 sickness.
 
 The symptoms,--of course, we are dealing here with psychic (or
 psychogenic) symptoms, and psychic illness--are acts which are
 detrimental to life as a whole, or which are at least useless;
 frequently they are obnoxious to the individual who performs them and
 are accompanied by distaste and suffering. The principal injury lies in
 the psychic exertion which they cost, and in the further exertion needed
 to combat them. The price these efforts exact may, when there is an
 extensive development of the symptoms, bring about an extraordinary
 impoverishment of the personality of the patient with respect to his
 available psychic energy, and consequently cripple him in all the
 important tasks of life. Since such an outcome is dependent on the
 amount of energy so utilized, you will readily understand that "being
 sick" is essentially a practical concept. But if you take a theoretical
 standpoint and disregard these quantitative relations, you can readily
 say that we are all sick, or rather neurotic, since the conditions
 favorable to the development of symptoms are demonstrable also among
 normal persons.
 
 As to the neurotic symptoms, we already know that they are the result of
 a conflict aroused by a new form of gratifying the libido. The two
 forces that have contended against each other meet once more in the
 symptom; they become reconciled through the compromise of a symptom
 development. That is why the symptom is capable of such resistance; it
 is sustained from both sides. We also know that one of the two partners
 to the conflict is the unsatisfied libido, frustrated by reality, which
 must now seek other means for its satisfaction. If reality remains
 inflexible even where the libido is prepared to take another object in
 place of the one denied it, the libido will then finally be compelled to
 resort to regression and to seek gratification in one of the earlier
 stages in its organizations already out-lived, or by means of one of the
 objects given up in the past. Along the path of regression the libido is
 enticed by fixations which it has left behind at these stages in its
 development.
 
 Here the development toward perversion branches off sharply from that of
 the neuroses. If the regressions do not awaken the resistance of the
 ego, then a neurosis does not follow and the libido arrives at some
 actual, even if abnormal, satisfaction. The ego, however, controls not
 alone consciousness, but also the approaches to motor innervation, and
 hence the realization of psychic impulses. If the ego then does not
 approve this regression, the conflict takes place. The libido is locked
 out, as it were, and must seek refuge in some place where it can find an
 outlet for its fund of energy, in accordance with the controlling
 demands for pleasurable gratification. It must withdraw from the ego.
 Such an evasion is offered by the fixations established in the course of
 its evolution and now traversed regressively, against which the ego had,
 at the time, protected itself by suppressions. The libido, streaming
 back, occupies these suppressed positions and thus withdraws from before
 the ego and its laws. At the same time, however, it throws off all the
 influences acquired under its tutelage. The libido could be guided so
 long as there was a possibility of its being satisfied; under the double
 pressure of external and internal denial it becomes unruly and harks
 back to former and more happy times. Such is its character,
 fundamentally unchangeable. The ideas which the libido now takes over in
 order to hold its energy belong to the system of the unconscious, and
 are therefore subject to its peculiar processes, especially elaboration
 and displacement. Conditions are set up here which are entirely
 comparable to those of dream formation. Just as the latent dream, the
 fulfillment of a wish-phantasy, is first built up in the
 unconsciousness, but must then pass through conscious processes before,
 censored and approved, it can enter into the compromise construction of
 the manifest dream, so the ideas representing the libido in the
 unconscious must still contend against the power of the fore-conscious
 ego. The opposition that has arisen against it in the ego follows it
 down by a "counter-siege" and forces it to choose such an expression as
 will serve at the same time to express itself. Thus, then, the symptom
 comes into being as a much distorted offshoot from the unconscious
 libidinous wish-fulfillment, an artificially selected ambiguity--with
 two entirely contradictory meanings. In this last point alone do we
 realize a difference between dream and symptom development, for the only
 fore-conscious purpose in dream formation is the maintenance of sleep,
 the exclusion from consciousness of anything which may disturb sleep;
 but it does not necessarily oppose the unconscious wish impulse with an
 insistent "No." Quite the contrary; the purpose of the dream may be more
 tolerant, because the situation of the sleeper is a less dangerous one.
 The exit to reality is closed only through the condition of sleep.
 
 You see, this evasion which the libido finds under the conditions of the
 conflict is possible only by virtue of the existing fixations. When
 these fixations are taken in hand by the regression, the suppression is
 side-tracked and the libido, which must maintain itself under the
 conditions of the compromise, is led off or gratified. By means of such
 a detour by way of the unconscious and the old fixations, the libido has
 at last succeeded in breaking its way through to some sort of
 gratification, however extraordinarily limited this may seem and however
 unrecognizable any longer as a genuine satisfaction. Now allow me to add
 two further remarks concerning this final result. In the first place, I
 should like you to take note of the intimate connection between the
 libido and the unconscious on the one hand, and on the other of the ego,
 consciousness, and reality. The connection that is evidenced here,
 however, does not indicate that originally they in any way belong
 together. I should like you to bear continually in mind that everything
 I have said here, and all that will follow, pertains only to the symptom
 development of hysterical neurosis.
 
 Where, now, can the libido find the fixations which it must have in
 order to force its way through the suppressions? In the activities and
 experiences of infantile sexuality, in its abandoned component-impulses,
 its childish objects which have been given up. The libido again returns
 to them. The significance of this period of childhood is a double one;
 on the one hand, the instinctive tendencies which were congenital in the
 child first showed themselves at this time; secondly, at the same time,
 environmental influences and chance experiences were first awakening his
 other instincts. I believe our right to establish this bipartite
 division cannot be questioned. The assertion that the innate disposition
 plays a part is hardly open to criticism, but analytic experience
 actually makes it necessary for us to assume that purely accidental
 experiences of childhood are capable of leaving fixations of the libido.
 I do not see any theoretical difficulties here. Congenital tendencies
 undoubtedly represent the after-effects of the experiences of an earlier
 ancestry; they must also have once been acquired; without such acquired
 characters there could be no heredity. And is it conceivable that the
 inheritance of such acquired characters comes to a standstill in the
 very generation that we have under observation? The significance of
 infantile experience, however, should not, as is so often done, be
 completely ignored as compared with ancestral experiences or those of
 our adult years; on the contrary, they should meet with an especial
 appreciation. They have such important results because they occur in the
 period of uncompleted development, and because of this very fact are in
 a position to cause a traumatic effect. The researches on the mechanics
 of development by Roux and others have shown us that a needle prick into
 an embryonic cell mass which is undergoing division results in most
 serious developmental disturbances. The same injury to a larva or a
 completed animal can be borne without injury.
 
 The libido fixation of adults, which we have referred to as
 representative of the constitutional factor in the etiological
 comparison of the neuroses, can be thought of, so far as we are
 concerned, as divisible into two separate factors, the inherited
 disposition and the tendency acquired in early childhood. We know that a
 schematic representation is most acceptable to the student. Let us
 combine these relations as follows:
 
                               Disposition as             accidental
   Cause of the                determined by              experiences
     neurosis           ==     libido fixation     +      (traumatic
                                                           element)
                                      |
            +-------------------------+------------------------+
            |                                                  |
      Sexual constitution                             Infantile experience
   (pre-historic experience)
 
 The hereditary sexual constitution provides us with manifold tendencies,
 varying with the special emphasis given one or the other component of
 the instinct, either individually or in combination. With the factor of
 infantile experience, there is again built up a complementary series
 within the sexual constitution which is perfectly comparable with our
 first series, namely, the gradations between disposition and the chance
 experiences of the adult. Here again we find the same extreme cases and
 similar relations in the matter of substitution. At this point the
 question becomes pertinent as to whether the most striking regressions
 of the libido, those which hark back to very early stages in sexual
 organization, are not essentially conditioned by the hereditary
 constitutional factor. The answer to this question, however, may best be
 put off until we are in a position to consider a wider range in the
 forms of neurotic disease.
 
 Let us devote a little time to the consideration of the fact that
 analytic investigation of neurotics shows the libido to be bound up with
 the infantile sexual experiences of these persons. In this light they
 seem of enormous importance for both the life and health of mankind.
 With respect to therapeutic work their importance remains undiminished.
 But when we do not take this into account we can herein readily
 recognize the danger of being misled by the situation as it exists in
 neurotics into adopting a mistaken and one-sided orientation toward
 life. In figuring the importance of the infantile experiences we must
 also subtract the influences arising from the fact that the libido has
 returned to them by regression, after having been forced out of its
 later positions. Thus we approach the opposite conclusion, that
 experiences of the libido had no importance whatever in their own time,
 but rather acquired it at the time of regression. You will remember that
 we were led to a similar alternative in the discussion of the
 Oedipus-complex.
 
 A decision on this matter will hardly be difficult for us. The statement
 is undoubtedly correct that the hold which the infantile experiences
 have on the libido--with the pathogenic influences this involves--is
 greatly augmented by the regression; still, to allow them to become
 definitive would nevertheless be misleading. Other considerations must
 be taken into account as well. In the first place, observation shows, in
 a way that leaves no room for doubt, that infantile experiences have
 their particular significance which is evidenced already during
 childhood. There are, furthermore, neuroses in children in which the
 factor of displacement in time is necessarily greatly minimized or is
 entirely lacking, since the illness follows as an immediate consequence
 of the traumatic experience. The study of these infantile neuroses keeps
 us from many dangerous misunderstandings of adult neuroses, just as the
 dreams of children similarly serve as the key to the understanding of
 the dreams of adults. As a matter of fact, the neuroses of children are
 very frequent, far more frequent than is generally believed. They are
 often overlooked, dismissed as signs of badness or naughtiness, and
 often suppressed by the authority of the nursery; in retrospect,
 however, they may be easily recognized later. They occur most frequently
 in the form of _anxiety hysteria_. What this implies we shall learn upon
 another occasion. When a neurosis breaks out in later life, analysis
 regularly shows that it is a direct continuation of that infantile
 malady which had perhaps developed only obscurely and incipiently.
 However, there are cases, as already stated, in which this childish
 nervousness continues, without any interruption, as a lifelong
 affliction. We have been able to analyze a very few examples of such
 neuroses during childhood, while they were actually going on; much more
 often we had to be satisfied with obtaining our insight into the
 childhood neurosis subsequently, when the patient is already well along
 in life, under conditions in which we are forced to work with certain
 corrections and under definite precautions.
 
 Secondly, we must admit that the universal regression of the libido to
 the period of childhood would be inexplicable if there were nothing
 there which could exert an attraction for it. The fixation which we
 assume to exist towards specific developmental phases, conveys a meaning
 only if we think of it as stabilizing a definite amount of libidinous
 energy. Finally, I am able to remind you that here there exists a
 complementary relationship between the intensity and the pathogenic
 significance of the infantile experiences to the later ones which is
 similar to that studied in previous series. There are cases in which the
 entire causal emphasis falls upon the sexual experiences of childhood,
 in which these impressions take on an effect which is unmistakably
 traumatic and in which no other basis exists for them beyond what the
 average sexual constitution and its immaturity can offer. Side by side
 with these there are others in which the whole stress is brought to bear
 by the later conflicts, and the emphasis the analysis places on
 childhood impressions appears entirely as the work of regression. There
 are also extremes of "retarded development" and "regression," and
 between them every combination in the interaction of the two factors.
 
 These relations have a certain interest for that pedagogy which assumes
 as its object the prevention of neuroses by an early interference in the
 sexual development of the child. So long as we keep our attention fixed
 essentially on the infantile sexual experiences, we readily come to
 believe we have done everything for the prophylaxis of nervous
 afflictions when we have seen to it that this development is retarded,
 and that the child is spared this type of experience. Yet we already
 know that the conditions for the causation of neuroses are more
 complicated and cannot in general be influenced through one single
 factor. The strict protection in childhood loses its value because it is
 powerless against the constitutional factor; furthermore, it is more
 difficult to carry out than the educators imagine, and it brings with it
 two new dangers that cannot be lightly dismissed. It accomplishes too
 much, for it favors a degree of sexual suppression which is harmful for
 later years, and it sends the child into life without the power to
 resist the violent onset of sexual demands that must be expected during
 puberty. The profit, therefore, which childhood prophylaxis can yield is
 most dubious; it seems, indeed, that better success in the prevention of
 neuroses can be gained by attacking the problem through a changed
 attitude toward facts.
 
 Let us return to the consideration of the symptoms. They serve as
 substitutes for the gratification which has been forborne, by a
 regression of the libido to earlier days, with a return to former
 development phases in their choice of object and in their organization.
 We learned some time ago that the neurotic is held fast somewhere in his
 past; we now know that it is a period of his past in which his libido
 did not miss the satisfaction which made him happy. He looks for such a
 time in his life until he has found it, even though he must hark back to
 his suckling days as he retains them in his memory or as he reconstructs
 them in the light of later influences. The symptom in some way again
 yields the old infantile form of satisfaction, distorted by the
 censoring work of the conflict. As a rule it is converted into a
 sensation of suffering and fused with other causal elements of the
 disease. The form of gratification which the symptom yields has much
 about it that alienates one's sympathy. In this we omit to take into
 account, however, the fact that the patients do not recognize the
 gratification as such and experience the apparent satisfaction rather as
 suffering, and complain of it. This transformation is part of the
 psychic conflict under the pressure of which the symptom must be
 developed. What was at one time a satisfaction for the individual must
 now awaken his antipathy or disgust. We know a simple but instructive
 example for such a change of feeling. The same child that sucked the
 milk with such voracity from its mother's breast is apt to show a strong
 antipathy for milk a few years later, which is often difficult to
 overcome. This antipathy increases to the point of disgust when the
 milk, or any substituted drink, has a little skin over it. It is rather
 hard to throw out the suggestion that this skin calls up the memory of
 the mother's breast, which was once so intensely coveted. In the
 meantime, to be sure, the traumatic experience of weaning has
 intervened.
 
 There is something else that makes the symptoms appear remarkable and
 inexplicable as a means of libidinous satisfaction. They in no way
 recall anything from which we normally are in the habit of expecting
 satisfaction. They usually require no object, and thereby give up all
 connection with external reality. We understand this to be a result of
 turning away from fact and of returning to the predominance of
 pleasurable gratification. But it is also a return to a sort of
 amplified autoeroticism, such as was yielded the sex impulse in its
 earliest satisfactions. In the place of a modification in the outside
 world, we have a physical change, in other words, an internal reaction
 in place of an external one, an adjustment instead of an activity.
 Viewed from a phylogenetic standpoint, this expresses a very significant
 regression. We will grasp this better when we consider it in connection
 with a new factor which we are still to discover from the analytic
 investigation of symptom development. Further, we recall that in symptom
 formation the same processes of the unconscious have been at work as in
 dream formation--elaboration and displacement. Similarly to the dream,
 the symptom represents a fulfillment, a satisfaction after the manner of
 the infantile; by the utmost elaboration this satisfaction can be
 compressed into a single sensation or innervation, or by extreme
 displacement it may be restricted to a tiny element of the entire
 libidinous complex. It is no wonder that we often have difficulties in
 recognizing in the symptom the libidinous satisfaction which we
 anticipate and always find verified.
 
 I have indicated that we must still become familiar with a new factor.
 It is something really surprising and confusing. You know that by
 analysis of the symptoms we arrive at a knowledge of the infantile
 experiences upon which the libido is fixated and out of which the
 symptoms are formed. Well, the surprising thing is this, that these
 infantile scenes are not always true. Indeed, in the majority of cases
 they are untrue, and in some instances they are directly contrary to
 historical truth. You see that this discovery, as no other, serves
 either to discredit the analysis which has led to such a result, or to
 discredit the patients upon whose testimony the analysis, as well as the
 whole understanding of neuroses, is built up. In addition there is
 something else utterly confusing about it. If the infantile experiences,
 revealed by analysis, were in every case real, we should have the
 feeling of walking on sure ground; if they were regularly falsified,
 disclosed themselves as inventions or phantasies of the patients, we
 should have to leave this uncertain ground and find a surer footing
 elsewhere. But it is neither the one nor the other, for when we look
 into the matter we find that the childhood experiences which are
 recalled or reconstructed in the course of the analysis may in some in
 some instances be false, in others undeniably true, and in the majority
 of cases a mixture of truth and fiction. The symptoms then are either
 the representation of actual experiences to which we may ascribe an
 influence in the fixation of the libido, or the representation of
 phantasies of the patient which, of course, can be of no etiological
 significance. It is hard to find one's way here. The first foothold is
 given perhaps by an analogous discovery, namely, that the same scattered
 childhood memories that individuals always have had and have been
 conscious of prior to an analysis may be falsified as well, or at least
 may contain a generous mixture of true and false. Evidence of error very
 seldom offers difficulties, and we at least gain the satisfaction of
 knowing that the blame for this unexpected disappointment is not to be
 laid at the door of analysis, but in some way upon the patients.
 
 After reflecting a bit we can easily understand what is so confusing in
 this matter. It is the slight regard for reality, the neglect to keep
 fact distinct from phantasy. We are apt to feel insulted that the
 patient has wasted our time with invented tales. There is an enormous
 gap in our thinking between reality and invention and we accord an
 entirely different valuation to reality. The patient, too, takes this
 same viewpoint in his normal thinking. When he offers the material
 which, by way of the symptom, leads back to the wish situations which
 are modeled upon the childhood experiences, we are at first, to be sure,
 in doubt whether we are dealing with reality or with phantasy. Later
 certain traits determine this decision; we are confronted with the task
 of acquainting the patient with them. This can never be accomplished
 without difficulty. If at the outset we tell him that he is going to
 reveal phantasies with which he has veiled his childhood history, just
 as every people weaves myths around its antiquity, we notice (to our
 comfort) that his interest in the further pursuit of the subject
 suddenly diminishes. He, too, wants to discover realities, and despises
 all "notions." But if until this is accomplished we allow him to believe
 that we are investigating the actual occurrences of his childhood, we
 run the risk of later being charged with error and with our apparent
 gullibility. For a long time he is unable to reconcile himself to the
 idea of considering phantasy and reality on equal terms and he tends,
 with reference to the childish experiences to be explained, to neglect
 for the time being the difference between the real and the imaginary.
 And yet this is obviously the only correct attitude toward these
 psychological products because they are, in a sense, real. It is a fact
 that the patient is able to create such phantasies for himself, and this
 is of scarcely less importance for his neurosis than if he had really
 undergone the experience which he imagines. These phantasies possess
 _psychological_ reality in contrast to _physical_ reality, and so we
 gradually come to understand that _in the realm of neuroses the
 psychological reality is the determining factor_.
 
 Among the experiences which recur continually in the early history of
 neurotics and, in fact, are never lacking, some are of particular
 significance and accordingly I consider them worthy of special
 treatment. I shall enumerate a few examples of this species: observation
 of the parental intercourse, seduction by an adult, and the threat of
 castration. It would be a grievous error to assume that physical reality
 can never be accorded them; this may often be proved beyond doubt by the
 testimony of adult relatives. So, for example, it is not at all unusual
 if the little boy who begins to play with his penis, and does not yet
 know that one must conceal this, is threatened by his parents or nurse
 with the cutting off of the organ or the guilty hand. Parents often
 admit upon questioning that they thought they had done the right thing
 by this intimidation; many individuals retain a correct, conscious
 memory of these threats, especially if it has occurred in later
 childhood. When the mother or some other woman makes the threat she
 usually delegates the responsibility of executing it to the father or to
 the doctor. In the famous _Struwelpeter_ by the pediatrist Hoffman, of
 Frankfort, rhymes which owe their popularity to his very fine
 understanding of the sexual and other complexes of childhood, you find a
 milder substitute for castration in the cutting off of the thumbs as a
 punishment for insistent sucking. But it is highly improbable that the
 threat of castration is actually made as often as it occurs in the
 analyses of neurotics. We are content to understand that the child
 imaginatively constructs this threat for himself from suggestions, from
 the knowledge that auto-erotic satisfaction is forbidden, and from the
 impression of castration he has received in discovering the female
 genital. It is, moreover, in no way impossible that the little child, so
 long as he is not credited with any understanding or memory, will, even
 in families outside the proletariat, become a witness to the sexual act
 between his parents or some other group-ups, and it cannot be disproved
 that the child _subsequently_ understands this impression, and may react
 upon it. But when this intercourse is described with minute details
 which could hardly have been observed, or if it turns out to be, as it
 so frequently does, an intercourse which was not face to face, _more
 ferarum_, there is no longer any doubt that this phantasy is derived
 from the observation of the intercourse of animals (dogs) and the
 unsatisfied curiosity of the child in his period of puberty. The
 greatest feat of the imagination is the phantasy of having witnessed the
 coitus of the parents while still unborn in the mother's womb. Of
 especial interest is the phantasy of having been seduced, because so
 often it is not a phantasy at all, but a real memory. But luckily it is
 not real so often as first appears from the results of analysis.
 Seduction by older children, or children of the same age, is much more
 frequent than seduction by adults, and if, in the case of little girls,
 the father quite regularly appears as the seducer in the occurrences
 which they relate, neither the fantastic nature of this accusation nor
 its motive can be doubted. The child as a rule covers the autoerotic
 period of his sexual activity, where there has been no actual seduction,
 with the seduction-phantasy. He spares himself the shame of onanism by
 imagining the presence of an object for his desires in that early
 period. As a matter of fact, you must not be misled in attributing
 sexual misuse of the child by its nearest male relatives solely and
 always to phantasy. Most analysts have probably treated cases in which
 such relations were real and could be proved beyond doubt, with the
 qualification that in such cases they belong to the later years of
 childhood and were transposed to an earlier time.
 
 We cannot avoid the impression that such experiences of childhood are in
 some way necessary to the neurosis, that they are claimed by its iron
 rule. If they exist in reality, then well and good, but if reality has
 withheld them they are constructed from suggestions and supplemented by
 the imagination. The result is the same, and to this day we have been
 unable to trace any difference in the results, whether fancy or fact
 played the larger part in these childish occurrences. Here again we
 encounter one of the complementary relationships so frequently met with;
 it is, to be sure, the most estranging of all those we have become
 acquainted with. Whence comes the need for these phantasies, and the
 material for them? There can be no doubt as to the sources of the
 impulse, but we must explain why the same phantasies are always created
 with the same content. I have an answer in readiness which I know you
 will think very far-fetched. I am of the opinion that these _primal
 phantasies_--so I should like to term these, and certainly some others
 also--are a phylogenetic possession. In them the individual reaches out
 beyond his own life, into the experiences of antiquity, where his own
 experience has become all too rudimentary. It seems very possible to me
 that everything which is obtained during an analysis in the guise of
 phantasy, the seduction of children, the release of sexual excitement by
 watching parental intercourse, the threat of castration--or rather
 castration itself--were once realities in the primeval existence of
 mankind and that the imaginative child is merely filling in the gaps of
 individual truth with prehistoric truth. We have again and again
 suspected that the psychology of neuroses stores up more of the
 antiquities of human development than all other sources.
 
 What we have just discussed makes it necessary for us to enter further
 into the origin and significance of that mental activity that is called
 imagination. As you well know, it enjoys universal esteem, although we
 have never clearly understood its place in the psychic life. I have this
 much to say about it. As you know, the ego of man is slowly educated by
 the influence of external necessity to an appreciation of reality and a
 pursuit of the principle of reality, and must therefore renounce
 temporarily or permanently various objects and goals of its strivings
 for satisfaction, sexual and otherwise. But renunciation of
 gratification has always been difficult for man. He cannot accomplish it
 without something in the nature of compensation. Accordingly he has
 reserved for himself a psychological activity wherein all these
 abandoned sources of pleasures and means of pleasurable gratification
 are granted a further existence, a form of existence in which they are
 freed from the requirements of reality and what we like to call the test
 of reality. Every impulse is soon transformed into the form of its own
 fulfillment. There is no doubt that dwelling on the imagined fulfillment
 of a given wish affords some satisfaction, although the realization that
 it is unreal is unobscured. In the activity of the imagination, man
 enjoys that freedom from external compulsion that he has long since
 renounced. He has made it possible to be alternately a pleasure-seeking
 animal and a reasoning human being. He finds that the scant satisfaction
 that he can force out of reality is not enough. "There is no getting
 along without auxiliary-constructions," Th. Fontaine once said. The
 creation of the psychic realm of fancy has its complete counterpart in
 the establishment of "preserves" and "conservation projects" in those
 places where the demands of husbandry, traffic and industry threaten
 quickly to change the original face of the earth into something
 unrecognizable. The national reserves maintain this old condition of
 things, which otherwise has everywhere been regretfully sacrificed to
 necessity. Everything may grow and spread there as it will, even that
 which is useless and harmful. The psychic realm of phantasy is such a
 reservation withdrawn from the principles of reality.
 
 The best known productions of phantasy are the so-called "day dreams,"
 which we already know, pictured satisfactions of ambitious, of covetous
 and erotic wishes, which flourish the more grandly the more reality
 admonishes them to modesty and patience. There is unmistakably shown in
 them the nature of imaginative happiness, the restoration of the
 independence of pleasurable gratification from the acquiescence of
 reality. We know such day dreams are nuclei and models for the dreams of
 night. The night dream is essentially nothing but a day dream, distorted
 by the nocturnal forms of psychological activity, and made available by
 the freedom which the night gives to instinctive impulses. We have
 already become acquainted with the idea that a day dream is not
 necessarily conscious, that there are also unconscious day dreams. Such
 unconscious day dreams are as much the source of night dreams as of
 neurotic symptoms.
 
 The significance of phantasy for the development of symptoms will become
 clear to you by the following: We have said that in a case of
 renunciation, the libido occupies regressively the positions once
 abandoned by it, to which, nevertheless, it has clung in certain ways.
 We shall neither retract this statement nor correct it, but we shall
 insert a missing link. How does the libido find its way to these points
 of fixation? Well, every object and tendency of the libido that has been
 abandoned, is not abandoned in every sense of the word. They, or their
 derivatives, are still held in presentations of the phantasy, with a
 certain degree of intensity. The libido need only retire to the
 imagination in order to find from them the open road to all suppressed
 fixations. These phantasies were happy under a sort of tolerance, there
 was no conflict between them and the ego, no matter how acute the
 contrast, so long as a certain condition was observed--a condition
 _quantitative_ in nature that is now disturbed by the flowing back of
 the libido to the phantasies. By this addition the accumulation of
 energy in the phantasies is heightened to such a degree that they become
 assertive and develop a pressure in the direction of realization. But
 that makes a conflict between them and the ego inevitable. Whether
 formerly conscious or unconscious, they now are subject to suppression
 by the ego and are victims to the attraction of the unconscious. The
 libido wanders from phantasies now unconscious to their sources in
 unconsciousness, and back to its own points of fixation.
 
 The return of the libido to phantasy is an intermediate step on the road
 to symptom development and well deserves a special designation. C. G.
 Jung coined for it the very appropriate name of _introversion_, but
 inappropriately he also lets it stand for other things. Let us therefore
 retain the idea that introversion signifies the turning aside of the
 libido from the possibilities of actual satisfaction and the excessive
 accumulation of the phantasies hitherto tolerated as harmless. An
 introvert is not yet a neurotic, but he finds himself in a labile
 situation; he must develop symptoms at the next dislocation of forces,
 if he does not find other outlets for his pent-up libido. The intangible
 nature of neurotic satisfaction and the neglect of the difference
 between imagination and reality are already determined by arrest in the
 phase of introversion.
 
 You have certainly noticed that in the last discussions I have
 introduced a new factor into the structure of the etiological chain,
 namely, the quantity, the amount of energy that comes under
 consideration. We must always take this factor into account. Purely
 qualitative analysis of the etiological conditions is not sufficient.
 Or, to put it in another way, a _dynamic_ conception alone of these
 psychic processes is not enough; there is need of an _economic_
 viewpoint. We must say to ourselves that the conflict between two
 impulses is not released before certain occupation-intensities have been
 reached, even though the qualitative conditions have long been potent.
 Similarly, the pathogenic significance of the constitutional factors is
 guided by how much _more_ of a given component impulse is present in the
 predisposition over and above that of another; one can even conceive the
 predispositions of all men to be qualitatively the same and to be
 differentiated only by these quantitative conditions. The quantitative
 factor is no less important for the power of resistance against neurotic
 ailments. It depends upon _what amount_ of unused libido a person can
 hold freely suspended, and upon _how large a fraction_ of the libido he
 is able to direct from the sexual path to the goal of sublimation. The
 final goal of psychological activity, which may be described
 qualitatively as striving towards pleasure-acquisition and avoidance of
 unpleasantness, presents itself in the light of economic considerations
 as the task of overcoming the gigantic stimuli at work in the
 psychological apparatus, and to prevent those obstructions which cause
 unpleasantness.
 
 So much I wanted to tell you about symptom development in the neuroses.
 Yes, but do not let me neglect to emphasize this especially: everything
 I have said here relates to the symptom development in hysteria. Even in
 compulsion neuroses, which retain the same fundamentals, much is found
 that is different. The counter-siege directed against the claims of the
 instincts, of which we have spoken in connection with hysteria, press to
 the fore in compulsion neuroses, and control the clinical picture by
 means of so-called "reaction-formations." The same kind and more
 far-reaching variations are discoverable among the other neuroses, where
 the investigations as to the mechanism of symptom development have in no
 way been completed.
 
 Before I leave you today I should like to have your attention for a
 while for an aspect of imaginative life which is worthy of the most
 general interest. For there is a way back from imagination to reality
 and that is--art. The artist is an incipient introvert who is not far
 from being a neurotic. He is impelled by too powerful instinctive needs.
 He wants to achieve honor, power, riches, fame and the love of women.
 But he lacks the means of achieving these satisfactions. So like any
 other unsatisfied person, he turns away from reality, and transfers all
 his interests, his libido, too, to the elaboration of his imaginary
 wishes, all of which might easily point the way to neurosis. A great
 many factors must combine to present this termination of his
 development; it is well known how often artists especially suffer from a
 partial inhibition of their capacities through neurosis. Apparently
 their constitutions are strongly endowed with an ability to sublimize
 and to shift the suppression determining their conflicts. The artist
 finds the way back to reality in this way. He is not the only one who
 has a life of imagination. The twilight-realm of phantasy is upheld by
 the sanction of humanity and every hungry soul looks here for help and
 sympathy. But for those who are not artists, the ability to obtain
 satisfaction from imaginative sources is very restricted. Their
 relentless suppressions force them to be satisfied with the sparse day
 dreams which may become conscious. If one is a real artist he has more
 at his disposal. In the first place, he understands how to elaborate his
 day dreams so that they lose their essentially personal element, which
 would repel strangers, and yield satisfaction to others as well. He also
 knows how to disguise them so that they do not easily disclose their
 origin in their despised sources. He further possesses the puzzling
 ability of molding a specific material into a faithful image of the
 creatures of his imagination, and then he is able to attach to this
 representation of his unconscious phantasies so much pleasurable
 gratification that, for a time at least, it is able to outweigh and
 release the suppressions. If he is able to accomplish all this, he makes
 it possible for others, in their return, to obtain solace and
 consolation from their own unconscious sources of gratification which
 had become inaccessible. He wins gratitude and admiration for himself
 and so, by means of his imagination, achieves the very things which had
 at first only an imaginary existence for him: honor, power, and the love
 of women.
 
 
 
 
 TWENTY-FOURTH LECTURE
 
 GENERAL THEORY OF THE NEUROSES
 
 _Ordinary Nervousness_
 
 
 In our last discussion we accomplish a difficult task. Now I shall
 temporarily leave our subject and address myself to you.
 
 For I know quite well that you are dissatisfied. You thought that an
 introduction to psychoanalysis would be quite a different matter. You
 expected to hear vivid illustrations instead of theories. You will tell
 me that when I gave you the illustration of "on the ground floor in the
 first story," you had grasped something of the causation of neurosis,
 only of course this should have been a real observation and not an
 imaginary story. Or, when in the beginning I described two symptoms (not
 imaginary also, let us hope) whose analysis revealed a close connection
 with the life of the patient, you first came to grasp the meaning of the
 symptoms and you hoped that I would proceed in the same way. Instead I
 have given you theories--lengthy, difficult to see in perspective and
 incomplete, to which something new was constantly being added. I worked
 with conceptions that I had not previously presented to you, abandoned
 descriptive for dynamic conceptions, and these in turn for economic
 ones. I made it hard for you to understand how many of the artificial
 terms I made use of still carry the same meaning and are used
 interchangeably only for the sake of euphony. Finally, I allowed broad
 conceptions to pass in review before you: the principles of pleasure and
 of fact and their phylogenetically inherited possession; and then,
 instead of introducing you to definite facts, I allowed them to become
 increasingly vague till they seemed to fade into dim distances.
 
 Why did I not begin my introduction to the theory of neurosis with the
 facts that you yourselves know about nervousness, with something that
 has always aroused your interest, with the peculiar temperament of
 nervous people, their incomprehensible reactions to external influences,
 to human intercourse, their irritability, their uselessness? Why did I
 not lead you step by step from the understanding of simple, everyday
 forms to the problems of mysterious and extreme manifestations of
 nervousness?
 
 I cannot even say that you are wrong. I am not so infatuated with my art
 of representation as to see some special attraction in every blemish. I
 myself believe that I could have proceeded differently, to your better
 advantage, and this indeed had been my intention. But one cannot always
 carry out one's sensible intentions. The nature of the subject matter
 issues its own commands, and easily modifies our plans. Even so usual a
 performance as the organization of well-known material is not entirely
 subject to the particular purposes of the author. It forms itself as it
 will and later one wonders why it turned out so and not otherwise.
 
 Probably one of the reasons is that the title, _A General Introduction
 to Psychoanalysis_, no longer applies to this part, which deals with the
 neuroses. The introduction to psychoanalysis is found in the study of
 errors and the dream; the theory of neurosis is psychoanalysis itself. I
 do not think that in so short a time I could have given you a knowledge
 of the theory of neurosis other than in concentrated form. It was
 necessary to present to you connectedly the meaning and interpretation
 of the symptoms, their external and internal conditions and their
 bearing on the mechanism of symptom formation. This I have attempted to
 do; it is practically the nucleus of the material that modern
 psychoanalysis is able to offer. We had to say quite a good deal
 concerning the libido and its development, and something as well
 concerning the development of the ego. The introduction had already
 prepared you for the presuppositions of our technique, for the large
 aspects of the unconscious and of suppression (resistance). In a
 subsequent lecture you will learn from what points psychoanalysis
 proceeds organically. For the present I have not sought to hide from you
 the fact that all our results are based on the study of a single group
 of nervous affections, the so-called transference neuroses. Though you
 have gained no positive knowledge and have not retained every detail,
 still I hope that you have a fair picture of the methods, the problems
 and the results of psychoanalysis.
 
 I have assumed that it was your wish for me to begin my presentation of
 neuroses with a description of nervous behavior, the nature of neurotic
 suffering, and the way in which the nervous meet the conditions of their
 illness and adapt themselves to these. Such subject matter is certainly
 interesting and well worth knowing. It is moreover not very hard to
 handle, yet it is not wise to begin with its consideration. There is
 danger of not discovering the unconscious, of overlooking the great
 significance of the libido, of judging all conditions as they appear to
 the ego of the nervous person. It is obvious that this ego is neither a
 reliable nor an impartial authority. For this very ego is the force that
 denies and suppresses the unconscious; when the unconscious is
 concerned, how then could we expect justice to be done? The rejected
 claims of sexuality stand first in the line of these suppressions; it is
 natural that from the standpoint of the ego we can never learn their
 extent and significance. As soon as we attain to the point of view of
 suppression, we are sufficiently warned not to make one of the
 contending factions, above all not to make the victor judge of the
 struggle. We are prepared to find that the testimony of the ego may lead
 us astray. If one is to believe the evidence of the ego, it would appear
 to have been active all along, all its symptoms would have been actively
 willed and formed. Yet we know that it has passively allowed a great
 deal to occur, a fact which it subsequently seeks to conceal and to
 palliate. To be sure, it does not always attempt this; in the case of
 the symptoms of compulsion neurosis it must admit that it is being
 opposed by something alien, which it can resist only with difficulty.
 
 Whoever does not heed these warnings not to mistake the prevarications
 of the ego for truth, has clear sailing; he avoids all the resistances
 which oppose the psychoanalytic emphasis upon the unconscious, on
 sexuality, and on the passiveness of the ego. He will assert with Alfred
 Adler that the "nervous character" is the cause instead of the result of
 the neurosis, but he will not be able to explain a single detail of
 symptom formation or to interpret a single dream.
 
 You will ask: Is it not possible to do justice to the part the ego plays
 in nervousness and in symptom formation without crudely neglecting the
 factors revealed by psychoanalysis? I answer you: Surely it must be
 possible and at some time or other it will take place; but the methods
 by which we organize the work of psychoanalysis do not favor our
 beginning with just this task. We can foresee the time when this task
 will claim the attention of psychoanalysis. There are forms of neuroses,
 the so-called narcistic neuroses, in which the ego is far more deeply
 involved than in anything we have studied heretofore. The analytic
 investigation of these conditions will enable us to judge reliably and
 impartially the part that the ego plays in neurotic illness.
 
 One of the relations which the ego bears to its neurosis is so obvious
 that it must be considered at the very outset. In no case does it seem
 to be absent, and it is most clearly recognizable in the traumatic
 neuroses, conditions which we do not as yet clearly understand. You must
 know that in the causation and mechanisms of all possible forms of
 neurosis, the same factors are active again and again; it is only the
 emphasis that is shifted from one to the other of these factors in
 symptom formation. The members of a company of actors each have certain
 parts to play--hero, villain, confidant, etc.--yet each will select a
 different drama for his benefit. Thus the phantasies which undergo
 conversion into symptoms are especially easy to detect in hysteria;
 compulsion neuroses are essentially dominated by the reactionary
 formations, or counter-seizures of the ego; what we designate as
 _secondary elaboration_ in dreams dominates paranoia in the form of
 delusions, etc.
 
 In traumatic neuroses, particularly if they are caused by the horrors of
 war, we are especially impressed by a selfish ego-impulse which seeks
 protection and personal advantage. This in itself is not a sufficient
 cause for illness, but it can favor its beginning and also feed its
 needs once it has been established. This motive serves to protect the
 ego from the dangers whose imminence precipitated the disease, and does
 not permit convalescence until the recurrence of these dangers seems
 impossible, or until compensation has been obtained for the danger that
 has been undergone.
 
 But the ego betrays similar interest in the origin and maintenance of
 all other neuroses. We have already said that the ego suffers the
 symptom to exist, because one of its phases gratifies the egoistic
 tendency toward suppression. Besides, the ending of the conflict by
 means of symptom development is the path of least resistance, and a
 most convenient solution for the principle of pleasure. Through symptom
 formation the ego is undoubtedly spared a severe and unpleasant inner
 task. There are cases where even the physician must admit that the
 resolution of the conflict into neurosis is the most harmless outcome
 and one most easily tolerated by society. Do not be surprised, then, to
 learn that occasionally even the physician takes the part of the illness
 he is battling against. He does not have to restrict himself to the role
 of the fanatic warrior for health in all situations of life. He knows
 that the world contains not only neurotic misery, but also real,
 incurable suffering. He knows that necessity may even require a human
 being to sacrifice his health, and he learns that by this sacrifice on
 the part of one individual untold wretchedness may be spared for many
 others. So if we say that the neurotic escapes the conflict _by taking
 refuge in illness_, we must admit that in some cases this escape is
 justifiable, and the physician who has diagnosed the state of affairs
 will retire silently and tactfully.
 
 But let us not consider these special cases in our further discussion.
 In average cases the ego, by having recourse to neurosis, obtains a
 certain inner _advantage from the disease_. Under certain conditions of
 life, there may also be derived a tangible external advantage, more or
 less valuable in reality. Let me direct your attention to the most
 frequent occurrences of this sort. Women who are brutally treated and
 mercilessly exploited by their husbands almost always adopt the evasion
 of the neurosis, provided that their predisposition permits this. This
 usually follows when the woman is too cowardly or too virtuous to seek
 secret solace in the arms of another, or when she dare not separate from
 her husband in the face of all opposition, when she has no prospect of
 maintaining herself or of finding a better husband and especially when
 her sexual emotions still bind her to this brutal man. Her illness
 becomes a weapon in her struggle with him, one that she can use for
 self-protection and misuse for purposes of vengeance. She probably dare
 not complain of her marriage, but she can complain of her illness. The
 doctor becomes her assistant. She forces her inconsiderate husband to
 spare her, to attend to her wishes, to permit her absence from the house
 and thus free her from the oppressions of her married life. Wherever
 such external or accidental gain through illness is considerable and
 can find no substitute in fact, you can prophesy that the possibility of
 influencing neurosis through therapy is very slight.
 
 You will tell me that what I have said about the advantage gained from
 the disease speaks entirely for the hypothesis I have rejected, namely,
 that the ego itself wills and creates the neurosis. Just a moment! It
 probably does not mean more than that the ego passively suffers the
 neurosis to exist, which it is unable to prevent anyway. It makes the
 most of the neurosis, if anything can be made of it at all. This is only
 one side of the question, the advantageous side. The ego is willing to
 endure the advantages of the neurosis, but there are not only
 advantages. As a rule it soon appears that the ego has made a poor deal
 in accepting the neurosis. It has paid too high a price for the
 mitigation of the conflict; and the sensations of suffering which the
 symptoms bring with them are perhaps every bit as bad as the agonies of
 conflict, usually they cause even greater discomfort. The ego wants to
 rid itself of the pain of the symptoms without relinquishing the gain of
 illness, and that is impossible. Thus the ego is discovered as by no
 means so active as it had thought itself to be, and this we want to keep
 in mind.
 
 If you were to come into contact with neurotics as a physician, you
 would soon cease to expect that those who complain most woefully of
 their illness are the ones who will oppose its therapy with the least
 resistance or who will welcome any help. On the contrary, you would
 readily understand that everything contributing to the advantage derived
 from the disease will strengthen the resistance to the suppression and
 heighten the difficulty of the therapy. We must also add another and
 later advantage to the gain of illness which is born with the symptom.
 If a psychic organization, such as this illness, has persisted for a
 long time, it finally behaves as an independent unit, it expresses
 something like self-preservation, attains a kind of _modus vivendi_
 between itself and other parts of psychic life, even those that are
 fundamentally hostile to it. And occasions will probably arise where it
 can prove again to be both useful and valuable, by which it will attain
 a _secondary function_, which gives strength to its existence. Instead
 of an illustration from pathology take a striking example from everyday
 life. An efficient workman who earns his living is crippled for his
 occupation by some disaster; his work is over for him. After a while,
 however, he receives a small accident insurance, and learns to exploit
 his injury by begging. His new existence, though most undesirable, is
 based upon the very thing that robbed him of his former maintenance. If
 you could cure his defect, he would be without a means of subsistence,
 he would have no livelihood. The question would arise: Is he capable of
 resuming his former work? That which corresponds to such secondary
 exploitation of illness in neurosis we may add to the primary benefit
 derived therefrom and may term it a _secondary_ advantage of disease.
 
 In general I should like to warn you not to underestimate the practical
 significance of the advantage from illness and yet not to be too much
 impressed by it theoretically. Aside from the previously recognized
 exceptions, I am always reminded of Oberlnder's pictures on "the
 intelligence of animals" which appeared in the _Fliegende Bltter_. An
 Arab is riding a camel on a narrow path cut through a steep mountain
 side. At a turn of the trail he is suddenly confronted by a lion who
 makes ready to spring. He sees no way out, on one side the precipice, on
 the other the abyss; retreat and flight--both are impossible; he gives
 himself up as lost. Not so the camel. He leaps into the abyss with his
 rider--and the lion is left in the lurch. The help of neurosis is as a
 rule no kinder to the rider. It may be due to the fact that the
 settlement of the conflict through symptom development is nevertheless
 an automatic process, not able to meet the demands of life, and for
 whose sake man renounces the use of his best and loftiest powers. If it
 were possible to choose, it were indeed best to perish in an honorable
 struggle with destiny.
 
 I still owe you further explanation as to why, in my presentation of the
 theory of neurosis, I did not proceed from ordinary nervousness as a
 starting point. You may assume that, had I done this, the proof of the
 sexual origin of neurosis would have been more difficult for me, and so
 I refrained. There you are mistaken. In transference neurosis we must
 work at interpretations of the symptoms to arrive at this conclusion. In
 the ordinary forms of the so-called true neuroses, however, the
 etiological significance of sexual life is a crude fact open to
 observation. I discovered it twenty years ago when I asked myself one
 day why we regularly barred out questions concerning sexual activity in
 examining nervous patients. At that time I sacrificed my popularity
 among my patients to my investigations, yet after a brief effort I could
 state that no neurosis, no true neurosis at least, is present with a
 normal sexual life. Of course, this statement passes too lightly over
 the individual differences, it is unclear through the vagueness with
 which it uses the term "normal," but even to-day it retains its value
 for purposes of rough orientation. At that time I reached the point of
 drawing comparisons between certain forms of nervousness and sexual
 abnormalities, and I do not doubt that I could repeat the same
 observations now, if similar material were at my disposal. I frequently
 noticed that a man who contented himself with incomplete sexual
 gratification, with manual ononism, for instance, would suffer from a
 true neurosis, and that this neurosis would promptly give way to another
 form, if another sexual regime no less harmful were substituted. From
 the change in the condition of the patient I was able to guess the
 change in the mode of his sexual life. At that time I learned to hold
 obstinately to my conjectures until I had overcome the patient's
 prevarications and had forced him to confirm my suppositions. To be
 sure, then he preferred to consult other physicians who did not inquire
 so insistently into his sexual life.
 
 At that time it did not escape my notice that the origin of the disease
 could not always be traced back to sexual life; sexual abnormality would
 cause the illness in one person, while another would fall ill because he
 had lost his fortune or had suffered an exhausting organic disease. We
 gained insight into this variation by means of the interrelations
 between the ego and the libido, and the more profound our insight
 became, the more satisfactory were the results. A person begins to
 suffer from neurosis when his ego has lost the capacity of accommodating
 the libido. The stronger the ego, the easier the solution of the
 problem; a weakening of the ego from any cause whatsoever has the same
 effect as a superlative increase of the claims of the libido. There are
 other and more intimate relations between the ego and the libido which I
 shall not discuss, as we are not concerned with them here. To us it is
 of enlightening significance that in every case, regardless of the way
 in which the illness was caused, the symptoms of neurosis were opposed
 by the libido and thus gave evidence for its abnormal use.
 
 Now, however, I want to draw your attention to the difference between
 the symptoms of the true neuroses and the psychoneuroses, the first
 group of which, the transference neurosis, has occupied us considerably.
 In both cases the symptoms proceed from the libido. They are accordingly
 abnormal uses of it, substitutes for gratification. But the symptoms of
 the true neurosis--such as pressure in the head, sensations of pain,
 irritability of an organ, weakening or inhibition of a function--these
 have no meaning, no psychic significance. They are manifested not only
 in the body, as for instance hysteric symptoms, but are in themselves
 physical processes whose creation is devoid of all the complicated
 psychic mechanism with which we have become acquainted. They really
 embody the character that has so long been attributed to the
 psychoneurotic symptom. But how can they then correspond to uses of the
 libido, which we have come to know as a psychological force? That is
 quite simple. Let me recall one of the very first objections that was
 made to psychoanalysis. It was stated that psychoanalysis was concerned
 with a purely psychological theory of neurotic manifestations; that this
 was a hopeless outlook since psychological theories could never explain
 illness. The objectors chose to forget that the sexual function is
 neither purely psychic nor merely somatic. It influences physical as
 well as psychic life. In the symptoms of the psychoneuroses we have
 recognized the expression of a disturbance in psychic processes. And so
 we shall not be surprised to discover that the true neuroses are the
 direct somatic consequences of sexual disturbances.
 
 The medical clinic gives us a valuable suggestion (observed by many
 research workers) for the comprehension of the true neuroses. In all the
 details of their symptomatology, and as well in their characteristic
 power to influence all organic systems and all functions, the true
 neuroses reveal a marked similarity to the conditions of those diseases
 which originate through the chronic influence of foreign poisons and as
 well through their acute diminution; with conditions prevalent in
 intoxication and abstinence. The two groups of conditions are brought
 still closer together by the relation of intermediate conditions, which,
 following M. Basedowi, we have learned to attribute to the influence of
 toxic substances, but of toxins, however, which are not introduced into
 the body from without, but arise in its own metabolism. These analogies,
 I think, lead us directly to the consideration of these neuroses as
 disturbances in sexual metabolism. It may be that more sexual toxins are
 produced than the individual can dispose of, or that inner, even psychic
 conditions, stand in the way of the proper elaboration of these
 substances. The language of the people has always favored such
 assumptions as to the nature of sexual desires. It calls love an
 "intoxication"; it will have love-madness aroused through potions, and
 thus sees the motive force removed, as it were, to the outer world. For
 the rest, the phrase "sexual metabolism" or "chemism of sexuality" is a
 chapter-head without content. We know nothing about it and cannot even
 decide whether we are to assume two sexual substances, the male and the
 female, or, if there is only _one_ sexual toxin, which to consider the
 carrier of all the stimulating power of the libido. The structure of
 psychoanalysis that we have erected is really only a superstructure
 which at some future time must be placed upon its organic foundation;
 but what this is we do not know as yet.
 
 Psychoanalysis is characterized as a science, not by reason of the
 subject matter it handles but by the technique it employs. This can be
 employed in dealing with the history of civilization, the science of
 religion or mythology, as well as with the theory of neurosis, without
 altering its character. The revealing of the unconscious in psychic life
 is all it aims to accomplish. The problems of the true neuroses, whose
 symptoms probably originate in direct toxic damage, yield no point of
 attack to psychoanalysis. Psychoanalysis can do little for their
 elucidation, and must leave the task to biological-medical research.
 Perhaps you understand now why I did not choose to organize my material
 differently. If I had given to you an _Introduction to the Theory of the
 Neuroses_ as you wished, it would unquestionably have been correct to
 proceed from the simple forms of the true neuroses to those complex
 illnesses caused by a disturbance of the libido. In discussing the true
 neuroses I would have had to bring together the facts we have gleaned
 from various quarters and present what we think we know of them. Only
 later, under the psychoneuroses, would psychoanalysis have been
 discussed as the most important technical aid for insight into these
 conditions. I had, however, intended and announced _A General
 Introduction to Psychoanalysis_, and it seemed to me more important to
 give you an idea of psychoanalysis than to present certain positive
 facts about neuroses; and so I could not place the true neuroses into
 the foreground, for they prove sterile for the purposes of
 psychoanalysis. I believe that I have made the wiser choice for you,
 since psychoanalysis deserves the interest of every educated person
 because of its profound hypotheses and far-reaching connections. The
 theory of neurosis, on the other hand, is a chapter of medicine like any
 other.
 
 You are, however, justified in expecting some interest on our part in
 the true neuroses. Because of their intimate connection with
 psychoneuroses we find this decidedly necessary. I shall tell you then
 that we distinguish three pure forms of true neuroses: _neurasthenia_,
 _anxiety neurosis_ and _hypochondria_. Even this classification has not
 remained uncontradicted. The terms are all widely used, but their
 connotation is vague and uncertain. Besides, there are in this world of
 confusion physicians who object to any distinctions between
 manifestations, any emphasis of clinical detail, who do not even
 recognize the separation of true neuroses and psychoneuroses. I think
 they have gone too far and have not chosen the road which leads to
 progress. The types of neuroses we have mentioned occur occasionally in
 pure form; more often they are blended with one another or with a
 psychoneurotic condition. This need not discourage us to the extent of
 abandoning the task of distinction. Think of the difference between the
 study of minerals and that of ores in mineralogy. Minerals are described
 as individuals; frequently of course they occur as crystals, separated
 sharply from their surroundings. Ores consist of an aggregate of
 minerals which have coalesced not accidentally, but as a result of the
 conditions of their origin. We understand too little of the process of
 development of neuroses, to create anything similar to the study of
 ores. But we are surely working in the right direction when we isolate
 the known clinical factors, comparable to the separate minerals, from
 the great mass.
 
 A noteworthy connection between the symptoms of the true neuroses and
 the psychoneuroses adds a valuable contribution to our knowledge of
 symptom formation in the latter. The symptom in the true neuroses is
 frequently the nucleus and incipient stage of development of the
 psychoneurotic symptom. Such a connection is most easily observed
 between neurasthenia and the transference neuroses, which are termed
 conversion hysteria, between anxiety neurosis and anxiety hysteria, but
 also between hypochondria and paraphrenia (dementia praecox and
 paranoia), forms of neuroses of which we shall speak subsequently. Let
 us take as an illustration the hysteric headache or backache. Analysis
 shows that through elaboration and displacement this pain has become the
 gratification substitute for a whole series of libidinous phantasies or
 reminiscences. But once upon a time this pain was real, a direct sexual
 toxic symptom, the physical expression of libidinous excitation. We do
 not wish to assert, by any means, that all hysteric symptoms can be
 traced to such a nucleus, but it is true that this is frequently the
 case, and that all influences upon the body through libidinous
 excitation, whether normal or pathological, are especially significant
 for the symptom development in hysteria. They play the part of the grain
 of sand which the mollusc has enveloped in mother-of-pearl. In the same
 way passing signs of sexual excitation, which accompany the sexual act,
 are used by psychoneurosis as the most convenient and appropriate
 material for symptom formation.
 
 A similar procedure is of diagnostic and therapeutic interest
 especially. Persons who are disposed to be neurotic, without suffering
 from a flourishing neurosis, frequently set in motion the work of
 symptom development as the result of an abnormal physical change--often
 an inflammation or an injury. This development rapidly makes the symptom
 given by reality the representative of the unconscious phantasies that
 had been lurking for an opportunity to seize upon a means of expression.
 In such a case the physician will try different ways of therapy. Either
 he will try to do away with the organic basis without bothering about
 its noisy neurotic elaboration, or he will struggle with the neurosis
 brought out by the occasion, and ignore its organic cause. The result
 will justify now one, now the other method of procedure; no general laws
 can be laid down for such mixed cases.
 
 
 
 
 TWENTY-FIFTH LECTURE
 
 GENERAL THEORY OF THE NEUROSES
 
 _Fear and Anxiety_
 
 
 Probably you will term what I told you about ordinary nervousness in my
 last lecture most fragmentary and unsatisfactory information. I know
 this, and I think you were probably most surprised that I did not
 mention fear, which most nervous people complain of and describe as
 their greatest source of suffering. It can attain a terrible intensity
 which may result in the wildest enterprises. But I do not wish to fall
 short of your expectations in this matter. I intend, on the contrary, to
 treat the problem of the fear of nervous people with great accuracy and
 to discuss it with you at some length.
 
 Fear itself needs no introduction; everyone has at some time or other
 known this sensation or, more precisely, this effect. It seems to me
 that we never seriously inquired why the nervous suffered so much more
 and so much more intensely under this condition. Perhaps it was thought
 a matter of course; it is usual to confuse the words "nervous" and
 "anxious" as though they meant the same thing. That is unjustifiable;
 there are anxious people who are not nervous, and nervous people who
 suffer from many symptoms, but not from the tendency to anxiety.
 
 However that may be, it is certain that the problem of fear is the
 meeting point of many important questions, an enigma whose complete
 solution would cast a flood of light upon psychic life. I do not claim
 that I can furnish you with this complete solution, but you will
 certainly expect psychoanalysis to deal with this theme in a manner
 different from that of the schools of medicine. These schools seem to be
 interested primarily in the anatomical cause of the condition of fear.
 They say the medulla oblongata is irritated, and the patient learns that
 he is suffering from neurosis of the nervus vague. The medulla
 oblongata is a very serious and beautiful object. I remember exactly how
 much time and trouble I devoted to the study of it, years ago. But today
 I must say that I know of nothing more indifferent to me for the
 psychological comprehension of fear, than knowledge of the nerve passage
 through which these sensations must pass.
 
 One can talk about fear for a long time without even touching upon
 nervousness. You will understand me without more ado, when I term this
 fear _real_ fear in contrast to _neurotic_ fear. Real fear seems quite
 rational and comprehensible to us. We may testify that it is a reaction
 to the perception of external danger, viz., harm that is expected and
 foreseen. It is related to the flight reflex and may be regarded as an
 expression of the instinct of self-preservation. And so the occasions,
 viz., the objects and situations which arouse fear, will depend largely
 on our knowledge of and our feeling of power over the outer world. We
 deem it quite a matter of course that the savage fears a cannon or an
 eclipse of the sun, while the white man, who can handle the instrument
 and prophesy the phenomenon, does not fear these things. At other times
 superior knowledge promulgates fear, because it recognizes the danger
 earlier. The savage, for instance, will recoil before a footprint in the
 woods, meaningless to the uninstructed, which reveals to him the
 proximity of an animal of prey; the experienced sailor will notice a
 little cloud, which tells him of a coming hurricane, with terror, while
 to the passenger it seems insignificant.
 
 After further consideration, we must say to ourselves that the verdict
 on real fear, whether it be rational or purposeful, must be thoroughly
 revised. For the only purposeful behavior in the face of imminent danger
 would be the cool appraisal of one's own strength in comparison with the
 extent of the threatening danger, and then decide which would presage a
 happier ending: flight, defense, or possibly even attack. Under such a
 proceeding fear has absolutely no place; everything that happens would
 be consummated just as well and better without the development of fear.
 You know that if fear is too strong, it proves absolutely useless and
 paralyzes every action, even flight. Generally the reaction against
 danger consists in a mixture of fear and resistance. The frightened
 animal is afraid and flees. But the purposeful factor in such a case is
 not fear but flight.
 
 We are therefore tempted to claim that the development of fear is never
 purposeful. Perhaps closer examination will give us greater insight into
 the fear situation. The first factor is the expectancy of danger which
 expresses itself in heightened sensory attention and in motor tension.
 This expectancy is undoubtedly advantageous; its absence may be
 responsible for serious consequences. On the one hand, it gives rise to
 motor activity, primarily to flight, and on a higher plane to active
 defense; on the other hand, it gives rise to something which we consider
 the condition of fear. In so far as the development is still incipient,
 and is restricted to a mere signal, the more undisturbed the conversion
 of the readiness to be afraid into action the more purposeful the entire
 proceeding. The readiness to be afraid seems to be the purposeful
 aspect; evolution of fear itself, the element that defeats its own
 object.
 
 I avoid entering upon a discussion as to whether our language means the
 same or distinct things by the words anxiety, fear or fright. I think
 that anxiety is used in connection with a condition regardless of any
 objective, while fear is essentially directed toward an object. Fright,
 on the other hand, seems really to possess a special meaning, which
 emphasizes the effects of a danger which is precipitated without any
 expectance or readiness of fear. Thus we might say that anxiety protects
 man from fright.
 
 You have probably noticed the ambiguity and vagueness in the use of the
 word "anxiety." Generally one means a subjective condition, caused by
 the perception that an "evolution of fear" has been consummated. Such a
 condition may be called an emotion. What is an emotion in the dynamic
 sense? Certainly something very complex. An emotion, in the first place,
 includes indefinite motor innervations or discharges; secondly, definite
 sensations which moreover are of two kinds, the perception of motor
 activities that have already taken place, and the direct sensations of
 pleasure and pain, which give the effect of what we call its feeling
 tone. But I do not think that the true nature of the emotion has been
 fathomed by these enumerations. We have gained deeper insight into some
 emotions and realize that the thread which binds together such a complex
 as we have described is the repetition of a certain significant
 experience. This experience might be an early impression of a very
 general sort, which belongs to the antecedent history of the species
 rather than to that of the individual. To be more clear: the emotional
 condition has a structure similar to that of an hysterical attack; it is
 the upshot of a reminiscence. The hysteric attack, then, is comparable
 to a newly formed individual emotion, the normal emotion to an hysteria
 which has become a universal heritage.
 
 Do not assume that what I have said here about emotions is derived from
 normal psychology. On the contrary, these are conceptions that have
 grown up with and are at home only in psychoanalysis. What psychology
 has to say about emotions--the James-Lange theory, for instance--is
 absolutely incomprehensible for us psychoanalysts, and cannot be
 discussed. Of course, we do not consider our knowledge about emotions
 very certain; it is a preliminary attempt to become oriented in this
 obscure region. To continue: We believe we know the early impression
 which the emotion of fear repeats. We think it is birth itself which
 combines that complex of painful feelings, of a discharge of impulses,
 of physical sensations, which has become the prototype for the effect of
 danger to life, and is ever after repeated within us as a condition of
 fear. The tremendous heightening of irritability through the
 interruption of the circulation (internal respiration) was at the time
 the cause of the experience of fear; the first fear was therefore toxic.
 The name anxiety--angustial--narrowness, emphasizes the characteristic
 tightening of the breath, which was at the time a consequence of an
 actual situation and is henceforth repeated almost regularly in the
 emotion. We shall also recognize how significant it is that this first
 condition of fear appeared during the separation from the mother. Of
 course, we are convinced that the tendency to repetition of the first
 condition of fear has been so deeply ingrained in the organism through
 countless generations, that not a single individual can escape the
 emotion of fear; not even the mythical Macduff who was "cut out of his
 mother's womb," and therefore did not experience birth itself. We do not
 know the prototype of the condition of fear in the case of other
 mammals, and so we do not know the complex of emotions that in them is
 the equivalent of our fear.
 
 Perhaps it will interest you to hear how the idea that birth is the
 source and prototype of the emotion of fear, happened to occur to me.
 Speculation plays the smallest part in it; I borrowed it from the native
 train of thought of the people. Many years ago we were sitting around
 the dinner table--a number of young physicians--when an assistant in the
 obstetrical clinic told a jolly story of what had happened in the last
 examination for midwives. A candidate was asked what it implied if
 during delivery the foeces of the newborn was present in the discharge
 of waters, and she answered promptly "the child is afraid." She was
 laughed at and "flunked." But I silently took her part and began to
 suspect that the poor woman of the people had, with sound perception,
 revealed an important connection.
 
 Proceeding now to neurotic fear, what are its manifestations and
 conditions? There is much to be described. In the first place we find a
 general condition of anxiety, a condition of free-floating fear as it
 were, which is ready to attach itself to any appropriate idea, to
 influence judgment, to give rise to expectations, in fact to seize any
 opportunity to make itself felt. We call this condition "expectant fear"
 or "anxious expectation." Persons who suffer from this sort of fear
 always prophesy the most terrible of all possibilities, interpret every
 coincidence as an evil omen, and ascribe a dreadful meaning to all
 uncertainty. Many persons who cannot be termed ill show this tendency to
 anticipate disaster. We blame them for being over-anxious or
 pessimistic. A striking amount of expectant fear is characteristic of a
 nervous condition which I have named "anxiety neurosis," and which I
 group with the true neuroses.
 
 A second form of fear in contrast to the one we have just described is
 psychologically more circumscribed and bound up with certain objects or
 situations. It is the fear of the manifold and frequently very peculiar
 phobias. Stanley Hall, the distinguished American psychologist, has
 recently taken the trouble to present a whole series of these phobias in
 gorgeous Greek terminology. They sound like the enumeration of the ten
 Egyptian plagues, except that their number exceeds ten, by far. Just
 listen to all the things which may become the objects of contents of a
 phobia: Darkness, open air, open squares, cats, spiders, caterpillars,
 snakes, mice, thunder-storms, sharp points, blood, enclosed spaces,
 crowds, solitude, passing over a bridge, travel on land and sea, etc. A
 first attempt at orientation in this chaos leads readily to a division
 into three groups. Some of the fearful objects and situations have
 something gruesome for normal people too, a relation to danger, and so,
 though they are exaggerated in intensity, they do not seem
 incomprehensible to us. Most of us, for instance, experience a feeling
 of repulsion in the presence of a snake. One may say that snakephobia is
 common to all human beings, and Charles Darwin has described most
 impressively how he was unable to control his fear of a snake pointing
 for him, though he knew he was separated from it by a thick pane of
 glass. The second group consists of cases which still bear a relation to
 danger, but this is of a kind which we are disposed to belittle rather
 than to overestimate. Most of the situation-phobia belong here. We know
 that by taking a railroad journey we entail greater chance of disaster
 than by staying at home. A collision, for instance, may occur, or a ship
 sink, when as a rule we must drown; yet we do not think of these
 dangers, and free from fear we travel on train and boat. We cannot deny
 that if a bridge should collapse at the moment we are crossing it, we
 would fall into the river, but that is such a rare occurrence that we do
 not take the danger into account. Solitude too has its dangers and we
 avoid it under certain conditions; but it is by no means a matter of
 being unable to suffer it for a single moment. The same is true for the
 crowd, the enclosed space, the thunder-storm, etc. It is not at all the
 content but the intensity of these neurotic phobias that appears strange
 to us. The fear of the phobia cannot even be described. Sometimes we
 almost receive the impression that the neurotic is not really afraid of
 the same things and situations that can arouse fear in us, and which he
 calls by the same name.
 
 There remains a third group of phobias which is entirely unintelligible
 to us. When a strong, adult man is afraid to cross a street or a square
 of his own home town, when a healthy, well-developed woman becomes
 almost senseless with fear because a cat has brushed the hem of her
 dress or a mouse has scurried through the room--how are we to establish
 the relation to danger that obviously exists under the phobia? In these
 animal phobias it cannot possibly be a question of the heightening of
 common human antipathies. For, as an illustration of the antithesis,
 there are numerous persons who cannot pass a cat without calling and
 petting it. The mouse of which women are so much afraid, is at the same
 time a first class pet name. Many a girl who has been gratified to have
 her lover call her so, screams when she sees the cunning little creature
 itself. The behavior of the man who is afraid to cross the street or the
 square can only be explained by saying that he acts like a little child.
 A child is really taught to avoid a situation of this sort as dangerous,
 and our agoraphobist is actually relieved of his fear if some one goes
 with him across the square or street.
 
 The two forms of fear that have been described, free-floating fear and
 the fear which is bound up with phobias, are independent of one another.
 The one is by no means a higher development of the other; only in
 exceptional cases, almost by accident, do they occur simultaneously. The
 strongest condition of general anxiety need not manifest itself in
 phobias; and persons whose entire life is hemmed in by agoraphobia can
 be entirely free of pessimistic expectant fear. Some phobias, such as
 the fear of squares or of trains, are acquired only in later life, while
 others, the fear of darkness, storms and animals, exist from the very
 beginning. The former signify serious illness, the latter appear rather
 as peculiarities, moods. Yet whoever is burdened with fear of this
 second kind may be expected to harbor other and similar phobias. I must
 add that we group all these phobias under _anxiety hysteria_, and
 therefore regard it as a condition closely related to the well-known
 conversion hysteria.
 
 The third form of neurotic fear confronts us with an enigma; we loose
 sight entirely of the connection between fear and threatening danger.
 This anxiety occurs in hysteria, for instance, as the accompaniment of
 hysteric symptoms, or under certain conditions of excitement, where we
 would expect an emotional manifestation, but least of all of fear, or
 without reference to any known circumstance, unintelligible to us and to
 the patient. Neither far nor near can we discover a danger or a cause
 which might have been exaggerated to such significance. Through these
 spontaneous attacks we learn that the complex which we call the
 condition of anxiety can be resolved into its components. The whole
 attack may be represented by a single intensively developed symptom,
 such as a trembling, dizziness, palpitation of the heart, or tightening
 of breath; the general undertone by which we usually recognize fear may
 be utterly lacking or vague. And yet these conditions, which we
 describe as "anxiety equivalents," are comparable to anxiety in all its
 clinical and etiological relations.
 
 Two questions arise. Can we relate neurotic fear, in which danger plays
 so small a part or none at all, to real fear, which is always a reaction
 to danger? And what can we understand as the basis of neurotic fear? For
 the present we want to hold to our expectations: "Wherever there is
 fear, there must be a cause for it."
 
 Clinical observation yields several suggestions for the comprehension of
 neurotic fear, the significance of which I shall discuss with you.
 
 1. It is not difficult to determine that expectant fear or general
 anxiety is closely connected with certain processes in sexual life, let
 us say with certain types of libido. Utilization, the simplest and most
 instructive case of this kind, results when persons expose themselves to
 frustrated excitation, viz., if their sexual excitation does not meet
 with sufficient relief and is not brought to a satisfactory conclusion,
 in men, during the time of their engagement to marry, for instance, or
 in women whose husbands are not sufficiently potent or who, from
 caution, execute the sexual act in a shortened or mutilated form. Under
 these circumstances libidinous excitement disappears and anxiety takes
 its place, both in the form of expectant fear and in attacks and anxiety
 equivalents. The cautious interruption of the sexual act, when practiced
 as the customary sexual regime, so frequently causes the anxiety
 neurosis in men, and especially in women, that physicians are wise in
 such cases to examine primarily this etiology. On innumerable occasions
 we have learned that anxiety neurosis vanishes when the sexual misuse is
 abandoned.
 
 So far as I know, the connection between sexual restraint and conditions
 of anxiety is no longer questioned even by physicians who have nothing
 to do with psychoanalysis. But I can well imagine that they do not
 desist from reversing the connection and saying that these persons have
 exhibited a tendency to anxiety from the outset and therefore practice
 reserve in sexual matters. The behavior of women whose sexual conduct is
 passive, viz., is determined by the treatment of the husband,
 contradicts this supposition. The more temperamental, that is, the more
 disposed toward sexual intercourse and capable of gratification is the
 woman, the more will she react to the impotence of the man, or to the
 _coitus interruptus_, by anxiety manifestations. In anaesthetic or only
 slightly libidinous women, such misuse will not carry such consequences.
 
 Sexual abstinence, recommended so warmly by the physicians of to-day,
 has the same significance in the development of conditions of anxiety
 only when the libido, to which satisfactory relief is denied, is
 sufficiently strong and not for the most part accounted for by
 sublimation. The decision whether illness is to result always depends
 upon the quantitative factors. Even where character formation and not
 disease is concerned, we easily recognize that sexual constraint goes
 hand in hand with a certain anxiety, a certain caution, while
 fearlessness and bold daring arise from free gratification of sexual
 desires. However much these relations are altered by various influences
 of civilization, for the average human being it is true that anxiety and
 sexual constraint belong together.
 
 I have by no means mentioned all the observations that speak for the
 genetic relation of the libido to fear. The influence on the development
 of neurotic fear of certain phases of life, such as puberty and the
 period of menopause, when the production of libido is materially
 heightened, belongs here too. In some conditions of excitement we may
 observe the mixture of anxiety and libido and the final substitution of
 anxiety for libido. These facts give us a twofold impression, first that
 we are concerned with an accumulation of libido, which is diverted from
 its normal channel, second that we are working with somatic processes.
 Just how anxiety originates from the libido we do not know; we can only
 ascertain that the libido is in abeyance, and that we observe anxiety in
 its place.
 
 2. We glean a second hint from the analysis of the psychoneuroses,
 especially of hysteria. We have heard that in addition to the symptoms,
 fear frequently accompanies this condition; this, however, is free
 floating fear, which is manifested either as an attack or becomes a
 permanent condition. The patients cannot tell what they are afraid of
 and connect their fear, through an unmistakable secondary elaboration,
 with phobias nearest at hand; death, insanity, paralysis. When we
 analyze the situation which gave rise to the anxiety or to symptoms
 accompanied by it, we can generally tell which normal psychologic
 process has been omitted and has been replaced by the phenomenon of
 fear. Let me express it differently: we reconstruct the unconscious
 process as though it had not experienced suppression and had continued
 its way into consciousness uninterruptedly. Under these conditions as
 well this process would have been accompanied by an emotion, and we now
 learn with surprise that when suppression has occurred the emotion
 accompanying the normal process has been replaced by fear, regardless of
 its original quality. In hysteric conditions of fear, its unconscious
 correlative may be either an impulse of similar character, such as fear,
 shame, embarrassment or positive libidinous excitation, or hostile and
 aggressive emotion such as fury or rage. Fear then is the common
 currency for which all emotional impulses can be exchanged, provided
 that the idea with which it has been associated has been subject to
 suppression.
 
 3. Patients suffering from compulsive acts are remarkably devoid of
 fear. They yield us the data for our third point. If we try to hinder
 them in the performance of their compulsive acts, of their washing or
 their ceremonials, or if they themselves dare to give up one of their
 compulsions, they are seized with terrible fear that again exacts
 obedience to the compulsion. We understand that the compulsive act had
 veiled fear and had been performed only to avoid it. In compulsion
 neurosis then, fear, which would otherwise be present, is replaced by
 symptom development. Similar results are yielded by hysteria. Following
 the process of suppression we find the development, either of anxiety
 alone or of anxiety and symptom development, or finally a more complete
 symptom development and no anxiety. In an abstract sense, then, it would
 be correct to say that symptoms are formed only to evade development of
 fear, which otherwise could not be escaped. According to this
 conception, fear is seen to occupy the center of the stage in the
 problems of neurosis.
 
 Our observations on anxiety neuroses led to the conclusion that when the
 libido was diverted from its normal use and anxiety thus released, it
 occurred on the basis of somatic processes. The analyses of hysteria and
 compulsion neuroses furnish the correlative observations that similar
 diversion with similar results may also be the consequence of a
 constraint of psychic forces. Such then is our knowledge of the origin
 of neurotic fear; it still sounds rather vague. But as yet I know no
 path that would lead us further. The second task we have set ourselves
 is still more difficult to accomplish. It is the establishment of a
 connection between neurotic fear, which is misused libido, and real
 fear, which is a reaction to danger. You may believe that these things
 are quite distinct and yet we have no criterion for distinguishing the
 sensations of real and neurotic fear.
 
 The desired connection is brought about by presupposing the antithesis
 of the ego to libido that is so frequently claimed. We know that the
 development of fear is the ego's reaction to danger, the signal for
 preparation for flight, and from this we are led to believe that in
 neurotic fear the ego attempts to escape the claims of its libido, and
 treats this inner danger as though it came from without. Accordingly our
 expectation that where there is fear there must be something to be
 afraid of, is fulfilled. But the analogy admits of further application.
 Just as the attempt to flee external danger is relieved by standing
 one's ground, and by appropriate steps toward defense, so the
 development of neurotic fear is arrested as fast as the symptom
 develops, for by means of it the fear is held in check.
 
 Our difficulties in understanding now lie elsewhere. The fear, which
 represents flight of the ego before the libido, is supposed to have
 sprung from the libido itself. That is obscure and warns us not to
 forget that the libido of a person belongs fundamentally to him and
 cannot confront him as an external force. The localized dynamics of fear
 development are still unintelligible; we do not know what psychic
 energies are released or from what psychic systems they are derived. I
 cannot promise to solve this problem, but we still have two trails to
 follow which lead us to direct observations and analytic investigation
 which can aid our speculations. We turn to the origin of fear in the
 child, and to the source of neurotic fear which attaches itself to
 phobias.
 
 Fear in children is quite common and it is very hard to tell whether it
 is neurotic or real fear. Indeed, the value of this distinction is
 rendered questionable by the behavior of children. On the one hand we
 are not surprised that the child fears all strange persons, new
 situations and objects, and we explain this reaction very easily by his
 weakness and ignorance. We ascribe to the child a strong disposition to
 real fear and would consider it purposeful if this fear were in fact a
 heritage. Herein the child would only repeat the behavior of prehistoric
 man and of the primitive man of today who, on account of his ignorance
 and helplessness, fears everything that is new, and much that is
 familiar, all of which can no longer inspire us with fear. If the
 phobias of the child were at least partially such as might be attributed
 to that primeval period of human development, this would tally entirely
 with our expectations.
 
 On the other hand, we cannot overlook the fact that not all children are
 equally afraid, and that those very children who express particular
 timidity toward all possible objects and situations subsequently prove
 to be nervous. Thus the neurotic disposition reveals itself by a decided
 tendency to real fear; anxiety rather than nervousness appears to be
 primary. We therefore arrive at the conclusion that the child (and later
 the adult) fears the power of his libido because he is anxious in the
 face of everything. The derivation of anxiety from the libido is hence
 put aside. Any investigation of the conditions of real fear consistently
 leads to the conclusion that consciousness of one's own weakness and
 helplessness--inferiority, in the terminology of A. Adler--when it is
 able to persist from childhood to maturity, is the cause underlying the
 neuroses.
 
 This sounds so simple and convincing that it has a claim upon our
 attention. To be sure, it would result in our shifting the basis of
 nervousness. The persistence of the feeling of inferiority, and its
 prerequisite condition of anxiety and its subsequent development of
 symptoms, is so firmly established that it is rather the exceptional
 case, when health is the outcome, which requires an explanation. What
 can be learned from careful observation of the fear of children? The
 little child is primarily afraid of strange people; situations wax
 important only because they involve people, and objects become
 influential much later. But the child does not fear these strange
 persons because he attributes evil intentions to them, because he
 compares his weakness with their strength or recognizes them as
 dangerous to his existence, his safety and freedom from pain. Such a
 child, suspicious, afraid of the aggressive impulse which dominates the
 world, would prove a sad theoretic construction. The child is afraid of
 a stranger because he is adjusted to a dear, beloved person, his
 mother. His disappointment and longing are transformed into fear, his
 unemployed libido, which cannot yet be held suspended, is diverted by
 fear. It cannot be termed a coincidence that this situation, which is a
 typical example of all childish fear, is a repetition of the first
 condition of fear during birth, viz., separation from the mother.
 
 The first situation phobias of children are darkness and solitude; the
 former often persists throughout life; common to both is the absence of
 the dear nurse, the mother. I once heard a child, who was afraid of the
 dark, call into an adjoining room, "Auntie, talk to me, I am afraid."
 "But what good will that do you? You cannot see me!" Whereupon the child
 answered, "If someone speaks, it is brighter." The yearning felt in
 darkness is converted into the fear of darkness. Far from saying that
 neurotic fear is only a secondary, a special case of real fear, we
 observe in little children something that resembles the behavior of real
 fear and has in common with neurotic fear, this characteristic feature:
 origin from unemployed libido. The child seems to bring very little real
 fear into the world. In all situations which may later become the
 conditions of phobias, on elevations, narrow bridges across water, on
 railroad and boat trips, the child exhibits no fear. And the more
 ignorant he is, the less fear he feels. It would be most desirable to
 have a greater heritage of such life-preservative instincts; the task of
 supervision, which is to hinder him from exposing himself to one danger
 after another, would be lessened. In reality the child at first
 overestimates his powers and behaves fearlessly because he does not
 recognize dangers. He will run to the water's edge, mount the window
 sill, play with fire or with sharp utensils, in short, he will do
 everything that would harm him and alarm his guardians. The awakening of
 real fear is the result of education, since we may not permit him to
 pass through the instructive experience himself.
 
 If there are children who meet this education to fear half way, and who
 discover dangers of which they have not been warned, the explanation
 suffices that their constitution contains a greater measure of
 libidinous need or that they have been spoiled early through libidinous
 gratification. No wonder that those persons who are nervous in later
 life are recruited from the ranks of these children. We know that the
 creation of neurosis is made easy by the inability to endure a
 considerable amount of pent-up libido for any length of time. You see
 that here too we must do justice to the constitutional factor, whose
 rights we never wish to question. We fight shy of it only when others
 neglect all other claims for this, and introduce the constitutional
 factor where it does not belong according to the combined results of
 observation and analysis, or where it must be the last consideration.
 
 Let us extract the sum of our observations on the anxiety of children:
 Infantile fear has very little to do with real fear, but is closely
 related to the neurotic fear of adults. It originates in unemployed
 libido and replaces the object of love that is lacking by an external
 object or situation.
 
 Now you will be glad to hear that the analysis of phobias cannot teach
 much more that is new. The same thing occurs in them as in the fear of
 children; unemployed libido is constantly being converted into real fear
 and so a tiny external danger takes the place of the demands of the
 libido. This coincidence is not strange, for infantile phobias are not
 only the prototypes but the direct prerequisite and prelude to later
 phobias, which are grouped with the anxiety hysterias. Every hysteria
 phobia can be traced to childish fear of which it is a continuation,
 even if it has another content and must therefore receive a different
 name. The difference between the two conditions lies in their mechanism.
 In the adult the fact that the libido has momentarily become useless in
 the form of longing, is not sufficient to effect the transformation of
 fear into libido. He has long since learned to maintain such libido in a
 suspended state or to use it differently. But when the libido is part of
 a psychic impulse which has experienced suppression, similar conditions
 to those of the child, who cannot distinguish the conscious from the
 unconscious, are restablished. The regression to infantile phobia is
 the bridge where the transformation of libido into fear is conveniently
 effected. We have, as you know, spoken a great deal about suppression,
 but we have always followed the fate of the conception that was to be
 suppressed, because this was easier to recognize and to present. We have
 always omitted from our consideration what happened to the emotion that
 clung to the suppressed idea; and only now we learn that whatever
 quality this emotion might have manifested under normal conditions, its
 fate is a transformation into fear. This transformation of emotion is by
 far the more important part of the suppression process. It is not so
 easy to discuss, because we cannot assert the existence of unconscious
 emotions in the same sense as unconscious ideas. With one difference, an
 idea remains the same whether it is conscious or unconscious; we can
 give an account of what corresponds to an unconscious idea. But an
 emotion is a release and must be judged differently from an idea.
 Without a deeper reflection and clarification of our hypotheses of
 psychic processes, we cannot tell what corresponds to its unconscious
 stage. We cannot undertake this here. But we want to retain the
 impression we have gained, that the development of anxiety is closely
 connected with the unconscious system.
 
 I said that the transformation into fear, rather a discharge in the form
 of fear, is the immediate fate of suppressed libido. Not the only or
 final fate, I must add. These neuroses are accompanied by processes that
 strive to restrain the development of fear, and succeed in various ways.
 In phobias, for instance, two phases of the neurotic process can be
 clearly distinguished. The first effects the suppression of libido and
 its transition to fear, which is joined to an external danger. The
 second consists in building up all those precautions and safety devices
 which are to prevent contact with this danger which is dealt with as an
 external fact. Suppression corresponds to the ego's flight from the
 libido, which it regards dangerous. The phobia is comparable to a
 fortification against outer danger, which is represented by the much
 feared libido. The weakness of the phobias' system of defense lies in
 the fact that the fort has been strengthened from without and has
 remained vulnerable within. The projection of peril from the libido into
 the environment is never very successful. In other neuroses, therefore,
 other systems of defense are used against the possibility of fear
 development. That is an interesting aspect of the psychology of
 neurosis. Unfortunately its study would lead us to digress too far, and
 presupposes a more thorough and special knowledge of the subject. I
 shall add only one thing more. I have already spoken to you of the
 counter siege by which the ego imprisons the suppression and which it
 must maintain permanently for the suppression to subsist. The task of
 this counter siege is to carry out diverse forms of defense against the
 fear development which follows the suppression.
 
 To return to the phobias, I may now say that you realize how
 insufficient it would be to explain only their content, to be interested
 only in knowing that this or that object or situation is made the
 subject of a phobia. The content of the phobia has about the same
 importance for it as the manifest dream facade has for the dream. With
 some necessary restrictions, we admit that among the contents of the
 phobias are some that are especially qualified to be objects of fear
 through phylogenetic inheritance, as Stanley Hall has emphasized. In
 harmony with this is the fact that many of these objects of fear can
 establish connections with danger only by symbolic relations.
 
 And so we are convinced of the central position that the problem of fear
 assumes in the questions of the neurotic psychology. We are deeply
 impressed with how closely the development of fear is interwoven with
 the fate of the libido and the unconscious system. There is only one
 disconnected point, one inconsistency in our hypothesis: the
 indisputable fact that real fear must be considered an expression of the
 ego's instincts of self-preservation.
 
 
 
 
 TWENTY-SIXTH LECTURE
 
 GENERAL THEORY OF THE NEUROSES
 
 _The Libido Theory and Narcism_
 
 
 Repeatedly in the past and more recently we have dealt with the
 distinction between the ego instincts and the sexual instincts. At
 first, suppression taught us that the two may be flatly opposed to each
 other, that in the struggle the sexual instincts suffer apparent defeat
 and are forced to obtain satisfaction by other regressive methods, and
 so find the compensation for defeat in their invulnerability. After that
 we learned that at the outset both have a different relation to the
 educator, Necessity, so that they do not develop in the same manner and
 do not enter into the same relationship with the principle of reality.
 We come to realize that the sexual instincts are much more closely
 allied to the emotional condition of fear than the ego instincts. This
 result appears incomplete only in one respect, which, however, is most
 important. For further evidence we shall mention the significant fact
 that non-satisfaction of hunger and thirst, the two most elementary
 instincts of self-preservation, never result in their reversal into
 anxiety, while the transformation of unsatisfied libido into fear is, as
 we have heard, one of the best known and most frequently observed
 phenomena.
 
 No one can contest our perfect justification in separating the ego from
 sexual instincts. It is affirmed by the existence of sexual desire,
 which is a very special activity of the individual. The only question
 is, what significance shall we give to this distinction, how decisive is
 it? The answer will depend upon the results of our observations; on how
 far the sexual instincts, in their psychological and somatic
 manifestations, behave differently from the others that are opposed to
 them; on how important are the consequences which result from these
 differences. We have, of course, no motive whatever for insisting upon
 a certain intangible difference in the character of the two groups of
 instincts. Both are only designations of the sources of energy of the
 individual. The discussion as to whether they are fundamentally of the
 same or of a different character, and if the same, when it was that they
 separated from one another, cannot profit by the conceptions, but must
 deal rather with the underlying biological facts. At present we know
 very little about this, and even if we knew more it would not be
 relevant to our analytic task.
 
 Obviously, we should gain slight profit if, following the example of
 Jung, we were to emphasize the original unity of all instincts, and were
 to call the energy expressed in all of them "libido." Since the sexual
 function cannot be eliminated from psychic life by any device, we are
 forced to speak of sexual and asexual libido. As in the past, we rightly
 retain the name libido for the instincts of sexual life.
 
 I believe, therefore, that the question, how far the justifiable
 distinction of the instincts of sex and of self-preservation may be
 carried, is of little importance for psychoanalysis; and psychoanalysis
 is moreover not competent to deal with it. From a biological standpoint
 there are, to be sure, various reasons for believing that this
 distinction is significant. Sexuality is the only function of the living
 organism which extends beyond the individual and sees to his kinship
 with the species. It is undeniable that its practice does not always
 benefit the individual as do his other performances. For the price of
 ecstatic pleasures it involves him in dangers which threaten his life
 and frequently cause death. Probably peculiar metabolic processes,
 different from all others, are required to maintain a part of the
 individual life for its progeny. The individual who places himself in
 the foreground and regards his sexuality as a means to his gratification
 is, from a biological point of view, only an episode in a series of
 generations, a transient appendage to a germ-plasm which is virtually
 endowed with immortality, just as though he were the temporary partner
 in a corporation which continues to persist after his death.
 
 For psychoanalytic explanation of neuroses, however, there is no need to
 enter upon these far-reaching implications. By separate observation of
 the sexual and the ego instincts, we have gained the key to the
 understanding of transference-neuroses. We were able to trace them back
 to the fundamental situation where the sexual instinct and the instinct
 of self-preservation had come in conflict with one another, or
 biologically although not so accurately, expressed where the part played
 by the ego, that of independent individuality, was opposed to the other,
 that of a link in a series of generations. Only human beings are capable
 of such conflict, and therefore, taken all in all, neurosis is the
 prerogative of man, and not of animals. The excessive development of his
 libido and the elaboration of a varied and complicated psychic life thus
 made possible, appear to have created the conditions prerequisite for
 conflict. It is clear that these conditions are also responsible for the
 great progress that man has made beyond his kinship with animals. The
 capacity for neurosis is really only the reverse side of his talents and
 gifts. But these are only speculations, which divert us from our task.
 
 Until now we worked with the impulse that we can distinguish the ego and
 the sexual instincts from one another by their manifestations. We could
 do this without difficulty in the transference neuroses. We called the
 accumulation of energy which the ego directed towards the object of its
 sexual striving libido and all others, which proceeded from the
 instincts of self-preservation, interest. We were able to achieve our
 first insight into the workings of psychic forces by observing the
 accumulation of the libido, its transformations and its final destiny.
 The transference neuroses furnished the best material for this. But the
 ego, composed from various organizations, their construction and
 functioning, remained hidden and we were led to believe that only the
 analysis of other neurotic disturbances would raise the veil.
 
 Very soon we began to extend these psychoanalytic conceptions to other
 conditions. As early as 1908, K. Abraham asserted, after a discussion
 with me, that the principal characteristic of dementia praecox (which
 may be considered one of the psychoses) is _that there is no libidinous
 occupation of objects_ (_The Psycho-sexual Differences between Hysteria
 and Dementia Praecox_). But then the question arose, what happens to the
 libido of the demented, which is diverted from its objects? Abraham did
 not hesitate to give the answer, "It is turned back upon the ego, and
 _this reflected turning back is the source of the megalomania_ in
 dementia praecox." This hallucination of greatness is exactly comparable
 to the well-known over-estimation of the objects habitual to lovers. So,
 for the first time, we gained an understanding of psychotic condition by
 comparing it with the normal course of love.
 
 These first interpretations of Abraham's have been maintained in
 psychoanalysis, and have become the basis of our attitude towards the
 psychoses. Slowly we familiarized ourselves with the idea that the
 libido, which we find attached to certain objects, which expresses a
 striving to attain gratification from these objects, may also forsake
 them and put in their place the person's own ego. Gradually these ideas
 were developed more and more consistently. The name for this placing of
 the libido--narcism--was borrowed from one of the perversions described
 by P. Naecke. In it the grown individual lavishes upon his own body all
 the affection usually devoted to some foreign sex object.
 
 We reflected that if such a fixation of libido on one's own body and
 person instead of on some external object exists, this cannot be an
 exceptional or trivial occurrence. It is much more probable that this
 narcism is the general and original condition, out of which the love for
 an object later develops, without however necessarily causing narcism to
 disappear. From the evolutionary history of object-libido we remembered
 that in the beginning many sex instincts seek auto-erotic gratification,
 and that this capacity for auto-eroticism forms the basis for the
 retardation of sexuality in its education to conformity with fact. And
 so, auto-eroticism was the sexual activity of the narcistic stage in the
 placing of the libido.
 
 To be brief: We represented the relation of the ego-libido to the
 object-libido in a way which I can explain by an analogy from zoology.
 Think of the simplest forms of life, which consist of a little lump of
 protoplasmic substance which is only slightly differentiated. They
 stretch out protrusions, known as pseudopia, into which the protoplasm
 flows. But they can withdraw these protrusions and assume their original
 shape. Now we compare the stretching out of these processes with the
 radiation of libido to the objects, while the central mass of libido can
 remain in the ego, and we assume that under normal conditions ego-libido
 can be changed into object-libido, and this can again be taken up into
 the ego, without any trouble.
 
 With the help of this representation we can now explain a great number
 of psychic conditions, or to express it more modestly, describe them, in
 the language of the libido theory; conditions that we must accredit to
 normal life, such as the psychic attitude during love, during organic
 sickness, during sleep. We assumed that the conditions of sleep rest
 upon withdrawal from the outer world and concentration upon the wish to
 sleep. The nocturnal psychic activity expressed in the dream we found in
 the service of a wish to sleep and, moreover, governed by wholly
 egoistic motives. Continuing in the sense of libido theory: sleep is a
 condition in which all occupations of objects, the libidinous as well as
 the egoistic, are given up, and are withdrawn into the ego. Does this
 not throw a new light upon recovery during sleep, and upon the nature of
 exhaustion in general? The picture of blissful isolation in the
 intra-uterine life, which the sleeper conjures up night after night,
 thus also completes the picture from the psychic side. In the sleeper
 the original condition of libido division is again restored, a condition
 of complete narcism in which libido and ego-interest are still united
 and live indistinguishably in the self-sufficient ego.
 
 We must observe two things: First, how can the conceptions of narcism
 and egoism be distinguished? I believe narcism is the libidinous
 complement of egoism. When we speak of egoism we mean only the benefits
 to the individual; if we speak of narcism we also take into account his
 libidinous satisfaction. As practical motives the two can be followed up
 separately to a considerable degree. One can be absolutely egoistic, and
 still have strong libidinous occupation of objects, in so far as the
 libidinous gratification by way of the object serves the needs of the
 ego. Egoism will then take care that the striving for the object results
 in no harm to the ego. One can be egoistic and at the same time
 excessively narcistic, i.e., have very slight need of an object. This
 need may be for direct sexual satisfaction or even for those higher
 desires, derived from need, which we are in the habit of calling love as
 opposed to sensuality. In all of these aspects, egoism is the
 self-evident, the constant, and narcism the variable element. The
 antithesis of egoism, _altruism_, is not the same as the conception of
 libidinous occupation of objects. Altruism differs from it by the
 absence of desire for sexual satisfaction. But in the state of being
 completely in love, altruism and libidinous occupation with an object
 clash. The sex object as a rule draws upon itself a part of the narcism
 of the ego. This is generally called "sexual over-estimation" of the
 object. If the altruistic transformation from egoism to the sex object
 is added, the sex object becomes all powerful; it has virtually sucked
 up the ego.
 
 I think you will find it a pleasant change if after the dry phantasy of
 science I present to you a poetic representation of the economic
 contrast between narcism and being in love. I take it from the
 _Westostliche Divans_ of Goethe:
 
     SULEIKA:
         Conqueror and serf and nation;
           They proclaim it joyously;
         Mankind's loftiest elation,
           Shines in personality.
         Life's enchantment lures and lingers,
           Of yourself is not afar,
         All may slip through passive fingers,
           If you tarry as you are.
 
     HATEM:
         Never could I be thus ravished,
           Other thoughts are in my mind,
         All the gladness earth has lavished
           In Suleika's charms I find.
         When I cherish her, then only
           Dearer to myself I grow,
         If she turned to leave me lonely
           I should lose the self I know.
         Hatem's happiness were over,--
           But his changeling soul would glide
         Into any favored lover
           Whom she fondles at her side.
 
 The second observation is supplementary to the dream theory. We cannot
 explain the origin of the dream unless we assume that the suppressed
 unconscious has achieved a certain independence of the ego. It does not
 conform to the wish for sleep and retains its hold on the energies that
 have seized it, even when all the occupations with objects dependent
 upon the ego have been released for the benefit of sleep. Not until then
 can we understand how this unconscious can take advantage of the
 nocturnal discontinuance or deposition of the censor, and can seize
 control of fragments left over from the day to fashion a forbidden dream
 wish from them. On the other hand, it is to the already existing
 connections with these supposed elements that these fragments owe a part
 of the resistance directed against the withdrawal of the libido, and
 controlled by the wish for sleep. We also wish to supplement our
 conception of dream formation with this trait of dynamic importance.
 
 Organic diseases, painful irritations, inflammation of the organs create
 a condition which clearly results in freeing the libido of its objects.
 The withdrawn libido again finds itself in the ego and occupies the
 diseased part of the part. We may even venture to assert that under
 these conditions the withdrawal of the libido from its objects is more
 conspicuous than the withdrawal of egoistic interest from the outside
 world. This seems to open the way to an understanding of hypochondria,
 where an organ occupies the ego in a similar way without being diseased,
 according to our conception. I shall resist the temptation of continuing
 along this line, or of discussing other situations which we can
 understand or represent through the assumption that the object libido
 travels to the ego. For I am eager to meet two objections, which I know
 are absorbing your attention. In the first place, you want to call me to
 account for my insistence upon distinguishing in sleep, in sickness and
 in similar situations between libido and interest, sexual instincts and
 ego instincts, since throughout the observations can be explained by
 assuming a single and uniform energy, which, freely mobile, occupies now
 the object, now the ego, and enters into the services of one or the
 other of these impulses. And, secondly, how can I venture to treat the
 freeing of libido from its object as the source of a pathological
 condition, since such transformation of object-libido into
 ego-libido--or more generally, ego-energy--belongs to the normal, daily
 and nightly repeated occurrences of psychic dynamics?
 
 The answer is: Your first objection sounds good. The discussion of the
 conditions of sleep, of sickness and of being in love would in
 themselves probably never have led to a distinction between ego-libido
 and object-libido, or between libido and interest. But you do not take
 into account the investigations from which we have set out, in the
 light of which we now regard the psychic situations under discussion.
 The necessity of distinguishing between libido and interest, that is,
 between sexual instincts and those of self-preservation, is forced upon
 us by our insight into the conflict out of which the transference
 neuroses emerge. We can no longer reckon without it. The assumption that
 object-libido can change into the ego-libido, in other words, that we
 must reckon with an ego-libido, appeared to us the only possible one
 wherewith to solve the riddle of the so-called narcistic neuroses--for
 instance, dementia praecox--or to justify the similarities and
 differences in a comparison of hysteria and compulsion. We now apply to
 sickness, sleep and love that which we found undeniably affirmed
 elsewhere. We may proceed with such applications as far as they will go.
 The only assertion that is not a direct refutation of our analytic
 experience is that libido remains libido whether it is directed towards
 objects or toward the ego itself, and is never transferred into egoistic
 interest, and vice-versa. But this assertion is of equal weight with the
 distinction of sex and ego instincts which we have already critically
 appraised, and which we will maintain from methodological motives until
 it may possibly be disproved.
 
 Your second objection, too, raises a justified question, but it points
 in a wrong direction. To be sure the retreat of object-libido into the
 ego is not purely pathogenic; we see that it occurs each time before
 going to sleep, only to be released again upon awaking. The little
 protoplasmic animal draws in its protrusions, only to send them out
 again on a later occasion. But it is quite another matter when a
 specific, very energetic process compels the withdrawal of libido from
 the object. The libido has become narcistic and cannot find its way back
 to the object, and this hindrance to the mobility of the libido
 certainly becomes pathogenic. It appears that an accumulation of
 narcistic libido cannot be borne beyond a certain point. We can imagine
 that the reason for occupation with the object is that the ego found it
 necessary to send out its libido in order not to become diseased because
 it was pent up. If it were our plan to go further into the subject of
 dementia praecox, I would show you that this process which frees the
 libido from the objects and bars the way back to them, is closely
 related to the process of suppression, and must be considered as its
 counterpart. But above all you would recognize familiar ground, for the
 conditions of these processes are practically identical, as far as we
 can now see, with those of suppression. The conflict appears to be the
 same, and to take place between the same forces. The reason for a result
 as different as, for instance, the result in hysteria, can be found only
 in a difference of dispositions. The vulnerable point in the libido
 development of these patients lies in another phase; the controlling
 fixation, which, as you will remember, permits the breach resulting in
 the formation of symptoms, is in another place probably in the stage of
 primitive narcism, to which dementia praecox returns in its final stage.
 It is noteworthy that for all the narcistic neuroses, we must assume
 fixation points of the libido which reach back into far earlier phases
 of development than in cases of hysteria or compulsion neuroses. But you
 have heard that the conceptions obtained in our study of transference
 neuroses are sufficient to orient us in the narcistic neuroses, which
 present far greater practical difficulties. The similarities are
 considerable; it is fundamentally the same field of observation. But you
 can easily imagine how hopeless the explanations of these conditions,
 which belong to psychiatry, appear to him who is not equipped for this
 task with an analytic knowledge of transference neuroses.
 
 The picture given by the symptoms of dementia praecox, which, moreover,
 is highly variable, is not exclusively determined by the symptoms. These
 result from forcing the libido away from the objects and accumulating it
 in the ego in the form of narcistic libido. A large space is occupied by
 other phenomena, which result from the impulses of the libido to regain
 the objects, and so show an attempt toward restitution and healing.
 These symptoms are in fact the more conspicuous, the more clamorous;
 they show an unquestionable similarity to those of hysteria, or less
 often to those of compulsion neurosis, and yet they are different in
 every respect. It appears that in dementia praecox the libido in its
 endeavor to return to the objects, i.e., to the images of the objects,
 really captures something, but only their shadows--I mean, the verbal
 images belonging to them. This is not the place to discuss this matter,
 but I believe that these reversed impulses of the libido have permitted
 us an insight into what really determines the difference between a
 conscious and an unconscious representation.
 
 I have now brought you into the field where we may expect the further
 progress of analytic work. Since we can now employ the conception of
 ego-libido, the narcistic neuroses have become accessible to us. We are
 confronted with the problem of finding a dynamic explanation of these
 conditions and at the same time of enlarging our knowledge of psychic
 life by an understanding of the ego. The ego psychology, which we strive
 to understand, must not be founded upon introspective data, but rather,
 as in the libido, upon analysis of the disturbances and decompositions
 of the ego. When this greater task is accomplished we shall probably
 disparage our previous knowledge of the fate of the libido which we
 gained from our study of the transference neuroses. But there is still
 much to be said in this matter. Narcistic neuroses can scarcely be
 approached by the same technique which served us in the transference
 neuroses. Soon you will hear why. After forging ahead a little in the
 study of narcistic neuroses we always seem to come to a wall which
 impedes progress. You know that in the transference neuroses we also
 encountered such barriers of resistance, but we were able to break them
 down piece by piece. In narcistic neuroses the resistance is
 insuperable; at best we are permitted to cast a curious glance over the
 wall to spy out what is taking place on the other side. Our technical
 methods must be replaced by others; we do not yet know whether or not we
 shall be able to find such a substitute. To be sure, even these patients
 furnish us with ample material. They do say many things, though not in
 answer to our questions, and for the time being we are forced to
 interpret these utterances through the understanding we have gained from
 the symptoms of transference neuroses. The coincidence is sufficiently
 great to assure us a good beginning. How far this technique will go,
 remains to be seen.
 
 There are additional difficulties that impede our progress. The
 narcistic conditions and the psychoses related to them can only be
 solved by observers who have schooled themselves in analytic study of
 transference neuroses. But our psychiatrists do not study psychoanalysis
 and we psychoanalysts see too few psychiatric cases. A race of
 psychiatrists that has gone through the school of psychoanalysis as a
 preparatory science most first grow up. The beginnings of this are now
 being made in America, where many leading psychiatrists explain the
 teachings of psychoanalysis to their students, and where many owners of
 sanatoriums and directors of institutes for the insane take pains to
 observe their patients in the light of these teachings. But even here we
 have occasionally been successful in casting a glance over the narcistic
 wall and I shall tell you a few things that we think we have discovered.
 
 The disease of paranoia, chronic systematic insanity, is given a very
 uncertain position by the attempts at classification of present-day
 psychiatry. There is no doubt of its close relationship to dementia
 praecox. I once was so bold as to propose that paranoia and dementia
 praecox could be classed together under the common name of paraphrenia.
 The types of paranoia are described according to their content as:
 megalomania, the mania of persecution, eroto mania, mania of jealousy,
 etc. From psychiatry we do not expect attempts at explanation. As an
 example of such an attempt, to be sure an antiquated and not entirely
 valid example, I might mention the attempt to develop one symptom
 directly out of another by means of an intellectual rationalization, as:
 the patient who primarily believes he is being persecuted draws the
 conclusion from this persecution that he must be an extraordinarily
 important personality and thus develops megalomania. In our analytical
 conception megalomania is the immediate outcome of exaggeration of the
 ego, which results from the drawing-in of libidinous occupation with
 objects, a secondary narcism as a recurrence of the originally early
 infantile form. In cases of the mania of persecution we have noticed a
 few things that lead us to follow a definite track. In the first place,
 we observed that in the great majority of cases the persecutor was of
 the same sex as the persecuted. This could still be explained in a
 harmless way, but in a few carefully studied cases it was clearly shown
 that the person of the same sex, who was most loved in normal times,
 became the persecutor after the malady set in. A further development is
 made possible by the fact that one loved person is replaced by another,
 according to familiar affinities, e.g., the father by the teacher or the
 superior. We concluded from such ever-increasing experiences, that
 paranoia persecutoria is the form in which the individual guards himself
 against a homosexual tendency that has become too powerful. The change
 from affection to hate, which notoriously may take the form of serious
 threats against the life of the loved and hated person, expresses the
 transformation of libidinous impulse into fear, which is a regularly
 recurring result of the process of suppression. As an illustration I
 shall cite the last case in which I made observations on this subject. A
 young physician had to be sent away from his home town because he had
 threatened the life of the son of a university professor, who up to that
 time had been his best friend. He ascribed truly devilish intentions to
 his erstwhile friend and credited him with power of a demon. He was to
 blame for all the misfortunes that had in recent years befallen the
 family of the patient, for all his personal and social ill-luck. But
 this was not enough. The wicked friend, and his father the professor,
 had been the cause of the war and had called the Russians into the land.
 He had forfeited his life a thousand times and our patient was convinced
 that with the death of the culprit all misfortune would come to an end.
 And yet his old affection for his friend was so great that it had
 paralyzed his hand when he had had the opportunity of shooting down the
 enemy at close quarters. In my short consultations with the patient, I
 discovered that the friendship between the two dated back to early
 school-life. Once at least the bonds of friendship had been
 over-stepped; a night spent together had been the occasion for complete
 sexual intercourse. Our patient never felt attracted to women, as would
 have been natural to his age or his charming personality. At one time he
 was engaged to a beautiful and distinguished young girl, but she broke
 off the engagement because she found so little affection in her fianc.
 Years later his malady broke out just at that moment when for the first
 time he had succeeded in giving complete gratification to a woman. When
 this woman embraced him, full of gratitude and devotion, he suddenly
 felt a strange pain which cut around his skull like a sharp incision.
 His later interpretation of this sensation was that an incision such as
 is used to expose a part of the brain had been performed upon him, and
 since his friend had become a pathological anatomist, he gradually came
 to the conclusion that he alone could have sent him this last woman as a
 temptation. From that time on his eyes were also opened to the other
 persecutions in which he was to be the victim of the intrigues of his
 former friend.
 
 But how about those cases where the persecutor is not of the same sex as
 the persecuted, where our explanation of a guard against homosexual
 libido is apparently contradicted? A short time ago I had occasion to
 investigate such a case and was able to glean corroboration from this
 apparent contradiction. A young girl thought she was followed by a man,
 with whom she had twice had intimate relations. She had, as a matter of
 fact, first laid these maniacal imputations at the door of a woman, whom
 we may consider as having played the part of a mother-substitute in her
 psychic life. Only after the second meeting did she progress to the
 point of diverting this maniacal idea from the woman and of transferring
 it to the man. The condition that the persecutor must be of the same sex
 was also originally maintained in this instance. In her claim before the
 lawyer and the physician, this patient did not mention this first stage
 of her mania, and this caused the appearance of a contradiction to our
 theory of paranoia.
 
 Homosexual choice of object is originally more natural to narcism than
 the heterosexual. If it is a matter of thwarting a strong and
 undesirable homosexual impulse, the way back to narcism is made
 especially easy. Until now I have had very little opportunity of
 speaking to you about the fundamental conditions of love-life, so far as
 we know them, and now I cannot make up for lost time. I only want to
 point out that the choice of an object, that progress in the development
 of the libido which comes after the narcistic stage, can proceed
 according to two different types--either according to the _narcistic_
 type, which puts a very similar personality in the place of the personal
 ego, or according to the _dependent_ type, which chooses those persons
 who have become valuable by satisfying needs of life other than as
 objects of the libido. We also accredit a strong fixation of the libido
 to the narcistic type of object-choice when there is a disposition
 toward manifest homosexuality.
 
 You will recall that in our first meeting of this semester I told you
 about the case of a woman who suffered from the mania of jealousy. Since
 we are so near the end you certainly will be glad to hear the
 psychoanalytic explanation of a maniacal idea. But I have less to say
 about it than you expect. The maniacal idea as well as the compulsion
 idea cannot be assailed by logical arguments or actual experience. This
 is explained by their relation to the unconscious, which is represented
 by the maniacal idea or the compulsion idea, and held down by whichever
 is effective. The difference between the two is based upon respective
 localization and dynamic relations of the two conditions.
 
 As in paranoia, so also in melancholia, of which, moreover, very
 different clinical forms are described. We have discovered a point of
 vantage which will yield us an insight into the inner structure of the
 condition. We realize that the self-accusations with which these
 melancholic patients torture themselves in the most pitiless way, really
 apply to another person, namely, the sex object which they have lost, or
 which through some fault has lost value for them. From this we may
 conclude that the melancholic has withdrawn his libido from the object.
 Through a process which we designate as "narcistic identification" the
 object is built up within the ego itself, is, so to say, projected upon
 the ego. Here I can give you only a descriptive representation, as yet
 without reference to the topical and dynamic relations. The personal ego
 is now treated in the same manner as the abandoned object, and suffers
 all the aggression and expressions of revenge which were planned for the
 object. Even the suicidal tendencies of melancholia are more
 comprehensible when we consider that this bitterness of the patient
 falls alike on the ego itself and on the object of its love and hate. In
 melancholia as well as in other narcistic conditions a feature of
 emotional life is strikingly shown which, since the time of Bleuler, we
 have been accustomed to designate as _ambivalence_. By this we mean that
 hostile and affectionate feelings are directed against one and the same
 person. I have, in the course of these discussions, unfortunately not
 been in a position to tell you more about this emotional ambivalence.
 
 We have, in addition to narcistic identification, an hysterical
 identification as well, which moreover has been known to us for a much
 longer time. I wish it were possible to determine clearly the difference
 between the two. Of the periodic and cyclic forms of melancholia I can
 tell you something that you will certainly be glad to hear, for it is
 possible, under favorable circumstances--I have twice had the
 experience--to prevent these emotional conditions (or their antitheses)
 by means of analytic treatment in the free intervals between the
 attacks. We learn that in melancholia as well as in mania, it is a
 matter of finding a special way for solving the conflict, the
 prerequisites for which entirely coincide with those of other neuroses.
 You can imagine how much there still is for psychoanalysis to learn in
 this field.
 
 I told you, too, that we hoped to gain a knowledge of the structure of
 the ego, and of the separate factors out of which it is built by means
 of the analysis of narcistic conditions. In one place we have already
 made a beginning. From the analysis of the maniacal delusion of being
 watched we concluded that in the ego there is really an agent which
 continually watches, criticizes and compares the other part of the ego
 and thus opposes it. We believe that the patient imparts to us a truth
 that is not yet sufficiently appreciated, when he complains that all his
 actions are spied upon and watched, all his thoughts recorded and
 criticized. He errs only in transferring this distressing force to
 something alien, outside of himself. He feels the dominance of a factor
 in his ego, which compares his actual ego and all of its activities to
 an _ideal ego_ that he has created in the course of his development. We
 also believe that the creation of this ideal ego took place with the
 purpose of again establishing that self-satisfaction which is bound up
 with the original infantile narcism, but which since then has
 experienced so many disturbances and disparagements. In this
 self-observing agent we recognize the ego-censor, the conscience; it is
 the same factor which at night exercises dream-censorship, and which
 creates the suppressions against inadmissible wish-impulses. Under
 analysis in the maniacal delusion of being watched it reveals its origin
 in the influence of parents, tutors and social environment and in the
 identification of the ego with certain of these model individuals.
 
 These are some of the conclusions which the application of
 psychoanalysis to narcistic conditions has yielded us. They are
 certainly all too few, and they often lack that accuracy which can only
 be acquired in a new field with the attainment of absolute familiarity.
 We owe them all to the exploitation of the conception of ego-libido or
 narcistic libido, by the aid of which we have extended to narcistic
 neuroses those observations which were confirmed in the transference
 neuroses. But now you will ask, is it possible for us to succeed in
 subordinating all the disturbances of narcistic conditions and the
 psychoses to the libido theory in such a way that in every case we
 recognize the libidinous factor of psychic life as the cause of the
 malady, and never make an abnormality in the functioning of the
 instincts of self-preservation answerable? Ladies and gentlemen, this
 conclusion does not seem urgent to me, and above all not ripe for
 decision. We can best leave it calmly to the progress of the science. I
 should not be surprised to find that the power to exert a pathogenic
 influence is really an exclusive prerogative of the libidinous impulses,
 and that the libido theory will celebrate its triumphs along the whole
 line from the simplest true neurosis to the most difficult psychotic
 derangement of the individual. For we know it to be a characteristic of
 the libido that it is continually struggling against subordinating
 itself to the realities of the world. But I consider it most probable
 that the ego instincts are indirectly swept along by the pathogenic
 excitations of the libido and forced into a functional disturbance.
 Moreover, I cannot see any defeat for our trend of investigation when we
 are confronted with the admission that in difficult psychoses the ego
 impulses themselves are fundamentally led astray; the future will teach
 us--or at least it will teach you. Let me return for one moment more to
 fear, in order to eliminate one last ambiguity that we have left. We
 have said that the relation between fear and the libido, which in other
 respects seems clearly defined, does not fit in with the assumption that
 in the face of danger real fear should become the expression of the
 instinct of self-preservation. This, however, can hardly be doubted. But
 suppose the emotion of fear is not contested by the egoistic ego
 impulse, but rather by the ego-libido? The condition of fear is in all
 cases purposeless and its lack of purpose is obvious when it reaches a
 higher level. It then disturbs the action, be it flight or defense,
 which alone is purposeful, and which serves the ends of
 self-preservation. If we accredit the emotional component of actual fear
 to the ego-libido, and the accompanying activity to the egoistic
 instinct to self-preservation, we have overcome every theoretical
 difficulty. Furthermore, you do not really believe that we flee
 _because_ we experience fear? On the contrary, we first are afraid _and
 then_ take to flight from the same motive that is awakened by the
 realization of danger. Men who have survived the endangering of their
 lives tell us that they were not at all afraid, they only acted. They
 turned the weapon against the wild animal, and that was in fact the most
 purposeful thing to do.
 
 
 
 
 TWENTY-SEVENTH LECTURE
 
 GENERAL THEORY OF THE NEUROSES
 
 _Transference_
 
 
 We are nearing the close of our discussions, and you probably cherish
 certain expectations, which shall not be disappointed. You think, I
 suppose, that I have not guided you through thick and thin of
 psychoanalytic subject matter to dismiss you without a word about
 therapy, which furnishes the only possibility of carrying on
 psychoanalysis. I cannot possibly omit this subject, for the observation
 of some of its aspects will teach you a new fact, without which the
 understanding of the diseases we have examined would be most incomplete.
 
 I know that you do not expect any guidance in the technique of
 practising analysis for therapeutic purposes. You wish to know only
 along what general lines psychoanalytic therapy works and approximately
 what it accomplishes. And you have an undeniable right to know this. I
 shall not actually tell you, however, but shall insist that you guess it
 yourselves.
 
 Only think! You know everything essential, from the conditions which
 precipitate the illness to all the factors at work within. Where is
 there room for therapeutic influence? In the first place, there is
 hereditary disposition; we do not speak of it often because it is
 strongly emphasized from another quarter, and we have nothing new to say
 about it. But do not think that we underestimate it. Just because we are
 therapeutists, we feel its power distinctly. At any rate, we cannot
 change it; it is a given fact which erects a barrier to our efforts. In
 the second place, there is the influence of the early experiences of
 childhood, which are in the habit of becoming sharply emphasized under
 analysis; they belong to the past and we cannot undo them. And then
 everything that we include in the term "actual forbearance"--misfortunes
 of life out of which privations of love arise, poverty, family discord,
 unfortunate choice in marriage, unfavorable social conditions and the
 severity of moral claims. These would certainly offer a foothold for
 very effectual therapy. But it would have to be the kind of therapy
 which, according to the Viennese folk-tale, Emperor Joseph practiced:
 the beneficial interference of a potentate, before whose will men bow
 and difficulties vanish. But who are we, to include such charity in the
 methods of our therapy? Poor as we are, powerless in society, forced to
 earn our living by practicing medicine, we are not even in a position to
 treat free of charge those patients who are unable to pay, as physicians
 who employ other methods of treatment can do. Our therapy is too long
 drawn-out, too extended for that. But perhaps you are still holding to
 one of the factors already mentioned, and think that you have found a
 factor through which our influence may be effective. If the restrictions
 of morality which are imposed by society have a share in the privation
 forced upon the patient, treatment might give him the courage, or
 possibly even the prescription itself, to cross these barriers, might
 tell him how gratification and health can be secured in the renunciation
 of that ideal which society has held up to us but often disregards. One
 grows healthy then, by giving one's sexuality full reign. Such analytic
 treatment, however, would be darkened by a shadow; it does not serve our
 recognized morality. The gain to the individual is a loss to society.
 
 But, ladies and gentlemen, who has misinformed you to this degree? It is
 inconceivable that the advice to give one's sexuality full reign can
 play a part in analytic therapy, if only from the circumstance we have
 ourselves described, that there is going on within the patient a bitter
 conflict between libidinous impulse and sexual suppression, between
 sensual and ascetic tendencies. This conflict is not abolished by giving
 one of these tendencies the victory over its opponent. We see that in
 the case of the nervous, asceticism has retained the upper hand. The
 consequence of this is that the suppressed sexual desire gains breathing
 space by the development of symptoms. If, on the other hand, we were to
 give the victory to sexuality, symptoms would have to replace the sexual
 suppression, which has been pushed aside. Neither of the two decisions
 can end the inner conflict, one part always remains unsatisfied. There
 are only a few cases wherein the conflict is so labile, that a factor
 such as the intervention of the physician could be decisive, and these
 cases really require no analytic treatment. Persons who can be so much
 influenced by a physician would have found some solution without him.
 You know that when an abstinent young man decides upon illegitimate
 sex-intercourse, or when an unsatisfied woman seeks compensation from
 another man, they have generally not waited for the permission of a
 physician, far less of an analyst, to do this.
 
 In studying the situation, one essential point is generally overlooked,
 that the pathogenic conflict of the neurotic must not be confused with
 normal struggles between psychic impulses of which all have their root
 in the same psychological soil. The neurotic struggle is a strife of
 forces, one of which has attained the level of the fore-conscious and
 the conscious, while the other has been held back in the unconscious
 stage. That is why the conflict can have no outcome; the struggling
 parties approach each other as little as in the well-known instance of
 the polar-bear and the whale. A real decision can be reached only if
 both meet on the same ground. To accomplish this is, I believe, the sole
 task of therapy.
 
 Moreover, I assure you that you are misinformed if you assume that
 advice and guidance in the affairs of life is an integral part of the
 analytic influence. On the contrary, we reject this role of the mentor
 as far as possible. Above all, we wish to attain independent decisions
 on the part of the patient. With this intention in mind, we require him
 to postpone all vital resolutions such as choice of a career, marriage
 or divorce, until the close of the treatment. You must confess that this
 is not what you had imagined. It is only in the case of certain very
 young or entirely helpless persons that we cannot insist upon the
 desired limitation. Here we must combine the function of physician and
 educator; we are well aware of the responsibility and behave with the
 necessary precaution.
 
 Judging from the zeal with which I defend myself against the accusation
 that analytic treatment urges the nervous person to give his sexuality
 full reign, you must not gather that we influence him for the benefit of
 conventional morality. We are just as far removed from that. We are no
 reformers, it is true, only observers, but we cannot help observing with
 critical eyes, and we have found it impossible to take the part of
 conventional sex morality, or to estimate highly the way in which
 society has tried to regulate the problems of sexual life in practice.
 We can prove to society mathematically that its code of ethics has
 exacted more sacrifices than is its worth, and that its procedure rests
 neither on veracity nor wisdom. We cannot spare our patients the task of
 listening to this criticism. We accustom them to weigh sexual matters,
 as well as others, without prejudice; and when, after the completion of
 the cure, they have become independent and choose some intermediate
 course between unrestrained sexuality and asceticism, our conscience is
 not burdened by the consequences. We tell ourselves: whoever has been
 successfully educated in being true to himself is permanently protected
 against the danger of immorality, even if his moral standard diverges
 from that of society. Let us, moreover, be careful not to overestimate
 the significance of the problem of abstinence with respect to its
 influence on neuroses. Only the minority of pathogenic situations of
 forbearance, with a subsequent condition of pent-up libido, can be
 resolved without more ado by such sexual intercourse as can be procured
 with little trouble.
 
 And so you cannot explain the therapeutic influence of psychoanalysis by
 saying that it simply recommends giving full sway to sexuality. You must
 seek another solution. I think that while I was refuting this
 supposition of yours, one of my remarks put you on the right track. Our
 usefulness consists in replacing the unconscious by the conscious, in
 translating the unconscious into the conscious. You are right; that is
 exactly it. By projecting the unconscious into the conscious, we do away
 with suppressions, we remove conditions of symptom formation and
 transform a pathogenic into a normal conflict which can be decided in
 some way or other. This is the only psychic change we produce in our
 patients; its extent is the extent of our helpfulness. Wherever no
 suppression and no analogous psychic process can be undone, there is no
 place for our therapy.
 
 We can express the aim of our efforts by various formulae of rendering
 the unconscious conscious, removing suppressions, filling out amnestic
 gaps--it all amounts to the same thing. But perhaps this admission does
 not satisfy you. You imagined that when a nervous person became cured
 something very different happened, that after having been subjected to
 the laborious process of psychoanalysis, he was transformed into a
 different human being. And now I tell you that the entire result is only
 that he has a little less of the unconscious, a little more of the
 conscious within him. Well, you probably underestimate the significance
 of such an inner change. The person cured of neurosis has really become
 another human being. Fundamentally, of course, he has remained the same.
 That is to say, he has only become what he might have been under the
 most favorable conditions. But that is saying a great deal. When you
 learn all that has to be done, the effort required to effect apparently
 so slight a change in psychic life, the significance of such a
 difference in the psychic realm will be credible to you.
 
 I shall digress for a moment to ask whether you know what is meant by a
 causal therapy? This name is given to the procedure which does not take
 the manifestations of disease for its point of departure, but seeks to
 remove the causes of disease. Is our psychoanalytical therapy causal or
 not? The answer is not simple, but perhaps it will give us the
 opportunity of convincing ourselves that this point of departure is
 comparatively fruitless. In so far as analytical therapy does not
 concern itself immediately with the removal of symptoms, it may be
 termed causal. Yet in another respect, you might say this would hardly
 follow. For we have followed the causal chain back far beyond the
 suppressions to the instinctive tendencies and their relative intensity
 as given by the constitution of the patient, and finally the nature of
 the digression in the abnormal process of its development. Assume for a
 moment that it were possible to influence these functions chemically, to
 increase or to decrease the quantity of the libido that happens to be
 present, to strengthen one impulse at the expense of another. This would
 be causal therapy in its true sense and our analysis would have
 furnished the indispensable preparatory work of reconnaissance. You know
 that there is as yet no possibility of so influencing the processes of
 the libido. Our psychic therapy interposes elsewhere, not exactly at
 those sources of the phenomena which have been disclosed to us, but
 sufficiently far beyond the symptoms, at an opening in the structure of
 the disease which has become accessible to us by means of peculiar
 conditions.
 
 What must we do in order to replace the unconscious by the conscious in
 our patient? At one time we thought this was quite simple, that all we
 had to do was to reconstruct the unconscious and then tell the patient
 about it. But we already know this was a shortsighted error. Our
 knowledge of the unconscious has not the same value as his; if we
 communicate our knowledge to him it will not stand _in place of_ the
 unconscious within him, but will exist _beside_ it, and only a very
 small change will have been effected. We must rather think of the
 unconscious as _localized_, and must seek it in memory at the point
 where it came into existence by means of a suppression. This suppression
 must be removed before the substitution of the conscious for the
 unconscious can be successfully effected. How can such a suppression be
 removed? Here our task enters a second phase. First to find the
 suppression, then to remove the resistance by which this suppression is
 maintained.
 
 How can we do away with resistance? In the same way--by reconstructing
 it and confronting the patient with it. For resistance arises from
 suppression, from the very suppression which we are trying to break up,
 or from an earlier one. It has been established by the counter-attack
 that was instigated to suppress the offensive impulse. And so now we do
 the very thing we intended at the outset: interpret, reconstruct,
 communicate--but now we do it in the right place. The counter-seizure of
 the idea or resistance is not part of the unconscious but of the ego,
 which is our fellow-worker. This holds true even if resistance is not
 conscious. We know that the difficulty arises from the ambiguity of the
 word "unconscious," which may connote either a phenomenon or a system.
 That seems very difficult, but it is only a repetition, isn't it? We
 were prepared for it a long time ago. We expect resistance to be
 relinquished, the counter-siege to collapse, when our interpretation has
 enabled the ego to recognize it. With what impulses are we able to work
 in such a case? In the first place, the patient's desire to become well,
 which has led him to accommodate himself to co-operate with us in the
 task of the cure; in the second place, the help of his intelligence,
 which is supported by the interpretation we offer him. There is no doubt
 that after we have made clear to him what he may expect, the patient's
 intelligence can identify resistances, and find their translation into
 the suppressions more readily. If I say to you, "Look up into the sky,
 you can see a balloon there," you will find it more readily than if I
 had just asked you to look up to see whether you could discover
 anything. And unless the student who for the first time works with a
 microscope is told by his teacher what he may look for, he will not see
 anything, even if it is present and quite visible.
 
 And now for the fact! In a large number of forms of nervous illness, in
 hysteria, conditions of anxiety and compulsion neuroses, one hypothesis
 is correct. By finding the suppression, revealing resistance,
 interpreting the thing suppressed, we really succeed in solving the
 problem, in overcoming resistance, in removing suppression, in
 transforming the unconscious into the conscious. While doing this we
 gain the clearest impression of the violent struggle that takes place in
 the patient's soul for the subjugation of resistance--a normal
 psychological struggle, in one psychic sphere between the motives that
 wish to maintain the counter-siege and those which are willing to give
 it up. The former are the old motives that at one time effected
 suppression; among the latter are those that have recently entered the
 conflict, to decide it, we trust, in the sense we favor. We have
 succeeded in reviving the old conflict of the suppression, in reopening
 the case that had already been decided. The new material we contribute
 consists in the first place of the warning, that the former solution of
 the conflict had led to illness, and the promise that another will pave
 the way to health; secondly, the powerful change of all conditions since
 the time of that first rejection. At that time the ego had been weak,
 infantile and may have had reason to denounce the claims of the libido
 as if they were dangerous. Today it is strong, experienced and is
 supported by the assistance of the physician. And so we may expect to
 guide the revived conflict to a better issue than a suppression, and in
 hysteria, fear and compulsion neuroses, as I have said before, success
 justifies our claims.
 
 There are other forms of illness, however, in which our therapeutic
 procedure never is successful, even though the causal conditions are
 similar. Though this may be characterized topically in a different way,
 in them there was also an original conflict between the ego and libido,
 which led to suppression. Here, too, it is possible to discover the
 occasions when suppressions occurred in the life of the patient. We
 employ the same procedure, are prepared to furnish the same promises,
 give the same kind of help. We again present to the patient the
 connections we expect him to discover, and we have in our favor the same
 interval in time between the treatment and these suppressions favoring a
 solution of the conflict; yet in spite of these conditions, we are not
 able to overcome the resistance, or to remove the suppression. These
 patients, suffering from paranoia, melancholia, and dementia praecox,
 remain untouched on the whole, and proof against psychoanalytic therapy.
 What is the reason for this? It is not lack of intelligence; we require,
 of course, a certain amount of intellectual ability in our patients; but
 those suffering from paranoia, for instance, who effect such subtle
 combinations of facts, certainly are not in want of it. Nor can we say
 that other motive forces are lacking. Patients suffering from
 melancholia, in contrast to those afflicted with paranoia, are
 profoundly conscious of being ill, of suffering greatly, but they are
 not more accessible. Here we are confronted with a fact we do not
 understand, which bids us doubt if we have really understood all the
 conditions of success in other neuroses.
 
 In the further consideration of our dealings with hysterical and
 compulsion neurotics we soon meet with a second fact, for which we were
 not at all prepared. After a while we notice that these patients behave
 toward us in a very peculiar way. We thought that we had accounted for
 all the motive forces that could come into play, that we had
 rationalized the relation between the patient and ourselves until it
 could be as readily surveyed as an example in arithmetic, and yet some
 force begins to make itself felt that we had not considered in our
 calculations. This unexpected something is highly variable. I shall
 first describe those of its manifestations which occur frequently and
 are easy to understand.
 
 We see our patient, who should be occupying himself only with finding a
 way out of his painful conflicts, become especially interested in the
 person of the physician. Everything connected with this person is more
 important to him than his own affairs and diverts him from his illness.
 Dealings with him are very pleasant for the time being. He is especially
 cordial, seeks to show his gratitude wherever he can, and manifests
 refinements and merits of character that we hardly had expected to
 find. The physician forms a very favorable opinion of the patient and
 praises the happy chance that permitted him to render assistance to so
 admirable a personality. If the physician has the opportunity of
 speaking to the relatives of the patient he hears with pleasure that
 this esteem is returned. At home the patient never tires of praising the
 physician, of prizing advantages which he constantly discovers. "He
 adores you, he trusts you blindly, everything you say is a revelation to
 him," the relatives say. Here and there one of the chorus observes more
 keenly and remarks, "It is a positive bore to hear him talk, he speaks
 only of you; you are his only subject of conversation."
 
 Let us hope that the physician is modest enough to ascribe the patient's
 estimation of his personality to the encouragement that has been offered
 him and to the widening of his intellectual horizon through the
 astounding and liberating revelations which the cure entails. Under
 these conditions analysis progressed splendidly. The patient understands
 every suggestion, he concentrates on the problems that the treatment
 requires him to solve, reminiscences and ideas flood his mind. The
 physician is surprised by the certainty and depth of these
 interpretations and notices with satisfaction how willingly the sick man
 receives the new psychological facts which are so hotly contested by the
 healthy persons in the world outside. An objective improvement in the
 condition of the patient, universally admitted, goes hand in hand with
 this harmonious relation of the physician to the patient under analysis.
 
 But we cannot always expect to have fair weather. There comes a day when
 the storm breaks. Difficulties turn up in the treatment. The patient
 asserts that he can think of nothing more. We are under the impression
 that he is no longer interested in the work, that he lightly passes over
 the injunction that, heedless of any critical impulse, he must say
 everything that comes to his mind. He behaves as though he were not
 under treatment, as though he had closed no agreement with the
 physician; he is clearly obsessed by something he does not wish to
 divulge. This is a situation which endangers the success of the
 treatment. We are distinctly confronted with a tremendous resistance.
 What can have happened?
 
 Provided we are able once more to clarify the situation, we recognize
 the cause of the disturbance to have been intense affectionate
 emotions, which the patient has transferred to the physician. This is
 certainly not justified either by the behavior of the physician or by
 the relations the treatment has created. The way in which this affection
 is manifested and the goals it strives for will depend on the personal
 affiliations of the two parties involved. When we have here a young girl
 and a man who is still young we receive the impression of normal love.
 We find it quite natural that a girl should fall in love with a man with
 whom she is alone a great deal, with whom she discusses intimate
 matters, who appears to her in the advantageous light of a beneficent
 adviser. In this we probably overlook the fact that in a neurotic girl
 we should rather presuppose a derangement in her capacity to love. The
 more the personal relations of physician and patient diverge from this
 hypothetical case, the more are we puzzled to find the same emotional
 relation over and over again. We can understand that a young woman,
 unhappy in her marriage, develops a serious passion for her physician,
 who is still free; that she is ready to seek divorce in order to belong
 to him, or even does not hesitate to enter into a secret love affair, in
 case the conventional obstacles loom too large. Similar things are known
 to occur outside of psychoanalysis. Under these circumstances, however,
 we are surprised to hear women and girls make remarks that reveal a
 certain attitude toward the problems of the cure. They always knew that
 love alone could cure them, and from the very beginning of their
 treatment they anticipated that this relationship would yield them what
 life had denied. This hope alone has spurred them on to exert themselves
 during the treatments, to overcome all the difficulties in communicating
 their disclosures. We add on our own account--"and to understand so
 easily everything that is generally most difficult to believe." But we
 are amazed by such a confession; it upsets our calculations completely.
 Can it be that we have omitted the most important factor from our
 hypothesis?
 
 And really, the more experience we gain, the less we can deny this
 correction, which shames our knowledge. The first few times we could
 still believe that the analytic cure had met with an accidental
 interruption, not inherent to its purpose. But when this affectionate
 relation between physician and patient occurs regularly in every new
 case, under the most unfavorable conditions and even under grotesque
 circumstances; when it occurs in the case of the elderly woman, and is
 directed toward the grey-beard, or to one in whom, according to our
 judgment, no seductive attractions exist, we must abandon the idea of an
 accidental interruption, and realize that we are dealing with a
 phenomenon which is closely interwoven with the nature of the illness.
 
 The new fact which we recognize unwillingly is termed _transference_. We
 mean a transference of emotions to the person of the physician, because
 we do not believe that the situation of the cure justifies the genesis
 of such feelings. We rather surmise that this readiness toward emotion
 originated elsewhere, that it was prepared within the patient, and that
 the opportunity given by analytic treatment caused it to be transferred
 to the person of the physician. Transference may occur as a stormy
 demand for love or in a more moderate form; in place of the desire to be
 his mistress, the young girl may wish to be adopted as the favored
 daughter of the old man, the libidinous desire may be toned down to a
 proposal of inseparable but ideal and platonic friendship. Some women
 understand how to sublimate the transference, how to modify it until it
 attains a kind of fitness for existence; others manifest it in its
 original, crude and generally impossible form. But fundamentally it is
 always the same and can never conceal that its origin is derived from
 the same source.
 
 Before we ask ourselves how we can accommodate this new fact, we must
 first complete its description. What happens in the case of male
 patients? Here we might hope to escape the troublesome infusion of sex
 difference and sex attraction. But the answer is pretty much the same as
 with women patients. The same relation to the physician, the same
 over-estimation of his qualities, the same abandon of interest toward
 his affairs, the same jealousy toward all those who are close to him.
 The sublimated forms of transference are more frequent in men, the
 direct sexual demand is rarer to the extent to which manifest
 homosexuality retreats before the methods by which these instinct
 components may be utilized. In his male patients more often than in his
 women patients, the physician observes a manifestation of transference
 which at first sight seems to contradict everything previously
 described: a hostile or _negative_ transference.
 
 In the first place, let us realize that the transference occurs in the
 patient at the very outset of the treatment and is, for a time, the
 strongest impetus to work. We do not feel it and need not heed it as
 long as it acts to the advantage of the analysis we are working out
 together. When it turns into resistance, however, we must pay attention
 to it. Then we discover that two contrasting conditions have changed
 their relation to the treatment. In the first place there is the
 development of an affectionate inclination, clearly revealing the signs
 of its origin in sexual desire which becomes so strong as to awaken an
 inner resistance against it. Secondly, there are the hostile instead of
 the tender impulses. The hostile feelings generally appear later than
 the affectionate impulses or succeed them. When they occur
 simultaneously they exemplify the ambivalence of emotions which exists
 in most of the intimate relations between all persons. The hostile
 feelings connote an emotional attachment just as do the affectionate
 impulses, just as defiance signifies dependence as well as does
 obedience, although the activities they call out are opposed. We cannot
 doubt but that the hostile feelings toward the physician deserve the
 name of transference, since the situation which the treatment creates
 certainly could not give sufficient cause for their origin. This
 necessary interpretation of negative transference assures us that we
 have not mistaken the positive or affectionate emotions that we have
 similarly named.
 
 The origin of this transference, the difficulties it causes us, the
 means of overcoming it, the use we finally extract from it--these
 matters must be dealt with in the technical instruction of
 psychoanalysis, and can only be touched upon here. It is out of the
 question to yield to those demands of the patient which take root from
 the transference, while it would be unkind to reject them brusquely or
 even indignantly. We overcome transference by proving to the patient
 that his feelings do not originate in the present situation, and are not
 intended for the person of the physician, but merely repeat what
 happened to him at some former time. In this way we force him to
 transform his repetition into a recollection. And so transference, which
 whether it be hostile or affectionate, seems in every case to be the
 greatest menace of the cure, really becomes its most effectual tool,
 which aids in opening the locked compartments of the psychic life. But I
 should like to tell you something which will help you to overcome the
 astonishment you must feel at this unexpected phenomenon. We must not
 forget that this illness of the patient which we have undertaken to
 analyze is not consummated or, as it were, congealed; rather it is
 something that continues its development like a living being. The
 beginning of the treatment does not end this development. When the cure,
 however, first has taken possession of the patient, the productivity of
 the illness in this new phase is concentrated entirely on one aspect:
 the relation of the patient to the physician. And so transference may be
 compared to the cambrium layer between the wood and the bark of a tree,
 from which the formation of new tissues and the growth of the trunk
 proceed at the same time. When the transference has once attained this
 significance the work upon the recollections of the patient recedes into
 the background. At that point it is correct to say that we are no longer
 concerned with the patient's former illness, but with a newly created,
 transformed neurosis, in place of the former. We followed up this new
 edition of an old condition from the very beginning, we saw it originate
 and grow; hence we understand it especially well, because we ourselves
 are the center of it, its object. All the symptoms of the patient have
 lost their original meaning and have adapted themselves to a new
 meaning, which is determined by its relation to transference. Or, only
 such symptoms as are capable of this transformation have persisted. The
 control of this new, artificial neurosis coincides with the removal of
 the illness for which treatment was sought in the first place, namely,
 with the solution of our therapeutic problem. The human being who, by
 means of his relations to the physician, has freed himself from the
 influences of suppressed impulses, becomes and stays free in his
 individual life, when the influence of the physician is subsequently
 removed.
 
 Transference has attained extraordinary significance, has become the
 centre of the cure, in the conditions of hysteria, anxiety and
 compulsion neuroses. Their conditions therefore are properly included
 under the term transference neuroses. Whoever in his analytic experience
 has come into contact with the existence of transference can no longer
 doubt the character of those suppressed impulses that express
 themselves in the symptoms of these neuroses and requires no stronger
 proof of their libidinous character. We may say that our conviction that
 the meaning of the symptoms is substituted libidinous gratification was
 finally confirmed by this explanation of transference.
 
 Now we have every reason to correct our former dynamic conception of the
 healing process, and to bring it into harmony with our new discernment.
 If the patient is to fight the normal conflict that our analysis has
 revealed against the suppressions, he requires a tremendous impetus to
 influence the desirable decision which will lead him back to health.
 Otherwise he might decide for a repetition of the former issue and allow
 those factors which have been admitted to consciousness to slip back
 again into suppression. The deciding vote in this conflict is not given
 by his intellectual penetration--which is neither strong nor free enough
 for such an achievement--but only by his relation to the physician.
 Inasmuch as his transference carries a positive sign, it invests the
 physician with authority and is converted into faith for his
 communications and conceptions. Without transference of this sort, or
 without a negative transfer, he would not even listen to the physician
 and to his arguments. Faith repeats the history of its own origin; it is
 a derivative of love and at first requires no arguments. When they are
 offered by a beloved person, arguments may later be admitted and
 subjected to critical reflection. Arguments without such support avail
 nothing, and never mean anything in life to most persons. Man's
 intellect is accessible only in so far as he is capable of libidinous
 occupation with an object, and accordingly we have good ground to
 recognize and to fear the limit of the patient's capacity for being
 influenced by even the best analytical technique, namely, the extent of
 his narcism.
 
 The capacity for directing libidinous occupation with objects towards
 persons as well must also be accorded to all normal persons. The
 inclination to transference on the part of the neurotic we have
 mentioned, is only an extraordinary heightening of this common
 characteristic. It would be strange indeed if a human trait so
 wide-spread and significant had never been noticed and turned to
 account. But that has been done. Bernheim, with unerring perspicacity,
 based his theory of hypnotic manifestations on the statement that all
 persons are open to suggestion in some way or other. Suggestibility in
 his sense is nothing more than an inclination to transference, bounded
 so narrowly that there is no room for any negative transfer. But
 Bernheim could never define suggestion or its origin. For him it was a
 fundamental fact, and he could never tell us anything regarding its
 origin. He did not recognize the dependence of suggestibility upon
 sexuality and the activity of the libido. We, on the other hand, must
 realize that we have excluded hypnosis from our technique of neurosis
 only to rediscover suggestion in the shape of transference.
 
 But now I shall pause and let you put in a word. I see that an objection
 is looming so large within you that if it were not voiced you would be
 unable to listen to me. "So at last you confess that like the
 hypnotists, you work with the aid of suggestion. That is what we have
 been thinking for a long time. But why choose the detour over
 reminiscences of the past, revealing of the unconscious, interpretation
 and retranslation of distortions, the tremendous expenditure of time and
 money, if the only efficacious thing is suggestion? Why do you not use
 suggestion directly against symptoms, as the others do, the honest
 hypnotists? And if, furthermore, you offer the excuse that by going your
 way you have made numerous psychological discoveries which are not
 revealed by direct suggestion, who shall vouch for their accuracy? Are
 not they, too, a result of suggestion, that is to say, of unintentional
 suggestion? Can you not, in this realm also, thrust upon the patient
 whatever you wish and whatever you think is so?"
 
 Your objections are uncommonly interesting, and must be answered. But I
 cannot do it now for lack of time. Till the next time, then. You shall
 see, I shall be accountable to you. Today I shall only end what I have
 begun. I promised to explain, with the aid of the factor of
 transference, why our therapeutic efforts have not met with success in
 narcistic neuroses.
 
 This I can do in a few words and you will see how simply the riddle can
 be solved, how well everything harmonizes. Observation shows that
 persons suffering from narcistic neuroses have no capacity for
 transference, or only insufficient remains of it. They reject the
 physician not with hostility, but with indifference. That is why he
 cannot influence them. His words leave them cold, make no impression,
 and so the mechanism of the healing process, which we are able to set
 in motion elsewhere, the renewal of the pathogenic conflict and the
 overcoming of the resistance to the suppression, cannot be reproduced in
 them. They remain as they are. Frequently they are known to attempt a
 cure on their own account, and pathological results have ensued. We are
 powerless before them.
 
 On the basis of our clinical impressions of these patients, we asserted
 that in their case libidinous occupation with objects must have been
 abandoned, and object-libido must have been transformed into ego-libido.
 On the strength of this characteristic we had separated it from the
 first group of neurotics (hysteria, anxiety and compulsion neuroses).
 Their behavior under attempts at therapy confirms this supposition. They
 show no neurosis. They, therefore, are inaccessible to our efforts and
 we cannot cure them.
 
 
 
 
 TWENTY-EIGHTH LECTURE
 
 GENERAL THEORY OF THE NEUROSES
 
 _Analytical Therapy_
 
 
 You know our subject for today. You asked me why we do not make use of
 direct suggestion in psychoanalytic therapy, when we admit that our
 influence depends substantially upon transference, i.e., suggestion, for
 you have come to doubt whether or not we can answer for the objectivity
 of our psychological discoveries in the face of such a predominance of
 suggestion. I promised to give you a comprehensive answer.
 
 Direct suggestion is suggestion directed against the expression of the
 symptoms, a struggle between your authority and the motives of the
 disease. You pay no attention during this process to the motives, but
 only demand of the patient that he suppress their expression in
 symptoms. So it makes no difference in principle whether you hypnotize
 the patient or not. Bernheim, with his usual perspicacity, asserted that
 suggestion is the essential phenomenon underlying hypnotism, that
 hypnotism itself is already a result of suggestion, is a suggested
 condition. Bernheim was especially fond of practising suggestion upon a
 person in the waking state, and could achieve the same results as with
 suggestion under hypnosis.
 
 What shall I deal with first, the evidence of experience or theoretic
 considerations?
 
 Let us begin with our experiences. I was a pupil of Bernheim's, whom I
 sought out in Nancy in 1889, and whose book on suggestion I translated
 into German. For years I practised hypnotic treatment, at first by means
 of prohibitory suggestions alone, and later by this method in
 combination with investigation of the patient after the manner of
 Breuer. So I can speak from experience about the results of hypnotic or
 suggestive therapy. If we judge Bernheim's method according to the old
 doctor's password that an ideal therapy must be rapid, reliable and not
 unpleasant for the patient, we find it fulfills at least two of these
 requirements. It can be carried out much more rapidly, indescribably
 more rapidly than the analytic method, and it brings the patient neither
 trouble nor discomfort. In the long run it becomes monotonous for the
 physician, since each case is exactly the same; continually forbidding
 the existence of the most diverse symptoms under the same ceremonial,
 without being able to grasp anything of their meaning or their
 significance. It is second-rate work, not scientific activity, and
 reminiscent of magic, conjuring and hocus-pocus; yet in the face of the
 interest of the patient this cannot be considered. The third requisite,
 however, was lacking. The procedure was in no way reliable. It might
 succeed in one case, and fail with the next; sometimes much was
 accomplished, at other times little, one knew not why. Worse than this
 capriciousness of the technique was the lack of permanency of the
 results. After a short time, when the patient was again heard from, the
 old malady had reappeared, or it had been replaced by a new malady. We
 could start in again to hypnotize. At the same time we had been warned
 by those who were experienced that by frequent repetitions of hypnotism
 we would deprive the patient of his self-reliance and accustom him to
 this therapy as though it were a narcotic. Granted that we did
 occasionally succeed as well as one could wish; with slight trouble we
 achieved complete and permanent results. But the conditions for such a
 favorable outcome remained unknown. I have had it happen that an
 aggravated condition which I had succeeded in clearing up completely by
 a short hypnotic treatment returned unchanged when the patient became
 angry and arbitrarily developed ill feeling against me. After a
 reconciliation I was able to remove the malady anew and with even
 greater thoroughness, yet when she became hostile to me a second time it
 returned again. Another time a patient whom I had repeatedly helped
 through nervous conditions by hypnosis, during the treatment of an
 especially stubborn attack, suddenly threw her arms around my neck. This
 made it necessary to consider the question, whether one wanted to or
 not, of the nature and source of the suggestive authority.
 
 So much for experience. It shows us that in renouncing direct suggestion
 we have given up nothing that is not replaceable. Now let us add a few
 further considerations. The practice of hypnotic therapy demands only a
 slight amount of work of the patient as well as of the physician. This
 therapy fits in perfectly with the estimation of neuroses to which the
 majority of physicians subscribe. The physician says to the neurotic,
 "There is nothing the matter with you; you are only nervous, and so I
 can blow away all your difficulties with a few words in a few minutes."
 But it is contrary to our dynamic conceptions that we should be able to
 move a great weight by an inconsiderable force, by attacking it directly
 and without the aid of appropriate preparations. So far as conditions
 are comparable, experience shows us that this performance does not
 succeed with the neurotic. But I know this argument is not unassailable;
 there are also "redeeming features."
 
 In the light of the knowledge we have gained from psychoanalysis we can
 describe the difference between hypnotic and psychoanalytic suggestion
 as follows: Hypnotic therapy seeks to hide something in psychic life,
 and to gloss it over; analytic therapy seeks to lay it bare and to
 remove it. The first method works cosmetically, the other surgically.
 The first uses suggestion in order to prevent the appearance of the
 symptoms, it strengthens suppression, but leaves unchanged all other
 processes that have led to symptom development. Analytic therapy attacks
 the illness closer to its sources, namely in the conflicts out of which
 the symptoms have emerged, it makes use of suggestion to change the
 solution of these conflicts. Hypnotic therapy leaves the patient
 inactive and unchanged, and therefore without resistance to every new
 occasion for disease. Analytic treatment places upon the physician, as
 well as upon the patient, a difficult responsibility; the inner
 resistance of the patient must be abolished. The psychic life of the
 patient is permanently changed by overcoming these resistances, it is
 lifted upon a higher plane of development and remains protected against
 new possibilities of disease. The work of overcoming resistance is the
 fundamental task of the analytic cure. The patient, however, must take
 it on himself to accomplish this, while the physician, with the aid of
 suggestion, makes it possible for him to do so. The suggestion works in
 the nature of an _education_. We are therefore justified in saying that
 analytic treatment is a sort of _after-education_.
 
 I hope I have made it clear to you wherein our technique of using
 suggestion differs therapeutically from the only use possible in
 hypnotic therapy. With your knowledge of the relation between suggestion
 and transference you will readily understand the capriciousness of
 hypnotic therapy which attracted our attention, and you will see why, on
 the other hand, analytic suggestion can be relied upon to its limits. In
 hypnosis we depend on the condition of the patient's capacity for
 transference, yet we are unable to exert any influence on this capacity.
 The transference of the subject may be negative, or, as is most
 frequent, ambivalent; the patient may have protected himself against
 suggestion by very special adjustments, yet we are unable to learn
 anything concerning them. In psychoanalysis we work with the
 transference itself, we do away with the forces opposing it, prepare the
 instrument with which we are to work. So it becomes possible to derive
 entirely new uses from the power of suggestion; we are able to control
 it, the patient does not work himself into any state of mind he pleases,
 but in so far as we are able to influence him at all, we can guide the
 suggestion.
 
 Now you will say, regardless of whether we call the driving force of our
 analysis transference or suggestion, there is still the danger that
 through our influence on the patient the objective certainty of our
 discoveries becomes doubtful. That which becomes a benefit to therapy
 works harm to the investigation. This objection is most often raised
 against psychoanalysis, and it must be admitted that even if it does not
 hit the mark, it cannot be waved aside as stupid. But if it were
 justified, psychoanalysis would be nothing more than an extraordinarily
 well disguised and especially workable kind of treatment by suggestion,
 and we may lay little weight upon all its assertions concerning the
 influences of life, psychic dynamics, and the unconscious. This is in
 fact the opinion held by our opponents; we are supposed especially to
 have "balked into" the patients everything that supports the importance
 of sexual experiences, and often the experiences themselves, after the
 combinations themselves have grown up in our degenerate imaginations. We
 can refute these attacks most easily by calling on the evidence of
 experience rather than by resorting to theory. Anyone who has himself
 performed a psychoanalysis has been able to convince himself innumerable
 times that it is impossible thus to suggest anything to the patient.
 There is no difficulty, of course, in making the patient a disciple of
 any one theory, and thus causing him to share the possible error of the
 physician. With respect to this he behaves just like any other person,
 like a student, but he has influenced only his intelligence, not his
 disease. The solving of his conflicts and the overcoming of his
 resistances succeeds only if we have aroused in him representations of
 such expectations as can agree with reality. What was inapplicable in
 the assumptions of the physician falls away during the course of the
 analysis; it must be withdrawn and replaced by something more nearly
 correct. By employing a careful technique we seek to prevent the
 occurrence of temporary results arising out of suggestion, yet there is
 no harm if such temporary results occur, for we are never satisfied with
 early successes. We do not consider the analysis finished until all the
 obscurities of the case are cleared up, all amnestic gaps filled out and
 the occasions which originally called out the suppressions discovered.
 We see in results that are achieved too quickly a hindrance rather than
 a furtherance of analytic work and repeatedly we undo these results
 again by purposely breaking up the transference upon which they rest.
 Fundamentally it is this feature which distinguishes analytical
 treatment from the purely suggestive technique and frees analytic
 results from the suspicion of having been suggested. Under every other
 suggestive treatment the transference itself is most carefully upheld
 and the influence left unquestioned; in analytic treatment, however, the
 transference becomes the subject of treatment and is subject to
 criticism in whatever form it may appear. At the end of an analytic cure
 the transference itself must be abolished; therefore the effect of the
 treatment, whether positive or negative, must be founded not upon
 suggestion but upon the overcoming of inner resistances, upon the inner
 change achieved in the patient, which the aid of suggestion has made
 possible.
 
 Presumably the creation of the separate suggestions is counteracted, in
 the course of the cure, by our being continually forced to attack
 resistances which have the ability to change themselves into negative
 (hostile) transferences. Furthermore, let me call your attention to the
 fact that a large number of results of analysis, otherwise perhaps
 subject to the suspicion that they are products of suggestion, can be
 confirmed from other unquestionable sources. As authoritative witnesses
 in this case we refer to the testimony of dements and paranoiacs, who
 are, naturally far removed from any suspicion of suggestive influence.
 Whatever these patients can tell us about symbolic translations and
 phantasies which have forced their way into their consciousness agrees
 faithfully with the results of our investigations upon the unconscious
 of transference-neurotics, and this gives added weight to the objective
 correctness of our interpretations which are so often doubted. I believe
 you will not go wrong if you give your confidence to analysis with
 reference to these factors.
 
 We now want to complete our statement concerning the mechanism of
 healing, by including it within the formulae of the libido theory. The
 neurotic is incapable both of enjoyment and work; first, because his
 libido is not directed toward any real object, and second because he
 must use up a great deal of his former energy to keep his libido
 suppressed and to arm himself against its attacks. He would become well
 if there could be an end to the conflict between his ego and his libido,
 and if his ego could again have the libido at its disposal. The task of
 therapy, therefore, consists of freeing the libido from its present
 bonds, which have estranged it from the ego, and furthermore to bring it
 once more into the service of the ego. Where is the libido of the
 neurotics? It is easy to find; it is bound to the symptoms which at that
 time furnish it with the only available substitute satisfaction. We have
 to become master of the symptoms, and abolish them, which is of course
 exactly what the patient asks us to do. To abolish the symptoms it
 becomes necessary to go back to their origin, to renew the conflict out
 of which they emerged, but this time with the help of motive forces that
 were originally not available, to guide it toward a new solution. This
 revision of the process of suppression can be accomplished only in part
 by following the traces in memory of the occurrences which led to the
 suppression. The decisive part of the cure is accomplished by means of
 the relationship to the physician, the transference, by means of which
 new editions of the old conflict are created. Under this situation the
 patient would like to behave as he had behaved originally, but by
 summoning all his available psychic power we compel him to reach a
 different decision. Transference, then, becomes the battlefield on which
 all the contending forces are to meet.
 
 The full strength of the libido, as well as the entire resistance
 against it, is concentrated in this relationship to the physician; so it
 is inevitable that the symptoms of the libido should be laid bare. In
 place of his original disturbance the patient manifests the artificially
 constructed disturbance of transference; in place of heterogeneous
 unreal objects for the libido you now have only the person of the
 physician, a single object, which, however, is also fantastic. The new
 struggle over this object is, however, raised to the highest psychic
 level with the aid of the physician's suggestions, and proceeds as a
 normal psychic conflict. By avoiding a new suppression the estrangement
 between the ego and the libido comes to an end, the psychic unity of the
 personality is restored. When the libido again becomes detached from the
 temporary object of the physician it cannot return to its former
 objects, but is now at the disposal of the ego. The forces we have
 overcome in the task of therapy are on the one hand the aversion of the
 ego for certain directions of the libido, which had expressed itself as
 a tendency to suppression, and on the other hand the tenacity of the
 libido, which is loathe to leave an object which it has once occupied.
 
 Accordingly the work of therapy falls into two phases: first, all the
 libido is forced from the symptoms into the transference, and
 concentrated there; secondly, the struggle over this new object is
 carried on and the libido set free. The decisive change for the better
 in this renewed conflict is the throwing out of the suppression, so that
 the libido cannot this time again escape the ego by fleeing into the
 unconscious. This is accomplished by the change in the ego under the
 influence of the physician's suggestion. In the course of the work of
 interpretation, which translates unconscious into conscious, the ego
 grows at the expense of the unconscious; it learns forgiveness toward
 the libido, and becomes inclined to permit some sort of satisfaction for
 it. The ego's timidity in the face of the demands of the libido is now
 lessened by the prospect of occupying some of the libido through
 sublimation. The more the processes of the treatment correspond to this
 theoretic description the greater will be the success of psychoanalytic
 therapy. It is limited by the lack of mobility of the libido, which can
 stand in the way of releasing its objects, and by the obstinate narcism
 which will not permit the object-transference to effect more than just
 so much. Perhaps we shall obtain further light on the dynamics of the
 healing process by the remark that we are able to gather up the entire
 libido which has become withdrawn from the control of the ego by drawing
 a part of it to ourselves in the process of transference.
 
 It is to be remembered that we cannot reach a direct conclusion as to
 the disposition of the libido during the disease from the distributions
 of the libido which are effected during and because of the treatment.
 Assuming that we have succeeded in curing the case by means of the
 creation and destruction of a strong father-transference to the
 physician, it would be wrong to conclude that the patient had previously
 suffered from a similar and unconscious attachment of his libido to his
 father. The father-transference is merely the battlefield upon which we
 were able to overcome the libido; the patient's libido had been
 concentrated here from its other positions. The battlefield need not
 necessarily have coincided with the most important fortresses of the
 enemy. Defense of the hostile capital need not take place before its
 very gates. Not until we have again destroyed the transference can we
 begin to reconstruct the distribution of the libido that existed during
 the illness.
 
 From the standpoint of the libido theory we might say a last word in
 regard to the dream. The dreams of neurotics, as well as their errors
 and haphazard thoughts, help us in finding the meaning of the symptoms
 and in discovering the disposition of the libido. In the form of the
 wish fulfillment they show us what wish impulses have been suppressed,
 and to what objects the libido, withdrawn from the ego, has been
 attached. That is why interpretation of dreams plays a large role in
 psychoanalytic treatment, and is in many cases, for a long time, the
 most important means with which we work. We already know that the
 condition of sleep itself carries with it a certain abatement of
 suppressions. Because of this lessening of the pressure upon it, it
 becomes possible for the suppressed impulse to create in the dream a
 much clearer expression than the symptom can furnish during the day. So
 dream-study is the easiest approach to a knowledge of the libidinous
 suppressed unconscious which has been withdrawn from the ego.
 
 Dreams of neurotics differ in no essential point from the dreams of
 normal persons; you might even say they cannot be distinguished. It
 would be unreasonable to explain the dreams of the nervous in any way
 which could not be applied to the dreams of the normal. So we must say
 the difference between neurosis and health applies only during the day,
 and does not continue in dream life. We find it necessary to attribute
 to the healthy numerous assumptions which have grown out of the
 connections between the dreams and the symptoms of the neurotic. We are
 not in a position to deny that even a healthy man possesses those
 factors in his psychic life which alone make possible the development of
 the dream and of the symptom as well. We must conclude, therefore, that
 the healthy have also made use of suppressions and are put to a certain
 amount of trouble to keep those impulses under control; the system of
 their unconscious, too, conceals impulses which are suppressed, yet are
 still possessed of energy, and _a part of their libido is also withdrawn
 from the control of their ego_. So the healthy man is virtually a
 neurotic, but dreams are apparently the only symptoms which he can
 manifest. Yet if we subject our waking hours to a more penetrating
 analysis we discover, of course, that they refute this appearance and
 that this seemingly healthy life is shot through with a number of
 trivial, practically unimportant symptom formations.
 
 The difference between nervous health and neurosis is entirely a
 practical one which is determined by the available capacity for
 enjoyment and accomplishment retained by the individual. It varies
 presumably with the relative proportion of the energy totals which have
 remained free and those which have been bound by suppressions, and is
 quantitative rather than qualitative. I do not have to remind you that
 this conception is the theoretical basis for the certainty that neuroses
 can be cured, despite their foundation in constitutional disposition.
 
 This is accordingly what we may make out of the identity between the
 dreams of the healthy and those of the neurotic for the definition of
 health. As regards the dream itself, we must note further that we cannot
 separate it from its relation to neurotic symptoms. We must recognize
 that it is not completely defined as a translation of thoughts into an
 archaic form of expression, that is, we must assume it discloses a
 disposition of libido and of object-occupations which have actually
 taken place.
 
 We have about come to the end. Perhaps you are disappointed that I have
 dealt only with theory in this chapter on psychoanalytic therapy, and
 have said nothing concerning the conditions under which the cure is
 undertaken, or of the successes which it achieves. But I shall omit
 both. I shall omit the first because I had intended no practical
 training in the practice of psychoanalysis, and I shall neglect the
 second for numerous reasons. At the beginning of our talks I emphasized
 the fact that under favorable circumstances we attain results which can
 be favorably compared with the happiest achievements in the field of
 internal therapy, and, I may add, these results could not have been
 otherwise achieved. If I were to say more I might be suspected of
 wishing to drown the voices of disparagement, which have become so loud,
 by advertising our claims. We psychoanalysts have repeatedly been
 threatened by our medical colleagues, even in open congresses, that the
 eyes of the suffering public must be opened to the worthlessness of this
 method of treatment by a statistical collection of analytic failures and
 injuries. But such a collection, aside from the biased, denunciatory
 character of its purpose, would hardly be able to give a correct picture
 of the therapeutic values of analysis. Analytic therapy is, as you know,
 still young; it took a long time to establish the technique, and this
 could be done only during the course of the work and under the influence
 of accumulating experience. As a result of the difficulties of
 instruction the physician who begins the practice of psychoanalysis is
 more dependent upon his capacity to develop on his own account than is
 the ordinary specialist, and the results he achieves in his first years
 can never be taken as indicative of the possibilities of analytic
 therapy.
 
 Many attempts at treatment failed in the early years of analysis because
 they were made on cases that were not at all suited to the procedure,
 and which today we exclude by our classification of symptoms. But this
 classification could be made only after practice. In the beginning we
 did not know that paranoia and dementia praecox are, in their fully
 developed phases, inaccessible, and we were justified in trying out our
 method on all kinds of conditions. Besides, the greatest number of
 failures in those first years were not due to the fault of the physician
 or because of unsuitable choice of subjects, but rather to the
 unpropitiousness of external conditions. We have hitherto spoken only of
 internal resistances, those of the patient, which are necessary and may
 be overcome. External resistances to psychoanalysis, due to the
 circumstances of the patient and his environment, have little
 theoretical interest, but are of great practical importance.
 Psychoanalytic treatment may be compared to a surgical operation, and
 has the right to be undertaken under circumstances favorable to its
 success. You know what precautions the surgeon is accustomed to take: a
 suitable room, good light, assistance, exclusion of relatives, etc. How
 many operations would be successful, do you think, if they had to be
 performed in the presence of all the members of the family, who would
 put their fingers into the field of operation and cry aloud at every cut
 of the knife? The interference of relatives in psychoanalytical
 treatment is a very great danger, a danger one does not know how to
 meet. We are armed against the internal resistances of the patient which
 we recognize as necessary, but how are we to protect ourselves against
 external resistance? It is impossible to approach the relatives of the
 patient with any sort of explanation, one cannot influence them to hold
 aloof from the whole affair, and one cannot get into league with them
 because we then run the danger of losing the confidence of the patient,
 who rightly demands that we in whom he confides take his part. Besides,
 those who know the rifts that are often formed in family life will not
 be surprised as analysts when they discover that the patient's nearest
 relatives are less interested in seeing him cured than in having him
 remain as he is. Where, as is so often the case, the neurosis is
 connected with conflicts with members of the family, the healthy member
 does not hesitate long in the choice between his own interest and that
 of the cure of the patient. It is not surprising if a husband looks with
 disfavor upon a treatment in which, as he may correctly suspect, the
 register of his sins is unrolled; nor are we surprised, and surely we
 cannot take the blame, when our efforts remain fruitless and are
 prematurely broken off because the resistance of the husband is added to
 that of the sick wife. We had only undertaken something which, under the
 existing circumstance, it was impossible to carry out.
 
 Instead of many cases, I shall tell you of just one in which, because of
 professional precautions, I was destined to play a sad role. Many years
 ago I treated a young girl who for a long time was afraid to go on the
 street, or to remain at home alone. The patient hesitatingly admitted
 that her phantasy had been caused by accidentally observing affectionate
 relations between her mother and a well-to-do friend of the family. But
 she was so clumsy--or perhaps so sly--as to give her mother a hint of
 what had been discussed during the analysis, and changed her behavior
 toward her mother, insisting that no one but her mother should protect
 her against the fear of being alone, and anxiously barring the way when
 her mother wished to leave the house. The mother had previously been
 very nervous herself, but had been cured years before in a hydropathic
 sanatorium. Let us say, in that institution she made the acquaintance of
 the man with whom she was to enter upon the relationship which was able
 to satisfy her in every respect. Becoming suspicious of the stormy
 demands of the girl, the mother _suddenly_ realized the meaning of her
 daughter's fear. She must have made herself sick to imprison her mother
 and to rob her of the freedom she needed to maintain relations with her
 lover. Immediately the mother made an end to the harmful treatment. The
 girl was put into a sanatorium for the nervous and exhibited for many
 years as "a poor victim of psychoanalysis." For just as long a period I
 was pursued by evil slander, due to the unfavorable outcome of this
 case. I maintained silence because I thought myself bound by the rules
 of professional discretion. Years later I learned from a colleague who
 had visited the institution, and had seen the agoraphobic girl there,
 that the relationship between the mother and the wealthy friend of the
 family was known all over town, and apparently connived at by the
 husband and father. It was to this "secret" that our treatment had been
 sacrificed.
 
 In the years before the war, when the influx of patients from all parts
 made me independent of the favor or disfavor of my native city, I
 followed the rule of not treating anyone who was not _sui juris_, was
 not independent of all other persons in his essential relations of life.
 Every psychoanalyst cannot do this. You may conclude from my warning
 against the relatives of patients that for purposes of psychoanalysis we
 should take the patients away from their families, and should limit this
 therapy to the inmates of sanatoriums. I should not agree with you in
 this; it is much more beneficial for the patients, if they are not in a
 stage of great exhaustion, to continue in the same circumstances under
 which they must master the tasks set for them during the treatment. But
 the relatives ought not to counteract this advantage by their behavior,
 and above all, they should not antagonize and oppose the endeavors of
 the physician. But how are we to contend against these influences which
 are so inaccessible to us! You see how much the prospects of a treatment
 are determined by the social surroundings and the cultural conditions of
 a family.
 
 This offers a sad outlook indeed for the effectiveness of psychoanalysis
 as a therapy, even if we can explain the great majority of our failures
 by putting the blame on such disturbing external factors! Friends of
 analysis have advised us to counterbalance such a collection of failures
 by means of a statistical compilation on our part of our successful
 cases. Yet I could not try myself to do this. I tried to explain that
 statistics would be worthless if the collected cases were not
 comparable, and in fact, the various neuroses which we have undertaken
 to treat could, as a matter of fact, hardly be compared on the same
 basis, since they differed in many fundamental respects. Besides, the
 period of time over which we could report was too short to permit us to
 judge the permanency of our cures, and concerning certain cases we could
 not have given any information whatever. They related to persons who had
 kept their ailments, as well as their treatment, secret, and whose cure
 must necessarily be kept secret as well. The strongest hindrance,
 however, lay in the knowledge that men behave most irrationally in
 matters of therapy, and that we have no prospect of attaining anything
 by an appeal to reason. A therapeutic novelty is received either with
 frenzied enthusiasm, as was the case when Koch first made public his
 tuberculin against tuberculosis, or it is treated with abysmal distrust,
 as was the really blessed vaccination of Jenner, which even today
 retains implacable opponents. There was a very obvious prejudice against
 psychoanalysis. When we had cured a very difficult case we would hear it
 said: "That is no proof, he would have become well by himself in all
 this time." Yet when a patient who had already gone through four cycles
 of depression and mania came into my care during a temporary cessation
 in the melancholia, and three weeks later found herself in the
 beginnings of a new attack, all the members of the family as well as the
 high medical authorities called into consultation, were convinced that
 the new attack could only be the result of the attempted analysis.
 Against prejudice we are powerless; you see it again in the prejudices
 that one group of warring nations has developed against the other. The
 most sensible thing for us to do is to wait and allow time to wear it
 away. Some day the same persons think quite differently about the same
 things than before. Why they formerly thought otherwise remains the dark
 secret.
 
 It may be possible that the prejudice against psychoanalysis is already
 on the wane. The continual spread of psychoanalytic doctrine, the
 increase of the number of physicians in many lands who treat
 analytically, seems to vouch for it. When I was a young physician I was
 caught in just such a storm of outraged feeling of the medical
 profession toward hypnosis, treatment by suggestion, which today is
 contrasted with psychoanalysis by "sober" men. Hypnotism did not,
 however, as a therapeutic agent, live up to its promises; we
 psychoanalysts may call ourselves its rightful heirs, and we have not
 forgotten the large amount of encouragement and theoretical explanation
 we owe to it. The injuries blamed upon psychoanalysis are limited
 essentially to temporary aggravation of the conflict when the analysis
 is clumsily handled, or when it is broken off unfinished. You have heard
 our justification for our form of treatment, and you can form your own
 opinion as to whether or not our endeavors are likely to lead to lasting
 injury. Misuse of psychoanalysis is possible in various ways; above all,
 transference is a dangerous remedy in the hands of an unconscientious
 physician. But no professional method of procedure is protected from
 misuse; a knife that is not sharp is of no use in effecting a cure.
 
 I have thus reached the end, ladies and gentlemen. It is more than the
 customary formal speech when I admit that I am myself keenly depressed
 over the many faults in the lectures I have just delivered. First of
 all, I am sorry that I have so often promised to return to a subject
 only slightly touched upon at the time, and then found that the context
 has not made it possible to keep my word. I have undertaken to inform
 you concerning an unfinished thing, still in the process of development,
 and my brief exposition itself was an incomplete thing. Often I
 presented the evidence and then did not myself draw the conclusion. But
 I could not endeavor to make you masters of the subject. I tried only to
 give you some explanation and stimulation.
 
 
 END
 
 
 
 
 INDEX
 
 
 Abel, C., 195
 
 Abel, R., 148
 
 Abraham, K., 284, 358
 
 Abstinence, 299
 
 Accidental and symptomatic acts, 42
 
 Accumulated and combined errors, 37
 
 Adler, A., 203, 330, 351
 
 Agoraphobia, 227, 233
 
 Alexander, dream of, 65
 
 Altruism, 360
 
 Ambivalence, 369
 
 Amnesia, 244;
   childhood, 168;
   hysterical, 245;
   infantile, 245;
   of the neurotic, 244
 
 Analyses of dreams, 94, 95, 96, 97, 98, 153
 
 Analysis, experimental, dream for, 93
 
 Analytical therapy, 372, 388
 
 Andreas, Lou, 272
 
 Anxiety, 340, 342;
   dream, 183;
   equivalents, 347;
   form of neurotic fear, 346;
   hysteria, 233, 259, 316, 346;
   hysteria, resistance in, 250;
   neurosis, 338, 344, 347
 
 Anxious expectation, 344
 
 Archaic remnants and infantilism in the dream, 167
 
 Art, and the neurosis, 326
 
 Association experiment, 86;
   free, 84
 
 Auto-eroticism, 359
 
 
 Back, George, 108
 
 Basedowi, M., 336
 
 Beheading symbol, 231
 
 Bernheim, 81, 240, 385, 388
 
 Binet, 302
 
 Binz, 66
 
 Birth of the hero, myths, 182
 
 Birth, the source of fear, 343;
   symbols of, 132;
   theories of children, 274
 
 Bleuler, 86, 369
 
 Bloch, Ivan, 265
 
 Blsche, W., 307
 
 Breuer, J., 221, 232, 241, 242, 253, 254, 388
 
 Breughel, P., 263
 
 
 Castration complex, 175
 
 Censor, dream, 110
 
 Charcot, 119
 
 Child, sexual life of, 268, 281
 
 Childhood amnesia, 168;
   dreams of, 101;
   egoism in, 171;
   experiences, phantasy in, 319;
   loss of memory for, 168;
   prophylaxis, 317
 
 Children, fear in, 350;
   sexual curiosity of, 274
 
 Children's dreams, 102;
   theories of birth, 274
 
 Choice of an object, 368
 
 Clinical problem, 244
 
 Common elements of dreams, 67, 69, 75
 
 Complex, castration, 175;
   family, 285;
   Oedipus, 174, 285;
   parent, 289
 
 Compulsion neurosis, 222, 227, 259, 261, 267, 298, 326;
   fear in, 349;
   manifestations of, 222
 
 Compulsion neurotics, resistance in, 250, 251;
   symptoms, analysis of, 224
 
 Compulsive activity, meaning of, 239;
   acts, 223;
   washing as, 233
 
 Condensation, 142
 
 Conflict, role of, in neurosis, 302, 305
 
 Conscious, definition of, 90
 
 Conversion-hysteria, 259, 339
 
 Criticism of dream, 194;
   of psychoanalysis, reasons for, 246
 
 
 Darwin, Charles, 247, 345
 
 Day dreams, 76, 105, 324
 
 Death in dreams, 133;
   wishes, 169
 
 Definition of psychoanalysis, 1
 
 Delusion, 216
 
 Dementia praecox, 339, 358, 363
 
 Development and regression, theories of, 294
 
 Diderot, 292
 
 Difficulties of psychoanalysis, 2, 5
 
 Disease, secondary advantage of, 334
 
 Disguise-memories, 168
 
 Displacement, 114, 144
 
 Dream, the, 63;
   of Alexander, 65;
   anxiety, 183;
   approaches to study of, 82;
   archaic remnants and infantilism in the, 167;
   censor, 110;
   character of, 69;
   criticism of, 194;
   day, 76, 105;
   definition of, 67, 68;
   difficulties and preliminary approach to, 63;
   distortion in, 101, 110, 183;
   doubtful points concerning, 194;
   for experimental analysis, 93;
   hypothesis and technique of interpretation of, 78;
   infantile, 183;
   interpretation, rules to be observed in, 91, 92;
   manifest and latent content of, 90, 96;
   of a prisoner, 109;
   the reaction to sleep-disturbing stimuli, 70;
   stimuli in, 71, 73;
   symbolism in, 122
 
 Dreams analysed, 94, 95, 96, 97, 98, 153;
   of childhood, 101;
   children's, 102;
   children's, elements of, 101-5;
   common elements of, 67, 69, 75;
   death in, 133;
   elaboration in, 74;
   examples of, 111;
   experimentally induced in, 71;
   of neurotics, 395;
   typical, 234;
   visual forms in, 75;
   wish fulfillment, 107;
   dream-work, 141;
   processes of, 142
 
 Du prel, 108
 
 
 Ego, development of, 304;
   impulses, 303;
   instincts, 356;
   psychology, 365;
   regressions, 310
 
 Egoism, 360;
   in childhood, 171
 
 Elements of children's dreams, 101, 102, 103, 104, 105
 
 Erogenous zones, 271
 
 Erotomania, 366
 
 Errors, accumulated and combined, 37;
   forgetting names, 34;
   forgetting projects, 34;
   losing and mislaying objects, 36;
   misreading, 51;
   proved by further developments, 39;
   psychology of, 10, 23;
   repeated, 37;
   slips of the pen, 49;
   of the tongue, 16, 18;
   expectant fear, 344
 
 
 Fact, principle of, 309
 
 Family-complex, 289
 
 Fear, 340, 342;
   in children, 350;
   in compulsion neurosis, 349;
   expectant, 344;
   in hysteria, 348;
   of the manifold, 344;
   neurotic, 341;
   anxiety, form of, 346;
   clinical observations on, 347;
   origin of, 350;
   and real fear, connection between, 350;
   real, 341;
   and neurotic fear, connection between, 350
 
 Fechner, G. T., 69
 
 Federn, P., 127
 
 Ferenczi, 304
 
 Fetichism, 302
 
 Fetichists, 264
 
 Fixation of the instinct, 295;
   traumatic, 236
 
 Flaubert, G., 263
 
 Fliess, W., 277
 
 Fontaine, Th., 324
 
 Fore-conscious, 256
 
 Forgetting, defense against unpleasant recollections, 56;
   impressions and experiences, 56;
   names, 34, 55;
   plans, 52;
   projects, 34;
   proper names, 87
 
 Free association, 84;
   name analysis by, 85
 
 Free-floating fear, 344
 
 Fright, 342
 
 
 Hall, Stanley, 344, 355
 
 Hildebrand, 71
 
 Hoffman, 321
 
 Homosexualists, 266
 
 Homosexuality, 263
 
 Hypnosis, 253, 386;
   psycho-therapy by, 253
 
 Hypnotic and psychoanalytic suggestion, difference between, 390
 
 Hypnotism, 81, 388
 
 Hypochondria, 338, 339, 362
 
 Hysteria, 233, 245, 246, 261, 266, 297;
   anxiety, 233, 316;
   conversion, 339;
   fear in, 348
 
 Hysterical amnesias, 245;
   backache, 339;
   headache, 339;
   identification, 369;
   vomiting, 233
 
 
 Illness as a defense, 332
 
 Imago, 139
 
 Incest, 176, 290
 
 Infantile amnesias, 245;
   dream, 183;
   fear, 353;
   neurosis, 316;
   sexuality, 272, 279
 
 Infantilism in the dream, archaic remnants and, 167
 
 Inferiority, 351
 
 Inhibition, 294
 
 Instinct, fixation of, 295
 
 Intellectual resistances, 251
 
 Introversion, 325
 
 Inversions, 149, 263
 
 
 James-Lange theory of emotion, 343
 
 Janet, P., 221
 
 Jealousy, obsession of, 216
 
 Jenner, 400
 
 Jung, C. J., 86, 232, 325, 357
 
 
 Koch, 400
 
 Krauss, F. S., 134
 
 
 Latent dream content, 90, 98
 
 Leuret, 221
 
 Levy, L., 133
 
 Libido, 116, 270;
   development of, 277, 282;
   fixation, 300;
   regressions of, 297;
   theory, the, 356
 
 Lichtenberg, 27
 
 Lindner, 271
 
 Losing and mislaying objects, 36, 57
 
 Loss of memory for childhood, 168
 
 
 Maeder, A., 39, 202
 
 Mania of persecution, 366;
   of jealousy, 366
 
 Manifest dream content, 90, 96
 
 Masochists, 264
 
 Maury, 66, 71
 
 Mayer, 16
 
 Mechanism of the tongue slip, 46
 
 Megalomania, 366
 
 Melancholia, 369
 
 Memory gaps, 244;
   loss of, for childhood, 168
 
 Meringer, 16
 
 Misreading, 51
 
 Mistakes, general observations on, 57
 
 Myths, birth of the hero, 132
 
 
 Name analysis by free association, 85
 
 Naecke, P., 359
 
 Narcism, 359, 360
 
 Narcistic identification, 369;
   neuroses, 298, 365;
   and transference, 386
 
 Negative transference, 383
 
 Nervousness, fear and, 340;
   ordinary, 328
 
 Nestroy, 305
 
 Neurasthenia, 338, 339
 
 Neurosis, anxiety, 344;
   art and, 326;
   common experiences in history of, 321;
   compulsion, 222;
   determining factor in, 321;
   development of symptoms of, 311;
   etiology of, 296;
   general theory of, 294;
   infantile, 316;
   narcistic, 298;
   schematic representation of cause of, 315;
   spontaneous, 237;
   symptoms of, 317;
   traumatic, 237;
   true, difference between the symptoms of, and the psychoneurosis, 336
 
 Neurotic fear, anxiety form of, 346;
   clinical observations on, 347;
   manifestations of, 344;
   origin of, 350;
   and real fear, connection between, 350
 
 Neurotic manifestations, psychoanalytic conception of, 211;
   symptoms, evolution of, 244;
   meaning of, 221;
   objections to interpretations of, 260
 
 Neurotics, dreams of, 395
 
 Nordenskjold, Otto, 107
 
 
 Oberlnder, 334
 
 Object, choice of, 368
 
 Obsession of jealousy, 216
 
 Oedipus complex, 174, 285
 
 Onanism, 272, 274
 
 Organic pleasure, 280
 
 
 Paranoia, 266, 339, 366
 
 Paraphrenia, 339, 366
 
 Parent-complex, 289
 
 Pathological ritual, 228
 
 Patricide, 290
 
 Perverse, 263;
   sexuality, 268, 279
 
 Perversions, sex, 175, 278
 
 Pfister, 199
 
 Phantasies, primal, 323
 
 Phantasy in childhood experiences, 319;
   in children, 322
 
 Phobias, 344;
   analysis of, 353;
   situation, in children, 352
 
 Pleasure, principle of, 309
 
 Pleasure-striving, 116
 
 Pre-genital sexual organization, 283
 
 Primal phantasies, 323
 
 Principle of fact, 309;
   of pleasure, 309
 
 Psychiatry, psychoanalysis and, 209;
   therapeutics of, 220
 
 Psychic flight from unpleasantness, 55;
   process, meaning of, 23;
   definition of, 7;
   in sleeping and waking, differences between, 69
 
 Psychoanalysis, definition of, 1;
   difficulties of, 2, 5;
   and psychiatry, 209;
   purpose of, 6;
   reasons for criticism of, 246;
   therapeutics of, 220
 
 Psychoanalytic conception of neurotic manifestations, 211;
   suggestion, hypnotic and difference between, 390
 
 Psychology of errors, 10
 
 Psychoneurosis,
   difference between the symptoms of the true neurosis and, 336;
   true neurosis and, connection between symptoms of, 338
 
 Psychotherapy by hypnosis, 253
 
 Purpose of psychoanalysis, 6
 
 
 Rank, O., 21, 108, 132, 139, 154, 175, 292
 
 Reaction-formations, 326
 
 Regression, 295, 296;
   of Libido, 297;
   theories of development and, 294
 
 Reik, Th., 290
 
 Repression, 255
 
 Reproduction, 269;
   sexuality and, 277
 
 Resistance, 92, 248;
   in anxiety hysteria, 250;
   in compulsion neurotics, 250, 251;
   external, 398;
   forms taken by, 250;
   internal, 398;
   intellectual, 251;
   in narcistic neurosis, 365
 
 Ritual, pathological, 228;
   sleep, 227
 
 Roux, 314
 
 
 Sachs, Hanns, 139, 173
 
 Sadistico-anal sexual organization, 283
 
 Sadists, 264
 
 Scherner, K. A., 124
 
 Schirmer, 74
 
 Schwind, 109
 
 Secondary treatment, 151
 
 Sex symbols, 126
 
 Sex, the third, 263
 
 Sexual curiosity of children, 274;
   definition of concept, 262;
   development, 284;
   instincts, 356;
   life of the child, 268, 281;
   life of man, 262;
   organizations, 277, 283;
   perversions, 175, 278
 
 Sexuality, perverse, 268;
   and reproduction, 277
 
 Siebault, 81
 
 Silberer, V., 203
 
 Situation-phobia, 345;
   phobias in children, 352
 
 Sleep, definition of, 67;
   ritual, 227
 
 Slips of the tongue, 16;
   effects of, 18;
   explanation of, 25, 46;
   general observations on, 48;
   of the pen, 49
 
 Sperber, H., 138
 
 Spontaneous neuroses, 237
 
 Stekel, W., 203
 
 Struwelpeter, 321
 
 Sublimation, 8, 300
 
 Substitute names, 87
 
 Suggestibility, 386
 
 Suggestion, 386, 388
 
 Suppression, 46, 248, 256, 259, 296, 298
 
 Symbol, 123;
   beheading, 231
 
 Symbolism in the dream, 122;
   in every day life, 130
 
 Symbols, 125, 126;
   of birth, 132;
   sex, 126
 
 Symptomatic acts, accidental and, 42
 
 Symptom-development, 259;
   interpretation, 259;
   purpose of, 258, 259
 
 Symptoms, individual, 232, 234;
   meaning of, 221;
   of neurosis, development of, 311;
   neurotic, evolution of, 244;
   objections to interpretations of, 260;
   significance of phantasy for the development of, 324;
   typical, 233
 
 System of the unconscious, fore-conscious and the conscious, 255-257
 
 
 Technique in dream interpretation, 82
 
 Therapy, analytical, 372
 
 Therapeutics of psychiatry, 220;
   of psychoanalysis, 220
 
 Third sex, 263
 
 Tongue slip, mechanism of, 46, 49
 
 Topophobia, 233
 
 Transference, 25, 372, 379;
   narcistic neuroses and, 386;
   neuroses, 259, 339, 384
 
 Translation of thoughts into visual images, 145
 
 Traumatic fixation, 236;
   neuroses, 237
 
 Trenck, 108
 
 True neuroses, 338;
   and psychoneuroses, connection between symptoms of, 338;
   symptoms of, 336
 
 Typical symptoms, 234
 
 
 Unconscious, the, 236, 255;
   definition of, 90;
   psychological processes, 240
 
 
 Vold, J. Mourly, 66, 127
 
 Vomiting, hysterical, 233
 
 von Brcke, 295
 
 
 Wallace, 247
 
 Washing, a compulsive act, 233
 
 Wishes, death, 169
 
 Wish fulfillment, 180;
   in dreams, 104, 107;
   negative, 261;
   positive, 261
 
 Wundt school, 86
 
 
 Zola, Emile, 224
 
 Zurich school, 86
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 The following typographical errors have been corrected by the etext
 transcriber:
 
 Resistance and Supression=>Resistance and Suppression
 
 Dark Ages faithfully perserved things=>Dark Ages faithfully preserved
 things
 
 the dream anaylsis=>the dream analysis
 
 reocgnize=>recognize
 
 crimes commited=>crimes committed
 
 embryo in the amnotic fluid=>embryo in the amniotic fluid
 
 Sublim Porte=>Sublime Porte
 
 remote of these thoughs=>remote of these thoughts
 
 uncomfortabe=>uncomfortable
 
 archiac or regressive mode=>archaic or regressive mode
 
 capitalist and the entrepeneur=>capitalist and the entrepreneur
 
 By means of two selected illlustrations=>By means of two selected
 illustrations
 
 and did not yet want to a prophet=>and did not yet want to be a prophet
 
 fundamenal difference=>fundamental difference
 
 psychlogical=>psychological
 
 sexual substitute-satsifaction=>sexual substitute-satisfaction
 
 carry on psychonalaysis=>carry on psychoanalysis
 
 with manual anonism=>with manual ononism
 
 the educator, Nesessity=>the educator, Necessity
 
 has been succssfully=>has been successfully
 
 The physician forms a very favorable opinon=>The physician forms a very
 favorable opinion
 
 affctionate=>affectionate
 
 destroyed the transfrence=>destroyed the transference
 
 read "Agamemnon" for "angenomen,"=>read "Agamemnon" for "angenommen,"
 
 "Angenomen" is a verb, meaning "to accept."=>"Angenommen" is a verb,
 meaning "to accept."
 
 misprints, which are of ocurse to be considered as errors of the
 typesetter.=>misprints, which are of course to be considered as errors
 of the typesetter.
 
 "Rckhaltos" means "unreservedly."=>"Rckhaltlos" means "unreservedly."
 
 Struuelpeter=>Struwelpeter
 
 Struwwelpeter=>Struwelpeter
 
 Oberlander, 334=>Oberlnder, 334
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 
 FOOTNOTES:
 
 [1] "Fehl-leistungen."
 
 [2] In the German, the correct announcement is, "Connetable schickt sein
 Schwert zurck." The novice, as a result of the suggestion, announced
 instead that "Komfortabel schickt sein Pferd zurck."
 
 [3] "Aufstossen" instead of "anstossen."
 
 [4] "Begleit-digen" compounded of "begleiten" and "beleidigen."
 
 [5] "Briefkasten" instead of "Brtkasten."
 
 [6] "Geneigt" instead of "geeignet."
 
 [7] "Versuchungen" instead of "Versuche."
 
 [8] "Aufgepatzt" instead of "aufgeputzt."
 
 [9] "Angenommen" is a verb, meaning "to accept."
 
 [10] The young man here said "aufzustossen" instead of "anzustossen."
 
 [11] Prof. Freud here gives the two examples, quite untranslatable, of
 "apopos" instead of "apropos," and "eischeiszwaibehen" instead of
 "eiweiszscheibehen."
 
 [12] From C. G. Jung.
 
 [13] From A. A. Brill.
 
 [14] From B. Dattner.
 
 [15] So also in the writings of A. Maeder (French), A. A. Brill
 (English) J. Strke (Dutch) and others.
 
 [16] From R. Reitler.
 
 [17] In the German Reichstag, November, 1908. "Rckhaltlos" means
 "unreservedly." "Rckgratlos" means "without backbone."
 
 [18] "Zum Vorschein bringen," means to bring to light. "Schweinereien"
 means filthiness or obscurity. The telescoping of the two ideas,
 resulting in the word "Vorschwein," plainly reveals the speaker's
 opinion of the affair.
 
 [19] The lady meant to say "Nach Hause," "to reach home." The word
 "Hose" means "drawers." The preservating content of her hesitancy is
 hereby revealed.
 
 [20] The German reads, "bei meinen Versuchen an Mausen," which, through
 the slip of the pen, resulted in "bei meinen Versuchen an Menschen."
 
 [21] "Angenommen" is a verb, meaning "to accept."
 
 [22] Josef Breuer, in the years 1880-1882. Cf. also my lectures on
 psychoanalysis, delivered in the United States in 1909.
 
 [23] The reader will recall the example: "things were re-filled."
 
 [24] From the sublime to the ridiculous is but a narrow passage.
 
 [25] Yes, the passage from Calais.
 
 [26] "Vorzug." "Vom Bett hervorziehen."
 
 [27] "Schrnkt sich ein."
 
 [28] In Germany tickets may be bought before the day of the performance
 only upon additional payment, over and above the regular cost of the
 ticket. This is called "Vorverkaufsgebhr."
 
 [29] See frontispiece
 
 [30] "steigen."
 
 [31] "den Frauen nachsteigen," and "ein alter Steiger."
 
 [32] "besitzen," to straddle.
 
 [33] While revising these pages I chanced upon a newspaper article that
 I quote here as an unexpected supplement to the above lines.
 
 THE PUNISHMENT OF GOD
 
 A BROKEN ARM FOR BROKEN FAITH
 
 Mrs. Anna M. the wife of a soldier in the reserve accused Mrs.
 Clementine C. of being untrue to her husband. The accusation reads that
 Mrs. C. had carried on an illicit relationship with Karl M. while her
 own husband was on the battlefield, from which he even sent her 70
 Kronen a month. Mrs. C. had received _quite a lot of money_ from the
 husband of the plaintiff, while she and her children had to live in
 _hunger_ and in misery. Friends of her husband had told her that Mrs. C.
 had visited inns with M. and had caroused there until late at night. The
 accused had even asked the husband of the plaintiff before several
 infantrymen whether he would not soon get a divorce from his "old woman"
 and live with her. Mrs. C.'s housekeeper had also repeatedly seen the
 husband of the plaintiff in her (Mrs. C.'s) apartment, in complete
 neglige.
 
 Yesterday Mrs. C. _denied_ before a judge in Leopoldstadt that she even
 knew M; there could be no question of intimate relation between them.
 
 The witness, Albertine M., however, testified that Mrs. C. had kissed
 the husband of the plaintiff and that she had surprised them at it.
 
 When M. was called as a witness in an earlier proceeding he had denied
 any intimate relation to the accused. Yesterday the judge received a
 _letter_ in which the witness retracts the statement he made in the
 first proceeding and _admits_ that he had carried on a love affair with
 Mrs. C., until last June. He says that he only denied this relationship
 in the former proceeding for the sake of the accused because before the
 proceeding she had come to him and begged on her knees that he should
 save her and not confess. "To-day," wrote the witness, "I felt impelled
 to make a full confession to the court, since I have _broken my left
 arm_ and this appears to me as the _punishment of God_ for my
 transgression."
 
 The judge maintained the penal offense had already become null and void,
 whereupon the plaintiff withdrew her accusation and the liberation of
 the accused followed.
 
 [34] This highly technical concept is explained in _The Interpretation
 of Dreams_, Chap. VII, Sec. (b) pp. 422 et seq.
 
 [35] The principal street of Vienna.
 
 [36] I do not mention another obvious interpretation of this "3" in the
 case of this childless woman, because it is not material to this
 analysis.
 
 [37] Compare S. Freud, _Totem and Taboo_, 1913.
 
 [38] E. Toulouse, Emile Zola--_Enqute medico-psychologique_, Paris,
 1896.
 
 [39] There are fagots and fagots.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 End of the Project Gutenberg EBook of A General Introduction to

 
 
 
 Produced by Chuck Greif and the Online Distributed
 Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net (This file was
 produced from images available at The Internet Archive)
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 [Illustration: SCHWIND, _The Dream of the Prisoner_
 
 See page 109 for analysis]
 
 
 
 
 A General Introduction
 to
 Psychoanalysis
 
 BY
 PROF. SIGMUND FREUD, LL.D.
 
 AUTHORIZED TRANSLATION
 WITH A PREFACE
 
 BY
 G. STANLEY HALL
 PRESIDENT, CLARK UNIVERSITY
 
 HORACE LIVERIGHT
 PUBLISHER NEW YORK
 
 Published, 1920, by
 HORACE LIVERIGHT, INC.
 
 _Printed in the United States of America_
 
 COPYRIGHT, 1920, BY EDWARD L. BERNAYS
 
 
 
 
 PREFACE
 
 
 Few, especially in this country, realize that while Freudian themes have
 rarely found a place on the programs of the American Psychological
 Association, they have attracted great and growing attention and found
 frequent elaboration by students of literature, history, biography,
 sociology, morals and aesthetics, anthropology, education, and religion.
 They have given the world a new conception of both infancy and
 adolescence, and shed much new light upon characterology; given us a new
 and clearer view of sleep, dreams, reveries, and revealed hitherto
 unknown mental mechanisms common to normal and pathological states and
 processes, showing that the law of causation extends to the most
 incoherent acts and even verbigerations in insanity; gone far to clear
 up the _terra incognita_ of hysteria; taught us to recognize morbid
 symptoms, often neurotic and psychotic in their germ; revealed the
 operations of the primitive mind so overlaid and repressed that we had
 almost lost sight of them; fashioned and used the key of symbolism to
 unlock many mysticisms of the past; and in addition to all this,
 affected thousands of cures, established a new prophylaxis, and
 suggested new tests for character, disposition, and ability, in all
 combining the practical and theoretic to a degree salutary as it is
 rare.
 
 These twenty-eight lectures to laymen are elementary and almost
 conversational. Freud sets forth with a frankness almost startling the
 difficulties and limitations of psychoanalysis, and also describes its
 main methods and results as only a master and originator of a new school
 of thought can do. These discourses are at the same time simple and
 almost confidential, and they trace and sum up the results of thirty
 years of devoted and painstaking research. While they are not at all
 controversial, we incidentally see in a clearer light the distinctions
 between the master and some of his distinguished pupils. A text like
 this is the most opportune and will naturally more or less supersede all
 other introductions to the general subject of psychoanalysis. It
 presents the author in a new light, as an effective and successful
 popularizer, and is certain to be welcomed not only by the large and
 growing number of students of psychoanalysis in this country but by the
 yet larger number of those who wish to begin its study here and
 elsewhere.
 
 The impartial student of Sigmund Freud need not agree with all his
 conclusions, and indeed, like the present writer, may be unable to make
 sex so all-dominating a factor in the psychic life of the past and
 present as Freud deems it to be, to recognize the fact that he is the
 most original and creative mind in psychology of our generation. Despite
 the frightful handicap of the _odium sexicum_, far more formidable today
 than the _odium theologicum_, involving as it has done for him lack of
 academic recognition and even more or less social ostracism, his views
 have attracted and inspired a brilliant group of minds not only in
 psychiatry but in many other fields, who have altogether given the world
 of culture more new and pregnant _appercus_ than those which have come
 from any other source within the wide domain of humanism.
 
 A former student and disciple of Wundt, who recognizes to the full his
 inestimable services to our science, cannot avoid making certain
 comparisons. Wundt has had for decades the prestige of a most
 advantageous academic chair. He founded the first laboratory for
 experimental psychology, which attracted many of the most gifted and
 mature students from all lands. By his development of the doctrine of
 apperception he took psychology forever beyond the old associationism
 which had ceased to be fruitful. He also established the independence of
 psychology from physiology, and by his encyclopedic and always thronged
 lectures, to say nothing of his more or less esoteric seminary, he
 materially advanced every branch of mental science and extended its
 influence over the whole wide domain of folklore, mores, language, and
 primitive religion. His best texts will long constitute a thesaurus
 which every psychologist must know.
 
 Again, like Freud, he inspired students who went beyond him (the
 Wurzburgers and introspectionists) whose method and results he could not
 follow. His limitations have grown more and more manifest. He has little
 use for the unconscious or the abnormal, and for the most part he has
 lived and wrought in a preevolutionary age and always and everywhere
 underestimated the genetic standpoint. He never transcends the
 conventional limits in dealing, as he so rarely does, with sex. Nor does
 he contribute much likely to be of permanent value in any part of the
 wide domain of affectivity. We cannot forbear to express the hope that
 Freud will not repeat Wundt's error in making too abrupt a break with
 his more advanced pupils like Adler or the Zurich group. It is rather
 precisely just the topics that Wundt neglects that Freud makes his chief
 corner-stones, viz., the unconscious, the abnormal, sex, and affectivity
 generally, with many genetic, especially ontogenetic, but also
 phylogenetic factors. The Wundtian influence has been great in the past,
 while Freud has a great present and a yet greater future.
 
 In one thing Freud agrees with the introspectionists, viz., in
 deliberately neglecting the "physiological factor" and building on
 purely psychological foundations, although for Freud psychology is
 mainly unconscious, while for the introspectionists it is pure
 consciousness. Neither he nor his disciples have yet recognized the aid
 proffered them by students of the autonomic system or by the
 distinctions between the epicritic and protopathic functions and organs
 of the cerebrum, although these will doubtless come to have their due
 place as we know more of the nature and processes of the unconscious
 mind.
 
 If psychologists of the normal have hitherto been too little disposed to
 recognize the precious contributions to psychology made by the cruel
 experiments of Nature in mental diseases, we think that the
 psychoanalysts, who work predominantly in this field, have been somewhat
 too ready to apply their findings to the operations of the normal mind;
 but we are optomistic enough to believe that in the end both these
 errors will vanish and that in the great synthesis of the future that
 now seems to impend our science will be made vastly richer and deeper on
 the theoretical side and also far more practical than it has ever been
 before.
 
 G. STANLEY HALL.
 
 Clark University,
 April, 1920.
 
 
 
 
 CONTENTS
 
 
 PART ONE
 
 _The Psychology of Errors_
 
 PAGE
 
 PREFACE    G. Stanley Hall                                             V
 
 LECTURE
 
 I. INTRODUCTION                                                        1
 
 II. THE PSYCHOLOGY OF ERRORS                                          10
 
 III. THE PSYCHOLOGY OF ERRORS--(_Continued_)                          23
 
 IV. THE PSYCHOLOGY OF ERRORS--(_Conclusion_)                          41
 
 
 PART TWO
 
 _The Dream_
 
 V. DIFFICULTIES AND PRELIMINARY APPROACH                              63
 
 VI. HYPOTHESIS AND TECHNIQUE OF INTERPRETATION                        78
 
 VII. MANIFEST DREAM CONTENT AND LATENT DREAM THOUGHT                  90
 
 VIII. DREAMS OF CHILDHOOD                                            101
 
 IX. THE DREAM CENSOR                                                 110
 
 X. SYMBOLISM IN THE DREAM                                            122
 
 XI. THE DREAM-WORK                                                   141
 
 XII. ANALYSES OF SAMPLE DREAMS                                       153
 
 XIII. ARCHAIC REMNANTS AND INFANTILISM IN THE DREAM                  167
 
 XIV. WISH FULFILLMENT                                                180
 
 XV. DOUBTFUL POINTS AND CRITICISM                                    194
 
 
 PART THREE
 
 _General Theory of the Neuroses_
 
 XVI. PSYCHOANALYSIS AND PSYCHIATRY                                   209
 
 XVII. THE MEANING OF THE SYMPTOMS                                    221
 
 XVIII. TRAUMATIC FIXATION--THE UNCONSCIOUS                           236
 
 XIX. RESISTANCE AND SUPPRESSION                                      248
 
 XX. THE SEXUAL LIFE OF MAN                                           262
 
 XXI. DEVELOPMENT OF THE LIBIDO AND SEXUAL ORGANIZATIONS              277
 
 XXII. THEORIES OF DEVELOPMENT AND REGRESSION--ETIOLOGY               294
 
 XXIII. THE DEVELOPMENT OF THE SYMPTOMS                               311
 
 XXIV. ORDINARY NERVOUSNESS                                           328
 
 XXV. FEAR AND ANXIETY                                                340
 
 XXVI. THE LIBIDO THEORY AND NARCISM                                  356
 
 XXVII. TRANSFERENCE                                                  372
 
 XXVIII. ANALYTICAL THERAPY                                           388
 
 INDEX                                                                403
 
 
 
 
 PART I
 
 THE PSYCHOLOGY OF ERRORS
 
 
 
 
 FIRST LECTURE
 
 INTRODUCTION
 
 
 I do not know how familiar some of you may be, either from your reading
 or from hearsay, with psychoanalysis. But, in keeping with the title of
 these lectures--_A General Introduction to Psychoanalysis_--I am obliged
 to proceed as though you knew nothing about this subject, and stood in
 need of preliminary instruction.
 
 To be sure, this much I may presume that you do know, namely, that
 psychoanalysis is a method of treating nervous patients medically. And
 just at this point I can give you an example to illustrate how the
 procedure in this field is precisely the reverse of that which is the
 rule in medicine. Usually when we introduce a patient to a medical
 technique which is strange to him we minimize its difficulties and give
 him confident promises concerning the result of the treatment. When,
 however, we undertake psychoanalytic treatment with a neurotic patient
 we proceed differently. We hold before him the difficulties of the
 method, its length, the exertions and the sacrifices which it will cost
 him; and, as to the result, we tell him that we make no definite
 promises, that the result depends on his conduct, on his understanding,
 on his adaptability, on his perseverance. We have, of course, excellent
 motives for conduct which seems so perverse, and into which you will
 perhaps gain insight at a later point in these lectures.
 
 Do not be offended, therefore, if, for the present, I treat you as I
 treat these neurotic patients. Frankly, I shall dissuade you from coming
 to hear me a second time. With this intention I shall show what
 imperfections are necessarily involved in the teaching of psychoanalysis
 and what difficulties stand in the way of gaining a personal judgment. I
 shall show you how the whole trend of your previous training and all
 your accustomed mental habits must unavoidably have made you opponents
 of psychoanalysis, and how much you must overcome in yourselves in
 order to master this instinctive opposition. Of course I cannot predict
 how much psychoanalytic understanding you will gain from my lectures,
 but I can promise this, that by listening to them you will not learn how
 to undertake a psychoanalytic treatment or how to carry one to
 completion. Furthermore, should I find anyone among you who does not
 feel satisfied with a cursory acquaintance with psychoanalysis, but who
 would like to enter into a more enduring relationship with it, I shall
 not only dissuade him, but I shall actually warn him against it. As
 things now stand, a person would, by such a choice of profession, ruin
 his every chance of success at a university, and if he goes out into the
 world as a practicing physician, he will find himself in a society which
 does not understand his aims, which regards him with suspicion and
 hostility, and which turns loose upon him all the malicious spirits
 which lurk within it.
 
 However, there are always enough individuals who are interested in
 anything which may be added to the sum total of knowledge, despite such
 inconveniences. Should there be any of this type among you, and should
 they ignore my dissuasion and return to the next of these lectures, they
 will be welcome. But all of you have the right to know what these
 difficulties of psychoanalysis are to which I have alluded.
 
 First of all, we encounter the difficulties inherent in the teaching and
 exposition of psychoanalysis. In your medical instruction you have been
 accustomed to visual demonstration. You see the anatomical specimen, the
 precipitate in the chemical reaction, the contraction of the muscle as
 the result of the stimulation of its nerves. Later the patient is
 presented to your senses; the symptoms of his malady, the products of
 the pathological processes, in many cases even the cause of the disease
 is shown in isolated state. In the surgical department you are made to
 witness the steps by which one brings relief to the patient, and are
 permitted to attempt to practice them. Even in psychiatry, the
 demonstration affords you, by the patient's changed facial play, his
 manner of speech and his behavior, a wealth of observations which leave
 far-reaching impressions. Thus the medical teacher preponderantly plays
 the role of a guide and instructor who accompanies you through a museum
 in which you contract an immediate relationship to the exhibits, and in
 which you believe yourself to have been convinced through your own
 observation of the existence of the new things you see.
 
 Unfortunately, everything is different in psychoanalysis. In
 psychoanalysis nothing occurs but the interchange of words between the
 patient and the physician. The patient talks, tells of his past
 experiences and present impressions, complains, confesses his wishes and
 emotions. The physician listens, tries to direct the thought processes
 of the patient, reminds him of things, forces his attention into certain
 channels, gives him explanations and observes the reactions of
 understanding or denial which he calls forth in the patient. The
 uneducated relatives of our patients--persons who are impressed only by
 the visible and tangible, preferably by such procedure as one sees in
 the moving picture theatres--never miss an opportunity of voicing their
 scepticism as to how one can "do anything for the malady through mere
 talk." Such thinking, of course, is as shortsighted as it is
 inconsistent. For these are the very persons who know with such
 certainty that the patients "merely imagine" their symptoms. Words were
 originally magic, and the word retains much of its old magical power
 even to-day. With words one man can make another blessed, or drive him
 to despair; by words the teacher transfers his knowledge to the pupil;
 by words the speaker sweeps his audience with him and determines its
 judgments and decisions. Words call forth effects and are the universal
 means of influencing human beings. Therefore let us not underestimate
 the use of words in psychotherapy, and let us be satisfied if we may be
 auditors of the words which are exchanged between the analyst and his
 patient.
 
 But even that is impossible. The conversation of which the
 psychoanalytic treatment consists brooks no auditor, it cannot be
 demonstrated. One can, of course, present a neurasthenic or hysteric to
 the students in a psychiatric lecture. He tells of his complaints and
 symptoms, but of nothing else. The communications which are necessary
 for the analysis are made only under the conditions of a special
 affective relationship to the physician; the patient would become dumb
 as soon as he became aware of a single impartial witness. For these
 communications concern the most intimate part of his psychic life,
 everything which as a socially independent person he must conceal from
 others; these communications deal with everything which, as a harmonious
 personality, he will not admit even to himself.
 
 You cannot, therefore, "listen in" on a psychoanalytic treatment. You
 can only hear of it. You will get to know psychoanalysis, in the
 strictest sense of the word, only by hearsay. Such instruction even at
 second hand, will place you in quite an unusual position for forming a
 judgment. For it is obvious that everything depends on the faith you are
 able to put in the instructor.
 
 Imagine that you are not attending a psychiatric, but an historical
 lecture, and that the lecturer is telling you about the life and martial
 deeds of Alexander the Great. What would be your reasons for believing
 in the authenticity of his statements? At first sight, the condition of
 affairs seems even more unfavorable than in the case of psychoanalysis,
 for the history professor was as little a participant in Alexander's
 campaigns as you were; the psychoanalyst at least tells you of things in
 connection with which he himself has played some role. But then the
 question turns on this--what set of facts can the historian marshal in
 support of his position? He can refer you to the accounts of ancient
 authors, who were either contemporaries themselves, or who were at least
 closer to the events in question; that is, he will refer you to the
 books of Diodor, Plutarch, Arrian, etc. He can place before you pictures
 of the preserved coins and statues of the king and can pass down your
 rows a photograph of the Pompeiian mosaics of the battle of Issos. Yet,
 strictly speaking, all these documents prove only that previous
 generations already believed in Alexander's existence and in the reality
 of his deeds, and your criticism might begin anew at this point. You
 will then find that not everything recounted of Alexander is credible,
 or capable of proof in detail; yet even then I cannot believe that you
 will leave the lecture hall a disbeliever in the reality of Alexander
 the Great. Your decision will be determined chiefly by two
 considerations; firstly, that the lecturer has no conceivable motive for
 presenting as truth something which he does not himself believe to be
 true, and secondly, that all available histories present the events in
 approximately the same manner. If you then proceed to the verification
 of the older sources, you will consider the same data, the possible
 motives of the writers and the consistency of the various parts of the
 evidence. The result of the examination will surely be convincing in the
 case of Alexander. It will probably turn out differently when applied
 to individuals like Moses and Nimrod. But what doubts you might raise
 against the credibility of the psychoanalytic reporter you will see
 plainly enough upon a later occasion.
 
 At this point you have a right to raise the question, "If there is no
 such thing as objective verification of psychoanalysis, and no
 possibility of demonstrating it, how can one possibly learn
 psychoanalysis and convince himself of the truth of its claims?" The
 fact is, the study is not easy and there are not many persons who have
 learned psychoanalysis thoroughly; but nevertheless, there is a feasible
 way. Psychoanalysis is learned, first of all, from a study of one's
 self, through the study of one's own personality. This is not quite what
 is ordinarily called self-observation, but, at a pinch, one can sum it
 up thus. There is a whole series of very common and universally known
 psychic phenomena, which, after some instruction in the technique of
 psychoanalysis, one can make the subject matter of analysis in one's
 self. By so doing one obtains the desired conviction of the reality of
 the occurrences which psychoanalysis describes and of the correctness of
 its fundamental conception. To be sure, there are definite limits
 imposed on progress by this method. One gets much further if one allows
 himself to be analyzed by a competent analyst, observes the effect of
 the analysis on his own ego, and at the same time makes use of the
 opportunity to become familiar with the finer details of the technique
 of procedure. This excellent method is, of course, only practicable for
 one person, never for an entire class.
 
 There is a second difficulty in your relation to psychoanalysis for
 which I cannot hold the science itself responsible, but for which I must
 ask you to take the responsibility upon yourselves, ladies and
 gentlemen, at least in so far as you have hitherto pursued medical
 studies. Your previous training has given your mental activity a
 definite bent which leads you far away from psychoanalysis. You have
 been trained to reduce the functions of an organism and its disorders
 anatomically, to explain them in terms of chemistry and physics and to
 conceive them biologically, but no portion of your interest has been
 directed to the psychic life, in which, after all, the activity of this
 wonderfully complex organism culminates. For this reason psychological
 thinking has remained strange to you and you have accustomed yourselves
 to regard it with suspicion, to deny it the character of the scientific,
 to leave it to the laymen, poets, natural philosophers and mystics. Such
 a delimitation is surely harmful to your medical activity, for the
 patient will, as is usual in all human relationships, confront you first
 of all with his psychic facade; and I am afraid your penalty will be
 this, that you will be forced to relinquish a portion of the therapeutic
 influence to which you aspire, to those lay physicians, nature-cure
 fakers and mystics whom you despise.
 
 I am not overlooking the excuse, whose existence one must admit, for
 this deficiency in your previous training. There is no philosophical
 science of therapy which could be made practicable for your medical
 purpose. Neither speculative philosophy nor descriptive psychology nor
 that so-called experimental psychology which allies itself with the
 physiology of the sense organs as it is taught in the schools, is in a
 position to teach you anything useful concerning the relation between
 the physical and the psychical or to put into your hand the key to the
 understanding of a possible disorder of the psychic functions. Within
 the field of medicine, psychiatry does, it is true, occupy itself with
 the description of the observed psychic disorders and with their
 grouping into clinical symptom-pictures; but in their better hours the
 psychiatrists themselves doubt whether their purely descriptive account
 deserves the name of a science. The symptoms which constitute these
 clinical pictures are known neither in their origin, in their mechanism,
 nor in their mutual relationship. There are either no discoverable
 corresponding changes of the anatomical organ of the soul, or else the
 changes are of such a nature as to yield no enlightenment. Such psychic
 disturbances are open to therapeutic influence only when they can be
 identified as secondary phenomena of an otherwise organic affection.
 
 Here is the gap which psychoanalysis aims to fill. It prepares to give
 psychiatry the omitted psychological foundation, it hopes to reveal the
 common basis from which, as a starting point, constant correlation of
 bodily and psychic disturbances becomes comprehensible. To this end, it
 must divorce itself from every anatomical, chemical or physiological
 supposition which is alien to it. It must work throughout with purely
 psychological therapeutic concepts, and just for that reason I fear
 that it will at first seem strange to you.
 
 I will not make you, your previous training, or your mental bias share
 the guilt of the next difficulty. With two of its assertions,
 psychoanalysis offends the whole world and draws aversion upon itself.
 One of these assertions offends an intellectual prejudice, the other an
 aesthetic-moral one. Let us not think too lightly of these prejudices;
 they are powerful things, remnants of useful, even necessary,
 developments of mankind. They are retained through powerful affects, and
 the battle against them is a hard one.
 
 The first of these displeasing assertions of psychoanalysis is this,
 that the psychic processes are in themselves unconscious, and that those
 which are conscious are merely isolated acts and parts of the total
 psychic life. Recollect that we are, on the contrary, accustomed to
 identify the psychic with the conscious. Consciousness actually means
 for us the distinguishing characteristic of the psychic life, and
 psychology is the science of the content of consciousness. Indeed, so
 obvious does this identification seem to us that we consider its
 slightest contradiction obvious nonsense, and yet psychoanalysis cannot
 avoid raising this contradiction; it cannot accept the identity of the
 conscious with the psychic. Its definition of the psychic affirms that
 they are processes of the nature of feeling, thinking, willing; and it
 must assert that there is such a thing as unconscious thinking and
 unconscious willing. But with this assertion psychoanalysis has
 alienated, to start with, the sympathy of all friends of sober science,
 and has laid itself open to the suspicion of being a fantastic mystery
 study which would build in darkness and fish in murky waters. You,
 however, ladies and gentlemen, naturally cannot as yet understand what
 justification I have for stigmatizing as a prejudice so abstract a
 phrase as this one, that "the psychic is consciousness." You cannot know
 what evaluation can have led to the denial of the unconscious, if such a
 thing really exists, and what advantage may have resulted from this
 denial. It sounds like a mere argument over words whether one shall say
 that the psychic coincides with the conscious or whether one shall
 extend it beyond that, and yet I can assure you that by the acceptance
 of unconscious processes you have paved the way for a decisively new
 orientation in the world and in science.
 
 Just as little can you guess how intimate a connection this initial
 boldness of psychoanalysis has with the one which follows. The next
 assertion which psychoanalysis proclaims as one of its discoveries,
 affirms that those instinctive impulses which one can only call sexual
 in the narrower as well as in the wider sense, play an uncommonly large
 role in the causation of nervous and mental diseases, and that those
 impulses are a causation which has never been adequately appreciated.
 Nay, indeed, psychoanalysis claims that these same sexual impulses have
 made contributions whose value cannot be overestimated to the highest
 cultural, artistic and social achievements of the human mind.
 
 According to my experience, the aversion to this conclusion of
 psychoanalysis is the most significant source of the opposition which it
 encounters. Would you like to know how we explain this fact? We believe
 that civilization was forged by the driving force of vital necessity, at
 the cost of instinct-satisfaction, and that the process is to a large
 extent constantly repeated anew, since each individual who newly enters
 the human community repeats the sacrifices of his instinct-satisfaction
 for the sake of the common good. Among the instinctive forces thus
 utilized, the sexual impulses play a significant role. They are thereby
 sublimated, i.e., they are diverted from their sexual goals and directed
 to ends socially higher and no longer sexual. But this result is
 unstable. The sexual instincts are poorly tamed. Each individual who
 wishes to ally himself with the achievements of civilization is exposed
 to the danger of having his sexual instincts rebel against this
 sublimation. Society can conceive of no more serious menace to its
 civilization than would arise through the satisfying of the sexual
 instincts by their redirection toward their original goals. Society,
 therefore, does not relish being reminded of this ticklish spot in its
 origin; it has no interest in having the strength of the sexual
 instincts recognized and the meaning of the sexual life to the
 individual clearly delineated. On the contrary, society has taken the
 course of diverting attention from this whole field. This is the reason
 why society will not tolerate the above-mentioned results of
 psychoanalytic research, and would prefer to brand it as aesthetically
 offensive and morally objectionable or dangerous. Since, however, one
 cannot attack an ostensibly objective result of scientific inquiry with
 such objections, the criticism must be translated to an intellectual
 level if it is to be voiced. But it is a predisposition of human nature
 to consider an unpleasant idea untrue, and then it is easy to find
 arguments against it. Society thus brands what is unpleasant as untrue,
 denying the conclusions of psychoanalysis with logical and pertinent
 arguments. These arguments originate from affective sources, however,
 and society holds to these prejudices against all attempts at
 refutation.
 
 However, we may claim, ladies and gentlemen, that we have followed no
 bias of any sort in making any of these contested statements. We merely
 wished to state facts which we believe to have been discovered by
 toilsome labor. And we now claim the right unconditionally to reject the
 interference in scientific research of any such practical
 considerations, even before we have investigated whether the
 apprehension which these considerations are meant to instil are
 justified or not.
 
 These, therefore, are but a few of the difficulties which stand in the
 way of your occupation with psychoanalysis. They are perhaps more than
 enough for a beginning. If you can overcome their deterrent impression,
 we shall continue.
 
 
 
 
 SECOND LECTURE
 
 THE PSYCHOLOGY OF ERRORS
 
 
 We begin with an investigation, not with hypotheses. To this end we
 choose certain phenomena which are very frequent, very familiar and very
 little heeded, and which have nothing to do with the pathological,
 inasmuch as they can be observed in every normal person. I refer to the
 errors which an individual commits--as for example, errors of speech in
 which he wishes to say something and uses the wrong word; or those which
 happen to him in writing, and which he may or may not notice; or the
 case of misreading, in which one reads in the print or writing something
 different from what is actually there. A similar phenomenon occurs in
 those cases of mishearing what is said to one, where there is no
 question of an organic disturbance of the auditory function. Another
 series of such occurrences is based on forgetfulness--but on a
 forgetfulness which is not permanent, but temporary, as for instance
 when one cannot think of a name which one knows and always recognizes;
 or when one forgets to carry out a project at the proper time but which
 one remembers again later, and therefore has only forgotten for a
 certain interval. In a third class this characteristic of transience is
 lacking, as for example in mislaying things so that they cannot be found
 again, or in the analogous case of losing things. Here we are dealing
 with a kind of forgetfulness to which one reacts differently from the
 other cases, a forgetfulness at which one is surprised and annoyed,
 instead of considering it comprehensible. Allied with these phenomena is
 that of erroneous ideas--in which the element of transience is again
 prominent, inasmuch as for a while one believes something which, before
 and after that time, one knows to be untrue--and a number of similar
 phenomena of different designations.
 
 These are all occurrences whose inner connection is expressed in the
 use of the same prefix of designation.[1] They are almost all
 unimportant, generally temporary and without much significance in the
 life of the individual. It is only rarely that one of them, such as the
 phenomenon of losing things, attains to a certain practical importance.
 For that reason also they do not attract much attention, they arouse
 only weak affects.
 
 It is, therefore, to these phenomena that I would now direct your
 attention. But you will object, with annoyance: "There are so many
 sublime riddles in the external world, just as there are in the narrower
 world of the psychic life, and so many wonders in the field of psychic
 disturbances which demand and deserve elucidation, that it really seems
 frivolous to waste labor and interest on such trifles. If you can
 explain to us how an individual with sound eyes and ears can, in broad
 daylight, see and hear things that do not exist, or why another
 individual suddenly believes himself persecuted by those whom up to that
 time he loved best, or defend, with the most ingenious arguments,
 delusions which must seem nonsense to any child, then we will be willing
 to consider psychoanalysis seriously. But if psychoanalysis can do
 nothing better than to occupy us with the question of why a speaker used
 the wrong word, or why a housekeeper mislaid her keys, or such trifles,
 then we know something better to do with our time and interest."
 
 My reply is: "Patience, ladies and gentlemen. I think your criticism is
 not on the right track. It is true that psychoanalysis cannot boast that
 it has never occupied itself with trifles. On the contrary, the objects
 of its observations are generally those simple occurrences which the
 other sciences have thrown aside as much too insignificant, the waste
 products of the phenomenal world. But are you not confounding, in your
 criticism, the sublimity of the problems with the conspicuousness of
 their manifestations? Are there not very important things which under
 certain circumstances, and at certain times, can betray themselves only
 by very faint signs? I could easily cite a great many instances of this
 kind. From what vague signs, for instance, do the young gentlemen of
 this audience conclude that they have won the favor of a lady? Do you
 await an explicit declaration, an ardent embrace, or does not a glance,
 scarcely perceptible to others, a fleeting gesture, the prolonging of a
 hand-shake by one second, suffice? And if you are a criminal lawyer, and
 engaged in the investigation of a murder, do you actually expect the
 murderer to leave his photograph and address on the scene of the crime,
 or would you, of necessity, content yourself with fainter and less
 certain traces of that individual? Therefore, let us not undervalue
 small signs; perhaps by means of them we will succeed in getting on the
 track of greater things. I agree with you that the larger problems of
 the world and of science have the first claim on our interest. But it is
 generally of little avail to form the definite resolution to devote
 oneself to the investigation of this or that problem. Often one does not
 know in which direction to take the next step. In scientific research it
 is more fruitful to attempt what happens to be before one at the moment
 and for whose investigation there is a discoverable method. If one does
 that thoroughly without prejudice or predisposition, one may, with good
 fortune, and by virtue of the connection which links each thing to every
 other (hence also the small to the great) discover even from such modest
 research a point of approach to the study of the big problems."
 
 Thus would I answer, in order to secure your attention for the
 consideration of these apparently insignificant errors made by normal
 people. At this point, we will question a stranger to psychoanalysis and
 ask him how he explains these occurrences.
 
 His first answer is sure to be, "Oh, they are not worth an explanation;
 they are merely slight accidents." What does he mean by this? Does he
 mean to assert that there are any occurrences so insignificant that they
 fall out of the causal sequence of things, or that they might just as
 well be something different from what they are? If any one thus denies
 the determination of natural phenomena at one such point, he has
 vitiated the entire scientific viewpoint. One can then point out to him
 how much more consistent is the religious point of view, when it
 explicitly asserts that "No sparrow falls from the roof without God's
 special wish." I imagine our friend will not be willing to follow his
 first answer to its logical conclusion; he will interrupt and say that
 if he were to study these things he would probably find an explanation
 for them. He will say that this is a case of slight functional
 disturbance, of an inaccurate psychic act whose causal factors can be
 outlined. A man who otherwise speaks correctly may make a slip of the
 tongue--when he is slightly ill or fatigued; when he is excited; when
 his attention is concentrated on something else. It is easy to prove
 these statements. Slips of the tongue do really occur with special
 frequency when one is tired, when one has a headache or when one is
 indisposed. Forgetting proper names is a very frequent occurrence under
 these circumstances. Many persons even recognize the imminence of an
 indisposition by the inability to recall proper names. Often also one
 mixes up words or objects during excitement, one picks up the wrong
 things; and the forgetting of projects, as well as the doing of any
 number of other unintentional acts, becomes conspicuous when one is
 distracted; in other words, when one's attention is concentrated on
 other things. A familiar instance of such distraction is the professor
 in _Fliegende Blaetter_, who takes the wrong hat because he is thinking
 of the problems which he wishes to treat in his next book. Each of us
 knows from experience some examples of how one can forget projects which
 one has planned and promises which one has made, because an experience
 has intervened which has preoccupied one deeply.
 
 This seems both comprehensible and irrefutable. It is perhaps not very
 interesting, not as we expected it to be. But let us consider this
 explanation of errors. The conditions which have been cited as necessary
 for the occurrence of these phenomena are not all identical. Illness and
 disorders of circulation afford a physiological basis. Excitement,
 fatigue and distraction are conditions of a different sort, which one
 could designate as psycho-physiological. About these latter it is easy
 to theorize. Fatigue, as well as distraction, and perhaps also general
 excitement, cause a scattering of the attention which can result in the
 act in progress not receiving sufficient attention. This act can then be
 more easily interrupted than usual, and may be inexactly carried out. A
 slight illness, or a change in the distribution of blood in the central
 organ of the nervous system, can have the same effect, inasmuch as it
 influences the determining factor, the distribution of attention, in a
 similar way. In all cases, therefore, it is a question of the effects of
 a distraction of the attention, caused either by organic or psychic
 factors.
 
 But this does not seem to yield much of interest for our psychoanalytic
 investigation. We might even feel tempted to give up the subject. To be
 sure, when we look more closely we find that not everything squares
 with this attention theory of psychological errors, or that at any rate
 not everything can be directly deduced from it. We find that such errors
 and such forgetting occur even when people are not fatigued, distracted
 or excited, but are in every way in their normal state; unless, in
 consequence of these errors, one were to attribute to them an excitement
 which they themselves do not acknowledge. Nor is the mechanism so simple
 that the success of an act is assured by an intensification of the
 attention bestowed upon it, and endangered by its diminution. There are
 many acts which one performs in a purely automatic way and with very
 little attention, but which are yet carried out quite successfully. The
 pedestrian who scarcely knows where he is going, nevertheless keeps to
 the right road and stops at his destination without having gone astray.
 At least, this is the rule. The practiced pianist touches the right keys
 without thinking of them. He may, of course, also make an occasional
 mistake, but if automatic playing increased the likelihood of errors, it
 would be just the virtuoso whose playing has, through practice, become
 most automatic, who would be the most exposed to this danger. Yet we
 see, on the contrary, that many acts are most successfully carried out
 when they are not the objects of particularly concentrated attention,
 and that the mistakes occur just at the point where one is most anxious
 to be accurate--where a distraction of the necessary attention is
 therefore surely least permissible. One could then say that this is the
 effect of the "excitement," but we do not understand why the excitement
 does not intensify the concentration of attention on the goal that is so
 much desired. If in an important speech or discussion anyone says the
 opposite of what he means, then that can hardly be explained according
 to the psycho-physiological or the attention theories.
 
 There are also many other small phenomena accompanying these errors,
 which are not understood and which have not been rendered comprehensible
 to us by these explanations. For instance, when one has temporarily
 forgotten a name, one is annoyed, one is determined to recall it and is
 unable to give up the attempt. Why is it that despite his annoyance the
 individual cannot succeed, as he wishes, in directing his attention to
 the word which is "on the tip of his tongue," and which he instantly
 recognizes when it is pronounced to him? Or, to take another example,
 there are cases in which the errors multiply, link themselves together,
 substitute for each other. The first time one forgets an appointment;
 the next time, after having made a special resolution not to forget it,
 one discovers that one has made a mistake in the day or hour. Or one
 tries by devious means to remember a forgotten word, and in the course
 of so doing loses track of a second name which would have been of use in
 finding the first. If one then pursues this second name, a third gets
 lost, and so on. It is notorious that the same thing can happen in the
 case of misprints, which are of course to be considered as errors of the
 typesetter. A stubborn error of this sort is said to have crept into a
 Social-Democratic paper, where, in the account of a certain festivity
 was printed, "Among those present was His Highness, the Clown Prince."
 The next day a correction was attempted. The paper apologized and said,
 "The sentence should, of course, have read 'The Clown Prince.'" One
 likes to attribute these occurrences to the printer's devil, to the
 goblin of the typesetting machine, and the like--figurative expressions
 which at least go beyond a psycho-physiological theory of the misprint.
 
 I do not know if you are acquainted with the fact that one can provoke
 slips of the tongue, can call them forth by suggestion, as it were. An
 anecdote will serve to illustrate this. Once when a novice on the stage
 was entrusted with the important role in _The Maid of Orleans_ of
 announcing to the King, "Connetable sheathes his sword," the star played
 the joke of repeating to the frightened beginner during the rehearsal,
 instead of the text, the following, "Comfortable sends back his
 steed,"[2] and he attained his end. In the performance the unfortunate
 actor actually made his debut with this distorted announcement; even
 after he had been amply warned against so doing, or perhaps just for
 that reason.
 
 These little characteristics of errors are not exactly illuminated by
 the theory of diverted attention. But that does not necessarily prove
 the whole theory wrong. There is perhaps something missing, a complement
 by the addition of which the theory would be made completely
 satisfactory. But many of the errors themselves can be regarded from
 another aspect.
 
 Let us select slips of the tongue, as best suited to our purposes. We
 might equally well choose slips of the pen or of reading. But at this
 point, we must make clear to ourselves the fact that so far we have
 inquired only as to when and under what conditions one's tongue slips,
 and have received an answer on this point only. One can, however, direct
 one's interest elsewhere and ask why one makes just this particular slip
 and no other; one can consider what the slip results in. You must
 realize that as long as one does not answer this question--does not
 explain the effect produced by the slip--the phenomenon in its
 psychological aspect remains an accident, even if its physiological
 explanation has been found. When it happens that I commit a slip of the
 tongue, I could obviously make any one of an infinite number of slips,
 and in place of the one right word say any one of a thousand others,
 make innumerable distortions of the right word. Now, is there anything
 which forces upon me in a specific instance just this one special slip
 out of all those which are possible, or does that remain accidental and
 arbitrary, and can nothing rational be found in answer to this question?
 
 Two authors, Meringer and Mayer (a philologist and a psychiatrist) did
 indeed in 1895 make the attempt to approach the problem of slips of the
 tongue from this side. They collected examples and first treated them
 from a purely descriptive standpoint. That, of course, does not yet
 furnish any explanation, but may open the way to one. They
 differentiated the distortions which the intended phrase suffered
 through the slip, into: interchanges of positions of words, interchanges
 of parts of words, perseverations, compoundings and substitutions. I
 will give you examples of these authors' main categories. It is a case
 of interchange of the first sort if someone says "the Milo of Venus"
 instead of "the Venus of Milo." An example of the second type of
 interchange, "I had a blush of rood to the head" instead of "rush of
 blood"; a perseveration would be the familiar misplaced toast, "I ask
 you to join me in hiccoughing the health of our chief."[3] These three
 forms of slips are not very frequent. You will find those cases much
 more frequent in which the slip results from a drawing together or
 compounding of syllables; for example, a gentleman on the street
 addresses a lady with the words, "If you will allow me, madame, I should
 be very glad to _inscort_ you."[4] In the compounded word there is
 obviously besides the word "escort," also the word "insult" (and
 parenthetically we may remark that the young man will not find much
 favor with the lady). As an example of the substitution, Meringer and
 Mayer cite the following: "A man says, 'I put the specimens in the
 letterbox,' instead of 'in the hot-bed,' and the like."[5]
 
 The explanation which the two authors attempt to formulate on the basis
 of this collection of examples is peculiarly inadequate. They hold that
 the sounds and syllables of words have different values, and that the
 production and perception of more highly valued syllables can interfere
 with those of lower values. They obviously base this conclusion on the
 cases of fore-sounding and perseveration which are not at all frequent;
 in other cases of slips of the tongue the question of such sound
 priorities, if any exist, does not enter at all. The most frequent cases
 of slips of the tongue are those in which instead of a certain word one
 says another which resembles it; and one may consider this resemblance
 sufficient explanation. For example, a professor says in his initial
 lecture, "I am not _inclined_ to evaluate the merits of my
 predecessor."[6] Or another professor says, "In the case of the female
 genital, despite many _temptations_ ... I mean many attempts ...
 etc."[7]
 
 The most common, and also the most conspicuous form of slips of the
 tongue, however, is that of saying the exact opposite of what one meant
 to say. In such cases, one goes far afield from the problem of sound
 relations and resemblance effects, and can cite, instead of these, the
 fact that opposites have an obviously close relationship to each other,
 and have particularly close relations in the psychology of association.
 There are historical examples of this sort. A president of our House of
 Representatives once opened the assembly with the words, "Gentlemen, I
 declare a quorum present, and herewith declare the assembly _closed_."
 
 Similar, in its trickiness, to the relation of opposites is the effect
 of any other facile association which may under certain circumstances
 arise most inopportunely. Thus, for instance, there is the story which
 relates that on the occasion of a festivity in honor of the marriage of
 a child of H. Helmholtz with a child of the well-known discoverer and
 captain of industry, W. Siemon, the famous physiologist Dubois-Reymond
 was asked to speak. He concluded his undoubtedly sparkling toast with
 the words, "Success to the new firm--Siemens and--Halski!" That, of
 course, was the name of the well-known old firm. The association of the
 two names must have been about as easy for a native of Berlin as "Weber
 and Fields" to an American.
 
 Thus we must add to the sound relations and word resemblances the
 influence of word associations. But that is not all. In a series of
 cases, an explanation of the observed slip is unsuccessful unless we
 take into account what phrase had been said or even thought previously.
 This again makes it a case of perseveration of the sort stressed by
 Meringer, but of a longer duration. I must admit, I am on the whole of
 the impression that we are further than ever from an explanation of
 slips of the tongue!
 
 However, I hope I am not wrong when I say that during the above
 investigation of these examples of slips of the tongue, we have all
 obtained a new impression on which it will be of value to dwell. We
 sought the general conditions under which slips of the tongue occur, and
 then the influences which determine the kind of distortion resulting
 from the slip, but we have in no way yet considered the effect of the
 slip of the tongue in itself, without regard to its origin. And if we
 should decide to do so we must finally have the courage to assert, "In
 some of the examples cited, the product of the slip also makes sense."
 What do we mean by "it makes sense"? It means, I think, that the product
 of the slip has itself a right to be considered as a valid psychic act
 which also has its purpose, as a manifestation having content and
 meaning. Hitherto we have always spoken of errors, but now it seems as
 if sometimes the error itself were quite a normal act, except that it
 has thrust itself into the place of some other expected or intended act.
 
 In isolated cases this valid meaning seems obvious and unmistakable.
 When the president with his opening words closes the session of the
 House of Representatives, instead of opening it, we are inclined to
 consider this error meaningful by reason of our knowledge of the
 circumstances under which the slip occurred. He expects no good of the
 assembly, and would be glad if he could terminate it immediately. The
 pointing out of this meaning, the interpretation of this error, gives us
 no difficulty. Or a lady, pretending to admire, says to another, "I am
 sure you must have messed up this charming hat yourself."[8] No
 scientific quibbles in the world can keep us from discovering in this
 slip the idea "this hat is a mess." Or a lady who is known for her
 energetic disposition, relates, "My husband asked the doctor to what
 diet he should keep. But the doctor said he didn't need any diet, he
 should eat and drink whatever _I_ want." This slip of tongue is quite an
 unmistakable expression of a consistent purpose.
 
 Ladies and gentlemen, if it should turn out that not only a few cases of
 slips of the tongue and of errors in general, but the larger part of
 them, have a meaning, then this meaning of errors of which we have
 hitherto made no mention, will unavoidably become of the greatest
 interest to us and will, with justice, force all other points of view
 into the background. We could then ignore all physiological and
 psycho-physiological conditions and devote ourselves to the purely
 psychological investigations of the sense, that is, the meaning, the
 purpose of these errors. To this end therefore we will not fail,
 shortly, to study a more extensive compilation of material.
 
 But before we undertake this task, I should like to invite you to follow
 another line of thought with me. It has repeatedly happened that a poet
 has made use of slips of the tongue or some other error as a means of
 poetic presentation. This fact in itself must prove to us that he
 considers the error, the slip of the tongue for instance, as meaningful;
 for he creates it on purpose, and it is not a case of the poet
 committing an accidental slip of the pen and then letting his pen-slip
 stand as a tongue-slip of his character. He wants to make something
 clear to us by this slip of the tongue, and we may examine what it is,
 whether he wishes to indicate by this that the person in question is
 distracted or fatigued. Of course, we do not wish to exaggerate the
 importance of the fact that the poet did make use of a slip to express
 his meaning. It could nevertheless really be a psychic accident, or
 meaningful only in very rare cases, and the poet would still retain the
 right to infuse it with meaning through his setting. As to their poetic
 use, however, it would not be surprising if we should glean more
 information concerning slips of the tongue from the poet than from the
 philologist or the psychiatrist.
 
 Such an example of a slip of the tongue occurs in _Wallenstein_
 (_Piccolomini_, Act 1, Scene 5). In the previous scene, Max Piccolomini
 has most passionately sided with the Herzog, and dilated ardently on the
 blessings of peace which disclosed themselves to him during the trip on
 which he accompanied Wallenstein's daughter to the camp. He leaves his
 father and the courtier, Questenberg, plunged in deepest consternation.
 And then the fifth scene continues:
 
   Q.
 
     Alas! Alas! and stands it so?
     What friend! and do we let him go away
     In this delusion--let him go away?
     Not call him back immediately, not open
     His eyes upon the spot?
 
   OCTAVIO.
 
     (_Recovering himself out of a deep study_)
 
     He has now opened mine,
     And I see more than pleases me.
 
   Q.
 
     What is it?
 
   OCTAVIO.
 
     A curse on this journey!
 
   Q.
 
     But why so? What is it?
 
   OCTAVIO.
 
     Come, come along, friend! I must follow up
     The ominous track immediately. Mine eyes
     Are opened now, and I must use them. Come!
 
     (_Draws Q. on with him._)
 
   Q.
 
     What now? Where go you then?
 
   OCTAVIO.
 
     (_Hastily._) To _her_ herself
 
   Q.
 
     To--
 
   OCTAVIO.
 
     (_Interrupting him and correcting himself._)
 
     To the duke. Come, let us go--.
 
 Octavio meant to say, "To him, to the lord," but his tongue slips and
 through his words "_to her_" he betrays to us, at least, the fact that
 he had quite clearly recognized the influence which makes the young war
 hero dream of peace.
 
 A still more impressive example was found by O. Rank in Shakespeare. It
 occurs in the _Merchant of Venice_, in the famous scene in which the
 fortunate suitor makes his choice among the three caskets; and perhaps I
 can do no better than to read to you here Rank's short account of the
 incident:
 
 "A slip of the tongue which occurs in Shakespeare's _Merchant of
 Venice_, Act III, Scene II, is exceedingly delicate in its poetic
 motivation and technically brilliant in its handling. Like the slip in
 _Wallenstein_ quoted by Freud (_Psychopathology of Everyday Life_, 2d
 ed., p. 48), it shows that the poets well know the meaning of these
 errors and assume their comprehensibility to the audience. Portia, who
 by her father's wish has been bound to the choice of a husband by lot,
 has so far escaped all her unfavored suitors through the fortunes of
 chance. Since she has finally found in Bassanio the suitor to whom she
 is attached, she fears that he, too, will choose the wrong casket. She
 would like to tell him that even in that event he may rest assured of
 her love, but is prevented from so doing by her oath. In this inner
 conflict the poet makes her say to the welcome suitor:
 
   PORTIA:
 
     I pray you tarry; pause a day or two,
     Before you hazard; for, in choosing wrong
     I lose your company; therefore, forbear a while:
     There's something tells me, (but it is not love)
     I would not lose you: * * *
     * * * I could teach you
     How to choose right, but then I am forsworn,
     So will I never be: so may you miss me;
     But if you do, you'll make me wish a sin
     That I had been forsworn. Beshrew your eyes.
     They have o'erlook'd me, and divided me;
     One half of me is yours, the other half _yours_,
     _Mine own_, I would say: but if mine, then yours,
     And so all yours.
 
 Just that, therefore, which she meant merely to indicate faintly to him
 or really to conceal from him entirely, namely that even before the
 choice of the lot she was his and loved him, this the poet--with
 admirable psychological delicacy of feeling--makes apparent by her slip;
 and is able, by this artistic device, to quiet the unbearable
 uncertainty of the lover, as well as the equal suspense of the audience
 as to the issue of the choice."
 
 Notice, at the end, how subtly Portia reconciles the two declarations
 which are contained in the slip, how she resolves the contradiction
 between them and finally still manages to keep her promise:
 
     "* * * but if mine, then yours,
      And so all yours."
 
 Another thinker, alien to the field of medicine, accidentally disclosed
 the meaning of errors by an observation which has anticipated our
 attempts at explanation. You all know the clever satires of Lichtenberg
 (1742-1749), of which Goethe said, "Where he jokes, there lurks a
 problem concealed." Not infrequently the joke also brings to light the
 solution of the problem. Lichtenberg mentions in his jokes and satiric
 comments the remark that he always read "Agamemnon" for "angenommen,"[9]
 so intently had he read Homer. Herein is really contained the whole
 theory of misreadings.
 
 At the next session we will see whether we can agree with the poets in
 their conception of the meaning of psychological errors.
 
 
 
 
 THIRD LECTURE
 
 THE PSYCHOLOGY OF ERRORS--(_Continued_)
 
 
 At the last session we conceived the idea of considering the error, not
 in its relation to the intended act which it distorted, but by itself
 alone, and we received the impression that in isolated instances it
 seems to betray a meaning of its own. We declared that if this fact
 could be established on a larger scale, then the meaning of the error
 itself would soon come to interest us more than an investigation of the
 circumstances under which the error occurs.
 
 Let us agree once more on what we understand by the "meaning" of a
 psychic process. A psychic process is nothing more than the purpose
 which it serves and the position which it holds in a psychic sequence.
 We can also substitute the word "purpose" or "intention" for "meaning"
 in most of our investigations. Was it then only a deceptive appearance
 or a poetic exaggeration of the importance of an error which made us
 believe that we recognized a purpose in it?
 
 Let us adhere faithfully to the illustrative example of slips of the
 tongue and let us examine a larger number of such observations. We then
 find whole categories of cases in which the intention, the meaning of
 the slip itself, is clearly manifest. This is the case above all in
 those examples in which one says the opposite of what one intended. The
 president said, in his opening address, "I declare the meeting closed."
 His intention is certainly not ambiguous. The meaning and purpose of his
 slip is that he wants to terminate the meeting. One might point the
 conclusion with the remark "he said so himself." We have only taken him
 at his word. Do not interrupt me at this point by remarking that this is
 not possible, that we know he did not want to terminate the meeting but
 to open it, and that he himself, whom we have just recognized as the
 best judge of his intention, will affirm that he meant to open it. In so
 doing you forget that we have agreed to consider the error entirely by
 itself. Its relation to the intention which it distorts is to be
 discussed later. Otherwise you convict yourself of an error in logic by
 which you smoothly conjure away the problem under discussion; or "beg
 the question," as it is called in English.
 
 In other cases in which the speaker has not said the exact opposite of
 what he intended, the slip may nevertheless express an antithetical
 meaning. "I am not _inclined_ to appreciate the merits of my
 predecessor." "_Inclined_" is not the opposite of "_in a position to_,"
 but it is an open betrayal of intent in sharpest contradiction to the
 attempt to cope gracefully with the situation which the speaker is
 supposed to meet.
 
 In still other cases the slip simply adds a second meaning to the one
 intended. The sentence then sounds like a contradiction, an
 abbreviation, a condensation of several sentences. Thus the lady of
 energetic disposition, "He may eat and drink whatever _I_ please." The
 real meaning of this abbreviation is as though the lady had said, "He
 may eat and drink whatever he pleases. But what does it matter what _he_
 pleases! It is _I_ who do the pleasing." Slips of the tongue often give
 the impression of such an abbreviation. For example, the anatomy
 professor, after his lecture on the human nostril, asks whether the
 class has thoroughly understood, and after a unanimous answer in the
 affirmative, goes on to say: "I can hardly believe that is so, since the
 people who understand the human nostril can, even in a city of millions,
 be counted on _one finger_--I mean, on the fingers of one hand." The
 abbreviated sentence here also has its meaning: it expresses the idea
 that there is only one person who thoroughly understands the subject.
 
 In contrast to these groups of cases are those in which the error does
 not itself express its meaning, in which the slip of the tongue does not
 in itself convey anything intelligible; cases, therefore, which are in
 sharpest opposition to our expectations. If anyone, through a slip of
 the tongue, distorts a proper name, or puts together an unusual
 combination of syllables, then this very common occurrence seems already
 to have decided in the negative the question of whether all errors
 contain a meaning. Yet closer inspection of these examples discloses the
 fact that an understanding of such a distortion is easily possible,
 indeed, that the difference between these unintelligible cases and the
 previous comprehensible ones is not so very great.
 
 A man who was asked how his horse was, answered, "Oh, it may _stake_--it
 may take another month." When asked what he really meant to say, he
 explained that he had been thinking that it was a _sorry_ business and
 the coming together of "_take_" and "_sorry_" gave rise to "_stake_."
 (Meringer and Mayer.)
 
 Another man was telling of some incidents to which he had objected, and
 went on, "and then certain facts were _re-filed_." Upon being
 questioned, he explained that he meant to stigmatize these facts as
 "_filthy_." "_Revealed_" and "_filthy_" together produced the peculiar
 "_re-filled_." (Meringer and Mayer.)
 
 You will recall the case of the young man who wished to "_inscort_" an
 unknown lady. We took the liberty of resolving this word construction
 into the two words "_escort_" and "_insult_," and felt convinced of this
 interpretation without demanding proof of it. You see from these
 examples that even slips can be explained through the concurrence, the
 interference, of two speeches of different intentions. The difference
 arises only from the fact that in the one type of slip the intended
 speech completely crowds out the other, as happens in those slips where
 the opposite is said, while in the other type the intended speech must
 rest content with so distorting or modifying the other as to result in
 mixtures which seem more or less intelligible in themselves.
 
 We believe that we have now grasped the secret of a large number of
 slips of the tongue. If we keep this explanation in mind we will be able
 to understand still other hitherto mysterious groups. In the case of the
 distortion of names, for instance, we cannot assume that it is always an
 instance of competition between two similar, yet different names. Still,
 the second intention is not difficult to guess. The distorting of names
 occurs frequently enough not as a slip of the tongue, but as an attempt
 to give the name an ill-sounding or debasing character. It is a familiar
 device or trick of insult, which persons of culture early learned to do
 without, though they do not give it up readily. They often clothe it in
 the form of a joke, though, to be sure, the joke is of a very low order.
 Just to cite a gross and ugly example of such a distortion of a name, I
 mention the fact that the name of the President of the French Republic,
 _Poincare_, has been at times, lately, transformed into
 "_Schweinskarre_." It is therefore easy to assume that there is also
 such an intention to insult in the case of other slips of the tongue
 which result in the distortion of a name. In consequence of our
 adherence to this conception, similar explanations force themselves upon
 us, in the case of slips of the tongue whose effect is comical or
 absurd. "I call upon you to _hiccough_ the health of our chief."[10]
 Here the solemn atmosphere is unexpectedly disturbed by the introduction
 of a word that awakens an unpleasant image; and from the prototype of
 certain expressions of insult and offense we cannot but suppose that
 there is an intention striving for expression which is in sharp contrast
 to the ostensible respect, and which could be expressed about as
 follows, "You needn't believe this. I'm not really in earnest. I don't
 give a whoop for the fellow--etc." A similar trick which passes for a
 slip of the tongue is that which transforms a harmless word into one
 which is indecent and obscene.[11]
 
 We know that many persons have this tendency of intentionally making
 harmless words obscene for the sake of a certain lascivious pleasure it
 gives them. It passes as wit, and we always have to ask about a person
 of whom we hear such a thing, whether he intended it as a joke or
 whether it occurred as a slip of the tongue.
 
 Well, here we have solved the riddle of errors with relatively little
 trouble! They are not accidents, but valid psychic acts. They have their
 meaning; they arise through the collaboration--or better, the mutual
 interference--of two different intentions. I can well understand that at
 this point you want to swamp me with a deluge of questions and doubts to
 be answered and resolved before we can rejoice over this first result of
 our labors. I truly do not wish to push you to premature conclusions.
 Let us dispassionately weigh each thing in turn, one after the other.
 
 What would you like to say? Whether I think this explanation is valid
 for all cases of slips of the tongue or only for a certain number?
 Whether one can extend this same conception to all the many other
 errors--to mis-reading, slips of the pen, forgetting, picking up the
 wrong object, mislaying things, etc? In the face of the psychic nature
 of errors, what meaning is left to the factors of fatigue, excitement,
 absent-mindedness and distraction of attention? Moreover, it is easy to
 see that of the two competing meanings in an error, one is always
 public, but the other not always. But what does one do in order to guess
 the latter? And when one believes one has guessed it, how does one go
 about proving that it is not merely a probable meaning, but that it is
 the only correct meaning? Is there anything else you wish to ask? If
 not, then I will continue. I would remind you of the fact that we really
 are not much concerned with the errors themselves, but we wanted only to
 learn something of value to psychoanalysis from their study. Therefore,
 I put the question: What are these purposes or tendencies which can thus
 interfere with others, and what relation is there between the
 interfering tendencies and those interfered with? Thus our labor really
 begins anew, after the explanation of the problem.
 
 Now, is this the explanation of all tongue slips? I am very much
 inclined to think so and for this reason, that as often as one
 investigates a case of a slip of the tongue, it reduces itself to this
 type of explanation. But on the other hand, one cannot prove that a slip
 of the tongue cannot occur without this mechanism. It may be so; for our
 purposes it is a matter of theoretical indifference, since the
 conclusions which we wish to draw by way of an introduction to
 psychoanalysis remain untouched, even if only a minority of the cases of
 tongue slips come within our conception, which is surely not the case. I
 shall anticipate the next question, of whether or not we may extend to
 other types of errors what we have gleaned from slips of the tongue, and
 answer it in the affirmative. You will convince yourselves of that
 conclusion when we turn our attention to the investigation of examples
 of pen slips, picking up wrong objects, etc. I would advise you,
 however, for technical reasons, to postpone this task until we shall
 have investigated the tongue slip itself more thoroughly.
 
 The question of what meaning those factors which have been placed in the
 foreground by some authors,--namely, the factors of circulatory
 disturbances, fatigue, excitement, absent-mindedness, the theory of the
 distraction of attention--the question of what meaning those factors can
 now have for us if we accept the above described psychic mechanism of
 tongue slips, deserves a more detailed answer. You will note that we do
 not deny these factors. In fact, it is not very often that
 psychoanalysis denies anything which is asserted on the other side. As a
 rule psychoanalysis merely adds something to such assertions and
 occasionally it does happen that what had hitherto been overlooked, and
 was newly added by psychoanalysis, is just the essential thing. The
 influence on the occurrence of tongue slips of such physiological
 predispositions as result from slight illness, circulatory disturbances
 and conditions of fatigue, should be acknowledged without more ado.
 Daily personal experience can convince you of that. But how little is
 explained by such an admission! Above all, they are not necessary
 conditions of the errors. Slips of the tongue are just as possible when
 one is in perfect health and normal condition. Bodily factors,
 therefore, have only the value of acting by way of facilitation and
 encouragement to the peculiar psychic mechanism of a slip of the tongue.
 
 To illustrate this relationship, I once used a simile which I will now
 repeat because I know of no better one as substitute. Let us suppose
 that some dark night I go past a lonely spot and am there assaulted by a
 rascal who takes my watch and purse; and then, since I did not see the
 face of the robber clearly, I make my complaint at the nearest police
 station in the following words: "Loneliness and darkness have just
 robbed me of my valuables." The police commissioner could then say to
 me: "You seem to hold an unjustifiably extreme mechanistic conception.
 Let us rather state the case as follows: Under cover of darkness, and
 favored by the loneliness, an unknown robber seized your valuables. The
 essential task in your case seems to me to be to discover the robber.
 Perhaps we can then take his booty from him again."
 
 Such psycho-physiological moments as excitement, absent-mindedness and
 distracted attention, are obviously of small assistance to us for the
 purpose of explanation. They are mere phrases, screens behind which we
 will not be deterred from looking. The question is rather what in such
 cases has caused the excitement, the particular diversion of attention.
 The influence of syllable sounds, word resemblances and the customary
 associations which words arouse should also be recognized as having
 significance. They facilitate the tongue slip by pointing the path which
 it can take. But if I have a path before me, does that fact as a matter
 of course determine that I will follow it? After all, I must have a
 stimulus to make me decide for it, and, in addition, a force which
 carries me forward on this path. These sound and word relationships
 therefore serve also only to facilitate the tongue slip, just as the
 bodily dispositions facilitate them; they cannot give the explanation
 for the word itself. Just consider, for example, the fact that in an
 enormously large number of cases, my lecturing is not disturbed by the
 fact that the words which I use recall others by their sound
 resemblance, that they are intimately associated with their opposites,
 or arouse common associations. We might add here the observation of the
 philosopher Wundt, that slips of the tongue occur when, in consequence
 of bodily fatigue, the tendency to association gains the upper hand over
 the intended speech. This would sound very plausible if it were not
 contradicted by experiences which proved that from one series of cases
 of tongue-slips bodily stimuli were absent, and from another, the
 association stimuli were absent.
 
 However, your next question is one of particular interest to me, namely:
 in what way can one establish the existence of the two mutually
 antagonistic tendencies? You probably do not suspect how significant
 this question is. It is true, is it not, that one of the two tendencies,
 the tendency which suffers the interference, is always unmistakable? The
 person who commits the error is aware of it and acknowledges it. It is
 the other tendency, what we call the interfering tendency, which causes
 doubt and hesitation. Now we have already learned, and you have surely
 not forgotten, that these tendencies are, in a series of cases, equally
 plain. That is indicated by the effect of the slip, if only we have the
 courage to let this effect be valid in itself. The president who said
 the opposite of what he meant to say made it clear that he wanted to
 open the meeting, but equally clear that he would also have liked to
 terminate it. Here the meaning is so plain that there is nothing left to
 be interpreted. But the other cases in which the interfering tendency
 merely distorts the original, without bringing itself to full
 expression--how can one guess the interfering meaning from the
 distortion?
 
 By a very sure and simple method, in the first series of cases, namely,
 by the same method by which one establishes the existence of the
 meaning interfered with. The latter is immediately supplied by the
 speaker, who instantly adds the originally intended expression. "It may
 _stake_--no, it may _take_ another month." Now we likewise ask him to
 express the interfering meaning; we ask him: "Now, why did you first say
 _stake_?" He answers, "I meant to say--'This is a _sorry_ business.'"
 And in the other case of the tongue slip--_re-filed_--the subject also
 affirms that he meant to say "It is a _fil-thy_ business," but then
 moderated his expression and turned it into something else. Thus the
 discovery of the interfering meaning was here as successful as the
 discovery of the one interfered with. Nor did I unintentionally select
 as examples cases which were neither related nor explained by me or by a
 supporter of my theories. Yet a certain investigation was necessary in
 both cases in order to obtain the solution. One had to ask the speaker
 why he made this slip, what he had to say about it. Otherwise he might
 perhaps have passed it by without seeking to explain it. When
 questioned, however, he furnished the explanation by means of the first
 thing that came to his mind. And now you see, ladies and gentlemen, that
 this slight investigation and its consequence are already a
 psychoanalysis, and the prototype of every psychoanalytic investigation
 which we shall conduct more extensively at a later time.
 
 Now, am I unduly suspicious if I suspect that at the same moment in
 which psychoanalysis emerges before you, your resistance to
 psychoanalysis also raises its head? Are you not anxious to raise the
 objection that the information given by the subject we questioned, and
 who committed the slip, is not proof sufficient? He naturally has the
 desire, you say, to meet the challenge, to explain the slip, and hence
 he says the first thing he can think of if it seems relevant. But that,
 you say, is no proof that this is really the way the slip happened. It
 might be so, but it might just as well be otherwise, you say. Something
 else might have occurred to him which might have fitted the case just as
 well and better.
 
 It is remarkable how little respect, at bottom, you have for a psychic
 fact! Imagine that someone has decided to undertake the chemical
 analysis of a certain substance, and has secured a sample of the
 substance, of a certain weight--so and so many milligrams. From this
 weighed sample certain definite conclusions can be drawn. Do you think
 it would ever occur to a chemist to discredit these conclusions by the
 argument that the isolated substance might have had some other weight?
 Everyone yields to the fact that it was just this weight and no other,
 and confidently builds his further conclusions upon that fact. But when
 you are confronted by the psychic fact that the subject, when
 questioned, had a certain idea, you will not accept that as valid, but
 say some other idea might just as easily have occurred to him! The
 trouble is that you believe in the illusion of psychic freedom and will
 not give it up. I regret that on this point I find myself in complete
 opposition to your views.
 
 Now you will relinquish this point only to take up your resistance at
 another place. You will continue, "We understand that it is the peculiar
 technique of psychoanalysis that the solution of its problems is
 discovered by the analyzed subject himself. Let us take another example,
 that in which the speaker calls upon the assembly 'to _hiccough_ the
 health of their chief.' The interfering idea in this case, you say, is
 the insult. It is that which is the antagonist of the expression of
 conferring an honor. But that is mere interpretation on your part, based
 on observations extraneous to the slip. If in this case you question the
 originator of the slip, he will not affirm that he intended an insult,
 on the contrary, he will deny it energetically. Why do you not give up
 your unverifiable interpretation in the face of this plain objection?"
 
 Yes, this time you struck a hard problem. I can imagine the unknown
 speaker. He is probably an assistant to the guest of honor, perhaps
 already a minor official, a young man with the brightest prospects. I
 will press him as to whether he did not after all feel conscious of
 something which may have worked in opposition to the demand that he do
 honor to the chief. What a fine success I'll have! He becomes impatient
 and suddenly bursts out on me, "Look here, you'd better stop this
 cross-examination, or I'll get unpleasant. Why, you'll spoil my whole
 career with your suspicions. I simply said '_auf_-gestossen' instead of
 '_an_-gestossen,' because I'd already said '_auf_' twice in the same
 sentence. It's the thing that Meringer calls a perservation, and there's
 no other meaning that you can twist out of it. Do you understand me?
 That's all." H'm, this is a surprising reaction, a really energetic
 denial. I see that there is nothing more to be obtained from the young
 man, but I also remark to myself that he betrays a strong personal
 interest in having his slip mean nothing. Perhaps you, too, agree that
 it is not right for him immediately to become so rude over a purely
 theoretical investigation, but, you will conclude, he really must know
 what he did and did not mean to say.
 
 Really? Perhaps that's open to question nevertheless.
 
 But now you think you have me. "So that is your technique," I hear you
 say. "When the person who has committed a slip gives an explanation
 which fits your theory, then you declare him the final authority on the
 subject. 'He says so himself!' But if what he says does not fit into
 your scheme, then you suddenly assert that what he says does not count,
 that one need not believe him."
 
 Yet that is certainly true. I can give you a similar case in which the
 procedure is apparently just as monstrous. When a defendant confesses to
 a deed, the judge believes his confession. But if he denies it, the
 judge does not believe him. Were it otherwise, there would be no way to
 administer the law, and despite occasional miscarriages you must
 acknowledge the value of this system.
 
 Well, are you then the judge, and is the person who committed the slip a
 defendant before you? Is a slip of the tongue a crime?
 
 Perhaps we need not even decline this comparison. But just see to what
 far-reaching differences we have come by penetrating somewhat into the
 seemingly harmless problems of the psychology of errors, differences
 which at this stage we do not at all know how to reconcile. I offer you
 a preliminary compromise on the basis of the analogy of the judge and
 the defendant. You will grant me that the meaning of an error admits of
 no doubt when the subject under analysis acknowledges it himself. I in
 turn will admit that a direct proof for the suspected meaning cannot be
 obtained if the subject denies us the information; and, of course, that
 is also the case when the subject is not present to give us the
 information. We are, then, as in the case of the legal procedure,
 dependent on circumstances which make a decision at one time seem more,
 and at another time, less probable to us. At law, one has to declare a
 defendant guilty on circumstantial evidence for practical reasons. We
 see no such necessity; but neither are we forced to forego the use of
 these circumstances. It would be a mistake to believe that a science
 consists of nothing but conclusively proved theorems, and any such
 demand would be unjust. Only a person with a mania for authority, a
 person who must replace his religious catechism with some other, even
 though it be scientific, would make such a demand. Science has but few
 apodeictic precepts in its catechism; it consists chiefly of assertions
 which it has developed to certain degrees of probability. It is actually
 a symptom of scientific thinking if one is content with these
 approximations of certainty and is able to carry on constructive work
 despite the lack of the final confirmation.
 
 But where do we get the facts for our interpretations, the circumstances
 for our proof, when the further remarks of the subject under analysis do
 not themselves elucidate the meaning of the error? From many sources.
 First of all, from the analogy with phenomena extraneous to the
 psychology of errors; as, for example, when we assert that the
 distortion of a name as a slip of the tongue has the same insulting
 significance as an intentional name distortion. We get them also from
 the psychic situation in which the error occurred, from our knowledge of
 the character of the person who committed the error, from the
 impressions which that person received before making the error, and to
 which he may possibly have reacted with this error. As a rule, what
 happens is that we find the meaning of the error according to general
 principles. It is then only a conjecture, a suggestion as to what the
 meaning may be, and we then obtain our proof from examination of the
 psychic situation. Sometimes, too, it happens that we have to wait for
 subsequent developments, which have announced themselves, as it were,
 through the error, in order to find our conjecture verified.
 
 I cannot easily give you proof of this if I have to limit myself to the
 field of tongue slips, although even here there are a few good examples.
 The young man who wished to "_inscort_" the lady is certainly shy; the
 lady whose husband may eat and drink whatever _she_ wants I know to be
 one of those energetic women who know how to rule in the home. Or take
 the following case: At a general meeting of the Concordia Club, a young
 member delivers a vehement speech in opposition, in the course of which
 he addresses the officers of the society as: "Fellow committee
 lenders." We will conjecture that some conflicting idea militated in him
 against his opposition, an idea which was in some way based on a
 connection with money lending. As a matter of fact, we learn from our
 informant that the speaker was in constant money difficulties, and had
 attempted to raise a loan. As a conflicting idea, therefore, we may
 safely interpolate the idea, "Be more moderate in your opposition, these
 are the same people who are to grant you the loan."
 
 But I can give you a wide selection of such circumstantial proof if I
 delve into the wide field of other kinds of error.
 
 If anyone forgets an otherwise familiar proper name, or has difficulty
 in retaining it in his memory despite all efforts, then the conclusion
 lies close at hand, that he has something against the bearer of this
 name and does not like to think of him. Consider in this connection the
 following revelation of the psychic situation in which this error
 occurs:
 
 "A Mr. Y. fell in love, without reciprocation, with a lady who soon
 after married a Mr. X. In spite of the fact that Mr. Y. has known Mr. X.
 a long time, and even has business relations with him, he forgets his
 name over and over again, so that he found it necessary on several
 occasions to ask other people the man's name when he wanted to write to
 Mr. X."[12]
 
 Mr. Y. obviously does not want to have his fortunate rival in mind under
 any condition. "Let him never be thought of."
 
 Another example: A lady makes inquiries at her doctor's concerning a
 mutual acquaintance, but speaks of her by her maiden name. She has
 forgotten her married name. She admits that she was much displeased by
 the marriage, and could not stand this friend's husband.[13]
 
 Later we shall have much to say in other relations about the matter of
 forgetting names. At present we are predominantly interested in the
 psychic situation in which the lapse of memory occurs.
 
 The forgetting of projects can quite commonly be traced to an
 antagonistic current which does not wish to carry out the project. We
 psychoanalysts are not alone in holding this view, but this is the
 general conception to which all persons subscribe the daily affairs, and
 which they first deny in theory. The patron who makes apologies to his
 protege, saying that he has forgotten his requests, has not squared
 himself with his protege. The protege immediately thinks: "There's
 nothing to that; he did promise but he really doesn't want to do it."
 Hence, daily life also proscribes forgetting, in certain connections,
 and the difference between the popular and the psychoanalytic conception
 of these errors appears to be removed. Imagine a housekeeper who
 receives her guest with the words: "What, you come to-day? Why, I had
 totally forgotten that I had invited you for to-day"; or the young man
 who might tell his sweetheart that he had forgotten to keep the
 rendezvous which they planned. He is sure not to admit it, it were
 better for him to invent the most improbable excuses on the spur of the
 moment, hindrances which prevented him from coming at that time, and
 which made it impossible for him to communicate the situation to her. We
 all know that in military matters the excuse of having forgotten
 something is useless, that it protects one from no punishment; and we
 must consider this attitude justified. Here we suddenly find everyone
 agreed that a certain error is significant, and everyone agrees what its
 meaning is. Why are they not consistent enough to extend this insight to
 the other errors, and fully to acknowledge them? Of course, there is
 also an answer to this.
 
 If the meaning of this forgetting of projects leaves room for so little
 doubt among laymen, you will be less surprised to find that poets make
 use of these errors in the same sense. Those of you who have seen or
 read Shaw's _Caesar and Cleopatra_ will recall that Caesar, when
 departing in the last scene, is pursued by the idea that there was
 something more he intended to do, but that he had forgotten it. Finally
 he discovers what it is: to take leave of Cleopatra. This small device
 of the author is meant to ascribe to the great Caesar a superiority
 which he did not possess, and to which he did not at all aspire. You can
 learn from historical sources that Caesar had Cleopatra follow him to
 Rome, and that she was staying there with her little Caesarion when
 Caesar was murdered, whereupon she fled the city.
 
 The cases of forgetting projects are as a rule so clear that they are of
 little use for our purpose, i.e., discovering in the psychic situation
 circumstantial evidence of the meaning of the error. Let us, therefore,
 turn to a particularly ambiguous and untransparent error, that of losing
 and mislaying objects. That we ourselves should have a purpose in losing
 an object, an accident frequently so painful, will certainly seem
 incredible to you. But there are many instances similar to the
 following: A young man loses the pencil which he had liked very much.
 The day before he had received a letter from his brother-in-law, which
 concluded with the words, "For the present I have neither the
 inclination nor the time to be a party to your frivolity and your
 idleness."[14] It so happened that the pencil had been a present from
 this brother-in-law. Without this coincidence we could not, of course,
 assert that the loss involved any intention to get rid of the gift.
 Similar cases are numerous. Persons lose objects when they have fallen
 out with the donors, and no longer wish to be reminded of them. Or
 again, objects may be lost if one no longer likes the things themselves,
 and wants to supply oneself with a pretext for substituting other and
 better things in their stead. Letting a thing fall and break naturally
 shows the same intention toward that object. Can one consider it
 accidental when a school child just before his birthday loses, ruins or
 breaks his belongings, for example his school bag or his watch?
 
 He who has frequently experienced the annoyance of not being able to
 find something which he has himself put away, will also be unwilling to
 believe there was any intent behind the loss. And yet the examples are
 not at all rare in which the attendant circumstances of the mislaying
 point to a tendency temporarily or permanently to get rid of the object.
 Perhaps the most beautiful example of this sort is the following: A
 young man tells me: "A few years ago a misunderstanding arose in my
 married life. I felt my wife was too cool and even though I willingly
 acknowledged her excellent qualities, we lived without any tenderness
 between us. One day she brought me a book which she had thought might
 interest me. I thanked her for this attention, promised to read the
 book, put it in a handy place, and couldn't find it again. Several
 months passed thus, during which I occasionally remembered this mislaid
 book and tried in vain to find it. About half a year later my beloved
 mother, who lived at a distance from us, fell ill. My wife left the
 house in order to nurse her mother-in-law. The condition of the patient
 became serious, and gave my wife an opportunity of showing her best
 side. One evening I came home filled with enthusiasm and gratitude
 toward my wife. I approached my writing desk, opened a certain drawer
 with no definite intention but as if with somnambulistic certainty, and
 the first thing I found is the book so long mislaid."
 
 With the cessation of the motive, the inability to find the mislaid
 object also came to an end.
 
 Ladies and gentlemen, I could increase this collection of examples
 indefinitely. But I do not wish to do so here. In my _Psychopathology of
 Everyday Life_ (first published in 1901), you will find only too many
 instances for the study of errors.[15]
 
 All these examples demonstrate the same thing repeatedly: namely, they
 make it seem probable that errors have a meaning, and show how one may
 guess or establish that meaning from the attendant circumstances. I
 limit myself to-day because we have confined ourselves to the purpose of
 profiting in the preparation for psychoanalysis from the study of these
 phenomena. I must, however, still go into two additional groups of
 observations, into the accumulated and combined errors and into the
 confirmation of our interpretations by means of subsequent developments.
 
 The accumulated and combined errors are surely the fine flower of their
 species. If we were interested only in proving that errors may have a
 meaning, we would limit ourselves to the accumulated and combined errors
 in the first place, for here the meaning is unmistakable, even to the
 dullest intelligence, and can force conviction upon the most critical
 judgment. The accumulation of manifestations betrays a stubbornness such
 as could never come about by accident, but which fits closely the idea
 of design. Finally, the interchange of certain kinds of error with each
 other shows us what is the important and essential element of the error,
 not its form or the means of which it avails itself, but the purpose
 which it serves and which is to be achieved by the most various paths.
 Thus I will give you a case of repeated forgetting. Jones recounts that
 he once allowed a letter to lie on his writing desk several days for
 reasons quite unknown. Finally he made up his mind to mail it; but it
 was returned from the dead letter office, for he had forgotten to
 address it. After he had addressed it he took it to the post office, but
 this time without a stamp. At this point he finally had to admit to
 himself his aversion against sending the letter at all.
 
 In another case a mistake is combined with mislaying an object. A lady
 is traveling to Rome with her brother-in-law, a famous artist. The
 visitor is much feted by the Germans living in Rome, and receives as a
 gift, among other things, a gold medal of ancient origin. The lady is
 vexed by the fact that her brother-in-law does not sufficiently
 appreciate the beautiful object. After she leaves her sister and reaches
 her home, she discovers when unpacking that she has brought with
 her--how, she does not know--the medal. She immediately informs her
 brother-in-law of this fact by letter, and gives him notice that she
 will send the medal back to Rome the next day. But on the following day,
 the medal has been so cleverly mislaid that it can neither be found nor
 sent, and at this point it begins to dawn upon the lady that her
 "absent-mindedness" means, namely, that she wants to keep the object for
 herself.[16]
 
 I have already given you an example of a combination of forgetfulness
 and error in which someone first forgot a rendezvous and then, with the
 firm intention of not forgetting it a second time, appeared at the wrong
 hour. A quite analogous case was told me from his own experience, by a
 friend who pursues literary interests in addition to his scientific
 ones. He said: "A few years ago I accepted the election to the board of
 a certain literary society, because I hoped that the society could at
 some time be of use to me in helping obtain the production of my drama,
 and, despite my lack of interest, I took part in the meetings every
 Friday. A few months ago I received the assurance of a production in the
 theatre in F., and since that time it happens regularly that I forget
 the meetings of that society. When I read your article on these things,
 I was ashamed of my forgetfulness, reproached myself with the meanness
 of staying away now that I no longer need these people and determined to
 be sure not to forget next Friday. I kept reminding myself of this
 resolution until I carried it out and stood before the door of the
 meeting room. To my astonishment, it was closed, the meeting was already
 over; for I had mistaken the day. It was already Saturday."
 
 It would be tempting enough to collect similar observations, but I will
 go no further; I will let you glance instead upon those cases in which
 our interpretation has to wait for its proof upon future developments.
 
 The chief condition of these cases is conceivably that the existing
 psychic situation is unknown to us or inaccessible to our inquiries. At
 that time our interpretation has only the value of a conjecture to which
 we ourselves do not wish to grant too much weight. Later, however,
 something happens which shows us how justified was our interpretation
 even at that time. I was once the guest of a young married couple and
 heard the young wife laughingly tell of a recent experience, of how on
 the day after her return from her honeymoon she had hunted up her
 unmarried sister again in order to go shopping with her, as in former
 times, while her husband went to his business. Suddenly she noticed a
 gentleman on the other side of the street, and she nudged her sister,
 saying, "Why look, there goes Mr. K." She had forgotten that this
 gentleman was her husband of some weeks' standing. I shuddered at this
 tale but did not dare to draw the inference. The little anecdote did not
 occur to me again until a year later, after this marriage had come to a
 most unhappy end.
 
 A. Maeder tells of a lady who, the day before her wedding, forgot to try
 on her wedding dress and to the despair of the dressmaker only
 remembered it later in the evening. He adds in connection with this
 forgetfulness the fact that she divorced her husband soon after. I know
 a lady now divorced from her husband, who, in managing her fortune,
 frequently signed documents with her maiden name, and this many years
 before she really resumed it. I know of other women who lost their
 wedding rings on their honeymoon and also know that the course of the
 marriage gave a meaning to this accident. And now one more striking
 example with a better termination. It is said that the marriage of a
 famous German chemist did not take place because he forgot the hour of
 the wedding, and instead of going to the church went to the laboratory.
 He was wise enough to rest satisfied with this one attempt, and died
 unmarried at a ripe old age.
 
 Perhaps the idea has also come to you that in these cases mistakes have
 taken the place of the _Omina_ or omens of the ancients. Some of the
 _Omina_ really were nothing more than mistakes; for example, when a
 person stumbled or fell down. Others, to be sure, bore the
 characteristics of objective occurrences rather than that of subjective
 acts. But you would not believe how difficult it sometimes is to decide
 in a specific instance whether the act belongs to the one or the other
 group. It so frequently knows how to masquerade as a passive experience.
 
 Everyone of us who can look back over a longer or shorter life
 experience will probably say that he might have spared himself many
 disappointments and painful surprises if he had found the courage and
 decision to interpret as omens the little mistakes which he made in his
 intercourse with people, and to consider them as indications of the
 intentions which were still being kept secret. As a rule, one does not
 dare do this. One would feel as though he were again becoming
 superstitious via a detour through science. But not all omens come true,
 and you will understand from our theories that they need not all come
 true.
 
 
 
 
 FOURTH LECTURE
 
 THE PSYCHOLOGY OF ERRORS--(_Conclusion_)
 
 
 We may certainly put it down as the conclusion of our labors up to this
 point that errors have a meaning, and we may make this conclusion the
 basis of our further investigations. Let me stress the fact once more
 that we do not assert--and for our purposes need not assert--that every
 single mistake which occurs is meaningful, although I consider that
 probable. It will suffice us if we prove the presence of such a meaning
 with relative frequency in the various forms of errors. These various
 forms, by the way, behave differently in this respect. In the cases of
 tongue slips, pen slips, etc., the occurrences may take place on a
 purely physiological basis. In the group based on forgetfulness
 (forgetting names or projects, mislaying objects, etc.) I cannot believe
 in such a basis. There does very probably exist a type of case in which
 the loss of objects should be recognized as unintentional. Of the
 mistakes which occur in daily life, only a certain portion can in any
 way be brought within our conception. You must keep this limitation in
 mind when we start henceforth from the assumption that mistakes are
 psychic acts and arise through the mutual interference of two
 intentions.
 
 Herein we have the first result of psychoanalysis. Psychology hitherto
 knew nothing of the occurrence of such interferences and the possibility
 that they might have such manifestations as a consequence. We have
 widened the province of the world of psychic phenomena quite
 considerably, and have brought into the province of psychology phenomena
 which formerly were not attributed to it.
 
 Let us tarry a moment longer over the assertion that errors are psychic
 acts. Does such an assertion contain more than the former declaration
 that they have a meaning? I do not believe so. On the contrary, it is
 rather more indefinite and open to greater misunderstanding. Everything
 which can be observed about the psychic life will on occasion be
 designated as a psychic phenomenon. But it will depend on whether the
 specific psychic manifestations resulted directly from bodily, organic,
 material influences, in which case their investigation will not fall
 within the province of psychology, or whether it was more immediately
 the result of other psychic occurrences back of which, somewhere, the
 series of organic influences then begins. We have the latter condition
 of affairs before us when we designate a phenomenon as a psychic
 manifestation, and for that reason it is more expedient to put our
 assertion in this form: the phenomena are meaningful; they have a
 meaning. By "meaning" we understand significance, purpose, tendency and
 position in a sequence of psychic relations.
 
 There are a number of other occurrences which are very closely related
 to errors, but which this particular name no longer fits. We call them
 _accidental and symptomatic_ acts. They also have the appearance of
 being unmotivated, the appearance of insignificance and unimportance,
 but in addition, and more plainly, of superfluity. They are
 differentiated from errors by the absence of another intention with
 which they collide and by which they are disturbed. On the other side
 they pass over without a definite boundary line into the gestures and
 movements which we count among expressions of the emotions. Among these
 accidental acts belong all those apparently playful, apparently
 purposeless performances in connection with our clothing, parts of our
 body, objects within reach, as well as the omission of such
 performances, and the melodies which we hum to ourselves. I venture the
 assertion that all these phenomena are meaningful and capable of
 interpretation in the same way as are the errors, that they are small
 manifestations of other more important psychic processes, valid psychic
 acts. But I do not intend to linger over this new enlargement of the
 province of psychic phenomena, but rather to return to the topic of
 errors, in the consideration of which the important psychoanalytic
 inquiries can be worked out with far greater clarity.
 
 The most interesting questions which we formulated while considering
 errors, and which we have not yet answered, are, I presume, the
 following: We said that the errors are the result of the mutual
 interference of two different intentions, of which the one can be called
 the intention interfered with, and the other the interfering intention.
 The intentions interfered with give rise to no further questions, but
 concerning the others we want to know, firstly, what kind of intentions
 are these which arise as disturbers of others, and secondly, in what
 proportions are the interfering related to the interfered?
 
 Will you permit me again to take the slip of the tongue as
 representative of the whole species and allow me to answer the second
 question before the first?
 
 The interfering intention in the tongue slip may stand in a significant
 relation to the intention interfered with, and then the former contains
 a contradiction of the latter, correcting or supplementing it. Or, to
 take a less intelligible and more interesting case, the interfering
 intention has nothing to do with the intention interfered with.
 
 Proofs for the first of the two relations we can find without trouble in
 the examples which we already know and in others similar to those. In
 almost all cases of tongue slips where one says the contrary of what he
 intended, where the interfering intention expresses the antithesis of
 the intention interfered with, the error is the presentation of the
 conflict between two irreconcilable strivings. "I declare the meeting
 opened, but would rather have it closed," is the meaning of the
 president's slip. A political paper which has been accused of
 corruptibility, defends itself in an article meant to reach a climax in
 the words: "Our readers will testify that we have always interceded for
 the good of all in the most _disinterested_ manner." But the editor who
 had been entrusted with the composition of the defence, wrote, "in the
 most _interested_ manner." That is, he thinks "To be sure, I have to
 write this way, but I know better." A representative of the people who
 urges that the Kaiser should be told the truth "_rueckhaltlos_," hears an
 inner voice which is frightened by his boldness, and which through a
 slip changes the "_rueckhaltlos_" into "_rueckgratlos_."[17]
 
 In the examples familiar to you, which give the impression of
 contraction and abbreviation, it is a question of a correction, an
 addition or continuation by which the second tendency manifests itself
 together with the first. "Things were revealed, but better say it right
 out, they were _filthy_, therefore, things were _refiled_."[18] "The
 people who understand this topic can be counted on the _fingers of one
 hand_, but no, there is really only _one_ who understands it; therefore,
 counted _on one finger_." Or, "My husband may eat and drink whatever
 _he_ wants. But you know very well that _I_ don't permit him to want
 anything; therefore he may eat and drink whatever _I want_." In all
 these cases, therefore, the slip arises from the content of the
 intention itself, or is connected with it.
 
 The other type of relationship between the two interfering intentions
 seems strange. If the interfering intention has nothing to do with the
 content of the one interfered with, where then does it come from and how
 does it happen to make itself manifest as interference just at that
 point? The observation which alone can furnish an answer here,
 recognizes the fact that the interference originates in a thought
 process which has just previously occupied the person in question and
 which then has that after-effect, irrespective of whether it has already
 found expression in speech or not. It is therefore really to be
 designated as perseveration, but not necessarily as the perseveration of
 spoken words. Here also there is no lack of an associative connection
 between the interfering and the interfered with, yet it is not given in
 the content, but artificially restored, often by means of forced
 connecting links.
 
 Here is a simple example of this, which I myself observed. In our
 beautiful Dolomites, I meet two Viennese ladies who are gotten up as
 tourists. I accompany them a short distance and we discuss the
 pleasures, but also the difficulties of the tourist's mode of life. One
 lady admits this way of spending the day entails much discomfort. "It is
 true," she says, "that it is not at all pleasant, when one has tramped
 all day in the sun, and waist and shirt are soaked through." At this
 point in this sentence she suddenly has to overcome a slight hesitancy.
 Then she continues: "But then, when one gets _nach Hose_, and can
 change...."[19] We did not analyze this slip, but I am sure you can
 easily understand it. The lady wanted to make the enumeration more
 complete and to say, "Waist, shirt and drawers." From motives of
 propriety, the mention of the drawers (Hose) was suppressed, but in the
 next sentence of quite independent content the unuttered word came to
 light as a distortion of the similar word, house (Hause).
 
 Now we can turn at last to the long delayed main question, namely, what
 kind of intentions are these which get themselves expressed in an
 unusual way as interferences of others, intentions within whose great
 variety we wish nevertheless to find what is common to them all! If we
 examine a series of them to this end, we will soon find that they divide
 themselves into three groups. In the first group belong the cases in
 which the interfering tendency is known to the speaker, and which,
 moreover, was felt by him before the slip. Thus, in the case of the slip
 "_refilled_," the speaker not only admits that he agreed with the
 judgment "_filthy_," on the incidents in question, but also that he had
 the intention (which he later abandoned) of giving it verbal expression.
 A second group is made up of those cases in which the interfering
 tendency is immediately recognized by the subject as his own, but in
 which he is ignorant of the fact that the interfering tendency was
 active in him just before the slip. He therefore accepts our
 interpretation, yet remains to a certain extent surprised by it.
 Examples of this situation can perhaps more easily be found among errors
 other than slips of the tongue. In a third group the interpretation of
 the interfering intention is energetically denied by the speaker. He not
 only denies that the interfering tendency was active in him before the
 slip, but he wants to assert that it was at all times completely alien
 to him. Will you recall the example of "hiccough," and the absolutely
 impolite disavowal which I received at the hands of this speaker by my
 disclosure of the interfering intention. You know that so far we have no
 unity in our conception of these cases. I pay no attention to the
 toastmaster's disavowal and hold fast to my interpretation; while you, I
 am sure, are yet under the influence of his repudiation and are
 considering whether one ought not to forego the interpretation of such
 slips, and let them pass as purely physiological acts, incapable of
 further analysis. I can imagine what it is that frightens you off. My
 interpretation draws the conclusion that intentions of which he himself
 knows nothing may manifest themselves in a speaker, and that I can
 deduce them from the circumstances. You hesitate before so novel a
 conclusion and one so full of consequences. I understand that, and
 sympathize with you to that extent. But let us make one thing clear: if
 you want consistently to carry through the conception of errors which
 you have derived from so many examples, you must decide to accept the
 above conclusion, even though it be unpleasant. If you cannot do so, you
 must give up that understanding of errors which you have so recently
 won.
 
 Let us tarry a while over the point which unites the three groups, which
 is common to the three mechanisms of tongue slips. Fortunately, that is
 unmistakable. In the first two groups the interfering tendency is
 recognized by the speaker; in the first there is the additional fact
 that it showed itself immediately before the slip. In both cases,
 however, _it was suppressed. The speaker had made up his mind not to
 convert the interfering tendency into speech and then the slip of the
 tongue occurred; that is to say, the suppressed tendency obtains
 expression against the speaker's will, in that it changes the expression
 of the intention which he permits, mixes itself with it or actually puts
 itself in its place._ This is, then, the mechanism of the tongue slip.
 
 From my point of view, I can also best harmonize the processes of the
 third group with the mechanism here described. I need only assume that
 these three groups are differentiated by the different degrees of
 effectiveness attending the suppression of an intention. In the first
 group, the intention is present and makes itself perceptible before the
 utterance of the speaker; not until then does it suffer the suppression
 for which it indemnifies itself in the slip. In the second group the
 suppression extends farther. The intention is no longer perceptible
 before the subject speaks. It is remarkable that the interfering
 intention is in no way deterred by this from taking part in the
 causation of the slip. Through this fact, however, the explanation of
 the procedure in the third group is simplified for us. I shall be so
 bold as to assume that in the error a tendency can manifest itself which
 has been suppressed for even a longer time, perhaps a very long time,
 which does not become perceptible and which, therefore, cannot be
 directly denied by the speaker. But leave the problem of the third
 group; from the observation of the other cases, you most draw the
 conclusion that _the suppression of the existing intention to say
 something is the indispensable condition of the occurrence of a slip_.
 
 We may now claim that we have made further progress in understanding
 errors. We know not only that they are psychic acts, in which we can
 recognize meaning and purpose, and that they arise through the mutual
 interference of two different intentions, but, in addition, we know that
 one of these intentions must have undergone a certain suppression in
 order to be able to manifest itself through interference with the other.
 The interfering intention must itself first be interfered with before it
 can become interfering. Naturally, a complete explanation of the
 phenomena which we call errors is not attained to by this. We
 immediately see further questions arising, and suspect in general that
 there will be more occasions for new questions as we progress further.
 We might, for example, ask why the matter does not proceed much more
 simply. If there is an existing purpose to suppress a certain tendency
 instead of giving it expression, then this suppression should be so
 successful that nothing at all of the latter comes to light; or it could
 even fail, so that the suppressed tendency attains to full expression.
 But errors are compromise formations. They mean some success and some
 failure for each of the two purposes. The endangered intention is
 neither completely suppressed nor does it, without regard to individual
 cases, come through wholly intact. We can imagine that special
 conditions must be existent for the occurrence of such interference or
 compromise formations, but then we cannot even conjecture what sort they
 may be. Nor do I believe that we can uncover these unknown circumstances
 through further penetration into the study of errors. Rather will it be
 necessary thoroughly to examine other obscure fields of psychic life.
 Only the analogies which we there encounter can give us the courage to
 draw those assumptions which are requisite to a more fundamental
 elucidation of errors. And one thing more. Even working with small
 signs, as we have constantly been in the habit of doing in this
 province, brings its dangers with it. There is a mental disease,
 combined paranoia, in which the utilization of such small signs is
 practiced without restriction and I naturally would not wish to give it
 as my opinion that these conclusions, built up on this basis, are
 correct throughout. We can be protected from such dangers only by the
 broad basis of our observations, by the repetition of similar
 impressions from the most varied fields of psychic life.
 
 We will therefore leave the analysis of errors here. But may I remind
 you of one thing more: keep in mind, as a prototype, the manner in which
 we have treated these phenomena. You can see from these examples what
 the purposes of our psychology are. We do not wish merely to describe
 the phenomena and to classify them, but to comprehend them as signs of a
 play of forces in the psychic, as expressions of tendencies striving to
 an end, tendencies which work together or against one another. We seek a
 dynamic conception of psychic phenomena. The perceived phenomena must,
 in our conception, give way to those strivings whose existence is only
 assumed.
 
 Hence we will not go deeper into the problem of errors, but we can still
 undertake an expedition through the length of this field, in which we
 will reencounter things familiar to us, and will come upon the tracks of
 some that are new. In so doing we will keep to the division which we
 made in the beginning of our study, of the three groups of tongue slips,
 with the related forms of pen slips, misreadings, mishearings,
 forgetfulness with its subdivisions according to the forgotten object
 (proper names, foreign words, projects, impressions), and the other
 faults of mistaking, mislaying and losing objects. Errors, in so far as
 they come into our consideration, are grouped in part with
 forgetfulness, in part with mistakes.
 
 We have already spoken in such detail of tongue slips, and yet there are
 still several points to be added. Linked with tongue slips are smaller
 effective phenomena which are not entirely without interest. No one
 likes to make a slip of the tongue; often one fails to hear his own
 slip, though never that of another. Tongue slips are in a certain sense
 infectious; it is not at all easy to discuss tongue slips without
 falling into slips of the tongue oneself. The most trifling forms of
 tongue slips are just the ones which have no particular illumination to
 throw on the hidden psychic processes, but are nevertheless not
 difficult to penetrate in their motivation. If, for example, anyone
 pronounces a long vowel as a short, in consequence of an interference no
 matter how motivated, he will for that reason soon after lengthen a
 short vowel and commit a new slip in compensation for the earlier one.
 The same thing occurs when one has pronounced a double vowel unclearly
 and hastily; for example, an "eu" or an "oi" as "ei." The speaker tries
 to correct it by changing a subsequent "ei" or "eu" to "oi." In this
 conduct the determining factor seems to be a certain consideration for
 the hearer, who is not to think that it is immaterial to the speaker how
 he treats his mother tongue. The second, compensating distortion
 actually has the purpose of making the hearer conscious of the first,
 and of assuring him that it also did not escape the speaker. The most
 frequent and most trifling cases of slips consist in the contractions
 and foresoundings which show themselves in inconspicuous parts of
 speech. One's tongue slips in a longer speech to such an extent that the
 last word of the intended speech is said too soon. That gives the
 impression of a certain impatience to be finished with the sentence and
 gives proof in general of a certain resistance to communicating this
 sentence or speech as a whole. Thus we come to borderline cases in which
 the differences between the psychoanalytic and the common physiological
 conception of tongue slips are blended. We assume that in these cases
 there is a tendency which interferes with the intention of the speech.
 But it can only announce that it is present, and not what its own
 intention is. The interference which it occasions then follows some
 sound influences or associative relationship, and may be considered as a
 distraction of attention from the intended speech. But neither this
 disturbance of attention nor the associative tendency which has been
 activated, strikes the essence of the process. This hints, however, at
 the existence of an intention which interferes with the purposed speech,
 an intention whose nature cannot (as is possible in all the more
 pronounced cases of tongue slips) this time be guessed from its effects.
 
 Slips of the pen, to which I now turn, are in agreement with those of
 the tongue to the extent that we need expect to gain no new points of
 view from them. Perhaps we will be content with a small gleaning. Those
 very common little slips of the pen--contractions, anticipations of
 later words, particularly of the last words--again point to a general
 distaste for writing, and to an impatience to be done; the pronounced
 effects of pen slips permit the nature and purpose of the interfering
 tendency to be recognized. One knows in general that if one finds a
 slip of the pen in a letter everything was not as usual with the writer.
 What was the matter one cannot always establish. The pen slip is
 frequently as little noticed by the person who makes it as the tongue
 slip. The following observation is striking: There are some persons who
 have the habit of always rereading a letter they have written before
 sending it. Others do not do so. But if the latter make an exception and
 reread the letter, they always have the opportunity of finding and
 correcting a conspicuous pen slip. How can that be explained? This looks
 as if these persons knew that they had made a slip of the pen while
 writing the letter. Shall we really believe that such is the case?
 
 There is an interesting problem linked with the practical significance
 of the pen slip. You may recall the case of the murderer H., who made a
 practice of obtaining cultures of the most dangerous disease germs from
 scientific institutions, by pretending to be a bacteriologist, and who
 used these cultures to get his close relatives out of the way in this
 most modern fashion. This man once complained to the authorities of such
 an institution about the ineffectiveness of the culture which had been
 sent to him, but committed a pen slip and instead of the words, "in my
 attempts on mice and guinea pigs," was plainly written, "in my attempts
 on people."[20] This slip even attracted the attention of the doctors at
 the institution, but so far as I know, they drew no conclusion from it.
 Now what do you think? Might not the doctors better have accepted the
 slip as a confession and instituted an investigation through which the
 murderer's handiwork would have been blocked in time? In this case was
 not ignorance of our conception of errors to blame for an omission of
 practical importance? Well, I am inclined to think that such a slip
 would surely seem very suspicious to me, but a fact of great importance
 stands in the way of its utilization as a confession. The thing is not
 so simple. The pen slip is surely an indication, but by itself it would
 not have been sufficient to instigate an investigation. That the man is
 preoccupied with the thought of infecting human beings, the slip
 certainly does betray, but it does not make it possible to decide
 whether this thought has the value of a clear plan of injury or merely
 of a phantasy having no practical consequence. It is even possible that
 the person who made such a slip will deny this phantasy with the best
 subjective justification and will reject it as something entirely alien
 to him. Later, when we give our attention to the difference between
 psychic and material reality, you will understand these possibilities
 even better. Yet this is again a case in which an error later attained
 unsuspected significance.
 
 In misreading, we encounter a psychic situation which is clearly
 differentiated from that of the tongue slips or pen slips. The one of
 the two rival tendencies is here replaced by a sensory stimulus and
 perhaps for that reason is less resistant. What one is reading is not a
 production of one's own psychic activity, as is something which one
 intends to write. In a large majority of cases, therefore, the
 misreading consists in a complete substitution. One substitutes another
 word for the word to be read, and there need be no connection in meaning
 between the text and the product of the misreading. In general, the slip
 is based upon a word resemblance. Lichtenberg's example of reading
 "_Agamemnon_" for "_angenommen_"[21] is the best of this group. If one
 wishes to discover the interfering tendency which causes the misreading,
 one may completely ignore the misread text and can begin the analytic
 investigation with the two questions: What is the first idea that occurs
 in free association to the product of the misreading, and, in what
 situation did the misreading occur? Now and then a knowledge of the
 latter suffices by itself to explain the misreading. Take, for example,
 the individual who, distressed by certain needs, wanders about in a
 strange city and reads the word "_Closethaus_" on a large sign on the
 first floor of a house. He has just time to be surprised at the fact
 that the sign has been nailed so high up when he discovers that,
 accurately observed, the sign reads "_Corset-haus_." In other cases the
 misreadings which are independent of the text require a penetrating
 analysis which cannot be accomplished without practice and confidence in
 the psychoanalytic technique. But generally it is not a matter of much
 difficulty to obtain the elucidation of a misreading. The substituted
 word, as in the example, "_Agamemnon_," betrays without more ado the
 thought sequence from which the interference results. In war times, for
 instance, it is very common for one to read into everything which
 contains a similar word structure, the names of the cities, generals and
 military expressions which are constantly buzzing around us. In this
 way, whatever interests and preoccupies one puts itself in the place of
 that which is foreign or uninteresting. The after-effects of thoughts
 blur the new perceptions.
 
 There are other types of misreadings, in which the text itself arouses
 the disturbing tendency, by means of which it is then most often changed
 into its opposite. One reads something which is undesired; analysis then
 convinces one that an intensive wish to reject what has been read should
 be made responsible for the alteration.
 
 In the first mentioned and more frequent cases of misreading, two
 factors are neglected to which we gave an important role in the
 mechanism of errors: the conflict of two tendencies and the suppression
 of one which then indemnifies itself by producing the error. Not that
 anything like the opposite occurs in misreading, but the importunity of
 the idea content which leads to misreading is nevertheless much more
 conspicuous than the suppression to which the latter may previously have
 been subjected. Just these two factors are most tangibly apparent in the
 various situations of errors of forgetfulness.
 
 Forgetting plans is actually uniform in meaning; its interpretation is,
 as we have heard, not denied even by the layman. The tendency
 interfering with the plan is always an antithetical intention, an
 unwillingness concerning which we need only discover why it does not
 come to expression in a different and less disguised manner. But the
 existence of this unwillingness is not to be doubted. Sometimes it is
 possible even to guess something of the motives which make it necessary
 for this unwillingness to disguise itself, and it always achieves its
 purpose by the error resulting from the concealment, while its rejection
 would be certain were it to present itself as open contradiction. If an
 important change in the psychic situation occurs between the formulation
 of the plan and its execution, in consequence of which the execution of
 the plan does not come into question, then the fact that the plan was
 forgotten is no longer in the class of errors. One is no longer
 surprised at it, and one understands that it would have been superfluous
 to have remembered the plan; it was then permanently or temporarily
 effaced. Forgetting a plan can be called an error only when we have no
 reason to believe there was such an interruption.
 
 The cases of forgetting plans are in general so uniform and transparent
 that they do not interest us in our investigation. There are two points,
 however, from which we can learn something new. We have said that
 forgetting, that is, the non-execution of a plan, points to an antipathy
 toward it. This certainly holds, but, according to the results of our
 investigations, the antipathy may be of two sorts, direct and indirect.
 What is meant by the latter can best be explained by one or two
 examples. If a patron forgets to say a good word for his protege to a
 third person, it may be because the patron is not really very much
 interested in the protege, therefore, has no great inclination to
 commend him. It is, at any rate, in this sense that the protege will
 construe his patron's forgetfulness. But the matter may be more
 complicated. The patron's antipathy to the execution of the plan may
 originate in another quarter and fasten upon quite a different point. It
 need not have anything to do with the protege, but may be directed
 toward the third person to whom the good word was to have been said.
 Thus, you see what doubts here confront the practical application of our
 interpretation. The protege, despite a correct interpretation of the
 forgetfulness, stands in danger of becoming too suspicious, and of doing
 his patron a grave injustice. Or, if an individual forgets a rendezvous
 which he has made, and which he had resolved to keep, the most frequent
 basis will certainly be the direct aversion to encountering this person.
 But analysis might here supply the information that the interfering
 intention was not directed against that person, but against the place in
 which they were to have met, and which was avoided because of a painful
 memory associated with it. Or, if one forgets to mail a letter, the
 counter-intention may be directed against the content of that letter,
 yet this does not in any way exclude the possibility that the letter is
 harmless in itself, and only subject to the counter-intention because
 something about it reminds the writer of another letter written
 previously, which, in fact, did afford a basis for the antipathy. One
 can say in such a case that the antipathy has here transferred itself
 from that former letter where it was justified to the present one in
 which it really has no meaning. Thus you see that one must always
 exercise restraint and caution in the application of interpretations,
 even though the interpretations are justified. That which is
 psychologically equivalent may nevertheless in practice be very
 ambiguous.
 
 Phenomena such as these will seem very unusual to you. Perhaps you are
 inclined to assume that the "indirect" antipathy is enough to
 characterize the incident as pathological. Yet I can assure you that it
 also occurs in a normal and healthy setting. I am in no way willing to
 admit the unreliability of our analytic interpretation. After all, the
 above-discussed ambiguity of plan-forgetting exists only so long as we
 have not attempted an analysis of the case, and are interpreting it only
 on the basis of our general suppositions. When we analyze the person in
 question, we discover with sufficient certainty in each case whether or
 not it is a direct antipathy, or what its origin is otherwise.
 
 A second point is the following: when we find in a large majority of
 cases that the forgetting of a plan goes back to an antipathy, we gain
 courage to extend this solution to another series of cases in which the
 analyzed person does not confirm, but denies, the antipathy which we
 inferred. Take as an example the exceedingly frequent incidents of
 forgetting to return books which one has borrowed, or forgetting to pay
 one's bills or debts. We will be so bold as to accuse the individual in
 question of intending to keep the books and not to pay the debts, while
 he will deny such an intention but will not be in a position to give us
 any other explanation of his conduct. Thereupon we insist that he has
 the intention, only he knows nothing about it; all we need for our
 inference is to have the intention betray itself through the effect of
 the forgetfulness. The subject may then repeat that he had merely
 forgotten it. You now recognize the situation as one in which we once
 before found ourselves. If we wish to be consistent in our
 interpretation, an interpretation which has been proved as manifold as
 it is justified, we will be unavoidably forced to the conclusion that
 there are tendencies in a human being which can become effective without
 his being conscious of them. By so doing, however, we place ourselves in
 opposition to all the views which prevail in daily life and in
 psychology.
 
 Forgetting proper names and foreign names as well as foreign words can
 be traced in the same manner to a counter-intention which aims either
 directly or indirectly at the name in question. I have already given you
 an example of such direct antipathy. The indirect causation, however, is
 particularly frequent and generally necessitates careful analysis for
 its determination. Thus, for example, in war times which force us to
 sacrifice so many of our former inclinations, the ability to recall
 proper names also suffers severely in consequence of the most peculiar
 connections. A short time ago it happened that I could not reproduce the
 name of that harmless Moravian city of Bisenz, and analysis showed that
 no direct dislike was to blame, but rather the sound resemblance to the
 name of the Bisenzi palace in Orrieto, in which I used to wish I might
 live. As a motive for the antagonism to remembering the name, we here
 encounter for the first time a principle which will later disclose to us
 its whole tremendous significance in the causation of neurotic symptoms,
 viz., the aversion on the part of the memory to remembering anything
 which is connected with unpleasant experience and which would revive
 this unpleasantness by a reproduction. This intention of avoiding
 unpleasantness in recollections of other psychic acts, the psychic
 flight from unpleasantness, we may recognize as the ultimate effective
 motive not only for the forgetting of names, but also for many other
 errors, such as omissions of action, etc.
 
 Forgetting names does, however, seem to be especially facilitated
 psycho-physiologically and therefore also occurs in cases in which the
 interference of an unpleasantness-motive cannot be established. If
 anyone once has a tendency to forget names, you can establish by
 analytical investigation that he not only loses names because he himself
 does not like them, or because they remind him of something he does not
 like, but also because the same name in his mind belongs to another
 chain of associations, with which he has more intimate relations. The
 name is anchored there, as it were, and denied to the other associations
 activated at the moment. If you will recall the tricks of mnemonic
 technique you will ascertain with some surprise that one forgets names
 in consequence of the same associations which one otherwise purposely
 forms in order to save them from being forgotten. The most conspicuous
 example of this is afforded by proper names of persons, which
 conceivably enough must have very different psychic values for different
 people. For example, take a first name, such as Theodore. To one of you
 it will mean nothing special, to another it means the name of his
 father, brother, friend, or his own name. Analytic experience will then
 show you that the first person is not in danger of forgetting that a
 certain stranger bears this name, while the latter will be constantly
 inclined to withhold from the stranger this name which seems reserved
 for intimate relationships. Let us now assume that this associative
 inhibition can come into contact with the operation of the
 unpleasantness-principle, and in addition with an indirect mechanism,
 and you will be in a position to form a correct picture of the
 complexity of causation of this temporary name-forgetting. An adequate
 analysis that does justice to the facts, however, will completely
 disclose these complications.
 
 Forgetting impressions and experiences shows the working of the tendency
 to keep unpleasantness from recollection much more clearly and
 conclusively than does the forgetting of names. It does not, of course,
 belong in its entirety to the category of errors, but only in so far as
 it seems to us conspicuous and unjustified, measured by the measuring
 stick of our accustomed conception--thus, for example, where the
 forgetfulness strikes fresh or important impressions or impressions
 whose loss tears a hole in the otherwise well-remembered sequence. Why
 and how it is in general that we forget, particularly why and how we
 forget experiences which have surely left the deepest impressions, such
 as the incidents of our first years of childhood, is quite a different
 problem, in which the defense against unpleasant associations plays a
 certain role but is far from explaining everything. That unpleasant
 impressions are easily forgotten is an indubitable fact. Various
 psychologists have observed it, and the great Darwin was so struck by it
 that he made the "golden rule" for himself of writing down with
 particular care observations which seemed unfavorable to his theory,
 since he had convinced himself that they were just the ones which would
 not stick in his memory.
 
 Those who hear for the first time of this principle of defense against
 unpleasant recollections by means of forgetting, seldom fail to raise
 the objection that they, on the contrary, have had the experience that
 just the painful is hard to forget, inasmuch as it always comes back to
 mind to torture the person against his will--as, for example, the
 recollection of an insult or humiliation. This fact is also correct, but
 the objection is not valid. It is important that one begin betimes to
 reckon with the fact that the psychic life is the arena of the struggles
 and exercises of antagonistic tendencies, or, to express it in
 non-dynamic terminology, that it consists of contradictions and paired
 antagonisms. Information concerning one specific tendency is of no avail
 for the exclusion of its opposite; there is room for both of them. It
 depends only on how the opposites react upon each other, what effects
 will proceed from the one and what from the other.
 
 Losing and mislaying objects is of especial interest to us because of
 the ambiguity and the multiplicity of tendencies in whose services the
 errors may act. The common element in all cases is this, that one wished
 to lose something. The reasons and purposes thereof vary. One loses an
 object when it has become damaged, when one intends to replace it with a
 better one, when one has ceased to like it, when it came from a person
 whose relations to one have become strained, or when it was obtained
 under circumstances of which one no longer wishes to think. The same
 purpose may be served by letting the object fall, be damaged or broken.
 In the life of society it is said to have been found that unwelcome and
 illegitimate children are much more often frail than those born in
 wedlock. To reach this result we do not need the coarse technique of the
 so-called angel-maker. A certain remissness in the care of the child is
 said to suffice amply. In the preservation of objects, the case might
 easily be the same as with the children.
 
 But things may be singled out for loss without their having forfeited
 any of their value, namely, when there exists the intention to sacrifice
 something to fate in order to ward off some other dreaded loss. Such
 exorcisings of fate are, according to the findings of analysis, still
 very frequent among us; therefore, the loss of things is often a
 voluntary sacrifice. In the same way losing may serve the purposes of
 obstinacy or self-punishment. In short, the more distant motivation of
 the tendency to get rid of a thing oneself by means of losing it is not
 overlooked.
 
 Mistakes, like other errors, are often used to fulfill wishes which one
 ought to deny oneself. The purpose is thus masked as fortunate
 accident; for instance, one of our friends once took the train to make a
 call in the suburbs, despite the clearest antipathy to so doing, and
 then, in changing cars, made the mistake of getting into the train which
 took him back to the city. Or, if on a trip one absolutely wants to make
 a longer stay at a half-way station, one is apt to overlook or miss
 certain connections, so that he is forced to make the desired
 interruption to the trip. Or, as once happened to a patient of mine whom
 I had forbidden to call up his fiancee on the telephone, "by mistake"
 and "absent-mindedly" he asked for a wrong number when he wanted to
 telephone to me, so that he was suddenly connected with the lady. A
 pretty example and one of practical significance in making a direct
 mistake is the observation of an engineer at a preliminary hearing in a
 damage suit:
 
 "Some time ago I worked with several colleagues in the laboratory of a
 high school on a series of complicated elasticity experiments, a piece
 of work which we had undertaken voluntarily but which began to take more
 time than we had expected. One day as I went into the laboratory with my
 colleague F., the latter remarked how unpleasant it was to him to lose
 so much time that day, since he had so much to do at home. I could not
 help agreeing with him, and remarked half jokingly, alluding to an
 incident of the previous week: 'Let's hope that the machine gives out
 again so that we can stop work and go home early.'
 
 "In the division of labor it happened that F. was given the regulation
 of the valve of the press, that is to say, he was, by means of a
 cautious opening of the valve, to let the liquid pressure from the
 accumulator flow slowly into the cylinder of the hydraulic press. The
 man who was directing the job stood by the manometer (pressure gauge)
 and when the right pressure had been reached called out in a loud voice:
 'Stop.' At this command F. seized the valve and turned with all his
 might--to the left! (All valves, without exception, close to the right.)
 Thereby the whole pressure of the accumulator suddenly became effective
 in the press, a strain for which the connecting pipes are not designed,
 so that a connecting pipe immediately burst--quite a harmless defect,
 but one which nevertheless forced us to drop work for the day and go
 home.
 
 "It is characteristic, by the way, that some time afterward when we were
 discussing this occurrence, my friend F. had no recollection whatever
 of my remark, which I could recall with certainty."
 
 From this point you may reach the conjecture that it is not harmless
 accident which makes the hands of your domestics such dangerous enemies
 to your household property. But you can also raise the question whether
 it is always an accident when one damages himself and exposes his own
 person to danger. There are interests the value of which you will
 presently be able to test by means of the analysis of observations.
 
 Ladies and gentlemen, this is far from being all that might be said
 about errors. There is indeed much left to investigate and to discuss.
 But I am satisfied if, from our investigations to date, your previous
 views are somewhat shaken and if you have acquired a certain degree of
 liberality in the acceptance of new ones. For the rest, I must content
 myself with leaving you face to face with an unclear condition of
 affairs. We cannot prove all our axioms by the study of errors and,
 indeed, are by no means solely dependent on this material. The great
 value of errors for our purpose lies in the fact that they are very
 frequent phenomena that can easily be observed on oneself and the
 occurrence of which do not require a pathological condition. I should
 like to mention just one more of your unanswered questions before
 concluding: "If, as we have seen in many examples, people come so close
 to understanding errors and so often act as though they penetrated their
 meaning, how is it possible that they can so generally consider them
 accidental, senseless and meaningless, and can so energetically oppose
 their psychoanalytic elucidation?"
 
 You are right; that is conspicuous and demands an explanation. I shall
 not give this explanation to you, however, but shall guide you slowly to
 the connecting links from which the explanation will force itself upon
 you without any aid from me.
 
 
 
 
 II
 
 THE DREAM
 
 
 
 
 FIFTH LECTURE
 
 THE DREAM
 
 _Difficulties and Preliminary Approach_
 
 
 One day the discovery was made that the disease symptoms of certain
 nervous patients have a meaning.[22] Thereupon the psychoanalytic method
 of therapy was founded. In this treatment it happened that the patients
 also presented dreams in place of their symptoms. Herewith originated
 the conjecture that these dreams also have a meaning.
 
 We will not, however, pursue this historical path, but enter upon the
 opposite one. We wish to discover the meaning of dreams as preparation
 for the study of the neuroses. This inversion is justified, for the
 study of dreams is not only the best preparation for that of the
 neuroses, but the dream itself is also a neurotic symptom, and in fact
 one which possesses for us the incalculable advantage of occurring in
 all normals. Indeed, if all human beings were well and would dream, we
 could gain from their dreams almost all the insight to which the study
 of the neuroses has led.
 
 Thus it is that the dream becomes the object of psychoanalytic
 research--again an ordinary, little-considered phenomenon, apparently of
 no practical value, like the errors with which, indeed, it shares the
 character of occurring in normals. But otherwise the conditions are
 rather less favorable for our work. Errors had been neglected only by
 science, which had paid little attention to them; but at least it was no
 disgrace to occupy one's self with them. People said there are indeed
 more important things, but perhaps something may come of it.
 Preoccupation with the dream, however, is not merely impractical and
 superfluous, but actually ignominious; it carries the odium of the
 unscientific, awakens the suspicion of a personal leaning towards
 mysticism. The idea of a physician busying himself with dreams when even
 in neuropathology and psychiatry there are matters so much more
 serious--tumors the size of apples which incapacitate the organ of the
 psyche, hemorrhages, and chronic inflammations in which one can
 demonstrate changes in the tissues under the microscope! No, the dream
 is much too trifling an object, and unworthy of Science.
 
 And besides, it is a condition which in itself defies all the
 requirements of exact research--in dream investigation one is not even
 sure of one's object. A delusion, for example, presents itself in clear
 and definite outlines. "I am the Emperor of China," says the patient
 aloud. But the dream? It generally cannot be related at all. If anyone
 relates a dream, has he any guarantee that he has told it correctly, and
 not changed it during the telling, or invented an addition which was
 forced by the indefiniteness of his recollection? Most dreams cannot be
 remembered at all, are forgotten except for small fragments. And upon
 the interpretation of such material shall a scientific psychology or
 method of treatment for patients be based?
 
 A certain excess in judgment may make us suspicious. The objections to
 the dream as an object of research obviously go too far. The question of
 insignificance we have already had to deal with in discussing errors. We
 said to ourselves that important matters may manifest themselves through
 small signs. As concerns the indefiniteness of the dream, it is after
 all a characteristic like any other. One cannot prescribe the
 characteristics of an object. Moreover, there are clear and definite
 dreams. And there are other objects of psychiatric research which suffer
 from the same trait of indefiniteness, e.g., many compulsion ideas, with
 which even respectable and esteemed psychiatrists have occupied
 themselves. I might recall the last case which occurred in my practice.
 The patient introduced himself to me with the words, "I have a certain
 feeling as though I had harmed or had wished to harm some living
 thing--a child?--no, more probably a dog--perhaps pushed it off a
 bridge--or something else." We can overcome to some degree the
 difficulty of uncertain recollection in the dream if we determine that
 exactly what the dreamer tells us is to be taken as his dream, without
 regard to anything which he has forgotten or may have changed in
 recollection. And finally, one cannot make so general an assertion as
 that the dream is an unimportant thing. We know from our own experience
 that the mood in which one wakes up after a dream may continue
 throughout the whole day. Cases have been observed by physicians in
 which a psychosis begins with a dream and holds to a delusion which
 originated in it. It is related of historical personages that they drew
 their inspiration for important deeds from dreams. So we may ask whence
 comes the contempt of scientific circles for the dream?
 
 I think it is the reaction to their over-estimation in former times.
 Reconstruction of the past is notoriously difficult, but this much we
 may assume with certainty--if you will permit me the jest--that our
 ancestors of 3000 years ago and more, dreamed much in the way we do. As
 far as we know, all ancient peoples attached great importance to dreams
 and considered them of practical value. They drew omens for the future
 from dreams, sought premonitions in them. In those days, to the Greeks
 and all Orientals, a campaign without dream interpreters must have been
 as impossible as a campaign without an aviation scout to-day. When
 Alexander the Great undertook his campaign of conquests, the most famous
 dream interpreters were in attendance. The city of Tyrus, which was then
 still situated on an island, put up so fierce a resistance that
 Alexander considered the idea of raising the siege. Then he dreamed one
 night of a satyr dancing as if in triumph; and when he laid his dream
 before his interpreters he received the information that the victory
 over the city had been announced to him. He ordered the attack and took
 Tyrus. Among the Etruscans and the Romans other methods of discovering
 the future were in use, but the interpretation of dreams was practical
 and esteemed during the entire Hellenic-Roman period. Of the literature
 dealing with the topic at least the chief work has been preserved to us,
 namely, the book of Artemidoros of Daldis, who is supposed to have lived
 during the lifetime of the Emperor Hadrian. How it happened subsequently
 that the art of dream interpretation was lost and the dream fell into
 discredit, I cannot tell you. Enlightenment cannot have had much part in
 it, for the Dark Ages faithfully preserved things far more absurd than
 the ancient dream interpretation. The fact is, the interest in dreams
 gradually deteriorated into superstition, and could assert itself only
 among the ignorant. The latest misuse of dream interpretation in our day
 still tries to discover in dreams the numbers which are going to be
 drawn in the small lottery. On the other hand, the exact science of
 to-day has repeatedly dealt with dreams, but always only with the
 purpose of applying its physiological theories to the dream. By
 physicians, of course, the dream was considered as a non-psychic act, as
 the manifestation of somatic irritations in the psychic life. Binz
 (1876) pronounced the dream "a bodily process, in all cases useless, in
 many actually pathological, above which the world-soul and immortality
 are raised as high as the blue ether over the weed-grown sands of the
 lowest plain." Maury compared it with the irregular twitchings of St.
 Vitus' Dance in contrast to the co-ordinated movements of the normal
 person. An old comparison makes the content of the dream analogous to
 the tones which the "ten fingers of a musically illiterate person would
 bring forth if they ran over the keys of the instrument."
 
 Interpretation means finding a hidden meaning. There can be no question
 of interpretation in such an estimation of the dream process. Look up
 the description of the dream in Wundt, Jodl and other newer
 philosophers. You will find an enumeration of the deviations of dream
 life from waking thought, in a sense disparaging to the dream. The
 description points out the disintegration of association, the suspension
 of the critical faculty, the elimination of all knowledge, and other
 signs of diminished activity. The only valuable contribution to the
 knowledge of the dream which we owe to exact science pertains to the
 influence of bodily stimuli, operative during sleep, on the content of
 the dream. There are two thick volumes of experimental researches on
 dreams by the recently deceased Norwegian author, J. Mourly Vold,
 (translated into German in 1910 and 1912), which deal almost solely with
 the consequences of changes in the position of the limbs. They are
 recommended as the prototype of exact dream research. Now can you
 imagine what exact science would say if it discovered that we wish to
 attempt to find the meaning of dreams? It may be it has already said it,
 but we will not allow ourselves to be frightened off. If errors can have
 a meaning, the dream can, too, and errors in many cases have a meaning
 which has escaped exact science. Let us confess to sharing the prejudice
 of the ancients and the common people, and let us follow in the
 footsteps of the ancient dream interpreters.
 
 First of all, we must orient ourselves in our task, and take a bird's
 eye view of our field. What is a dream? It is difficult to say in one
 sentence. But we do not want to attempt any definition where a reference
 to the material with which everyone is familiar suffices. Yet we ought
 to select the essential element of the dream. How can that be found?
 There are such monstrous differences within the boundary which encloses
 our province, differences in every direction. The essential thing will
 very probably be that which we can show to be common to all dreams.
 
 Well, the first thing which is common to all dreams is that we are
 asleep during their occurrence. The dream is apparently the psychic life
 during sleep, which has certain resemblances to that of the waking
 condition, and on the other hand is distinguished from it by important
 differences. That was noted even in Aristotle's definition. Perhaps
 there are other connections obtaining between the dream and sleep. One
 can be awakened by a dream, one frequently has a dream when he wakes
 spontaneously or is forcibly awakened from sleep. The dream then seems
 to be an intermediate condition between sleeping and waking. Thus we are
 referred to the problem of sleep. What, then, is sleep?
 
 That is a physiological or biological problem concerning which there is
 still much controversy. We can form no decision on the point, but I
 think we may attempt a psychological characterization of sleep. Sleep is
 a condition in which I wish to have nothing to do with the external
 world, and have withdrawn my interest from it. I put myself to sleep by
 withdrawing myself from the external world and by holding off its
 stimuli. I also go to sleep when I am fatigued by the external world.
 Thus, by going to sleep, I say to the external world, "Leave me in
 peace, for I wish to sleep." Conversely, the child says, "I won't go to
 bed yet, I am not tired, I want to have some more fun." The biological
 intention of sleep thus seems to be recuperation; its psychological
 character, the suspension of interest in the external world. Our
 relation to the world into which we came so unwillingly, seems to
 include the fact that we cannot endure it without interruption. For this
 reason we revert from time to time to the pre-natal existence, that is,
 to the intra-uterine existence. At least we create for ourselves
 conditions quite similar to those obtaining at that time--warmth,
 darkness and the absence of stimuli. Some of us even roll ourselves
 into tight packages and assume in sleep a posture very similar to the
 intra-uterine posture. It seems as if the world did not wholly possess
 us adults, it has only two-thirds of our life, we are still one-third
 unborn. Each awakening in the morning is then like a new birth. We also
 speak of the condition after sleep with the words, "I feel as though I
 had been born anew," by which we probably form a very erroneous idea of
 the general feeling of the newly born. It may be assumed that the
 latter, on the contrary, feel very uncomfortable. We also speak of birth
 as "seeing the light of day." If that be sleep, then the dream is not on
 its program at all, rather it seems an unwelcome addition. We think,
 too, that dreamless sleep is the best and only normal sleep. There
 should be no psychic activity in sleep; if the psyche stirs, then just
 to that extent have we failed to reduplicate the foetal condition;
 remainders of psychic activity could not be completely avoided. These
 remainders are the dream. Then it really does seem that the dream need
 have no meaning. It was different in the case of errors; they were
 activities of the waking state. But when I am asleep, have quite
 suspended psychic activity and have suppressed all but certain of its
 remainders, then it is by no means inevitable that these remainders have
 a meaning. In fact, I cannot make use of this meaning, in view of the
 fact that the rest of my psyche is asleep. This must, of course, be a
 question only of twitching, like spasmodic reactions, a question only of
 psychic phenomena such as follow directly upon somatic stimulation. The
 dream, therefore, appears to be the sleep-disturbing remnant of the
 psychic activity of waking life, and we may make the resolution promptly
 to abandon a theme which is so ill-adapted to psychoanalysis.
 
 However, even if the dream is superfluous, it exists nevertheless and we
 may try to give an account of its existence. Why does not the psyche go
 to sleep? Probably because there is something which gives it no rest.
 Stimuli act upon the psyche, and it must react to them. The dream,
 therefore, is the way in which the psyche reacts to the stimuli acting
 upon it in the sleeping condition. We note here a point of approach to
 the understanding of the dream. We can now search through different
 dreams to discover what are the stimuli which seek to disturb the sleep
 and which are reacted to with dreams. Thus far we might be said to have
 discovered the first common element.
 
 Are there other common elements? Yes, it is undeniable that there are,
 but they are much more difficult to grasp and describe. The psychic
 processes of sleep, for example, have a very different character from
 those of waking. One experiences many things in the dream, and believes
 in them, while one really has experienced nothing but perhaps the one
 disturbing stimulus. One experiences them predominantly in visual
 images; feelings may also be interspersed in the dream as well as
 thoughts; the other senses may also have experiences, but after all the
 dream experiences are predominantly pictures. A part of the difficulty
 of dream telling comes from the fact that we have to transpose these
 pictures into words. "I could draw it," the dreamer says frequently,
 "but I don't know how to say it." That is not really a case of
 diminished psychic activity, like that of the feeble-minded in
 comparison with the highly gifted; it is something qualitatively
 different, but it is difficult to say wherein the difference lies. G. T.
 Fechner once hazarded the conjecture that the scene in which dreams are
 played is a different one from that of the waking perceptual life. To be
 sure, we do not understand this, do not know what we are to think of it,
 but the impression of strangeness which most dreams make upon us does
 really bear this out. The comparison of the dream activity with the
 effects of a hand untrained in music also fails at this point. The
 piano, at least, will surely answer with the same tones, even if not
 with melodies, as soon as by accident one brushes its keys. Let us keep
 this second common element of all dreams carefully in mind, even though
 it be not understood.
 
 Are there still further traits in common? I find none, and see only
 differences everywhere, differences indeed in the apparent length as
 well as the definiteness of the activities, participation of effects,
 durability, etc. All this really is not what we might expect of a
 compulsion-driven, irresistible, convulsive defense against a stimulus.
 As concerns the dimensions of dreams, there are very short ones which
 contain only one picture or a few, one thought--yes, even one word
 only--, others which are uncommonly rich in content, seem to dramatize
 whole novels and to last very long. There are dreams which are as plain
 as an experience itself, so plain that we do not recognize them as
 dreams for a long time after waking; others which are indescribably
 weak, shadowy and vague; indeed in one and the same dream, the
 overemphasized and the scarcely comprehensible, indefinite parts may
 alternate with each other. Dreams may be quite meaningful or at least
 coherent, yes, even witty, fantastically beautiful. Others, again, are
 confused, as if feeble-minded, absurd, often actually mad. There are
 dreams which leave us quite cold, others in which all the effects come
 to expression--pain deep enough for tears, fear strong enough to waken
 us, astonishment, delight, etc. Dreams are generally quickly forgotten
 upon waking, or they may hold over a day to such an extent as to be
 faintly and incompletely remembered in the evening. Others, for example,
 the dreams of childhood, are so well preserved that they stay in the
 memory thirty years later, like fresh experiences. Dreams, like
 individuals, may appear a single time, and never again, or they may
 repeat themselves unchanged in the same person, or with small
 variations. In short, this nightly psychic activity can avail itself of
 an enormous repertoire, can indeed compass everything which the psychic
 accomplishes by day, but yet the two are not the same.
 
 One might try to give an account of this many-sidedness of the dream by
 assuming that it corresponds to different intermediate stages between
 sleeping and waking, different degrees of incomplete sleep. Yes, but in
 that case as the psyche nears the waking state, the conviction that it
 is a dream ought to increase along with the value, content and
 distinctiveness of the dream product, and it would not happen that
 immediately beside a distinct and sensible dream fragment a senseless
 and indistinct one would occur, to be followed again by a goodly piece
 of work. Surely the psyche could not change its degree of somnolence so
 quickly. This explanation thus avails us nothing; at any rate, it cannot
 be accepted offhand.
 
 Let us, for the present, give up the idea of finding the meaning of the
 dream and try instead to clear a path to a better understanding of the
 dream by means of the elements common to all dreams. From the relation
 of dreams to the sleeping condition, we concluded that the dream is the
 reaction to a sleep-disturbing stimulus. As we have heard, this is the
 only point upon which exact experimental psychology can come to our
 assistance; it gives us the information that stimuli applied during
 sleep appear in the dream. There have been many such investigations
 carried out, including that of the above mentioned Mourly Vold. Indeed,
 each of us must at some time have been in a position to confirm this
 conclusion by means of occasional personal observations. I shall choose
 certain older experiments for presentation. Maury had such experiments
 made on his own person. He was allowed to smell cologne while dreaming.
 He dreamed that he was in Cairo in the shop of Johann Marina Farina, and
 therewith were linked further extravagant adventures. Or, he was
 slightly pinched in the nape of the neck; he dreamed of having a mustard
 plaster applied, and of a doctor who had treated him in childhood. Or, a
 drop of water was poured on his forehead. He was then in Italy,
 perspired profusely, and drank the white wine of Orvieto.
 
 What strikes us about these experimentally induced dreams we may perhaps
 be able to comprehend still more clearly in another series of stimulated
 dreams. Three dreams have been recounted by a witty observer,
 Hildebrand, all of them reactions to the sound of the alarm clock:
 
 "I go walking one spring morning and saunter through the green fields to
 a neighboring village. There I see the inhabitants in gala attire, their
 hymn books under their arms, going church-ward in great numbers. To be
 sure, this is Sunday, and the early morning service will soon begin. I
 decide to attend, but since I am somewhat overheated, decide to cool off
 in the cemetery surrounding the church. While I am there reading several
 inscriptions, I hear the bell ringer ascend the tower, and now see the
 little village church bell which is to give the signal for the beginning
 of the service. The bell hangs a good bit longer, then it begins to
 swing, and suddenly its strokes sound clear and penetrating, so clear
 and penetrating that they make an end of--my sleep. The bell-strokes,
 however, come from my alarm clock.
 
 "A second combination. It is a clear winter day. The streets are piled
 high with snow. I agree to go on a sleighing party, but must wait a long
 time before the announcement comes that the sleigh is at the door. Then
 follow the preparations for getting in--the fur coat is put on, the
 footwarmer dragged forth--and finally I am seated in my place. But the
 departure is still delayed until the reins give the waiting horses the
 tangible signal. Now they pull; the vigorously shaken bells begin their
 familiar Janizary music so powerfully that instantly the spider web of
 the dream is torn. Again it is nothing but the shrill tone of the alarm
 clock.
 
 "And still a third example. I see a kitchen maid walking along the
 corridor to the dining room with some dozens of plates piled high. The
 pillar of porcelain in her arms seems to me in danger of losing its
 balance. 'Take care!' I warn her. 'The whole load will fall to the
 ground.' Naturally, the inevitable retort follows: one is used to that,
 etc., and I still continue to follow the passing figure with
 apprehensive glances. Sure enough, at the threshold she stumbles--the
 brittle dishes fall and rattle and crash over the floor in a thousand
 pieces. But--the endless racket is not, as I soon notice, a real
 rattling, but really a ringing and with this ringing, as the awakened
 subject now realizes, the alarm has performed its duty."
 
 These dreams are very pretty, quite meaningful, not at all incoherent,
 as dreams usually are. We will not object to them on that score. That
 which is common to them all is that the situation terminates each time
 in a noise, which one recognizes upon waking up as the sound of the
 alarm. Thus we see here how a dream originates, but also discover
 something else. The dream does not recognize the alarm--indeed the alarm
 does not appear in the dream--the dream replaces the alarm sound with
 another, it interprets the stimulus which interrupts the sleep, but
 interprets it each time in a different way. Why? There is no answer to
 this question, it seems to be something arbitrary. But to understand the
 dream means to be able to say why it has chosen just this sound and no
 other for the interpretation of the alarm-clock stimulus. In quite
 analogous fashion, we must raise the objection to the Maury experiment
 that we see well enough that the stimulus appears in the dream, but that
 we do not discover why it appears in just this form; and that the form
 taken by the dream does not seem to follow from the nature of the
 sleep-disturbing stimulus. Moreover, in the Maury experiments a mass of
 other dream material links itself to the direct stimulus product; as,
 for example, the extravagant adventures in the cologne dream, for which
 one can give no account.
 
 Now I shall ask you to consider the fact that the waking dreams offer by
 far the best chances for determining the influence of external
 sleep-disturbing stimuli. In most of the other cases it will be more
 difficult. One does not wake up in all dreams, and in the morning, when
 one remembers the dream of the night, how can one discover the
 disturbing stimulus which was perhaps in operation at night? I did
 succeed once in subsequently establishing such a sound stimulus, though
 naturally only in consequence of special circumstances. I woke up one
 morning in a place in the Tyrolese Mountains, with the certainty that I
 had dreamt the Pope had died. I could not explain the dream, but then my
 wife asked me: "Did you hear the terrible bell ringing that broke out
 early this morning from all the churches and chapels?" No, I had heard
 nothing, my sleep is a sound one, but thanks to this information I
 understood my dream. How often may such stimuli incite the sleeper to
 dream without his knowing of them afterward? Perhaps often, perhaps
 infrequently; when the stimulus can no longer be traced, one cannot be
 convinced of its existence. Even without this fact we have given up
 evaluating the sleep disturbing stimuli, since we know that they can
 explain only a little bit of the dream, and not the whole dream
 reaction.
 
 But we need not give up this whole theory for that reason. In fact, it
 can be extended. It is clearly immaterial through what cause the sleep
 was disturbed and the psyche incited to dream. If the sensory stimulus
 is not always externally induced, it may be instead a stimulus
 proceeding from the internal organs, a so-called somatic stimulus. This
 conjecture is obvious, and it corresponds to the most popular conception
 of the origin of dreams. Dreams come from the stomach, one often hears
 it said. Unfortunately it may be assumed here again that the cases are
 frequent in which the somatic stimulus which operated during the night
 can no longer be traced after waking, and has thus become unverifiable.
 But let us not overlook the fact that many recognized experiences
 testify to the derivation of dreams from the somatic stimulus. It is in
 general indubitable that the condition of the internal organs can
 influence the dream. The relation of many a dream content to a
 distention of the bladder or to an excited condition of the genital
 organs, is so clear that it cannot be mistaken. From these transparent
 cases one can proceed to others in which, from the content of the dream,
 at least a justifiable conjecture may be made that such somatic stimuli
 have been operative, inasmuch as there is something in this content
 which may be conceived as elaboration, representation, interpretation
 of the stimuli. The dream investigator Schirmer (1861) insisted with
 particular emphasis on the derivation of the dream from organic stimuli,
 and cited several splendid examples in proof. For example, in a dream he
 sees "two rows of beautiful boys with blonde hair and delicate
 complexions stand opposite each other in preparation for a fight, fall
 upon each other, seize each other, take up the old position again, and
 repeat the whole performance;" here the interpretation of these rows of
 boys as teeth is plausible in itself, and it seems to become convincing
 when after this scene the dreamer "pulls a long tooth out of his jaws."
 The interpretation of "long, narrow, winding corridors" as intestinal
 stimuli, seems sound and confirms Schirmer's assertion that the dream
 above all seeks to represent the stimulus-producing organ by means of
 objects resembling it.
 
 Thus we must be prepared to admit that the internal stimuli may play the
 same role in the dream as the external. Unfortunately, their evaluation
 is subject to the same difficulties as those we have already
 encountered. In a large number of cases the interpretation of the
 stimuli as somatic remains uncertain and undemonstrable. Not all dreams,
 but only a certain portion of them, arouse the suspicion that an
 internal organic stimulus was concerned in their causation. And finally,
 the internal stimuli will be as little able as the external sensory
 stimuli to explain any more of the dream than pertains to the direct
 reaction to the stimuli. The origin, therefore, of the rest of the dream
 remains obscure.
 
 Let us, however, notice a peculiarity of dream life which becomes
 apparent in the study of these effects of stimuli. The dream does not
 simply reproduce the stimulus, but it elaborates it, it plays upon it,
 places it in a sequence of relationships, replaces it with something
 else. That is a side of dream activity which must interest us because it
 may lead us closer to the nature of the dream. If one does something
 under stimulation, then this stimulation need not exhaust the act.
 Shakespeare's _Macbeth_, for example, is a drama created on the occasion
 of the coronation of the King who for the first time wore upon his head
 the crown symbolizing the union of three countries. But does this
 historical occasion cover the content of the drama, does it explain its
 greatness and its riddle? Perhaps the external and internal stimuli,
 acting upon the sleeper, are only the incitors of the dream, of whose
 nature nothing is betrayed to us from our knowledge of that fact.
 
 The other element common to dreams, their psychic peculiarity, is on the
 one hand hard to comprehend, and on the other hand offers no point for
 further investigation. In dreams we perceive a thing for the most part
 in visual forms. Can the stimuli furnish a solution for this fact? Is it
 actually the stimulus which we experience? Why, then, is the experience
 visual when optic stimulation incited the dream only in the rarest
 cases? Or can it be proved, when we dream speeches, that during sleep a
 conversation or sounds resembling it reached our ear? This possibility I
 venture decisively to reject.
 
 If, from the common elements of dreams, we get no further, then let us
 see what we can do with their differences. Dreams are often senseless,
 blurred, absurd; but there are some that are meaningful, sober,
 sensible. Let us see if the latter, the sensible dreams, can give some
 information concerning the senseless ones. I will give you the most
 recent sensible dream which was told me, the dream of a young man: "I
 was promenading in Kaertner Street, met Mr. X. there, whom I accompanied
 for a bit, and then I went to a restaurant. Two ladies and a gentleman
 seated themselves at my table. I was annoyed at this at first, and would
 not look at them. Then I did look, and found that they were quite
 pretty." The dreamer adds that the evening before the dream he had
 really been in Kaertner Street, which is his usual route, and that he had
 met Mr. X. there. The other portion of the dream is no direct
 reminiscence, but bears a certain resemblance to a previous experience.
 Or another meaningful dream, that of a lady. "Her husband asks, 'Doesn't
 the piano need tuning?' She: 'It is not worth while; it has to be newly
 lined.'" This dream reproduces without much alteration a conversation
 which took place the day before between herself and her husband. What
 can we learn from these two sober dreams? Nothing but that you find them
 to be reproductions of daily life or ideas connected therewith. This
 would at least be something if it could be stated of all dreams. There
 is no question, however, that this applies to only a minority of dreams.
 In most dreams there is no sign of any connection with the previous day,
 and no light is thereby cast on the senseless and absurd dream. We know
 only that we have struck a new problem. We wish to know not only what it
 is that the dream says, but when, as in our examples, the dream speaks
 plainly, we also wish to know why and wherefore this recent experience
 is repeated in the dream.
 
 I believe you are as tired as I am of continuing attempts like these. We
 see, after all, that the greatest interest in a problem is inadequate if
 one does not know a path which will lead to a solution. Up to this point
 we have not found this path. Experimental psychology gave us nothing but
 a few very valuable pieces of information concerning the meaning of
 stimuli as dream incitors. We need expect nothing from philosophy except
 that lately it has taken haughtily to pointing out to us the
 intellectual inferiority of our object. Let us not apply to the occult
 sciences for help. History and popular tradition tell us that the dream
 is meaningful and significant; it sees into the future. Yet that is hard
 to accept and surely not demonstrable. Thus our first efforts end in
 entire helplessness.
 
 Unexpectedly we get a hint from a quarter toward which we have not yet
 looked. Colloquial usage--which after all is not an accidental thing but
 the remnant of ancient knowledge, though it should not be made use of
 without caution--our speech, that is to say, recognizes something which
 curiously enough it calls "day dreaming." Day dreams are phantasies.
 They are very common phenomena, again observable in the normal as well
 as in the sick, and access to their study is open to everyone in his own
 person. The most conspicuous feature about these phantastic productions
 is that they have received the name "day dreams," for they share neither
 of the two common elements of dreams. Their name contradicts the
 relation to the sleeping condition, and as regards the second common
 element, one does not experience or hallucinate anything, one only
 imagines it. One knows that it is a phantasy, that one is not seeing but
 thinking the thing. These day dreams appear in the period before
 puberty, often as early as the last years of childhood, continue into
 the years of maturity, are then either given up or retained through
 life. The content of these phantasies is dominated by very transparent
 motives. They are scenes and events in which the egoistic, ambitious and
 power-seeking desires of the individual find satisfaction. With young
 men the ambition phantasies generally prevail; in women, the erotic,
 since they have banked their ambition on success in love. But often
 enough the erotic desire appears in the background with men too; all the
 heroic deeds and incidents are after all meant only to win the
 admiration and favor of women. Otherwise these day dreams are very
 manifold and undergo changing fates. They are either, each in turn,
 abandoned after a short time and replaced by a new one, or they are
 retained, spun out into long stories, and adapted to changes in daily
 circumstances. They move with the time, so to speak, and receive from it
 a "time mark" which testifies to the influence of the new situation.
 They are the raw material of poetic production, for out of his day
 dreams the poet, with certain transformations, disguises and omissions,
 makes the situations which he puts into his novels, romances and dramas.
 The hero of the day dreams, however, is always the individual himself,
 either directly or by means of a transparent identification with
 another.
 
 Perhaps day dreams bear this name because of the similarity of their
 relation to reality, in order to indicate that their content is as
 little to be taken for real as that of dreams. Perhaps, however, this
 identity of names does nevertheless rest on a characteristic of the
 dream which is still unknown to us, perhaps even one of those
 characteristics which we are seeking. It is possible, on the other hand,
 that we are wrong in trying to read a meaning into this similarity of
 designation. Yet that can only be cleared up later.
 
 
 
 
 SIXTH LECTURE
 
 THE DREAM
 
 _Hypothesis and Technique of Interpretation_
 
 
 We must find a new path, a new method, in order to proceed with the
 investigation of the dream. I shall now make an obvious suggestion. Let
 us assume as a hypothesis for everything which follows, that _the dream
 is not a somatic but a psychic phenomenon_. You appreciate the
 significance of that statement, but what justification have we for
 making it? None; but that alone need not deter us from making it. The
 matter stands thus: If the dream is a somatic phenomenon, it does not
 concern us. It can be of interest to us only on the supposition that it
 is a _psychic_ phenomenon. Let us therefore work upon that assumption in
 order to see what comes of it. The result of our labor will determine
 whether we are to hold to this assumption and whether we may, in fact,
 consider it in turn a result. What is it that we really wish to achieve,
 to what end are we working? It is what one usually seeks to attain in
 the sciences, an understanding of phenomena, the creation of
 relationships between them, and ultimately, if possible, the extension
 of our control over them.
 
 Let us then proceed with the work on the assumption that the dream is a
 psychic phenomenon. This makes it an achievement and expression of the
 dreamer, but one that tells us nothing, one that we do not understand.
 What do you do when I make a statement you do not understand? You ask
 for an explanation, do you not? Why may we not do the same thing here,
 _ask the dreamer to give us the meaning of his dream_?
 
 If you will remember, we were in this same situation once before. It was
 when we were investigating errors, a case of a slip of the tongue.
 Someone said: "_Da sind dinge zum vorschwein gekommen_," whereupon we
 asked--no, luckily, not we, but others, persons in no way associated
 with psychoanalysis--these persons asked him what he meant by this
 unintelligible talk. He immediately answered that he had intended to say
 "_Das waren schweinereien_," but that he had suppressed this intention,
 in favor of the other, more gentle "_Da sind dinge zum vorschein
 gekommen_."[23] I explained to you at the time that this inquiry was
 typical of every psychoanalytical investigation, and now you understand
 that psychoanalysis follows the technique, as far as possible, of having
 the subjects themselves discover the solutions of their riddles. The
 dreamer himself, then, is to tell us the meaning of his dream.
 
 It is common knowledge, however, that this is not such an easy matter
 with dreams. In the case of slips, our method worked in a number of
 cases, but we encountered some where the subject did not wish to say
 anything--in fact, indignantly rejected the answer that we suggested.
 Instances of the first method are entirely lacking in the case of
 dreams; the dreamer always says he knows nothing. He cannot deny our
 interpretation, for we have none. Shall we then give up the attempt?
 Since he knows nothing and we know nothing and a third person surely
 knows nothing, it looks as though there were no possibility of
 discovering anything. If you wish, discontinue the investigation. But if
 you are of another mind, you can accompany me on the way. For I assure
 you, it is very possible, in fact, probable, that the dreamer does know
 what his dream means, but does _not know that he knows, and therefore
 believes he does not know_.
 
 You will point out to me that I am again making an assumption, the
 second in this short discourse, and that I am greatly reducing the
 credibility of my claim. On the assumption that the dream is a psychic
 phenomenon, on the further assumption that there are unconscious things
 in man which he knows without knowing that he knows, etc.--we need only
 realize clearly the intrinsic improbability of each of these two
 assumptions, and we shall calmly turn our attention from the conclusions
 to be derived from such premises.
 
 Yet, ladies and gentlemen, I have not invited you here to delude you or
 to conceal anything from you. I did, indeed, announce a _General
 Introduction to Psychoanalysis_, but I did not intend the title to
 convey that I was an oracle, who would show you a finished product with
 all the difficulties carefully concealed, all the gaps filled in and all
 the doubts glossed over, so that you might peacefully believe you had
 learned something new. No, precisely because you are beginners, I wanted
 to show you our science as it is, with all its hills and pitfalls,
 demands and considerations. For I know that it is the same in all
 sciences, and must be so in their beginnings particularly. I know, too,
 that teaching as a rule endeavors to hide these difficulties and these
 incompletely developed phases from the student. But that will not do in
 psychoanalysis. I have, as a matter of fact, made two assumptions, one
 within the other, and he who finds the whole too troublesome and too
 uncertain or is accustomed to greater security or more elegant
 derivations, need go no further with us. What I mean is, he should leave
 psychological problems entirely alone, for it must be apprehended that
 he will not find the sure and safe way he is prepared to go,
 traversable. Then, too, it is superfluous for a science that has
 something to offer to plead for auditors and adherents. Its results must
 create its atmosphere, and it must then bide its time until these have
 attracted attention to themselves.
 
 I would warn those of you, however, who care to continue, that my two
 assumptions are not of equal worth. The first, that the dream is a
 psychic phenomenon, is the assumption we wish to prove by the results of
 our work. The other has already been proved in another field, and I take
 the liberty only of transferring it from that field to our problem.
 
 Where, in what field of observation shall we seek the proof that there
 is in man a knowledge of which he is not conscious, as we here wish to
 assume in the case of the dreamer? That would be a remarkable, a
 surprising fact, one which would change our understanding of the psychic
 life, and which would have no need to hide itself. To name it would be
 to destroy it, and yet it pretends to be something real, a contradiction
 in terms. Nor does it hide itself. It is no result of the fact itself
 that we are ignorant of its existence and have not troubled sufficiently
 about it. That is just as little our fault as the fact that all these
 psychological problems are condemned by persons who have kept away from
 all observations and experiments which are decisive in this respect.
 
 The proof appeared in the field of hypnotic phenomena. When, in the year
 1889, I was a witness to the extraordinarily enlightening demonstrations
 of Siebault and Bernheim in Nancy, I witnessed also the following
 experiment: If one placed a man in the somnambulistic state, allowed him
 to have all manner of hallucinatory experience, and then woke him up, it
 appeared in the first instance that he knew nothing about what had
 happened during his hypnotic sleep. Bernheim then directly invited him
 to relate what had happened to him during the hypnosis. He maintained he
 was unable to recall anything. But Bernheim insisted, he persisted, he
 assured him he did know, that he must recall, and, incredible though it
 may seem, the man wavered, began to rack his memory, recalled in a
 shadowy way first one of the suggested experiences, then another; the
 recollection became more and more complete and finally was brought forth
 without a gap. The fact that he had this knowledge finally, and that he
 had had no experiences from any other source in the meantime, permits
 the conclusion that he knew of these recollections in the beginning.
 They were merely inaccessible, he did not know that he knew them; he
 believed he did not know them. This is exactly what we suspect in the
 dreamer.
 
 I trust you are taken by surprise by the establishment of this fact, and
 that you will ask me why I did not refer to this proof before in the
 case of the slips, where we credited the man who made a mistake in
 speech with intentions he knew nothing about and which he denied. "If a
 person believes he knows nothing concerning experiences, the memory of
 which, however, he retains," you might say, "it is no longer so
 improbable that there are also other psychic experiences within him of
 whose existence he is ignorant. This argument would have impressed us
 and advanced us in the understanding of errors." To be sure, I might
 then have referred to this but I reserved it for another place, where it
 was more necessary. Errors have in a measure explained themselves, have,
 in part, furnished us with the warning that we must assume the existence
 of psychic processes of which we know nothing, for the sake of the
 connection of the phenomena. In dreams we are compelled to look to other
 sources for explanations; and besides, I count on the fact that you will
 permit the inference I draw from hypnotism more readily in this
 instance. The condition in which we make mistakes most seem to you to
 be the normal one. It has no similarity to the hypnotic. On the other
 hand, there is a clear relationship between the hypnotic state and
 sleep, which is the essential condition of dreams. Hypnotism is known as
 artificial sleep; we say to the person whom we hypnotize, "Sleep," and
 the suggestions which we throw out are comparable to the dreams of
 natural sleep. The psychical conditions are in both cases really
 analogous. In natural sleep we withdraw our attention from the entire
 outside world; in the hypnotic, on the other hand, from the whole world
 with the exception of the one person who has hypnotized us, with whom we
 remain in touch. Furthermore, the so-called nurse's sleep in which the
 nurse remains in touch with the child, and can be waked only by him, is
 a normal counterpart of hypnotism. The transference of one of the
 conditions of hypnotism to natural sleep does not appear to be such a
 daring proceeding. The inferential assumption that there is also present
 in the case of the dreamer a knowledge of his dream, a knowledge which
 is so inaccessible that he does not believe it himself, does not seem to
 be made out of whole cloth. Let us note that at this point there appears
 a third approach to the study of the dream; from the sleep-disturbing
 stimuli, from the day-dreams, and now in addition, from the suggested
 dreams of the hypnotic state.
 
 Now we return, perhaps with increased faith, to our problem. Apparently
 it is very probable that the dreamer knows of his dream; the question
 is, how to make it possible for him to discover this knowledge, and to
 impart it to us? We do not demand that he give us the meaning of his
 dream at once, but he will be able to discover its origin, the thought
 and sphere of interest from which it springs. In the case of the errors,
 you will remember, the man was asked how he happened to use the wrong
 word, "_vorschwein_," and his next idea gave us the explanation. Our
 dream technique is very simple, an imitation of this example. We again
 ask how the subject happened to have the dream, and his next statement
 is again to be taken as an explanation. We disregard the distinction
 whether the dreamer believes or does not believe he knows, and treat
 both cases in the same way.
 
 This technique is very simple indeed, but I am afraid it will arouse
 your sharpest opposition. You will say, "a new assumption. The third!
 And the most improbable of all! If I ask the dreamer what he considers
 the explanation of his dream to be, his very next association is to be
 the desired explanation? But it may be he thinks of nothing at all, or
 his next thought may be anything at all. We cannot understand upon what
 we can base such anticipation. This, really, is putting too much faith
 in a situation where a slightly more critical attitude would be more
 suitable. Furthermore, a dream is not an isolated error, but consists of
 many elements. To which idea should we pin our faith?"
 
 You are right in all the non-essentials. A dream must indeed be
 distinguished from a word slip, even in the number of its elements. The
 technique is compelled to consider this very carefully. Let me suggest
 that we separate the dream into its elements, and carry on the
 investigation of each element separately; then the analogy to the
 word-slip is again set up. You are also correct when you say that in
 answer to the separate dream elements no association may occur to the
 dreamer. There are cases in which we accept this answer, and later you
 will hear what those cases are. They are, oddly enough, cases in which
 we ourselves may have certain associations. But in general we shall
 contradict the dreamer when he maintains he has no associations. We
 shall insist that he must have some association and--we shall be
 justified. He will bring forth some association, any one, it makes no
 difference to us. He will be especially facile with certain information
 which might be designated as historical. He will say, "that is something
 that happened yesterday" (as in the two "prosaic" dreams with which we
 are acquainted); or, "that reminds me of something that happened
 recently," and in this manner we shall notice that the act of
 associating the dreams with recent impressions is much more frequent
 than we had at first supposed. Finally, the dreamer will remember
 occurrences more remote from the dream, and ultimately even events in
 the far past.
 
 But in the essential matters you are mistaken. If you believe that we
 assume arbitrarily that the dreamer's next association will disclose
 just what we are seeking, or must lead to it, that on the contrary the
 association is just as likely to be entirely inconsequential, and
 without any connection with what we are seeking, and that it is an
 example of my unbounded optimism to expect anything else, then you are
 greatly mistaken. I have already taken the liberty of pointing out that
 in each one of you there is a deep-rooted belief in psychic freedom and
 volition, a belief which is absolutely unscientific, and which must
 capitulate before the claims of a determinism that controls even the
 psychic life. I beg of you to accept it as a fact that only this one
 association will occur to the person questioned. But I do not put one
 belief in opposition to another. It can be proved that the association,
 which the subject produces, is not voluntary, is not indeterminable, not
 unconnected with what we seek. Indeed, I discovered long ago--without,
 however, laying too much stress on the discovery--that even experimental
 psychology has brought forth this evidence.
 
 I ask you to give your particular attention to the significance of this
 subject. If I invite a person to tell me what occurs to him in relation
 to some certain element of his dream I am asking him to abandon himself
 to free association, _controlled by a given premise_. This demands a
 special delimitation of the attention, quite different from cogitation,
 in fact, exclusive of cogitation. Many persons put themselves into such
 a state easily; others show an extraordinarily high degree of
 clumsiness. There is a higher level of free association again, where I
 omit this original premise and designate only the manner of the
 association, e.g., rule that the subject freely give a proper name or a
 number. Such an association would be more voluntary, more
 indeterminable, than the one called forth by our technique. But it can
 be shown that it is strongly determined each time by an important inner
 mental set which, at the moment at which it is active, is unknown to us,
 just as unknown as the disturbing tendencies in the case of errors and
 the provocative tendencies in the case of accidental occurrences.
 
 I, and many others after me, have again and again instigated such
 investigations for names and numbers which occur to the subject without
 any restraint, and have published some results. The method is the
 following: Proceeding from the disclosed names, we awaken continuous
 associations which then are no longer entirely free, but rather are
 limited as are the associations to the dream elements, and this is true
 until the impulse is exhausted. By that time, however, the motivation
 and significance of the free name associations is explained. The
 investigations always yield the same results, the information often
 covers a wealth of material and necessitates lengthy elaboration. The
 associations to freely appearing numbers are perhaps the most
 significant. They follow one another so quickly and approach a hidden
 goal with such inconceivable certainty, that it is really startling. I
 want to give you an example of such a name analysis, one that, happily,
 involves very little material.
 
 In the course of my treatment of a young man, I referred to this subject
 and mentioned the fact that despite the apparent volition it is
 impossible to have a name occur which does not appear to be limited by
 the immediate conditions, the peculiarities of the subject, and the
 momentary situation. He was doubtful, and I proposed that he make such
 an attempt immediately. I know he has especially numerous relations of
 every sort with women and girls, and so am of the opinion that he will
 have an unusually wide choice if he happens to think of a woman's name.
 He agrees. To my astonishment, and perhaps even more to his, no
 avalanche of women's names descends upon my head, but he is silent for a
 time, and then admits that a single name has occurred to him--and no
 other: _Albino_. How extraordinary, but what associations have you with
 this name? How many albinoes do you know? Strangely enough, he knew no
 albinoes, and there were no further associations with the name. One
 might conclude the analysis had proved a failure; but no--it was already
 complete; no further association was necessary. The man himself had
 unusually light coloring. In our talks during the cure I had frequently
 called him an albino in fun. We were at the time occupied in determining
 the feminine characteristics of his nature. He himself was the Albino,
 who at that moment was to him the most interesting feminine person.
 
 In like manner, melodies, which come for no reason, show themselves
 conditioned by and associated with a train of thought which has a right
 to occupy one, yet of whose activity one is unconscious. It is easily
 demonstrable that the attraction to the melody is associated with the
 text, or its origin. But I must take the precaution not to include in
 this assertion really musical people, with whom, as it happens, I have
 had no experience. In their cases the musical meaning of the melody may
 have occasioned its occurrence. More often the first reason holds. I
 know of a young man who for a time was actually haunted by the really
 charming melody of the song of Paris, from _The Beautiful Helen_, until
 the analysis brought to his attention the fact that at that time his
 interest was divided between an Ida and a Helen.
 
 If then the entirely unrestrained associations are conditioned in such a
 manner and are arranged in a distinct order, we are justified in
 concluding that associations with a single condition, that of an
 original premise, or starting point, may be conditioned to no less
 degree. The investigation does in fact show that aside from the
 conditioning which we have established by the premise, a second farther
 dependence is recognizable upon powerful affective thoughts, upon cycles
 of interest and complexes of whose influence we are ignorant, therefore
 unconscious at the time.
 
 Associations of this character have been the subject matter of very
 enlightening experimental investigations, which have played a noteworthy
 role in the history of psychoanalysis. The Wundt school proposed the
 so-called association-experiment, wherein the subject is given the task
 of answering in the quickest possible time, with any desired reaction,
 to a given stimulus-word. It is then possible to study the interval of
 time that elapses between the stimulus and the reaction, the nature of
 the answer given as reaction, the possible mistake in a subsequent
 repetition of the same attempt, and similar matters. The Zurich School
 under the leadership of Bleuler and Jung, gave the explanation of the
 reactions following the association-experiment, by asking the subject to
 explain a given reaction by means of further associations, in the cases
 where there was anything extraordinary in the reaction. It then became
 apparent that these extraordinary reactions were most sharply determined
 by the complexes of the subject. In this matter Bleuler and Jung built
 the first bridge from experimental psychology to psychoanalysis.
 
 Thus instructed, you will be able to say, "We recognize now that free
 associations are predetermined, not voluntary, as we had believed. We
 admit this also as regards the associations connected with the elements
 of the dream, but that is not what we are concerned with. You maintain
 that the associations to the dream element are determined by the unknown
 psychic background of this very element. We do not think that this is a
 proven fact. We expect, to be sure, that the association to the dream
 element will clearly show itself through one of the complexes of the
 dreamer, but what good is that to us? That does not lead us to
 understand the dream, but rather, as in the case of the
 association-experiment, to a knowledge of the so-called complexes. What
 have these to do with the dream?"
 
 You are right, but you overlook one point, in fact, the very point
 because of which I did not choose the association-experiment as the
 starting point for this exposition. In this experiment the one
 determinate of the reaction, viz., the stimulus word, is voluntarily
 chosen. The reaction is then an intermediary between this stimulus word
 and the recently aroused complex of the subject. In the dream the
 stimulus word is replaced by something that itself has its origin in the
 psychic life of the dreamer, in sources unknown to him, hence very
 likely itself a product of the complex. It is not an altogether
 fantastic hypothesis, then, that the more remote associations, even
 those that are connected with the dream element, are determined by no
 other complex than the one which determines the dream element itself,
 and will lead to the disclosure of the complex.
 
 Let me show you by another case that the situation is really as we
 expect it to be. Forgetting proper names is really a splendid example
 for the case of dream analysis; only here there is present in one person
 what in the dream interpretation is divided between two persons. Though
 I have forgotten a name temporarily I still retain the certainty that I
 know the name; that certainty which we could acquire for the dreamer
 only by way of the Bernheim experiment. The forgotten name, however, is
 not accessible. Cogitation, no matter how strenuous, does not help.
 Experience soon tells me that. But I am able each time to find one or
 more substitute names for the forgotten name. If such a substitute name
 occurs to me spontaneously then the correspondence between this
 situation and that of the dream analysis first becomes evident. Nor is
 the dream element the real thing, but only a substitute for something
 else, for what particular thing I do not know, but am to discover by
 means of the dream analysis. The difference lies only in this, that in
 forgetting a name I recognize the substitute automatically as
 unsuitable, while in the dream element we must acquire this
 interpretation with great labor. When a name is forgotten, too, there
 is a way to go from the substitute to the unknown reality, to arrive at
 the forgotten name. If I centre my attention on the substitute name and
 allow further associations to accumulate, I arrive in a more or less
 roundabout way at the forgotten name, and discover that the spontaneous
 substitute names, together with those called up by me, have a certain
 connection with the forgotten name, were conditioned by it.
 
 I want to show you an analysis of this type. One day I noticed that I
 could not recall the name of the little country in the Riviera of which
 Monte Carlo is the capital. It is very annoying, but it is true. I steep
 myself in all my knowledge about this country, think of Prince Albert,
 of the house of Lusignan, of his marriages, his preference for deep-sea
 study, and anything else I can think of, but to no avail. So I give up
 the thinking, and in place of the lost name allow substitute names to
 suggest themselves. They come quickly--Monte Carlo itself, then
 Piedmont, Albania, Montevideo, Colico. Albania is the first to attract
 my attention, it is replaced by Montenegro, probably because of the
 contrast between black and white. Then I see that four of these
 substitutes contain the same syllable _mon_. I suddenly have the
 forgotten word, and cry aloud, "_Monaco_." The substitutes really
 originated in the forgotten word, the four first from the first
 syllable, the last brings back the sequence of syllables and the entire
 final syllable. In addition, I am also able easily to discover what it
 was that took the name from my memory for a time. Monaco is also the
 Italian name of Munich; this latter town exerted the inhibiting
 influence.
 
 The example is pretty enough, but too simple. In other cases we must add
 to the first substitute names a long line of associations, and then the
 analogy to the dream interpretation becomes clearer. I have also had
 such experiences. Once when a stranger invited me to drink Italian wine
 with him, it so happened in the hostelry that he forgot the name of the
 wine he had intended to order just because he had retained a most
 pleasant memory of it. Out of a profusion of dissimilar substitute
 associations which came to him in the place of the forgotten name, I was
 able to conclude that the memory of some one named Hedwig had deprived
 him of the name of the wine, and he actually confirmed not only that he
 had first tasted this wine in the company of a Hedwig, but he also, as
 a result of this declaration, recollected the name again. He was at the
 time happily married, and this Hedwig belonged to former times, not now
 recalled with pleasure.
 
 What is possible in forgetting names must work also in dream
 interpretation, viz., making the withheld actuality accessible by means
 of substitutions and through connecting associations. As exemplified by
 name-forgetting, we may conclude that in the case of the associations to
 the dream element they will be determined as well by the dream element
 as by its unknown essential. Accordingly, we have advanced a few steps
 in the formulation of our dream technique.
 
 
 
 
 SEVENTH LECTURE
 
 THE DREAM
 
 _Manifest Dream Content and Latent Dream Thought_
 
 
 We have not studied the problem of errors in vain. Thanks to our efforts
 in this field, under the conditions known to you, we have evolved two
 different things, a conception of the elements of the dream and a
 technique for dream interpretation. The conception of the dream element
 goes to show something unreal, a substitute for something else, unknown
 to the dreamer, similar to the tendency of errors, a substitute for
 something the dreamer knows but cannot approach. We hope to transfer the
 same conception to the whole dream, which consists of just such
 elements. Our method consists of calling up, by means of free
 associations, other substitute formations in addition to these elements,
 from which we divine what is hidden.
 
 Let me ask you to permit a slight change in our nomenclature which will
 greatly increase the flexibility of our vocabulary. Instead of hidden,
 unapproachable, unreal, let us give a truer description and say
 inaccessible or unknown to the consciousness of the dreamer. By this we
 mean only what the connection with the lost word or with the interfering
 intention of the error can suggest to you, namely, unconscious _for the
 time being_. Naturally in contrast to this we may term _conscious_ the
 elements of the dream itself and the substitute formations just gained
 by association. As yet there is absolutely no theoretical construction
 implied in this nomenclature. The use of the word unconscious as a
 suitable and intelligible descriptive epithet is above criticism.
 
 If we transfer our conception from a single element to the entire dream,
 we find that the dream as a whole is a distorted substitute for
 something else, something unconscious. To discover this unconscious
 thing is the task of dream interpretation. From this, three important
 rules, which we must observe in the work of dream interpretation, are
 straightway derived:
 
 1. What the dream seems to say, whether it be sensible or absurd, clear
 or confused is not our concern, since it can under no condition be that
 unconscious content we are seeking. Later we shall have to observe an
 obvious limitation of this rule. 2. The awakening of substitute
 formations for each element shall be the sole object of our work. We
 shall not reflect on these, test their suitability or trouble how far
 they lead away from the element of the dream. 3. We shall wait until the
 hidden unconscious we are seeking appears of itself, as the missing word
 _Monaco_ in the experiment which we have described.
 
 Now we can understand, too, how unimportant it is how much, how little,
 above all, how accurately or how indifferently the dream is remembered.
 For the dream which is remembered is not the real one, but a distorted
 substitute, which is to help us approach the real dream by awakening
 other substitute formations and by making the unconscious in the dream
 conscious. Therefore if our recollection of the dream was faulty, it has
 simply brought about a further distortion of this substitute, a
 distortion which cannot, however, be unmotivated.
 
 One can interpret one's own dreams as well as those of others. One
 learns even more from these, for the process yields more proof. If we
 try this, we observe that something impedes the work. Haphazard ideas
 arise, but we do not let them have their way. Tendencies to test and to
 choose make themselves felt. As an idea occurs, we say to ourselves "No,
 that does not fit, that does not belong here"; of a second "that is too
 senseless"; of a third, "this is entirely beside the point"; and one can
 easily observe how the ideas are stifled and suppressed by these
 objections, even before they have become entirely clear. On the one
 hand, therefore, too much importance is attached to the dream elements
 themselves; on the other, the result of free association is vitiated by
 the process of selection. If you are not interpreting the dream alone,
 if you allow someone else to interpret it for you, you will soon
 discover another motive which induces you to make this forbidden choice.
 At times you say to yourself, "No, this idea is too unpleasant, I either
 will not or cannot divulge this."
 
 Clearly these objections are a menace to the success of our work. We
 must guard against them, in our own case by the firm resolve not to give
 way to them; and in the interpretation of the dreams of others by making
 the hard and fast rule for them, never to omit any idea from their
 account, even if one of the following four objections should arise: that
 is, if it should seem too unimportant, absurd, too irrelevant or too
 embarrassing to relate. The dreamer promises to obey this rule, but it
 is annoying to see how poorly he keeps his promise at times. At first we
 account for this by supposing that in spite of the authoritative
 assurance which has been given to the dreamer, he is not impressed with
 the importance of free association, and plan perhaps to win his
 theoretic approval by giving him papers to read or by sending him to
 lectures which are to make him a disciple of our views concerning free
 association. But we are deterred from such blunders by the observation
 that, in one's own case, where convictions may certainly be trusted, the
 same critical objections arise against certain ideas, and can only be
 suppressed subsequently, upon second thought, as it were.
 
 Instead of becoming vexed at the disobedience of the dreamer, these
 experiences can be turned to account in teaching something new,
 something which is the more important the less we are prepared for it.
 We understand that the task of interpreting dreams is carried on against
 a certain _resistance_ which manifests itself by these critical
 objections. This resistance is independent of the theoretical conviction
 of the dreamer. Even more is apparent. We discover that such a critical
 objection is never justified. On the contrary, those ideas which we are
 so anxious to suppress, prove _without exception_ to be the most
 important, the most decisive, in the search for the unconscious. It is
 even a mark of distinction if an idea is accompanied by such an
 objection.
 
 This resistance is something entirely new, a phenomenon which we have
 found as a result of our hypotheses although it was not originally
 included in them. We are not too pleasantly surprised by this new factor
 in our problem. We suspect that it will not make our work any easier. It
 might even tempt us to abandon our entire work in connection with the
 dream. Such an unimportant thing as the dream and in addition such
 difficulties instead of a smooth technique! But from another point of
 view, these same difficulties may prove fascinating, and suggest that
 the work is worth the trouble. Whenever we try to penetrate to the
 hidden unconscious, starting out from the substitute which the dream
 element represents, we meet with resistance. Hence, we are justified in
 supposing that something of weight must be hidden behind the substitute.
 What other reason could there be for the difficulties which are
 maintained for purposes of concealment? If a child does not want to open
 his clenched fist, he is certainly hiding something he ought not to
 have.
 
 Just as soon as we bring the dynamic representation of resistance into
 our consideration of the case, we must realize that this factor is
 something quantitatively variable. There may be greater or lesser
 resistances and we are prepared to see these differences in the course
 of our work. We may perhaps connect this with another experience found
 in the work of dream interpretation. For sometimes only one or two ideas
 serve to carry us from the dream element to its unconscious aspect,
 while at other times long chains of associations and the suppression of
 many critical objections are necessary. We shall note that these
 variations are connected with the variable force of resistance. This
 observation is probably correct. If resistance is slight, then the
 substitute is not far removed from the unconscious, but strong
 resistance carries with it a great distortion of the unconscious and in
 addition a long journey back to it.
 
 Perhaps the time has come to take a dream and try out our method to see
 if our faith in it shall be confirmed. But which dream shall we choose?
 You cannot imagine how hard it is for me to decide, and at this point I
 cannot explain the source of the difficulty. Of course, there must be
 dreams which, as a whole, have suffered slight distortion, and it would
 be best to start with one of these. But which dreams are the least
 distorted? Those which are sensible and not confused, of which I have
 already given you two examples? This would be a gross misunderstanding.
 Testing shows that these dreams have suffered by distortion to an
 exceptionally high degree. But if I take the first best dream,
 regardless of certain necessary conditions, you would probably be very
 much disappointed. Perhaps we should have to note such an abundance of
 ideas in connection with single elements of dream that it would be
 absolutely impossible to review the work in perspective. If we write the
 dream out and confront it with the written account of all the ideas
 which arise in connection with it, these may easily amount to a
 reiteration of the text of the dream. It would therefore seem most
 practical to choose for analysis several short dreams of which each one
 can at least reveal or confirm something. This is what we shall decide
 upon, provided experience should not point out where we shall really
 find slightly distorted dreams.
 
 But I know of another way to simplify matters, one which, moreover, lies
 in our path. Instead of attempting the interpretation of entire dreams,
 we shall limit ourselves to single dream elements and by observing a
 series of examples we shall see how these are explained by the
 application of our method.
 
 1. A lady relates that as a child she often dreamt "_that God had a
 pointed paper hat on his head_." How do you expect to understand that
 without the help of the dreamer? Why, it sounds quite absurd. It is no
 longer absurd when the lady testifies that as a child she was frequently
 made to wear such a hat at the table, because she could not help
 stealing glances at the plates of her brothers and sisters to see if one
 of them had gotten more than she. The hat was therefore supposed to act
 as a sort of blinder. This explanation was moreover historic, and given
 without the least difficulty. The meaning of this fragment and of the
 whole brief dream, is clear with the help of a further idea of the
 dreamer. "Since I had heard that God was all-knowing and all-seeing,"
 she said, "the dream can only mean that I know everything and see
 everything just as God does, even when they try to prevent me." This
 example is perhaps too simple.
 
 2. A sceptical patient has a longer dream, in which certain people
 happen to tell her about my book concerning laughter and praise it
 highly. Then something is mentioned about a certain "_'canal,' perhaps
 another book in which 'canal' occurs, or something else with the word
 'canal' ... she doesn't know ... it is all confused_."
 
 Now you will be inclined to think that the element "canal" will evade
 interpretation because it is so vague. You are right as to the supposed
 difficulty, but it is not difficult because it is vague, but rather it
 is vague for a different reason, the same reason which also makes the
 interpretation difficult. The dreamer can think of nothing concerning
 the word canal, I naturally can think of nothing. A little while later,
 as a matter of fact on the next day, she tells me that something
 occurred to her that _may perhaps_ be related to it, a joke that she has
 heard. On a ship between Dover and Calais a well-known author is
 conversing with an Englishman, who quoted the following proverb in a
 certain connection: "_Du sublime au ridicule, il n'y a qu'un pas_."[24]
 The author answers, "_Oui, le pas de Calais_,"[25] with which he wishes
 to say that he finds France sublime and England ridiculous. But the
 "_Pas de Calais_" is really a canal, namely, the English Channel. Do I
 think that this idea has anything to do with the dream? Certainly, I
 believe that it really gives the solution to the puzzling dream
 fragments. Or can you doubt that this joke was already present in the
 dream, as the unconscious factor of the element, "canal." Can you take
 it for granted that it was subsequently added to it? The idea testifies
 to the scepticism which is concealed behind her obtrusive admiration,
 and the resistance is probably the common reason for both phenomena, for
 the fact that the idea came so hesitatingly and that the decisive
 element of the dream turned out to be so vague. Kindly observe at this
 point the relation of the dream element to its unconscious factor. It is
 like a small part of the unconscious, like an allusion to it; through
 its isolation it became quite unintelligible.
 
 3. A patient dreams, in the course of a longer dream: "_Around a table
 of peculiar shape several members of his family are sitting, etc._" In
 connection with this table, it occurs to him that he saw such a piece of
 furniture during a visit to a certain family. Then his thoughts
 continue: In this family a peculiar relation had existed between father
 and son, and soon he adds to this that as a matter of fact the same
 relation exists between himself and his father. The table is therefore
 taken up into the dream to designate this parallel.
 
 This dreamer had for a long time been familiar with the claims of dream
 interpretation. Otherwise he might have taken exception to the fact that
 so trivial a detail as the shape of a table should be taken as the
 basis of the investigation. As a matter of fact we judge nothing in the
 dream as accidental or indifferent, and we expect to reach our
 conclusion by the explanation of just such trivial and unmotivated
 details. Perhaps you will be surprised that the dream work should arouse
 the thought "we are in exactly the same position as they are," just by
 the choice of the table. But even this becomes clear when you learn that
 the name of the family in question is _Tischler_. By permitting his own
 family to sit at such a table, he intends to express that they too are
 _Tischler_. Please note how, in relating such a dream interpretation,
 one must of necessity become indiscreet. Here you have arrived at one of
 the difficulties in the choice of examples that I indicated before. I
 could easily have substituted another example for this one, but would
 probably have avoided this indiscretion at the cost of committing
 another one in its place.
 
 The time has come to introduce two new terms, which we could have used
 long ago. We shall call that which the dream relates, the manifest
 content of the dream; that which is hidden, which we can only reach by
 the analysis of ideas we shall call latent dream thoughts. We may now
 consider the connection between the manifest dream content and the
 latent dream thoughts as they are revealed in these examples. Many
 different connections can exist. In examples 1 and 2 the manifest
 content is also a constituent part of the latent thought, but only a
 very small part of it. A small piece of a great composite psychic
 structure in the unconscious dream thought has penetrated into the
 manifest dream, like a fragment of it, or in other cases, like an
 allusion to it, like a catchword or an abbreviation in the telegraphic
 code. The interpretation must mould this fragment, or indication, into a
 whole, as was done most successfully in example 2. One sort of
 distortion of which the dream mechanism consists is therefore
 substitution by means of a fragment or an allusion. In the third,
 moreover, we must recognize another relation which we shall see more
 clearly and distinctly expressed in the following examples:
 
 4. The dreamer "_pulls a certain woman of his acquaintance from behind a
 bed_." He finds the meaning of this dream element himself by his first
 association. It means: This woman "has a pull" with him.[26]
 
 5. Another man dreams that "_his brother is in a closet_." The first
 association substitutes _clothes-press_ for closet, and the second gives
 the meaning: his brother is _close-pressed_ for money.[27]
 
 6. The dreamer "_climbs a mountain from the top of which he has an
 extraordinarily distant view_." This sounds quite sensible; perhaps
 there is nothing about it that needs interpretation, and it is simply
 necessary to find out which reminiscence this dream touches upon and why
 it was recalled. But you are mistaken; it is evident that this dream
 requires interpretation as well as any other which is confused. For no
 previous mountain climbing of his own occurs to the dreamer, but he
 remembers that an acquaintance of his is publishing a "_Rundschau_,"
 which deals with our relation to the furthermost parts of the earth. The
 latent dream thought is therefore in this case an identification of the
 dreamer with the "_Rundschauer_."
 
 Here you find a new type of connection between the manifest content and
 the latent dream element. The former is not so much a distortion of the
 latter as a representation of it, a plastic concrete perversion that is
 based on the sound of the word. However, it is for this very reason
 again a distortion, for we have long ago forgotten from which concrete
 picture the word has arisen, and therefore do not recognize it by the
 image which is substituted for it. If you consider that the manifest
 dream consists most often of visual images, and less frequently of
 thoughts and words, you can imagine that a very particular significance
 in dream formation is attached to this sort of relation. You can also
 see that in this manner it becomes possible to create substitute
 formations for a great number of abstract thoughts in the manifest
 dream, substitutions that serve the purpose of further concealment all
 the same. This is the technique of our picture puzzle. What the origin
 is of the semblance of wit which accompanies such representations is a
 particular question which we need not touch upon at this time.
 
 A fourth type of relation between the manifest and the latent dream
 cannot be dealt with until its cue in the technique has been given. Even
 then I shall not have given you a complete enumeration, but it will be
 sufficient for our purpose.
 
 Have you the courage to venture upon the interpretation of an entire
 dream? Let us see if we are well enough equipped for this undertaking.
 Of course, I shall not choose one of the most obscure, but one
 nevertheless that shows in clear outline the general characteristics of
 a dream.
 
 A young woman who has been married for many years dreams: "_She is
 sitting in the theatre with her husband; one side of the orchestra is
 entirely unoccupied. Her husband tells her that Elise L. and her
 bridegroom had also wished to come, but had only been able to procure
 poor seats, three for_ 1 _Fl.,_ 50 _Kr. and those of course they could
 not take. She thinks this is no misfortune for them._"
 
 The first thing that the dreamer has to testify is that the occasion for
 the dream is touched upon in its manifest content. Her husband had
 really told her that Elise L., an acquaintance of about her age, had
 become engaged. The dream is the reaction to this news. We already know
 that in the case of many dreams it is easy to trace such a cause to the
 preceding day, and that the dreamer often gives these deductions without
 any difficulty. The dreamer also places at our disposal further
 information for other parts of the manifest dream content. Whence the
 detail that one side of the orchestra is unoccupied? It is an allusion
 to an actual occurrence of the previous week. She had made up her mind
 to go to a certain performance and had procured tickets in advance, so
 much in advance that she had been forced to pay a preference tax.[28]
 When she arrived at the theatre, she saw how needless had been her
 anxiety, for _one side of the orchestra was almost empty_. She could
 have bought the tickets on the day of the performance itself. Her
 husband would not stop teasing her about her excessive haste. Whence the
 1 Fl. 50 Kr.? From a very different connection that has nothing to do
 with the former, but which also alludes to an occurrence of the previous
 day. Her sister-in-law had received 150 florins as a present from her
 husband, and knew no better, the poor goose, than to hasten to the
 jeweler and spend the money on a piece of jewelry. Whence the number 3?
 She can think of nothing in connection with this unless one stresses the
 association that the bride, Elise L., is only three months younger than
 she herself, who has been married for almost ten years. And the
 absurdity of buying three tickets for two people? She says nothing of
 this, and indeed denies all further associations or information.
 
 But she has given us so much material in her few associations, that it
 becomes possible to derive the latent dream thought from it. It must
 strike us that in her remarks concerning the dream, time elements which
 constitute a common element in the various parts of this material appear
 at several points. She attended to the tickets _too soon_, took them
 _too hastily_, so that she had to pay more than usual for them; her
 sister-in-law likewise _hastened_ to carry her money to the jeweler's to
 buy a piece of jewelry, just as if she might _miss_ it. Let us add to
 the expressions "_too early_," "_precipitately_," which are emphasized
 so strongly, the occasion for the dream, namely, that her friend only
 three months younger than herself had even now gotten a good husband,
 and the criticism expressed in the condemnation of her sister-in-law,
 that it was _foolish_ to hurry so. Then the following construction of
 the latent dream thought, for which the manifest dream is a badly
 distorted substitute, comes to us almost spontaneously:
 
 "How _foolish_ it was of me to hurry so in marrying! Elise's example
 shows me that I could have gotten a husband later too." (The
 precipitateness is represented by her own behavior in buying the
 tickets, and that of her sister-in-law in purchasing jewelry. Going to
 the theatre was substituted for getting married. This appears to have
 been the main thought; and perhaps we may continue, though with less
 certainty, because the analysis in these parts is not supported by
 statements of the dreamer.) "And I would have gotten 100 times as much
 for my money." (150 Fl. is 100 times as much as 1 Fl. 50 Kr.). If we
 might substitute the dowry for the money, then it would mean that one
 buys a husband with a dowry; the jewelry as well as the poor seats would
 represent the husband. It would be even more desirable if the fragment
 "3 seats" had something to do with a husband. But our understanding does
 not penetrate so far. We have only guessed that the dream expresses her
 _disparagement_ of her own husband, and her regret at having _married so
 early_.
 
 It is my opinion that we are more surprised and confused than satisfied
 by the result of this first dream interpretation. We are swamped by more
 impressions than we can master. We see that the teachings of dream
 interpretation are not easily exhausted. Let us hasten to select those
 points that we recognize as giving us new, sound insight.
 
 In the first place, it is remarkable that in the latent thought the main
 emphasis falls on the element of haste; in the manifest dream there is
 absolutely no mention of this to be found. Without the analysis we
 should not have had any idea that this element was of any importance at
 all. So it seems possible that just the main thing, the central point of
 the unconscious thoughts, may be absent in the manifest dream. Because
 of this, the original impression in the dream must of necessity be
 entirely changed. Secondly: In the dream there is a senseless
 combination, 3 for 1 Fl. 50 Kr.; in the dream thought we divine the
 sentence, "It was senseless (to marry so early)." Can one deny that this
 thought, "It was senseless," was represented in the manifest dream by
 the introduction of an absurd element? Thirdly: Comparison will show
 that the relation between the manifest and latent elements is not
 simple, certainly not of such a sort that a manifest element is always
 substituted for the latent. There must rather be a quantitative
 relationship between the two groups, according to which a manifest
 element may represent several latent ones, or a latent element
 represented by several manifest elements.
 
 Much that is surprising might also be said of the sense of the dream and
 the dreamer's reaction to it. She acknowledges the interpretation but
 wonders at it. She did not know that she disparaged her husband so, and
 she did not know why she should disparage him to such a degree. There is
 still much that is incomprehensible. I really believe that we are not
 yet fully equipped for dream interpretation, and that we must first
 receive further instruction and preparation.
 
 
 
 
 EIGHTH LECTURE
 
 THE DREAM
 
 _Dreams of Childhood_
 
 
 We think we have advanced too rapidly. Let us go back a little. Before
 our last attempt to overcome the difficulties of dream distortion
 through our technique, we had decided that it would be best to avoid
 them by limiting ourselves only to those dreams in which distortion is
 either entirely absent or of trifling importance, if there are such. But
 here again we digress from the history of the evolution of our
 knowledge, for as a matter of fact we become aware of dreams entirely
 free of distortion only after the consistent application of our method
 of interpretation and after complete analysis of the distorted dream.
 
 The dreams we are looking for are found in children. They are short,
 clear, coherent, easy to understand, unambiguous, and yet unquestionable
 dreams. But do not think that all children's dreams are like this. Dream
 distortion makes its appearance very early in childhood, and dreams of
 children from five to eight years of age have been recorded that showed
 all the characteristics of later dreams. But if you will limit
 yourselves to the age beginning with conscious psychic activity, up to
 the fourth or fifth year, you will discover a series of dreams that are
 of a so-called infantile character. In a later period of childhood you
 will be able to find some dreams of this nature occasionally. Even among
 adults, dreams that closely resemble the typically infantile ones occur
 under certain conditions.
 
 From these children's dreams we gain information concerning the nature
 of dreams with great ease and certainty, and we hope it will prove
 decisive and of universal application.
 
 1. For the understanding of these dreams we need no analysis, no
 technical methods. We need not question the child that is giving an
 account of his dream. But one must add to this a story taken from the
 life of the child. An experience of the previous day will always explain
 the dream to us. The dream is a sleep-reaction of psychic life upon
 these experiences of the day.
 
 We shall now consider a few examples so that we may base our further
 deductions upon them.
 
 _a_). A boy of 22 months is to present a basket of cherries as a
 birthday gift. He plainly does so very unwillingly, although they
 promise him that he will get some of them himself. The next morning he
 relates as his dream, "_Hermann eat all cherries_."
 
 _b_). A little girl of three and a quarter years makes her first trip
 across a lake. At the landing she does not want to leave the boat and
 cries bitterly. The time of the trip seems to her to have passed
 entirely too rapidly. The next morning she says, "_Last night I rode on
 the lake_." We may add the supplementary fact that this trip lasted
 longer.
 
 _c_). A boy of five and a quarter years is taken on an excursion into
 the Escherntal near Hallstatt. He had heard that Hallstatt lay at the
 foot of the Dachstein, and had shown great interest in this mountain.
 From his home in Aussee there was a beautiful view of the Dachstein, and
 with a telescope one could discern the Simonyhuette upon it. The child
 had tried again and again to see it through the telescope, with what
 result no one knew. He started on the excursion in a joyously expectant
 mood. Whenever a new mountain came in sight the boy asked, "Is that the
 Dachstein?" The oftener this question was answered in the negative, the
 more moody he became; later he became entirely silent and would not take
 part in a small climb to a waterfall. They thought he was overtired, but
 the next morning, he said quite happily, "_Last night I dreamed that we
 were in the Simonyhuette_." It was with this expectation, therefore, that
 he had taken part in the excursion. The only detail he gave was one he
 had heard before, "you had to climb steps for six hours."
 
 These three dreams will suffice for all the information we desire.
 
 2. We see that children's dreams are not meaningless; they are
 _intelligible, significant, psychic acts_. You will recall what I
 represented to you as the medical opinion concerning the dream, the
 simile of untrained fingers wandering aimlessly over the keys of the
 piano. You cannot fail to see how decidedly these dreams of childhood
 are opposed to this conception. But it would be strange indeed if the
 child brought forth complete psychic products in sleep, while the adult
 in the same condition contents himself with spasmodic reactions. Indeed,
 we have every reason to attribute the more normal and deeper sleep to
 the child.
 
 3. Dream distortion is lacking in these dreams, therefore they need no
 interpretation. The manifest and latent dreams are merged. _Dream
 distortion is therefore not inherent in the dream._ I may assume that
 this relieves you of a great burden. But upon closer consideration we
 shall have to admit of a tiny bit of distortion, a certain
 differentiation between manifest dream content and latent dream thought,
 even in these dreams.
 
 4. The child's dream is a reaction to an experience of the day, which
 has left behind it a regret, a longing or an unfulfilled desire. _The
 dream brings about the direct unconcealed fulfillment of this wish._ Now
 recall our discussions concerning the importance of the role of external
 or internal bodily stimuli as disturbers of sleep, or as dream
 producers. We learned definite facts about this, but could only explain
 a very small number of dreams in this way. In these children's dreams
 nothing points to the influence of such somatic stimuli; we cannot be
 mistaken, for the dreams are entirely intelligible and easy to survey.
 But we need not give up the theory of physical causation entirely on
 this account. We can only ask why at the outset we forgot that besides
 the physical stimuli there are also psychic sleep-disturbing stimuli.
 For we know that it is these stimuli that commonly cause the disturbed
 sleep of adults by preventing them from producing the ideal condition of
 sleep, the withdrawal of interest from the world. The dreamer does not
 wish to interrupt his life, but would rather continue his work with the
 things that occupy him, and for this reason he does not sleep. The
 unfulfilled wish, to which he reacts by means of the dream, is the
 psychic sleep-disturbing stimulus for the child.
 
 5. From this point we easily arrive at an explanation of the function of
 the dream. The dream, as a reaction to the psychic stimulus, must have
 the value of a release of this stimulus which results in its elimination
 and in the continuation of sleep. We do not know how this release is
 made possible by the dream, but we note that _the dream is not a
 disturber of sleep_, as calumny says, _but a guardian of sleep, whose
 duty it is to quell disturbances_. It is true, we think we would have
 slept better if we had not dreamt, but here we are wrong; as a matter of
 fact, we would not have slept at all without the help of the dream. That
 we have slept so soundly is due to the dream alone. It could not help
 disturbing us slightly, just as the night watchman often cannot avoid
 making a little noise while he drives away the rioters who would awaken
 us with their noise.
 
 6. One main characteristic of the dream is that a wish is its source,
 and that the content of the dream is the gratification of this wish.
 Another equally constant feature is that the dream does not merely
 express a thought, but also represents the fulfillment of this wish in
 the form of a hallucinatory experience. "_I should like to travel on the
 lake_," says the wish that excites the dream; the dream itself has as
 its content "_I travel on the lake_." One distinction between the latent
 and manifest dream, a distortion of the latent dream thought, therefore
 remains even in the case of these simple children's dreams, namely, _the
 translation of the thought into experience_. In the interpretation of
 the dream it is of utmost importance that this change be traced back. If
 this should prove to be an extremely common characteristic of the dream,
 then the above mentioned dream fragment, "_I see my brother in a
 closet_" could not be translated, "_My brother is close-pressed_," but
 rather, "I wish that my brother were close-pressed, _my brother should
 be close-pressed_." Of the two universal characteristics of the dream we
 have cited, the second plainly has greater prospects of unconditional
 acknowledgment than the first. Only extensive investigation can
 ascertain that the cause of the dream must always be a wish, and cannot
 also be an anxiety, a plan or a reproach; but this does not alter the
 other characteristic, that the dream does not simply reproduce the
 stimulus but by experiencing it anew, as it were, removes, expells and
 settles it.
 
 7. In connection with these characteristics of the dream we can again
 resume the comparison between the dream and the error. In the case of
 the latter we distinguish an interfering tendency and one interfered
 with, and the error is the compromise between the two. The dream fits
 into the same scheme. The tendency interfered with, in this case, can
 be no other than that of sleep. For the interfering tendency we
 substitute the psychic stimulus, the wish which strives for its
 fulfillment, let us say, for thus far we are not familiar with any other
 sleep-disturbing psychic stimulus. In this instance also the dream is
 the result of compromise. We sleep, and yet we experience the removal of
 a wish; we gratify the wish, but at the same time continue to sleep.
 Both are partly carried out and partly given up.
 
 8. You will remember that we once hoped to gain access to the
 understanding of the dream problem by the fact that certain very
 transparent phantasy formations are called _day dreams_. Now these day
 dreams are actual wish fulfillments, fulfillments of ambitious or erotic
 wishes with which we are familiar; but they are conscious, and though
 vividly imagined, they are never hallucinatory experiences. In this
 instance, therefore, the less firmly established of the two main
 characteristics of the dream holds, while the other proves itself
 entirely dependent upon the condition of sleep and impossible to the
 waking state. In colloquial usage, therefore, there is a presentment of
 the fact that the fulfillment of a wish is a main characteristic of the
 dream. Furthermore, if the experience in the dream is a transformed
 representation only made possible by the condition of sleep--in other
 words, a sort of nocturnal day dream--then we can readily understand
 that the occurrence of phantasy formations can release the nocturnal
 stimulus and bring satisfaction. For day dreaming is an activity closely
 bound up in gratification and is, indeed, pursued only for this reason.
 
 Not only this but other colloquial usages also express the same feeling.
 Well-known proverbs say, "The pig dreams of acorns, the goose of maize,"
 or ask, "Of what does the hen dream? Of millet." So the proverb descends
 even lower than we do, from the child to the animal, and maintains that
 the content of a dream is the satisfaction of a need. Many turns of
 speech seem to point to the same thing--"dreamlike beauty," "I should
 never have dreamed of that," "in my wildest dreams I hadn't imagined
 that." This is open partisanship on the part of colloquial usage. For
 there are also dreams of fear and dreams of embarrassing or indifferent
 content, but they have not been drawn into common usage. It is true that
 common usage recognizes "bad" dreams, but still the dream plainly
 connotates to it only the beautiful wish fulfillment. There is indeed
 no proverb that tells us that the pig or the goose dreams of being
 slaughtered.
 
 Of course it is unbelievable that the wish-fulfillment characteristic
 has not been noted by writers on the dream. Indeed, this was very often
 the case, but none of them thought of acknowledging this characteristic
 as universal and of making it the basis of an explanation of the dream.
 We can easily imagine what may have deterred them and shall discuss it
 subsequently.
 
 See what an abundance of information we have gained, with almost no
 effort, from the consideration of children's dreams--the function of the
 dream as a guardian of sleep; its origin from two rival tendencies, of
 which the one, the longing for sleep, remains constant, while the other
 tries to satisfy a psychic stimulus; the proof that the dream is a
 significant psychic act; its two main characteristics: wish fulfillment
 and hallucinatory experience. And we were almost able to forget that we
 are engaged in psychoanalysis. Aside from its connection with errors our
 work has no specific connotation. Any psychologist, who is entirely
 ignorant of the claims of psychoanalysis, could have given this
 explanation of children's dreams. Why has no one done so?
 
 If there were only infantile dreams, our problem would be solved, our
 task accomplished, and that without questioning the dreamer, or
 approaching the unconscious, and without taking free association into
 consideration. The continuation of our task plainly lies in this
 direction. We have already repeatedly had the experience that
 characteristics that at first seemed universally true, have subsequently
 held good only for a certain kind and for a certain number of dreams. It
 is therefore for us to decide whether the common characteristics which
 we have gathered from children's dreams can be applied universally,
 whether they also hold for those dreams that are not transparent, whose
 manifest content shows no connection with wishes left over from the
 previous day. We think that these dreams have undergone considerable
 distortion and for this reason are not to be judged superficially. We
 also suspect that for the explanation of this distortion we shall need
 the psychoanalytic method which we could dispense with in the
 understanding of children's dreams.
 
 There is at any rate a class of dreams that are undistorted, and, just
 like children's dreams, are easily recognizable as wish fulfillments. It
 is those that are called up throughout life by the imperative needs of
 the body--hunger, thirst, sexual desire--hence wish fulfillments in
 reaction to internal physical stimuli. For this reason, I have noted the
 dream of a young girl, that consisted of a menu following her name (Anna
 F......, strawberry, huckleberry, egg-dish, pap), as a reaction to an
 enforced day of fasting on account of a spoiled stomach, which was
 directly traceable to the eating of the fruits twice mentioned in the
 dream. At the same time, the grandmother, whose age added to that of her
 grandchild would make a full seventy, had to go without food for a day
 on account of kidney-trouble, and dreamed the same night that she had
 been invited out and that the finest tid-bits had been set before her.
 Observations with prisoners who are allowed to go hungry, or with people
 who suffer privations on travels or expeditions, show that under these
 conditions the dreams regularly deal with the satisfaction of these
 needs. Otto Nordenskjold, in his book _Antarctic_ (1904), testifies to
 the same thing concerning his crew, who were ice-bound with him during
 the winter (Vol. 1, page 336). "Very significant in determining the
 trend of our inmost thoughts were our dreams, which were never more
 vivid and numerous than just at this time. Even those of our comrades
 who ordinarily dreamed but seldom, now had long stories to tell, when in
 the morning we exchanged our latest experiences in that realm of
 phantasy. All of them dealt with that outside world that now was so far
 away from us, but often they fitted into our present condition. Food and
 drink were most often the pivots about which our dreams revolved. One of
 us, who excelled in going to great dinners in his sleep, was most happy
 whenever he could tell us in the morning that he attended a dinner of
 three courses; another one dreamed of tobacco, whole mountains of
 tobacco; still another dreamed of a ship that came along on the open
 sea, under full sail. One other dream deserves mention: The postman
 comes with the mail and gives a long explanation of why it is so late;
 he had delivered it to the wrong address and only after great trouble on
 his part had succeeded in getting it back. Of course one occupies
 himself with even more impossible things in sleep, but in nearly all the
 dreams that I myself dreamed or heard tell of, the lack of phantasy was
 quite striking. It would surely be of great psychological interest if
 all these dreams were recorded. It is easy to understand how we longed
 for sleep, since it could offer us everything for which each one of us
 felt the most burning desire." I quote further from Du Prel. "Mungo
 Park, who during a trip in Africa was almost exhausted, dreamed without
 interruption of the fertile valleys and fields of his home. Trenck,
 tortured by hunger in the redoubt at Magdeburg, likewise saw himself
 surrounded by wonderful meals, and George Back, who took part in
 Franklin's first expedition, dreamed regularly and consistently of
 luxurious meals when, as a result of terrible privations, he was nearly
 dead of hunger."
 
 A man who feels great thirst at night after enjoying highly seasoned
 food for supper, often dreams that he is drinking. It is of course
 impossible to satisfy a rather strong desire for food or drink by means
 of the dream; from such a dream one awakes thirsty and must now drink
 real water. The effect of the dream is in this case practically
 trifling, but it is none the less clear that it was called up for the
 purpose of maintaining the sleep in spite of the urgent impulse to awake
 and to act. Dreams of satisfaction often overcome needs of a lesser
 intensity.
 
 In a like manner, under the influence of sexual stimuli, the dream
 brings about satisfaction that shows noteworthy peculiarities. As a
 result of the characteristic of the sexual urge which makes it somewhat
 less dependent upon its object than hunger and thirst, satisfaction in a
 dream of pollution may be an actual one, and as a result of difficulties
 to be mentioned later in connection with the object, it happens
 especially often that the actual satisfaction is connected with confused
 or distorted dream content. This peculiarity of the dream of pollution,
 as O. Rank has observed, makes it a fruitful subject to pursue in the
 study of dream distortion. Moreover, all dreams of desire of adults
 usually contain something besides satisfaction, something that has its
 origin in the sources of the purely psychic stimuli, and which requires
 interpretation to render it intelligible.
 
 Moreover we shall not maintain that the wish-fulfillment dreams of the
 infantile kind occur in adults only as reactions to the known imperative
 desires. We also know of short clear dreams of this sort under the
 influence of dominating situations that arise from unquestionably
 psychic sources. As, for example, in dreams of impatience, whenever a
 person has made preparations for a journey, for a theatrical
 performance, for a lecture or for a visit, and now dreams of the
 anticipated fulfillment of his expectations, and so arrives at his goal
 the night before the actual experience, in the theatre or in
 conversation with his host. Or the well-named dreams of comfort, when a
 person who likes to prolong his sleep, dreams that he is already up, is
 washing himself, or is already in school, while as a matter of fact he
 continues sleeping, hence would rather get up in a dream than in
 reality. The desire for sleep which we have recognized as a regular part
 of the dream structure becomes intense in these dreams and appears in
 them as the actual shaping force of the dream. The wish for sleep
 properly takes its place beside other great physical desires.
 
 At this point I refer you to a picture by Schwind, from the Schack
 Gallery in Munich, so that you may see how rightly the artist has
 conceived the origin of a dream from a dominating situation. It is the
 _Dream of a Prisoner_,[29] which can have no other subject than his
 release. It is a very neat stroke that the release should be effected
 through the window, for the ray of light that awakens the prisoner comes
 through the same window. The gnomes standing one above the other
 probably represent the successive positions which he himself had to take
 in climbing to the height of the window, and I do not think I am
 mistaken or that I attribute too much preconcerted design to the artist,
 by noting that the uppermost of the gnomes, who is filing the grating
 (and so does what the prisoner would like to do) has the features of the
 prisoner.
 
 In all other dreams except those of children and those of the infantile
 type, distortion, as we have said, blocks our way. At the outset we
 cannot ascertain whether they are also wish fulfillments, as we suspect;
 from their manifest content we cannot determine from what psychic
 stimulus they derive their origin, and we cannot prove that they also
 are occupied in doing away with the stimulus and in satisfying it. They
 must probably be interpreted, that is, translated; their distortion must
 be annulled; their manifest content replaced by their latent thought
 before we can judge whether what we have found in children's dreams may
 claim a universal application for all dreams.
 
 
 
 
 NINTH LECTURE
 
 THE DREAM
 
 _The Dream Censor_
 
 
 We have learned to know the origin, nature and function of the dream
 from the study of children's dreams. _Dreams are the removal of
 sleep-disturbing psychic stimuli by way of hallucinated satisfaction._
 Of adults' dreams, to be sure, we could explain only one group, what we
 characterized as dreams of an infantile type. As to the others we know
 nothing as yet, nor do we understand them. For the present, however, we
 have obtained a result whose significance we do not wish to
 under-estimate. Every time a dream is completely comprehensible to us,
 it proves to be an hallucinated wish-fulfillment. This coincidence
 cannot be accidental, nor is it an unimportant matter.
 
 We conclude, on the basis of various considerations and by analogy to
 the conception of mistakes, that another type of dream is a distorted
 substitute for an unknown content and that it must first be led back to
 that content. Our next task is the investigation and the understanding
 of this dream distortion.
 
 Dream distortion is the thing which makes the dream seem strange and
 incomprehensible to us. We want to know several things about it;
 firstly, whence it comes, its dynamics; secondly, what it does; and
 finally, how it does it. We can say at this point that dream distortion
 is the product of the dream work, that is, of the mental functioning of
 which the dream itself is the conscious symptom. Let us describe the
 dream work and trace it back to the forces which work upon it.
 
 And now I shall ask you to listen to the following dream. It was
 recorded by a lady of our profession, and according to her, originated
 with a highly cultivated and respected lady of advanced age. No analysis
 of this dream was made. Our informant remarks that to a psychoanalyst
 it needs no interpretation. The dreamer herself did not interpret it,
 but she judged and condemned it as if she understood its interpretation.
 For she said concerning it: "That a woman of fifty should dream such
 abominable, stupid stuff--a woman who has no other thought, day and
 night, than to care for her child!"
 
 And now follows the dreams of the "_services of love_." "She goes into
 Military Hospital No. 1, and says to the sentry at the gate, that she
 must speak to the chief physician ... (she mentions a name which is not
 familiar to her), as she wants to offer her service to the hospital. She
 stresses the word 'service,' so love services. Since she is an old lady
 he lets her pass after some hesitation. But instead of reaching the
 chief physician, she finds herself in a large somber room in which there
 are many officers and army doctors sitting and standing around a long
 table. She turns with her proposal to a staff doctor who, after a few
 words, soon understands her. The words of her speech in the dream are,
 'I and numerous other women and girls of Vienna are ready for the
 soldiers, troops, and officers, without distinction....' Here in the
 dream follows a murmuring. That the idea is, however, correctly
 understood by those present she sees from the semi-embarrassed, somewhat
 malicious expressions of the officers. The lady then continues, 'I know
 that our decision sounds strange, but we are in bitter earnest. The
 soldier in the field is not asked either whether or not he wants to
 die.' A moment of painful silence follows. The staff doctor puts his arm
 around her waist and says, 'Madame, let us assume that it really came to
 that ...' (murmurs). She withdraws from his arm with the thought, 'They
 are all alike!' and answers, 'My heavens, I am an old woman, and perhaps
 will never be confronted with that situation; one consideration,
 moreover, must be kept in mind: the consideration of age, which prevents
 an older woman from ... with a very young boy ... (murmurs) ... that
 would be horrible.' The staff doctor, 'I understand perfectly.' Several
 officers, among them one who had paid court to her in her youth, laugh
 loudly, and the lady asks to be conducted to the chief physician, whom
 she knows, so that everything may be arranged. At this she realizes with
 great dismay that she does not know his name. The staff officer,
 nevertheless, very politely and respectfully shows her the way to the
 second story, up a very narrow winding iron stairway which leads to the
 upper story directly from the door of the room. In going up she hears an
 officer say, 'That is a tremendous decision irrespective of whether a
 woman is young or old; all honor to her!'
 
 "With the feeling that she is merely doing her duty, she goes up an
 endless staircase."
 
 This dream she repeats twice in the course of a few weeks, with--as the
 lady notices--quite insignificant and very senseless changes.
 
 This dream corresponds in its structure to a day dream. It has few gaps,
 and many of its individual points might have been elucidated as to
 content through inquiry, which, as you know, was omitted. The
 conspicuous and interesting point for us, however, is that the dream
 shows several gaps, gaps not of recollection, but of original content.
 In three places the content is apparently obliterated, the speeches in
 which these gaps occur are interrupted by murmurs. Since we have
 performed no analysis, we have, strictly speaking, also no right to make
 any assertion about the meaning of the dream. Yet there are intimations
 given from which something may be concluded. For example, the phrase
 "services of love," and above all the bits of speech which immediately
 precede the murmurs, demand a completion which can have but one meaning.
 If we interpolate these, then the phantasy yields as its content the
 idea that the dreamer is ready, as an act of patriotic duty, to offer
 her person for the satisfaction of the erotic desires of the army,
 officers as well as troops. That certainly is exceedingly shocking, it
 is an impudent libidinous phantasy, but--it does not occur in the dream
 at all. Just at the point where consistency would demand this
 confession, there is a vague murmur in the manifest dream, something is
 lost or suppressed.
 
 I hope you will recognize the inevitability of the conclusion that it is
 the shocking character of these places in the dream that was the motive
 for their suppression. Yet where do you find a parallel for this state
 of affairs? In these times you need not seek far. Take up any political
 paper and you will find that the text is obliterated here and there, and
 that in its place shimmers the white of the paper. You know that that is
 the work of the newspaper censor. In these blank spaces something was
 printed which was not to the liking of the censorship authorities, and
 for that reason it was crossed out. You think that it is a pity, that it
 probably was the most interesting part, it was "the best part."
 
 In other places the censorship did not touch the completed sentence. The
 author foresaw what parts might be expected to meet with the objection
 of the censor, and for that reason he softened them by way of
 prevention, modified them slightly, or contented himself with innuendo
 and allusion to what really wanted to flow from his pen. Thus the sheet,
 it is true, has no blank spaces, but from certain circumlocutions and
 obscurities of expression you will be able to guess that thoughts of the
 censorship were the restraining motive.
 
 Now let us keep to this parallel. We say that the omitted dream
 speeches, which were disguised by a murmuring, were also sacrifices to a
 censorship. We actually speak of a _dream censor_ to which we may
 ascribe a contributing part in the dream distortion. Wherever there are
 gaps in the manifest dream, it is the fault of the dream censor. Indeed,
 we should go further, and recognize each time as a manifestation of the
 dream censor, those places at which a dream element is especially faint,
 indefinitely and doubtfully recalled among other, more clearly
 delineated portions. But it is only rarely that this censorship
 manifests itself so undisguisedly, so naively one may say, as in the
 example of the dream of the "services of love." Far more frequently the
 censorship manifests itself according to the second type, through the
 production of weakenings, innuendoes, allusions instead of direct
 truthfulness.
 
 For a third type of dream censorship I know of no parallel in the
 practice of newspaper censorship, yet it is just this type that I can
 demonstrate by the only dream example which we have so far analyzed. You
 will remember the dream of the "three bad theatre tickets for one florin
 and a half." In the latent thoughts of this dream, the element
 "_precipitately, too soon_," stood in the foreground. It means: "It was
 foolish to marry so _early_, it was also foolish to buy theatre tickets
 so _early_, it was ridiculous of the sister-in-law to spend her money so
 _hastily_, merely to buy an ornament." Nothing of this central element
 of the dream thought was evident in the manifest dream. In the latter,
 going to the theatre and getting the tickets were shoved into the
 foreground. Through this displacement of the emphasis, this regrouping
 of the elements of the content, the manifest dream becomes so dissimilar
 from the latent dream thoughts that no one would suspect the latter
 behind the former. This displacement of emphasis is a favorite device of
 the dream distortion and gives the dream that strangeness which makes
 the dreamer himself unwilling to recognize it as his own production.
 
 Omission, modification, regrouping of the material, these, then, are the
 effects of the dream censor and the devices of dream distortion. The
 dream censorship itself is the author, or one of the authors, of the
 dream distortion whose investigation now occupies us. Modification and
 rearrangement we are already accustomed to summarize as _displacement_.
 
 After these remarks concerning the effects of the dream censor, let us
 now turn to their dynamics. I hope you will not consider the expression
 too anthropomorphically, and picture the dream censor as a severe little
 manikin who lives in a little brain chamber and there performs his
 duties; nor should you attempt to localize him too much, to think of a
 brain center from which his censoring influence emanates, and which
 would cease with the injury or extirpation of this center. For the
 present, the term "dream censor" is no more than a very convenient
 phrase for a dynamic relationship. This phrase does not prevent us from
 asking by what tendencies such influence is exerted and upon which
 tendencies it works; nor will we be surprised to discover that we have
 already encountered the dream censor before, perhaps without recognizing
 him.
 
 For such was actually the case. You will remember that we had a
 surprising experience when we began to apply our technique of free
 association. We then began to feel that some sort of a resistance
 blocked our efforts to proceed from the dream element to the unconscious
 element for which the former is the substitute. This resistance, we
 said, may be of varying strength, enormous at one time, quite negligible
 at another. In the latter case we need cross only a few intermediate
 steps in our work of interpretation. But when the resistance is strong,
 then we must go through a long chain of associations, are taken far
 afield and must overcome all the difficulties which present themselves
 as critical objections to the association technique. What we met with in
 the work of interpretation, we must now bring into the dream work as
 the dream censor. The resistance to interpretation is nothing but the
 objectivation of the dream censor. The latter proves to us that the
 force of the censor has not spent itself in causing the dream
 distortion, has not since been extinguished, but that this censorship
 continues as a permanent institution with the purpose of preserving the
 distortion. Moreover, just as in the interpretation the strength of the
 resistance varied with each element, so also the distortion produced by
 the censor in the same dream is of varying magnitude for each element.
 If one compares the manifest with the latent dream one sees that certain
 isolated latent elements have been practically eliminated, others more
 or less modified, and still others left unchanged, indeed, have perhaps
 been taken over into the dream content with additional strength.
 
 But we wanted to discover what purposes the censorship serves and
 against which tendencies it acts. This question, which is fundamental to
 the understanding of the dream, indeed perhaps to human life, is easily
 answered if we look over a series of those dreams which have been
 analyzed. The tendencies which the censorship exercises are those which
 are recognized by the waking judgment of the dreamer, those with which
 he feels himself in harmony. You may rest assured that when you reject
 an accurate interpretation of a dream of your own, you do so with the
 same motives with which the dream censor works, the motives with which
 it produces the dream distortion and makes the interpretation necessary.
 Recall the dream of our fifty-year old lady. Without having interpreted
 it, she considers her dream abominable, would have been still more
 outraged if our informant had told her anything about the indubitable
 meaning; and it is just on account of this condemnation that the
 shocking spots in her dream were replaced by a murmur.
 
 The tendencies, however, against which the dream censor directs itself,
 must now be described from the standpoint of this instance. One can say
 only that these tendencies are of an objectionable nature throughout,
 that they are shocking from an ethical, aesthetic and social point of
 view, that they are things one does not dare even to think, or thinks of
 only with abhorrence. These censored wishes which have attained to a
 distorted expression in the dream, are above all expressions of a
 boundless, reckless egoism. And indeed, the personal ego occurs in
 every dream to play the major part in each of them, even if it can
 successfully disguise itself in the manifest content. This _sacro
 egoismo_ of the dream is surely not unconnected with the sleep-inducing
 cessation of psychic activity which consists, it should be noted, in the
 withdrawal of interest from the entire external world.
 
 The ego which has been freed of all ethical restraints feels itself in
 accord with all the demands of the sexual striving, with those demands
 which have long since been condemned by our aesthetic rearing, demands
 of such a character that they resist all our moral demands for
 restraint. The pleasure-striving--the libido, as we term it--chooses its
 objects without inhibitions, and indeed, prefers those that are
 forbidden. It chooses not only the wife of another, but, above all,
 those incestuous objects declared sacred by the agreement of
 mankind--the mother and sister in the man's case, the father and brother
 in the woman's. Even the dream of our fifty-year old lady is an
 incestuous one, its libido unmistakably directed toward her son. Desires
 which we believe to be far from human nature show themselves strong
 enough to arouse dreams. Hate, too, expends itself without restraint.
 Revenge and murderous wishes toward those standing closest to the
 dreamer are not unusual, toward those best beloved in daily life, toward
 parents, brothers and sisters, toward one's spouse and one's own
 children. These censored wishes seem to arise from a veritable hell; no
 censorship seems too harsh to be applied against their waking
 interpretation.
 
 But do not reproach the dream itself for this evil content. You will
 not, I am sure, forget that the dream is charged with the harmless,
 indeed the useful function of guarding sleep from disturbance. This evil
 content, then, does not lie in the nature of the dream. You know also
 that there are dreams which can be recognized as the satisfaction of
 justified wishes and urgent bodily needs. These, to be sure, undergo no
 dream distortion. They need none. They can satisfy their function
 without offending the ethical and aesthetic tendencies of the ego. And
 will you also keep in mind the fact that the amount of dream distortion
 is proportional to two factors. On the one hand, the worse the
 censorable wish, the greater the distortion; on the other hand, however,
 the stricter the censor himself is at any particular time the greater
 the distortion will be also. A young, strictly reared and prudish girl
 will, by reason of those factors, disfigure with an inexorable
 censorship those dream impulses which we physicians, for example, and
 which the dreamer herself ten years later, would recognize as
 permissible, harmless, libidinous desires.
 
 Besides, we are far from being at the point where we can allow ourselves
 to be shocked by the results of our work of interpretation. I think we
 are not yet quite adept at it; and above all there lies upon us the
 obligation to secure it against certain attacks. It is not at all
 difficult to "find a hitch" in it. Our dream interpretations were made
 on the hypotheses we accepted a little while ago, that the dream has
 some meaning, that from the hypnotic to the normal sleep one may carry
 over the idea of the existence at such times of an unconscious psychic
 activity, and that all associations are predetermined. If we had come to
 plausible results on the basis of these hypotheses, we would have been
 justified in concluding that the hypotheses were correct. But what is to
 be done when the results are what I have just pictured them to be? Then
 it surely is natural to say, "These results are impossible, foolish, at
 least very improbable, hence there must have been something wrong with
 the hypotheses. Either the dream is no psychic phenomenon after all, or
 there is no such thing as unconscious mental activity in the normal
 condition, or our technique has a gap in it somewhere. Is that not a
 simpler and more satisfying conclusion than the abominations which we
 pretend to have disclosed on the basis of our suppositions?"
 
 Both, I answer. It is a simpler as well as a more satisfying conclusion,
 but not necessarily more correct for that reason. Let us take our time,
 the matter is not yet ripe for judgment. Above all we can strengthen the
 criticism against our dream interpretation still further. That its
 conclusions are so unpleasant and unpalatable is perhaps of secondary
 importance. A stronger argument is the fact that the dreamers to whom we
 ascribe such wish-tendencies from the interpretation of their dreams
 reject the interpretations most emphatically, and with good reason.
 "What," says the one, "you want to prove to me by this dream that I
 begrudged the sums which I spent for my sister's trousseau and my
 brother's education? But indeed that can't be so. Why I work only for my
 sister, I have no interest in life but to fulfill my duties toward her,
 as being the oldest child, I promised our blessed mother I would." Or a
 woman says of her dream, "You mean to say that I wish my husband were
 dead! Why, that is simply revolting, nonsense. It isn't only that we
 have the happiest possible married life, you probably won't believe me
 when I tell you so, but his death would deprive me of everything else
 that I own in the world." Or another will tell us, "You mean that I have
 sensual desires toward my sister? That is ridiculous. I am not in the
 least fond of her. We don't get along and I haven't exchanged a word
 with her in years." We might perhaps ignore this sort of thing if the
 dreamers did not confirm or deny the tendencies ascribed to them; we
 could say that they are matters which the dreamers do not know about
 themselves. But that the dreamers should feel the exact opposite of the
 ascribed wish, and should be able to prove to us the dominance of the
 opposite tendency--this fact must finally disconcert us. Is it not time
 to lay aside the whole work of the dream interpretation as something
 whose results reduce it to absurdity?
 
 By no means; this stronger argument breaks down when we attack it
 critically. Assuming that there are unconscious tendencies in the
 psychic life, nothing is proved by the ability of the subject to show
 that their opposites dominate his conscious life. Perhaps there is room
 in the psychic life even for antithetical tendencies, for contradictions
 which exist side by side, yes, possibly it is just the dominance of the
 one impulse which is the necessary condition for the unconsciousness of
 its opposite. The first two objections raised against our work hold
 merely that the results of dream interpretation are not simple, and very
 unpleasant. In answer to the first of these, one may say that for all
 your enthusiasm for the simple solution, you cannot thereby solve a
 single dream problem. To do so you must make up your mind to accept the
 fact of complicated relationships. And to the second of these objections
 one may say that you are obviously wrong to use a preference or a
 dislike as the basis for a scientific judgment. What difference does it
 make if the results of the dream interpretation seem unpleasant, even
 embarrassing and disgusting to you? "That doesn't prevent them from
 existing," as I used to hear my teacher Charcot say in similar cases,
 when I was a young doctor. One must be humble, one must keep personal
 preferences and antipathies in the background, if one wishes to
 discover the realities of the world. If a physicist can prove to you
 that the organic life of this planet must, within a short period of
 time, become completely extinct, do you also venture to say to him,
 "That cannot be so. This prospect is too unpleasant." On the contrary,
 you will be silent until another physicist proves some error in the
 assumptions or calculations of the first. If you reject the unpleasant,
 you are repeating the mechanism of dream construction instead of
 understanding and mastering it.
 
 Perhaps you will promise to overlook the repulsive character of the
 censored dream-wishes, and will take refuge in the argument that it is
 improbable, after all, that so wide a field be given over to the evil in
 the constitution of man. But does your own experience justify you in
 saying that? I will not discuss the question of how you may estimate
 yourselves, but have you found so much good will among your superiors
 and rivals, so much chivalry among your enemies, so little envy in their
 company, that you feel yourselves in duty bound to enter a protest
 against the part played by the evil of egoism in human nature? Are you
 ignorant of how uncontrolled and undependable the average human being is
 in all the affairs of sex life? Or do you not know that all the
 immoralities and excesses of which we dream nightly are crimes committed
 daily by waking persons? What else does psychoanalysis do here but
 confirm the old saying of Plato, that the good people are those who
 content themselves with dreaming what the others, the bad people, really
 do?
 
 And now turn your attention from the individual case to the great war
 devastating Europe. Think of the amount of brutality, the cruelty and
 the lies allowed to spread over the civilized world. Do you really
 believe that a handful of conscienceless egoists and corruptionists
 could have succeeded in setting free all these evil spirits, if the
 millions of followers did not share in the guilt? Do you dare under
 these circumstances to break a lance for the absence of evil from the
 psychic constitution of mankind?
 
 You will reproach me with judging the war one-sidedly, you will say that
 it has also brought forth all that is most beautiful and noble in
 mankind, its heroic courage, its self-sacrifice, its social feeling.
 Certainly, but do not at this point allow yourselves to become guilty of
 the injustice which has so often been perpetrated against
 psychoanalysis, of reproaching it with denying one thing because it was
 asserting another. It is not our intention to deny the noble strivings
 of human nature, nor have we ever done anything to deprecate their
 value. On the contrary, I show you not only the censored evil
 dream-wishes, but also the censor which suppresses them and renders them
 unrecognizable. We dwell on the evil in mankind with greater emphasis
 only because others deny it, a method whereby the psychic life of
 mankind does not become better, but merely incomprehensible. When,
 however, we give up this one-sided ethical estimate, we shall surely be
 able to find a more accurate formula for the relationship of the evil to
 the good in human nature.
 
 And thus the matter stands. We need not give up the conclusions to which
 our labors in dream interpretation lead us even though we must consider
 those conclusions strange. Perhaps we can approach their understanding
 later by another path. For the present, let us repeat: dream distortion
 is a consequence of the censorship practised by accredited tendencies of
 the ego against those wish-impulses that are in any way shocking,
 impulses which stir in us nightly during sleep. Why these wish-impulses
 come just at night, and whence they come--these are questions which will
 bear considerable investigation.
 
 It would be a mistake, however, to omit to mention, with fitting
 emphasis, another result of these investigations. The dream wishes which
 try to disturb our sleep are not known to us, in fact we learn of them
 first through the dream interpretation. Therefore, they may be described
 as "at that time" unconscious in the sense above defined. But we can go
 beyond this and say that they are more than merely "at that time"
 unconscious. The dreamer to be sure denies their validity, as we have
 seen in so many cases, even after he has learned of their existence by
 means of the interpretation. The situation is then repeated which we
 first encountered in the interpretation of the tongue slip "hiccough"
 where the toastmaster was outraged and assured us that neither then nor
 ever before had he been conscious of disrespectful impulse toward his
 chief. This is repeated with every interpretation of a markedly
 distorted dream, and for that reason attains a significance for our
 conception. We are now prepared to conclude that there are processes and
 tendencies in the psychic life of which one knows nothing at all, has
 known nothing for some time, might, in fact, perhaps never have known
 anything. The unconscious thus receives a new meaning for us; the idea
 of "at present" or "at a specific time" disappears from its conception,
 for it can also mean _permanently_ unconscious, not merely _latent at
 the time_. Obviously we shall have to learn more of this at another
 session.
 
 
 
 
 TENTH LECTURE
 
 THE DREAM
 
 _Symbolism in the Dream_
 
 
 We have discovered that the distortion of dreams, a disturbing element
 in our work of understanding them, is the result of a censorious
 activity which is directed against the unacceptable of the unconscious
 wish-impulses. But, of course, we have not maintained that censorship is
 the only factor which is to blame for the dream distortion, and we may
 actually make the discovery in a further study of the dream that other
 items play a part in this result. That is, even if the dream censorship
 were eliminated we might not be in a position to understand the dreams;
 the actual dream still might not be identical with the latent dream
 thought.
 
 This other item which makes the dream unintelligible, this new addition
 to dream distortion, we discover by considering a gap in our technique.
 I have already admitted that for certain elements of the dream, no
 associations really occur to the person being analyzed. This does not
 happen so often as the dreamers maintain; in many cases the association
 can be forced by persistence. But still there are certain instances in
 which no association is forthcoming, or if forced does not furnish what
 we expected. When this happens in the course of a psychoanalytic
 treatment, then a particular meaning may be attached thereto, with which
 we have nothing to do here. It also occurs, however, in the
 interpretation of the dreams of a normal person or in interpreting one's
 own dreams. Once a person is convinced that in these cases no amount of
 forcing of associations will avail, he will finally make the discovery
 that the unwished-for contingency occurs regularly in certain dream
 elements, and he will begin to recognize a new order of things there,
 where at first he believed he had come across a peculiar exception to
 our technique.
 
 In this way we are tempted to interpret these silent dream elements
 ourselves, to undertake their translation by the means at hand. The fact
 that every time we trust to this substitution we obtain a satisfactory
 meaning is forced upon us; until we resolve upon this decision the dream
 remains meaningless, its continuity is broken. The accumulation of many
 similar cases tends to give the necessary certainty to our first timid
 attempts.
 
 I am expounding all this in rather a schematic manner, but this is
 permissible for purposes of instruction, and I am not trying to
 misstate, but only to simplify matters.
 
 In this manner we derive constant translations for a whole series of
 dream elements just as constant translations are found in our popular
 dream books for all the things we dream. But do not forget that in our
 association technique we never discover constant substitutes for the
 dream elements.
 
 You will say at once that this road to interpretation appears far more
 uncertain and open to objection than the former methods of free
 association. But a further fact is to be taken into consideration. After
 one has gathered a sufficient number of such constant substitutes
 empirically, he will say that of his own knowledge he should actually
 have denied that these items of dream interpretation could really be
 understood without the associations of the dreamer. The facts that force
 us to recognize their meaning will appear in the second half of our
 analysis.
 
 We call such a constant relationship between a dream element and its
 interpretation _symbolic_. The dream element is itself a _symbol_ of the
 unconscious dream thought. You will remember that previously, when we
 were investigating the relationship between dream elements and their
 actuality, I drew three distinctions, viz., that of the part of the
 whole, that of the allusion, and that of the imagery. I then announced
 that there was a fourth, but did not name it. This fourth is the
 symbolic relationship here introduced. Very interesting discussions
 center about this, and we will now consider them before we express our
 own particular observations on symbolism. Symbolism is perhaps the most
 noteworthy chapter of dream study.
 
 In the first place, since symbols are permanent or constant
 translations, they realize, in a certain measure, the ideal of ancient
 as well as popular dream interpretation, an ideal which by means of our
 technique we had left behind. They permit us in certain cases to
 interpret a dream without questioning the dreamer who, aside from this,
 has no explanation for the symbol. If the interpreter is acquainted with
 the customary dream symbols and, in addition, with the dreamer himself,
 the conditions under which the latter lives and the impressions he
 received before having the dream, it is often possible to interpret a
 dream without further information--to translate it "right off the bat."
 Such a trick flatters the interpreter and impresses the dreamer; it
 stands out as a pleasurable incident in the usual arduous course of
 cross-examining the dreamer. But do not be misled. It is not our
 function to perform tricks. Interpretation based on a knowledge of
 symbols is not a technique that can replace the associative technique,
 or even compare with it. It is a supplement to the associative
 technique, and furnishes the latter merely with transplanted, usable
 results. But as regards familiarity with the dreamer's psychic
 situation, you must consider the fact that you are not limited to
 interpreting the dreams of acquaintances; that as a rule you are not
 acquainted with the daily occurrences which act as the stimuli for the
 dreams, and that the associations of the subject furnish you with a
 knowledge of that very thing we call the psychic situation.
 
 Furthermore, it is very extraordinary, particularly in view of
 circumstances to be mentioned later, that the most vehement opposition
 has been voiced against the existence of the symbolic relationship
 between the dream and the unconscious. Even persons of judgment and
 position, who have otherwise made great progress in psychoanalysis, have
 discontinued their support at this point. This is the more remarkable
 since, in the first place, symbolism is neither peculiar to the dream
 nor characteristic of it, and since in the second place, symbolism in
 the dream was not discovered through psychoanalysis, although the latter
 is not poor otherwise in making startling discoveries. The discoverer of
 dream symbolism, if we insist on a discovery in modern times, was the
 philosopher K. A. Scherner (1861). Psychoanalysis affirmed Scherner's
 discovery and modified it considerably.
 
 Now you will want to know something of the nature of dream symbolism,
 and to hear some examples. I shall gladly impart to you what I know, but
 I admit that our knowledge is not so complete as we could desire it to
 be.
 
 The nature of the symbol relationship is a comparison, but not any
 desired comparison. One suspects a special prerequisite for this
 comparison, but is unable to say what it is. Not everything to which we
 are able to compare an object or an occurrence occurs in the dream as
 its symbol; on the other hand, the dream does not symbolize anything we
 may choose, but only specific elements of the dream thought. There are
 limitations on both sides. It must be admitted that the idea of the
 symbol cannot be sharply delimited at all times--it mingles with the
 substitution, dramatization, etc., even approaches the allusion. In one
 series of symbols the basic comparison is apparent to the senses. On the
 other hand, there are other symbols which raise the question of where
 the similarity, the "something intermediate" of this suspected
 comparison is to be sought. We may discover it by more careful
 consideration, or it may remain hidden to us. Furthermore, it is
 extraordinary, if the symbol is a comparison, that this comparison is
 not revealed by the association, that the dreamer is not acquainted with
 the comparison, that he makes use of it without knowing of its
 existence. Indeed, the dreamer does not even care to admit the validity
 of this comparison when it is pointed out to him. So you see, a symbolic
 relationship is a comparison of a very special kind, the origin of which
 is not yet clearly understood by us. Perhaps later we may find
 references to this unknown factor.
 
 The number of things that find symbolic representation in the dream is
 not great--the human body as a whole, parents, children, brothers and
 sisters, birth, death, nakedness and a few others. The only typical,
 that is, regular representation of the human person as a whole is in the
 form of a _house_, as was recognized by Scherner who, indeed, wished to
 credit this symbol with an overwhelming significance which it does not
 deserve. It occurs in dreams that a person, now lustful, now frightened,
 climbs down the fronts of houses. Those with entirely smooth walls are
 men; but those which are provided with projections and balconies to
 which one can hold on, are women. Parents appear in the dream as _king_
 and _queen_, or other persons highly respected. The dream in this
 instance is very pious. It treats children, and brothers and sisters,
 less tenderly; they are symbolized as _little animals_ or _vermin_.
 Birth is almost regularly represented by some reference to _water_;
 either one plunges into the water or climbs out of it, or rescues
 someone from the water, or is himself rescued from it, i.e., there is a
 mother-relation to the person. Death is replaced in the dream by _taking
 a journey, riding in a train_; _being dead, by various darksome, timid
 suggestions_; _nakedness, by clothes_ and _uniforms_. You see here how
 the lines between symbolic and suggestive representation merge one into
 another.
 
 In contrast to the paucity of this enumeration, it is a striking fact
 that the objects and subject matter of another sphere are represented by
 an extraordinarily rich symbolism. This is the sphere of the sexual
 life, the genitals, the sex processes and sexual intercourse. The great
 majority of symbols in the dream are sex symbols. A remarkable
 disproportion results from this fact. The designated subject matters are
 few, their symbols extraordinarily profuse, so that each of these
 objects can be expressed by any number of symbols of almost equal value.
 In the interpretation something is disclosed that arouses universal
 objection. The symbol interpretations, in contrast to the many-sidedness
 of the dream representations, are very monotonous--this displeases all
 who deal with them; but what is one to do?
 
 Since this is the first time in these lectures that we speak of the
 sexual life, I must tell you the manner in which I intend to handle this
 theme. Psychoanalysis sees no reason for hiding matters or treating them
 by innuendo, finds no necessity of being ashamed of dealing with this
 important subject, believes it is proper and decent to call everything
 by its correct name, and hopes most effectively in this manner to ward
 off disturbing or salacious thoughts. The fact that I am talking before
 a mixed audience can make no difference on this point. Just as there is
 no special knowledge either for the Delphic oracle or for flappers, so
 the ladies present among you have, by their appearance in this lecture
 hall, made it clear that they wish to be considered on the same basis as
 the men.
 
 The dream has a number of representations for the male genital that may
 be called symbolic, and in which the similarity of the comparison is,
 for the most part, very enlightening. In the first place, the holy
 figure 3 is a symbolical substitute for the entire male genital. The
 more conspicuous and more interesting part of the genital to both sexes,
 the male organ, has symbolical substitute in objects of like form, those
 which are long and upright, such as _sticks_, _umbrellas_, _poles_,
 _trees_, etc. It is also symbolized by objects that have the
 characteristic, in common with it, of penetration into the body and
 consequent injury, hence pointed _weapons_ of every type, _knives_,
 _daggers_, _lances_, _swords_, and in the same manner _firearms_,
 _guns_, _pistols_ and the _revolver_, which is so suitable because of
 its shape. In the troubled dream of the young girl, pursuit by a man
 with a knife or a firearm plays a big role. This, probably the most
 frequent dream symbolism, is easily translatable. Easily comprehensible,
 too, is the substitution for the male member of objects out of which
 water flows: _faucets_, _water cans_, _fountains_, as well as its
 representation by other objects that have the power of elongation, such
 as _hanging lamps_, _collapsible pencils_, etc. That _pencils_,
 _quills_, _nail files_, _hammers_ and other _instruments_ are
 undoubtedly male symbols is a fact connected with a conception of the
 organ, which likewise is not far to seek.
 
 The extraordinary characteristic of the member of being able to raise
 itself against the force of gravity, one of the phenomena of erection,
 leads to symbolic representations by _balloons_, _aeroplanes_, and more
 recently, _Zeppelins_. The dream has another far more expressive way of
 symbolizing erection. It makes the sex organ the essential part of the
 whole person and pictures the person himself as _flying_. Do not feel
 disturbed because the dreams of flying, often so beautiful, and which we
 all have had, must be interpreted as dreams of general sexual
 excitement, as erection dreams. P. Federn, among the psychoanalytical
 students, has confirmed this interpretation beyond any doubt, and even
 Mourly Vold, much praised for his sobriety, who carried on his dream
 experiments with artificial positions of the arms and legs, and who was
 really opposed to psychoanalysis--perhaps knew nothing about
 psychoanalysis--has come to the same conclusion as a result of his
 research. It is no objection to this conclusion that women may have the
 same dreams of flying. Remember that our dreams act as wish-fulfillments,
 and that the wish to be a man is often present in women, consciously or
 unconsciously. And the fact that it is possible for a woman to realize
 this wish by the same sensation as a man does, will not mislead anyone
 acquainted with anatomy. There is a small organ in the genitals of a
 woman similar to that of the male, and this small organ, the clitoris,
 even in childhood, and in the years before sexual intercourse, plays
 the same role as does the large organ of the male.
 
 To the less comprehensible male sex-symbols belong certain _reptiles_
 and _fish_, notably the famous symbol of the _snake_. Why _hats_ and
 _cloaks_ should have been turned to the same use is certainly difficult
 to discover, but their symbolic meaning leaves no room for doubt. And
 finally the question may be raised whether possibly the substitution of
 some other member as a representation for the male organ may not be
 regarded as symbolic. I believe that one is forced to this conclusion by
 the context and by the female counterparts.
 
 The female genital is symbolically represented by all those objects
 which share its peculiarity of enclosing a space capable of being filled
 by something--viz., by _pits_, _caves_, and _hollows_, by _pitchers_ and
 _bottles_, by _boxes_ and _trunks_, _jars_, _cases_, _pockets_, etc. The
 _ship_, too, belongs in this category. Many symbols represent the womb
 of the mother rather than the female genital, as _wardrobes_, _stoves_,
 and primarily a _room_. The room-symbolism is related to the
 house-symbol, _doors_ and _entrances_ again become symbolic of the
 genital opening. But materials, too, are symbols of the woman--_wood_,
 _paper_, and objects that are made of these materials, such as _tables_
 and _books_. Of animals, at least the _snail_ and _mussel_ are
 unmistakably recognizable as symbols for the female; of parts of the
 body the _mouth_ takes the place of the genital opening, while
 _churches_ and _chapels_ are structural symbolisms. As you see, all of
 these symbols are not equally comprehensible.
 
 The breasts must be included in the genitals, and like the larger
 hemispheres of the female body are represented by _apples_, _peaches_
 and _fruits_ in general. The pubic hair growth of both sexes appears in
 the dream as _woods_ and _bushes_. The complicated topography of the
 female genitals accounts for the fact that they are often represented as
 scenes with _cliffs_, _woods_ and _water_, while the imposing mechanism
 of the male sex apparatus leads to the use of all manner of very
 complicated _machinery_, difficult to describe.
 
 A noteworthy symbol of the female genital is also the _jewel-casket_;
 _jewels_ and _treasure_ are also representatives of the beloved person
 in the dream; _sweets_ frequently occur as representatives of sexual
 delights. The satisfaction in one's own genital is suggested by all
 types of _play_, in which may be included _piano-playing_. Exquisite
 symbolic representations of _onanism_ are _sliding_ and _coasting_ as
 well as _tearing off a branch_. A particularly remarkable dream symbol
 is that of having _one's_ _teeth fall out_, or _having them pulled_.
 Certainly its most immediate interpretation is castration as a
 punishment for onanism. Special representations for the relations of the
 sexes are less numerous in the dream than we might have expected from
 the foregoing. Rhythmic activities, such as _dancing_, _riding_ and
 _climbing_ may be mentioned, also harrowing experiences, such as _being
 run over_. One may include certain _manual activities_, and, of course,
 _being threatened with weapons_.
 
 You must not imagine that either the use or the translation of these
 symbols is entirely simple. All manner of unexpected things are
 continually happening. For example, it seems hardly believable that in
 these symbolic representations the sex differences are not always
 sharply distinguished. Many symbols represent a genital in general,
 regardless of whether male or female, e.g., the _little child_, the
 _small son_ or _daughter_. It sometimes occurs that a predominantly male
 symbol is used for a female genital, or vice versa. This is not
 understood until one has acquired an insight into the development of the
 sexual representations of mankind. In many instances this double meaning
 of symbols may be only apparent; the most striking of the symbols, such
 as _weapons_, _pockets_ and _boxes_ are excluded from this bisexual
 usage.
 
 I should now like to give a summary, from the point of view of the
 symbols rather than of the thing represented, of the field out of which
 the sex symbols are for the most part taken, and then to make a few
 remarks about the symbols which have points in common that are not
 understood. An obscure symbol of this type is the _hat_, perhaps
 headdress on the whole, and is usually employed as a male
 representation, though at times as a female. In the same way the _cloak_
 represents a man, perhaps not always the genital aspect. You are at
 liberty to ask, why? The _cravat_, which is suspended and is not worn by
 women, is an unmistakable male symbol. _White laundry_, all _linen_, in
 fact, is female. _Dresses_, _uniforms_ are, as we have already seen,
 substitutes for nakedness, for body-formation; the _shoe_ or _slipper_
 is a female genital. _Tables_ and _wood_ have already been mentioned as
 puzzling but undoubtedly female symbols. _Ladders_, _ascents_, _steps_
 in relation to their mounting, are certainly symbols of sexual
 intercourse. On closer consideration we see that they have the rhythm of
 walking as a common characteristic; perhaps, too, the heightening of
 excitement and the shortening of the breath, the higher one mounts.
 
 We have already spoken of _natural scenery_ as a representation of the
 female genitals. _Mountains_ and _cliffs_ are symbols of the male organ;
 the _garden_ a frequent symbol of the female genitals. _Fruit_ does not
 stand for the child, but for the breasts. _Wild animals_ signify
 sensually aroused persons, or further, base impulses, passions.
 _Blossoms_ and _flowers_ represent the female genitals, or more
 particularly, virginity. Do not forget that the blossoms are really the
 genitals of the plants.
 
 We already know the _room_ as a symbol. The representation may be
 extended in that the windows, entrances and exits of the room take on
 the meaning of the body openings. Whether the room is _open_ or _closed_
 is a part of this symbolism, and the _key_ that opens it is an
 unmistakable male symbol.
 
 This is the material of dream symbolism. It is not complete and might be
 deepened as well as extended. But I am of the opinion it will seem more
 than enough to you, perhaps will make you reluctant. You will ask, "Do I
 really live in the midst of sex symbols? Are all the objects that
 surround me, all the clothes I put on, all the things that I touch,
 always sex symbols, and nothing else?" There really are sufficient
 grounds for such questions, and the first is, "Where, in fact, are we to
 find the meaning of these dream symbols if the dreamer himself can give
 no information concerning them, or at best can give only incomplete
 information?"
 
 My answer is: "From many widely different sources, from fairy tales and
 myths, jokes and farces, from folklore, that is, the knowledge of the
 customs, usages, sayings and songs of peoples, from the poetic and
 vulgar language. Everywhere we find the same symbolism and in many of
 these instances we understand them without further information. If we
 follow up each of these sources separately we shall find so many
 parallels to the dream symbolism that we must believe in the correctness
 of our interpretations."
 
 The human body, we have said, is, according to Scherner, frequently
 symbolized in the dream by the house. Continuing this representation,
 the windows, doors and entrances are the entrances into the body
 cavities, the facades are smooth or provided with balconies and
 projections to which to hold. The same symbolism is to be found in our
 daily speech when we greet a good friend as "_old house_" or when we say
 of someone, "We'll hit him in the _belfry_," or maintain of another that
 he's not quite right in the _upper story_. In anatomy the body openings
 are sometimes called the _body-portals_.
 
 The fact that we meet our parents in the dream as imperial or royal
 persons is at first surprising. But it has its parallel in the fairy
 tale. Doesn't it begin to dawn upon us that the many fairy tales which
 begin "Once upon a time there was a _king_ and a _queen_" intend nothing
 else than, "Once there was a _father_ and a _mother_?" In our families
 we refer to our children as _princes_, the eldest as the _crown-prince_.
 The king usually calls himself the _father of the country_. We playfully
 designate little children as _worms_, and say, sympathetically, "_poor
 little worm_."
 
 Let us return to the symbolism of the house. When we use the projections
 of the house to hold ourselves on to in the dream, are we not reminded
 of the familiar colloquialism about persons with well-developed breasts:
 "She has something to _hold onto_"? The folk express this in still
 another way when it says, "there's lots of _wood in front of her
 house_"; as though it wished to come to the aid of our interpretation
 that wood is a feminine, maternal symbol.
 
 In addition to wood there are others. We might not understand how this
 material has come to be a substitute for the maternal, the feminine.
 Here our comparison of languages may be helpful. The German word _Holz_
 (wood) is said to be from the same stem as the Greek word, nle,
 which means stuff, raw material. This is an example of the case, not
 entirely unusual, where a general word for material finally is
 exclusively used for some special material. There is an island in the
 ocean, known by the name of Madeira. The Portuguese gave it this name at
 the time of its discovery because it was at that time entirely covered
 with forests, for in the language of the Portuguese, Madeira means
 _wood_. You will recognize, however, that Madeira, is nothing else than
 the slightly changed Latin word _materia_ which again has the general
 meaning of _material_ Material is derived from _mater_, mother. The
 material out of which something is made, is at the same time its
 mother-part. In the symbolic use of wood for woman, mother, this ancient
 conception still lives.
 
 Birth is regularly expressed in dreams by some connection with water;
 one plunges into the water, or comes out of the water, which means one
 gives birth to, or is born. Now let us not forget that this symbol may
 refer in two ways to the truths of evolutionary history. Not alone have
 all land-mammals, including the ancestors of man, developed out of water
 animals--this is the ultimate fact--but every single mammal, every human
 being, lived the first part of his existence in the water--namely, lived
 in the body of his mother as an embryo in the amniotic fluid and came
 out of the water at the time of his birth. I do not wish to maintain
 that the dreamer knows this, on the contrary I hold that he does not
 have to know. The dreamer very likely knows some things because of the
 fact that he was told about them in his childhood, and for that very
 reason I maintain that this knowledge has played no part in the
 construction of his symbols. He was told in childhood that the stork
 brought him--but where did it get him? Out of a lake, out of the
 well--again, out of the water. One of my patients to whom such
 information had been given, a little count, disappeared for a whole
 afternoon. Finally he was discovered lying at the edge of the palace
 lake, his little face bent above the water and earnestly peering into it
 to see if he could not see the little children at the bottom.
 
 In the myths of the birth of the hero, which O. Rank submitted to
 comparative examination,--the oldest is that of King Sargon of Agade,
 about 2800 B.C.--exposure in the water and rescue from water play a
 predominating role. Rank has recognized that these are representations
 of birth, analogous to those customary in dreams. When a person in his
 dream rescues another from the water, the latter becomes his mother, or
 just plainly mother; in the myth a person who rescues a child out of the
 water professes herself as the real mother of the child. In a well-known
 joke the intelligent Jewish boy is asked who was the mother of Moses. He
 answered without hesitation, the Princess. But no, he is told, she only
 took him out of the water. "That's what _she says_," is his reply, and
 thereby he shows that he has found the correct interpretation of the
 myth.
 
 Leaving on a trip represents death in the dream. Likewise it is the
 custom in the nursery when a child asks where someone who has died, and
 whom he misses, may be, to say to him that the absent one has taken a
 trip. Again I should like to deny the truth of the belief that the dream
 symbol originates in this evasion used for the benefit of children. The
 poet makes use of the same symbol when he speaks of the Hereafter as
 "that undiscovered bourne from which no _traveler_ returns." Even in
 everyday speech it is customary to refer to the last journey. Every
 person acquainted with ancient rite knows how seriously, for example,
 the Egyptians considered the portrayal of a journey to the land of the
 dead. There still exist many copies of the "death book" which was given
 to the mummy for this journey as a sort of Baedeker. Since the burial
 places have been separated from the living quarters, the last journey of
 the dead person has become a reality.
 
 In the same manner the genital symbolism is just as little peculiar to
 the dream alone. Every one of you has perhaps at some time or other been
 so unkind as to call some woman an "_old casket_" without perhaps being
 aware that he was using a genital symbol. In the New Testament one may
 read "Woman is a weak _vessel_." The Holy Scriptures of the Jews, so
 nearly poetic in their style, are filled with sex-symbolic expressions
 which have not always been correctly understood, and the true
 construction of which, in the _Song of Songs_, for example, has led to
 many misunderstandings. In the later Hebraic literature the
 representation of woman as a house, the door taking the place of the sex
 opening, is very widespread. The man complains, for instance, when he
 discovers a lack of virginity, that he has found _the door open_. The
 symbol of the table for woman is also known to this literature. The
 woman says of her husband, "I set the table for him, _but he upset it_."
 Lame children are supposed to result from the fact that the man has
 _overturned the table_. I take these examples from a work by L. Levy of
 Bruenn, _The Sexual Symbolism of the Bible and the Talmud_.
 
 That ships, too, represent women in dreams is a belief derived from the
 etymologists, who maintain "ship" was originally the name of an earthen
 vessel and is the same word as _Schaff_ (to create). The Greek myth of
 Periander of Corinth and his wife Melissa is proof that the stove or
 oven is a woman, and a womb. When, according to Herodotus, the tyrant
 entreated the shade of his beloved wife, whom, however, he had murdered
 in a fit of jealousy, for some sign of its identity, the deceased
 identified herself by the reminder that he, _Periander_, _had thrust his
 bread into a cold oven_, as a disguise for an occurrence that could have
 been known to no other person. In the _Anthropophyteia_ published by F.
 S. Krauss, an indispensable source book for everything that has to do
 with the sex life of nations, we read that in a certain German region it
 is commonly said of a woman who has just been delivered of a child,
 "_Her oven has caved in_." The making of a fire and everything connected
 therewith is filled through and through with sex symbolism. The flame is
 always the male genital, the fireplace, the hearth, is the womb of the
 woman.
 
 If you have often wondered why it is that landscapes are so often used
 to represent the female genitals in the dream, then let the mythologist
 teach you the role Mother Earth has played in the symbolisms and cults
 of ancient times. You may be tempted to say that a room represents a
 woman in the dream because of the German colloquialism which uses the
 term _Frauenzimmer_ instead of _Frau_, in other words, it substitutes
 for the human person the idea of that room that is set aside for her
 exclusive use. In like manner we speak of the _Sublime Porte_, and mean
 the Sultan and his government; furthermore, the name of the ancient
 Egyptian ruler, Pharaoh, means nothing other than "great court room."
 (In the ancient Orient the court yards between the double gates of the
 town were the gathering places of the people, in the same manner as the
 market place was in the classical world.) What I mean is, this
 derivation is far too superficial. It seems more probable to me that the
 room, as the space surrounding man, came to be the symbol of woman. We
 have seen that the house is used in such a representation; from
 mythology and poetry we may take the _city_, _fortress_, _palace_,
 _citadel_, as further symbols of woman. The question may easily be
 decided by the dreams of those persons who do not speak German and do
 not understand it. In the last few years my patients have been
 predominantly foreign-language speaking, and I think I can recall that
 in their dreams as well the room represents woman, even where they had
 no analogous usages in their languages. There are still other signs
 which show that the symbolization is not limited by the bounds of
 language, a fact that even the old dream investigator, Schubert (1862)
 maintained. Since none of my dreamers were totally ignorant of German I
 must leave this differentiation to those psychoanalysts who can gather
 examples in other lands where the people speak but one language.
 
 Among the symbol-representations of the male genital there is scarcely
 one that does not recur in jokes or in vulgar or poetical usage,
 especially among the old classical poets. Not alone do those symbols
 commonly met with in dreams appeal here, but also new ones, e.g., the
 working materials of various performances, foremost of which is the
 incantation. Furthermore, we approach in the symbolic representation of
 the male a very extended and much discussed province, which we shall
 avoid for economic reasons. I should like to make a few remarks,
 however, about one of the unclassified symbols--the figure 3. Whether or
 not this figure derives its holiness from its symbolic meaning may
 remain undecided. But it appears certain that many objects which occur
 in nature as three-part things derive their use as coats-of-arms and
 emblems from such symbolic meaning, e.g., the clover, likewise the
 three-part French lily, (fleur-de-lys), and the extraordinary
 coats-of-arms of two such widely separated islands as Sicily and the
 Isle of Man, where the Triskeles (three partly bended knees, emerging
 from a central point) are merely said to be the portrayal in a different
 form of the male genitals. Copies of the male member were used in
 antiquity as the most powerful charms (_Apotropaea_) against evil
 influences, and this is connected with the fact that the lucky amulets
 of our own time may one and all be recognized as genital or sex-symbols.
 Let us study such a collection, worn in the form of little silver
 pendants: the four-leaf clover, a pig, a mushroom, a horse-shoe, a
 ladder, a chimney-sweep. The four-leaf clover, it seems, has usurped the
 place of the three-leaf clover, which is really more suitable as a
 symbol; the pig is an ancient symbol of fertility; the mushroom is an
 unquestionable penis symbol--there are mushrooms that derive their
 systematic names from their unmistakable similarity to the male member
 (Phallus impudicus); the horseshoe recalls the contour of the female
 genital opening; and the chimney sweep who carries a ladder belongs in
 this company because he carries on that trade with which the
 sex-intercourse is vulgarly compared (_cf._ the _Anthropophyteia_). We
 have already become acquainted with his ladder as a sex symbol in the
 dream; the German usage is helpful here, it shows us how the verb "to
 mount"[30] is made use of in an exquisite sexual sense. We use the
 expressions "_to run after women_," which literally translated would be
 "_to climb after women_," and "_an old climber_."[31] In French, where
 "_step_" is "_la marche_" we find that the analogous expression for a
 man about town is "_un vieux marcheur_." It is apparently not unknown in
 this connection that the sexual intercourse of many of the larger
 animals requires a mounting, _a climbing upon_ the female.
 
 The tearing off of a branch as the symbolic representation of onanism is
 not alone in keeping with the vulgar representation of the fact of
 onanism, but has far-reaching mythological parallels. Especially
 noteworthy, however, is the representation of onanism, or rather the
 punishment therefor, castration, by the falling out or pulling out of
 teeth, because there is a parallel in folk-lore which is probably known
 to the fewest dreamers. It does not seem at all questionable to me that
 the practice of circumcision common among so many peoples is an
 equivalent and a substitute for castration. And now we are informed that
 in Australia certain primitive tribes practice circumcision as a rite of
 puberty (the ceremony in honor of the boy's coming of age), while
 others, living quite near, have substituted for this act the striking
 out of a tooth.
 
 I end my exposition with these examples. They are only examples. We know
 more about these matters, and you may well imagine how much richer and
 how much more interesting such a collection would appear if made, not by
 amateurs like ourselves, but by real experts in mythology, anthropology,
 philology and folk-lore. We are compelled to draw a few conclusions
 which cannot be exhaustive, but which give us much food for thought.
 
 In the first place, we are faced by the fact that the dreamer has at his
 disposal a symbolic means of expression of which he is unconscious
 while awake, and does not recognize when he sees. That is as remarkable
 as if you should make the discovery that your chambermaid understands
 Sanskrit, although you know she was born in a Bohemian village and never
 learned the language. It is not easy to harmonize this fact with our
 psychological views. We can only say that the dreamer's knowledge of
 symbolism is unconscious, that it is a part of his unconscious mental
 life. We make no progress with this assumption. Until now it was only
 necessary to admit of unconscious impulses, those about which one knew
 nothing, either for a period of time or at all times. But now we deal
 with something more; indeed, with unknown knowledge, with thought
 relationships, comparisons between unlike objects which lead to this,
 that one constant may be substituted for another. These comparisons are
 not made anew each time, but they lie ready, they are complete for all
 time. That is to be concluded from the fact of their agreement in
 different persons, agreement despite differences in language.
 
 But whence comes the knowledge of these symbol-relationships? The usages
 of language cover only a small part of them. The dreamer is for the most
 part unacquainted with the numerous parallels from other sources; we
 ourselves must first laboriously gather them together.
 
 Secondly, these symbolic representations are peculiar neither to the
 dreamer nor to the dream work by means of which they become expressed.
 We have learned that mythology and fairy-tales make use of the same
 symbolism, as well as do the people in their sayings and songs, the
 ordinary language of every day, and poetic phantasy. The field of
 symbolism is an extraordinarily large one, and dream symbolism is but a
 small part thereof. It is not even expedient to approach the whole
 problem from the dream side. Many of the symbols that are used in other
 places do not occur in the dream at all, or at best only very seldom.
 Many of the dream symbols are to be found in other fields only very
 rarely, as you have seen. One gets the impression that he is here
 confronted with an ancient but no longer existent method of expression,
 of which various phases, however, continue in different fields, one
 here, one there, a third, perhaps in a slightly altered form, in several
 fields. I am reminded of the phantasy of an interesting mental
 defective, who had imagined a fundamental language, of which all these
 symbolic representations were the remains.
 
 Thirdly, you must have noticed that symbolism in these other fields is
 by no means sex symbolism solely, while in the dream the symbols are
 used almost entirely to express sexual objects and processes. Nor is
 this easily explained. Is it possible that symbols originally sexual in
 their meaning later came to have other uses, and that this was the
 reason perhaps for the weakening of the symbolic representation to one
 of another nature? These questions are admittedly unanswerable if one
 has dealt only with dream-symbolism. One can only adhere to the
 supposition that there is an especially intimate connection between true
 symbols and things sexual.
 
 An important indication of this has been given us recently. A
 philologist, H. Sperber (Upsala) who works independently of
 psychoanalysis, advanced the theory that sexual needs have played the
 largest part in the origin and development of languages. The first
 sounds served as means of communication, and called the sexual partner;
 the further development of the roots of speech accompanied the
 performance of the primitive man's work. This work was communal and
 progressed to the accompaniment of rhythmically repeated word sounds. In
 that way a sexual interest was transferred to the work. The primitive
 man made work acceptable at the same time that he used it as an
 equivalent and substitute for sex-activity. The word thus called forth
 by the common labor had two meanings, designating the sex-act as well as
 the equivalent labor-activity. In time the word became disassociated
 from its sexual significance and became fixed on this work. Generations
 later the same thing happened to a new word that once had sexual
 significance and came to be used for a new type of work. In this manner
 a number of word-roots were formed, all of sexual origin, and all of
 which had lost their sexual significance. If the description sketched
 here approximates the truth, it opens up the possibility for an
 understanding of the dream symbolism. We can understand how it is that
 in the dream, which preserves something of these most ancient
 conditions, there are so extraordinarily many symbols for the sexual,
 and why, in general, weapons and implements always stand for the male,
 materials and things manufactured, for the female. Symbolic
 relationships would be the remnants of the old word-identity; things
 which once were called by the same names as the genitals can now appear
 in the dream as symbols for them.
 
 From our parallels to dream symbolization you may also learn to
 appreciate what is the character of psychoanalysis which makes it a
 subject of general interest, which is true of neither psychology nor
 psychiatry. Psychoanalytic work connects with so many other scientific
 subjects, the investigation of which promises the most pertinent
 discoveries, with mythology, with folk-lore, with racial psychology and
 with religion. You will understand how a journal can have grown on
 psychoanalytic soil, the sole purpose of which is the furtherance of
 these relationships. This is the _Imago_ founded in 1912 and edited by
 Hanns Sachs and Otto Rank. In all of these relations, psychoanalysis is
 first and foremost the giving, less often the receiving, part. Indeed it
 derives benefit from the fact that its unusual teachings are
 substantiated by their recurrence in other fields, but on the whole it
 is psychoanalysis that provides the technical procedure and the point of
 view, the use of which will prove fruitful in those other fields. The
 psychic life of the human individual provides us, upon psychoanalytic
 investigation, with explanations with which we are able to solve many
 riddles in the life of humanity, or at least show these riddles in their
 proper light.
 
 Furthermore, I have not even told you under what conditions we are able
 to get the deepest insight into that suppositious "fundamental
 language," or from which field we gain the most information. So long as
 you do not know this you cannot appreciate the entire significance of
 the subject. This field is the neurotic, its materials, the symptoms and
 other expressions of the nervous patient, for the explanation and
 treatment of which psychoanalysis was devised.
 
 My fourth point of view returns to our premise and connects up with our
 prescribed course. We said, even if there were no such thing as dream
 censorship, the dream would still be hard to understand, for we would
 then be confronted with the task of translating the symbol-language of
 the dream into the thought of our waking hours. Symbolism is a second
 and independent item of dream distortion, in addition to dream
 censorship. It is not a far cry to suppose that it is convenient for
 the dream censorship to make use of symbolism since both lead to the
 same end, to making the dream strange and incomprehensible.
 
 Whether or not in the further study of the dream we shall hit upon a new
 item that influences dream distortion, remains to be seen. I should not
 like to leave the subject of dream symbolism without once more touching
 upon the curious fact that it arouses such strong opposition in the case
 of educated persons, in spite of the fact that symbolism in myth,
 religion, art and speech is undoubtedly so prevalent. Is not this again
 because of its relationship to sexuality?
 
 
 
 
 ELEVENTH LECTURE
 
 THE DREAM
 
 
 _The Dream-Work_
 
 If you have mastered dream censorship and symbolic representation, you
 are, to be sure, not yet adept in dream distortion, but you are
 nevertheless in a position to understand most dreams. For this you
 employ two mutually supplementary methods, call up the associations of
 the dreamer until you have penetrated from the substitute to the actual,
 and from your own knowledge supply the meaning for the symbol. Later we
 shall discuss certain uncertainties which show themselves in this
 process.
 
 We are now in a position to resume work which we attempted, with very
 insufficient means at an earlier stage, when we studied the relation
 between the manifest dream elements and their latent actualities, and in
 so doing established four such main relationships: that of a part of the
 whole, that of approach or allusion, the symbolic relationship and
 plastic word representation. We shall now attempt the same on a larger
 scale, by comparing the manifest dream content as a whole, with the
 latent dream which we found by interpretation.
 
 I hope you will never again confuse these two. If you have achieved
 this, you have probably accomplished more in the understanding of the
 dream than the majority of the readers of my _Interpretation of Dreams_.
 Let me remind you once more that this process, which changes the latent
 into the manifest dream, is called _dream-work_. Work which proceeds in
 the opposite direction, from the manifest dream to the latent, is our
 _work of interpretation_. The work of interpretation attempts to undo
 the dream-work. Infantile dreams that are recognized as evident wish
 fulfillments nevertheless have undergone some dream-work, namely, the
 transformation of the wish into reality, and generally, too, of thoughts
 into visual pictures. Here we need no interpretation, but only a
 retracing of these transformations. Whatever dream-work has been added
 to other dreams, we call _dream distortion_, and this can be annulled by
 our work of interpretation.
 
 The comparison of many dream interpretations has rendered it possible
 for me to give you a coherent representation of what the dream-work does
 with the material of the latent dream. I beg of you, however, not to
 expect to understand too much of this. It is a piece of description that
 should be listened to with calm attention.
 
 The first process of the dream-work is _condensation_. By this we
 understand that the manifest dream has a smaller content than the latent
 one, that is, it is a sort of abbreviated translation of the latter.
 Condensation may occasionally be absent, but as a rule it is present,
 often to a very high degree. The opposite is never true, that is, it
 never occurs that the manifest dream is more extensive in scope and
 content than the latent. Condensation occurs in the following ways: 1.
 Certain latent elements are entirely omitted; 2. only a fragment of the
 many complexes of the latent dream is carried over into the manifest
 dream; 3. latent elements that have something in common are collected
 for the manifest dream and are fused into a whole.
 
 If you wish, you may reserve the term "condensation" for this last
 process alone. Its effects are particularly easy to demonstrate. From
 your own dreams you will doubtless recall the fusion of several persons
 into one. Such a compound person probably looks like A., is dressed like
 B., does something that one remembers of C., but in spite of this one is
 conscious that he is really D. By means of this compound formation
 something common to all four people is especially emphasized. One can
 make a compound formation of events and of places in the same way as of
 people, provided always that the single events and localities have
 something in common which the latent dream emphasizes. It is a sort of
 new and fleeting concept of formation, with the common element as its
 kernel. This jumble of details that has been fused together regularly
 results in a vague indistinct picture, as though you had taken several
 pictures on the same film.
 
 The shaping of such compound formations must be of great importance to
 the dream-work, for we can prove, (by the choice of a verbal expression
 for a thought, for instance) that the common elements mentioned above
 are purposely manufactured where they originally do not exist. We have
 already become acquainted with such condensation and compound
 formations; they played an important part in the origin of certain cases
 of slips of the tongue. You recall the young man who wished to _inscort_
 a woman. Furthermore, there are jokes whose technique may be traced to
 such a condensation. But entirely aside from this, one may maintain that
 this appearance of something quite unknown in the dream finds its
 counterpart in many of the creations of our imagination which fuse
 together component parts that do not belong together in experience, as
 for example the centaurs, and the fabulous animals of old mythology or
 of Boecklin's pictures. For creative imagination can invent nothing new
 whatsoever, it can only put together certain details normally alien to
 one another. The peculiar thing, however, about the procedure of the
 dream-work is the following: The material at the disposal of the
 dream-work consists of thoughts, thoughts which may be offensive and
 unacceptable, but which are nevertheless correctly formed and expressed.
 These thoughts are transformed into something else by the dream-work,
 and it is remarkable and incomprehensible that this translation, this
 rendering, as it were, into another script or language, employs the
 methods of condensation and combination. For a translation usually
 strives to respect the discriminations expressed in the text, and to
 differentiate similar things. The dream-work, on the contrary, tries to
 fuse two different thoughts by looking, just as the joke does, for an
 ambiguous word which shall act as a connecting link between the two
 thoughts. One need not attempt to understand this feature of the case at
 once, but it may become significant for the conception of the
 dream-work.
 
 Although condensation renders the dream opaque, one does not get the
 impression that it is an effect of dream censorship. One prefers to
 trace it back to mechanical or economic conditions; but censorship
 undoubtedly has a share in the process.
 
 The results of condensation may be quite extraordinary. With its help,
 it becomes possible at times to collect quite unrelated latent thought
 processes into one manifest dream, so that one can arrive at an
 apparently adequate interpretation, and at the same time conceive a
 possible further interpretation.
 
 The consequence of condensation for the relation between latent and
 manifest dreams is the fact that no simple relations can exist between
 the elements of the one and the other. A manifest element corresponds
 simultaneously to several latent ones, and vice versa, a latent element
 may partake of several manifest ones, an interlacing, as it were. In the
 interpretation of the dream it also becomes evident that the
 associations to a single element do not necessarily follow one another
 in orderly sequence. Often we must wait until the entire dream is
 interpreted.
 
 Dream-work therefore accomplishes a very unusual sort of transcription
 of dream thoughts, not a translation word for word, or sign for sign,
 not a selection according to a set rule, as if all the consonants of a
 word were given and the vowels omitted; nor is it what we might call
 substitution, namely, the choice of one element to take the place of
 several others. It is something very different and much more
 complicated.
 
 The second process of the dream-work is _displacement_. Fortunately we
 are already prepared for this, since we know that it is entirely the
 work of dream censorship. The two evidences of this are firstly, that a
 latent element is not replaced by one of its constituent parts but by
 something further removed from it, that is, by a sort of allusion;
 secondly, that the psychic accent is transferred from an important
 element to another that is unimportant, so that the dream centers
 elsewhere and seems strange.
 
 Substitution by allusion is known to our conscious thinking also, but
 with a difference. In conscious thinking the allusion must be easily
 intelligible, and the substitute must bear a relation to the actual
 content. Jokes, too, often make use of allusion; they let the condition
 of content associations slide and replace it by unusual external
 associations, such as resemblances in sound, ambiguity of words, etc.
 They retain, however, the condition of intelligibility; the joke would
 lose all its effect if the allusion could not be traced back to the
 actual without any effort whatsoever. The allusion of displacement has
 freed itself of both these limitations. Its connection with the element
 which it replaces is most external and remote, is unintelligible for
 this reason, and if it is retraced, its interpretation gives the
 impression of an unsuccessful joke or of a forced, far-fetched
 explanation. For the dream censor has only then accomplished its
 purpose, when it has made the path of return from the allusion to the
 original undiscoverable.
 
 The displacement of emphasis is unheard of as a means of expressing
 thoughts. In conscious thinking we occasionally admit it to gain a comic
 effect. I can probably give you an idea of the confusion which this
 produces by reminding you of the story of the blacksmith who had
 committed a capital crime. The court decided that the penalty for the
 crime must be paid, but since he was the only blacksmith in the village
 and therefore indispensable, while there were three tailors, one of the
 latter was hung in his stead.
 
 The third process of the dream-work is the most interesting from a
 psychological point of view. It consists of the _translation_ of
 thoughts into visual images. Let us bear in mind that by no means all
 dream thoughts undergo this translation; many of them retain their form
 and appear in the manifest dream also as thought or consciousness;
 moreover, visual images are not the only form into which thoughts are
 translated. They are, however, the foundation of the dream fabric; this
 part of the dream work is, as we already know, the second most constant,
 and for single dream elements we have already learned to know "plastic
 word representation."
 
 It is evident that this process is not simple. In order to get an idea
 of its difficulties you must pretend that you have undertaken the task
 of replacing a political editorial in a newspaper by a series of
 illustrations, that you have suffered an atavistic return from the use
 of the alphabet to ideographic writing. Whatever persons or concrete
 events occur in this article you will be able to replace easily by
 pictures, perhaps to your advantage, but you will meet with difficulties
 in the representation of all abstract words and all parts of speech
 denoting thought relationships, such as particles, conjunctions, etc.
 With the abstract words you could use all sorts of artifices. You will,
 for instance, try to change the text of the article into different words
 which may sound unusual, but whose components will be more concrete and
 more adapted to representation. You will then recall that most abstract
 words were concrete before their meaning paled, and will therefore go
 back to the original concrete significance of these words as often as
 possible, and so you will be glad to learn that you can represent the
 "possession" of an object by the actual physical straddling of it.[32]
 The dream work does the same thing. Under such circumstances you can
 hardly demand accuracy of representation. You will also have to allow
 the dream-work to replace an element that is as hard to depict as for
 instance, broken faith, by another kind of rupture, a broken leg.[33] In
 this way you will be able to smooth away to some extent the crudity of
 imagery when the latter is endeavoring to replace word expression.
 
 In the representation of parts of speech that denote thought relations,
 such as _because_, _therefore_, _but_, etc., you have no such aids;
 these constituent parts of the text will therefore be lost in your
 translation into images. In the same way, the dream-work resolves the
 content of the dream thought into its raw material of objects and
 activities. You may be satisfied if the possibility is vouchsafed you to
 suggest certain relations, not representable in themselves, in a more
 detailed elaboration of the image. In quite the same way the dream-work
 succeeds in expressing much of the content of the latent dream thought
 in the formal peculiarities of the manifest dream, in its clearness or
 vagueness, in its division into several parts, etc. The number of
 fragmentary dreams into which the dream is divided corresponds as a rule
 to the number of main themes, of thought sequences in the latent dream;
 a short preliminary dream often stands as an introduction or a
 motivation to the complementary dream which follows; a subordinate
 clause in dream thought is represented in the manifest dream as an
 interpolated change of scene, etc. The form of the dream is itself,
 therefore, by no means without significance and challenges
 interpretation. Different dreams of the same night often have the same
 meaning, and testify to an increasing effort to control a stimulus of
 growing urgency. In a single dream a particularly troublesome element
 may be represented by "duplicates," that is, by numerous symbols.
 
 By continually comparing dream thought with the manifest dream that
 replaces it, we learn all sorts of things for which we were not
 prepared, as for instance, the fact that even the nonsense and absurdity
 of the dream have meaning. Yes, on this point the opposition between the
 medical and psychoanalytic conception of the dream reaches a climax not
 previously achieved. According to the former, the dream is senseless
 because the dreaming psychic activity has lost all power of critical
 judgment; according to our theory, on the other hand, the dream becomes
 senseless, whenever a critical judgment, contained in the dream thought,
 wishes to express the opinion: "It is nonsense." The dream which you all
 know, about the visit to the theatre (three tickets 1 Fl. 50 Kr.) is a
 good example of this. The opinion expressed here is: "It was _nonsense_
 to marry so early."
 
 In the same way, we discover in interpretation what is the significance
 of the doubts and uncertainties so often expressed by the dreamer as to
 whether a certain element really occurred in the dream; whether it was
 this or something else. As a rule these doubts and uncertainties
 correspond to nothing in the latent dream thought; they are occasioned
 throughout by the working of the dream censor and are equivalent to an
 unsuccessful attempt at suppression.
 
 One of the most surprising discoveries is the manner in which the
 dream-work deals with those things which are opposed to one another in
 the latent dream. We already know that agreements in the latent material
 are expressed in the manifest dream by condensations. Now oppositions
 are treated in exactly the same way as agreements and are, with special
 preference, expressed by the same manifest element. An element in a
 manifest dream, capable of having an opposite, may therefore represent
 itself as well as its opposite, or may do both simultaneously; only the
 context can determine which translation is to be chosen. It must follow
 from this that the particle "no" cannot be represented in the dream, at
 least not unambiguously.
 
 The development of languages furnishes us with a welcome analogy for
 this surprising behavior on the part of the dream work. Many scholars
 who do research work in languages have maintained that in the oldest
 languages opposites--such as strong, weak; light, dark; big,
 little--were expressed by the same root word. (_The Contradictory Sense
 of Primitive Words._) In old Egyptian, _ken_ originally meant both
 strong and weak. In conversation, misunderstanding in the use of such
 ambiguous words was avoided by the tone of voice and by accompanying
 gestures, in writing by the addition of so-called determinatives, that
 is, by a picture that was itself not meant to be expressed. Accordingly,
 if ken meant strong, the picture of an erect little man was placed after
 the alphabetical signs, if _ken_, _weak_, was meant, the picture of a
 cowering man followed. Only later, by slight modifications of the
 original word, were two designations developed for the opposites which
 it denoted. In this way, from _ken_ meaning both strong and weak, there
 was derived a _ken_, strong, and a _ken_, weak. It is said that not only
 the most primitive languages in their last developmental stage, but also
 the more recent ones, even the living tongues of to-day have retained
 abundant remains of this primitive opposite meaning. Let me give you a
 few illustrations of this taken from C. Abel (1884).
 
 In Latin there are still such words of double meaning:
 
 _altus_--high, deep, and _sacer_, sacred, accursed.
 
 As examples of modifications of the same root, I cite:
 
 _clamare_--to scream, _clam_--quiet, still, secret;
 
 _siccus_--dry, _succus_--juice.
 
 And from the German:
 
 _Stimme_--voice, _stumm_--dumb.
 
 The comparison of related tongues yields a wealth of examples:
 
 English: _lock_; German: _Loch_--hole, _Luecke_--gap.
 
 English: _cleave_; German: _kleben_--to stick, to adhere.
 
 The English _without_, is to-day used to mean "not with"; that "with"
 had the connotation of deprivation as well as that of apportioning, is
 apparent from the compounds: _withdraw_, _withhold_. The German
 _wieder_, again, closely resembles this.
 
 Another peculiarity of dream-work finds it prototype in the development
 of language. It occurred in ancient Egyptian as well as in other later
 languages that the sequence of sounds of the words was transposed to
 denote the same fundamental idea. The following are examples from
 English and German:
 
 _Topf_--_pot_; _boat_--_tub_; _hurry_--_Ruhe_ (rest, quiet).
 
 _Balken_ (beam)--_Kloben_ (mallet)--_club_.
 
 From the Latin and the German:
 
 _capere_ (to seize)--_packen_ (to seize, to grasp).
 
 Inversions such as occur here in the single word are effected in a very
 different way by the dream-work. We already know the inversion of the
 sense, substitution by the opposite. Besides there are inversions of
 situations, of relations between two people, and so in dreams we are in
 a sort of topsy-turvy world. In a dream it is frequently the rabbit that
 shoots the hunter. Further inversion occurs in the sequence of events,
 so that in the dream the cause is placed after the effect. It is like a
 performance in a third-rate theatre, where the hero falls before the
 shot which kills him is fired from the wings. Or there are dreams in
 which the whole sequence of the elements is inverted, so that in the
 interpretation one must take the last first, and the first last, in
 order to obtain a meaning. You will recall from our study of dream
 symbolism that to go or fall into the water means the same as to come
 out of it, namely, to give birth to, or to be born, and that mounting
 stairs or a ladder means the same as going down. The advantage that
 dream distortions may gain from such freedom of representation, is
 unmistakable.
 
 These features of the dream-work may be called _archaic_. They are
 connected with ancient systems of expression, ancient languages and
 literatures, and involve the same difficulties which we shall deal with
 later in a critical connection.
 
 Now for some other aspects of the matter. In the dream-work it is
 plainly a question of translating the latent thoughts, expressed in
 words, into psychic images, in the main, of a visual kind. Now our
 thoughts were developed from such psychic images; their first material
 and the steps which led up to them were psychic impressions, or to be
 more exact, the memory images of these psychic impressions. Only later
 were words attached to these and then combined into thoughts. The
 dream-work therefore puts the thoughts through a _regressive_ treatment,
 that is, one that retraces the steps in their development. In this
 regression, all that has been added to the thoughts as a new
 contribution in the course of the development of the memory pictures
 must fall away.
 
 This, then, is the dream-work. In view of the processes that we have
 discovered about it, our interest in the manifest dream was forced into
 the background. I shall, however, devote a few remarks to the latter,
 since it is after all the only thing that is positively known to us.
 
 It is natural that the manifest dream should lose its importance for us.
 It must be a matter of indifference to us whether it is well composed or
 resolved into a series of disconnected single images. Even when its
 exterior seems to be significant, we know that it has been developed by
 means of dream distortion and may have as little organic connection with
 the inner content of the dream as the facade of an Italian church has
 with its structure and ground plan. At other times this facade of the
 dream, too, has its significance, in that it reproduces with little or
 no distortion an important part of the latent dream thought. But we
 cannot know this before we have put the dream through a process of
 interpretation and reached a decision as to what amount of distortion
 has taken place. A similar doubt prevails when two elements in the dream
 seem to have been brought into close relations to one another. This may
 be a valuable hint, suggesting that we may join together those manifest
 thoughts which correspond to the elements in the latent dream; yet at
 other times we are convinced that what belongs together in thought has
 been torn apart in the dream.
 
 As a general rule we must refrain from trying to explain one part of the
 manifest dream by another, as if the dream were coherently conceived and
 pragmatically represented. At the most it is comparable to a Breccian
 stone, produced by the fusion of various minerals in such a way that the
 markings it shows are entirely different from those of the original
 mineral constituents. There is actually a part of the dream-work, the
 so-called _secondary treatment_, whose function it is to develop
 something unified, something approximately coherent from the final
 products of the dream-work. In so doing the material is often arranged
 in an entirely misleading sense and insertions are made wherever it
 seems necessary.
 
 On the other hand, we must not over-estimate the dream-work, nor
 attribute too much to it. The processes which we have enumerated tell
 the full tale of its functioning; beyond condensing, displacing,
 representing plastically, and then subjecting the whole to a secondary
 treatment, it can do nothing. Whatever of judgment, of criticism, of
 surprise, and of deduction are to be found in the dream are not products
 of the dream-work and are only very seldom signs of afterthoughts about
 the dream, but are generally parts of the latent dream thought, which
 have passed over into the manifest dream, more or less modified and
 adapted to the context. In the matter of composing speeches, the
 dream-work can also do nothing. Except for a few examples, the speeches
 in the dream are imitations and combinations of speeches heard or made
 by oneself during the day, and which have been introduced into the
 latent thought, either as material or as stimuli for the dream. Neither
 can the dream pose problems; when these are found in the dream, they are
 in the main combinations of numbers, semblances of examples that are
 quite absurd or merely copies of problems in the latent dream thought.
 Under these conditions it is not surprising that the interest which has
 attached itself to the dream-work is soon deflected from it to the
 latent dream thoughts which are revealed in more or less distorted form
 in the manifest dream. It is not justifiable, however, to have this
 change go so far that in a theoretical consideration one regularly
 substitutes the latent dream thought for the dream itself, and
 maintains of the latter what can hold only for the former. It is odd
 that the results of psychoanalysis should be misused for such an
 exchange. "Dream" can mean nothing but the result of the dream-work,
 that is, the _form_ into which the latent dream thoughts have been
 translated by the dream-work.
 
 Dream-work is a process of a very peculiar sort, the like of which has
 hitherto not been discovered in psychic life. These condensations,
 displacements, regressive translations of thoughts into pictures, are
 new discoveries which richly repay our efforts in the field of
 psychoanalysis. You will realize from the parallel to the dream-work,
 what connections psychoanalytic studies will reveal with other fields,
 especially with the development of speech and thought. You can only
 surmise the further significance of these connections when you hear that
 the mechanism of the dream structure is the model for the origin of
 neurotic symptoms.
 
 I know too that we cannot as yet estimate the entire contribution that
 this work has made to psychology. We shall only indicate the new proofs
 that have been given of the existence of unconscious psychic acts--for
 such are the latent dream thoughts--and the unexpectedly wide approach
 to the understanding of the unconscious psychic life that dream
 interpretation opens up to us.
 
 The time has probably come, however, to illustrate separately, by
 various little examples of dreams, the connected facts for which you
 have been prepared.
 
 
 
 
 TWELFTH LECTURE
 
 THE DREAM
 
 _Analysis of Sample Dreams_
 
 
 I hope you will not be disappointed if I again lay before you excerpts
 from dream analyses instead of inviting you to participate in the
 interpretation of a beautiful long dream. You will say that after so
 much preparation you ought to have this right, and that after the
 successful interpretation of so many thousands of dreams it should long
 ago have become possible to assemble a collection of excellent dream
 samples with which we could demonstrate all our assertions concerning
 dream-work and dream thoughts. Yes, but the difficulties which stand in
 the way of the fulfillment of your wish are too many.
 
 First of all, I must confess to you that no one practices dream
 interpretation as his main occupation. When does one interpret dreams?
 Occasionally one can occupy himself with the dream of some friend,
 without any special purpose, or else he may work with his own dreams for
 a time in order to school himself in psychoanalytic method; most often,
 however, one deals with the dreams of nervous individuals who are
 undergoing analytic treatment. These latter dreams are excellent
 material, and in no way inferior to those of normal persons, but one is
 forced by the technique of the treatment to subordinate dream analysis
 to therapeutic aims and to pass over a large number of dreams after
 having derived something from them that is of use in the treatment. Many
 dreams we meet with during the treatment are, as a matter of fact,
 impossible of complete analysis. Since they spring from the total mass
 of psychic material which is still unknown to us, their understanding
 becomes possible only after the completion of the cure. Besides, to tell
 you such dreams would necessitate the disclosure of all the secrets
 concerning a neurosis. That will not do for us, since we have taken the
 dream as preparation for the study of the neuroses.
 
 I know you would gladly leave this material, and would prefer to hear
 the dreams of healthy persons, or your own dreams explained. But that is
 impossible because of the content of these dreams. One can expose
 neither himself, nor another whose confidence he has won, so
 inconsiderately as would result from a thorough interpretation of his
 dreams--which, as you already know, refer to the most intimate things of
 his personality. In addition to this difficulty, caused by the nature of
 the material, there is another that must be considered when
 communicating a dream. You know the dream seems strange even to the
 dreamer himself, let alone to one who does not know the dreamer. Our
 literature is not poor in good and detailed dream analyses. I myself
 have published some in connection with case histories. Perhaps the best
 example of a dream interpretation is the one published by O. Rank, being
 two related dreams of a young girl, covering about two pages of print,
 the analysis covering seventy-six pages. I would need about a whole
 semester in order to take you through such a task. If we select a longer
 or more markedly distorted dream, we have to make so many explanations,
 we must make use of so many free associations and recollections, must go
 into so many bypaths, that a lecture on the subject would be entirely
 unsatisfactory and inconclusive. So I must ask you to be content with
 what is more easily obtained, with the recital of small bits of dreams
 of neurotic persons, in which we may be able to recognize this or that
 isolated fact. Dream symbols are the most easily demonstrable, and after
 them, certain peculiarities of regressive dream representations.[34] I
 shall tell you why I considered each of the following dreams worthy of
 communication.
 
 1. A dream, consisting of only two brief pictures: "_The dreamer's uncle
 is smoking a cigarette, although it is Saturday. A woman caresses him as
 though he were her child._"
 
 In commenting on the first picture, the dreamer (a Jew) remarks that his
 uncle is a pious man who never did, and never would do, anything so
 sinful as smoking on the Sabbath. As to the woman of the second picture,
 he has no free associations other than his mother. These two pictures or
 thoughts should obviously be brought into connection with each other,
 but how? Since he expressly rules out the reality of his uncle's action,
 then it is natural to interpolate an "if." "_If_ my uncle, that pious
 man, should smoke a cigarette on Saturday, then I could also permit my
 mother's caresses." This obviously means that the mother's caresses are
 prohibited, in the same manner as is smoking on Saturday, to a pious
 Jew. You will recall, I told you that all relations between the dream
 thoughts disappear in the dream-work, that these relations are broken up
 into their raw material, and that it is the task of interpretation to
 re-interpolate the omitted connections.
 
 2. Through my publications on dreams I have become, in certain respects,
 the public consultant on matters pertaining to dreams, and for many
 years I have been receiving communications from the most varied sources,
 in which dreams are related to me or presented to me for my judgment. I
 am of course grateful to all those persons who include with the story of
 the dream, enough material to make an interpretation possible, or who
 give such an interpretation themselves. It is in this category that the
 following dream belongs, the dream of a Munich physician in the year
 1910. I select it because it goes to show how impossible of
 understanding a dream generally is before the dreamer has given us what
 information he has about it. I suspect that at bottom you consider the
 ideal dream interpretation that in which one simply inserts the meaning
 of the symbols, and would like to lay aside the technique of free
 association to the dream elements. I wish to disabuse your minds of this
 harmful error.
 
 "On July 13, 1910, toward morning, I dreamed _that I was bicycling down
 a street in Tuebingen, when a brown Dachshund tore after me and caught me
 by the heel. A bit further on I get off, seat myself on a step, and
 begin to beat the beast, which has clenched its teeth tight._ (_I feel
 no discomfort from the biting or the whole scene._) _Two elderly ladies
 are sitting opposite me and watching me with grins on their faces. Then
 I wake up and, as so often happens to me, the whole dream becomes
 perfectly clear to me in this moment of transition to the waking
 state._"
 
 Symbols are of little use in this case. The dreamer, however, informs
 us, "I lately fell in love with a girl, just from seeing her on the
 street, but had no means of becoming acquainted with her. The most
 pleasant means might have been the Dachshund, since I am a great lover
 of animals, and also felt that the girl was in sympathy with this
 characteristic." He also adds that he repeatedly interfered in the
 fights of scuffling dogs with great dexterity and frequently to the
 great amazement of the spectators. Thus we learn that the girl, who
 pleased him, was always accompanied by this particular dog. This girl,
 however, was disregarded in the manifest dream, and there remained only
 the dog which he associates with her. Perhaps the elderly ladies who
 simpered at him took the place of the girl. The remainder of what he
 tells us is not enough to explain this point. Riding a bicycle in the
 dream is a direct repetition of the remembered situation. He had never
 met the girl with the dog except when he was on his bicycle.
 
 3. When anyone has lost a loved one, he produces dreams of a special
 sort for a long time afterward, dreams in which the knowledge of death
 enters into the most remarkable compromises with the desire to have the
 deceased alive again. At one time the deceased is dead and yet continues
 to live on because he does not know that he is dead, and would die
 completely only if he knew it; at another time he is half dead and half
 alive, and each of these conditions has its particular signs. One cannot
 simply label these dreams nonsense, for to come to life again is no more
 impossible in the dream than, for example, it is in the fairy story, in
 which it occurs as a very frequent fate. As far as I have been able to
 analyze such dreams, I have always found them to be capable of a
 sensible solution, but that the pious wish to recall the deceased to
 life goes about expressing itself by the oddest methods. Let me tell you
 such a dream, which seems queer and senseless enough, and analysis of
 which will show you many of the points for which you have been prepared
 by our theoretical discussions. The dream is that of a man who had lost
 his father many years previously.
 
 "_Father is dead, but has been exhumed and looks badly. He goes on
 living, and the dreamer does everything to prevent him from noticing
 that fact._" Then the dream goes on to other things, apparently
 irrelevant.
 
 The father is dead, that we know. That he was exhumed is not really
 true, nor is the truth of the rest of the dream important. But the
 dreamer tells us that when he came back from his father's funeral, one
 of his teeth began to ache. He wanted to treat this tooth according to
 the Jewish precept, "If thy tooth offend thee, pluck it out," and betook
 himself to the dentist. But the latter said, "One does not simply pull a
 tooth out, one must have patience with it. I shall inject something to
 kill the nerve. Come again in three days and then I will take it out."
 
 "This 'taking it out'," says the dreamer suddenly, "is the exhuming."
 
 Is the dreamer right? It does not correspond exactly, only
 approximately, for the tooth is not taken out, but something that has
 died off is taken out of it. But after our other experiences we are
 probably safe in believing that the dream work is capable of such
 inaccuracies. It appears that the dreamer condensed, fused into one, his
 dead father and the tooth that was killed but retained. No wonder then,
 that in the manifest dream something senseless results, for it is
 impossible for everything that is said of the tooth to fit the father.
 What is it that serves as something intermediate between tooth and
 father and makes this condensation possible?
 
 This interpretation must be correct, however, for the dreamer says that
 he is acquainted with the saying that when one dreams of losing a tooth
 it means that one is going to lose a member of his family.
 
 We know that this popular interpretation is incorrect, or at least is
 correct only in a scurrilous sense. For that reason it is all the more
 surprising to find this theme thus touched upon in the background of
 other portions of the dream content.
 
 Without any further urging, the dreamer now begins to tell of his
 father's illness and death as well as of his relations with him. The
 father was sick a long time, and his care and treatment cost him, the
 son, much money. And yet it was never too much for him, he never grew
 impatient, never wished it might end soon. He boasts of his true Jewish
 piety toward his father, of rigid adherence to the Jewish precepts. But
 are you not struck by a contradiction in the thoughts of the dream? He
 had identified tooth with father. As to the tooth he wanted to follow
 the Jewish precept that carries out its own judgment, "pull it out if it
 causes pain and annoyance." He had also been anxious to follow the
 precept of the law with regard to his father, which in this case,
 however, tells him to disregard trouble and expense, to take all the
 burdens upon himself and to let no hostile intent arise toward the
 object which causes the pain. Would not the agreement be far more
 compelling if he had really developed feelings toward his father similar
 to those about his sick tooth; that is, had he wished that a speedy
 death should put an end to that superfluous, painful and expensive
 existence?
 
 I do not doubt that this was really his attitude toward his father
 during the latter's extended illness, and that his boastful assurances
 of filial piety were intended to distract his attention from these
 recollections. Under such circumstances, the death-wish directed toward
 the parent generally becomes active, and disguises itself in phrases of
 sympathetic consideration such as, "It would really be a blessed release
 for him." But note well that we have here overcome an obstacle in the
 latent dream thoughts themselves. The first part of these thoughts was
 surely unconscious only temporarily, that is to say, during the
 dream-work, while the inimical feelings toward the father might have
 been permanently unconscious, dating perhaps from childhood,
 occasionally slipping into consciousness, shyly and in disguise, during
 his father's illness. We can assert this with even greater certainty of
 other latent thoughts which have made unmistakable contributions to the
 dream content. To be sure, none of these inimical feelings toward the
 father can be discovered in the dream. But when we search a childhood
 history for the root of such enmity toward the father, we recollect that
 fear of the father arises because the latter, even in the earliest
 years, opposes the boy's sex activities, just as he is ordinarily forced
 to oppose them again, after puberty, for social motives. This relation
 to the father applies also to our dreamer; there had been mixed with his
 love for him much respect and fear, having its source in early sex
 intimidation.
 
 From the onanism complex we can now explain the other parts of the
 manifest dream. "_He looks badly_" does, to be sure, allude to another
 remark of the dentist, that it looks badly to have a tooth missing in
 that place; but at the same time it refers to the "looking badly" by
 which the young man betrayed, or feared to betray, his excessive sexual
 activity during puberty. It was not without lightening his own heart
 that the dreamer transposed the bad looks from himself to his father in
 the manifest content, an inversion of the dream work with which you are
 familiar. "_He goes on living since then_," disguises itself with the
 wish to have him alive again as well as with the promise of the dentist
 that the tooth will be preserved. A very subtle phrase, however, is the
 following: "The dreamer does everything _to prevent him_ (_the father_)
 _from noticing the fact_," a phrase calculated to lead us to conclude
 that he is dead. Yet the only meaningful conclusion is again drawn from
 the onanism complex, where it is a matter of course for the young man to
 do everything in order to hide his sex life from his father. Remember,
 in conclusion, that we were constantly forced to interpret the so-called
 tooth-ache dreams as dreams dealing with the subject of onanism and the
 punishment that is feared.
 
 You now see how this incomprehensible dream came into being, by the
 creation of a remarkable and misleading condensation, by the fact that
 all the ideas emerge from the midst of the latent thought process, and
 by the creation of ambiguous substitute formations for the most hidden
 and, at the time, most remote of these thoughts.
 
 4. We have tried repeatedly to understand those prosaic and banal dreams
 which have nothing foolish or repulsive about them, but which cause us
 to ask: "Why do we dream such unimportant stuff?" So I shall give you a
 new example of this kind, three dreams belonging together, all of which
 were dreamed in the same night by a young woman.
 
 (_a_). "_She it going through the hall of her house and strikes her head
 against the low-hanging chandelier, so that her head bleeds._"
 
 She has no reminiscence to contribute, nothing that really happened. The
 information she gives leads in quite another direction. "You know how
 badly my hair is falling out. Mother said to me yesterday, 'My child, if
 it goes on like this, you will have a head like the cheek of a
 buttock.'" Thus the head here stands for the other part of the body. We
 can understand the chandelier symbolically without other help; all
 objects that can be lengthened are symbols of the male organ. Thus the
 dream deals with a bleeding at the lower end of the body, which results
 from its collision with the male organ. This might still be ambiguous;
 her further associations show that it has to do with her belief that
 menstrual bleeding results from sexual intercourse with a man, a bit of
 sexual theory believed by many immature girls.
 
 (_b_). "_She sees a deep hole in the vineyard which she knows was made
 by pulling out a tree._" Herewith her remark that "_she misses the
 tree_." She means that she did not see the tree in the dream, but the
 same phrase serves to express another thought which symbolic
 interpretation makes completely certain. The dream deals with another
 bit of the infantile sex theory, namely, with the belief that girls
 originally had the same genitals as boys and that the later conformation
 resulted from castration (pulling out of a tree).
 
 (_c_). "_She is standing in front of the drawer of her writing table,
 with which she is so familiar that she knows immediately if anybody has
 been through it._" The writing-table drawer, like every drawer, chest,
 or box, stands for the female genital. She knows that one can recognize
 from the genital the signs of sexual intercourse (and, as she thinks,
 even of any contact at all) and she has long been afraid of such a
 conviction. I believe that the accent in all these dreams is to be laid
 upon the idea of _knowing_. She is reminded of the time of her childish
 sexual investigations, the results of which made her quite proud at the
 time.
 
 5. Again a little bit of symbolism. But this time I must first describe
 the psychic situation in a short preface. A man who spent the night with
 a woman describes his partner as one of those motherly natures whose
 desire for a child irresistibly breaks through during intercourse. The
 circumstances of their meeting, however, necessitated a precaution
 whereby the fertilizing discharge of semen is kept away from the womb.
 Upon awaking after this night, the woman tells the following dream:
 
 "_An officer with a red cap follows her on the street. She flees from
 him, runs up the staircase, and he follows after her. Breathlessly she
 reaches her apartment and slams and locks the door behind her. He
 remains outside and as she looks through a peephole she sees him sitting
 outside on a bench and weeping._"
 
 You undoubtedly recognize in the pursuit by an officer with a red cap,
 and the breathless stair climbing, the representation of the sexual act.
 The fact that the dreamer locks herself in against the pursuer may serve
 as an example of that inversion which is so frequently used in dreams,
 for in reality it was the man who withdrew before the completion of the
 act. In the same way her grief has been transposed to the partner, it is
 he who weeps in the dream, whereby the discharge of the semen is also
 indicated.
 
 You must surely have heard that in psychoanalysis it is always
 maintained that all dreams have a sexual meaning. Now you yourselves are
 in a position to form a judgment as to the incorrectness of this
 reproach. You have become acquainted with the wish-fulfillment dreams,
 which deal with the satisfying of the plainest needs, of hunger, of
 thirst, of longing for freedom, the dreams of convenience and of
 impatience and likewise the purely covetous and egoistic dreams. But
 that the markedly distorted dreams preponderantly--though again not
 exclusively--give expression to sex wishes, is a fact you may certainly
 keep in mind as one of the results of psychoanalytical research.
 
 6. I have a special motive for piling up examples of the use of symbols
 in dreams. At our first meeting I complained of how hard it is, when
 lecturing on psychoanalysis, to demonstrate the facts in order to awaken
 conviction; and you very probably have come to agree with me since then.
 But the various assertions of psychoanalysis are so closely linked that
 one's conviction can easily extend from one point to a larger part of
 the whole. We might say of psychoanalysis that if we give it our little
 finger it promptly demands the whole hand. Anyone who was convinced by
 the explanation of errors can no longer logically disbelieve in all the
 rest of psychoanalysis. A second equally accessible point of approach is
 furnished by dream symbolism. I shall give you a dream, already
 published, of a peasant woman, whose husband is a watchman and who has
 certainly never heard anything about dream symbolism and psychoanalysis.
 You may then judge for yourselves whether its explanation with the help
 of sex symbols can be called arbitrary and forced.
 
 "_Then someone broke into her house and she called in fright for a
 watchman. But the latter had gone companionably into a church together
 with two 'beauties.' A number of steps led up to the church. Behind the
 church was a hill, and on its crest a thick forest. The watchman was
 fitted out with a helmet, gorget and a cloak. He had a full brown beard.
 The two were going along peacefully with the watchman, had sack-like
 aprons bound around their hips. There was a path from the church to the
 hill. This was overgrown on both sides with grass and underbrush that
 kept getting thicker and that became a regular forest on the crest of
 the hill._"
 
 You will recognize the symbols without any difficulty. The male genital
 is represented by a trinity of persons, the female by a landscape with a
 chapel, hill and forest. Again you encounter steps as the symbol of the
 sexual act. That which is called a hill in the dream has the same name
 in anatomy, namely, _mons veneris_, the mount of Venus.
 
 7. I have another dream which can be solved by means of inserting
 symbols, a dream that is remarkable and convincing because the dreamer
 himself translated all the symbols, even though he had had no
 preliminary knowledge of dream interpretation. This situation is very
 unusual and the conditions essential to its occurrence are not clearly
 known.
 
 "_He is going for a walk with his father in some place which must be the
 Prater_,[35] _for one can see the rotunda and before it a smaller
 building to which is anchored a captive balloon, which, however, seems
 fairly slack. His father asks him what all that is for; he wonders at it
 himself but explains it to his father. Then they come to a courtyard in
 which there lies spread out a big sheet of metal. His father wants to
 break off a big piece of it for himself but first looks about him to see
 if anyone might see him. He says to him that all he needs to do is to
 tell the inspector and then he can take some without more ado. There are
 steps leading from this courtyard down into a pit, the walls of which
 are upholstered with some soft material rather like a leather arm chair.
 At the end of this pit is a longish platform and then a new pit
 begins...._"
 
 The dreamer himself interprets as follows: "The rotunda is my genital,
 the balloon in front of it is my penis, of whose slackness I have been
 complaining." Thus one may translate in more detail, that the rotunda is
 the posterior--a part of the body which the child regularly considers as
 part of the genital--while the smaller building before it is the
 scrotum. In the dream his father asks him what all that is for; that is
 to say, he asks the object and function of the genitals. It is easy to
 turn this situation around so that the dreamer is the one who does the
 asking. Since no such questioning of the father ever took place in real
 life, we must think of the thought of this dream as a wish or consider
 it in the light of a supposition, "If I had asked father for sexual
 enlightenment." We will find the continuation of this idea in another
 place shortly.
 
 The courtyard, in which the sheet metal lies spread out, is not to be
 considered primarily as symbolical but refers to the father's place of
 business. For reasons of discretion I have substituted the "sheet metal"
 for another material with which the father deals, without changing
 anything in the literal wording of the dream. The dreamer entered his
 father's business and took great offense at the rather dubious practices
 upon which the profits depended to a large extent. For this reason the
 continuation of the above idea of the dream might be expressed as "if I
 had asked him, he would only have deceived me as he deceives his
 customers." The dreamer himself gives us the second meaning of "breaking
 off the metal," which serves to represent the commercial dishonesty. He
 says it means masturbation. Not only have we long since become familiar
 with this symbol, but the fact also is in agreement. The secrecy of
 masturbation is expressed by means of its opposite--"It can be safely
 done openly." Again our expectations are fulfilled by the fact that
 masturbatory activity is referred to as the father's, just as the
 questioning was in the first scene of the dream. Upon being questioned
 he immediately gives the interpretation of the pit as the vagina on
 account of the soft upholstering of its walls. I will add arbitrarily
 that the "going down" like the more usual "going up" is meant to
 describe the sexual intercourse in the vagina.
 
 Such details as the fact that the first pit ends in a platform and then
 a new one begins, he explains himself as having been taken from his own
 history. He practiced intercourse for a while, then gave it up on
 account of inhibitions, and now hopes to be able to resume it as a
 result of the treatment.
 
 8. The two following dreams are those of a foreigner, of very polygamous
 tendencies, and I give them to you as proof for the claim that one's ego
 appears in every dream, even in those in which it is disguised in the
 manifest content. The trunks in the dream are a symbol for woman.
 
 (_a_). "_He is to take a trip, his luggage is placed on a carriage to
 be taken to the station, and there are many trunks piled up, among which
 are two big black ones like sample trunks. He says, consolingly, to
 someone, 'Well, they are only going as far as the station with us.'_"
 
 In reality he does travel with a great deal of luggage, but he also
 brings many tales of women with him when he comes for treatment. The two
 black trunks stand for two dark women who play the chief part in his
 life at present. One of them wanted to travel to Vienna after him, but
 he telegraphed her not to, upon my advice.
 
 (_b_). A scene at the customs house: "_A fellow traveler opens his trunk
 and says indifferently while puffing a cigarette, 'There's nothing in
 here.' The customs official seems to believe him but delves into the
 trunk once more and finds something particularly forbidden. The traveler
 then says resignedly, 'Well, there's no help for it.'_"
 
 He himself is the traveler, I the customs official. Though otherwise
 very frank in his confessions, he has on this occasion tried to conceal
 from me a new relationship which he had struck up with a lady whom he
 was justified in believing that I knew. The painful situation of being
 convicted of this is transposed into a strange person so that he himself
 apparently is not present in the dream.
 
 9. The following is an example of a symbol which I have not yet
 mentioned:
 
 "_He meets his sister in company with two friends who are themselves
 sisters. He extends his hand to both of them but not to his sister._"
 
 This is no allusion to a real occurrence. His thoughts instead lead him
 back to a time when his observations made him wonder why a girl's
 breasts develop so late. The two sisters, therefore, are the breasts. He
 would have liked to touch them if only it had not been his sister.
 
 10. Let me add an example of a symbol of death in a dream:
 
 "_He is walking with two persons whose name he knows but has forgotten.
 By the time he is awake, over a very high, steep iron bridge. Suddenly
 the two people are gone and he sees a ghostly man with a cap, and clad
 in white. He asks this man whether he is the telegraph messenger.... No.
 Or is he a coachman? No. Then he goes on,_" and even in the dream he is
 in great fear. After waking he continues the dream by a phantasy in
 which the iron bridge suddenly breaks, and he plunges into the abyss.
 
 When the dreamer emphasizes the fact that certain individuals in a dream
 are unknown, that he has forgotten their names, they are generally
 persons standing in very close relationship to the dreamer. This dreamer
 has two sisters; if it be true, as his dream indicates, that he wished
 these two dead, then it would only be justice if the fear of death fell
 upon him for so doing. In connection with the telegraph messenger he
 remarks that such people always bring bad news. Judged by his uniform he
 might also have been the lamp-lighter, who, however, also extinguishes
 the lamps--in other words, as the spirit of death extinguishes the flame
 of life. The coachman reminds him of Uhland's poem of King Karl's ocean
 voyage and also of a dangerous lake trip with two companions in which he
 played the role of the king in the poem. In connection with the iron
 bridge he remembers a recent accident and the stupid saying "Life is a
 suspension bridge."
 
 11. The following may serve as another example of the representation of
 death in a dream: "_An unknown man leaves a black bordered visiting card
 for him._"
 
 12. The following dream will interest you for several reasons, though it
 is one arising from a neurotic condition among other things:
 
 "_He is traveling in a train. The train stops in an open field. He
 thinks it means that there is going to be an accident, that he must save
 himself, and he goes through all the compartments of the train and
 strikes dead everyone whom he meets, conductors, engine drivers, etc._"
 
 In connection with this he tells a story that one of his friends told
 him. An insane man was being transported in a private compartment in a
 certain place in Italy, but through some mistake another traveler was
 put in the same compartment. The insane man murdered his fellow
 passenger. Thus he identifies himself with this insane person and bases
 his right so to do upon a compulsive idea which was then torturing him,
 namely, he must "do away with all persons who knew of his failings." But
 then he himself finds a better motivation which gave rise to the dream.
 The day before, in the theatre, he again saw the girl whom he had
 expected to marry but whom he had left because she had given him cause
 for jealousy. With a capacity for intense jealousy such as he has, he
 would really be insane if he married. In other words, he considers her
 so untrustworthy that out of jealousy he would have to strike dead all
 the persons who stood in his way. Going through a series of rooms, of
 compartments in this case, we have already learned to recognize as the
 symbol of marriage (the opposite of monogamy).
 
 In connection with the train stopping in the open country and his fear
 of an accident, he tells the following: Once, when he was traveling in a
 train and it came to a sudden stop outside of a station, a young lady in
 the compartment remarked that perhaps there was going to be a collision,
 and that in that case the best precaution would be to pull one's legs
 up. But this "legs up" had also played a role in the many walks and
 excursions into the open which he had taken with the girl in that happy
 period in their first love. Thus it is a new argument for the idea that
 he would have to be crazy in order to marry her now. But from my
 knowledge of the situation I can assume with certainty that the wish to
 be as crazy as that nevertheless exists in him.
 
 
 
 
 THIRTEENTH LECTURE
 
 THE DREAM
 
 _Archaic Remnants and Infantilism in the Dream_
 
 
 Let us revert to our conclusion that the dream-work, under the influence
 of the dream censorship, transforms the latent dream thoughts into some
 other form of expression. The latent thoughts are no other than the
 conscious thoughts known to us in our waking hours; the new mode of
 expression is incomprehensible to us because of its many-sided features.
 We have said it extends back to conditions of our intellectual
 development which we have long progressed beyond, to the language of
 pictures, the symbol-representations, perhaps to those conditions which
 were in force before the development of our language of thought. So we
 called the mode of expression of the dream-work the archaic or
 regressive.
 
 You may conclude that as a result of the deeper study of the dream-work
 we gain valuable information about the rather unknown beginnings of our
 intellectual development. I trust this will be true, but this work has
 not, up to the present time, been undertaken. The antiquity into which
 the dream-work carries us back is of a double aspect, firstly, the
 individual antiquity, childhood; and, secondly (in so far as every
 individual in his childhood lives over again in some more or less
 abbreviated manner the entire development of the human race), also this
 antiquity, the philogenetic. That we shall be able to differentiate
 which part of the latent psychic proceeding has its source in the
 individual, and which part in the philogenetic antiquity is not
 improbable. In this connection it appears to me, for example, that the
 symbolic relations which the individual has never learned are ground for
 the belief that they should be regarded as a philogenetic inheritance.
 
 However, this is not the only archaic characteristic of the dream. You
 probably all know from your own experiences the peculiar amnesia, that
 is, loss of memory, concerning childhood. I mean the fact that the first
 years, to the fifth, sixth or eighth, have not left the same traces in
 our memory as have later experiences. One meets with individual persons,
 to be sure, who can boast of a continuous memory from the very beginning
 to the present day, but the other condition, that of a gap in the
 memory, is far more frequent. I believe we have not laid enough stress
 on this fact. The child is able to speak well at the age of two, it soon
 shows that it can become adjusted to the most complicated psychic
 situations, and makes remarks which years later are retold to it, but
 which it has itself entirely forgotten. Besides, the memory in the early
 years is more facile, because it is less burdened than in later years.
 Nor is there any reason for considering the memory-function as a
 particularly high or difficult psychic performance; in fact, the
 contrary is true, and you can find a good memory in persons who stand
 very low intellectually.
 
 As a second peculiarity closely related to the first, I must point out
 that certain well-preserved memories, for the most part formatively
 experienced, stand forth in this memory-void which surrounds the first
 years of childhood and do not justify this hypothesis. Our memory deals
 selectively with its later materials, with impressions which come to us
 in later life. It retains the important and discards the unimportant.
 This is not true of the retained childhood memories. They do not bespeak
 necessarily important experiences of childhood, not even such as from
 the viewpoint of the child need appear of importance. They are often so
 banal and intrinsically so meaningless that we ask ourselves in wonder
 why just these details have escaped being forgotten. I once endeavored
 to approach the riddle of childhood amnesia and the interrupted memory
 remnants with the help of analysis, and I arrived at the conclusion that
 in the case of the child, too, only the important has remained in the
 memory, except that by means of the process of condensation already
 known to you, and especially by means of distortion, the important is
 represented in the memory by something that appears unimportant. For
 this reason I have called these childhood memories "disguise-memories,"
 memories used to conceal; by means of careful analysis one is able to
 develop out of them everything that is forgotten.
 
 In psychoanalytic treatment we are regularly called upon to fill out the
 infantile memory gaps, and in so far as the cure is to any degree
 successful, we are able again to bring to light the content of the
 childhood years thus clouded in forgetfulness. These impressions have
 never really been forgotten, they have only been inaccessible, latent,
 have belonged to the unconscious. But sometimes they bob up out of the
 unconscious spontaneously, and, as a matter of fact, this is what
 happens in dreams. It is apparent that the dream life knows how to find
 the entrance to these latent, infantile experiences. Beautiful examples
 of this occur in literature, and I myself can present such an example. I
 once dreamed in a certain connection of a person who must have performed
 some service for me, and whom I clearly saw. He was a one-eyed man,
 short in stature, stout, his head deeply sunk into his neck. I concluded
 from the content that he was a physician. Luckily I was able to ask my
 mother, who was still living, how the physician in my birth-place, which
 I left when I was three years old, looked, and I learned from her that
 he had one eye, was short and stout, with his head sunk into his neck,
 and also learned at what forgotten mishap he had been of service to me.
 This control over the forgotten material of childhood years is, then, a
 further archaic tendency of the dream.
 
 The same information may be made use of in another of the puzzles that
 have presented themselves to us. You will recall how astonished people
 were when we came to the conclusion that the stimuli which gave rise to
 dreams were extremely bad and licentious sexual desires which have made
 dream-censorship and dream-distortion necessary. After we have
 interpreted such a dream for the dreamer and he, in the most favorable
 circumstances does not attack the interpretation itself, he almost
 always asks the question whence such a wish comes, since it seems
 foreign to him and he feels conscious of just the opposite sensations.
 We need not hesitate to point out this origin. These evil wish-impulses
 have their origin in the past, often in a past which is not too far
 away. It can be shown that at one time they were known and conscious,
 even if they no longer are so. The woman, whose dream is interpreted to
 mean that she would like to see her seventeen-year old daughter dead,
 discovers under our guidance that she in fact at one time entertained
 this wish. The child is the fruit of an unhappy marriage, which early
 ended in a separation. Once, while the child was still in the womb, and
 after a tense scene with her husband, she beat her body with her fists
 in a fit of anger, in order to kill the child. How many mothers who
 to-day love their children tenderly, perhaps too tenderly, received them
 unwillingly, and at the time wished that the life within them would not
 develop further; indeed, translated this wish into various actions,
 happily harmless. The later death-wish against some loved one, which
 seems so strange, also has its origin in early phases of the
 relationship to that person.
 
 The father, the interpretation of whose dream shows that he wishes for
 the death of his eldest and favorite child, must be reminded of the fact
 that at one time this wish was no stranger to him. While the child was
 still a suckling, this man, who was unhappy in his choice of a wife,
 often thought that if the little being that meant nothing to him would
 die, he would again be free, and would make better use of his freedom. A
 like origin may be found for a large number of similar hate impulses;
 they are recollections of something that belonged to the past, were once
 conscious and played their parts in the psychic life. You will wish to
 conclude therefrom that such wishes and such dreams cannot occur if such
 changes in the relationship to a person have not taken place; if such
 relationship was always of the same character. I am ready to admit this,
 only wish to warn you that you are to take into consideration not the
 exact terms of the dream, but the meaning thereof according to its
 interpretation. It may happen that the manifest dream of the death of
 some loved person has only made use of some frightful mask, that it
 really means something entirely different, or that the loved person
 serves as a concealing substitute for some other.
 
 But the same circumstances will call forth another, more difficult
 question. You say: "Granted this death wish was present at some time or
 other, and is substantiated by memory, yet this is no explanation. It is
 long outlived, to-day it can be present only in the unconscious and as
 an empty, emotionless memory, but not as a strong impulse. Why should it
 be recalled by the dream at all!" This question is justified. The
 attempt to answer it would lead us far afield and necessitate taking up
 a position in one of the most important points of dream study. But I
 must remain within the bounds of our discussion and practice restraint.
 Prepare yourselves for the temporary abstention. Let us be satisfied
 with the circumstantial proof that this outlived wish can be shown to
 act as a dream stimulator and let us continue the investigation to see
 whether or not other evil wishes admit of the same derivation out of the
 past.
 
 Let us continue with the removal or death-wish which most frequently can
 be traced back to the unbounded egoism of the dreamer. Such a wish can
 very often be shown to be the inciting cause of the dream. As often as
 someone has been in our way in life--and how often must this happen in
 the complicated relationships of life--the dream is ready to do away
 with him, be he father, mother, brother, sister, spouse, etc. We have
 wondered sufficiently over this evil tendency of human nature, and
 certainly were not predisposed to accept the authenticity of this result
 of dream interpretation without question. After it has once been
 suggested to us to seek the origin of such wishes in the past, we
 disclose immediately the period of the individual past in which such
 egoism and such wish-impulses, even as directed against those closest to
 the dreamer, are no longer strangers. It is just in these first years of
 childhood which later are hidden by amnesia, that this egoism frequently
 shows itself in most extreme form, and from which regular but clear
 tendencies thereto, or real remnants thereof, show themselves. For the
 child loves itself first, and later learns to love others, to sacrifice
 something of its ego for another. Even those persons whom the child
 seems to love from the very beginning, it loves at the outset because it
 has need of them, cannot do without them, in others words, out of
 egoistical motives. Not until later does the love impulse become
 independent of egoism. _In brief, egoism has taught the child to love._
 
 In this connection it is instructive to compare the child's regard for
 his brothers and sisters with that which he has for his parents. The
 little child does not necessarily love his brothers and sisters, often,
 obviously, he does not love them at all. There is no doubt that in them
 he hates his rivals and it is known how frequently this attitude
 continues for many years until maturity, and even beyond, without
 interruption. Often enough this attitude is superseded by a more tender
 feeling, or rather let us say glossed over, but the hostile feeling
 appears regularly to have been the earlier. It is most noticeable in
 children of from two and one-half to four or five years of age, when a
 new little brother or sister arrives. The latter is usually received in
 a far from friendly manner. Expressions such as "I don't want him! Let
 the stork take him away again," are very usual. Subsequently every
 opportunity is made use of to disparage the new arrival, and even
 attempts to do him bodily harm, direct attacks, are not unheard of. If
 the difference in age is less, the child learns of the existence of the
 rival with intense psychic activity, and accommodates himself to the new
 situation. If the difference in age is greater, the new child may awaken
 certain sympathies as an interesting object, as a sort of living doll,
 and if the difference is eight years or more, motherly impulses,
 especially in the case of girls, may come into play. But to be truthful,
 when we disclose in a dream the wish for the death of a mother or sister
 we need seldom find it puzzling and may trace its origin easily to early
 childhood, often enough, also, to the propinquity of later years.
 
 Probably no nurseries are free from mighty conflicts among the
 inhabitants. The motives are rivalry for the love of the parents,
 articles owned in common, the room itself. The hostile impulses are
 called forth by older as well as younger brothers and sisters. I believe
 it was Bernard Shaw who said: "If there is anyone who hates a young
 English lady more than does her mother, it is her elder sister." There
 is something about this saying, however, that arouses our antipathy. We
 can, at a pinch, understand hatred of brothers and sisters, and rivalry
 among them, but how may feelings of hatred force their way into the
 relationship between daughter and mother, parents and children?
 
 This relationship is without doubt the more favorable, even when looked
 at from the viewpoint of the child. This is in accord with our
 expectation; we find it much more offensive for love between parents and
 children to be lacking than for love between brothers and sisters. We
 have, so to speak, made something holy in the first instance which in
 the other case we permitted to remain profane. But daily observation can
 show us how frequently the feelings between parents and their grown
 children fail to come up to the ideal established by society, how much
 enmity exists and would find expression did not accumulations of piety
 and of tender impulse hold them back. The motives for this are
 everywhere known and disclose a tendency to separate those of the same
 sex, daughter from mother, father from son. The daughter finds in her
 mother the authority that hems in her will and that is entrusted with
 the task of causing her to carry out the abstention from sexual liberty
 which society demands; in certain cases also she is the rival who
 objects to being displaced. The same type of thing occurs in a more
 glaring manner between father and son. To the son the father is the
 embodiment of every social restriction, borne with such great
 opposition; the father bars the way to freedom of will, to early sexual
 satisfaction, and where there is family property held in common, to the
 enjoyment thereof. Impatient waiting for the death of the father grows
 to heights approximating tragedy in the case of a successor to the
 throne. Less strained is the relationship between father and daughter,
 mother and son. The latter affords the purest examples of an unalterable
 tenderness, in no way disturbed by egoistical considerations.
 
 Why do I speak of these things, so banal and so well known? Because
 there is an unmistakable disposition to deny their significance in life,
 and to set forth the ideal demanded by society as a fulfilled thing much
 oftener than it really is fulfilled. But it is preferable for psychology
 to speak the truth, rather than that this task should be left to the
 cynic. In any event, this denial refers only to actual life. The arts of
 narrative and dramatic poetry are still free to make use of the motives
 that result from a disturbance of this ideal.
 
 It is not to be wondered at that in the case of a large number of people
 the dream discloses the wish for the removal of the parents, especially
 the parent of the same sex. We may conclude that it is also present
 during waking hours, and that it becomes conscious even at times when it
 is able to mask itself behind another motive, as in the case of the
 dreamer's sympathy for his father's unnecessary sufferings in example 3.
 It is seldom that the enmity alone controls the relationship; much more
 often it recedes behind more tender impulses, by which it is suppressed,
 and must wait until a dream isolates it. That which the dream shows us
 in enlarged form as a result of such isolation, shrinks together again
 after it has been properly docketed in its relation to life as a result
 of our interpretation (H. Sachs). But we also find this dream wish in
 places where it has no connection with life, and where the adult, in his
 waking hours, would never recognize it. The reason for this is that the
 deepest and most uniform motive for becoming unfriendly, especially
 between persons of the same sex, has already made its influence felt in
 earliest childhood.
 
 I mean the love rivalry, with the especial emphasis of the sex
 character. The son, even as a small child, begins to develop an especial
 tenderness for his mother, whom he considers as his own property, and
 feels his father to be a rival who puts into question his individual
 possession; and in the same manner the little daughter sees in her
 mother a person who is a disturbing element in her tender relationship
 with her father, and who occupies a position that she could very well
 fill herself. One learns from these observations to what early years
 these ideas extend back--ideas which we designate as the
 _Oedipus-complex_, because this myth realizes with a very slightly
 weakened effect the two extreme wishes which grow out of the situation
 of the son--to kill his father and take his mother to wife. I do not
 wish to maintain that the Oedipus-complex covers entirely the relation
 of the child to its parents; this relation can be much more complicated.
 Furthermore, the Oedipus-complex is more or less well-developed; it may
 even experience a reversal, but it is a customary and very important
 factor in the psychic life of the child; and one tends rather to
 underestimate than to overestimate its influence and the developments
 which may follow from it. In addition, children frequently react to the
 Oedipus-idea through stimulation by the parents, who in the placing of
 their affection are often led by sex-differences, so that the father
 prefers the daughter, the mother the son; or again, where the marital
 affection has cooled, and this love is substituted for the outworn love.
 
 One cannot maintain that the world was very grateful to psychoanalytic
 research for its discovery of the Oedipus-complex. On the contrary, it
 called forth the strongest resistance on the part of adults; and persons
 who had neglected to take part in denying this proscribed or tabooed
 feeling-relationship later made good the omission by taking all value
 from the complex through false interpretations. According to my
 unchanged conviction there is nothing to deny and nothing to make more
 palatable. One should accept the fact, recognized by the Greek myth
 itself, as inevitable destiny. On the other hand, it is interesting that
 this Oedipus-complex, cast out of life, was yielded up to poetry and
 given the freest play. O. Rank has shown in a careful study how this
 very Oedipus-complex has supplied dramatic literature with a large
 number of motives in unending variations, derivations and disguises,
 also in distorted forms such as we recognize to be the work of a censor.
 We may also ascribe this Oedipus-complex to those dreamers who were so
 fortunate as to escape in later life these conflicts with their parents,
 and intimately associated therewith we find what we call the _castration
 complex_, the reaction to sexual intimidation or restriction, ascribed
 to the father, of early infantile sexuality.
 
 By applying our former researches to the study of the psychic life of
 the child, we may expect to find that the origin of other forbidden
 dream-wishes, of excessive sexual impulses, may be explained in the same
 manner. Thus we are moved to study the development of sex-life in the
 child also, and we discover the following from a number of sources: In
 the first place, it is a mistake to deny that the child has a sexual
 life, and to take it for granted that sexuality commences with the
 ripening of the genitals at the time of puberty. On the contrary--the
 child has from the very beginning a sexual life rich in content and
 differing in numerous respects from that which is later considered
 normal. What we call "perverse" in the life of the adult, differs from
 the normal in the following respects: first, in disregard for the
 dividing line of species (the gulf between man and animal); second,
 being insensible to the conventional feeling of disgust; third, the
 incest-limitation (being prohibited from seeking sexual satisfaction
 with near blood-relations); fourth, homosexuality, and fifth,
 transferring the role of the genitals to other organs and other parts of
 the body. None of these limitations exist in the beginning, but are
 gradually built up in the course of development and education. The
 little child is free from them. He knows no unbridgable chasm between
 man and animal; the arrogance with which man distinguishes himself from
 the animal is a later acquisition. In the beginning he is not disgusted
 at the sight of excrement, but slowly learns to be so disgusted under
 the pressure of education; he lays no special stress on the difference
 between the sexes, rather accredits to both the same genital formation;
 he directs his earliest sexual desires and his curiosity toward those
 persons closest to him, and who are dear to him for various reasons--his
 parents, brothers and sisters, nurses; and finally, you may observe in
 him that which later breaks through again, raised now to a love
 attraction, viz., that he does not expect pleasure from his sexual
 organs alone, but that many other parts of the body portray the same
 sensitiveness, are the media of analogous sensations, and are able to
 play the role of the genitals. The child may, then, be called
 "polymorphus perverse," and if he makes but slight use of all these
 impulses, it is, on the one hand, because of their lesser intensity as
 compared to later life, and on the other hand, because the bringing up
 of the child immediately and energetically suppresses all his sexual
 expressions. This suppression continues in theory, so to say, since the
 grown-ups are careful to control part of the childish sex-expressions,
 and to disguise another part by misrepresenting its sexual nature until
 they can deny the whole business. These are often the same persons who
 discourse violently against all the sexual faults of the child and then
 at the writing table defend the sexual purity of the same children.
 Where children are left to themselves or are under the influence of
 corruption, they often are capable of really conspicuous performances of
 perverse sexual activity. To be sure, the grown-ups are right in looking
 upon these things as "childish performances," as "play," for the child
 is not to be judged as mature and answerable either before the bar of
 custom or before the law, but these things do exist, they have their
 significance as indications of innate characteristics as well as causes
 and furtherances of later developments, they give us an insight into
 childhood sex-life and thereby into the sex life of man. When we
 rediscover in the background of our distorted dreams all these perverse
 wish-impulses, it means only that the dream has in this field traveled
 back to the infantile condition.
 
 Especially noteworthy among these forbidden wishes are those of incest,
 i.e., those directed towards sexual intercourse with parents and
 brothers and sisters. You know what antipathy society feels toward such
 intercourse, or at least pretends to feel, and what weight is laid on
 the prohibitions directed against it. The most monstrous efforts have
 been made to explain this fear of incest. Some have believed that it is
 due to evolutionary foresight on the part of nature, which is
 psychically represented by this prohibition, because inbreeding would
 deteriorate the race-character; others maintained that because of having
 lived together since early childhood the sexual desire is diverted from
 the persons under consideration. In both cases, furthermore, the
 incest-avoidance would be automatically assured, and it would be
 difficult to understand the need of strict prohibitions, which rather
 point to the presence of a strong desire. Psychoanalytic research has
 incontrovertibly shown that the incestuous love choice is rather the
 first and most customary choice, and that not until later is there any
 resistance, the source of which probably is to be found in the
 individual psychology.
 
 Let us sum up what our plunge into child psychology has given us toward
 the understanding of the dream. We found not only that the materials of
 forgotten childhood experiences are accessible to the dream, but we saw
 also that the psychic life of children, with all its peculiarities, its
 egoism, its incestuous love-choice, etc., continues, for the purposes of
 the dream, in the unconscious, and that the dream nightly leads us back
 to this infantile stage. Thus it becomes more certain _that the
 unconscious in our psychic life is the infantile_. The estranging
 impression that there is so much evil in man, begins to weaken. This
 frightful evil is simply the original, primitive, infantile side of
 psychic life, which we may find in action in children, which we overlook
 partly because of the slightness of its dimensions, partly because it is
 lightly considered, since we demand no ethical heights of the child.
 Since the dream regresses to this stage, it seems to have made apparent
 the evil that lies in us. But it is only a deceptive appearance by which
 we have allowed ourselves to be frightened. We are not so evil as we
 might suspect from the interpretation of dreams.
 
 If the evil impulses of the dream are merely infantilism, a return to
 the beginnings of our ethical development, since the dream simply makes
 children of us again in thinking and in feeling, we need not be ashamed
 of these evil dreams if we are reasonable. But being reasonable is only
 a part of psychic life. Many things are taking place there that are not
 reasonable, and so it happens that we are ashamed of such dreams, and
 unreasonably. We turn them over to the dream-censorship, are ashamed and
 angry if one of these dreams has in some unusual manner succeeded in
 penetrating into consciousness in an undistorted form, so that we must
 recognize it--in fact, we are at times just as ashamed of the distorted
 dream as we would be if we understood it. Just think of the scandalized
 opinion of the fine old lady about her uninterpreted dream of "services
 of love." The problem is not yet solved, and it is still possible that
 upon further study of the evil in the dream we shall come to some other
 decision and arrive at another valuation of human nature.
 
 As a result of the whole investigation we grasp two facts, which,
 however, disclose only the beginnings of new riddles, new doubts. First:
 the regression of dream-work is not only formal, it is also of greater
 import. It not only translates our thoughts into a primitive form of
 expression, but it reawakens the peculiarities of our primitive psychic
 life, the ancient predominance of the ego, the earliest impulses of our
 sexual life, even our old intellectual property, if we may consider the
 symbolic relations as such. And second: We must accredit all these
 infantilisms which once were governing, and solely governing, to the
 unconscious, about which our ideas now change and are broadened.
 Unconscious is no longer a name for what is at that time latent, the
 unconscious is an especial psychic realm with wish-impulses of its own,
 with its own method of expression and with a psychic mechanism peculiar
 to itself, all of which ordinarily are not in force. But the latent
 dream-thoughts, which we have solved by means of the dream-interpretation,
 are not of this realm. They are much more nearly the same as any we may
 have thought in our waking hours. Still they are unconscious; how does
 one solve this contradiction? We begin to see that a distinction must be
 made. Something that originates in our conscious life, and that shares
 its characteristics--we call it the day-remnants--combines in the
 dream-fabrication with something else out of the realm of the
 unconscious. Between these two parts the dream-work completes itself.
 The influencing of the day-remnants by the unconscious necessitates
 regression. This is the deepest insight into the nature of the dream
 that we are able to attain without having searched through further
 psychic realms. The time will soon come, however, when we shall clothe
 the unconscious character of the latent dream-thought with another name,
 which shall differentiate it from the unconscious out of the realm of
 the infantile.
 
 We may, to be sure, propound the question: what forces the psychological
 activity during sleep to such regression? Why do not the sleep
 disturbing psychic stimuli do the job without it? And if they must,
 because of the dream censorship, disguise themselves through old forms
 of expression which are no longer comprehensible, what is the use of
 giving new life to old, long-outgrown psychic stimuli, wishes and
 character types, that is, why the material regression in addition to the
 formal? The only satisfactory answer would be this, that only in this
 manner can a dream be built up, that dynamically the dream-stimulus can
 be satisfied only in this way. But for the time being we have no right
 to give such an answer.
 
 
 
 
 FOURTEENTH LECTURE
 
 THE DREAM
 
 _Wish Fulfillment_
 
 
 May I bring to your attention once more the ground we have already
 covered? How, when we met with dream distortion in the application of
 our technique, we decided to leave it alone for the time being, and set
 out to obtain decisive information about the nature of the dream by way
 of infantile dreams? How, then, armed with the results of this
 investigation, we attacked dream distortion directly and, I trust, in
 some measure overcame it? But we must remind ourselves that the results
 we found along the one way and along the other do not fit together as
 well as might be. It is now our task to put these two results together
 and balance them against one another.
 
 From both sources we have seen that the dream-work consists essentially
 in the transposition of thoughts into an hallucinatory experience. How
 that can take place is puzzling enough, but it is a problem of general
 psychology with which we shall not busy ourselves here. We have learned
 from the dreams of children that the purpose of the dream-work is the
 satisfaction of one of the sleep-disturbing psychic stimuli by means of
 a wish fulfillment. We were unable to make a similar statement
 concerning distorted dreams, until we knew how to interpret them. But
 from the very beginning we expected to be able to bring the distorted
 dreams under the same viewpoint as the infantile. The earliest
 fulfillment of this expectation led us to believe that as a matter of
 fact all dreams are the dreams of children and that they all work with
 infantile materials, through childish psychic stimuli and mechanics.
 Since we consider that we have conquered dream-distortion, we must
 continue the investigation to see whether our hypothesis of
 wish-fulfillment holds good for distorted dreams also.
 
 We very recently subjected a number of dreams to interpretation, but
 left wish-fulfillment entirely out of consideration. I am convinced that
 the question again and again occurred to you: "What about
 wish-fulfillment, which ostensibly is the goal of dream-work?" This
 question is important. It was, in fact, the question of our lay-critics.
 As you know, humanity has an instinctive antagonism toward intellectual
 novelties. The expression of such a novelty should immediately be
 reduced to its narrowest limits, if possible, comprised in a commonplace
 phrase. Wish-fulfillment has become that phrase for the new
 dream-science. The layman asks: "Where is the wish-fulfillment?"
 Immediately, upon having heard that the dream is supposed to be a
 wish-fulfillment, and indeed, by the very asking of the question, he
 answers it with a denial. He is at once reminded of countless
 dream-experiences of his own, where his aversion to the dream was
 enormous, so that the proposition of psychoanalytic dream-science seems
 very improbable to him. It is a simple matter to answer the layman that
 wish-fulfillment cannot be apparent in distorted dreams, but must be
 sought out, so that it is not recognized until the dream is interpreted.
 We know, too, that the wishes in these distorted dreams are prohibited
 wishes, are wishes rejected by the censor and that their existence lit
 the very cause of the dream distortion and the reason for the intrusion
 of the dream censor. But it is hard to convince the lay-critic that one
 may not seek the wish-fulfillment in the dream before the dream has been
 interpreted. This is continually forgotten. His sceptical attitude
 toward the theory of wish-fulfillment is really nothing more than a
 consequence of dream-censorship, a substitute and a result of the denial
 of this censored dream-wish.
 
 To be sure, even we shall find it necessary to explain to ourselves why
 there are so many dreams of painful content, and especially dreams of
 fear. We see here, for the first time, the problem of the affects in the
 dream, a problem worthy of separate investigation, but which
 unfortunately cannot be considered here. If the dream is a
 wish-fulfillment, painful experiences ought to be impossible in the
 dream; in that the lay-critics apparently are right. But three
 complications, not thought of by them, must be taken into consideration.
 
 First: It may be that the dream work has not been successful in creating
 a wish-fulfillment, so that a part of the painful effect of the
 dream-thought is left over for the manifest dream. Analysis should then
 show that these thoughts were far more painful even than the dream which
 was built out of them. This much may be proved in each instance. We
 admit, then, that the dream work has not achieved its purpose any more
 than the drink-dream due to the thirst-stimulus has achieved its purpose
 of satisfying the thirst. One remains thirsty, and must wake up in order
 to drink. But it was a real dream, it sacrificed nothing of its nature.
 We must say: "Although strength be lacking, let us praise the will to
 do." The clearly recognizable intention, at least, remains praiseworthy.
 Such cases of miscarriage are not unusual. A contributory cause is this,
 that it is so much more difficult for the dream work to change affect
 into content in its own sense; the affects often show great resistance,
 and thus it happens that the dream work has worked the painful content
 of the dream-thoughts over into a wish-fulfillment, while the painful
 affect continues in its unaltered form. Hence in dreams of this type the
 affect does not fit the content at all, and our critics may say the
 dream is so little a wish-fulfillment that a harmless content may be
 experienced as painful. In answer to this unintelligible remark we say
 that the wish-fulfillment tendency in the dream-work appears most
 prominent, because isolated, in just such dreams. The error is due to
 the fact that he who does not know neurotics imagines the connection
 between content and affect as all too intimate, and cannot, therefore,
 grasp the fact that a content may be altered without any corresponding
 change in the accompanying affect-expression.
 
 A second, far more important and more extensive consideration, equally
 disregarded by the layman, is the following: A wish-fulfillment
 certainly must bring pleasure--but to whom? Naturally, to him who has
 the wish. But we know from the dreamer that he stands in a very special
 relationship to his wishes. He casts them aside, censors them, he will
 have none of them. Their fulfillment gives him no pleasure, but only the
 opposite. Experience then shows that this opposite, which must still be
 explained, appears in the form of fear. The dreamer in his relation to
 his dream-wishes can be compared only to a combination of two persons
 bound together by some strong common quality. Instead of further
 explanations I shall give you a well-known fairy tale, in which you will
 again find the relationships I have mentioned. A good fairy promises a
 poor couple, husband and wife, to fulfill their first three wishes. They
 are overjoyed, and determine to choose their three wishes with great
 care. But the woman allows herself to be led astray by the odor of
 cooking sausages emanating from the next cottage, and wishes she had a
 couple of such sausages. Presto! they are there. This is the first
 wish-fulfillment. Now the husband becomes angry, and in his bitterness
 wishes that the sausages might hang from the end of her nose. This, too,
 is accomplished, and the sausages cannot be removed from their new
 location. So this is the second wish-fulfillment, but the wish is that
 of the husband. The wife is very uncomfortable because of the
 fulfillment of this wish. You know how the fairy tale continues. Since
 both husband and wife are fundamentally one, the third wish must be that
 the sausages be removed from the nose of the wife. We could make use of
 this fairy tale any number of times in various connections; here it
 serves only as an illustration of the possibility that the
 wish-fulfillment for the one personality may lead to an aversion on the
 part of the other, if the two do not agree with one another.
 
 It will not be difficult now to come to a better understanding of the
 anxiety-dream. We shall make one more observation, then we shall come to
 a conclusion to which many things lead. The observation is that the
 anxiety dreams often have a content which is entirely free from
 distortion and in which the censorship is, so to speak, eluded. The
 anxiety dream is ofttimes an undisguised wish-fulfillment, not, to be
 sure, of an accepted, but of a discarded wish. The anxiety development
 has stepped into the place of the censorship. While one may assert of
 the infantile dream that it is the obvious fulfillment of a wish that
 has gained admittance, and of the distorted dream that it is the
 disguised fulfillment of a suppressed wish, he must say of the anxiety
 dream that the only suitable formula is this, that it is the obvious
 fulfillment of a suppressed wish. Anxiety is the mark which shows that
 the suppressed wish showed itself stronger than the censorship, that it
 put through its wish-fulfillment despite the censorship, or was about to
 put it through. We understand that what is wish-fulfillment for the
 suppressed wish is for us, who are on the side of the dream-censor, only
 a painful sensation and a cause for antagonism. The anxiety which
 occurs in dreams is, if you wish, anxiety because of the strength of
 these otherwise suppressed wishes. Why this antagonism arises in the
 form of anxiety cannot be discovered from a study of the dream alone;
 one must obviously study anxiety from other sources.
 
 What holds true for the undistorted anxiety dream we may assume to be
 true also of those dreams which have undergone partial distortion, and
 of the other dreams of aversion whose painful impressions very probably
 denote approximations of anxiety. The anxiety dream is usually also a
 dream that causes waking; we habitually interrupt sleep before the
 suppressed wish of the dream has accomplished its entire fulfillment in
 opposition to the censorship. In this case the execution of the dream is
 unsuccessful, but this does not change its nature. We have likened the
 dream to the night watchman or sleep-defender who wishes to protect our
 sleep from being disturbed. The night watchman, too, sometimes wakes the
 sleeper when he feels himself too weak to drive away the disturbance or
 danger all by himself. Yet we are often able to remain asleep, even when
 the dream begins to become suspicious, and begins to assume the form of
 anxiety. We say to ourselves in our sleep: "It's only a dream," and we
 sleep on.
 
 When does it happen that the dream-wish is in a position to overpower
 this censorship? The conditions for this may be just as easily furnished
 by the dream-wish as by the dream-censorship. The wish may, for unknown
 reasons, become irresistible; but one gets the impression that more
 frequently the attitude of the dream censorship is to blame for this
 disarrangement in the relations of the forces. We have already heard
 that the censorship works with varying intensity in each single
 instance, that it handles each element with a different degree of
 strictness; now we should like to add the proposition that it is an
 extremely variable thing and does not exert equal force on every
 occasion against the same objectionable element. If on occasion the
 censorship feels itself powerless with respect to a dream-wish which
 threatens to over-ride it, then, instead of distortion, it makes use of
 the final means at its disposal, it destroys the sleep condition by the
 development of anxiety.
 
 And now it occurs to us that we know absolutely nothing yet as to why
 these evil, depraved wishes are aroused just at night, in order that
 they may disturb our sleep. The answer can only be an assumption which
 is based on the nature of the condition of sleep. During the day the
 heavy pressure of a censorship weighs upon these wishes, making it
 impossible, as a rule, for them to express themselves in any manner. At
 night, evidently, this censorship is withdrawn for the benefit of the
 single sleep-wish, in the same manner as are all the other interests of
 psychic life, or at least placed in a position of very minor importance.
 The forbidden wishes must thank this noctural deposition of the censor
 for being able to raise their heads again. There are nervous persons
 troubled with insomnia who admit that their sleeplessness was in the
 beginning voluntary. They did not trust themselves to fall asleep,
 because they were afraid of their dreams, that is, of the results due to
 a slackening of the censorship. So you can readily see that this
 withdrawal of the censor does not in itself signify rank carelessness.
 Sleep weakens our power to move; our evil intentions, even if they do
 begin to stir, can accomplish nothing but a dream, which for practical
 purposes is harmless, and the highly sensible remark of the sleepers, a
 night-time remark indeed, but not a part of the dream life, "it is only
 a dream," is reminiscent of this quieting circumstance. So let us grant
 this, and sleep on.
 
 If, thirdly, you recall the concept that the dreamer, struggling against
 his wishes, is to be compared to a summation of two separate persons, in
 some manner closely connected, you will be able to grasp the further
 possibility of how a thing which is highly unpleasant, namely,
 punishment, may be accomplished by wish-fulfillment. Here again the
 fairy tale of the three wishes can be of service to us: the sausages on
 the plate are the direct wish-fulfillment of the first person, the
 woman; the sausages at the end of her nose are the wish-fulfillment of
 the second person, the husband, but at the same time the punishment for
 the stupid wish of the woman. Among the neurotics we find again the
 motivation of the third wish, which remains in fairy tales only. There
 are many such punishment-tendencies in the psychic life of man; they are
 very powerful, and we may make them responsible for some of our painful
 dreams. Perhaps you now say that at this rate, not very much of the
 famed wish-fulfillment is left. But upon closer view you will admit
 that you are wrong. In contrast to the many-sided to be discussed, of
 what the dream might be--and, according to numerous authors, is--the
 solution (wish-fulfillment, anxiety-fulfillment, punishment-fulfillment)
 is indeed very restricted. That is why anxiety is the direct antithesis
 of the wish, why antitheses are so closely allied in association and why
 they occur together in the unconscious, as we have heard; and that is
 why punishment, too, is a wish-fulfillment of the other, the censoring
 person.
 
 On the whole, then, I have made no concessions to your protestation
 against the theory of wish-fulfillment. We are bound, however, to
 establish wish-fulfillment in every dream no matter how distorted, and
 we certainly do not wish to withdraw from this task. Let us go back to
 the dream, already interpreted, of the three bad theatre tickets for 1
 Fl. 50 Kr. from which we have already learned so much. I hope you still
 remember it. A lady who tells her husband during the day that her friend
 Elise, only three months younger than herself, has become engaged,
 dreams she is in the theatre with her husband. Half the parquet is
 empty. Her husband says, "Elise and her fiance wanted to go to the
 theatre, too, but couldn't because they could get only poor seats, three
 for one gulden and a half." She was of the opinion that that wasn't so
 unfortunate. We discovered that the dream-thought originated in her
 discontent at having married too soon, and the fact that she was
 dissatisfied with her husband. We may be curious as to the manner in
 which these thoughts have been worked over into a wish-fulfillment, and
 where their traces may be found in the manifest content. Now we know
 that the element "too soon, premature" is eliminated from the dream by
 the censor. The empty parquet is a reference to it. The puzzling "three
 for 1 Fl. 50 Kr." is now, with the help of symbolism which we have since
 learned, more understandable.[36] The "3" really means a husband, and
 the manifest element is easy to translate: to buy a husband for her
 dowry ("I could have bought one ten times better for my dowry"). The
 marriage is obviously replaced by going into the theatre. "Buying the
 tickets too soon" directly takes the place of the premature marriage.
 This substitution is the work of the wish-fulfillment. Our dreamer was
 not always so dissatisfied with her early marriage as she was on the day
 she received news of the engagement of her friend. At the time she was
 proud of her marriage and felt herself more favored than her friend.
 Naive girls have frequently confided to their friends after their
 engagement that soon they, too, will be able to go to all the plays
 hitherto forbidden, and see everything. The desire to see plays, the
 curiosity that makes its appearance here, was certainly in the beginning
 directed towards sex matters, the sex-life, especially the sex-life of
 the parents, and then became a strong motive which impelled the girl to
 an early marriage. In this way the visit to the theatre becomes an
 obvious representative substitute for being married. In the momentary
 annoyance at her early marriage she recalls the time when the early
 marriage was a wish-fulfillment for her, because she had satisfied her
 curiosity; and she now replaces the marriage, guided by the old
 wish-impulse, with the going to the theatre.
 
 We may say that we have not sought out the simplest example as proof of
 a hidden wish-fulfillment. We would have to proceed in analogous manner
 with other distorted dreams. I cannot do that for you, and simply wish
 to express the conviction that it will be successful everywhere. But I
 wish to continue along this theoretical line. Experience has taught me
 that it is one of the most dangerous phases of the entire dream science,
 and that many contradictions and misunderstandings are connected
 therewith. Besides, you are perhaps still under the impression that I
 have retracted a part of my declaration, in that I said that the dream
 is a fulfilled wish or its opposite, an actualized anxiety or
 punishment, and you will think this is the opportunity to compel further
 reservations of me. I have also heard complaints that I am too abrupt
 about things which appear evident to me, and that for that reason I do
 not present the thing convincingly enough.
 
 If a person has gone thus far with us in dream-interpretation, and
 accepted everything that has been offered, it is not unusual for him to
 call a halt at wish-fulfillment, and say, "Granted that in every
 instance the dream has a meaning, and that this meaning can be disclosed
 by psychoanalytic technique, why must this dream, despite all evidence
 to the contrary, always be forced into the formula of wish-fulfillment?
 Why might not the meaning of this nocturnal thought be as many-sided as
 thought is by day; why may not the dream in one case express a fulfilled
 wish, in another, as you yourself say, the opposite thereof, an
 actualized anxiety; or why may it not correspond to a resolution, a
 warning, a reflection with its pro's and con's, a reproach, a goad to
 conscience, an attempt to prepare oneself for a contemplated
 performance, etc? Why always nothing more than a wish, or at best, its
 opposite?"
 
 One might maintain that a difference of opinion on these points is of no
 great importance, so long as we are at one otherwise. We might say that
 it is enough to have discovered the meaning of the dream, and the way to
 recognize it; that it is a matter of no importance, if we have too
 narrowly limited this meaning. But this is not so. A misunderstanding of
 this point strikes at the nature of our knowledge of the dream, and
 endangers its worth for the understanding of neuroses. Then, too, that
 method of approach which is esteemed in the business world as genteel is
 out of place in scientific endeavors, and harmful.
 
 My first answer to the question why the dream may not be many-sided in
 its meaning is the usual one in such instances: I do not know why it
 should not be so. I would not be opposed to such a state of affairs. As
 far as I am concerned, it could well be true. Only one small matter
 prevents this broader and more comfortable explanation of the
 dream--namely, that as a matter of fact it isn't so. My second answer
 emphasizes the fact that the assumption that the dream corresponds to
 numerous forms of thought and intellectual operations is no stranger to
 me. In a story about a sick person I once reported a dream that occurred
 three nights running and then stopped, and I explained this suppression
 by saying that the dream corresponded to a resolution which had no
 reason to recur after having been carried out. More recently I published
 a dream which corresponded to a confession. How is it possible for me to
 contradict myself, and maintain that the dream is always only a
 fulfilled wish?
 
 I do that, because I do not wish to admit a stupid misunderstanding
 which might cost us the fruits of all our labors with regard to the
 dream, a misunderstanding which confuses the dream with the latent
 dream-thought and affirms of the dream something that applies
 specifically and solely to the latter. For it is entirely correct that
 the dream can represent, and be replaced by all those things we
 enumerated: a resolution, a warning, reflection, preparation, an attempt
 to solve a problem, etc. But if you look closely, you will recognize
 that all these things are true only of the latent dream thoughts, which
 have been changed about in the dream. You learn from the interpretation
 of the dreams that the person's unconscious thinking is occupied with
 such resolutions, preparations, reflections, etc., out of which the
 dream-work then builds the dream. If you are not at the time interested
 in the dream-work, but are very much interested in the unconscious
 thought-work of man, you eliminate the dream-work, and say of the dream,
 for all practical purposes quite correctly, that it corresponds to a
 warning, a resolution, etc. This often happens in psychoanalytic
 activity. People endeavor for the most part only to destroy the dream
 form, and to substitute in its place in the sequence the latent thoughts
 out of which the dream was made.
 
 Thus we learn, from the appreciation of the latent dream-thoughts, that
 all the highly complicated psychic acts we have enumerated can go on
 unconsciously, a result as wonderful as it is confusing.
 
 But to return, you are right only if you admit that you have made use of
 an abbreviated form of speech, and if you do not believe that you must
 connect the many-sidedness we have mentioned with the essence of the
 dream. When you speak of the dream you must mean either the manifest
 dream, i.e., the product of the dream-work, or at most the dream-work
 itself--that psychic occurrence which forms the manifest dream out of
 the latent dream thought. Any other use of the word is a confusion of
 concept that can only cause trouble. If your assertions refer to the
 latent thoughts back of the dream, say so, and do not cloud the problem
 of the dream by using such a faulty means of expression. The latent
 dream thoughts are the material which the dream-work remolds into the
 manifest dream. Why do you insist upon confusing the material with the
 work that makes use of it? Are you any better off than those who knew
 only the product of this work, and could explain neither where it came
 from nor how it was produced?
 
 The only essential thing in the dream is the dream-work that has had
 its influence upon the thought-material. We have no right to disregard
 it theoretically even if, in certain practical situations, we may fail
 to take it into account. Analytic observation, too, shows that the
 dream-work never limits itself to translating these thoughts in the
 archaic or regressive mode of expression known to you. Rather it
 regularly adds something which does not belong to the latent thoughts of
 waking, but which is the essential motive of dream-formation. This
 indispensable ingredient is at the same time the unconscious wish, for
 the fulfillment of which the dream content is rebuilt. The dream may be
 any conceivable thing, if you take into account only the thoughts
 represented by it, warning, resolution, preparation, etc.; it is also
 always the fulfillment of an unknown wish, and it is this only if you
 look upon it as the result of the dream-work. A dream is never itself a
 resolution, a warning, and no more--but always a resolution, etc.,
 translated into an archaic form of expression with the help of the
 unconscious wish, and changed about for the purpose of fulfilling this
 wish. The one characteristic, wish-fulfillment, is constant; the other
 may vary; it may itself be a wish at times, so that the dream, with the
 aid of an unconscious wish, presents as fulfilled a latent wish out of
 waking hours.
 
 I understand all this very well, but I do not know whether or not I
 shall be successful in making you understand it as well. I have
 difficulties, too, in proving it to you. This cannot be done without, on
 the one hand, careful analysis of many dreams, and on the other hand
 this most difficult and most important point of our conception of the
 dream cannot be set forth convincingly without reference to things to
 follow. Can you, in fact, believe that taking into consideration the
 intimate relationship of all things, one is able to penetrate deeply
 into the nature of one thing without having carefully considered other
 things of a very similar nature? Since we know nothing as yet about the
 closest relatives of the dream, neurotic symptoms, we must once again
 content ourselves with what has already been accomplished. I want to
 explain one more example to you, and propose a new viewpoint.
 
 Let us again take up that dream to which we have several times recurred,
 the dream of the three theatre tickets for 1 Fl. 50 Kr. I can assure you
 that I took this example quite unpremeditatedly at first. You are
 acquainted with the latent dream thoughts: annoyance, upon hearing that
 her friend had just now become engaged, at the thought that she herself
 had hurried so to be married; contempt for her husband; the idea that
 she might have had a better one had she waited. We also know the wish,
 which made a dream out of these thoughts--it is "curiosity to see,"
 being permitted to go to the theatre, very likely a derivation from the
 old curiosity finally to know just what happens when one is married.
 This curiosity, as is well known, regularly directs itself in the case
 of children to the sex-life of the parents. It is an impulse of
 childhood, and in so far as it persists later, an impulse whose roots
 reach back into the infantile. But that day's news played no part in
 awaking the curiosity, it awoke only annoyance and regret. This wish
 impulse did not have anything to do immediately with the latent dream
 thoughts, and we could fit the result of the dream interpretation into
 the analysis without considering the wish impulse at all. But then, the
 annoyance itself was not capable of producing the dream; a dream could
 not be derived from the thought: "It was stupid to marry so soon,"
 except by reviving the old wish finally to see what happens when one is
 married. The wish then formed the dream content, in that it replaced
 marriage by going to the theatre, and gave it the form of an earlier
 wish-fulfillment: "so now I may go to the theatre and see all the
 forbidden things, and you may not. I am married and you must wait." In
 such a manner the present situation was transposed into its opposite, an
 old triumph put into the place of the recent defeat. Added thereto was a
 satisfied curiosity amalgamated with a satisfied egoistic sense of
 rivalry. This satisfaction determines the manifest dream content in
 which she really is sitting in the theatre, and her friend was unable to
 get tickets. Those bits of dream content are affixed to this
 satisfaction situation as unfitting and inexplicable modifications,
 behind which the latent dream thoughts still hide. Dream interpretation
 must take into consideration everything that serves toward the
 representation of the wish-fulfillment and must reconstruct from these
 suggestions the painful latent dream-thought.
 
 The observation I now wish to make is for the purpose of drawing your
 attention to the latent, dream thoughts, now pushed to the fore. I beg
 of you not to forget first, that the dreamer is unconscious of them,
 second, they are entirely logical and continuous, so that they may be
 understood as a comprehensible reaction to the dream occasion, third,
 that they may have the value of any desired psychic impulse or
 intellectual operation. I shall now designate these thoughts more
 forcibly than before as "day-remnants"; the dreamer may acknowledge them
 or not. I now separate day-remnants and latent dream thoughts in
 accordance with our previous usage of calling everything that we
 discover in interpreting the dream "latent dream thoughts," while the
 day-remnants are only a part of the latent dream thoughts. Then our
 conception goes to show that something additional has been added to the
 day-remnants, something which also belonged to the unconscious, a strong
 but suppressed wish impulse, and it is this alone that has made possible
 the dream fabrication. The influence of this wish impulse on the
 day-remnants creates the further participation of the latent dream
 thoughts, thoughts which no longer appear rational and understandable in
 relation to waking life.
 
 In explaining the relationship of the day-remnants to the unconscious
 wish I have made use of a comparison which I can only repeat here. Every
 undertaking requires a capitalist, who defrays the expenses, and an
 entrepreneur, who has the idea and understands how to carry it out. The
 role of the capitalist in the dream fabrication is always played by the
 unconscious wish; it dispenses the psychic energy for dream-building.
 The actual worker is the day-remnant, which determines how the
 expenditure is to be made. Now the capitalist may himself have the idea
 and the particularized knowledge, or the entrepreneur may have the
 capital. This simplifies the practical situation, but makes its
 theoretical comprehension more difficult. In economics we always
 distinguish between the capitalist and the entrepreneur aspect in a
 single person, and thus we reconstruct the fundamental situation which
 was the point of departure for our comparison. In dream-fabrication the
 same variations occur. I shall leave their further development to you.
 
 We can go no further here, for you have probably long been disturbed by
 a reflection which deserves to be heard. Are the day-remnants, you ask,
 really unconscious in the same sense as the unconscious wish which is
 essential to making them suitable for the dream? You discern correctly.
 Here lies the salient point of the whole affair. They are not
 unconscious in the same sense. The dream wish belongs to a different
 unconsciousness, that which we have recognized as of infantile origin,
 fitted out with special mechanisms. It is entirely appropriate to
 separate these two types of unconsciousness and give them different
 designations. But let us rather wait until we have become acquainted
 with the field of neurotic symptoms. If people say one unconsciousness
 is fantastic, what will they say when we acknowledge that we arrived at
 our conclusions by using two kinds of unconsciousness?
 
 Let us stop here. Once more you have heard something incomplete; but is
 there not hope in the thought that this science has a continuation which
 will be brought to light either by ourselves or by those to follow? And
 have not we ourselves discovered a sufficient number of new and
 surprising things?
 
 
 
 
 FIFTEENTH LECTURE
 
 THE DREAM
 
 _Doubtful Points and Criticism_
 
 
 Let us not leave the subject of dreams before we have touched upon the
 most common doubts and uncertainties which have arisen in connection
 with the new ideas and conceptions we have discussed up to this point.
 The more attentive members of the audience probably have already
 accumulated some material bearing upon this.
 
 1. You may have received the impression that the results of our work of
 interpretation of the dream have left so much that is uncertain, despite
 our close adherence to technique, that a true translation of the
 manifest dream into the latent dream thoughts is thereby rendered
 impossible. In support of this you will point out that in the first
 place, one never knows whether a specific element of the dream is to be
 taken literally or symbolically, since those elements which are used
 symbolically do not, because of that fact, cease to be themselves. But
 if one has no objective standard by which to decide this, the
 interpretation is, as to this point, left to the discretion of the dream
 interpreter. Moreover, because of the way in which the dream work
 combines opposites, it is always uncertain whether a specific dream
 element is to be taken in the positive or the negative sense, whether it
 is to be understood as itself or as its opposite. Hence this is another
 opportunity for the exercise of the interpreter's discretion. In the
 third place, in consequence of the frequency with which every sort of
 inversion is practised in the dream, the dream interpreter is at liberty
 to assume such an inversion at any point of the dream he pleases. And
 finally you will say, you have heard that one is seldom sure that the
 interpretation which is found is the only possible one. There is danger
 of overlooking a thoroughly admissible second interpretation of the
 same dream. Under these circumstances, you will conclude there is a
 scope left for the discretion of the interpreter, the breadth of which
 seems incompatible with the objective accuracy of the results. Or you
 may also conclude that the fault does not rest with the dream but that
 the inadequacies of our dream interpretation result from errors in our
 conceptions and hypotheses.
 
 All your material is irreproachable, but I do not believe that it
 justifies your conclusions in two directions, namely, that dream
 interpretation as we practice it is sacrificed to arbitrariness and that
 the deficiency of our results makes the justification of our method
 doubtful. If you will substitute for the arbitrariness of the
 interpreter, his skill, his experience, his comprehension, I agree with
 you. We shall surely not be able to dispense with some such personal
 factor, particularly not in difficult tasks of dream interpretation. But
 this same state of affairs exists also in other scientific occupations.
 There is no way in which to make sure that one man will not wield a
 technique less well, or utilize it more fully, than another. What might,
 for example, impress you as arbitrariness in the interpretation of
 symbols, is compensated for by the fact that as a rule the connection of
 the dream thoughts among themselves, the connection of the dream with
 the life of the dreamer, and the whole psychic situation in which the
 dream occurs, chooses just one of the possible interpretations advanced
 and rejects the others as useless for its purposes. The conclusion drawn
 from the inadequacies of dream interpretation, that our hypotheses are
 wrong, is weakened by an observation which shows that the ambiguity and
 indefiniteness of the dream is rather characteristic and necessarily to
 be expected.
 
 Recollect that we said that the dream work translates the dream thoughts
 into primitive expressions analogous to picture writing. All these
 primitive systems of expression are, however, subject to such
 indefiniteness and ambiguities, but it does not follow that we are
 justified in doubting their usefulness. You know that the fusion of
 opposites by the dream-work is analogous to the so-called "antithetical
 meaning of primitive words," in the oldest languages. The philologist,
 R. Abel (1884), whom we have to thank for this point of view, admonishes
 us not to believe that the meaning of the communication which one
 person made to another when using such ambiguous words was necessarily
 unclear. Tone and gesture used in connection with the words would have
 left no room for doubt as to which of the two opposites the speaker
 intended to communicate. In writing, where gesture is lacking, it was
 replaced by a supplementary picture sign not intended to be spoken, as
 for example by the picture of a little man squatting lazily or standing
 erect, according to whether the ambiguous hieroglyphic was to mean
 "weak" or "strong." It was in this way that one avoided any
 misunderstanding despite the ambiguity of the sounds and signs.
 
 We recognize in the ancient systems of expression, e.g., the writings of
 those oldest languages, a number of uncertainties which we would not
 tolerate in our present-day writings. Thus in many Semitic writings only
 the consonants of words are indicated. The reader had to supply the
 omitted vowels according to his knowledge and the context. Hieroglyphic
 writing does not proceed in exactly this way, but quite similarly, and
 that is why the pronunciation of old Egyptian has remained unknown to
 us. The holy writings of the Egyptians contain still other
 uncertainties. For example, it is left to the discretion of the writer
 whether or not he shall arrange the pictures from right to left or from
 left to right. To be able to read we have to follow the rule that we
 must depend upon the faces of the figures, birds, and the like. The
 writer, however, could also arrange the picture signs in vertical rows,
 and in inscriptions on small objects he was guided by considerations of
 beauty and proportion further to change the order of the signs. Probably
 the most confusing feature of hieroglyphic writing is to be found in the
 fact that there is no space between words. The pictures stretch over the
 page at uniform distances from one another, and generally one does not
 know whether a sign belongs to what has gone before or is the beginning
 of a new word. Persian cuneiform writing, on the other hand, makes use
 of an oblique wedge sign to separate the words.
 
 The Chinese tongue and script is exceedingly old, but still used by four
 hundred million people. Please do not think I understand anything about
 it. I have only informed myself concerning it because I hoped to find
 analogies to the indefinite aspects of the dream. Nor was I
 disappointed. The Chinese language is filled with so many vagaries that
 it strikes terror into our hearts. It consists, as is well known, of a
 number of syllable sounds which are spoken singly or are combined in
 twos. One of the chief dialects has about four hundred such sounds. Now
 since the vocabulary of this dialect is estimated at about four thousand
 words, it follows that every sound has on an average of ten different
 meanings, some less but others, consequently, more. Hence there are a
 great number of ways of avoiding a multiplicity of meaning, since one
 cannot guess from the context alone which of the ten meanings of the
 syllable sound the speaker intended to convey to the hearer. Among them
 are the combining of two sounds into a compounded word and the use of
 four different "tones" with which to utter these syllables. For our
 purposes of comparison, it is still more interesting to note that this
 language has practically no grammar. It is impossible to say of a
 one-syllable word whether it is a noun, a verb, or an adjective, and we
 find none of those changes in the forms of the words by means of which
 we might recognize sex, number, ending, tense or mood. The language,
 therefore, might be said to consist of raw material, much in the same
 manner as our thought language is broken up by the dream work into its
 raw materials when the expressions of relationship are left out. In the
 Chinese, in all cases of vagueness the decision is left to the
 understanding of the hearer, who is guided by the context. I have
 secured an example of a Chinese saying which, literally translated,
 reads: "Little to be seen, much to wonder at." That is not difficult to
 understand. It may mean, "The less a man has seen, the more he finds to
 wonder at," or, "There is much to admire for the man who has seen
 little." Naturally, there is no need to choose between these two
 translations, which differ only in grammar. Despite these uncertainties,
 we are assured, the Chinese language is an extraordinarily excellent
 medium for the expression of thought. Vagueness does not, therefore,
 necessarily lead to ambiguity.
 
 Now we must certainly admit that the condition of affairs is far less
 favorable in the expression-system of the dream than in these ancient
 languages and writings. For, after all, these latter are really designed
 for communication, that is to say, they were always intended to be
 understood, no matter in what way and with what aids. But it is just
 this characteristic which the dream lacks. The dream does not want to
 tell anyone anything, it is no vehicle of communication, it is, on the
 contrary, constructed so as not to be understood. For that reason we
 must not be surprised or misled if we should discover that a number of
 the ambiguities and vagaries of the dream do not permit of
 determination. As the one specific gain of our comparison, we have only
 the realization that such uncertainties as people tried to make use of
 in objecting to the validity of our dream interpretation, are rather the
 invariable characteristic of all primitive systems of expression.
 
 How far the dream can really be understood can be determined only by
 practice and experience. My opinion is, that that is very far indeed,
 and the comparison of results which correctly trained analysts have
 gathered confirms my view. The lay public, even that part of the lay
 public which is interested in science, likes, in the face of the
 difficulties and uncertainties of a scientific task, to make what I
 consider an unjust show of its superior scepticism. Perhaps not all of
 you are acquainted with the fact that a similar situation arose in the
 history of the deciphering of the Babylonian-Assyrian inscriptions.
 There was a period then when public opinion went far in declaring the
 decipherors of cuneiform writing to be visionaries and the whole
 research a "fraud." But in the year 1857 the Royal Asiatic Society made
 a decisive test. It challenged the four most distinguished decipherors
 of cuneiform writing, Rawlinson, Hincks, Fox Talbot and Oppert, each to
 send to it in a sealed envelope his independent translation of a newly
 discovered inscription, and the Society was then able to testify, after
 having made a comparison of the four readings, that their agreement was
 sufficiently marked to justify confidence in what already had been
 accomplished, and faith in further progress. At this the mockery of the
 learned lay world gradually came to an end and the confidence in the
 reading of cuneiform documents has grown appreciably since then.
 
 2. A second series of objections is firmly grounded in the impression
 from which you too probably are not free, that a number of the solutions
 of dream interpretations which we find it necessary to make seem forced,
 artificial, far-fetched, in other words, violent or even comical or
 jocose. These comments are so frequent that I shall choose at random the
 latest example which has come to my attention. Recently, in free
 Switzerland, the director of a boarding-school was relieved of his
 position on account of his active interest in psychoanalysis. He raised
 objections and a Berne newspaper made public the judgment of the school
 authorities. I quote from that article some sentences which apply to
 psychoanalysis: "Moreover, we are surprised at the many far-fetched and
 artificial examples as found in the aforementioned book of Dr. Pfister
 of Zurich.... Thus, it certainly is a cause of surprise when the
 director of a boarding-school so uncritically accepts all these
 assertions and apparent proofs." These observations are offered as the
 decisions of "one who judges calmly." I rather think this calm is
 "artificial." Let us examine these remarks more closely in the hope that
 a little reflection and knowledge of the subject can be no detriment to
 calm judgment.
 
 It is positively refreshing to see how quickly and unerringly some
 individuals can judge a delicate question of abstruse psychology by
 first impressions. The interpretations seem to them far-fetched and
 forced, they do not please them, so the interpretations are wrong and
 the whole business of interpretation amounts to nothing. No fleeting
 thought ever brushes the other possibility, that these interpretations
 must appear as they are for good reasons, which would give rise to the
 further question of what these good reasons might be.
 
 The content thus judged generally relates to the results of
 displacement, with which you have become acquainted as the strongest
 device of the dream censor. It is with the help of displacements that
 the dream censor creates substitute-formations which we have designated
 as allusions. But they are allusions which are not easily recognized as
 such, and from which it is not easy to find one's way back to the
 original and which are connected with this original by means of the
 strangest, most unusual, most superficial associations. In all of these
 cases, however, it is a question of matters which are to be hidden,
 which were intended for concealment; this is what the dream censor aims
 to do. We must not expect to find a thing that has been concealed in its
 accustomed place in the spot where it belongs. In this respect the
 Commissions for the Surveillance of Frontiers now in office are more
 cunning than the Swiss school authorities. In their search for documents
 and maps they are not content to search through portfolios and letter
 cases but they also take into account the possibility that spies and
 smugglers might carry such severely proscribed articles in the most
 concealed parts of their clothing, where they certainly do not belong,
 as for example between the double soles of their boots. If the concealed
 objects are found in such a place, they certainly are very far-fetched,
 but nevertheless they have been "fetched."
 
 If we recognize that the most remote, the most extraordinary
 associations between the latent dream element and its manifest
 substitute are possible, associations appearing ofttimes comical,
 ofttimes witty, we follow in so doing a wealth of experience derived
 from examples whose solutions we have, as a rule, not found ourselves.
 Often it is not possible to give such interpretations from our own
 examples. No sane person could guess the requisite association. The
 dreamer either gives us the translation with one stroke by means of his
 immediate association--he can do this, for this substitute formation was
 created by his mind--or he provides us with so much material that the
 solution no longer demands any special astuteness but forces itself upon
 us as inevitable. If the dreamer does not help us in either of these two
 ways, then indeed the manifest element in question remains forever
 incomprehensible to us. Allow me to give you one more such example of
 recent occurrence. One of my patients lost her father during the time
 that she was undergoing treatment. Since then she has made use of every
 opportunity to bring him back to life in her dreams. In one of her
 dreams her father appears in a certain connection, of no further
 importance here, and says, "_It is a quarter past eleven, it is half
 past eleven, it is quarter of twelve_." All she can think of in
 connection with this curious incident is the recollection that her
 father liked to see his grown-up children appear punctually at the
 general meal hour. That very thing probably had some connection with the
 dream element, but permitted of no conclusion as to its source. Judging
 from the situation of the treatment at that time, there was a justified
 suspicion that a carefully suppressed critical rebellion against her
 loved and respected father played its part in this dream. Continuing her
 associations, and apparently far afield from topics relevant to the
 dream, the dreamer relates that yesterday many things of a
 psychological nature had been discussed in her presence, and that a
 relative made the remark: "The cave man (_Urmensch_) continues to live
 in all of us." Now we think we understand. That gave her an excellent
 opportunity of picturing her father as continuing to live. So in the
 dream she made of him a clockman (_Uhrmensch_) by having him announce
 the quarter-hours at noon time.
 
 You may not be able to disregard the similarity which this examples
 bears to a pun, and it really has happened frequently that the dreamer's
 pun is attributed to the interpreter. There are still other examples in
 which it is not at all easy to decide whether one is dealing with a joke
 or a dream. But you will recall that the same doubt confronted us when
 we were dealing with slips of the tongue. A man tells us a dream of his,
 that his uncle, while they were sitting in the latter's _auto_mobile,
 gave him a kiss. He very quickly supplies the interpretation himself. It
 means "_auto_-eroticism," (a term taken from the study of the libido, or
 love impulse, and designating satisfaction of that impulse without an
 external object). Did this man permit himself to make fun of us and give
 out as a dream a pun that occurred to him? I do not believe so; he
 really dreamed it. Whence comes the astounding similarity? This question
 at one time led me quite a ways from my path, by making it necessary for
 me to make a thorough investigation of the problem of humor itself. By
 so doing I came to the conclusion that the origin of wit lies in a
 foreconscious train of thought which is left for a moment to unconscious
 manipulation, from which it then emerges as a joke. Under the influence
 of the unconscious it experiences the workings of the mechanisms there
 in force, namely, of condensation and displacement, that is, of the same
 processes which we found active in the dream work, and it is to this
 agreement that we are to ascribe the similarity between wit and the
 dream, wherever it occurs. The unintentional "dream joke" has, however,
 none of the pleasure-giving quality of the ordinary joke. Why that is
 so, greater penetration into the study of wit may teach you. The "dream
 joke" seems a poor joke to us, it does not make us laugh, it leaves us
 cold.
 
 Here we are also following in the footsteps of ancient dream
 interpretation, which has left us, in addition to much that is useless,
 many a good example of dream interpretation we ourselves cannot
 surpass. I am now going to tell you a dream of historical importance
 which Plutarch and Artemidorus of Daldis both tell concerning Alexander
 the Great, with certain variations. When the King was engaged in
 besieging the city of Tyre (322 B.C.), which was being stubbornly
 defended, he once dreamed that he saw a dancing satyr. Aristandros, his
 dream interpreter, who accompanied the army, interpreted this dream for
 him by making of the word _Satyros_, [Greek] sa Turos, "Thine is
 Tyre," and thus promising him a triumph over the city. Alexander allowed
 himself to be influenced by this interpretation to continue the siege,
 and finally captured Tyre. The interpretation, which seems artificial
 enough, was without doubt the correct one.
 
 3. I can imagine that it will make a special impression on you to hear
 that objections to our conception of the dream have been raised also by
 persons who, as psychoanalysts, have themselves been interested in the
 interpretation of dreams. It would have been too extraordinary if so
 pregnant an opportunity for new errors had remained unutilized, and
 thus, owing to comprehensible confusions and unjustified
 generalizations, there have been assertions made which, in point of
 incorrectness are not far behind the medical conception of dreams. One
 of these you already know. It is the declaration that the dream is
 occupied with the dreamer's attempts at adaptation to his present
 environment, and attempts to solve future problems, in other words, that
 the dream follows a "prospective tendency" (A. Maeder). We have already
 shown that this assertion is based upon a confusion of the dream with
 the latent thoughts of the dream, that as a premise it overlooks the
 existence of the dream-work. In characterizing that psychic activity
 which is unconscious and to which the latent thoughts of the dream
 belong, the above assertion is no novelty, nor is it exhaustive, for
 this unconscious psychic activity occupies itself with many other things
 besides preparation for the future. A much worse confusion seems to
 underlie the assurance that back of every dream one finds the
 "death-clause," or death-wish. I am not quite certain what this formula
 is meant to indicate, but I suppose that back of it is a confusion of
 the dream with the whole personality of the dreamer.
 
 An unjustified generalization, based on few good examples, is the
 pronouncement that every dream permits of two interpretations, one such
 as we have explained, the so-called psychoanalytic, and another, the
 so-called anagogical or mystical, which ignores the instinctive impulses
 and aims at a representation of the higher psychic functions (V.
 Silberer). There are such dreams, but you will try in vain to extend
 this conception to even a majority of the dreams. But after everything
 you have heard, the statement will seem very incomprehensible that all
 dreams can be interpreted bisexually, that is, as the concurrence of two
 tendencies which may be designated as male and female (A. Adler). To be
 sure, there are a few such dreams, and you may learn later that these
 are built up in the manner of certain hysterical symptoms. I mention all
 these newly discovered general characteristics of the dream in order to
 warn you against them or at least in order not to leave you in doubt as
 to how I judge them.
 
 4. At one time the objective value of dream research was called into
 question by the observation that patients undergoing analysis
 accommodate the content of their dreams to the favorite theories of
 their physicians, so that some dream predominantly of sexual impulses,
 others of the desire for power and still others even of rebirth (W.
 Stekel). The weight of this observation is diminished by the
 consideration that people dreamed before there was such a thing as a
 psychoanalytic treatment to influence their dreams, and that those who
 are now undergoing treatment were also in the habit of dreaming before
 the treatment was commenced. The meaning of this novel discovery can
 soon be recognized as a matter of course and as of no consequence for
 the theory of the dream. Those day-remnants which give rise to the dream
 are the overflow from the strong interest of the waking life. If the
 remarks of the physician and the stimuli which he gives have become
 significant to the patient under analysis, then they become a part of
 the day's remnants, can serve as psychic stimuli for the formation of a
 dream along with other, emotionally-charged, unsolved interests of the
 day, and operate much as do the somatic stimuli which act upon the
 sleeper during his sleep. Just like these other incitors of the dream,
 the sequence of ideas which the physician sets in motion may appear in
 the manifest content, or may be traced in the latent content of the
 dream. Indeed, we know that one can produce dreams experimentally, or to
 speak more accurately, one can insert into the dream a part of the
 dream material. Thus the analyst in influencing his patients, merely
 plays the role of an experimenter in the manner of Mourly Vold, who
 places the limbs of his subjects in certain positions.
 
 One can often influence the dreamer as to the _subject-matter_ of his
 dream, but one can never influence _what he will dream_ about it. The
 mechanism of the dream-work and the unconscious wish that is hidden in
 the dream are beyond the reach of all foreign influences. We already
 realized, when we evaluated the dreams caused by bodily stimuli, that
 the peculiarity and self-sufficiency of the dream life shows itself in
 the reaction with which the dream retorts to the bodily or physical
 stimuli which are presented. The statement here discussed, which aims to
 throw doubt upon the objectivity of dream research, is again based on a
 confusion--this time of the whole dream with the dream material.
 
 This much, ladies and gentlemen, I wanted to tell you concerning the
 problems of the dream. You will suspect that I have omitted a great
 deal, and have yourselves discovered that I had to be inconclusive on
 almost all points. But that is due to the relation which the phenomena
 of the dream have to those of the neuroses. We studied the dream by way
 of introduction to the study of the neuroses, and that was surely more
 correct than the reverse would have been. But just as the dream prepares
 us for the understanding of the neuroses, so in turn the correct
 evaluation of the dream can only be gained after a knowledge of neurotic
 phenomena has been won.
 
 I do not know what you will think about this, but I must assure you that
 I do not regret having taken so much of your interest and of your
 available time for the problems of the dream. There is no other field in
 which one can so quickly become convinced of the correctness of the
 assertions by which psychoanalysis stands or falls. It will take the
 strenuous labor of many months, even years, to show that the symptoms in
 a case of neurotic break-down have their meaning, serve a purpose, and
 result from the fortunes of the patient. On the other hand, the efforts
 of a few hours suffice in proving the same content in a dream product
 which at first seems incomprehensibly confused, and thereby to confirm
 all the hypotheses of psychoanalysis, the unconsciousness of psychic
 processes, the special mechanism which they follow, and the motive
 forces which manifest themselves in them. And if we associate the
 thorough analogy in the construction of the dream and the neurotic
 symptom with the rapidity of transformation which makes of the dreamer
 an alert and reasonable individual, we gain the certainty that the
 neurosis also is based only on a change in the balance of the forces of
 psychic life.
 
 
 
 
 III
 
 GENERAL THEORY OF THE NEUROSES
 
 
 
 
 SIXTEENTH LECTURE
 
 GENERAL THEORY OF THE NEUROSES
 
 _Psychoanalysis and Psychiatry_
 
 
 I am very glad to welcome you back to continue our discussions. I last
 lectured to you on the psychoanalytic treatment of errors and of the
 dream. To-day I should like to introduce you to an understanding of
 neurotic phenomena, which, as you soon will discover, have much in
 common with both of those topics. But I shall tell you in advance that I
 cannot leave you to take the same attitude toward me that you had
 before. At that time I was anxious to take no step without complete
 reference to your judgment. I discussed much with you, I listened to
 your objections, in short, I deferred to you and to your "normal common
 sense." That is no longer possible, and for a very simple reason. As
 phenomena, the dream and errors were not strange to you. One might say
 that you had as much experience as I, or that you could easily acquire
 as much. But neuroses are foreign to you; since you are not doctors
 yourselves you have had access to them only through what I have told
 you. Of what use is the best judgment if it is not supported by
 familiarity with the material in question?
 
 Do not, however, understand this as an announcement of dogmatic lectures
 which demand your unconditional belief. That would be a gross
 misunderstanding. I do not wish to convince you. I am out to stimulate
 your interest and shake your prejudices. If, in consequence of not
 knowing the facts, you are not in a position to judge, neither should
 you believe nor condemn. Listen and allow yourselves to be influenced by
 what I tell you. One cannot be so easily convinced; at least if he comes
 by convictions without effort, they soon prove to be valueless and
 unable to hold their own. He only has a right to conviction who has
 handled the same material for many years and who in so doing has gone
 through the same new and surprising experiences again and again. Why, in
 matters of intellect these lightning conversions, these momentary
 repulsions? Do you not feel that a _coup de foudre_, that love at first
 sight, originates in quite a different field, namely, in that of the
 emotions? We do not even demand that our patients should become
 convinced of and predisposed to psychoanalysis. When they do, they seem
 suspicious to us. The attitude we prefer in them is one of benevolent
 scepticism. Will you not also try to let the psychoanalytic conception
 develop in your mind beside the popular or "psychiatric"? They will
 influence each other, mutually measure their strength, and some day work
 themselves into a decision on your part.
 
 On the other hand, you must not think for a moment that what I present
 to you as the psychoanalytic conception is a purely speculative system.
 Indeed, it is a sum total of experiences and observations, either their
 direct expression or their elaboration. Whether this elaboration is done
 adequately and whether the method is justifiable will be tested in the
 further progress of the science. After two and a half decades, now that
 I am fairly advanced in years, I may say that it was particularly
 difficult, intensive and all-absorbing work which yielded these
 observations. I have often had the impression that our opponents were
 unwilling to take into consideration this objective origin of our
 statements, as if they thought it were only a question of subjective
 ideas arising haphazard, ideas to which another may oppose his every
 passing whim. This antagonistic behavior is not entirely comprehensible
 to me. Perhaps the physician's habit of steering clear of his neurotic
 patients and listening so very casually to what they have to say allows
 him to lose sight of the possibility of deriving anything valuable from
 his patients' communications, and therefore, of making penetrating
 observations on them. I take this opportunity of promising you that I
 shall carry on little controversy in the course of my lectures, least of
 all with individual controversialists. I have never been able to
 convince myself of the truth of the saying that controversy is the
 father of all things. I believe that it comes down to us from the Greek
 sophist philosophy and errs as does the latter through the overvaluation
 of dialectics. To me, on the contrary, it seems as if the so-called
 scientific criticism were on the whole unfruitful, quite apart from the
 fact that it is almost always carried on in a most personal spirit. For
 my part, up to a few years ago, I could even boast that I had entered
 into a regular scientific dispute with only one scholar (Lowenfeld, of
 Munich). The end of this was that we became friends and have remained
 friends to this day. But I did not repeat this attempt for a long time,
 because I was not certain that the outcome would be the same.
 
 Now you will surely judge that so to reject the discussion of literature
 must evidence stubborness, a very special obtuseness against objections,
 or, as the kindly colloquialisms of science have it, "a complete
 personal bias." In answer, I would say that should you attain to a
 conviction by such hard labor, you would thereby derive a certain right
 to sustain it with some tenacity. Furthermore, I should like to
 emphasize the fact that I have modified my views on certain important
 points in the course of my researches, changed them and replaced them by
 new ones, and that I naturally made a public statement of that fact each
 time. What has been the result of this frankness? Some paid no attention
 at all to my self-corrections and even to-day criticize me for
 assertions which have long since ceased to have the same meaning for me.
 Others reproach me for just this deviation, and on account of it declare
 me unreliable. For is anyone who has changed his opinions several times
 still trustworthy; is not his latest assertion, as well, open to error?
 At the same time he who holds unswervingly to what he has once said, or
 cannot be made to give it up quickly enough, is called stubborn and
 biased. In the face of these contradictory criticisms, what else can one
 do but be himself and act according to his own dictates? That is what I
 have decided to do, and I will not allow myself to be restrained from
 modifying and adapting my theories as the progress of my experience
 demands. In the basic ideas I have hitherto found nothing to change, and
 I hope that such will continue to be the case.
 
 Now I shall present to you the psychoanalytic conception of neurotic
 manifestations. The natural thing for me to do is to connect them to the
 phenomena we have previously treated, for the sake of their analogy as
 well as their contrast. I will select as symptomatic an act of frequent
 occurrence in my office hour. Of course, the analyst cannot do much for
 those who seek him in his medical capacity, and lay the woes of a
 lifetime before him in fifteen minutes. His deeper knowledge makes it
 difficult for him to deliver a snap decision as do other
 physicians--"There is nothing wrong with you"--and to give the advice,
 "Go to a watering-place for a while." One of our colleagues, in answer
 to the question as to what he did with his office patients, said,
 shrugging his shoulders, that he simply "fines them so many kronen for
 their mischief-making." So it will not surprise you to hear that even in
 the case of very busy analysts, the hours for consultation are not very
 crowded. I have had the ordinary door between my waiting room and my
 office doubled and strengthened by a covering of felt. The purpose of
 this little arrangement cannot be doubted. Now it happens over and over
 again that people who are admitted from my waiting room omit to close
 the door behind them; in fact, they almost always leave both doors open.
 As soon as I have noticed this I insist rather gruffly that he or she go
 back in order to rectify the omission, even though it be an elegant
 gentleman or a lady in all her finery. This gives an impression of
 misapplied pedantry. I have, in fact, occasionally discredited myself by
 such a demand, since the individual concerned was one of those who
 cannot touch even a door knob, and prefer as well to have their
 attendants spared this contact. But most frequently I was right, for he
 who conducts himself in this way, and leaves the door from the waiting
 room into the physician's consultation room open, belongs to the rabble
 and deserves to be received inhospitably. Do not, I beg you, defend him
 until you have heard what follows. For the fact is that this negligence
 of the patient's only occurs when he has been alone in the waiting room
 and so leaves an empty room behind him, never when others, strangers,
 have been waiting with him. If that latter is the case, he knows very
 well that it is in his interest not to be listened to while he is
 talking to the physician, and never omits to close both the doors with
 care.
 
 This omission of the patient's is so predetermined that it becomes
 neither accidental nor meaningless, indeed, not even unimportant, for,
 as we shall see, it throws light upon the relation of this patient to
 the physician. He is one of the great number of those who seek
 authority, who want to be dazzled, intimidated. Perhaps he had inquired
 by telephone as to what time he had best call, he had prepared himself
 to come on a crowd of suppliants somewhat like those in front of a
 branch milk station. He now enters an empty waiting room which is,
 moreover, most modestly furnished, and he is disappointed. He must
 demand reparation from the physician for the wasted respect that he had
 tendered him, and so he omits to close the door between the reception
 room and the office. By this, he means to say to the physician: "Oh,
 well, there is no one here anyway, and probably no one will come as long
 as I am here." He would also be quite unmannerly and supercilious during
 the consultation if his presumption were not at once restrained by a
 sharp reminder.
 
 You will find nothing in the analysis of this little symptomatic act
 which was not previously known to you. That is to say, it asserts that
 this act is not accidental, but has a motive, a meaning, a purpose, that
 it has its assignable connections psychologically, and that it serves as
 a small indication of a more important psychological process. But above
 all it implies that the process thus intimated is not known to the
 consciousness of the individual in whom it takes place, for none of the
 patients who left the two doors open would have admitted that they meant
 by this omission to show me their contempt. Some could probably recall a
 slight sense of disappointment at entering an empty waiting room, but
 the connection between this impression and the symptomatic act which
 followed--of these, his consciousness was surely not aware.
 
 Now let us place, side by side with this small analysis of a symptomatic
 act, an observation on a pathological case. I choose one which is fresh
 in my mind and which can also be described with relative brevity. A
 certain measure of minuteness of detail is unavoidable in any such
 account.
 
 A young officer, home on a short leave of absence, asked me to see his
 mother-in-law who, in spite of the happiest circumstances, was
 embittering her own and her people's existence by a senseless idea. I am
 introduced to a well preserved lady of fifty-three with pleasant, simple
 manners, who gives the following account without any hesitation: She is
 most happily married and lives in the country with her husband, who
 operates a large factory. She cannot say enough for the kind
 thoughtfulness of her husband. They had married for love thirty years
 ago, and since then there had never been a shadow, a quarrel or cause
 for jealousy. Now, even though her two children are well married, the
 husband and father does not yet want to retire, from a feeling of duty.
 A year ago there happened the incredible thing, incomprehensible to
 herself as well. She gave complete credence to an anonymous letter which
 accused her excellent husband of having an affair with a young girl--and
 since then her happiness is destroyed. The more detailed circumstances
 were somewhat as follows: She had a chambermaid with whom she had
 perhaps too often discussed intimate matters. This girl pursued another
 young woman with positively malicious enmity because the latter had
 progressed so much further in life, despite the fact that she was of no
 better origin. Instead of going into domestic service, the girl had
 obtained a business training, had entered the factory and in consequence
 of the short-handedness due to the drafting of the clerks into the army
 had advanced to a good position. She now lives in the factory itself,
 meets all the gentlemen socially, and is even addressed as "Miss." The
 girl who had remained behind in life was of course ready to speak all
 possible evil of her one-time schoolmate. One day our patient and her
 chambermaid were talking of an old gentleman who had been visiting at
 the house, and of whom it was known that he did not live with his wife,
 but kept another woman as his mistress. She does not know how it
 happened that she suddenly remarked, "That would be the most awful thing
 that could happen to me, if I should ever hear that my good husband also
 had a mistress." The next day she received an anonymous letter through
 the mail which, in a disguised handwriting, carried this very
 communication which she had conjured up. She concluded--it seems
 justifiably--that the letter was the handiwork of her malignant
 chambermaid, for the letter named as the husband's mistress the
 self-same woman whom the maid persecuted with her hatred. Our patient,
 in spite of the fact that she immediately saw through the intrigue and
 had seen enough in her town to know how little credence such cowardly
 denunciations deserve, was nevertheless at once prostrated by the
 letter. She became dreadfully excited and promptly sent for her husband
 in order to heap the bitterest reproaches upon him. Her husband
 laughingly denied the accusation and did the best that could be done. He
 called in the family physician, who was as well the doctor in attendance
 at the factory, and the latter added his efforts to quiet the unhappy
 woman. Their further procedure was also entirely reasonable. The
 chambermaid was dismissed, but the pretended rival was not. Since then,
 the patient claims she has repeatedly so far calmed herself as no longer
 to believe the contents of the anonymous letter, but this relief was
 neither thoroughgoing nor lasting. It was enough to hear the name of the
 young lady spoken or to meet her on the street in order to precipitate a
 new attack of suspicion, pain and reproach.
 
 This, now, is the case history of this good woman. It does not need much
 psychiatric experience to understand that her portrayal of her own case
 was, if anything, rather too mild in contrast to other nervous patients.
 The picture, we say, was dissimulated; in reality she had never overcome
 her belief in the accusation of the anonymous letter.
 
 Now what position does a psychiatrist take toward such a case? We
 already know what he would do in the case of the symptomatic act of the
 patient who does not close the doors to the waiting room. He declares it
 an accident without psychological interest, with which he need not
 concern himself. But this attitude cannot be maintained toward the
 pathological case of the jealous woman. The symptomatic act seems no
 great matter, but the symptom itself claims attention by reason of its
 gravity. It is bound up with intense subjective suffering while
 objectively it threatens to break up a home; therefore its claim to
 psychiatric interest cannot be put aside. The first endeavor of the
 psychiatrist is to characterize the symptom by some distinctive feature.
 The idea with which this woman torments herself cannot in itself be
 called nonsensical, for it does happen that elderly married men have
 affairs with young girls. But there is something else about it that is
 nonsensical and incredible. The patient has no reason beyond the
 declaration in the anonymous letter to believe that her tender and
 faithful husband belongs to this sort of married men, otherwise not
 uncommon. She knows that this letter in itself carries no proof; she can
 satisfactorily explain its origin; therefore she ought to be able to
 persuade herself that she has no reason to be jealous. Indeed she does
 this, but in spite of it she suffers every bit as much as she would if
 she acknowledged this jealousy as fully justified. We are agreed to call
 ideas of this sort, which are inaccessible to arguments based on logic
 or on facts, "_obsessions_." Thus the good lady suffers from an
 "_obsession of jealousy_" that is surely a distinctive characterization
 for this pathological case.
 
 Having reached this first certainty, our psychiatric interest will have
 become aroused. If we cannot do away with a delusion by taking reality
 into account, it can hardly have arisen from reality. But the delusion,
 what is its origin? There are delusions of the most widely varied
 content. Why is it that in our case the content should be jealousy? In
 what types of persons are obsessions liable to occur, and, in
 particular, obsessions of jealousy? We would like to turn to the
 psychiatrist with such questions, but here he leaves us in the lurch.
 There is only one of our queries which he heeds. He will examine the
 family history of this woman and _perhaps_ will give us the answer: "The
 people who develop obsessions are those in whose families similar and
 other psychic disturbances have repeatedly occurred." In other words, if
 this lady develops an obsession she does so because she was predisposed
 to it by reason of her heredity. That is certainly something, but is it
 all that we want to know? Is it all that was effective in causing this
 breakdown? Shall we be content to assume that it is immaterial,
 accidental and inexplicable why the obsession of jealousy develops
 rather than any other? And may we also accept this sentence about the
 dominance of the influence of heredity in its negative meaning, that is,
 that no matter what experiences came to this human being she was
 predestined to develop some kind of obsession? You will want to know why
 scientific psychiatry will give no further explanation. And I reply, "He
 is a rascal who gives more than he owns." The psychiatrist does not know
 of any path that leads him further in the explanation of such a case. He
 must content himself with the diagnosis and a prognosis which, despite a
 wealth of experience, is uncertain.
 
 Yet, can psychoanalysis do more at this point? Indeed yes! I hope to
 show you that even in so inaccessible a case as this it can discover
 something which makes the further understanding possible. May I ask you
 first to note the apparently insignificant fact that the patient
 actually provoked the anonymous letter which now supports her delusion.
 The day before, she announces to the intriguing chambermaid that if her
 husband were to have an affair with a young girl it would be the worst
 misfortune that could befall her. By so doing she really gave the maid
 the idea of sending her the anonymous letter. The obsession thus attains
 a certain independence from the letter; it existed in the patient
 beforehand--perhaps as a dread; or was it a wish? Consider, moreover,
 these additional details yielded by an analysis of only two hours. The
 patient was indeed most helpful when, after telling her story, she was
 urged to communicate her further thoughts, ideas and recollections. She
 declared that nothing came to her mind, that she had already told
 everything. After two hours the undertaking had really to be given up
 because she announced that she already felt cured and was sure that the
 morbid idea would not return. Of course, she said this because of this
 resistance and her fear of continuing the analysis. In these two hours,
 however, she had let fall certain remarks which made possible definite
 interpretation, indeed made it incontestable; and this interpretation
 throws a clear light on the origin of her obsession of jealousy. Namely,
 she herself was very much infatuated with a certain young man, the very
 same son-in-law upon whose urging she had come to consult me
 professionally. She knew nothing of this infatuation, or at least only a
 very little. Because of the existing relationship, it was very easy for
 this infatuation to masquerade under the guise of harmless tenderness.
 With all our further experience it is not difficult to feel our way
 toward an understanding of the psychic life of this honest woman and
 good mother. Such an infatuation, a monstrous, impossible thing, could
 not be allowed to become conscious. But it continued to exist and
 unconsciously exerted a heavy pressure. Something had to happen, some
 sort of relief had to be found and the mechanism of displacement which
 so constantly takes part in the origin of obsessional jealousy offered
 the most immediate mitigation. If not only she, old woman that she was,
 was in love with a young man but if also her old husband had an affair
 with a young girl, then she would be freed from the voice of her
 conscience which accused her of infidelity. The phantasy of her
 husband's infidelity was thus like a cooling salve on her burning wound.
 Of her own love she never became conscious, but the reflection of it,
 which would bring her such advantages, now became compulsive,
 obsessional and conscious. Naturally all arguments directed against the
 obsession were of no avail since they were directed only to the
 reflection, and not to the original force to which it owed its strength
 and which, unimpeachable, lay buried in the unconscious.
 
 Let us now piece together these fragments to see what a short and
 impeded psychoanalysis can nevertheless contribute to the understanding
 of this case. It is assumed of course that our inquiries were carefully
 conducted, a point which I cannot at this place submit to your judgment.
 In the first place, the obsession becomes no longer nonsensical nor
 incomprehensible, it is full of meaning, well motivated and an integral
 part of the patient's emotional experience. Secondly, it is a necessary
 reaction toward an unconscious psychological process, revealed in other
 ways, and it is to this very circumstance that it owes its obsessional
 nature, that is, its resistance to arguments based on logic or fact. In
 itself the obsession is something wished for, a kind of consolation.
 Finally, the experiences underlying the condition are such as
 unmistakably determine an obsession of jealousy and no other. You will
 also recognize the part played by the two important analogies in the
 analysis of the symptomatic act with reference to its meaning and intent
 and also to its relation to an unconscious factor in the situation.
 
 Naturally, we have not yet answered all the questions which may be put
 on the basis of this case. Rather the case bristles with further
 problems of a kind which we have not yet been able to solve in any way,
 and of others which could not be solved because of the disadvantage of
 the circumstances under which we were working. For example: why is this
 happily married woman open to an infatuation for her son-in-law, and why
 does the relief which could have been obtained in other ways come to her
 by way of this mirror-image, this projection of her own condition upon
 her husband? I trust you will not think that it is idle and wanton to
 open such problems. Already we have much material at our disposal for
 their possible solution. This woman is in that critical age when her
 sexual needs undergo a sudden and unwelcome exaggeration. This might in
 itself be sufficient. In addition, her good and faithful mate may for
 many years have been lacking in that sufficient sexual capacity which
 the well-preserved woman needs for her satisfaction. We have learned by
 experience to know that those very men whose faithfulness is thus placed
 beyond a doubt are most gentle in their treatment of their wives and
 unusually forbearing toward their nervous complaints. Furthermore, the
 fact that it was just the young husband of a daughter who became the
 object of her abnormal infatuation is by no means insignificant. A
 strong erotic attachment to the daughter, which in the last analysis
 leads back to the mother's sexual constitution, will often find a way to
 live on under such a disguise. May I perhaps remind you in this
 connection that the relationship between mother and son-in-law has
 seemed particularly delicate since all time and is one which among
 primitive peoples gave rise to very powerful taboos and avoidances.[37]
 It often transgresses our cultural standards positively as well as
 negatively. I cannot tell you of course which of these three factors
 were at work in our case; whether two of them only, or whether all of
 them cooperated, for as you know I did not have the opportunity to
 continue the analysis beyond two hours.
 
 I realize at this point, ladies and gentlemen, that I have been speaking
 entirely of things for which your understanding was not prepared. I did
 this in order to carry through the comparison of psychiatry and
 psychoanalysis. May I now ask one thing of you? Have you noticed any
 contradiction between them? Psychiatry does not apply the technical
 methods of psychoanalysis, and neglects to look for any significance in
 the content of the obsession. Instead of first seeking out more specific
 and immediate causes, psychiatry refers us to the very general and
 remote source--heredity. But does this imply a contradiction, a conflict
 between them? Do they not rather supplement one another? For does the
 hereditary factor deny the significance of the experience, is it not
 rather true that both operate together in the most effective way? You
 must admit that there is nothing in the nature of psychiatric work which
 must repudiate psychoanalytic research. Therefore, it is the
 psychiatrists who oppose psychoanalysis, not psychiatry itself.
 Psychoanalysis stands in about the same relation to psychiatry as does
 histology to anatomy. The one studies the outer forms of organs, the
 other the closer structure of tissues and cells. A contradiction between
 two types of study, where one simplifies the other, is not easily
 conceivable. You know that anatomy to-day forms the basis of scientific
 medicine, but there was a time when the dissection of human corpses to
 learn the inner structure of the body was as much frowned upon as the
 practice of psychoanalysis, which seeks to ascertain the inner workings
 of the human soul, seems proscribed to-day. And presumably a not too
 distant time will bring us to the realization that a psychiatry which
 aspires to scientific depth is not possible without a real knowledge of
 the deeper unconscious processes in the psychic life.
 
 Perhaps this much-attacked psychoanalysis has now found some friends
 among you who are anxious to see it justify itself as well from another
 aspect, namely, the therapeutic side. You know that the therapy of
 psychiatry has hitherto not been able to influence obsessions. Can
 psychoanalysis perhaps do so, thanks to its insight into the mechanism
 of these symptoms? No, ladies and gentlemen, it cannot; for the present
 at least it is just as powerless in the face of these maladies as every
 other therapy. We can understand what it was that happened within the
 patient, but we have no means of making the patient himself understand
 this. In fact, I told you that I could not extend the analysis of the
 obsession beyond the first steps. Would you therefore assert that
 analysis is objectionable in such cases because it remains without
 result? I think not. We have the right, indeed we have the duty to
 pursue scientific research without regard to an immediate practical
 effect. Some day, though we do not know when or where, every little
 scrap of knowledge will have been translated into skill, even into
 therapeutic skill. If psychoanalysis were as unsuccessful in all other
 forms of nervous and psychological disease as it is in the case of the
 obsession, it would nevertheless remain fully justified as an
 irreplaceable method of scientific research. It is true that we would
 then not be in a position to practice it, for the human subjects from
 which we must learn, live and will in their own right; they must have
 motives of their own in order to assist in the work, but they would deny
 themselves to us. Therefore let me conclude this session by telling you
 that there are comprehensive groups of nervous diseases concerning which
 our better understanding has actually been translated into therapeutic
 power; moreover, that in disturbances which are most difficult to reach
 we can under certain conditions secure results which are second to none
 in the field of internal therapeutics.
 
 
 
 
 SEVENTEENTH LECTURE
 
 GENERAL THEORY OF THE NEUROSES
 
 _The Meaning of the Symptoms_
 
 
 In the last lecture I explained to you that clinical psychiatry concerns
 itself very little with the form under which the symptoms appear or with
 the burden they carry, but that it is precisely here that psychoanalysis
 steps in and shows that the symptom carries a meaning and is connected
 with the experience of the patient. The meaning of neurotic symptoms was
 first discovered by J. Breuer in the study and felicitous cure of a case
 of hysteria which has since become famous (1880-82). It is true that P.
 Janet independently reached the same result; literary priority must in
 fact be accorded to the French scholar, since Breuer published his
 observations more than a decade later (1893-95) during his period of
 collaboration with me. On the whole it may be of small importance to us
 who is responsible for this discovery, for you know that every discovery
 is made more than once, that none is made all at once, and that success
 is not meted out according to deserts. America is not named after
 Columbus. Before Breuer and Janet, the great psychiatrist Leuret
 expressed the opinion that even for the deliria of the insane, if we
 only understood how to interpret them, a meaning could be found. I
 confess that for a considerable period of time I was willing to estimate
 very highly the credit due to P. Janet in the explanation of neurotic
 symptoms, because he saw in them the expression of subconscious ideas
 (_idees inconscientes_) with which the patients were obsessed. But since
 then Janet has expressed himself most conservatively, as though he
 wanted to confess that the term "subconscious" had been for him nothing
 more than a mode of speech, a shift, "_une facon de parler_," by the use
 of which he had nothing definite in mind. I now no longer understand
 Janet's discussions, but I believe that he has needlessly deprived
 himself of high credit.
 
 The neurotic symptoms then have their meaning just like errors and the
 dream, and like these they are related to the lives of the persons in
 whom they appear. The importance of this insight into the nature of the
 symptom can best be brought home to you by way of examples. That it is
 borne out always and in all cases, I can only assert, not prove. He who
 gathers his own experience will be convinced of it. For certain reasons,
 however, I shall draw my instances not from hysteria, but from another
 fundamentally related and very curious neurosis concerning which I wish
 to say a few introductory words to you. This so-called compulsion
 neurosis is not so popular as the widely known hysteria; it is, if I may
 use the expression, not so noisily ostentatious, behaves more as a
 private concern of the patient, renounces bodily manifestations almost
 entirely and creates all its symptoms psychologically. Compulsion
 neurosis and hysteria are those forms of neurotic disease by the study
 of which psychoanalysis has been built up, and in whose treatment as
 well the therapy celebrates its triumphs. Of these the compulsion
 neurosis, which does not take that mysterious leap from the psychic to
 the physical, has through psychoanalytic research become more intimately
 comprehensible and transparent to us than hysteria, and we have come to
 understand that it reveals far more vividly certain extreme
 characteristics of the neuroses.
 
 The chief manifestations of compulsion neurosis are these: the patient
 is occupied by thoughts that in reality do not interest him, is moved by
 impulses that appear alien to him, and is impelled to actions which, to
 be sure, afford him no pleasure, but the performance of which he cannot
 possibly resist. The thoughts may be absurd in themselves or thoroughly
 indifferent to the individual, often they are absolutely childish and in
 all cases they are the result of strained thinking, which exhausts the
 patient, who surrenders himself to them most unwillingly. Against his
 will he is forced to brood and speculate as though it were a matter of
 life or death to him. The impulses, which the patient feels within
 himself, may also give a childish or ridiculous impression, but for the
 most part they bear the terrifying aspect of temptations to fearful
 crimes, so that the patient not only denies them, but flees from them in
 horror and protects himself from actual execution of his desires through
 inhibitory renunciations and restrictions upon his personal liberty. As
 a matter of fact he never, not a single time, carries any of these
 impulses into effect; the result is always that his evasion and
 precaution triumph. The patient really carries out only very harmless
 trivial acts, so-called compulsive acts, for the most part repetitions
 and ceremonious additions to the occupations of every-day life, through
 which its necessary performances--going to bed, washing, dressing,
 walking--become long-winded problems of almost insuperable difficulty.
 The abnormal ideas, impulses and actions are in nowise equally potent in
 individual forms and cases of compulsion neurosis; it is the rule,
 rather, that one or the other of these manifestations is the dominating
 factor and gives the name to the disease; that all these forms, however,
 have a great deal in common is quite undeniable.
 
 Surely this means violent suffering. I believe that the wildest
 psychiatric phantasy could not have succeeded in deriving anything
 comparable, and if one did not actually see it every day, one could
 hardly bring oneself to believe it. Do not think, however, that you give
 the patient any help when you coax him to divert himself, to put aside
 these stupid ideas and to set himself to something useful in the place
 of his whimsical occupations. This is just what he would like of his own
 accord, for he possesses all his senses, shares your opinion of his
 compulsion symptoms, in fact volunteers it quite readily. But he cannot
 do otherwise; whatever activities actually are released under compulsion
 neurosis are carried along by a driving energy, such as is probably
 never met with in normal psychic life. He has only one remedy--to
 transfer and change. In place of one stupid idea he can think of a
 somewhat milder absurdity, he can proceed from one precaution and
 prohibition to another, or carry through another ceremonial. He may
 shift, but he cannot annul the compulsion. One of the chief
 characteristics of the sickness is the instability of the symptoms; they
 can be shifted very far from their original form. It is moreover
 striking that the contrasts present in all psychological experience are
 so very sharply drawn in this condition. In addition to the compulsion
 of positive and negative content, an intellectual doubt makes itself
 felt that gradually attacks the most ordinary and assured certainties.
 All these things merge into steadily increasing uncertainty, lack of
 energy, curtailment of personal liberty, despite the fact that the
 patient suffering from compulsion neurosis is originally a most
 energetic character, often of extraordinary obstinacy, as a rule
 intellectually gifted above the average. For the most part he has
 attained a desirable stage of ethical development, is overconscientious
 and more than usually correct. You can imagine that it takes no
 inconsiderable piece of work to find one's way through this maze of
 contradictory characteristics and symptoms. Indeed, for the present our
 only object is to understand and to interpret some symptoms of this
 disease.
 
 Perhaps in reference to our previous discussions, you would like to know
 the position of present-day psychiatry to the problems of the compulsion
 neurosis. This is covered in a very slim chapter. Psychiatry gives names
 to the various forms of compulsion, but says nothing further concerning
 them. Instead it emphasizes the fact that those who show these symptoms
 are degenerates. That yields slight satisfaction, it is an ethical
 judgment, a condemnation rather than an explanation. We are led to
 suppose that it is in the unsound that all these peculiarities may be
 found. Now we do believe that persons who develop such symptoms must
 differ fundamentally from other people. But we would like to ask, are
 they more "degenerate" than other nervous patients, those suffering, for
 instance, from hysteria or other diseases of the mind? The
 characterization is obviously too general. One may even doubt whether it
 is at all justified, when one learns that such symptoms occur in
 excellent men and women of especially great and universally recognized
 ability. In general we glean very little intimate knowledge of the great
 men who serve us as models. This is due both to their own discretion and
 to the lying propensities of their biographers. Sometimes, however, a
 man is a fanatic disciple of truth, such as Emile Zola, and then we hear
 from him the strange compulsion habits from which he suffered all his
 life.[38]
 
 Psychiatry has resorted to the expedient of speaking of "superior
 degenerates." Very well--but through psychoanalysis we have learned that
 these peculiar compulsion symptoms may be permanently removed just like
 any other disease of normal persons. I myself have frequently succeeded
 in doing this.
 
 I will give you two examples only of the analysis of compulsion
 symptoms, one, an old observation, which cannot be replaced by anything
 more complete, and one a recent study. I am limiting myself to such a
 small number because in an account of this nature it is necessary to be
 very explicit and to enter into every detail.
 
 A lady about thirty years old suffered from the most severe compulsions.
 I might indeed have helped her if caprice of fortune had not destroyed
 my work--perhaps I will yet have occasion to tell you about it. In the
 course of each day the patient often executed, among others, the
 following strange compulsive act. She ran from her room into an
 adjoining one, placed herself in a definite spot beside a table which
 stood in the middle of the room, rang for her maid, gave her a trivial
 errand to do, or dismissed her without more ado, and then ran back
 again. This was certainly not a severe symptom of disease, but it still
 deserved to arouse curiosity. Its explanation was found, absolutely
 without any assistance on the part of the physician, in the very
 simplest way, a way to which no one can take exception. I hardly know
 how I alone could have guessed the meaning of this compulsive act, or
 have found any suggestion toward its interpretation. As often as I had
 asked the patient: "Why do you do this? Of what use is it?" she had
 answered, "I don't know." But one day after I had succeeded in
 surmounting a grave ethical doubt of hers she suddenly saw the light and
 related the history of the compulsive act. More than ten years prior she
 had married a man far older than herself, who had proved impotent on the
 bridal night. Countless times during the night he had run from his room
 to hers to repeat the attempt, but each time without success. In the
 morning he said angrily: "It is enough to make one ashamed before the
 maid who does the beds," and took a bottle of red ink that happened to
 be in the room, and poured its contents on the sheet, but not on the
 place where such a stain would have been justifiable. At first I did not
 understand the connection between this reminiscence and the compulsive
 act in question, for the only agreement I could find between them was in
 the running from one room into another,--possibly also in the appearance
 of the maid. Then the patient led me to the table in the second room and
 let me discover a large spot on the cover. She explained also that she
 placed herself at the table in such a way that the maid could not miss
 seeing the stain. Now it was no longer possible to doubt the intimate
 relation of the scene after her bridal night and her present compulsive
 act, but there were still a number of things to be learned about it.
 
 In the first place, it is obvious that the patient identifies herself
 with her husband, she is acting his part in her imitation of his running
 from one room into the other. We must then admit--if she holds to this
 role--that she replaces the bed and sheet by table and cover. This may
 seem arbitrary, but we have not studied dream symbolism in vain. In
 dreams also a table which must be interpreted as a bed, is frequently
 seen. "Bed and board" together represent married life, one may therefore
 easily be used to represent the other.
 
 The evidence that the compulsive act carries meaning would thus be
 plain; it appears as a representation, a repetition of the original
 significant scene. However, we are not forced to stop at this semblance
 of a solution; when we examine more closely the relation between these
 two people, we shall probably be enlightened concerning something of
 wider importance, namely, the purpose of the compulsive act. The nucleus
 of this purpose is evidently the summoning of the maid; to her she
 wishes to show the stain and refute her husband's remark: "It is enough
 to shame one before the maid." He--whose part she is playing--therefore
 feels no shame before the maid, hence the stain must be in the right
 place. So we see that she has not merely repeated the scene, rather she
 has amplified it, corrected it and "turned it to the good." Thereby,
 however, she also corrects something else,--the thing which was so
 embarrassing that night and necessitated the use of the red
 ink--impotence. The compulsive act then says: "No, it is not true, he
 did not have to be ashamed before the maid, he was not impotent." After
 the manner of a dream she represents the fulfillment of this wish in an
 overt action, she is ruled by the desire to help her husband over that
 unfortunate incident.
 
 Everything else that I could tell you about this case supports this clue
 more specifically; all that we otherwise know about her tends to
 strengthen this interpretation of a compulsive act incomprehensible in
 itself. For years the woman has lived separated from her husband and is
 struggling with the intention to obtain a legal divorce. But she is by
 no means free from him; she forces herself to remain faithful to him,
 she retires from the world to avoid temptation; in her imagination she
 excuses and idealizes him. The deepest secret of her malady is that by
 means of it she shields her husband from malicious gossip, justifies her
 separation from him, and renders possible for him a comfortable separate
 life. Thus the analysis of a harmless compulsive act leads to the very
 heart of this case and at the same time reveals no inconsiderable
 portion of the secret of the compulsion neurosis in general. I shall be
 glad to have you dwell upon this instance, as it combines conditions
 that one can scarcely demand in other cases. The interpretation of the
 symptoms was discovered by the patient herself in one flash, without the
 suggestion or interference of the analyst. It came about by the
 reference to an experience, which did not, as is usually the case,
 belong to the half-forgotten period of childhood, but to the mature life
 of the patient, in whose memory it had remained unobliterated. All the
 objections which critics ordinarily offer to our interpretation of
 symptoms fail in this case. Of course, we are not always so fortunate.
 
 And one thing more! Have you not observed how this insignificant
 compulsive act initiated us into the intimate life of the invalid? A
 woman can scarcely relate anything more intimate than the story of her
 bridal night, and is it without further significance that we just
 happened to come on the intimacies of her sexual life? It might of
 course be the result of the selection I have made in this instance. Let
 us not judge too quickly and turn our attention to the second instance,
 one of an entirely different kind, a sample of a frequently occurring
 variety, namely, the sleep ritual.
 
 A nineteen-year old, well-developed, gifted girl, an only child, who was
 superior to her parents in education and intellectual activity, had been
 wild and mischievous in her childhood, but has become very nervous
 during the last years without any apparent outward cause. She is
 especially irritable with her mother, always discontented, depressed,
 has a tendency toward indecision and doubt, and is finally forced to
 confess that she can no longer walk alone on public squares or wide
 thoroughfares. We shall not consider at length her complicated
 condition, which requires at least two diagnoses--agoraphobia and
 compulsion neurosis. We will dwell only upon the fact that this girl has
 also developed a sleep ritual, under which she allows her parents to
 suffer much discomfort. In a certain sense, we may say that every
 normal person has a sleep ritual, in other words that he insists on
 certain conditions, the absence of which hinders him from falling
 asleep; he has created certain observances by which he bridges the
 transition from waking to sleeping and these he repeats every evening in
 the same manner. But everything that the healthy person demands in order
 to obtain sleep is easily understandable and, above all, when external
 conditions necessitate a change, he adapts himself easily and without
 loss of time. But the pathological ritual is rigid, it persists by
 virtue of the greatest sacrifices, it also masks itself with a
 reasonable justification and seems, in the light of superficial
 observation, to differ from the normal only by exaggerated pedantry. But
 under closer observation we notice that the mask is transparent, for the
 ritual covers intentions that go far beyond this reasonable
 justification, and other intentions as well that are in direct
 contradiction to this reasonable justification. Our patient cites as the
 motive of her nightly precautions that she must have quiet in order to
 sleep; therefore she excludes all sources of noise. To accomplish this,
 she does two things: the large clock in her room is stopped, all other
 clocks are removed; not even the wrist watch on her night-table is
 suffered to remain. Flowerpots and vases are placed on her desk so that
 they cannot fall down during the night, and in breaking disturb her
 sleep. She knows that these precautions are scarcely justifiable for the
 sake of quiet; the ticking of the small watch could not be heard even if
 it should remain on the night-table, and moreover we all know that the
 regular ticking of a clock is conducive to sleep rather than disturbing.
 She does admit that there is not the least probability that flowerpots
 and vases left in place might of their own accord fall and break during
 the night. She drops the pretense of quiet for the other practice of
 this sleep ritual. She seems on the contrary to release a source of
 disturbing noises by the demand that the door between her own room and
 that of her parents remain half open, and she insures this condition by
 placing various objects in front of the open door. The most important
 observances concern the bed itself. The large pillow at the head of the
 bed may not touch the wooden back of the bed. The small pillow for her
 head must lie on the large pillow to form a rhomb; she then places her
 head exactly upon the diagonal of the rhomb. Before covering herself,
 the featherbed must be shaken so that its foot end becomes quite flat,
 but she never omits to press this down and redistribute the thickness.
 
 Allow me to pass over the other trivial incidents of this ritual; they
 would teach us nothing new and cause too great digression from our
 purpose. Do not overlook, however, the fact that all this does not run
 its course quite smoothly. Everything is pervaded by the anxiety that
 things have not been done properly; they must be examined, repeated. Her
 doubts seize first on one, then on another precaution, and the result is
 that one or two hours elapse during which the girl cannot and the
 intimidated parents dare not sleep.
 
 These torments were not so easily analyzed as the compulsive act of our
 former patient. In the working out of the interpretations I had to hint
 and suggest to the girl, and was met on her part either by positive
 denial or mocking doubt. This first reaction of denial, however, was
 followed by a time when she occupied herself of her own accord with the
 possibilities that had been suggested, noted the associations they
 called out, produced reminiscences, and established connections, until
 through her own efforts she had reached and accepted all
 interpretations. In so far as she did this, she desisted as well from
 the performance of her compulsive rules, and even before the treatment
 had ended she had given up the entire ritual. You must also know that
 the nature of present-day analysis by no means enables us to follow out
 each individual symptom until its meaning becomes clear. Rather it is
 necessary to abandon a given theme again and again, yet with the
 certainty that we will be led back to it in some other connection. The
 interpretation of the symptoms in this case, which I am about to give
 you, is a synthesis of results, which, with the interruptions of other
 work, needed weeks and months for their compilation.
 
 Our patient gradually learns to understand that she has banished clocks
 and watches from her room during the night because the clock is the
 symbol of the female genital. The clock, which we have learned to
 interpret as a symbol for other things also, receives this role of the
 genital organ through its relation to periodic occurrences at equal
 intervals. A woman may for instance be found to boast that her
 menstruation is as regular as clockwork. The special fear of our
 patient, however, was that the ticking of the clock would disturb her
 in her sleep. The ticking of the clock may be compared to the throbbing
 of the clitoris during sexual excitement. Frequently she had actually
 been awakened by this painful sensation and now this fear of an erection
 of the clitoris caused her to remove all ticking clocks during the
 night. Flowerpots and vases are, as are all vessels, also female
 symbols. The precaution, therefore, that they should not fall and break
 at night, was not without meaning. We know the widespread custom of
 breaking a plate or dish when an engagement is celebrated. The fragment
 of which each guest possesses himself symbolizes his renunciation of his
 claim to the bride, a renunciation which we may assume as based on the
 monogamous marriage law. Furthermore, to this part of her ceremonial our
 patient adds a reminiscence and several associations. As a child she had
 slipped once and fallen with a bowl of glass or clay, had cut her
 finger, and bled violently. As she grew up and learned the facts of
 sexual intercourse, she developed the fear that she might not bleed
 during her bridal night and so not prove to be a virgin. Her precaution
 against the breaking of vases was a rejection of the entire virginity
 complex, including the bleeding connected with the first cohabitation.
 She rejected both the fear to bleed and the contradictory fear not to
 bleed. Indeed her precautions had very little to do with a prevention of
 noise.
 
 One day she guessed the central idea of her ceremonial, when she
 suddenly understood her rule not to let the pillow come in contact with
 the bed. The pillows always had seemed a woman to her, the erect back of
 the bed a man. By means of magic, we may say, she wished to keep apart
 man and wife; it was her parents she wished to separate, so to prevent
 their marital intercourse. She had sought to attain the same end by more
 direct methods in earlier years, before the institution of her
 ceremonial. She had simulated fear or exploited a genuine timidity in
 order to keep open the door between the parents' bedroom and the
 nursery. This demand had been retained in her present ceremonial. Thus
 she had gained the opportunity of overhearing her parents, a proceeding
 which at one time subjected her to months of sleeplessness. Not content
 with this disturbance to her parents, she was at that time occasionally
 able to gain her point and sleep between father and mother in their
 very bed. Then "pillow" and "wooden wall" could really not come in
 contact. Finally when she became so big that her presence between the
 parents could not longer be borne comfortably, she consciously simulated
 fear and actually succeeded in changing places with her mother and
 taking her place at her father's side. This situation was undoubtedly
 the starting point for the phantasies, whose after-effects made
 themselves felt in her ritual.
 
 If a pillow represented a woman, then the shaking of the featherbed till
 all the feathers were lumped at one end, rounding it into a prominence,
 must have its meaning also. It meant the impregnation of the wife; the
 ceremonial, however, never failed to provide for the annulment, of this
 pregnancy by the flattening down of the feathers. Indeed, for years our
 patient had feared that the intercourse between her parents might result
 in another child which would be her rival. Now, where the large pillow
 represents a woman, the mother, then the small pillow could be nothing
 but the daughter. Why did this pillow have to be placed so as to form a
 rhomb; and why did the girl's head have to rest exactly upon the
 diagonal? It was easy to remind the patient that the rhomb on all walls
 is the rune used to represent the open female genital. She herself then
 played the part of the man, the father, and her head took the place of
 the male organ. (Cf. the symbol of beheading to represent castration.)
 
 Wild ideas, you will say, to run riot in the head of a virgin girl. I
 admit it, but do not forget that I have not created these ideas but
 merely interpreted them. A sleep ritual of this kind is itself very
 strange, and you cannot deny the correspondence between the ritual and
 the phantasies that yielded us the interpretation. For my part I am most
 anxious that you observe in this connection that no single phantasy was
 projected in the ceremonial, but a number of them had to be
 integrated,--they must have their nodal points somewhere in space.
 Observe also that the observance of the ritual reproduce the sexual
 desire now positively, now negatively, and serve in part as their
 rejection, again as their representation.
 
 It would be possible to make a better analysis of this ritual by
 relating it to other symptoms of the patient. But we cannot digress in
 that direction. Let the suggestion suffice that the girl is subject to
 an erotic attachment to her father, the beginning of which goes back to
 her earliest childhood. That perhaps is the reason for her unfriendly
 attitude toward her mother. Also we cannot escape the fact that the
 analysis of this symptom again points to the sexual life of the patient.
 The more we penetrate to the meaning and purpose of neurotic symptoms,
 the less surprising will this seem to us.
 
 By means of two selected illustrations I have demonstrated to you that
 neurotic symptoms carry just as much meaning as do errors and the dream,
 and that they are intimately connected with the experience of the
 patient. Can I expect you to believe this vitally significant statement
 on the strength of two examples? No. But can you expect me to cite
 further illustrations until you declare yourself convinced? That too is
 impossible, since considering the explicitness with which I treat each
 individual case, I would require a five-hour full semester course for
 the explanation of this one point in the theory of the neuroses. I must
 content myself then with having given you one proof for my assertion and
 refer you for the rest to the literature of the subject, above all to
 the classical interpretation of symptoms in Breuer's first case
 (hysteria) as well as to the striking clarification of obscure symptoms
 in the so-called dementia praecox by C. G. Jung, dating from the time
 when this scholar was still content to be a mere psychoanalyst--and did
 not yet want to be a prophet; and to all the articles that have
 subsequently appeared in our periodicals. It is precisely investigations
 of this sort which are plentiful. Psychoanalysts have felt themselves so
 much attracted by the analysis, interpretation and translation of
 neurotic symptoms, that by contrast they seem temporarily to have
 neglected other problems of neurosis.
 
 Whoever among you takes the trouble to look into the matter will
 undoubtedly be deeply impressed by the wealth of evidential material.
 But he will also encounter difficulties. We have learned that the
 meaning of a symptom is found in its relation to the experience of the
 patient. The more highly individualized the symptom is, the sooner we
 may hope to establish these relations. Therefore the task resolves
 itself specifically into the discovery for every nonsensical idea and
 useless action of a past situation wherein the idea had been justified
 and the action purposeful. A perfect example for this kind of symptom is
 the compulsive act of our patient who ran to the table and rang for the
 maid. But there are symptoms of a very different nature which are by no
 means rare. They must be called typical symptoms of the disease, for
 they are approximately alike in all cases, in which the individual
 differences disappear or shrivel to such an extent that it is difficult
 to connect them with the specific experiences of the patient and to
 relate them to the particular situations of his past. Let us again
 direct our attention to the compulsion neurosis. The sleep ritual of our
 second patient is already quite typical, but bears enough individual
 features to render possible what may be called an _historic_
 interpretation. But all compulsive patients tend to repeat, to isolate
 their actions from others and to subject them to a rhythmic sequence.
 Most of them wash too much. Agoraphobia (topophobia, fear of spaces), a
 malady which is no longer grouped with the compulsion neurosis, but is
 now called anxiety hysteria, invariably shows the same pathological
 picture; it repeats with exhausting monotony the same feature, the
 patient's fear of closed spaces, of large open squares, of long
 stretched streets and parkways, and their feeling of safety when
 acquaintances accompany them, when a carriage drives after them, etc. On
 this identical groundwork, however, the individual differences between
 the patients are superimposed--moods one might almost call them, which
 are sharply contrasted in the various cases. The one fears only narrow
 streets, the other only wide ones, the one can go out walking only when
 there are few people abroad, the other when there are many. Hysteria
 also, aside from its wealth of individual features, has a superfluity of
 common typical symptoms that appear to resist any facile historical
 methods of tracing them. But do not let us forget that it is by these
 typical symptoms that we get our bearings in reaching a diagnosis. When,
 in one case of hysteria we have finally traced back a typical symptom to
 an experience or a series of similar experiences, for instance followed
 back an hysterical vomiting to its origin in a succession of disgust
 impressions, another case of vomiting will confuse us by revealing an
 entirely different chain of experiences, seemingly just as effective. It
 seems almost as though hysterical patients must vomit for some reason as
 yet unknown, and that the historic factors, revealed by analysis, are
 chance pretexts, seized on as opportunity best offered to serve the
 purposes of a deeper need.
 
 Thus we soon reach the discouraging conclusion that although we can
 satisfactorily explain the individual neurotic symptom by relating it to
 an experience, our science fails us when it comes to the typical
 symptoms that occur far more frequently. In addition, remember that I am
 not going into all the detailed difficulties which come up in the course
 of resolutely hunting down an historic interpretation of the symptom. I
 have no intention of doing this, for though I want to keep nothing from
 you, and so paint everything in its true colors, I still do not wish to
 confuse and discourage you at the very outset of our studies. It is true
 that we have only begun to understand the interpretation of symptoms,
 but we wish to hold fast to the results we have achieved, and struggle
 forward step by step toward the mastery of the still unintelligible
 data. I therefore try to cheer you with the thought that a fundamental
 between the two kinds of symptoms can scarcely be assumed. Since the
 individual symptoms are so obviously dependent upon the experience of
 the patient, there is a possibility that the typical symptoms revert to
 an experience that is in itself typical and common to all humanity.
 Other regularly recurring features of neurosis, such as the repetition
 and doubt of the compulsion neurosis, may be universal reactions which
 are forced upon the patient by the very nature of the abnormal change.
 In short, we have no reason to be prematurely discouraged; we shall see
 what our further results will yield.
 
 We meet a very similar difficulty in the theory of dreams, which in our
 previous discussion of the dream I could not go into. The manifest
 content of dreams is most profuse and individually varied, and I have
 shown very explicitly what analysis may glean from this content. But
 side by side with these dreams there are others which may also be termed
 "typical" and which occur similarly in all people. These are dreams of
 identical content which offer the same difficulties for their
 interpretation as the typical symptom. They are the dreams of falling,
 flying, floating, swimming, of being hemmed in, of nakedness, and
 various other anxiety dreams that yield first one and then another
 interpretation for the different patients, without resulting in an
 explanation of their monotonous and typical recurrence. In the matter
 of these dreams also, we see a fundamental groundwork enriched by
 individual additions. Probably they as well can be fitted into the
 theory of dream life, built up on the basis of other dreams,--not
 however by straining the point, but by the gradual broadening of our
 views.
 
 
 
 
 EIGHTEENTH LECTURE
 
 GENERAL THEORY OF THE NEUROSES
 
 _Traumatic Fixation--The Unconscious_
 
 
 I said last time that we would not continue our work from the standpoint
 of our doubts, but on the basis of our results. We have not even touched
 upon two of the most interesting conclusions, derived equally from the
 same two sample analyses.
 
 In the first place, both patients give us the impression of being
 _fixated_ upon some very definite part of their past; they are unable to
 free themselves therefrom, and have therefore come to be completely
 estranged both from the present and the future. They are now isolated in
 their ailment, just as in earlier days people withdrew into monasteries
 there to carry along the burden of their unhappy fates. In the case of
 the first patient, it is her marriage with her husband, really
 abandoned, that has determined her lot. By means of her symptoms she
 continues to deal with her husband; we have learned to understand those
 voices which plead his case, which excuse him, exalt him, lament his
 loss. Although she is young and might be coveted by other men, she has
 seized upon all manner of real and imaginary (magic) precautions to
 safeguard her virtue for him. She will not appear before strangers, she
 neglects her personal appearance; furthermore, she cannot bring herself
 to get up readily from any chair on which she has been seated. She
 refuses to give her signature, and finally, since she is motivated by
 her desire not to let anyone have anything of hers, she is unable to
 give presents.
 
 In the case of the second patient, the young girl, it is an erotic
 attachment for her father that had established itself in the years prior
 to puberty, which plays the same role in her life. She also has arrived
 at the conclusion that she may not marry so long as she is sick. We may
 suspect she became ill in order that she need not marry, and that she
 might stay with her father.
 
 It is impossible to evade the question of how, in what manner, and
 driven by what motives, an individual may come by such a remarkable and
 unprofitable attitude toward life. Granted of course that this bearing
 is a general characteristic of neurosis, and not a special peculiarity
 of these two cases, it is nevertheless a general trait in every neurosis
 of very great importance in practice. Breuer's first hysterical patient
 was fixated in the same manner upon the time when she nursed her very
 sick father. In spite of her recuperation she has, in certain respects,
 since that time, been done with life; although she remained healthy and
 able, she did not enter on the normal life of women. In every one of our
 patients we may see, by the use of analysis, that in his
 disease-symptoms and their results he has gone back again into a
 definite period of his past. In the majority of cases he even chooses a
 very early phase of his life, sometime a childhood phase, indeed,
 laughable as it may appear, a phase of his very suckling existence.
 
 The closest analogies to these conditions of our neurotics are furnished
 by the types of sickness which the war has just now made so
 frequent--the so-called traumatic neuroses. Even before the war there
 were such cases after railroad collisions and other frightful
 occurrences which endangered life. The traumatic neuroses are,
 fundamentally, not the same as the spontaneous neuroses which we have
 been analysing and treating; moreover, we have not yet succeeded in
 bringing them within our hypotheses, and I hope to be able to make clear
 to you wherein this limitation lies. Yet on one point we may emphasize
 the existence of a complete agreement between the two forms. The
 traumatic neuroses show clear indications that they are grounded in a
 fixation upon the moment of the traumatic disaster. In their dreams
 these patients regularly live over the traumatic situation; where there
 are attacks of an hysterical type, which permit of an analysis, we learn
 that the attack approximates a complete transposition into this
 situation. It is as if these patients had not yet gotten through with
 the traumatic situation, as if it were actually before them as a task
 which was not yet mastered. We take this view of the matter in all
 seriousness; it shows the way to an _economic_ view of psychic
 occurrences. For the expression "traumatic" has no other than an
 economic meaning, and the disturbance permanently attacks the
 management of available energy. The traumatic experience is one which,
 in a very short space of time, is able to increase the strength of a
 given stimulus so enormously that its assimilation, or rather its
 elaboration, can no longer be effected by normal means.
 
 This analogy tempts us to classify as traumatic those experiences as
 well upon which our neurotics appear to be fixated. Thus the possibility
 is held out to us of having found a simple determining factor for the
 neurosis. It would then be comparable to a traumatic disease, and would
 arise from the inability to meet an overpowering emotional experience.
 As a matter of fact this reads like the first formula, by which Breuer
 and I, in 1893-1895, accounted theoretically for our new observations. A
 case such as that of our first patient, the young woman separated from
 her husband, is very well explained by this conception. She was not able
 to get over the unfeasibility of her marriage, and has not been able to
 extricate herself from this trauma. But our very next, that of the girl
 attached to her father, shows us that the formula is not sufficiently
 comprehensive. On the one hand, such baby love of a little girl for her
 father is so usual, and so often outlived that the designation
 "traumatic" would carry no significance; on the other hand, the history
 of the patient teaches us that this first erotic fixation apparently
 passed by harmlessly at the time, and did not again appear until many
 years later in the symptoms of the compulsion neurosis. We see
 complications before us, the existence of a greater wealth of
 determining factors in the disease, but we also suspect that the
 traumatic viewpoint will not have to be given up as wrong; rather it
 will have to subordinate itself when it is fitted into a different
 context.
 
 Here again we must leave the road we have been traveling. For the time
 being, it leads us no further and we have many other things to find out
 before we can go on again. But before we leave this subject let us note
 that the fixation on some particular phase of the past has bearings
 which extend far beyond the neurosis. Every neurosis contains such a
 fixation, but every fixation does not lead to a neurosis, nor fall into
 the same class with neuroses, nor even set the conditions for the
 development of a neurosis. Mourning is a type of emotional fixation on a
 theory of the past, which also brings with it the most complete
 alienation from the present and the future. But mourning is sharply
 distinguished from neuroses that may be designated as pathological forms
 of mourning.
 
 It also happens that men are brought to complete deadlock by a traumatic
 experience that has so completely shaken the foundations on which they
 have built their lives that they give up all interest in the present and
 future, and become completely absorbed in their retrospections; but
 these unhappy persons are not necessarily neurotic. We must not
 overestimate this one feature as a diagnostic for a neurosis, no matter
 how invariable and potent it may be.
 
 Now let us turn to the second conclusion of our analysis, which however
 we will hardly need to limit subsequently. We have spoken of the
 senseless compulsive activities of our first patient, and what intimate
 memories she disclosed as belonging to them; later we also investigated
 the connection between experience and symptom and thus discovered the
 purpose hidden behind the compulsive activity. But we have entirely
 omitted one factor that deserves our whole attention. As long as the
 patient kept repeating the compulsive activity she did not know that it
 was in any way related with the experience in question. The connection
 between the two was hidden from her, she truthfully answered that she
 did not know what compelled her to do this. Once, suddenly, under the
 influence of the cure, she hit upon the connection and was able to tell
 it to us. But still she did not know of the end in the service of which
 she performed the compulsive activities, the purpose to correct a
 painful part of the past and to place the husband, still loved by her,
 upon a higher level. It took quite a long time and a great deal of
 trouble for her to grasp and admit to me that such a motive alone could
 have been the motive force of the compulsive activity.
 
 The relation between the scene after the unhappy bridal night and the
 tender motive of the patient yield what we have called the meaning of
 the compulsive activity. But both the "whence" and the "why" remained
 hidden from her as long as she continued to carry out the compulsive
 act. Psychological processes had been going on within her for which the
 compulsive act found an expression. She could, in a normal frame of
 mind, observe their effect, but none of the psychological antecedents
 of her action had come to the knowledge of her consciousness. She had
 acted in just the same manner as a hypnotized person to whom Bernheim
 had given the injunction that five minutes after his awakening in the
 ward he was to open an umbrella, and he had carried out this order on
 awakening, but could give no motive for his so doing. We have exactly
 such facts in mind when we speak of the existence of _unconscious
 psychological processes_. Let anyone in the world account for these
 facts in a more correct scientific manner, and we will gladly withdraw
 completely our assumption of unconscious psychological processes. Until
 then, however, we shall continue to use this assumption, and when anyone
 wants to bring forward the objection that the unconscious can have no
 reality for science and is a mere makeshift, (_une facon de parler_), we
 must simply shrug our shoulders and reject his incomprehensible
 statement resignedly. A strange unreality which can call out such real
 and palpable effects as a compulsion symptom!
 
 In our second patient we meet with fundamentally the same thing. She had
 created a decree which she must follow: the pillow must not touch the
 head of the bed; yet she does not know how it originated, what its
 meaning is, nor to what motive it owes the source of its power. It is
 immaterial whether she looks upon it with indifference or struggles
 against it, storms against it, determines to overcome it. She must
 nevertheless follow it and carry out its ordinance, though she asks
 herself, in vain, why. One must admit that these symptoms of compulsion
 neurosis offer the clearest evidence for a special sphere of
 psychological activity, cut off from the rest. What else could be back
 of these images and impulses, which appear from one knows not where,
 which have such great resistance to all the influences of an otherwise
 normal psychic life; which give the patient himself the impression that
 here are super-powerful guests from another world, immortals mixing in
 the affairs of mortals. Neurotic symptoms lead unmistakably to a
 conviction of the existence of an unconscious psychology, and for that
 very reason clinical psychiatry, which recognizes only a conscious
 psychology, has no explanation other than that they are present as
 indications of a particular kind of degeneration. To be sure, the
 compulsive images and impulses are not themselves unconscious--no more
 so than the carrying out of the compulsive-acts escapes conscious
 observation. They would not have been symptoms had they not penetrated
 through into consciousness. But their psychological antecedents as
 disclosed by the analysis, the associations into which we place them by
 our interpretations, are unconscious, at least until we have made them
 known to the patient during the course of the analysis.
 
 Consider now, in addition, that the facts established in our two cases
 are confirmed in all the symptoms of all neurotic diseases, that always
 and everywhere the meaning of the symptoms is unknown to the sufferer,
 that analysis shows without fail that these symptoms are derivatives of
 unconscious experiences which can, under various favorable conditions,
 become conscious. You will understand then that in psychoanalysis we
 cannot do without this unconscious psyche, and are accustomed to deal
 with it as with something tangible. Perhaps you will also be able to
 understand how those who know the unconscious only as an idea, who have
 never analyzed, never interpreted dreams, or never translated neurotic
 symptoms into meaning and purpose, are most ill-suited to pass an
 opinion on this subject. Let us express our point of view once more. Our
 ability to give meaning to neurotic symptoms by means of analytic
 interpretation is an irrefutable indication of the existence of
 unconscious psychological processes--or, if you prefer, an irrefutable
 proof of the necessity for their assumption.
 
 But that is not all. Thanks to a second discovery of Breuer's, for which
 he alone deserves credit and which appears to me to be even more
 far-reaching, we are able to learn still more concerning the
 relationship between the unconscious and the neurotic symptom. Not alone
 is the meaning of the symptoms invariably hidden in the unconscious; but
 the very existence of the symptom is conditioned by its relation to this
 unconscious. You will soon understand me. With Breuer I maintain the
 following: Every time we hit upon a symptom we may conclude that the
 patient cherishes definite unconscious experiences which withhold the
 meaning of the symptoms. Vice versa, in order that the symptoms may come
 into being, it is also essential that this meaning be unconscious.
 Symptoms are not built up out of conscious experiences; as soon as the
 unconscious processes in question become conscious, the symptom
 disappears. You will at once recognize here the approach to our therapy,
 a way to make symptoms disappear. It was by these means that Breuer
 actually achieved the recovery of his patient, that is, freed her of her
 symptoms; he found a technique for bringing into her consciousness the
 unconscious experiences that carried the meaning of her symptoms, and
 the symptoms disappeared.
 
 This discovery of Breuer's was not the result of a speculation, but of a
 felicitous observation made possible by the cooperation of the patient.
 You should therefore not trouble yourself to find things you already
 know to which you can compare these occurrences, rather you should
 recognize herein a new fundamental fact which in itself is capable of
 much wider application. Toward this further end permit me to go over
 this ground again in a different way.
 
 The symptom develops as a substitution for something else that has
 remained suppressed. Certain psychological experiences should normally
 have become so far elaborated that consciousness would have attained
 knowledge of them. This did not take place, however, but out of these
 interrupted and disturbed processes, imprisoned in the unconscious, the
 symptom arose. That is to say, something in the nature of an interchange
 had been effected; as often as therapeutic measures are successful in
 again reversing this transposition, psychoanalytic therapy solves the
 problem of the neurotic symptom.
 
 Accordingly, Breuer's discovery still remains the foundation of
 psychoanalytic therapy. The assertion that the symptoms disappear when
 one has made their unconscious connections conscious, has been borne out
 by all subsequent research, although the most extraordinary and
 unexpected complications have been met with in its practical execution.
 Our therapy does its work by means of changing the unconscious into the
 conscious, and is effective only in so far as it has the opportunity of
 bringing about this transformation.
 
 Now we shall make a hasty digression so that you do not by any chance
 imagine that this therapeutic work is too easy. From all we have learned
 so far, the neurosis would appear as the result of a sort of ignorance,
 the incognizance of psychological processes that we should know of. We
 would thus very closely approximate the well-known Socratic teachings,
 according to which evil itself is the result of ignorance. Now the
 experienced physician will, as a rule, discover fairly readily what
 psychic impulses in his several patients have remained unconscious.
 Accordingly it would seem easy for him to cure the patient by imparting
 this knowledge to him and freeing him of his ignorance. At least the
 part played by the unconscious meaning of the symptoms could easily be
 discovered in this manner, and it would only be in dealing with the
 relationship of the symptoms to the experiences of the patient that the
 physician would be handicapped. In the face of these experiences, of
 course, he is the ignorant one of the two, for he did not go through
 these experiences, and must wait until the patient remembers them and
 tells them to him. But in many cases this difficulty could be readily
 overcome. One can question the relatives of the patient concerning these
 experiences, and they will often be in a position to point out those
 that carry any traumatic significance; they may even be able to inform
 the analyst of experiences of which the patient knows nothing because
 they occurred in the very early years of his life. By a combination of
 such means it would seem that the pathogenic ignorance of the patient
 could be cleared up in a short time and without much trouble.
 
 If only that were all! We have made discoveries for which we were at
 first unprepared. Knowing and knowing is not always the same thing;
 there are various kinds of knowing that are psychologically by no means
 comparable. "_Il y a fagots et fagots_,"[39] as Moliere says. The
 knowledge of the physician is not the same as that of the patient and
 cannot bring about the same results. The physician can gain no results
 by transferring his knowledge to the patient in so many words. This is
 perhaps putting it incorrectly, for though the transference does not
 result in dissolving the symptoms, it does set the analysis in motion,
 and calls out an energetic denial, the first sign usually that this has
 taken place. The patient has learned something that he did not know up
 to that time, the meaning of his symptoms, and yet he knows it as little
 as before. So we discover there is more than one kind of ignorance. It
 will require a deepening of our psychological insight to make clear to
 us wherein the difference lies. But our assertion nevertheless remains
 true that the symptoms disappear with the knowledge of their meaning.
 For there is only one limiting condition; the knowledge must be founded
 on an inner change in the patient which can be attained only through
 psychic labors directed toward a definite end. We have here been
 confronted by problems which will soon lead us to the elaboration of a
 dynamics of symptom formation.
 
 I must stop to ask you whether this is not all too vague and too
 complicated? Do I not confuse you by so often retracting my words and
 restricting them, spinning out trains of thought and then rejecting
 them? I should be sorry if this were the case. However, I strongly
 dislike simplification at the expense of truth, and am not averse to
 having you receive the full impression of how many-sided and complicated
 the subject is. I also think that there is no harm done if I say more on
 every point than you can at the moment make use of. I know that every
 hearer and reader arranges what is offered him in his own thoughts,
 shortens it, simplifies it and extracts what he wishes to retain. Within
 a given measure it is true that the more we begin with the more we have
 left. Let me hope that, despite all the by-play, you have clearly
 grasped the essential parts of my remarks, those about the meaning of
 symptoms, about the unconscious, and the relation between the two. You
 probably have also understood that our further efforts are to take two
 directions: first, the clinical problem--to discover how persons become
 sick, how they later on accomplish a neurotic adaptation toward life;
 secondly, a problem of psychic dynamics, the evolution of the neurotic
 symptoms themselves from the prerequisites of the neuroses. We will
 undoubtedly somewhere come on a point of contact for these two problems.
 
 I do not wish to go any further to-day, but since our time is not yet up
 I intend to call your attention to another characteristic of our two
 analyses, namely, the memory gaps or amnesias, whose full appreciation
 will be possible later. You have heard that it is possible to express
 the object of psychoanalytic treatment in a formula: all pathogenic
 unconscious experience must be transposed into consciousness. You will
 perhaps be surprised to learn that this formula can be replaced by
 another: all the memory gaps of the patient must be filled out, his
 amnesias must be abolished. Practically this amounts to the same thing.
 Therefore an important role in the development of his symptoms must be
 accredited to the amnesias of the neurotic. The analysis of our first
 case, however, will hardly justify this valuation of the amnesia. The
 patient has not forgotten the scene from which the compulsion act
 derives--on the contrary, she remembers it vividly, nor is there any
 other forgotten factor which comes into play in the development of these
 symptoms. Less clear, but entirely analogous, is the situation in the
 case of our second patient, the girl with the compulsive ritual. She,
 too, has not really forgotten the behavior of her early years, the fact
 that she insisted that the door between her bedroom and that of her
 parents be kept open, and that she banished her mother out of her place
 in her parents' bed. She recalls all this very clearly, although
 hesitatingly and unwillingly. Only one factor stands out strikingly in
 our first case, that though the patient carries out her compulsive act
 innumerable times, she is not once reminded of its similarity with the
 experience after the bridal-night; nor was this memory even suggested
 when by direct questions she was asked to search for its motivation. The
 same is true of the girl, for in her case not only her ritual, but the
 situation which provoked it, is repeated identically night after night.
 In neither case is there any actual amnesia, no lapse of memory, but an
 association is broken off which should have called out a reproduction, a
 revival in the memory. Such a disturbance is enough to bring on a
 compulsion neurosis. Hysteria, however, shows a different picture, for
 it is usually characterized by most grandiose amnesias. As a rule, in
 the analysis of each hysterical symptom, one is led back to a whole
 chain of impressions which, upon their recovery, are expressly
 designated as forgotten up to the moment. On the one hand this chain
 extends back to the earliest years of life, so that the hysterical
 amnesias may be regarded as the direct continuation of the infantile
 amnesias, which hides the beginnings of our psychic life from those of
 us who are normal. On the other hand, we discover with surprise that the
 most recent experiences of the patient are blurred by these losses of
 memory--that especially the provocations which favored or brought on the
 illness are, if not entirely wiped out by the amnesia, at least
 partially obliterated. Without fail important details have disappeared
 from the general picture of such a recent memory, or are placed by false
 memories. Indeed it happens almost regularly that just before the
 completion of an analysis, certain memories of recent experiences
 suddenly come to light. They had been held back all this time, and had
 left noticeable gaps in the context.
 
 We have pointed out that such a crippling of the ability to recall is
 characteristic of hysteria. In hysteria symptomatic conditions also
 arise (hysterical attacks) which need leave no trace in the memory. If
 these things do not occur in compulsion-neuroses, you are justified in
 concluding that these amnesias exhibit psychological characteristics of
 the hysterical change, and not a general trait of the neuroses. The
 significance of this difference will be more closely limited by the
 following observations. We have combined two things as the meaning of a
 symptom, its "whence," on the one hand, and its "whither" or "why," on
 the other. By these we mean to indicate the impressions and experiences
 whence the symptom arises, and the purpose the symptom serves. The
 "whence" of a symptom is traced back to impressions which have come from
 without, which have therefore necessarily been conscious at some time,
 but which may have sunk into the unconscious--that is, have been
 forgotten. The "why" of the symptom, its tendency, is in every case an
 endopsychic process, developed from within, which may or may not have
 become conscious at first, but could just as readily never have entered
 consciousness at all and have been unconscious from its inception. It
 is, after all, not so very significant that, as happens in the
 hysterias, amnesia has covered over the "whence" of the symptom, the
 experience upon which it is based; for it is the "why," the tendency of
 the symptom, which establishes its dependence on the unconscious, and
 indeed no less so in the compulsion neuroses than in hysteria. In both
 cases the "why" may have been unconscious from the very first.
 
 By thus bringing into prominence the unconscious in psychic life, we
 have raised the most evil spirits of criticism against psychoanalysis.
 Do not be surprised at this, and do not believe that the opposition is
 directed only against the difficulties offered by the conception of the
 unconscious or against the relative inaccessibility of the experiences
 which represent it. I believe it comes from another source. Humanity, in
 the course of time, has had to endure from the hands of science two
 great outrages against its naive self-love. The first was when humanity
 discovered that our earth was not the center of the universe, but only
 a tiny speck in a world-system hardly conceivable in its magnitude. This
 is associated in our minds with the name "Copernicus," although
 Alexandrian science had taught much the same thing. The second occurred
 when biological research robbed man of his apparent superiority under
 special creation, and rebuked him with his descent from the animal
 kingdom, and his ineradicable animal nature. This re-valuation, under
 the influence of Charles Darwin, Wallace and their predecessors, was not
 accomplished without the most violent opposition of their
 contemporaries. But the third and most irritating insult is flung at the
 human mania of greatness by present-day psychological research, which
 wants to prove to the "I" that it is not even master in its own home,
 but is dependent upon the most scanty information concerning all that
 goes on unconsciously in its psychic life. We psychoanalysts were
 neither the first, nor the only ones to announce this admonition to look
 within ourselves. It appears that we are fated to represent it most
 insistently and to confirm it by means of empirical data which are of
 importance to every single person. This is the reason for the widespread
 revolt against our science, the omission of all considerations of
 academic urbanity, and emancipation of the opposition from all
 restraints of impartial logic. We were compelled to disturb the peace of
 the world, in addition, in another manner, of which you will soon come
 to know.
 
 
 
 
 NINETEENTH LECTURE
 
 GENERAL THEORY OF THE NEUROSES
 
 _Resistance and Suppression_
 
 
 In order to progress in our understanding of the neuroses, we need new
 experiences and we are about to obtain two. Both are very remarkable and
 were at the time of their discovery, very surprising. You are, of
 course, prepared for both from our discussions of the past semester.
 
 In the first place: When we undertake to cure a patient, to free him
 from the symptoms of his malady, he confronts us with a vigorous,
 tenacious resistance that lasts during the whole time of the treatment.
 That is so peculiar a fact that we cannot expect much credence for it.
 The best thing is not to mention this fact to the patient's relatives,
 for they never think of it otherwise than as a subterfuge on our part in
 order to excuse the length or the failure of our treatment. The patient,
 moreover, produces all the phenomena of this resistance without even
 recognizing it as such; it is always a great advance to have brought him
 to the point of understanding this conception and reckoning with it.
 Just consider, this patient suffers from his symptoms and causes those
 about him to suffer with him. He is willing, moreover, to take upon
 himself so many sacrifices of time, money, effort and self-denial in
 order to be freed. And yet he struggles, in the very interests of his
 malady, against one who would help him. How improbable this assertion
 must sound! And yet it is so, and if we are reproached with its
 improbability, we need only answer that this fact is not without its
 analogies. Whoever goes to a dentist with an unbearable toothache may
 very well find himself thrusting away the dentist's arm when the man
 makes for his sick tooth with a pair of pincers.
 
 The resistance which the patient shows is highly varied, exceedingly
 subtle, often difficult to recognize, Protean-like in its manifold
 changes of form. It means that the doctor must become suspicious and be
 constantly on his guard against the patient. In psychoanalytic therapy
 we make use, as you know, of that technique which is already familiar to
 you from the interpretation of dreams. We tell the patient that without
 further reflection he should put himself into a condition of calm
 self-observation and that he must then communicate whatever results this
 introspection gives him--feelings, thoughts, reminiscences, in the order
 in which they appear to his mind. At the same time, we warn him
 expressly against yielding to any motive which would induce him to
 choose or exclude any of his thoughts as they arise, in whatever way the
 motive may be couched and however it may excuse him from telling us the
 thought: "that is too unpleasant," or "too indiscreet" for him to tell;
 or "it is too unimportant," or "it does not belong here," "it is
 nonsensical." We impress upon him the fact that he must skim only across
 the surface of his consciousness and must drop the last vestige of a
 critical attitude toward that which he finds. We finally inform him that
 the result of the treatment and above all its length is dependent on the
 conscientiousness with which he follows this basic rule of the analytic
 technique. We know, in fact, from the technique of interpreting dreams,
 that of all the random notions which may occur, those against which such
 doubts are raised are invariably the ones to yield the material which
 leads to the uncovering of the unconscious.
 
 The first reaction we call out by laying down this basic technical rule
 is that the patient directs his entire resistance against it. The
 patient tries in every way to escape its requirements. First he will
 declare that he cannot think of anything, then, that so much comes to
 his mind that it is impossible to seize on anything definite. Then we
 discover with no slight displeasure that he has yielded to this or that
 critical objection, for he betrays himself by the long pauses which he
 allows to occur in his speaking. He then confesses that he really cannot
 bring himself to this, that he is ashamed to; he prefers to let this
 motive get the upper hand over his promise. He may say that he did think
 of something but that it concerns someone else and is for that reason
 exempt. Or he says that what he just thought of is really too trivial,
 too stupid and too foolish. I surely could not have meant that he should
 take such thoughts into account. Thus it goes on, with untold
 variations, in the face of which we continually reiterate that "telling
 everything" really means telling everything.
 
 One can scarcely find a patient who does not make the attempt to reserve
 some province for himself against the intrusion of the analysis. One
 patient, whom I must reckon among the most highly intelligent, thus
 concealed an intimate love relation for weeks; and when he was asked to
 explain this infringement of our inviolable rule, he defended his action
 with the argument that he considered this one thing was his private
 affair. Naturally, analytic treatment cannot countenance such right of
 sanctuary. One might as well try in a city like Vienna to allow an
 exception to be made of great public squares like the Hohe Markt or the
 Stephans Platz and say that no one should be arrested in those
 places--and then attempt to round up some particular wrong-doer. He will
 be found nowhere but in those sanctuaries. I once brought myself around
 to permit such an exception in the case of a man on whose capacity for
 work a great deal depended, and who was bound by his oath of service,
 which forbade him to tell anyone of certain things. To be sure, he was
 satisfied with the results--but not I; I resolved never to repeat such
 an attempt under these conditions.
 
 Compulsion neurotics are exceedingly adept at making this technical rule
 almost useless by bringing to bear all their over-conscientiousness and
 their doubts upon it. Patients suffering from anxiety-hysteria sometimes
 succeed in reducing it to absurdity by producing only notions so remote
 from the thing sought for that analysis is quite unprofitable. But it is
 not my intention to go into the way in which these technical
 difficulties may be met. It is enough to know that finally, by means of
 resolution and perseverance, we do succeed in wresting a certain amount
 of obedience from the patient toward this basic rule of the technique;
 the resistance then makes itself felt in other ways. It appears in the
 form of an intellectual resistance, battles by means of arguments, and
 makes use of all difficulties and improbabilities which a normal yet
 uninstructed thinking is bound to find in the theory of analysis. Then
 we hear from one voice alone the same criticisms and objections which
 thunder about us in mighty chorus in the scientific literature.
 Therefore the critics who shout to us from outside cannot tell us
 anything new. It is a veritable tempest in a teapot. Still the patient
 can be argued with, he is anxious to persuade us to instruct him, to
 teach him, to lead him to the literature, so that he may continue
 working things out for himself. He is very ready to become an adherent
 of psychoanalysis on condition that analysis spare him personally. But
 we recognize this curiosity as a resistance, as a diversion from our
 special objects, and we meet it accordingly. In those patients who
 suffer from compulsion neuroses, we must expect the resistance to
 display special tactics. They frequently allow the analysis to take its
 way, so that it may succeed in throwing more and more light on the
 problems of the case, but we finally begin to wonder how it is that this
 clearing up brings with it no practical progress, no diminution of the
 symptom. Then we may discover that the resistance has entrenched itself
 in the doubts of the compulsion neurosis itself and in this position is
 able successfully to resist our efforts. The patient has said something
 like this to himself: "This is all very nice and interesting. And I
 would be glad to continue it. It would affect my malady considerably if
 it were true. But I don't believe that it is true and as long as I don't
 believe it, it has nothing to do with my sickness." And so it may go on
 for a long time until one finally has shaken this position itself; it is
 then that the decisive battle takes place.
 
 The intellectual resistances are not the worst, one can always get ahead
 of them. But the patient can also put up resistances, within the limits
 of the analysis, whose conquest belongs to the most difficult tasks of
 our technique. Instead of recalling, he actually goes again through the
 attitudes and emotions of his previous life which, by means of the
 so-called "transference," can be utilized as resistances to the
 physician and the treatment. If the patient is a man, he takes this
 material as a rule from his relations to his father, in whose place he
 now puts the physician, and in so doing constructs a resistance out of
 his struggle for independence of person and opinion; out of his ambition
 to equal or to excel his father; out of his unwillingness to assume the
 burden of gratitude a second time in his life. For long times at a
 stretch one receives the impression that the patient desires to put the
 physician in the wrong and to let him feel his helplessness by
 triumphing over him, and that this desire has completely replaced his
 better intention of making an end to his sickness. Women are adepts at
 exploiting, for the purposes of the resistance, a tender, erotically
 tinged transference to the physician. When this leaning attains a
 certain intensity, all interest for the actual situation of the
 treatment is lost, together with every sense of the responsibility which
 was assumed by undertaking it. The never-failing jealousy as well as the
 embitterment over the inevitable repudiation, however gently effected,
 all must serve to spoil the personal understanding between patient and
 physician and thus to throw out one of the most powerful propelling
 forces of the analysis.
 
 Resistances of this sort must not be narrow-mindedly condemned. They
 contain so much of the most important material of the patient's past and
 reproduce it in such a convincing manner, that they become of the
 greatest aid to the analysis, if a skillful technique is able to turn
 them in the right direction. It is only remarkable that this material is
 at first always in the service of the resistance, for which it serves as
 a barrier against the treatment. One can also say that here are traits
 of character, adjustments of the ego which were mobilized in order to
 defeat the attempted change. We are thus able to learn how these traits
 arose under the conditions of the neurosis, as a reaction to its
 demands, and to see features more clearly in this character which could
 otherwise not have shown up so clearly or at least not to this extent,
 and which one may therefore designate as latent. You must also not get
 the impression that we see an unforeseen endangering of the analytic
 influence in the appearance of these resistances. On the contrary, we
 know that these resistances must come to light; we are dissatisfied only
 when we do not provoke them in their full strength and so make them
 plain to the patient Indeed, we at last understand that overcoming these
 resistances is the essential achievement of analysis and is that portion
 of the work which alone assures us that we have accomplished something
 with the patient.
 
 You must also take into account the fact that any accidental occurrences
 which arise during the treatment will be made use of by the patient as a
 disturbance--every diverting incident, every statement about analysis
 from an inimical authority in his circle, any chance illness or any
 organic affection which complicates the neurosis; indeed, he even uses
 every improvement of his condition as a motive for abating his efforts.
 You will then have gained an approximate, though still an incomplete
 picture of the forms and devices of the resistance which must be met
 and overcome in the course of every analysis. I have given this point
 such detailed consideration because I am about to inform you that our
 dynamic conception of the neurosis is based on this experience with the
 resistance of neurotic patients against the banishment of their
 symptoms. Breuer and I both originally practiced psycho-therapy by means
 of hypnosis. Breuer's first patient was treated throughout under a
 condition of hypnotic suggestibility, and I at first followed his
 example. I admit that my work at that time progressed easily and
 agreeably and also took much less time. But the results were capricious
 and not permanent; therefore I finally gave up hypnotism. Then only did
 I realize that no insight into the forces which produce these diseases
 was possible as long as one used hypnotism. The condition of hypnosis
 could prevent the physician from realizing the existence of a
 resistance. Hypnosis drives back the resistance and frees a certain
 field for the work of analysis, but similarly to the doubt in the
 compulsion neurosis, in so doing it clogs the boundaries of this field
 till they become impenetrable. That is why I can say that true
 psychoanalysis began when the help of hypnotism was renounced.
 
 But if the establishment of the resistance thus becomes a matter of such
 importance, then surely we must give our caution full rein, and follow
 up any doubts as to whether we are not all too ready in our assumption
 of their existence. Perhaps there really are neurotic cases in which
 associations appear for other reasons, perhaps the arguments against our
 hypothesis really deserve more consideration and we are unjustified in
 conveniently rejecting all intellectual criticisms of analysis as a
 resistance. Indeed, ladies and gentlemen, but our judgment was by no
 means readily arrived at. We had opportunity to observe every critical
 patient from the first sign of the resistance till after its
 disappearance. In the course of the treatment, the resistance is
 moreover constantly changing in intensity. It is always on the increase
 as we approach a new theme, is strongest at the height of its
 elaboration, and dies down again when this theme has been abandoned.
 Furthermore, unless we have made some unusual and awkward technical
 error, we never have to deal with the full measure of resistance of
 which the patient is capable. We could therefore convince ourselves that
 the same man took up and discarded his critical attitude innumerable
 times in the course of the analysis. Whenever we are on the point of
 bringing before his consciousness some piece of unconscious material
 which is especially painful to him, then he is critical in the extreme.
 Even though he had previously understood and accepted a great deal,
 nevertheless all record of these gains seems now to have been wiped out.
 He may, in his desire to resist at any cost, present a picture of
 veritable emotional feeblemindedness. If one succeeds in helping him to
 overcome this new resistance, then he regains his insight and his
 understanding. Thus his criticism is not an independent function to be
 respected as such; it plays the role of handy-man to his emotional
 attitude and is guided by his resistance. If something displeases him,
 he can defend himself against it very ingeniously and appear most
 critical. But if something strikes his fancy, then he may show himself
 easily convinced. Perhaps none of us are very different, and the patient
 under analysis shows this dependence of the intellect on the emotional
 life so plainly only because, under the analysis, he is so hard pressed.
 
 In what way shall we now account for the observation that the patient so
 energetically resists our attempts to rid him of his symptoms and to
 make his psychic processes function in a normal way? We tell ourselves
 that we have here come up against strong forces which oppose any change
 in the condition; furthermore, that these forces must be identical with
 those which originally brought about the condition. Some process must
 have been functional in the building up of these symptoms, a process
 which we can now reconstruct by means of our experiences in solving the
 meaning of the symptoms. We already know from Breuer's observations that
 the existence of a symptom presupposes that some psychic process was not
 carried to its normal conclusion, so that it could not become conscious.
 The symptom is the substitute for that which did not take place. Now we
 know where the forces whose existence we suspect must operate. Some
 violent antagonism must have been aroused to prevent the psychic process
 in question from reaching consciousness, and it therefore remained
 unconscious. As an unconscious thought it had the power to create a
 symptom. The same struggle during the analytic treatment opposes anew
 the efforts to carry this unconscious thought over into consciousness.
 This process we felt as a resistance. That pathogenic process which is
 made evident to us through the resistance, we will name _repression_.
 
 We are now ready to obtain a more definite idea of this process of
 repression. It is the preliminary condition for the formation of
 symptoms; it is also a thing for which we have no parallel. If we take
 as prototype an impulse, a psychological process which is striving to
 convert itself into action, we know that it may succumb before a
 rejection, which we call "repudiation" or "condemnation." In the course
 of this struggle, the energy which the impulse had at its disposal was
 withdrawn from it, it becomes powerless; yet it may subsist in the form
 of a memory. The whole process of decision occurs with the full
 knowledge of the ego. The state of affairs is very different if we
 imagine that this same impulse has been subjected to repression. In that
 case, it would retain its energy and there would be no memory of it
 left; in addition, the process of repression would be carried out
 without the knowledge of the ego. Through this comparison, however, we
 have come no nearer understanding the nature of repression.
 
 I now go into the theoretical ideas which alone have shown themselves
 useful in making the conception of repression more definite. It is above
 all necessary that we progress from a purely descriptive meaning of the
 word "unconscious" to its more systematic meaning; that is, we come to a
 point where we must call the consciousness or unconsciousness of a
 psychic process only one of its attributes, an attribute which is,
 moreover, not necessarily unequivocal. If such a process remained
 unconscious, then this separation from consciousness is perhaps only an
 indication of the fate to which it has submitted and not this fate
 itself. To bring this home to us more vividly, let us assume that every
 psychological process--with one exception, which I will go into
 later--first exists in an unconscious state or phase and only goes over
 from this into a conscious phase, much as a photographic picture is
 first a negative and then becomes a picture by being printed. But not
 every negative need become a positive, and just as little is it
 necessary that every unconscious psychological process should be changed
 into a conscious one. We find it advantageous to express ourselves as
 follows: Any particular process belongs in the first place to the
 psychological system of the unconscious; from this system it can under
 certain conditions go over into the system of the conscious. The crudest
 conception of these systems is the one which is most convenient for us,
 namely, a representation in space. We will compare the system of the
 unconscious to a large ante-chamber, in which the psychic impulses rub
 elbows with one another, as separate beings. There opens out of this
 ante-chamber another, a smaller room, a sort of parlor, which
 consciousness occupies. But on the threshold between the two rooms there
 stands a watchman; he passes on the individual psychic impulses, censors
 them, and will not let them into the parlor if they do not meet with his
 approval. You see at once that it makes little difference whether the
 watchman brushes a single impulse away from the threshold, or whether he
 drives it out again after it has already entered the parlor. It is a
 question here only of the extent of his watchfulness, and the timeliness
 of his judgment. Still working with this simile, we proceed to a further
 elaboration of our nomenclature. The impulses in the ante-chamber of the
 unconscious cannot be seen by the conscious, which is in the other room;
 therefore for the time being they must remain unconscious. When they
 have succeeded in pressing forward to the threshold, and have been sent
 back by the watchman, then they are unsuitable for consciousness and we
 call them _suppressed_. Those impulses, however, which the watchman has
 permitted to cross the threshold have not necessarily become conscious;
 for this can happen only if they have been successful in attracting to
 themselves the glance of the conscious. We therefore justifiably call
 this second room the system of the _fore-conscious_. In this way the
 process of becoming conscious retains its purely descriptive sense.
 Suppression then, for any individual impulse, consists in not being able
 to get past the watchman from the system of the unconscious to that of
 the fore-conscious. The watchman himself is long since known to us; we
 have met him as the resistance which opposed us when we attempted to
 release the suppression through analytic treatment.
 
 Now I know you will say that these conceptions are as crude as they are
 fantastic, and not at all permissible in a scientific discussion. I know
 they are crude--indeed, we even know that they are incorrect, and if we
 are not very much mistaken we have a better substitute for them in
 readiness. Whether they will continue then to appear so fantastic to you
 I do not know. For the time being, they are useful conceptions, similar
 to the manikin _Ampere_ who swims in the stream of the electric current.
 In so far as they are helpful in the understanding of our observation,
 they are by no means to be despised. I should like to assure you that
 these crude assumptions go far in approximating the actual
 situation--the two rooms, the watchman on the threshold between the two,
 and consciousness at the end of the second room in the role of an
 onlooker. I should also like to hear you admit that our
 designations--_unconscious_, _fore-conscious_, and _conscious_ are much
 less likely to arouse prejudice, and are easier to justify than others
 that have been used or suggested--such as _sub-conscious_,
 _inter-conscious_, _between-conscious_, etc.
 
 This becomes all the more important to me if you should warn me that
 this arrangement of the psychic apparatus, such as I have assumed in the
 explanation of neurotic symptoms, must be generally applicable and must
 hold for normal functioning as well. In that, of course, you are right.
 We cannot follow this up at present, but our interest in the psychology
 of the development of the symptom must be enormously increased if
 through the study of pathological conditions we have the prospect of
 finding a key to the normal psychic occurrences which have been so well
 concealed.
 
 You will probably recognize what it is that supports our assumptions
 concerning these two systems and their relation to consciousness. The
 watchman between the unconscious and the fore-conscious is none other
 than the censor under whose control we found the manifest dream to
 obtain its form. The residue of the day's experiences, which we found
 were the stimuli which set off the dream, are fore-conscious materials
 which at night, during sleep, had come under the influence of
 unconscious and suppressed wishes. Borne along by the energy of the
 wish, these stimuli were able to build the latent dream. Under the
 control of the unconscious system this material was worked over, went
 through an elaboration and displacement such as the normal psychic life
 or, better said, the fore-conscious system, either does not know at all
 or tolerates only exceptionally. In our eyes the characteristics of each
 of the two systems were betrayed by this difference in their
 functioning. The dependent relation between the fore-conscious and the
 conscious was to us only an indication that it must belong to one of the
 two systems. The dream is by no means a pathological phenomenon; it may
 appear in every healthy person under the conditions of sleep. Any
 assumption as to the structure of the psychic apparatus which covers the
 development of both the dream and the neurotic symptom has also an
 undeniable claim to be taken into consideration in any theory of normal
 psychic life.
 
 So much, then, for suppression. It is, however, only a prerequisite for
 the evolution of the symptom. We know that the symptom serves as a
 substitute for a process kept back by suppression. Yet it is no simple
 matter to bridge this gap between the suppression and the evolution of
 the substitute. We have first to answer several questions on other
 aspects of the problem concerning the suppression and its
 substantiation: What kind of psychological stimuli are at the basis of
 the suppression; by what forces is it achieved; for what motives? On
 these matters we have only one insight that we can go by. We learned in
 the investigation of resistance that it grows out of the forces of the
 "I," in other words from obvious and latent traits of character. It must
 be from the same traits also that suppression derived support; at least
 they played a part in its development. All further knowledge is still
 withheld from us.
 
 A second observation, for which I have already prepared, will help us
 further at this point. By means of analysis we can assign one very
 general purpose to the neurotic symptom. This is of course nothing new
 to you. I have already shown it to you in the two cases of neuroses.
 But, to be sure, what is the significance of two cases! You have the
 right to demand that it be shown to you innumerable times. But I am
 unable to do this. Here again your own experience must step in, or your
 belief, which may in this matter rely upon the unanimous account of all
 psychoanalysts.
 
 You will remember that in these two cases, whose symptoms we subjected
 to searching investigation, the analysis introduced us to the most
 intimate sexual life of these patients. In the first case, moreover, we
 could identify with unusual clearness the purpose or tendency of the
 symptoms under investigation. Perhaps in the second case it was
 slightly covered by another factor--one we will consider later. Now, the
 same thing that we saw in these two examples we would see in all other
 cases that we subjected to analysis. Each time, through analysis, we
 would be introduced to the sexual wishes and experiences of the patient,
 and every time we would have to conclude that their symptoms served the
 same purpose. This purpose shows itself to be the satisfaction of sexual
 wishes; the symptoms serve as a sexual satisfaction for the patient,
 they are a substitute for such satisfactions as they miss in reality.
 
 Recall the compulsive act of our first patient. The woman longs for her
 intensely beloved husband, with whom she cannot share her life because
 of his shortcoming and weaknesses. She feels she must remain true to
 him, she can give his place to no one else. Her compulsive symptom
 affords her that for which she pines, ennobles her husband, denies and
 corrects his weaknesses,--above all, his impotence. This symptom is
 fundamentally a wish-fulfillment, exactly as is a dream; moreover, it is
 what a dream not always is, an erotic wish-fulfillment. In the case of
 our second patient you can see that one of the component purposes of her
 ceremonial was the prevention of the intercourse of her parents or the
 hindrance of the creation of a new child thereby. You have perhaps also
 guessed that essentially she strove to put herself in the place of her
 mother. Here again we find the removal of disturbances to sexual
 satisfaction and the fulfillment of personal sexual wishes. We shall
 soon turn to the complications of whose existence we have given you
 several indications.
 
 I do not want to make reservations as to the universal applicability of
 these declarations later on, and therefore I wish to call to your
 attention the fact that everything that I say here about suppression,
 symptom-development and symptom-interpretation has been learned from
 three types of neuroses--anxiety-hysteria, conversion-hysteria, and
 compulsion-neuroses--and for the time being is relevant to these forms
 only. These three conditions, which we are in the habit of combining
 into one group under the name of "_transference neuroses_," also limit
 the field open to psychoanalytic therapy. The other neuroses have not
 been nearly so well studied by psychoanalysis,--in one group, in fact,
 the impossibility of therapeutic influence has been the reason for the
 neglect. But you must not forget that psychoanalysis is still a very
 young science, that it demands much time and care in preparation for it,
 that not long ago it was still in the cradle, so to speak. Yet at all
 points we are about to penetrate into the understanding of those other
 conditions which are not transference neuroses. I hope I shall still be
 able to speak to you of the developments that our assumptions and
 results have undergone by being correlated with this new material, and
 to show you that these further studies have not led to contradictions
 but rather to the production of still greater uniformity. Granted that
 everything, then, that has been said here, holds good for the three
 transference neuroses, allow me to add a new bit of information to the
 evaluation of its symptoms. A comparative investigation into the causes
 of the disease discloses a result that may be confined into the formula:
 in some way or other these patients fell ill through _self-denial_ when
 reality withheld from them the satisfaction of their sexual wishes. You
 recognize how excellently well these two results are found to agree. The
 symptoms must be understood, then, as a substitute satisfaction for that
 which is missed in life.
 
 To be sure, there are all kinds of objections possible to the
 declaration that neurotic symptoms are substitutes for sexual
 satisfaction. I shall still go into two of them today. If you yourself
 have analytically examined a fairly large number of neurotics you will
 perhaps gravely inform me that in one class of cases this is not at all
 applicable, the symptoms appear rather to have the opposite purpose, to
 exclude sexual satisfaction, or discontinue it. I shall not deny the
 correctness of your interpretation. The psychoanalytic content has a
 habit of being more complicated than we should like to have it. Had it
 been so simple, perhaps we should have had no need for psychoanalysis to
 bring it to light. As a matter of fact, some of the traits of the
 ceremonial of our second patient may be recognized as of this ascetic
 nature, inimical to sexual satisfaction; for example, the fact that she
 removes the clocks, which have the magic qualities of preventing nightly
 erections, or that she tries to prevent the falling and breaking of
 vessels, which symbolizes a protection of her virginity. In other cases
 of bed-ceremonials which I was able to analyze, this negative character
 was far more evident; the ceremonial might consist throughout of
 protective regulations against sexual recollections and temptations. On
 the other hand, we have often discovered in psychoanalysis that
 opposites do not mean contradictions. We might extend our assertion and
 say the symptoms purpose either a sexual satisfaction or a guard against
 it; that in hysteria the positive wish-fulfillment takes precedence,
 while in the compulsion neuroses the negative, ascetic characteristics
 have the ascendancy. We have not yet been able to speak of that aspect
 of the mechanism of the symptoms, their two-sidedness, or polarity,
 which enables them to serve this double purpose, both the sexual
 satisfaction and its opposite. The symptoms are, as we shall see,
 compromise results, arising from the integration of two opposed
 tendencies; they represent not only the suppressed force but also the
 suppressing factor, which was originally potent in bringing about the
 negation. The result may then favor either one side or the other, but
 seldom is one of the influences entirely lacking. In cases of hysteria,
 the meeting of the two purposes in the same symptom is most often
 achieved. In compulsion-neuroses, the two parts often become distinct;
 the symptom then has a double meaning, it consists of two actions, one
 following the other, one releasing the other. It will not be so easy to
 put aside a further misgiving. If you should look over a large number of
 symptom-interpretations, you would probably judge offhand that the
 conception of a sexual substitute-satisfaction has been stretched to its
 utmost limits in these cases. You will not hesitate to emphasize that
 these symptoms offer nothing in the way of actual satisfaction, that
 often enough they are limited to giving fresh life to sensations or
 phantasies from some sexual complex. Further, you will declare that the
 apparent sexual satisfaction so often shows a childish and unworthy
 character, perhaps approximates an act of onanism, or is reminiscent of
 filthy naughtiness, habits that are already forbidden and broken in
 childhood. Finally, you will express your surprise that one should
 designate as a sexual satisfaction appetites which can only be described
 as horrible or ghastly, even unnatural. As to these last points, we
 shall come to no agreement until we have submitted man's sexual life to
 a thorough investigation, and thus ascertained what one is justified in
 calling sexual.
 
 
 
 
 TWENTIETH LECTURE
 
 GENERAL THEORY OF THE NEUROSES
 
 _The Sexual Life of Man_
 
 
 One might think we could take for granted what we are to understand by
 the term "sexual." Of course, the sexual is the indecent, which we must
 not talk about. I have been told that the pupils of a famous
 psychiatrist once took the trouble to convince their teacher that the
 symptoms of hysteria very frequently represent sexual matters. With this
 intention they took him to the bedside of a woman suffering from
 hysteria, whose attacks were unmistakable imitations of the act of
 delivery. He, however, threw aside their suggestion with the remark, "a
 delivery is nothing sexual." Assuredly, a delivery need not under all
 circumstances be indecent.
 
 I see that you take it amiss that I jest about such serious matters. But
 this is not altogether a jest. In all seriousness, it is not altogether
 easy to define the concept "sexual." Perhaps the only accurate
 definition would be everything that is connected with the difference
 between the two sexes; but this you may find too general and too
 colorless. If you emphasize the sexual act as the central factor, you
 might say that everything is sexual which seeks to obtain sensual
 excitement from the body and especially from the sexual organs of the
 opposite sex, and which aims toward the union of the genitals and the
 performance of the sexual act. But then you are really very close to the
 comparison of sexual and indecent, and the act of delivery is not
 sexual. But if you think of the function of reproduction as the nucleus
 of sexuality you are in danger of excluding a number of things that do
 not aim at reproduction but are certainly sexual, such as onanism or
 even kissing. But we are prepared to realize that attempts at definition
 always lead to difficulties; let us give up the attempt to achieve the
 unusual in our particular case. We may suspect that in the development
 of the concept "sexual" something occurred which resulted in a false
 disguise. On the whole, we are quite well oriented as to what people
 call sexual.
 
 The inclusion of the following factors in our concept "sexual" amply
 suffices for all practical purposes in ordinary life: the contrast
 between the sexes, the attainment of sexual excitement, the function of
 reproduction, the characteristic of an indecency that must be kept
 concealed. But this is no longer satisfactory to science. For through
 careful examinations, rendered possible only by the sacrifices and the
 unselfishness of the subjects, we have come in contact with groups of
 human beings whose sexual life deviates strikingly from the average. One
 group among them, the "perverse," have, as it were, crossed off the
 difference between the sexes from their program. Only the same sex can
 arouse their sexual desires; the other sex, even the sexual parts, no
 longer serve as objects for their sexual desires, and in extreme cases,
 become a subject for disgust. They have to that extent, of course,
 foregone any participation in reproduction. We call such persons
 homosexual or inverted. Often, though not always, they are men and women
 of high physical, intellectual and ethical development, who are affected
 only with this one portentous abnormality. Through their scientific
 leaders they proclaim themselves to be a special species of mankind, "a
 third sex," which shares equal rights with the two other sexes. Perhaps
 we shall have occasion to examine their claims critically. Of course
 they are not, as they would like to claim, the "elect" of humanity, but
 comprise just as many worthless second-rate individuals as those who
 possess a different sexual organization.
 
 At any rate, this type among the perverse seek to achieve the same ends
 with the object of their desires as do normal people. But in the same
 group there exists a long succession of abnormal individuals whose
 sexual activities are more and more alien to what seems desirable to the
 sensible person. In their manifold strangeness they seem comparable only
 to the grotesque freaks that P. Breughel painted as the temptation of
 Saint Anthony, or the forgotten gods and believers that G. Flaubert
 pictures in the long procession that passes before his pious penitent.
 This ill-assorted array fairly clamors for orderly classification if it
 is not to bewilder our senses. We first divide them, on the one hand,
 into those whose sexual object has changed, as is the case with
 homosexualists, and, on the other, those whose sexual aim has changed.
 Those of the first group have dispensed with the mutual union of the
 genital organs, and have, as one of the partners of the act, replaced
 the genitals by another organ or part of the body; they have thus
 overcome both the short-comings of organic structure and the usual
 disgust involved. There are others of this group who still retain the
 genitals as their object, but not by virtue of their sexual function;
 they participate for anatomic reasons or rather by reason of their
 proximity. By means of these individuals we realize that the functions
 of excretion, which in the education of the child are hushed away as
 indecent, still remain capable of drawing complete sexual interest on
 themselves. There are still others who have relinquished the genitals
 entirely as an objective, have raised another part of the body to serve
 as the goal of their desire; the woman's breast, the foot, the tress of
 hair. There are also the fetishists, to whom the body part means
 nothing, who are gratified by a garment, a piece of white linen, a shoe.
 And finally there are persons who seek the whole object but with certain
 peculiar or horrible demands: even those who covet a defenseless corpse
 for instance, which they themselves must criminally compel to satisfy
 their desire. But enough of these horrors.
 
 Foremost in the second grouping are those perverted ones who have placed
 as the end of their sexual desire performances normally introductory or
 preparatory to it. They satisfy their desire by their eyes and hands.
 They watch or attempt to watch the other individual in his most intimate
 doings, or uncover those portions of their own bodies which they should
 conceal in the vague expectation of being rewarded by a similar
 procedure on the other person's part. Here also belong the enigmatic
 sadists, whose affectionate strivings know no other goal than to cause
 their object pain and agony, varying all the way from humiliating
 suggestions to the harshest physical ill-treatment. As if to balance the
 scale, we have on the other hand the masochists, whose sole satisfaction
 consists in suffering every variety of humiliation and torture, symbolic
 and real, at the hands of the beloved one. There are still others who
 combine and confuse a number of these abnormal conditions. Moreover, in
 both these groups there are those who seek sexual satisfaction in
 reality, and others who are content merely to imagine such
 gratification, who need no actual object at all, but can supplant it by
 their own fantastic creations.
 
 There can be not the least doubt that the sexual activities of these
 individuals are actually found in the absurdities, caprices and horrors
 that we have examined. Not only do they themselves conceive them as
 adequate substitutes, but we must recognize that they take the same
 place in their lives that normal sex gratification occupies in ours, and
 for which they bring the same sacrifices, often incommensurate with
 their ends. It is perfectly possible to trace along broad lines as well
 as in detail in what way these abnormalities follow the normal procedure
 and how they diverge from it. You will also find the characteristic of
 indecency which belongs to the sexual act in these vagaries, only that
 it is therein magnified to the disreputable.
 
 Ladies and gentlemen, what attitude are we to assume to these unusual
 varieties of sex gratification? Nothing at all is achieved by the mere
 expression of indignation and personal disgust and by the assurance that
 we do not share these lusts. That is not our concern. We have here a
 field of observation like any other. Moreover, the evasion that these
 persons are merely rarities, curiosities, is easily refuted. On the
 contrary, we are dealing with very frequent and widespread phenomena.
 If, however, we are told that we must not permit them to influence our
 views on sexual life, since they are all aberrations of the sexual
 instinct, we must meet this with a serious answer. If we fail to
 understand these abnormal manifestations of sexuality and are unable to
 relate them to the normal sexual life, then we cannot understand normal
 sexuality. It is, in short, our unavoidable task to account
 theoretically for all the potentialities of the perversions we have gone
 over and to explain their relation to the so-called normal sexuality.
 
 A penetrating insight due to Ivan Bloch and two new experimental results
 will help us in this task. Bloch takes exception to the point of view
 which sees in a perversion a "sign of degeneration"; he proves that such
 deviations from the aim of the sexual instinct, such loose relations to
 the object of sexuality, have occurred at all times, among the most
 primitive and the most highly civilized peoples, and have occasionally
 achieved toleration and general recognition. The two experimental
 results were obtained in the course of psychoanalytic investigations of
 neurotics; they will undoubtedly exert a decided influence on our
 conceptions of sexual perversion.
 
 We have stated that the neurotic symptoms are substitutions for sexual
 satisfactions, and I have given you to understand that the proof of this
 assertion by means of the analysis of symptoms encounters many
 difficulties. For this statement is only justifiable if, under the term
 "sexual satisfactions," we include the so-called perverse sexual ends,
 since with surprising frequency we find symptoms which can be
 interpreted only in the light of their activity. The claim of rareness
 made by the homosexualists or the inverted immediately collapses when we
 learn that in the case of no single neurotic do we fail to obtain
 evidence of homosexual tendencies, and that in a considerable number of
 symptoms we find the expression of this latent inversion. Those who call
 themselves homosexualists are the conscious and manifest inverts, but
 their number is as nothing before the latent homosexualists. We are
 forced to regard the desire for an object of one's own sex as a
 universal aberration of erotic life and to cede increasing importance to
 it. Of course the differences between manifest homosexuality and the
 normal attitude are not thus erased; their practical importance
 persists, but their theoretic value is greatly decreased. Paranoia, a
 disturbance which cannot be counted among the transference-neuroses,
 must in fact be assumed as arising regularly from the attempt to ward
 off powerful homosexual tendencies. Perhaps you will recall that one of
 our patients under her compulsive symptoms acted the part of a man,
 namely that of her own estranged husband; the production of such
 symptoms, impersonating the actions of men, is very common to neurotic
 women. Though this cannot be ascribed directly to homosexuality, it is
 certainly concerned with its prerequisites.
 
 You are probably acquainted with the fact that the neurosis of hysteria
 may manifest its symptoms in all organic systems and may therefore
 disturb all functions. Analysis shows that in these symptoms there are
 expressed all those tendencies termed perverse, which seek to represent
 the genitals through other organs. These organs behave as substitute
 genitals; through the study of hysteric symptoms we have come to the
 conclusion that aside from their functional activities, the organs of
 the body have a sexual significance, and that the performance of their
 functions is disturbed if the sexual factor claims too much attention.
 Countless sensations and innervations, which appear as symptoms of
 hysteria, in organs apparently not concerned with sexuality, are thus
 discovered as bound up with the fulfillment of perverse sexual desires
 through the transference of sex instincts to other organs. These
 symptoms bring home to us the extent to which the organs used in the
 consumption of food and in excretion may become the bearers of sexual
 excitement. We see repeated here the same picture which the perversions
 have openly and unmistakably lain before us; in hysteria, however, we
 must make the detour of interpreting symptoms, and in this case the
 perverse sexual tendencies must be ascribed not to the conscious but to
 the unconscious life of the individual.
 
 Among the many symptoms manifested in compulsion neurosis, the most
 important are those produced by too powerful sadistic tendencies, i.e.,
 sexual tendencies with perverted aim. These symptoms, in accordance with
 the structure of compulsion neurosis, serve primarily as a rejection of
 these desires, or they express a struggle between satisfaction and
 rejection. In this struggle, the satisfaction is never excessively
 curtailed; it achieves its results in the patient's behavior in a
 roundabout way, by preference turning against his own person in
 self-inflicted torture. Other forms of neurosis, characterized by
 intensive worry, are the expression of an exaggerated sexualization of
 acts that are ordinarily only preparatory to sexual satisfactions; such
 are the desires to see, to touch, to investigate. Here is thus explained
 the great importance of the fear of contact and also of the compulsion
 to wash. An unbelievably large portion of compulsion acts may, in the
 form of disguised repetitions and modifications, be traced back to
 onanism, admittedly the only uniform action which accompanies the most
 varied flights of the sexual imagination.
 
 It would cost me very little effort to interweave far more closely the
 relation between perversion and neurosis, but I believe that what I have
 said is sufficient for our purposes. We must avoid the error of
 overestimating the frequency and intensity of perverse inclinations in
 the light of these interpretations of symptoms. You have heard that a
 neurosis may develop from the denial of normal sexual satisfactions.
 Through this actual denial the need is forced into the abnormal paths
 of sex excitement. You will later obtain a better insight into the way
 this happens. You certainly understand, that through such "_collateral_"
 hindrance, the perverse tendencies must become more powerful than they
 would have been if no actual obstacle had been put in the way of a
 normal sexual satisfaction. As a matter of fact, a similar influence may
 be recognized in manifest perversions. In many cases, they are provoked
 or motivated by the fact that too great difficulties stand in the way of
 normal sexual satisfactions, owing to temporary circumstances or to the
 permanent institutions of society. In other cases, to be sure, the
 perverse tendencies are entirely independent of such conditions; they
 are, as it were, the normal kind of sexual life for the individual in
 question.
 
 Perhaps you are momentarily under the impression that we have confused
 rather than clarified the relation between normal and perverse
 sexuality. But keep in mind this consideration. If it is true that a
 hindrance or withholding of normal sexual satisfaction will bring out
 perverse tendencies in persons who have not previously shown them, we
 must assume that these persons must have harbored tendencies akin to
 perversities--or, if you will, perversities in latent form. This brings
 us to the second experimental conclusion of which I spoke, namely, that
 psychoanalytic investigation found it necessary to concern itself with
 the sexual life of the child, since, in the analysis of symptoms,
 reminiscences and ideas reverted to the early years of childhood.
 Whatever we revealed in this manner was corroborated point by point
 through the direct observation of children. The result was the
 recognition that all inclinations to perversion have their origin in
 childhood, that children have tendencies toward them all and practice
 them in a measure corresponding to their immaturity. Perverse sexuality,
 in brief, is nothing more than magnified infantile sexuality divided
 into its separate tendencies.
 
 Now you will certainly see these perversions in another light and no
 longer ignore their relation to the sexual life of man, at the cost, I
 do not doubt, of surprises and incongruities painful to your emotions.
 At first you will undoubtedly be disposed to deny everything--the fact
 that children have something which may be termed sexual life, the truth
 of our observations and the justification of our claim to see in the
 behavior of children any relation to what is condemned in later years
 as perversity. Permit me first to explain to you the cause of your
 reluctance and then to present to you the sum of our observations. It is
 biologically improbable, even absurd, to assume that children have no
 sexual life--sexual excitements, desires, and some sort of
 satisfaction--but that they develop it suddenly between the ages of
 twelve and fourteen. This would be just as improbable from the viewpoint
 of biology as to say that they were not born with genitals but developed
 them only in the period of puberty. The new factor which becomes active
 in them at the time is the function of reproduction, which avails itself
 for its own purposes of all the physical and psychic material already
 present. You commit the error of confusing sexuality with reproduction
 and thereby block the road to the understanding of sexuality, and of
 perversions and neuroses as well. This error is a prejudice. Oddly
 enough its source is the fact that you yourselves were children, and as
 children succumbed to the influence of education. One of the most
 important educational tasks which society must assume is the control,
 the restriction of the sexual instinct when it breaks forth as an
 impulse toward reproduction; it must be subdued to an individual will
 that is identical with the mandates of society. In its own interests,
 accordingly, society would postpone full development until the child has
 reached a certain stage of intellectual maturity, for education
 practically ceases with the complete emergence of the sexual impulse.
 Otherwise the instinct would burst all bounds and the work of culture,
 achieved with such difficulty, would be shattered. The task of
 restraining this sexuality is never easy; it succeeds here too poorly
 and there too well. The motivating force of human society is
 fundamentally economic; since there is not sufficient nourishment to
 support its members without work on their part, the number of these
 members must be limited and their energies diverted from sexual activity
 to labor. Here, again, we have the eternal struggle for life that has
 persisted from prehistoric times to the present.
 
 Experience must have shown educators that the task of guiding the sexual
 will of the new generation can be solved only by influencing the early
 sexual life of the child, the period preparatory to puberty, not by
 awaiting the storm of puberty. With this intention almost all infantile
 sex activities are forbidden to the child or made distasteful to him;
 the ideal goal has been to render the life of the child asexual. In the
 course of time it has really come to be considered asexual, and this
 point of view has actually been proclaimed by science. In order not to
 contradict our belief and intentions, we ignore the sexual activity of
 the child--no slight thing, at that--or are content to interpret it
 differently. The child is supposed to be pure and innocent, and whoever
 says otherwise may be condemned as a shameless blasphemer of the tender
 and sacred feelings of humanity.
 
 The children are the only ones who do not join in carrying out these
 conventions, who assert their animal rights, who prove again and again
 that the road to purity is still before them. It is strange that those
 who deny the sexuality of children, do not therefore slacken in their
 educational efforts but rather punish severely the manifestations of the
 very thing they maintain does not exist, and call it "childish
 naughtiness." Theoretically it is highly interesting to observe that the
 period of life which offers most striking evidence against the biased
 conception of asexual childhood, is the time up to five or six years of
 age; after that everything is enveloped by a veil of amnesia, which is
 rent apart only by thorough scientific investigation; it may previously
 have given way partially in certain forms of dreams.
 
 Now I shall present to you what is most easily recognizable in the
 sexual life of the child. At first, for the sake of convenience let me
 explain to you the conception of the libido. Libido, analogous to
 hunger, is the force through which the instinct, here the sex instinct
 (as in the case of hunger it is the instinct to eat) expresses itself.
 Other conceptions, such as sexual excitement and satisfaction, require
 no elucidation. You will easily see that interpretation plays the
 greatest part in disclosing the sexuality of the suckling; in fact you
 will probably cite this as an objection. These interpretations proceed
 from a foundation of analytic investigation that trace backwards from a
 given symptom. The suckling reveals the first sexual impulses in
 connection with other functions necessary for life. His chief interest,
 as you know, is directed toward the taking in of food; when it has
 fallen asleep at its mother's breast, fully satisfied, it bears the
 expression of blissful content that will come back again in later life
 after the experience of the sexual orgasm. That of course would be too
 slight evidence to form the basis of a conclusion. But we observe that
 the suckling wishes to repeat the act of taking in food without actually
 demanding more food; he is therefore no longer urged by hunger. We say
 he is sucking, and the fact that after this he again falls asleep with a
 blissful expression shows us that the act of sucking in itself has
 yielded him satisfaction. As you know, he speedily arranges matters so
 that he cannot fall asleep without sucking. Dr. Lindner, an old
 pediatrist in Budapest, was the first one to ascertain the sexual nature
 of this procedure. Persons attending to the child, who surely make no
 pretensions to a theoretic attitude, seem to judge sucking in a similar
 manner. They do not doubt that it serves a pleasurable satisfaction,
 term it naughty, and force the child to relinquish it against his will,
 and if he will not do so of his own accord, through painful measures.
 And so we learn that the suckling performs actions that have no object
 save the obtaining of a sensual gratification. We believe that this
 gratification is first experienced during the taking in of food, but
 that he speedily learns to separate it from this condition. The
 gratification can only be attributed to the excitation of the mouth and
 lips, hence we call these parts of the body _erogenous zones_ and the
 pleasure derived from sucking, _sexual_. Probably we shall have to
 discuss the justification of this name.
 
 If the suckling could express himself, he would probably recognize the
 act of sucking at his mother's breast as the most important thing in
 life. He is not so far wrong, for in this one act he satisfies two great
 needs of life. With no small degree of surprise we learn through
 psychoanalysis how much of the physical significance of this act is
 retained through life. The sucking at the mother's breast becomes the
 term of departure for all of sexual life, the unattained ideal of later
 sex gratification, to which the imagination often reverts in times of
 need. The mother's breast is the first object for the sexual instinct; I
 can scarcely bring home to you how significant this object is for
 centering on the sexual object in later life, what profound influence it
 exerts upon the most remote domains of psychic life through evolution
 and substitution. The suckling, however, soon relinquishes it and fills
 its place by a part of his own body. The child sucks his thumb or his
 own tongue. Thereby he renders himself independent of the consent of the
 outer world in obtaining his sensual satisfactions, and moreover
 increases the excitement by including a second zone of his body. The
 erogenous zones are not equally satisfactory; it is therefore an
 important experience when, as Dr. Lindner puts it, the child while
 touching his own body discovers the especially excitable genitals, and
 so finds the way from sucking to onanism.
 
 Through the evaluation of sucking we become acquainted with two decisive
 characteristics of infantile sexuality. It arises in connection with the
 satisfaction of great organic needs and behaves _auto-erotically_, that
 is to say, it seeks and finds it objects on its own body. What is most
 clearly discernible during the taking in of food is partially repeated
 during excretion. We conclude that the nursling experiences pleasure
 during the excretion of urine and the contents of the intestine and that
 he soon strives to arrange these acts in a way to secure the greatest
 possible amount of satisfaction by the corresponding excitement of the
 erogenous membrane zones. Lou Andreas, with her delicate perceptions,
 has shown how at this point the outer world first intervenes as a
 hindrance, hostile to the child's desire for satisfaction--the first
 vague suggestion of outer and inner conflicts. He may not let his
 excretions pass from him at a moment agreeable to him, but only when
 other persons set the time. To induce him to renounce these sources of
 satisfaction, everything relating to these functions is declared
 indecent and must be concealed. Here, for the first time, he is to
 exchange pleasure for social dignity. His own relation to his excretions
 is originally quite different. He experiences no disgust toward his
 faeces, values them as a part of his body from which he does not part
 lightly, for he uses them as the first "present" he can give to persons
 he esteems particularly. Even after education has succeeded in
 alienating him from these tendencies, he transfers the evaluation of the
 faeces to the "present" and to "money." On the other hand, he appears to
 regard his achievements in urination with especial pride.
 
 I know that you have been wanting to interrupt me for a long time and to
 cry: "Enough of these monstrosities! Excretion a source of sexual
 gratification that even the suckling exploits! Faeces a valuable
 substance! The anus a sort of genital! We do not believe it, but we
 understand why children's physicians and pedagogues have decidedly
 rejected psychoanalysis and its results." No, you have merely forgotten
 that it was my intention to present to you infantile sexuality in
 connection with the facts of sexual perversion. Why should you not know
 that in the case of many grown-ups, homosexuals as well as
 heterosexuals, the locus of intercourse is transferred from the normal
 to a more remote portion of the body. And that there are many
 individuals who confess to a pleasurable sensation of no slight degree
 in the emptying of the bowels during their entire lives! Children
 themselves will confirm their interest in the act of defecation and the
 pleasure in watching the defecation of another, when they are a few
 years older and capable of giving expression to their feelings. Of
 course, if these children have previously been systematically
 intimidated, they will understand all too well the wisdom of preserving
 silence on the subject. As for the other things that you do not wish to
 believe, let me refer you to the results of analysis and the direct
 observation of children, and you will realize that it is difficult not
 to see these things or to see them in a different light. I do not even
 object to making the relation between child-sexuality and sexual
 perversion quite obvious to you. It is really only natural; if the child
 has sexual life at all, it must necessarily be perverse, because aside
 from a few hazy illusions, the child does not know how sexuality gives
 rise to reproduction. The common characteristic of all perversions, on
 the other hand, is that they have abandoned reproduction as their aim.
 We term sexual activity perverse when it has renounced the aim of
 reproduction and follows the pursuit of pleasure as an independent goal.
 And so you realize that the turning point in the development of sexual
 life lies in its subjugation to the purpose of reproduction. Everything
 this side of the turning point, everything that has given up this
 purpose and serves the pursuit of pleasure alone, must carry the term
 "perverse" and as such be regarded with contempt.
 
 Permit me, therefore, to continue with my brief presentation of
 infantile sexuality. What I have told you about two organic systems I
 could supplement by a discussion of all the others. The sexual life of
 the child exhausts itself in the exercise of a series of partial
 instincts which seek, independently of one another, to gain satisfaction
 from his own body or from an external object. Among these organs the
 genitals speedily predominate. There are persons who continue the
 pursuit of satisfaction by means of their own genitals, without the aid
 of another genital or object, uninterruptedly from the onanism of the
 suckling to the onanism of necessity which arises in puberty, and even
 indefinitely beyond that. The theme of onanism alone would occupy us for
 a long period of time; it offers material for diverse observations.
 
 In spite of my inclination to shorten the theme, I must tell you
 something about the sexual curiosity of children. It is most
 characteristic for child sexuality and significant for the study of
 neurotic symptoms. The sexual curiosity of children begins very early,
 sometimes before the third year. It is not connected with the
 differences of sexes, which means nothing to the child, since the boy,
 at any rate, ascribes the same male genital to both sexes. When the boy
 first discovers the primary sexual structure of the female, he tries at
 first to deny the evidence of his senses, for he cannot conceive a human
 being who lacks the part of his body that is of such importance to him.
 Later he is terrified at the possibility revealed to him and he feels
 the influence of all the former threats, occasioned by his intensive
 preoccupation with his little organ. He becomes subject to the
 domination of the castration complex, the formation of which plays an
 important part in the development of his character, provided he remains
 healthy; of his neurosis, if he becomes diseased; of his resistance, if
 he is treated analytically. We know that the little girl feels injured
 on account of her lack of a large, visible penis, envies the boy his
 possession, and primarily from this motive desires to be a man. This
 wish manifests itself subsequently in neurosis, arising from some
 failure in her role as a woman. During childhood, the clitoris of the
 girl is the equivalent of the penis; it is especially excitable, the
 zone where auto-erotic satisfaction is achieved. In the transition to
 womanhood it is most important that the sensations of the clitoris are
 completely transferred at the right time to the entrance of the vagina.
 In cases of so-called sexual anesthesia of women the clitoris has
 obstinately retained its excitability.
 
 The sexual interest of children generally turns first to the mystery of
 birth--the same problem that is the basis of the questions asked by the
 sphinx of Thebes. This curiosity is for the most part aroused by the
 selfish fear of the arrival of a new child. The answer which the
 nursery has ready for the child, that the stork brings children, is
 doubted far more frequently than we imagine, even by very young
 children. The feeling that he has been cheated out of the truth by
 grown-ups, contributes greatly to the child's sense of solitude and to
 his independent development. But the child is not capable of solving
 this problem unaided. His undeveloped sexual constitution restricts his
 ability to understand. At first he assumes that children are produced by
 a special substance in one's food and does not know that only women can
 bear children. Later he learns of this limitation and relinquishes the
 derivation of children from food--a supposition retained in the
 fairy-tale. The growing child soon notices that the father plays some
 part in reproduction, but what it is he cannot guess. If, by chance, he
 is witness of a sexual act, he sees in it an attempt to subjugate, a
 scuffle, the sadistic miscomprehension of coitus; he does not however
 relate this act immediately to the evolution of the child. When he
 discovers traces of blood on the bedsheets or on the clothing of his
 mother, he considers them the proof of an injury inflicted by the
 father. During the latter part of childhood, he imagines that the sexual
 organ of the man plays an important part in the evolution of children,
 but can ascribe only the function of urination to that part of his body.
 
 From the very outset children unite in believing that the birth of the
 child takes place through the anus; that the child therefore appears as
 a ball of faeces. After anal interests have been proven valueless, he
 abandons this theory and assumes that the navel opens or that the region
 between the two breasts is the birthplace of the child. In this way the
 curious child approaches the knowledge of sexual facts, which, clouded
 by his ignorance, he often fails to see. In the years prior to puberty
 he generally receives an incomplete, disparaging explanation which often
 causes traumatic consequences.
 
 You have probably heard that the conception "sexual" is unduly expanded
 by psychoanalysis in order that it may maintain the hypothesis that all
 neuroses are due to sexual causes and that the meaning of the symptoms
 is sexual. You are now in a position to judge whether or not this
 expansion is unjustifiable. We have expanded the conception sexual only
 to include the sexual life of children and of perverse persons. That is
 to say, we have reestablished its proper boundaries. Outside of
 psychoanalysis sexuality means only a very limited thing: normal sexual
 life in the service of reproduction.
 
 
 
 
 TWENTY-FIRST LECTURE
 
 GENERAL THEORY OF THE NEUROSES
 
 _Development of the Libido and Sexual Organizations_
 
 
 I am under the impression that I did not succeed in convincing you of
 the significance of perversions for our conception of sexuality. I
 should therefore like to clarify and add as much as I can.
 
 It was not only perversions that necessitated an alteration of our
 conception of sexuality, which aroused such vehement contradiction. The
 study of infantile sexuality did a great deal more along that line, and
 its close correspondence to the perversions became decisive for us. But
 the origin of the expressions of infantile sexuality, unmistakable as
 they are in later years of childhood, seem to be lost in obscurity.
 Those who disregard the history of evolution and analytic coherence,
 will dispute the potency of the sexual factor and will infer the agency
 of generalized forces. Do not forget that as yet we have no generally
 acknowledged criterion for identifying the sexual nature of an
 occurrence, unless we assume that we can find it in a relation to the
 functions of reproduction, and this we must reject as too narrow. The
 biological criteria, such as the periodicities of twenty-three and
 twenty-eight days, suggested by W. Fliess, are by no means established;
 the specific chemical nature which we can possibly assume for sexual
 occurrences is still to be discovered. The sexual perversions of adults,
 on the other hand, are tangible and unambiguous. As their generally
 accepted nomenclature shows, they are undoubtedly sexual in character;
 whether we designate them as signs of degeneration, or otherwise, no one
 has yet had the courage to place them outside the phenomena of sex. They
 alone justify the assertion that sexuality and reproduction are not
 coincident, for it is clear that all of them disavow the goal of
 reproduction.
 
 This brings me to an interesting parallel. While "conscious" and
 "psychic" were generally considered to be identical, we had to make an
 essay to widen our conception of the "psychic" to recognize as psychic
 something that was not conscious. Analogously, when "sexual" and
 "related to reproduction" (or, in shorter form, "genital") has been
 generally considered identical, psychoanalysis must admit as "sexual"
 such things as are not "genital," things which have nothing to do with
 reproduction. It is only a formal analogy, but it does not lack a deeper
 basis.
 
 But if the existence of sexual perversions is such a compelling
 argument, why has it not long ago had its effect, and settled the
 question? I really am unable to say. It appears to be because the sexual
 perversions are subject to a peculiar ban that extends even into theory,
 and stands in the way of their scientific appreciation. It seems as if
 no one could forget that they are not only revolting, but even
 unnatural, dangerous; as if they had a seductive influence and that at
 bottom one had to stifle a secret envy of those who enjoyed them. As the
 count who passes judgment in the famous Tannhauser parody admits:
 
     "And in the mount of Venus, his honor slipped his mind,
      It's odd that never happens to people of our kind."
 
 Truthfully speaking, the perverts are rather poor devils who atone most
 bitterly for the satisfaction they attain with such difficulty.
 
 What makes the perverse activity unmistakably sexual, despite all the
 strangeness of its object, is that the act in perverse satisfaction most
 frequently is accompanied by a complete orgasm, and by an ejaculation of
 the genital product. Of course, this is only true in the case of adults;
 with children orgasms and genital excretions are hardly possible; they
 are replaced by rudiments which, again, are not recognized as truly
 sexual.
 
 In order to complete the appreciation of sexual perversions, I have
 something to add. Condemned as they are, sharply as they are contrasted
 with the normal sexual activity, simple observation shows that rarely is
 normal sex-life entirely free from one or another of the perverse
 traits. Even the kiss can be claimed to be perverse, for it consists in
 the union of two erogenous mouth zones in place of the respective
 genitals. But no one outlaws it as perverse, it is, on the contrary,
 admitted in theatrical performances as a modified suggestion of the
 sexual act. This very kissing may easily become a complete perversion
 if it results in such intensity that it is immediately followed by an
 emission and orgasm--a thing that is not at all unusual. Further, we can
 learn that handling and gazing upon the object becomes an essential
 prerequisite to sexual pleasure; that some, in the height of sexual
 excitation, pinch and bite, that the greatest excitation is not always
 called forth in lovers by the genitals, but rather by other parts of the
 body, and so forth. There is no sense in considering persons with single
 traits of this kind abnormal, and counting them among the perverts.
 Rather, we recognize more and more clearly that the essential nature of
 perversion does not consist in overstepping the sexual aim, nor in a
 substitution for the genitals, not even in the variety of objects, but
 simply in the exclusiveness with which these deviations are carried out
 and by means of which the sexual act that serves reproduction is pushed
 aside. When the perverse activities serve to prepare or heighten the
 normal sexual act, they are really no longer perversions. To be sure,
 the chasm between normal and perverse sexuality is practically bridged
 by such facts. The natural result is that normal sexuality takes its
 origin from something existing prior to it, since certain components of
 this material are thrown out and others are combined in order to make
 them subject to a new aim--that of reproduction.
 
 Before we make use of our knowledge of perversions to concentrate anew
 and with clearer perspective on the study of infantile sexuality, I must
 call your attention to an important difference between the two. Perverse
 sexuality is as a rule extraordinarily centralized, its whole action is
 directed toward one, usually an isolated, goal. A partial instinct has
 the upper hand. It is either the only one that can be demonstrated or it
 has subjected the others to its purposes. In this respect there is no
 difference between normal and perverse sexuality other than that the
 ruling partial instincts, and with them the sexual goals, are different.
 In the one case as well as in the other there is, so to say, a well
 organized tyranny, excepting that here one family and there another has
 appropriated all the power to itself. Infantile sexuality, on the other
 hand, is on the whole devoid of such centralization and organization,
 its individual component impulses are of equal power, and each
 independently goes in search of the acquisition of pleasurable
 excitement. The lack as well as the presence of centralization fit in
 well with the fact that both the perverse and the normal sexuality
 originated from the infantile. There are also cases of perverse
 sexuality that have much more similarity with the infantile, where,
 independently of one another, numerous partial instincts have forced
 their way, insisted on their aims, or rather perpetuated them. In these
 cases it is more correct to speak of infantilism of sexual life than of
 perversions.
 
 Thus prepared we can consider a question which we certainly shall not be
 spared. People will say to us: "Why are you so set on including within
 sexuality those manifestations of childhood, out of which the sexual
 later develops, but which, according to your own admission, are of
 uncertain origin? Why are you not satisfied rather with the
 physiological description, and simply say that even in the suckling one
 may notice activities, such as sucking objects or holding back
 excrements, which show us that he strives towards an _organic pleasure_?
 In that way you would have avoided the estranging conception of sexual
 life in the tiniest child." I have nothing to say against organic
 pleasure; I know that the most extreme excitement of the sexual union is
 only an organic pleasure derived from the activity of the genitals. But
 can you tell me when this organic pleasure, originally not
 differentiated, acquires the sexual character that it undoubtedly does
 possess in the later phases of development? Do you know more about the
 "organic pleasure" than about sexuality? You will answer, the sexual
 character is acquired when the genitals begin to play their role; sexual
 means genital. You will even reject the contrary evidence of the
 perversions by confronting me with the statement that in most
 perversions it is a matter of achieving the genital orgasm, although by
 other means than a union of the genitals. You would really command a
 much better position if you did not regard as characteristic of the
 sexual that untenable relation to reproduction seen in the perversions,
 if you replaced it by activity of the genitals. Then we no longer differ
 very widely; the genital organs merely replace other organs. What do you
 make of the numerous practices which show you that the genitals may be
 represented by other organs in the attainment of gratification, as is
 the case in the normal kiss, or the perverse practices of "fast life,"
 or the symptoms of hysteria? In these neuroses it is quite usual for
 stimulations, sensations and innervations, even the process of erection,
 which is localized in the genitals, to be transferred to other distant
 parts of the body, so that you have nothing to which you can hold as
 characteristics of the sexual. You will have to decide to follow my
 example and expand the designation "sexual" to include the strivings of
 early childhood toward organic pleasure.
 
 Now, for my justification, I should like you to give me the time for two
 more considerations. As you know, we call the doubtful and indefinable
 pleasure activities of earliest childhood sexual because our analysis of
 the symptoms leads us to them by way of material that is undeniably
 sexual. We admit that it need not for that reason in itself be sexual.
 But take an analogous case. Suppose there were no way to observe the
 development of two dicotyledonous plants from their seeds--the apple
 tree and the bean. In both cases, however, imagine it possible to follow
 their evolution from the fully developed plant backwards to the first
 seedling with two leaf-divisions. The two little leaves are
 indistinguishable, in both cases they look exactly alike. Shall I
 conclude from this that they really are the same and that the specific
 differences between an apple tree and bean plant do not appear until
 later in the history of the plant? Or is it biologically more correct to
 believe that this difference is already present in the seedling,
 although the two little leaves show no differences? We do the same thing
 when we term as sexual the pleasure derived from the activities of the
 suckling. Whether each and every organic enjoyment may be called sexual,
 or if besides the sexual there is another that does not deserve this
 name, is a matter I cannot discuss here. I know too little about organic
 pleasure and its conditions, and will not be at all surprised if the
 retrogressive character of the analysis leads us back finally to a
 generalized factor.
 
 One thing more. You have on the whole gained very little for what you
 are so anxious to maintain, the sexual purity of the child, even when
 you can convince me that the activities of the suckling had better not
 be called sexual. For from the third year on, there is no longer any
 doubt concerning the presence of a sexual life in the child. At this
 time the genitals already begin to become active; there is perhaps
 regularly a period of infantile masturbation, in other words, a
 gratification by means of the genitals. The psychic and social
 expressions of the sexual life are no longer absent; choice of an
 object, affectionate preference for certain persons, indeed, a leaning
 toward one of the two sexes, jealousy--all these have been established
 independently by unprejudiced observation, prior to the advent of
 psychoanalysis, and confirmed by every careful observer. You will say
 that you had no doubt as to the early awakening of affection, you will
 take issue only with its sexual nature. Children between the ages of
 three and eight have already learned to hide these things, but if you
 look sharply you can always gather sufficient evidence of the "sexual"
 purpose of this affection. What escapes you will be amply supplied by
 investigation. The sexual goals of this period of life are most
 intimately connected with the contemporaneous sexual theories, of which
 I have given you some examples. The perverse nature of some of these
 goals is the result of the constitutional immaturity of the child, who
 has not yet discovered the goal of the act of copulation.
 
 From about the sixth or the eighth year on a pause in, and reversion of,
 sexual development is noticeable, which in the cases that reach the
 highest cultural standard deserves the name of a latent period. The
 latent period may also fail to appear and there need not be an
 interruption of sexual activity and sexual interests at any period. Most
 of the experiences and impulses prior to the latent period then fall
 victim to the infantile amnesia, the forgetting we have already
 discussed, which cloaks our earliest childhood and makes us strangers to
 it. In every psychoanalysis we are confronted with the task of leading
 this forgotten period of life back into memory; one cannot resist the
 supposition that the beginning of sexual life it contains furnishes the
 motive for this forgetting, namely, that this forgetting is a result of
 suppression.
 
 The sexual life of the child shows from the third year that it has much
 in common with that of the adult; it is distinguished from the latter,
 as we already know, by the lack of stable organization under the primacy
 of the genitals, by the unavoidable traits of perversion, and,
 naturally, by the far lesser intensity of the whole impulse.
 Theoretically the most interesting phases of the sexual development or,
 as we would rather say, the libido-development, so far as theory is
 concerned, lie back of this period. This development is so rapidly gone
 through that perhaps it would never have been possible for direct
 observation to grasp its fleeting pictures. Psychoanalytic investigation
 of the neuroses has for the first time made it possible to discover more
 remote phases of the libido-development. These are, to be sure, nothing
 but constructions, but if you wish to carry on psychoanalysis in a
 practical way you will find that they are necessary and valuable
 constructions. You will soon understand why pathology may disclose
 conditions which we would have overlooked in the normal object.
 
 We can now declare what form the sexual life of the child takes before
 the primacy of the genitals is established. This primacy is prepared in
 the first infantile epoch prior to the latent period, and is
 continuously organized from puberty on. There is in this early period a
 sort of loose organization, which we shall call _pre-genital_. In the
 foreground of this phase, however, the partial instincts of the genitals
 are not prominent, rather the _sadistic_ and _anal_. The contrast
 between _masculine_ and _feminine_ plays no part as yet, its place is
 taken by the contrast between _active_ and _passive_, which we may
 designate as the forerunner of sexual polarity, with which it is later
 fused. That which appears masculine to us in the activity of this phase,
 observed from the standpoint of the later genital stage, is the
 expression of an instinct to mastery, which may border on cruelty.
 Impulses with passive goals attach themselves to the erogenous zone of
 the rectal opening. Most important at this time, curiosity and the
 instinct to watch are powerful. The genital really takes part in the
 sexual life only in its role as excretory organ for the bladder. Objects
 are not lacking to the partial impulses of this period, but they do not
 necessarily combine into a single object. The sadistico-anal
 organization is the step antecedent to the phase of genital primacy. A
 more penetrating study furnishes proof how much of this is retained for
 the later and final form, and in what ways its partial instincts are
 forced into line under the new genital organization. Back of the
 sadistico-anal phase of libido-development, we get a view of an earlier,
 even more primitive phase of organization, in which the erogenous
 mouth-zone plays the chief role. You may surmise that the sexual
 activity of sucking belongs to it, and may wonder at the intuition of
 the ancient Egyptians, whose art characterized the child, as well as
 the god Horus, with the finger in his month. Abraham only recently
 published material concerning the traces which this primitive oral phase
 has left upon the sexual life of later years.
 
 I can surmise that these details about sexual organization have burdened
 your mind more than they have informed you. Perhaps I have again gone
 into detail too much. But be patient; what you have heard will become
 more valuable through the uses to which it is later put. Keep well in
 mind the impression that sexual life, as we call it, the function, of
 the libido, does not make its appearance as a completed whole, nor does
 it develop in its own image, but goes through a series of successive
 phases which are not similar to each other. In fact, it is a
 developmental sequence, like that from the grub to the butterfly. The
 turning point of the development is the subordination of all sexual
 partial-instincts to the primacy of the genitals, and thereby the
 subjection of sexuality to the function of reproduction. Originally it
 is a diffused sexual life, one which consists of independent activities
 of single partial instincts which strive towards organic gratification.
 This anarchy is modified by approaches to pre-genital organization,
 first of all the sadistico-anal phase, prior to this the oral phase,
 which is perhaps the most primitive. Added to this there are the various
 processes, as yet not well known, which carry over one organization
 level to the later and more advanced phase. The significance, for the
 understanding of the neuroses, of the long evolutionary path of the
 libido which carries it over so many grades we shall discuss on another
 occasion.
 
 Today we shall look at another angle of the development, namely the
 relation of the partial instinct to the object. We shall make a hurried
 survey of this development in order to spend more time upon a relatively
 later product. Some of the components of the sex instincts have had an
 object from the very beginning and hold fast to it; such are the
 instinct to mastery (sadism), curiosity, and the impulse to watch. Other
 impulses which are more clearly attached to specific erogenous zones of
 the body have this object only in the beginning, as long as they adhere
 to the functions which are not sexual; they release this object when
 they free themselves from these non-sexual functions. The first object
 of the oral component of the sexual impulse is the mother's breast,
 which satisfies the hunger of the infant. By the act of sucking, the
 erotic component which is also satisfied by the sucking becoming
 independent, it gives up the foreign object and replaces it by some part
 of its own body. The oral impulse becomes _auto-erotic_, just as the
 anal and other erogenous impulses are from the very beginning. Further
 development, to express it most briefly, has two goals--first, to give
 up auto-eroticism, and, again, to substitute for the object of one's own
 body a foreign object; second, to unify the different objects into a
 single impulse, replace them by a single object. To be sure, that can
 happen only if this single object is itself complete, a body similar to
 one's own. Nor can it be consummated without leaving behind as useless a
 large number of the auto-erotic instinctive impulses.
 
 The processes of finding the object are rather involved, and have as yet
 had no comprehensive exposition. For our purpose, let us emphasize the
 fact that when the process has come to a temporary cessation in the
 childhood years, before the latent period, the object it has found is
 seen to be practically identical with the first object derived from its
 relation to the object of the oral pleasure impulse. It is, if not the
 mother's breast, the mother herself. We call the mother the first
 _object of love_. For we speak of love when we emphasize the psychic
 side of sex-impulses, and disregard or for a moment wish to forget the
 fundamental physical or "sensual" demands of the instincts. At the time
 when the mother becomes the object of love, the psychic work of
 suppression which withdraws the knowledge of a part of his sexual goal
 from his consciousness has already begun in the child. The selection of
 the mother as the object of love involves everything we understand by
 the Oedipus complex which has come to have such great significance in
 the psychoanalytic explanation of neuroses, and which has had no small
 part in arousing opposition to psychoanalysis.
 
 Here is a little experience which took place during the present war: A
 brave young disciple of psychoanalysis is a doctor at the German front
 somewhere in Poland, and attracts the attention of his colleagues by the
 fact that he occasionally exercises an unexpected influence in the case
 of a patient. Upon being questioned he admits that he works by means of
 psychoanalysis and is finally induced to impart his knowledge to his
 colleagues. Every evening the physicians of the corps, colleagues and
 superiors, gather in order to listen to the inmost secrets of analysis.
 For a while this goes on nicely, but after he has told his audience of
 the Oedipus-complex, a superior rises and says he does not believe it,
 that it is shameful for the lecturer to tell such things to them, brave
 men who are fighting for their fatherland, and who are the fathers of
 families, and he forbade the continuation of the lectures. This was the
 end.
 
 Now you will be impatient to discover what this frightful
 Oedipus-complex consists of. The name tells you. You all know the Greek
 myth of King Oedipus, who is destined by the fates to kill his father,
 and take his mother to wife, who does everything to escape the oracle
 and then does penance by blinding himself when he discovers that he has,
 unknowingly, committed these two sins. I trust many of you have
 yourselves experienced the profound effect of the tragedy in which
 Sophocles handles this material. The work of the Attic poet presents the
 manner in which the deed of Oedipus, long since accomplished, is finally
 brought to light by an artistically prolonged investigation,
 continuously fed with new evidence; thus far it has a certain similarity
 to the process of psychoanalysis. In the course of the dialogue it
 happens that the infatuated mother-wife, Jocasta, opposes the
 continuation of the investigation. She recalls that many men have
 dreamed that they have cohabited with their mothers, but one should lay
 little stress on dreams. We do not lay little stress on dreams, least of
 all typical dreams such as occur to many men, and we do not doubt that
 this dream mentioned by Jocasta is intimately connected with the strange
 and frightful content of the myth.
 
 It is surprising that Sophocles' tragedy does not call forth much
 greater indignation and opposition on the part of the audience, a
 reaction similar to, and far more justified, than the reaction to our
 simple military physician. For it is a fundamentally immoral play, it
 dispenses with the moral responsibility of men, it portrays godlike
 powers as instigators of guilt, and shows the helplessness of the moral
 impulses of men which contend against sin. One might easily suppose that
 the burden of the myth purposed accusation against the gods and Fate,
 and in the hands of the critical Euripides, always at odds with the
 gods, it would probably have become such an accusation. But there is no
 trace of this in the work of the believer Sophocles. A pious sophistry
 which asserts that the highest morality is to bow to the will of the
 gods, even if they command a crime, helps him over the difficulty. I do
 not think that this moral constitutes the power of the drama, but so far
 as the effect goes, that is unimportant; the listener does not react to
 it, but to the secret meaning and content of the myth. He reacts as
 though through self-analysis he had recognized in himself the
 Oedipus-complex, and had unmasked the will of the gods, as well as the
 oracle, as sublime disguises of his own unconsciousness. It is as though
 he remembered the wish to remove his father, and in his place to take
 his mother to wife, and must be horrified at his own desires. He also
 understands the voice of the poet as if it were telling him: "You revolt
 in vain against your responsibility, and proclaim in vain the efforts
 you have made to resist these criminal purposes. In spite of these
 efforts, you are guilty, for you have not been able to destroy the
 criminal purposes, they will persist unconsciously in you." And in that
 there is psychological truth. Even if man has relegated his evil
 impulses to the unconscious, and would tell himself that he is no longer
 answerable for them, he will still be compelled to experience this
 responsibility as a feeling of guilt which he cannot trace to its
 source.
 
 It is not to be doubted for a moment that one may recognize in the
 Oedipus-complex one of the most important sources for the consciousness
 of guilt with which neurotics are so often harassed. But furthermore, in
 a study of the origins of religion and morality of mankind which I
 published in 1913, under the title of _Totem and Taboo_, the idea was
 brought home to me that perhaps mankind as a whole has, at the beginning
 of its history, come by its consciousness of guilt, the final source of
 religion and morality, through the Oedipus-complex. I should like to say
 more on this subject, but perhaps I had better not. It is difficult to
 turn away from this subject now that I have begun speaking of it, but we
 must return to individual psychology.
 
 What does direct observation of the child at the time of the selection
 of its object, before the latent period, show us concerning the
 Oedipus-complex? One may easily see that the little man would like to
 have the mother all to himself, that he finds the presence of his
 father disturbing, he becomes irritated when the latter permits himself
 to show tenderness towards the mother, and expresses his satisfaction
 when the father is away or on a journey. Frequently he expresses his
 feelings directly in words, promises the mother he will marry her. One
 may think this is very little in comparison with the deeds of Oedipus,
 but it is actually enough, for it is essentially the same thing. The
 observation is frequently clouded by the circumstance that the same
 child at the same time, on other occasions, gives evidence of great
 tenderness towards its father; it is only that such contradictory, or
 rather, _ambivalent_ emotional attitudes as would lead to a conflict in
 the case of an adult readily take their place side by side in a child,
 just as later on they permanently exist in the unconscious. You might
 wish to interpose that the behavior of the child springs from egoistic
 motives and does not justify the setting up of an erotic complex. The
 mother provides for all the necessities of the child, and it is
 therefore to the child's advantage that she troubles herself for no one
 else. This, too, is correct, but it will soon be clear that in this, as
 in similar situations, the egoistic interest offers only the opportunity
 upon which the erotic impulse seizes. If the little one shows the most
 undisguised sexual curiosity about his mother, if he wants to sleep with
 her at night, insists upon being present while she is dressing, or
 attempts to caress her, as the mother can so often ascertain and
 laughingly relates, it is undoubtedly due to the erotic nature of the
 attachment to his mother. We must not forget that the mother shows the
 same care for her little daughter without achieving the same effect, and
 that the father often vies with her in caring for the boy without being
 able to win the same importance in his eyes as the mother. In short, it
 is clear that the factor of sex-preference cannot be eliminated from the
 situation by any kind of criticism. From the standpoint of egoistic
 interest it would merely be stupid of the little fellow not to tolerate
 two persons in his services rather than only one.
 
 I have, as you will have noticed, described only the relation of the boy
 to his father and mother. As far as the little girl is concerned, the
 process is the same with the necessary modifications. The affectionate
 devotion to the father, the desire to set aside the mother as
 superfluous and to take her place, a coquetry which already works with
 all the arts of later womanhood, give such a charming picture,
 especially in the baby girl, that we are apt to forget its seriousness,
 and the grave consequences which may result from this infantile
 situation. Let us not fail to add that frequently the parents themselves
 exert a decisive influence over the child in the wakening of the Oedipus
 attitude, in that they themselves follow a sex preference when there are
 a number of children. The father in the most unmistakable manner shows
 preference for the daughter, while the mother is most affectionate
 toward the son. But even this factor cannot seriously undermine the
 spontaneous character of the childish Oedipus-complex. The
 Oedipus-complex expands and becomes a family-complex when other children
 appear. It becomes the motive force, revived by the sense of personal
 injury, which causes the child to receive its brothers and sisters with
 aversion and to wish to remove them without more ado. It is much more
 frequent for the children to express these feelings of hatred than those
 arising from the parent-complex. If such a wish is fulfilled, and death
 takes away the undesired increase in the family, after a short while we
 may discover through analysis what an important experience this death
 was for the child, even though he had not remembered it. The child
 forced into second place by the birth of a little brother or sister, and
 for the first time practically isolated from his mother, is loathe to
 forgive her for this; feelings which we would call extreme bitterness in
 an adult are aroused in him and often become the basis of a lasting
 estrangement. We have already mentioned that sexual curiosity with all
 its consequences usually grows out of these experiences of the child.
 With the growing up of these brothers and sisters the relation to them
 undergoes the most significant changes. The boy may take his sister as
 the object for his love, to replace his faithless mother; situations of
 dangerous rivalry, which are of vast importance for later life, arise
 even in the nursery among numerous brothers who court the affection of a
 younger sister. A little girl finds in her older brother a substitute
 for her father, who no longer acts towards her with the same affection
 as in former years, or she takes a younger sister as a substitute for
 the child that she vainly wished of her father.
 
 Such things, and many more of a similar character, are shown by the
 direct observation of children and the consideration of their vivid
 childish recollections, which are not influenced by the analysis. You
 will conclude, among other things, that the position of a child in the
 sequence of his brothers and sisters is of utmost importance for the
 entire course of his later life, a factor which should be considered in
 every biography. In the face of these explanations that are found with
 so little effort, you will hardly recall without smiling the scientific
 explanations for the prohibition of incest. What inventions! By living
 together from early childhood the sexual attraction must have been
 diverted from these members of the family who are of opposite sex, or a
 biological tendency against in-breeding finds its psychic equivalent in
 an innate dread of incest! In this no account is taken of the fact that
 there would be no need of so unrelenting a prohibition by law and
 morality if there were any natural reliable guards against the
 temptation of incest. Just the opposite is true. The first choice of an
 object among human beings is regularly an incestuous one, in the man
 directed toward the mother and sister, and the most stringent laws are
 necessary to prevent this persisting infantile tendency from becoming
 active. Among the primitive races the prohibitions against incest are
 much more stringent than ours, and recently Th. Reik showed in a
 brilliant paper that the puberty-rites of the savages, which represent a
 rebirth, have the significance of loosing the incestuous bonds of the
 boy to his mother, and of establishing the reconciliation with the
 father.
 
 Mythology teaches that incest, apparently so abhorred by men, is
 permitted to the gods without further thought, and you may learn from
 ancient history that incestuous marriage with his sister was holy
 prescript for the person of the ruler (among the ancient Pharaohs and
 the Incas of Peru). We have here a privilege denied the common herd.
 
 Incest with his mother is one of the sins of Oedipus, patricide the
 other. It might also be mentioned that these are the two great sins
 which the first social-religious institution of mankind, totemism,
 abhors. Let us turn from the direct observation of the child to analytic
 investigation of the adult neurotic. What does analysis yield to the
 further knowledge of the Oedipus-complex? This is easily told. It shows
 the patient up in the light of the myth; it shows that each of these
 neurotics was himself an Oedipus or, what amounts to the same thing,
 became a Hamlet in the reaction to the complex. To be sure, the analytic
 representation of the Oedipus-complex enlarges upon and is a coarser
 edition of the infantile sketch. The hatred of the father, the
 death-wish with regard to him, are no longer timidly suggested, the
 affection for the mother recognizes the goal of possessing her for a
 wife. Dare we really accredit these horrible and extreme feelings to
 those tender childhood years, or does analysis deceive us by bringing in
 some new element? It is not difficult to discover this. Whenever an
 account of past events is given, be it written even by a historian, we
 must take into account the fact that inadvertently something has been
 interpolated from the present and from intervening times into the past;
 so that the entire picture is falsified. In the case of the neurotic it
 is questionable whether this interpolation is entirely unintentional or
 not; we shall later come to learn its motives and must justify the fact
 of "imagining back" into the remote past. We also easily discover that
 hatred of the father is fortified by numerous motives which originate in
 later times and circumstances, since the sexual wishes for the mother
 are cast in forms which are necessarily foreign to the child. But it
 would be a vain endeavor to explain the whole of the Oedipus-complex by
 "imagining back," and as related to later times. The infantile nucleus
 and more or less of what has been added to it continues to exist and may
 be verified by the direct observation of the child.
 
 The clinical fact which we meet with in penetrating the form of the
 Oedipus-complex as established by analysis, is of the greatest practical
 importance. We learn that at the period of puberty, when the sexual
 instinct first asserts its demands in full strength, the old incestuous
 and familiar objects are again taken up and seized anew by the libido.
 The infant's choice of an object was feeble, but it nevertheless set the
 direction for the choice of an object in puberty. At that time very
 intense emotional experiences are brought into play and directed towards
 the Oedipus-complex, or utilized in the reaction to it. However, since
 their presuppositions have become unsupportable, they must in large part
 remain outside of consciousness. From this time on the human individual
 must devote himself to the great task of freeing himself from his
 parents, and only after he has freed himself can he cease to be a child,
 and become a member of the social community. The task confronting the
 son consists of freeing himself from his libidinous wishes towards his
 mother and utilizing them in the quest for a really foreign object for
 his love. He must also effect a reconciliation with his father, if he
 has stayed hostile to him, or if in the reaction to his infantile
 opposition he has become subject to his domination, he must now free
 himself from this pressure. These tasks are set for every man; it is
 noteworthy how seldom their solution is ideally achieved, i.e., how
 seldom the solution is psychologically as well as socially correct.
 Neurotics, however, find no solution whatever; the son remains during
 his whole life subject to the authority of his father, and is not able
 to transfer his libido to a foreign sexual object. Barring the
 difference in the specific relation, the same fate may befall the
 daughter. In this sense the Oedipus-complex is correctly designated as
 the nucleus of the neurosis.
 
 You can imagine how rapidly I am reviewing a great number of conditions
 which are associated with the Oedipus-complex, of practical as well as
 of theoretical importance. I cannot enter upon their variations or
 possible inversions. Of its less immediate relations I only wish to
 indicate the influence which the Oedipus-complex has been found to exert
 on literary production. In a valuable book, Otto Rank has shown that the
 dramatists of all times have taken their materials principally from the
 Oedipus-and incest-complexes, with their variations and disguises.
 Moreover, we will not forget to mention that the two guilty wishes of
 Oedipus were recognized long before the time of psychoanalysis as the
 true representatives of the unrestrained life of impulses. Among the
 writings of the encyclopedist Diderot we find a famous dialogue, _The
 Nephew of Ramau_, which no less a person than Goethe has translated into
 German. In this you may read the remarkable sentence: "_If the little
 savage were left to himself he would preserve all his imbecility, he
 would unite the passions of a man of thirty to the unreasonableness of
 the child in the cradle; he would twist his father's neck and bed with
 his mother_."
 
 There is also one other thing of which I must needs speak. The
 mother-wife of Oedipus shall not have reminded us of the dream in vain.
 Do you still remember the result of our dream analysis, that the wishes
 out of which the dream is constructed so frequently are of a perverse,
 incestuous nature, or disclose an enmity toward near and beloved
 relatives the existence of which had never been suspected? At the time
 we did not trace the sources of these evil impulses. Now you may see
 them for yourselves. They represent the disposition made in early
 infancy of the libidinous energy, with the objects, long since given up
 in conscious life, to which it had once clung, which are now shown at
 night to be still present and in a certain sense capable of activity.
 But since all people have such perverse, incestuous and murderous
 dreams, and not the neurotics alone, we may conclude that even those who
 are normal have passed through the same evolutionary development,
 through the perversions and the direction of the libidio toward the
 objects of the Oedipus-complex. This, then, is the way of normal
 development, upon which the neurotics merely enlarge. They show in
 cruder form what dream analysis exposes in the healthy dreamer as well.
 Accordingly here is one of the motives which led us to deal with the
 study of the dream before we considered the neurotic symptom.
 
 
 
 
 TWENTY-SECOND LECTURE
 
 GENERAL THEORY OF THE NEUROSES
 
 _Theories of Development and Regression--Etiology_
 
 
 We have learned that the libidio goes through an extensive development
 before it can enter the service of reproduction in a way which may be
 regarded as normal. Now I wish to present to you what importance this
 fact possesses for the causation of neuroses.
 
 I believe we are in harmony with the teachings of general pathology in
 assuming that this development involves two dangers, inhibition and
 regression. In other words, with the universal tendency of biological
 processes toward variation, it must necessarily happen that not all
 preparatory phases of a given function are equally well passed through
 or accomplished with comparable thoroughness. Certain components of a
 function may be permanently held back in an early stage of development
 and the complete development is therefore retarded to a certain extent.
 
 Let us seek analogies for these processes from other fields. If a whole
 people leaves its dwellings to seek a new home, as frequently happened
 in the early periods of the history of mankind, their entire number will
 certainly not reach the new destination. Setting aside other losses,
 small groups or associations of these wandering peoples would stop on
 the way, and, while the majority passes on, they would settle down at
 these way-stations. Or, to seek a more appropriate comparison: You know
 that in the most highly evolved mammals, the male seminal glands, which
 originally are located in the far depths of the abdominal cavity, begin
 to wander during a certain period of intra-uterine life until they reach
 a position almost immediately under the skin of the pelvic extremity. In
 the case of a number of male individuals, one of the paired glands may
 as a result of this wandering remain in the pelvic cavity, or may be
 permanently located in the canal through which both glands must pass in
 their journey, or finally the canal itself may stay open permanently
 instead of growing together with the seminal glands after the change of
 position has taken place normally. When, as a young student, I was doing
 my first piece of scientific research under the direction of von Bruecke,
 I was working on the dorsal nerve-roots in the spinal cord of a small
 fish very archaic in form. I discovered that the nerve ganglia of these
 roots grow out from large cells which lie in the grey matter of the
 dorsal column, a condition no longer true of other vertebrates. But I
 soon discovered that such nerve cells are found outside the grey matter
 all the way to the so-called spinal ganglion of the dorsal root. From
 this I concluded that the cells of this group of ganglia had traveled
 from the spinal cord to the roots of the nerves. This same result is
 attested by embryology. In this little fish, however, the entire path of
 the journey was traceable by the cells that had remained behind. Closer
 observation will easily reveal to you the weak points of these
 comparisons. Therefore let me simply say that with reference to every
 single sexual impulse, I consider it possible for several of its
 components to be held back in the earlier stages of development while
 other components have worked themselves out to completion. You will
 realize that we think of every such impulse as a current continuously
 driving on from the very beginning of life, and that our resolving it
 into individual movements which follow separately one upon the other is
 to a certain extent artificial. Your impression that these concepts
 require further clarification is correct, but an attempt would lead to
 too great digression. Before we pass on, however, let us agree to call
 this arrest of a partial impulse in an early stage of development, a
 _fixation_ of the instinct.
 
 _Regression_ is the second danger of this development by stages. Even
 those components which have achieved a degree of progress may readily
 turn backward to these earlier stages. Having attained to this later and
 more highly developed form, the impulse is forced to a regression when
 it encounters great external difficulties in the exercise of its
 function, and accordingly cannot reach the goal which will satisfy its
 strivings. We can obviously assume that fixation and regression are not
 independent of each other. The stronger the fixations in the process of
 development prove to be, the more readily will the function evade
 external difficulties by a regression back to those fixations, and the
 less capable will the fully developed function be to withstand the
 hindrances that stand in the way of its exercise. Remember that if a
 people in its wandering has left large groups at certain way-stations,
 it is natural for those who have gone on to return to these stations if
 they are beaten or encounter a mighty foe. The more they have left on
 the way, however, the greater is their chance of defeat.
 
 For your comprehension of the neuroses it is necessary to keep in mind
 this connection between fixation and regression. This will give you a
 secure hold upon the question of the cause of neuroses--of the etiology
 of neuroses--which we shall soon consider.
 
 For the present we have still to discuss various aspects of regression.
 With the knowledge you have gained concerning the development of the
 function of libido, you must expect two kinds of regression: incestuous
 return to the first libidinous objects and return of the entire sexual
 organization to an earlier stage of development. Both occur in the
 transference neuroses and play an important part in its mechanism.
 Especially is the return to the first incestuous objects of libido a
 feature that the neurotic exhibits with positively tiresome regularity.
 We could say far more about regression of libido if we took into
 consideration another group of neuroses: neurotic narcism. But we cannot
 do this now. These conditions give us a clue to other stages of
 development of the function of libido, which have not been mentioned
 previously, and correspondingly show new kinds of regression. But I
 think the most important task before me at this point is to warn you not
 to confuse _regression_ and _suppression_, and aid you to see clearly
 the connection between the two processes. Suppression, as you know, is
 the process by which an act capable of becoming conscious, in other
 words, an act that belongs to the fore-conscious system, is rendered
 unconscious and accordingly is thrust back into the unconscious system.
 Similarly we speak of suppression when the unconscious psychic act never
 has been admitted into the adjoining fore-conscious system but is
 arrested by the censor at the threshold. Kindly observe that the
 conception of suppression has nothing to do with sexuality. It describes
 a purely psychological process, which could better be characterized by
 terming it _localized_. By that we mean that it is concerned with the
 spatial relationships within the psyche, or if we drop this crude
 metaphor, with building up the psychological apparatus out of separate,
 psychic systems.
 
 Through these comparisons we observe that up to this point we have not
 used the word regression in its general, but in a very special sense. If
 you accord it the general meaning of return from a higher to a lower
 stage of development you must include suppression as a form of
 regression, for suppression may also be described as the reversion to an
 earlier and lower stage in the development of a psychic act. Only in
 regard to suppression, this tendency to revert is not necessarily
 involved, for when a psychic act is held back in the early unconscious
 stage we also term it suppression in a dynamic sense. Suppression is a
 localized and dynamic conception, regression purely descriptive. What up
 this point we have called regression and considered in its relation to
 fixation, was only the return of libido to former stages of its
 development. The nature of this latter conception is entirely distinct
 and independent of suppression. We cannot call the libido regressions
 purely psychical processes and do not know what localization in the
 psychological apparatus we should assign to them. Even though the libido
 exerts a most powerful influence on psychic life, its organic
 significance is still the most conspicuous.
 
 Discussions of this sort, gentlemen, are bound to be somewhat dry. To
 render them more vivid and impressive, let us return to clinical
 illustrations. You know that hysteria and compulsion-neurosis are the
 two chief factors in the group of transference neuroses. In hysteria,
 libidinous return to primary, incestuous sexual objects is quite
 regular, but regression to a former stage of sexual organization very
 rare. In the mechanism of hysteria suppression plays the chief part. If
 you will permit me to supplement our previous positive knowledge of this
 neurosis by a constructive suggestion, I could describe the state of
 affairs in this manner: the union of the partial instincts under the
 domination of the genitals is accomplished, but its results encounter
 the opposition of the fore-conscious system which, of course, is bound
 up with consciousness. Genital organization, therefore, may stand for
 the unconscious but not for the fore-conscious. Through this rejection
 on the part of the fore-conscious, a situation arises which in certain
 aspects is similar to the condition existing before the genitals had
 attained their primacy. Of the two libido regressions, the regression to
 a former stage of sexual organization is by far the more conspicuous.
 Since it is lacking in hysteria and our entire conception of the
 neuroses is still too much dominated by the study of hysteria which
 preceded it in point of time, the meaning of libido regression became
 clearer to us much later than that of repression. Let us be prepared to
 widen and change our attitude still more when we consider other
 narcistic neuroses besides compulsion-neurosis and hysteria in our
 discussion.
 
 In contrast to this, regression of libido in compulsion-neurosis turns
 back most conspicuously to the earlier sadistico-anal organization,
 which accordingly becomes the most significant factor expressed by the
 symptoms. Under these conditions the love impulse must mask itself as a
 sadistic impulse. The compulsion idea must therefore be reinterpreted.
 Isolated from other superimposed factors, which though they are not
 accidental are also indispensable, it no longer reads: "I want to murder
 you"; rather it says "I want to enjoy you in love." Add to this, that
 simultaneously regression of the object has also set in, so that this
 impulse is invariably directed toward the nearest and dearest persons,
 and you can imagine with what horror the patient thinks of these
 compulsion ideas and how alien they appear to his conscious perception.
 In the mechanism of these neuroses, suppression, too, assumes an
 important part, which it is not easy to explain in a superficial
 discussion of this sort. Regression of the libido without suppression
 would never result in neurosis but would finally end in perversion. This
 makes it obvious that suppression is the process most characteristic of
 neurosis, and typifies it most perfectly. Perhaps I shall at some future
 time have the opportunity of presenting to you our knowledge of the
 mechanism of perversions and then you will see that here also things do
 not work themselves out as simply as we should best like to construe
 them.
 
 You will most readily reconcile yourself with these elucidations of
 fixation and regression, when you consider them as a preface to the
 investigation of the etiology of neuroses. Towards this I have only
 advanced a single fact: that people become neurotically ill when the
 possibility of satisfying their libido is removed, ill with "denial," as
 I expressed myself, and that their symptoms are the substitutes for the
 denied gratification. Of course, that does not mean that every denial of
 libidinous satisfaction makes every person neurotic, but merely that in
 all cases known of neurosis, the factor of denial was traceable. The
 syllogism therefore cannot be reversed. You also understand, I trust,
 that this statement is not supposed to reveal the entire secret of the
 etiology of neurosis, but only emphasizes an important and indispensable
 condition.
 
 Now, we do not know, in the further discussion of this statement,
 whether to emphasize the nature of denial or the individuality of the
 person affected by it. Denial is very rarely complete and absolute; to
 cause a pathological condition, the specific gratification desired by
 the particular person in question must be withheld, the certain
 satisfaction of which he alone is capable. On the whole there are many
 ways of enduring abstinence from libidinous gratification without
 succumbing to a neurosis by reason thereof. Above all we know of people
 who are able to endure abstinence without doing themselves injury; they
 are not happy under the circumstances, they are filled with yearning,
 but they do not become ill. Furthermore, we must take into consideration
 that the impulses of the sex instinct are extraordinarily _plastic_, if
 I may use that term in this connection. One thing may take the place of
 the other; one may assume the other's intensity; if reality refuses the
 one gratification, the satisfaction of another may offer full
 compensation. The sexual impulses are like a network of communicating
 channels filled with fluids; they are this in spite of their subjugation
 to the primacy of the genitals, though I realize it is difficult to
 unite these two ideas in one conception. The component impulses of
 sexuality as well as the total sexual desire, which represents their
 aggregate, show a marked ability to change their object, to exchange it,
 for instance, for one more easily attainable. This displacement and the
 readiness to accept substitutes must exert powerful influences in
 opposition to the pathological effect of abstinence. Among these
 processes which resist the ill effects of abstinence, one in particular
 has won cultural significance. Sexual desire relinquishes either its
 goal of partial gratification of desire, or the goal of desire toward
 reproduction, and adopts another aim, genetically related to the
 abandoned one, save that it is no longer sexual but must be termed
 social. This process is called "sublimation," and in adopting this
 process we subscribe to the general standard which places social aims
 above selfish sexual desires. Sublimation is, as a matter of fact, only
 a special case of the relation of sexual to non-sexual desires. We shall
 have occasion to talk more about this later in another connection.
 
 Now your impression will be that abstinence has become an insignificant
 factor, since there are so many methods of enduring it. Yet this is not
 the case, for its pathological power is unimpaired. The remedies are
 generally not sufficient. The measure of unsatisfied libido which the
 average human being can stand is limited. The plasticity and freedom of
 movement of libido is by no means retained to the same extent by all
 individuals; sublimation can, moreover, never account for more than a
 certain small fraction of the libido, and finally most people possess
 the capacity for sublimation only to a very slight degree. The most
 important of these limitations clearly lies in the adaptability of the
 libido, as it renders the gratification of the individual dependent upon
 the attainment of only a very few aims and objects. Kindly recall that
 incomplete development of the libido leaves extensive and possibly even
 numerous libido fixations in earlier developmental phases of the
 processes of sexual organization and object-finding, and that these
 phases are usually not capable of affording a real gratification. You
 will then recognize libido fixation as the second powerful factor which
 together with abstinence constitutes the causative factors of the
 illness. We may abbreviate schematically and say that libido fixation
 represents the internal disposing factor, abstinence the accidental
 external factor of the etiology of neurosis.
 
 I seize the opportunity to warn you of taking sides in a most
 unnecessary conflict. In scientific affairs it is a popular proceeding
 to emphasize a part of the truth in place of the whole truth and to
 combat all the rest, which has lost none of its verity, in the name of
 that fraction. In this way various factions have already separated out
 from the movement of psychoanalysis; one faction recognizes only the
 egoistic impulses and denies the sexual, another appreciates the
 influence of objective tasks in life, but ignores the part played by the
 individual past, and so on. Here is occasion for a similar antithesis
 and subject for dispute: are neuroses _exogenous_ or _endogenous_
 diseases, are they the inevitable results of a special constitution or
 the product of certain harmful (traumatic) impressions; in particular,
 are they called forth by libido fixation (and the sexual constitution
 which goes with this) or through the pressure of forbearance? This
 dilemma seems to me no whit wiser than another I could present to you:
 is the child created through the generation of the father or the
 conception of the mother? Both factors are equally essential, you will
 answer very properly. The conditions which cause neuroses are very
 similar if not precisely the same. For the consideration of the causes
 of neuroses, we may arrange neurotic diseases in a series, in which two
 factors, sexual constitution and experience, or, if you wish,
 libido-fixation and self-denial, are represented in such a way that one
 increases as the other decreases. At one end of the series are the
 extreme cases, of which you can say with full conviction: These persons
 would have become ill because of the peculiar development of their
 libido, no matter what they might have experienced, no matter how gently
 life might have treated them. At the other end are cases which would
 call forth the reversed judgment, that the patients would undoubtedly
 have escaped illness if life had not thrust certain conditions upon
 them. But in the intermediate cases of the series, predisposing sexual
 constitution and subversive demands of life combine. Their sexual
 constitution would not have given rise to neurosis if the victims had
 not had such experiences, and their experiences would not have acted
 upon them traumatically if the conditions of the libido had been
 otherwise. Within this series I may grant a certain preponderance to the
 weight carried by the predisposing factors, but this admission, too,
 depends upon the boundaries within which you wish to delimit
 nervousness.
 
 Allow me to suggest that you call such series _complementary series_. We
 shall have occasion to establish other series of this sort.
 
 The tenacity with which the libido clings to certain tendencies and
 objects, the so-called _adhesiveness_ of the libido, appears to us as an
 independent factor, individually variable, the determining conditions of
 which are completely unknown to us, but the importance of which for the
 etiology of the neuroses we can no longer underestimate. At the same
 time we must not overestimate the closeness of this interrelation. A
 similar adhesiveness of the libido occurs--for unknown reasons--in
 normal persons under various conditions, and is a determining factor in
 the perverse, who are in a certain sense the opposite of nervous. Before
 the period of psychoanalysis, it was known (Binet) that the anamnesia of
 the perverse is often traced back to an early impression--an abnormality
 in the tendency of the instinct or its choice of object--and it is to
 this that the libido of the individual has clung for life. Frequently it
 is hard to say how such an impression becomes capable of attracting the
 libido so intensively. I shall give you a case of this kind which I
 observed myself. A man, to whom the genital and all other sex stimuli of
 woman now mean nothing, who in fact can only be thrown into an
 irresistible sexual excitation by the sight of a shoe on a foot of a
 certain form, is able to recall an experience he had in his sixth year,
 which proved decisive for the fixation of his libido. One day he sat on
 a stool beside his governess, who was to give him an English lesson. She
 was an old, shriveled, unbeautiful girl with washed-out blue eyes and a
 pug nose, who on this day, because of some injury, had put a velvet
 slipper on her foot and stretched it out on a footstool; the leg itself
 she had most decorously covered. After a diffident attempt at normal
 sexual activity, undertaken during puberty, such a thin sinewy foot as
 his governess' had become the sole object of his sexuality; and the man
 was irresistibly carried away if other features, reminiscent of the
 English governess, appeared in conjunction with the foot. Through this
 fixation of the libido the man did not become neurotic but perverse, a
 foot fetishist, as we say. So you see that, although exaggerated and
 premature fixation of the libido is indispensable for the causation of
 neuroses, its sphere of action exceeds the limits of neuroses
 immeasurably. This condition also, taken by itself, is no more decisive
 than abstinence.
 
 And so the problem of the cause of neuroses seems to become more
 complicated. Psychoanalytic investigation does, in fact, acquaint us
 with a new factor, not considered in our etiological series, which is
 recognized most easily in those cases where permanent well-being is
 suddenly disturbed by an attack of neurosis. These individuals regularly
 show signs of contradiction between their wishes, or, as we are wont to
 say, indication of psychic _conflict_. A part of their personality
 represents certain wishes, another rebels against them and resists
 them. A neurosis cannot come into existence without such conflict. This
 may seem to be of small significance. You know that our psychic life is
 continually agitated by conflicts for which we must find a solution.
 Certain conditions, therefore, must exist to make such a conflict
 pathological. We want to know what these conditions are, what psychic
 powers form the background for these pathological conflicts, what
 relation the conflict bears to the causative factors.
 
 I hope I shall be able to give you satisfactory answers to these
 questions even if I must make them schematically brief. Self-denial
 gives rise to conflict, for libido deprived of its gratification is
 forced to seek other means and ends. A pathogenic conflict arises when
 these other means and ends arouse the disfavor of one part of the
 personality, and a veto ensues which makes the new mode of gratification
 impossible for the time being. This is the point of departure for the
 development of the symptoms, a process which we shall consider later.
 The rejected libidinous desires manage to have their own way, through
 circuitous byways, but not without catering to the objections through
 the observance of certain symptom-formation; the symptoms are the new or
 substitute satisfaction which the condition of self-denial has made
 necessary.
 
 We can express the significance of the psychic conflict in another way,
 by saying: the _outer_ self-denial, in order to become pathological,
 must be supplemented by an _inner_ self-denial. Outer denial removes one
 possibility of gratification, inner denial would like to exclude another
 possibility, and it is this second possibility which becomes the center
 of the ensuing conflict. I prefer this form of presentation because it
 possesses secret content. It implies the probability that the inner
 impediment found its origin in the prehistoric stage of human
 development in real external hindrances.
 
 What powers are these which interpose objections to libidinous desire,
 who are the other parties to the pathological conflict? They are, in the
 widest sense, the non-sexual impulses. We call them comprehensively the
 "ego impulses"; psychoanalysis of transference neuroses does not grant
 us ready access to their further investigation, but we learn to know
 them, in a measure, through the resistance they offer to analysis. The
 pathological struggle is waged between ego-impulses and sexual impulses.
 In a series of cases it appears as though conflict could exist between
 various purely sexual desires; but that is really the same thing, for of
 the two sexual desires involved in the conflict, one is always
 considerate of the ego, while the other demands that the ego be denied,
 and so it remains a conflict between the ego and sexuality.
 
 Again and again when psychoanalysis claimed that psychological event was
 the result of sexual impulses, indignant protest was raised that in
 psychic life there were other impulses and interests besides the sexual,
 that everything could not be derived from sexuality, etc. Well, it is a
 great pleasure to share for once the opinion of one's opponents.
 Psychoanalysis never forgot that non-sexual impulses exist. It insisted
 on the decided distinction between sexual and ego-impulses and
 maintained in the face of every objection not that neuroses arise from
 sexuality, but that they owe their origin to the conflict between
 sexuality and the ego. Psychoanalysis can have no reasonable motive for
 denying the existence or significance of ego-impulses, even though it
 investigates the influence sexual impulses play in illness and in life.
 Only it has been destined to deal primarily with sexual impulses,
 because transference neuroses have furnished the readiest access to
 their investigation, and because it had become obligatory to study what
 others had neglected.
 
 It does not follow, either, that psychoanalysis has never occupied
 itself at all with the non-sexual side of personality. The very
 distinction of the ego from sexuality has shown most clearly that the
 ego-impulses also pass through a significant development, which is by no
 means entirely independent of the development of the libido, nor does it
 fail to exert a reaction upon it. To be sure, we know much less about
 the evolution of the ego than about libido development, for so far only
 the study of narcistic neuroses has promised to throw light on the
 structure of the ego. There is extant the notable attempt of Ferenczi to
 construct theoretically the stages of ego development, and furthermore
 we already possess two fixed points from which to proceed in our
 evolution of this development. We do not dream of asserting that the
 libidinous interests of a person are from the outset opposed to the
 interests of self-preservation; in every stage, rather, the ego will
 strive to remain in harmony with its sexual organization at that time,
 and accommodate itself thereto. The succession of the separate phases
 of development of libido probably follows a prescribed program; but we
 cannot deny that this sequence can be influenced by the ego, and that a
 certain parallelism of the phases of development of the ego and the
 libido may also be assumed. Indeed, the disturbance of this parallelism
 could become a pathological factor. One of the most important insights
 we have to gain is the nature of the attitude which the ego exhibits
 when an intensive fixation of its libido is left behind in one stage of
 its development. It may countenance the fixation and accordingly become
 perverse or, what amounts to the same thing, become infantile. Or it may
 be averse to this attachment of the libido, the result of which is that
 wherever the libido is subject to _fixation_, there the ego undergoes
 _suppression_.
 
 In this way we reach the conclusion that the third factor of the
 etiology of neuroses is the tendency to _conflict_, upon which the
 development both of the ego and libido are dependent. Our insight into
 the causation of the neuroses has therefore been amplified. First, the
 most generalized factor, self-denial, then the fixation of the libido,
 by which it is forced into certain directions, and thirdly, the tendency
 to conflict in the development of the ego, which has rejected libidinous
 impulses of this kind. The state of affairs is therefore not so confused
 and difficult to see through, as you may have imagined it to be in the
 course of my explanation. But of course we are to discover that we have
 not, as yet, reached the end. We must add still a new factor and further
 analyze one we already know.
 
 To show you the influence of ego development in the formation of a
 conflict, and so to give an illustration of the causation of neuroses, I
 should like to cite an example which, although it is entirely imaginary,
 is not far removed from probability in any respect. Drawing upon the
 title of a farce by Nestroy, I shall label this example "On the ground
 floor and in the first story." The janitor lives on the ground floor,
 while the owner of the house, a rich, distinguished man, occupies the
 first story. Both have children, and we shall assume that the owner
 permits his little daughter to play unwatched with the child of the
 people. Then it may easily happen that the games of the children become
 "naughty," that is, they assume a sexual character; they play "father
 and mother," watch each other in the performance of intimate
 performances and mutually stimulate their genitals. The janitor's
 daughter, who, in spite of her five or six years of age, has had
 occasion to make observations on the sexuality of adults, probably
 played the part of the seducer. These experiences, even though they be
 of short duration, are sufficient to set in motion certain sexual
 impulses in both children, which continue in the form of onanism for
 several years after the common games have ceased. So far the
 consequences are similar; the final result will be very different. The
 janitor's daughter will continue onanism possibly to the commencement of
 her periods, abandon it then without difficulty, not many years later
 find a lover, perhaps bear a child, choose this or that path of life,
 which may likely enough make of her a popular artist who ends as an
 aristocrat. Perhaps the outcome will be less brilliant, but at any rate
 she will work out her life, free from neurosis, unharmed by her
 premature sexual activity. Very different is the effect on the other
 child. Even while she is very young she will realize vaguely that she
 has done wrong. In a short while, perhaps only after a violent struggle,
 she will renounce the gratification of onanism, yet still retain an
 undercurrent of depression in her attitude. If, during her early
 childhood, she chances to learn something about sexual intercourse, she
 will turn away in explicable disgust and seek to remain innocent.
 Probably she is at the time subjected anew to an irresistible impulse to
 onanism, of which she does not dare to complain. When the time arrives
 for her to find favor in the eyes of a man, a neurosis will suddenly
 develop and cheat her out of marriage and the joy of life. When analysis
 succeeds in gaining insight into this neurosis, it will reveal that this
 well-bred, intelligent girl of high ideals, has completely suppressed
 her sexual desires, but that unconsciously they cling to the meager
 experiences she had with the friend of her childhood.
 
 The difference of these two destinies, arising from the same experience,
 is due to the fact that one ego has experienced development while the
 other has not. The janitor's daughter in later years looks upon sexual
 intercourse as the same natural and harmless thing it had seemed in her
 childhood. The owner's daughter had experienced the influence of
 education and had recognized its claims. Thus stimulated, her ego had
 forged its ideals of womanly purity and lack of desire which, however,
 could not agree with any sexual activity; her intellectual development
 had made unworthy her interest in the woman's part she was to play. This
 higher moral and intellectual evolution of her ego was in conflict with
 the claims of her sexuality.
 
 I should like to consider today one more point in the development of the
 ego, partly because it opens wide vistas, partly because it will justify
 the sharp, perhaps unnatural line of division we are wont to draw
 between sexual and ego impulses. In estimating the several developments
 of ego and of libido, we must emphasize an aspect which has not
 frequently been appreciated heretofore. Both the ego and the libido are
 fundamentally heritages, abbreviated repetitions of an evolution which
 mankind has, in the course of long periods of time, traversed from
 primeval ages. The libido shows its phylogenetic origin most readily, I
 should say. Recall, if you please, that in one class of animals the
 genital apparatus is closely connected with the mouth, that in another
 it cannot be separated from the excretory apparatus, and in others it is
 attached to organs of locomotion. Of all these things you will find a
 most fascinating description in the valuable book of W. Boelsche. Animals
 portray, so to speak, all kinds of perversions which have become set as
 their permanent sexual organizations. In man this phylogenetic aspect is
 partly clouded by the circumstance that these activities, although
 fundamentally inherited, are achieved anew in individual development,
 presumably because the same conditions still prevail and still continue
 to exert their influence on each personality. I should say that
 originally they served to call forth an activity, where they now serve
 only as a stimulus for recollection. There is no doubt that in addition
 the course of development in each individual, which has been innately
 determined, may be disturbed or altered from without by recent
 influences. That power which has forced this development upon mankind,
 and which today maintains the identical pressure, is indeed known to us:
 it is the same self-denial enforced by the realities--or, given its big
 and actual name, _Necessity_, the struggle for existence, the [Greek]
 'Ananche. This has been a severe teacher, but under him we have become
 potent. The neurotics are those children upon whom this severity has had
 a bad effect--but there is risk in all education. This appreciation of
 the struggle of life as the moving force of development need not
 prejudice us against the importance of "innate tendencies in evolution"
 if their existence can be proved.
 
 It is worth noting that sexual instincts and instincts of
 self-preservation do not behave similarly when they are confronted with
 the necessities of actuality. It is easier to educate the instincts of
 self-preservation and everything that is connected with them; they
 speedily learn to adapt themselves to necessity and to arrange their
 development in accordance with the mandates of fact. That is easy to
 understand, for they cannot procure the objects they require in any
 other way; without these objects the individual must perish. The sex
 instincts are more difficult to educate because at the outset they do
 not suffer from the need of an object. As they are related almost
 parasitically to the other functions of the body and gratify themselves
 auto-erotically by way of their own body, they are at first withdrawn
 from the educational influence of real necessity. In most people, they
 maintain themselves in some way or other during the entire course of
 life as those characteristics of obstinacy and inaccessibility to
 influence which are generally collectively called unreasonableness. The
 education of youth generally comes to an end when the sexual demands are
 aroused to their full strength. Educators know this and act accordingly;
 but perhaps the results of psychoanalysis will influence them to
 transfer the greatest emphasis to the education of the early years, of
 childhood, beginning with the suckling. The little human being is
 frequently a finished product in his fourth or fifth year, and only
 reveals gradually in later years what has long been ready within him.
 
 To appreciate the full significance of the aforementioned difference
 between the two groups of instincts, we must digress considerably and
 introduce a consideration which we must needs call _economic_. Thereby
 we enter upon one of the most important but unfortunately one of the
 most obscure domains of psychoanalysis. We ask ourselves whether a
 fundamental purpose is recognizable in the workings of our psychological
 apparatus, and answer immediately that this purpose is the pursuit of
 pleasurable excitement. It seems as if our entire psychological activity
 were directed toward gaining pleasurable stimulation, toward avoiding
 painful ones; that it is regulated automatically by the _principle of
 pleasure_. Now we should like to know, above all, what conditions cause
 the creation of pleasure and pain, but here we fall short. We may only
 venture to say that pleasurable excitation _in some way_ involves
 lessening, lowering or obliterating the amount of stimuli present in the
 psychic apparatus. This amount, on the other hand, is increased by pain.
 Examination of the most intense pleasurable excitement accessible to
 man, the pleasure which accompanies the performance of the sexual act,
 leaves small doubt on this point. Since such processes of pleasure are
 concerned with the destinies of quantities of psychic excitation or
 energy, we call considerations of this sort economic. It thus appears
 that we can describe the tasks and performances of the psychic apparatus
 in different and more generalized terms than by the emphasis of the
 pursuit of pleasure. We may say that the psychic apparatus serves the
 purpose of mastering and bringing to rest the mass of stimuli and the
 stimulating forces which approach it. The sexual instincts obviously
 show their aim of pleasurable excitement from the beginning to the end
 of their development; they retain this original function without much
 change. The ego instincts strive at first for the same thing. But
 through the influence of their teacher, necessity, the ego instincts
 soon learn to adduce some qualification to the principle of pleasure.
 The task of avoiding pain becomes an objective almost comparable to the
 gain of pleasure; the ego learns that its direct gratification is
 unavoidably withheld, the gain of pleasurable excitement postponed, that
 always a certain amount of pain must be borne and certain sources of
 pleasure entirely relinquished. This educated ego has become
 "reasonable." It is no longer controlled by the principle of pleasure,
 but by the _principle of fact_, which at bottom also aims at pleasure,
 but pleasure which is postponed and lessened by considerations of fact.
 
 The transition from the pleasure principle to that of fact is the most
 important advance in the development of the ego. We already know that
 the sexual instincts pass through this stage unwillingly and late. We
 shall presently learn the consequence to man of the fact that his
 sexuality admits of such a loose relation to the external realities of
 his life. Yet one more observation belongs here. Since the ego of man
 has, like the libido, its history of evolution, you will not be
 surprised to hear that there are "ego-regressions," and you will want to
 know what role this return of the ego to former phases of development
 plays in neurotic disease.
 
 
 
 
 TWENTY-THIRD LECTURE
 
 GENERAL THEORY OF THE NEUROSES
 
 _The Development of the Symptoms_
 
 
 In the layman's eyes the symptom shows the nature of the disease, and
 cure means removal of symptoms. The physician, however, finds it
 important to distinguish the symptoms from the disease and recognizes
 that doing away with the symptoms is not necessarily curing the disease.
 Of course, the only tangible thing left over after the removal of the
 symptoms is the capacity to build new symptoms. Accordingly, for the
 time being, let us accept the layman's viewpoint and consider the
 understanding of the symptoms as equivalent to the understanding of the
 sickness.
 
 The symptoms,--of course, we are dealing here with psychic (or
 psychogenic) symptoms, and psychic illness--are acts which are
 detrimental to life as a whole, or which are at least useless;
 frequently they are obnoxious to the individual who performs them and
 are accompanied by distaste and suffering. The principal injury lies in
 the psychic exertion which they cost, and in the further exertion needed
 to combat them. The price these efforts exact may, when there is an
 extensive development of the symptoms, bring about an extraordinary
 impoverishment of the personality of the patient with respect to his
 available psychic energy, and consequently cripple him in all the
 important tasks of life. Since such an outcome is dependent on the
 amount of energy so utilized, you will readily understand that "being
 sick" is essentially a practical concept. But if you take a theoretical
 standpoint and disregard these quantitative relations, you can readily
 say that we are all sick, or rather neurotic, since the conditions
 favorable to the development of symptoms are demonstrable also among
 normal persons.
 
 As to the neurotic symptoms, we already know that they are the result of
 a conflict aroused by a new form of gratifying the libido. The two
 forces that have contended against each other meet once more in the
 symptom; they become reconciled through the compromise of a symptom
 development. That is why the symptom is capable of such resistance; it
 is sustained from both sides. We also know that one of the two partners
 to the conflict is the unsatisfied libido, frustrated by reality, which
 must now seek other means for its satisfaction. If reality remains
 inflexible even where the libido is prepared to take another object in
 place of the one denied it, the libido will then finally be compelled to
 resort to regression and to seek gratification in one of the earlier
 stages in its organizations already out-lived, or by means of one of the
 objects given up in the past. Along the path of regression the libido is
 enticed by fixations which it has left behind at these stages in its
 development.
 
 Here the development toward perversion branches off sharply from that of
 the neuroses. If the regressions do not awaken the resistance of the
 ego, then a neurosis does not follow and the libido arrives at some
 actual, even if abnormal, satisfaction. The ego, however, controls not
 alone consciousness, but also the approaches to motor innervation, and
 hence the realization of psychic impulses. If the ego then does not
 approve this regression, the conflict takes place. The libido is locked
 out, as it were, and must seek refuge in some place where it can find an
 outlet for its fund of energy, in accordance with the controlling
 demands for pleasurable gratification. It must withdraw from the ego.
 Such an evasion is offered by the fixations established in the course of
 its evolution and now traversed regressively, against which the ego had,
 at the time, protected itself by suppressions. The libido, streaming
 back, occupies these suppressed positions and thus withdraws from before
 the ego and its laws. At the same time, however, it throws off all the
 influences acquired under its tutelage. The libido could be guided so
 long as there was a possibility of its being satisfied; under the double
 pressure of external and internal denial it becomes unruly and harks
 back to former and more happy times. Such is its character,
 fundamentally unchangeable. The ideas which the libido now takes over in
 order to hold its energy belong to the system of the unconscious, and
 are therefore subject to its peculiar processes, especially elaboration
 and displacement. Conditions are set up here which are entirely
 comparable to those of dream formation. Just as the latent dream, the
 fulfillment of a wish-phantasy, is first built up in the
 unconsciousness, but must then pass through conscious processes before,
 censored and approved, it can enter into the compromise construction of
 the manifest dream, so the ideas representing the libido in the
 unconscious must still contend against the power of the fore-conscious
 ego. The opposition that has arisen against it in the ego follows it
 down by a "counter-siege" and forces it to choose such an expression as
 will serve at the same time to express itself. Thus, then, the symptom
 comes into being as a much distorted offshoot from the unconscious
 libidinous wish-fulfillment, an artificially selected ambiguity--with
 two entirely contradictory meanings. In this last point alone do we
 realize a difference between dream and symptom development, for the only
 fore-conscious purpose in dream formation is the maintenance of sleep,
 the exclusion from consciousness of anything which may disturb sleep;
 but it does not necessarily oppose the unconscious wish impulse with an
 insistent "No." Quite the contrary; the purpose of the dream may be more
 tolerant, because the situation of the sleeper is a less dangerous one.
 The exit to reality is closed only through the condition of sleep.
 
 You see, this evasion which the libido finds under the conditions of the
 conflict is possible only by virtue of the existing fixations. When
 these fixations are taken in hand by the regression, the suppression is
 side-tracked and the libido, which must maintain itself under the
 conditions of the compromise, is led off or gratified. By means of such
 a detour by way of the unconscious and the old fixations, the libido has
 at last succeeded in breaking its way through to some sort of
 gratification, however extraordinarily limited this may seem and however
 unrecognizable any longer as a genuine satisfaction. Now allow me to add
 two further remarks concerning this final result. In the first place, I
 should like you to take note of the intimate connection between the
 libido and the unconscious on the one hand, and on the other of the ego,
 consciousness, and reality. The connection that is evidenced here,
 however, does not indicate that originally they in any way belong
 together. I should like you to bear continually in mind that everything
 I have said here, and all that will follow, pertains only to the symptom
 development of hysterical neurosis.
 
 Where, now, can the libido find the fixations which it must have in
 order to force its way through the suppressions? In the activities and
 experiences of infantile sexuality, in its abandoned component-impulses,
 its childish objects which have been given up. The libido again returns
 to them. The significance of this period of childhood is a double one;
 on the one hand, the instinctive tendencies which were congenital in the
 child first showed themselves at this time; secondly, at the same time,
 environmental influences and chance experiences were first awakening his
 other instincts. I believe our right to establish this bipartite
 division cannot be questioned. The assertion that the innate disposition
 plays a part is hardly open to criticism, but analytic experience
 actually makes it necessary for us to assume that purely accidental
 experiences of childhood are capable of leaving fixations of the libido.
 I do not see any theoretical difficulties here. Congenital tendencies
 undoubtedly represent the after-effects of the experiences of an earlier
 ancestry; they must also have once been acquired; without such acquired
 characters there could be no heredity. And is it conceivable that the
 inheritance of such acquired characters comes to a standstill in the
 very generation that we have under observation? The significance of
 infantile experience, however, should not, as is so often done, be
 completely ignored as compared with ancestral experiences or those of
 our adult years; on the contrary, they should meet with an especial
 appreciation. They have such important results because they occur in the
 period of uncompleted development, and because of this very fact are in
 a position to cause a traumatic effect. The researches on the mechanics
 of development by Roux and others have shown us that a needle prick into
 an embryonic cell mass which is undergoing division results in most
 serious developmental disturbances. The same injury to a larva or a
 completed animal can be borne without injury.
 
 The libido fixation of adults, which we have referred to as
 representative of the constitutional factor in the etiological
 comparison of the neuroses, can be thought of, so far as we are
 concerned, as divisible into two separate factors, the inherited
 disposition and the tendency acquired in early childhood. We know that a
 schematic representation is most acceptable to the student. Let us
 combine these relations as follows:
 
                               Disposition as             accidental
   Cause of the                determined by              experiences
     neurosis           ==     libido fixation     +      (traumatic
                                                           element)
                                      |
            +-------------------------+------------------------+
            |                                                  |
      Sexual constitution                             Infantile experience
   (pre-historic experience)
 
 The hereditary sexual constitution provides us with manifold tendencies,
 varying with the special emphasis given one or the other component of
 the instinct, either individually or in combination. With the factor of
 infantile experience, there is again built up a complementary series
 within the sexual constitution which is perfectly comparable with our
 first series, namely, the gradations between disposition and the chance
 experiences of the adult. Here again we find the same extreme cases and
 similar relations in the matter of substitution. At this point the
 question becomes pertinent as to whether the most striking regressions
 of the libido, those which hark back to very early stages in sexual
 organization, are not essentially conditioned by the hereditary
 constitutional factor. The answer to this question, however, may best be
 put off until we are in a position to consider a wider range in the
 forms of neurotic disease.
 
 Let us devote a little time to the consideration of the fact that
 analytic investigation of neurotics shows the libido to be bound up with
 the infantile sexual experiences of these persons. In this light they
 seem of enormous importance for both the life and health of mankind.
 With respect to therapeutic work their importance remains undiminished.
 But when we do not take this into account we can herein readily
 recognize the danger of being misled by the situation as it exists in
 neurotics into adopting a mistaken and one-sided orientation toward
 life. In figuring the importance of the infantile experiences we must
 also subtract the influences arising from the fact that the libido has
 returned to them by regression, after having been forced out of its
 later positions. Thus we approach the opposite conclusion, that
 experiences of the libido had no importance whatever in their own time,
 but rather acquired it at the time of regression. You will remember that
 we were led to a similar alternative in the discussion of the
 Oedipus-complex.
 
 A decision on this matter will hardly be difficult for us. The statement
 is undoubtedly correct that the hold which the infantile experiences
 have on the libido--with the pathogenic influences this involves--is
 greatly augmented by the regression; still, to allow them to become
 definitive would nevertheless be misleading. Other considerations must
 be taken into account as well. In the first place, observation shows, in
 a way that leaves no room for doubt, that infantile experiences have
 their particular significance which is evidenced already during
 childhood. There are, furthermore, neuroses in children in which the
 factor of displacement in time is necessarily greatly minimized or is
 entirely lacking, since the illness follows as an immediate consequence
 of the traumatic experience. The study of these infantile neuroses keeps
 us from many dangerous misunderstandings of adult neuroses, just as the
 dreams of children similarly serve as the key to the understanding of
 the dreams of adults. As a matter of fact, the neuroses of children are
 very frequent, far more frequent than is generally believed. They are
 often overlooked, dismissed as signs of badness or naughtiness, and
 often suppressed by the authority of the nursery; in retrospect,
 however, they may be easily recognized later. They occur most frequently
 in the form of _anxiety hysteria_. What this implies we shall learn upon
 another occasion. When a neurosis breaks out in later life, analysis
 regularly shows that it is a direct continuation of that infantile
 malady which had perhaps developed only obscurely and incipiently.
 However, there are cases, as already stated, in which this childish
 nervousness continues, without any interruption, as a lifelong
 affliction. We have been able to analyze a very few examples of such
 neuroses during childhood, while they were actually going on; much more
 often we had to be satisfied with obtaining our insight into the
 childhood neurosis subsequently, when the patient is already well along
 in life, under conditions in which we are forced to work with certain
 corrections and under definite precautions.
 
 Secondly, we must admit that the universal regression of the libido to
 the period of childhood would be inexplicable if there were nothing
 there which could exert an attraction for it. The fixation which we
 assume to exist towards specific developmental phases, conveys a meaning
 only if we think of it as stabilizing a definite amount of libidinous
 energy. Finally, I am able to remind you that here there exists a
 complementary relationship between the intensity and the pathogenic
 significance of the infantile experiences to the later ones which is
 similar to that studied in previous series. There are cases in which the
 entire causal emphasis falls upon the sexual experiences of childhood,
 in which these impressions take on an effect which is unmistakably
 traumatic and in which no other basis exists for them beyond what the
 average sexual constitution and its immaturity can offer. Side by side
 with these there are others in which the whole stress is brought to bear
 by the later conflicts, and the emphasis the analysis places on
 childhood impressions appears entirely as the work of regression. There
 are also extremes of "retarded development" and "regression," and
 between them every combination in the interaction of the two factors.
 
 These relations have a certain interest for that pedagogy which assumes
 as its object the prevention of neuroses by an early interference in the
 sexual development of the child. So long as we keep our attention fixed
 essentially on the infantile sexual experiences, we readily come to
 believe we have done everything for the prophylaxis of nervous
 afflictions when we have seen to it that this development is retarded,
 and that the child is spared this type of experience. Yet we already
 know that the conditions for the causation of neuroses are more
 complicated and cannot in general be influenced through one single
 factor. The strict protection in childhood loses its value because it is
 powerless against the constitutional factor; furthermore, it is more
 difficult to carry out than the educators imagine, and it brings with it
 two new dangers that cannot be lightly dismissed. It accomplishes too
 much, for it favors a degree of sexual suppression which is harmful for
 later years, and it sends the child into life without the power to
 resist the violent onset of sexual demands that must be expected during
 puberty. The profit, therefore, which childhood prophylaxis can yield is
 most dubious; it seems, indeed, that better success in the prevention of
 neuroses can be gained by attacking the problem through a changed
 attitude toward facts.
 
 Let us return to the consideration of the symptoms. They serve as
 substitutes for the gratification which has been forborne, by a
 regression of the libido to earlier days, with a return to former
 development phases in their choice of object and in their organization.
 We learned some time ago that the neurotic is held fast somewhere in his
 past; we now know that it is a period of his past in which his libido
 did not miss the satisfaction which made him happy. He looks for such a
 time in his life until he has found it, even though he must hark back to
 his suckling days as he retains them in his memory or as he reconstructs
 them in the light of later influences. The symptom in some way again
 yields the old infantile form of satisfaction, distorted by the
 censoring work of the conflict. As a rule it is converted into a
 sensation of suffering and fused with other causal elements of the
 disease. The form of gratification which the symptom yields has much
 about it that alienates one's sympathy. In this we omit to take into
 account, however, the fact that the patients do not recognize the
 gratification as such and experience the apparent satisfaction rather as
 suffering, and complain of it. This transformation is part of the
 psychic conflict under the pressure of which the symptom must be
 developed. What was at one time a satisfaction for the individual must
 now awaken his antipathy or disgust. We know a simple but instructive
 example for such a change of feeling. The same child that sucked the
 milk with such voracity from its mother's breast is apt to show a strong
 antipathy for milk a few years later, which is often difficult to
 overcome. This antipathy increases to the point of disgust when the
 milk, or any substituted drink, has a little skin over it. It is rather
 hard to throw out the suggestion that this skin calls up the memory of
 the mother's breast, which was once so intensely coveted. In the
 meantime, to be sure, the traumatic experience of weaning has
 intervened.
 
 There is something else that makes the symptoms appear remarkable and
 inexplicable as a means of libidinous satisfaction. They in no way
 recall anything from which we normally are in the habit of expecting
 satisfaction. They usually require no object, and thereby give up all
 connection with external reality. We understand this to be a result of
 turning away from fact and of returning to the predominance of
 pleasurable gratification. But it is also a return to a sort of
 amplified autoeroticism, such as was yielded the sex impulse in its
 earliest satisfactions. In the place of a modification in the outside
 world, we have a physical change, in other words, an internal reaction
 in place of an external one, an adjustment instead of an activity.
 Viewed from a phylogenetic standpoint, this expresses a very significant
 regression. We will grasp this better when we consider it in connection
 with a new factor which we are still to discover from the analytic
 investigation of symptom development. Further, we recall that in symptom
 formation the same processes of the unconscious have been at work as in
 dream formation--elaboration and displacement. Similarly to the dream,
 the symptom represents a fulfillment, a satisfaction after the manner of
 the infantile; by the utmost elaboration this satisfaction can be
 compressed into a single sensation or innervation, or by extreme
 displacement it may be restricted to a tiny element of the entire
 libidinous complex. It is no wonder that we often have difficulties in
 recognizing in the symptom the libidinous satisfaction which we
 anticipate and always find verified.
 
 I have indicated that we must still become familiar with a new factor.
 It is something really surprising and confusing. You know that by
 analysis of the symptoms we arrive at a knowledge of the infantile
 experiences upon which the libido is fixated and out of which the
 symptoms are formed. Well, the surprising thing is this, that these
 infantile scenes are not always true. Indeed, in the majority of cases
 they are untrue, and in some instances they are directly contrary to
 historical truth. You see that this discovery, as no other, serves
 either to discredit the analysis which has led to such a result, or to
 discredit the patients upon whose testimony the analysis, as well as the
 whole understanding of neuroses, is built up. In addition there is
 something else utterly confusing about it. If the infantile experiences,
 revealed by analysis, were in every case real, we should have the
 feeling of walking on sure ground; if they were regularly falsified,
 disclosed themselves as inventions or phantasies of the patients, we
 should have to leave this uncertain ground and find a surer footing
 elsewhere. But it is neither the one nor the other, for when we look
 into the matter we find that the childhood experiences which are
 recalled or reconstructed in the course of the analysis may in some in
 some instances be false, in others undeniably true, and in the majority
 of cases a mixture of truth and fiction. The symptoms then are either
 the representation of actual experiences to which we may ascribe an
 influence in the fixation of the libido, or the representation of
 phantasies of the patient which, of course, can be of no etiological
 significance. It is hard to find one's way here. The first foothold is
 given perhaps by an analogous discovery, namely, that the same scattered
 childhood memories that individuals always have had and have been
 conscious of prior to an analysis may be falsified as well, or at least
 may contain a generous mixture of true and false. Evidence of error very
 seldom offers difficulties, and we at least gain the satisfaction of
 knowing that the blame for this unexpected disappointment is not to be
 laid at the door of analysis, but in some way upon the patients.
 
 After reflecting a bit we can easily understand what is so confusing in
 this matter. It is the slight regard for reality, the neglect to keep
 fact distinct from phantasy. We are apt to feel insulted that the
 patient has wasted our time with invented tales. There is an enormous
 gap in our thinking between reality and invention and we accord an
 entirely different valuation to reality. The patient, too, takes this
 same viewpoint in his normal thinking. When he offers the material
 which, by way of the symptom, leads back to the wish situations which
 are modeled upon the childhood experiences, we are at first, to be sure,
 in doubt whether we are dealing with reality or with phantasy. Later
 certain traits determine this decision; we are confronted with the task
 of acquainting the patient with them. This can never be accomplished
 without difficulty. If at the outset we tell him that he is going to
 reveal phantasies with which he has veiled his childhood history, just
 as every people weaves myths around its antiquity, we notice (to our
 comfort) that his interest in the further pursuit of the subject
 suddenly diminishes. He, too, wants to discover realities, and despises
 all "notions." But if until this is accomplished we allow him to believe
 that we are investigating the actual occurrences of his childhood, we
 run the risk of later being charged with error and with our apparent
 gullibility. For a long time he is unable to reconcile himself to the
 idea of considering phantasy and reality on equal terms and he tends,
 with reference to the childish experiences to be explained, to neglect
 for the time being the difference between the real and the imaginary.
 And yet this is obviously the only correct attitude toward these
 psychological products because they are, in a sense, real. It is a fact
 that the patient is able to create such phantasies for himself, and this
 is of scarcely less importance for his neurosis than if he had really
 undergone the experience which he imagines. These phantasies possess
 _psychological_ reality in contrast to _physical_ reality, and so we
 gradually come to understand that _in the realm of neuroses the
 psychological reality is the determining factor_.
 
 Among the experiences which recur continually in the early history of
 neurotics and, in fact, are never lacking, some are of particular
 significance and accordingly I consider them worthy of special
 treatment. I shall enumerate a few examples of this species: observation
 of the parental intercourse, seduction by an adult, and the threat of
 castration. It would be a grievous error to assume that physical reality
 can never be accorded them; this may often be proved beyond doubt by the
 testimony of adult relatives. So, for example, it is not at all unusual
 if the little boy who begins to play with his penis, and does not yet
 know that one must conceal this, is threatened by his parents or nurse
 with the cutting off of the organ or the guilty hand. Parents often
 admit upon questioning that they thought they had done the right thing
 by this intimidation; many individuals retain a correct, conscious
 memory of these threats, especially if it has occurred in later
 childhood. When the mother or some other woman makes the threat she
 usually delegates the responsibility of executing it to the father or to
 the doctor. In the famous _Struwelpeter_ by the pediatrist Hoffman, of
 Frankfort, rhymes which owe their popularity to his very fine
 understanding of the sexual and other complexes of childhood, you find a
 milder substitute for castration in the cutting off of the thumbs as a
 punishment for insistent sucking. But it is highly improbable that the
 threat of castration is actually made as often as it occurs in the
 analyses of neurotics. We are content to understand that the child
 imaginatively constructs this threat for himself from suggestions, from
 the knowledge that auto-erotic satisfaction is forbidden, and from the
 impression of castration he has received in discovering the female
 genital. It is, moreover, in no way impossible that the little child, so
 long as he is not credited with any understanding or memory, will, even
 in families outside the proletariat, become a witness to the sexual act
 between his parents or some other group-ups, and it cannot be disproved
 that the child _subsequently_ understands this impression, and may react
 upon it. But when this intercourse is described with minute details
 which could hardly have been observed, or if it turns out to be, as it
 so frequently does, an intercourse which was not face to face, _more
 ferarum_, there is no longer any doubt that this phantasy is derived
 from the observation of the intercourse of animals (dogs) and the
 unsatisfied curiosity of the child in his period of puberty. The
 greatest feat of the imagination is the phantasy of having witnessed the
 coitus of the parents while still unborn in the mother's womb. Of
 especial interest is the phantasy of having been seduced, because so
 often it is not a phantasy at all, but a real memory. But luckily it is
 not real so often as first appears from the results of analysis.
 Seduction by older children, or children of the same age, is much more
 frequent than seduction by adults, and if, in the case of little girls,
 the father quite regularly appears as the seducer in the occurrences
 which they relate, neither the fantastic nature of this accusation nor
 its motive can be doubted. The child as a rule covers the autoerotic
 period of his sexual activity, where there has been no actual seduction,
 with the seduction-phantasy. He spares himself the shame of onanism by
 imagining the presence of an object for his desires in that early
 period. As a matter of fact, you must not be misled in attributing
 sexual misuse of the child by its nearest male relatives solely and
 always to phantasy. Most analysts have probably treated cases in which
 such relations were real and could be proved beyond doubt, with the
 qualification that in such cases they belong to the later years of
 childhood and were transposed to an earlier time.
 
 We cannot avoid the impression that such experiences of childhood are in
 some way necessary to the neurosis, that they are claimed by its iron
 rule. If they exist in reality, then well and good, but if reality has
 withheld them they are constructed from suggestions and supplemented by
 the imagination. The result is the same, and to this day we have been
 unable to trace any difference in the results, whether fancy or fact
 played the larger part in these childish occurrences. Here again we
 encounter one of the complementary relationships so frequently met with;
 it is, to be sure, the most estranging of all those we have become
 acquainted with. Whence comes the need for these phantasies, and the
 material for them? There can be no doubt as to the sources of the
 impulse, but we must explain why the same phantasies are always created
 with the same content. I have an answer in readiness which I know you
 will think very far-fetched. I am of the opinion that these _primal
 phantasies_--so I should like to term these, and certainly some others
 also--are a phylogenetic possession. In them the individual reaches out
 beyond his own life, into the experiences of antiquity, where his own
 experience has become all too rudimentary. It seems very possible to me
 that everything which is obtained during an analysis in the guise of
 phantasy, the seduction of children, the release of sexual excitement by
 watching parental intercourse, the threat of castration--or rather
 castration itself--were once realities in the primeval existence of
 mankind and that the imaginative child is merely filling in the gaps of
 individual truth with prehistoric truth. We have again and again
 suspected that the psychology of neuroses stores up more of the
 antiquities of human development than all other sources.
 
 What we have just discussed makes it necessary for us to enter further
 into the origin and significance of that mental activity that is called
 imagination. As you well know, it enjoys universal esteem, although we
 have never clearly understood its place in the psychic life. I have this
 much to say about it. As you know, the ego of man is slowly educated by
 the influence of external necessity to an appreciation of reality and a
 pursuit of the principle of reality, and must therefore renounce
 temporarily or permanently various objects and goals of its strivings
 for satisfaction, sexual and otherwise. But renunciation of
 gratification has always been difficult for man. He cannot accomplish it
 without something in the nature of compensation. Accordingly he has
 reserved for himself a psychological activity wherein all these
 abandoned sources of pleasures and means of pleasurable gratification
 are granted a further existence, a form of existence in which they are
 freed from the requirements of reality and what we like to call the test
 of reality. Every impulse is soon transformed into the form of its own
 fulfillment. There is no doubt that dwelling on the imagined fulfillment
 of a given wish affords some satisfaction, although the realization that
 it is unreal is unobscured. In the activity of the imagination, man
 enjoys that freedom from external compulsion that he has long since
 renounced. He has made it possible to be alternately a pleasure-seeking
 animal and a reasoning human being. He finds that the scant satisfaction
 that he can force out of reality is not enough. "There is no getting
 along without auxiliary-constructions," Th. Fontaine once said. The
 creation of the psychic realm of fancy has its complete counterpart in
 the establishment of "preserves" and "conservation projects" in those
 places where the demands of husbandry, traffic and industry threaten
 quickly to change the original face of the earth into something
 unrecognizable. The national reserves maintain this old condition of
 things, which otherwise has everywhere been regretfully sacrificed to
 necessity. Everything may grow and spread there as it will, even that
 which is useless and harmful. The psychic realm of phantasy is such a
 reservation withdrawn from the principles of reality.
 
 The best known productions of phantasy are the so-called "day dreams,"
 which we already know, pictured satisfactions of ambitious, of covetous
 and erotic wishes, which flourish the more grandly the more reality
 admonishes them to modesty and patience. There is unmistakably shown in
 them the nature of imaginative happiness, the restoration of the
 independence of pleasurable gratification from the acquiescence of
 reality. We know such day dreams are nuclei and models for the dreams of
 night. The night dream is essentially nothing but a day dream, distorted
 by the nocturnal forms of psychological activity, and made available by
 the freedom which the night gives to instinctive impulses. We have
 already become acquainted with the idea that a day dream is not
 necessarily conscious, that there are also unconscious day dreams. Such
 unconscious day dreams are as much the source of night dreams as of
 neurotic symptoms.
 
 The significance of phantasy for the development of symptoms will become
 clear to you by the following: We have said that in a case of
 renunciation, the libido occupies regressively the positions once
 abandoned by it, to which, nevertheless, it has clung in certain ways.
 We shall neither retract this statement nor correct it, but we shall
 insert a missing link. How does the libido find its way to these points
 of fixation? Well, every object and tendency of the libido that has been
 abandoned, is not abandoned in every sense of the word. They, or their
 derivatives, are still held in presentations of the phantasy, with a
 certain degree of intensity. The libido need only retire to the
 imagination in order to find from them the open road to all suppressed
 fixations. These phantasies were happy under a sort of tolerance, there
 was no conflict between them and the ego, no matter how acute the
 contrast, so long as a certain condition was observed--a condition
 _quantitative_ in nature that is now disturbed by the flowing back of
 the libido to the phantasies. By this addition the accumulation of
 energy in the phantasies is heightened to such a degree that they become
 assertive and develop a pressure in the direction of realization. But
 that makes a conflict between them and the ego inevitable. Whether
 formerly conscious or unconscious, they now are subject to suppression
 by the ego and are victims to the attraction of the unconscious. The
 libido wanders from phantasies now unconscious to their sources in
 unconsciousness, and back to its own points of fixation.
 
 The return of the libido to phantasy is an intermediate step on the road
 to symptom development and well deserves a special designation. C. G.
 Jung coined for it the very appropriate name of _introversion_, but
 inappropriately he also lets it stand for other things. Let us therefore
 retain the idea that introversion signifies the turning aside of the
 libido from the possibilities of actual satisfaction and the excessive
 accumulation of the phantasies hitherto tolerated as harmless. An
 introvert is not yet a neurotic, but he finds himself in a labile
 situation; he must develop symptoms at the next dislocation of forces,
 if he does not find other outlets for his pent-up libido. The intangible
 nature of neurotic satisfaction and the neglect of the difference
 between imagination and reality are already determined by arrest in the
 phase of introversion.
 
 You have certainly noticed that in the last discussions I have
 introduced a new factor into the structure of the etiological chain,
 namely, the quantity, the amount of energy that comes under
 consideration. We must always take this factor into account. Purely
 qualitative analysis of the etiological conditions is not sufficient.
 Or, to put it in another way, a _dynamic_ conception alone of these
 psychic processes is not enough; there is need of an _economic_
 viewpoint. We must say to ourselves that the conflict between two
 impulses is not released before certain occupation-intensities have been
 reached, even though the qualitative conditions have long been potent.
 Similarly, the pathogenic significance of the constitutional factors is
 guided by how much _more_ of a given component impulse is present in the
 predisposition over and above that of another; one can even conceive the
 predispositions of all men to be qualitatively the same and to be
 differentiated only by these quantitative conditions. The quantitative
 factor is no less important for the power of resistance against neurotic
 ailments. It depends upon _what amount_ of unused libido a person can
 hold freely suspended, and upon _how large a fraction_ of the libido he
 is able to direct from the sexual path to the goal of sublimation. The
 final goal of psychological activity, which may be described
 qualitatively as striving towards pleasure-acquisition and avoidance of
 unpleasantness, presents itself in the light of economic considerations
 as the task of overcoming the gigantic stimuli at work in the
 psychological apparatus, and to prevent those obstructions which cause
 unpleasantness.
 
 So much I wanted to tell you about symptom development in the neuroses.
 Yes, but do not let me neglect to emphasize this especially: everything
 I have said here relates to the symptom development in hysteria. Even in
 compulsion neuroses, which retain the same fundamentals, much is found
 that is different. The counter-siege directed against the claims of the
 instincts, of which we have spoken in connection with hysteria, press to
 the fore in compulsion neuroses, and control the clinical picture by
 means of so-called "reaction-formations." The same kind and more
 far-reaching variations are discoverable among the other neuroses, where
 the investigations as to the mechanism of symptom development have in no
 way been completed.
 
 Before I leave you today I should like to have your attention for a
 while for an aspect of imaginative life which is worthy of the most
 general interest. For there is a way back from imagination to reality
 and that is--art. The artist is an incipient introvert who is not far
 from being a neurotic. He is impelled by too powerful instinctive needs.
 He wants to achieve honor, power, riches, fame and the love of women.
 But he lacks the means of achieving these satisfactions. So like any
 other unsatisfied person, he turns away from reality, and transfers all
 his interests, his libido, too, to the elaboration of his imaginary
 wishes, all of which might easily point the way to neurosis. A great
 many factors must combine to present this termination of his
 development; it is well known how often artists especially suffer from a
 partial inhibition of their capacities through neurosis. Apparently
 their constitutions are strongly endowed with an ability to sublimize
 and to shift the suppression determining their conflicts. The artist
 finds the way back to reality in this way. He is not the only one who
 has a life of imagination. The twilight-realm of phantasy is upheld by
 the sanction of humanity and every hungry soul looks here for help and
 sympathy. But for those who are not artists, the ability to obtain
 satisfaction from imaginative sources is very restricted. Their
 relentless suppressions force them to be satisfied with the sparse day
 dreams which may become conscious. If one is a real artist he has more
 at his disposal. In the first place, he understands how to elaborate his
 day dreams so that they lose their essentially personal element, which
 would repel strangers, and yield satisfaction to others as well. He also
 knows how to disguise them so that they do not easily disclose their
 origin in their despised sources. He further possesses the puzzling
 ability of molding a specific material into a faithful image of the
 creatures of his imagination, and then he is able to attach to this
 representation of his unconscious phantasies so much pleasurable
 gratification that, for a time at least, it is able to outweigh and
 release the suppressions. If he is able to accomplish all this, he makes
 it possible for others, in their return, to obtain solace and
 consolation from their own unconscious sources of gratification which
 had become inaccessible. He wins gratitude and admiration for himself
 and so, by means of his imagination, achieves the very things which had
 at first only an imaginary existence for him: honor, power, and the love
 of women.
 
 
 
 
 TWENTY-FOURTH LECTURE
 
 GENERAL THEORY OF THE NEUROSES
 
 _Ordinary Nervousness_
 
 
 In our last discussion we accomplish a difficult task. Now I shall
 temporarily leave our subject and address myself to you.
 
 For I know quite well that you are dissatisfied. You thought that an
 introduction to psychoanalysis would be quite a different matter. You
 expected to hear vivid illustrations instead of theories. You will tell
 me that when I gave you the illustration of "on the ground floor in the
 first story," you had grasped something of the causation of neurosis,
 only of course this should have been a real observation and not an
 imaginary story. Or, when in the beginning I described two symptoms (not
 imaginary also, let us hope) whose analysis revealed a close connection
 with the life of the patient, you first came to grasp the meaning of the
 symptoms and you hoped that I would proceed in the same way. Instead I
 have given you theories--lengthy, difficult to see in perspective and
 incomplete, to which something new was constantly being added. I worked
 with conceptions that I had not previously presented to you, abandoned
 descriptive for dynamic conceptions, and these in turn for economic
 ones. I made it hard for you to understand how many of the artificial
 terms I made use of still carry the same meaning and are used
 interchangeably only for the sake of euphony. Finally, I allowed broad
 conceptions to pass in review before you: the principles of pleasure and
 of fact and their phylogenetically inherited possession; and then,
 instead of introducing you to definite facts, I allowed them to become
 increasingly vague till they seemed to fade into dim distances.
 
 Why did I not begin my introduction to the theory of neurosis with the
 facts that you yourselves know about nervousness, with something that
 has always aroused your interest, with the peculiar temperament of
 nervous people, their incomprehensible reactions to external influences,
 to human intercourse, their irritability, their uselessness? Why did I
 not lead you step by step from the understanding of simple, everyday
 forms to the problems of mysterious and extreme manifestations of
 nervousness?
 
 I cannot even say that you are wrong. I am not so infatuated with my art
 of representation as to see some special attraction in every blemish. I
 myself believe that I could have proceeded differently, to your better
 advantage, and this indeed had been my intention. But one cannot always
 carry out one's sensible intentions. The nature of the subject matter
 issues its own commands, and easily modifies our plans. Even so usual a
 performance as the organization of well-known material is not entirely
 subject to the particular purposes of the author. It forms itself as it
 will and later one wonders why it turned out so and not otherwise.
 
 Probably one of the reasons is that the title, _A General Introduction
 to Psychoanalysis_, no longer applies to this part, which deals with the
 neuroses. The introduction to psychoanalysis is found in the study of
 errors and the dream; the theory of neurosis is psychoanalysis itself. I
 do not think that in so short a time I could have given you a knowledge
 of the theory of neurosis other than in concentrated form. It was
 necessary to present to you connectedly the meaning and interpretation
 of the symptoms, their external and internal conditions and their
 bearing on the mechanism of symptom formation. This I have attempted to
 do; it is practically the nucleus of the material that modern
 psychoanalysis is able to offer. We had to say quite a good deal
 concerning the libido and its development, and something as well
 concerning the development of the ego. The introduction had already
 prepared you for the presuppositions of our technique, for the large
 aspects of the unconscious and of suppression (resistance). In a
 subsequent lecture you will learn from what points psychoanalysis
 proceeds organically. For the present I have not sought to hide from you
 the fact that all our results are based on the study of a single group
 of nervous affections, the so-called transference neuroses. Though you
 have gained no positive knowledge and have not retained every detail,
 still I hope that you have a fair picture of the methods, the problems
 and the results of psychoanalysis.
 
 I have assumed that it was your wish for me to begin my presentation of
 neuroses with a description of nervous behavior, the nature of neurotic
 suffering, and the way in which the nervous meet the conditions of their
 illness and adapt themselves to these. Such subject matter is certainly
 interesting and well worth knowing. It is moreover not very hard to
 handle, yet it is not wise to begin with its consideration. There is
 danger of not discovering the unconscious, of overlooking the great
 significance of the libido, of judging all conditions as they appear to
 the ego of the nervous person. It is obvious that this ego is neither a
 reliable nor an impartial authority. For this very ego is the force that
 denies and suppresses the unconscious; when the unconscious is
 concerned, how then could we expect justice to be done? The rejected
 claims of sexuality stand first in the line of these suppressions; it is
 natural that from the standpoint of the ego we can never learn their
 extent and significance. As soon as we attain to the point of view of
 suppression, we are sufficiently warned not to make one of the
 contending factions, above all not to make the victor judge of the
 struggle. We are prepared to find that the testimony of the ego may lead
 us astray. If one is to believe the evidence of the ego, it would appear
 to have been active all along, all its symptoms would have been actively
 willed and formed. Yet we know that it has passively allowed a great
 deal to occur, a fact which it subsequently seeks to conceal and to
 palliate. To be sure, it does not always attempt this; in the case of
 the symptoms of compulsion neurosis it must admit that it is being
 opposed by something alien, which it can resist only with difficulty.
 
 Whoever does not heed these warnings not to mistake the prevarications
 of the ego for truth, has clear sailing; he avoids all the resistances
 which oppose the psychoanalytic emphasis upon the unconscious, on
 sexuality, and on the passiveness of the ego. He will assert with Alfred
 Adler that the "nervous character" is the cause instead of the result of
 the neurosis, but he will not be able to explain a single detail of
 symptom formation or to interpret a single dream.
 
 You will ask: Is it not possible to do justice to the part the ego plays
 in nervousness and in symptom formation without crudely neglecting the
 factors revealed by psychoanalysis? I answer you: Surely it must be
 possible and at some time or other it will take place; but the methods
 by which we organize the work of psychoanalysis do not favor our
 beginning with just this task. We can foresee the time when this task
 will claim the attention of psychoanalysis. There are forms of neuroses,
 the so-called narcistic neuroses, in which the ego is far more deeply
 involved than in anything we have studied heretofore. The analytic
 investigation of these conditions will enable us to judge reliably and
 impartially the part that the ego plays in neurotic illness.
 
 One of the relations which the ego bears to its neurosis is so obvious
 that it must be considered at the very outset. In no case does it seem
 to be absent, and it is most clearly recognizable in the traumatic
 neuroses, conditions which we do not as yet clearly understand. You must
 know that in the causation and mechanisms of all possible forms of
 neurosis, the same factors are active again and again; it is only the
 emphasis that is shifted from one to the other of these factors in
 symptom formation. The members of a company of actors each have certain
 parts to play--hero, villain, confidant, etc.--yet each will select a
 different drama for his benefit. Thus the phantasies which undergo
 conversion into symptoms are especially easy to detect in hysteria;
 compulsion neuroses are essentially dominated by the reactionary
 formations, or counter-seizures of the ego; what we designate as
 _secondary elaboration_ in dreams dominates paranoia in the form of
 delusions, etc.
 
 In traumatic neuroses, particularly if they are caused by the horrors of
 war, we are especially impressed by a selfish ego-impulse which seeks
 protection and personal advantage. This in itself is not a sufficient
 cause for illness, but it can favor its beginning and also feed its
 needs once it has been established. This motive serves to protect the
 ego from the dangers whose imminence precipitated the disease, and does
 not permit convalescence until the recurrence of these dangers seems
 impossible, or until compensation has been obtained for the danger that
 has been undergone.
 
 But the ego betrays similar interest in the origin and maintenance of
 all other neuroses. We have already said that the ego suffers the
 symptom to exist, because one of its phases gratifies the egoistic
 tendency toward suppression. Besides, the ending of the conflict by
 means of symptom development is the path of least resistance, and a
 most convenient solution for the principle of pleasure. Through symptom
 formation the ego is undoubtedly spared a severe and unpleasant inner
 task. There are cases where even the physician must admit that the
 resolution of the conflict into neurosis is the most harmless outcome
 and one most easily tolerated by society. Do not be surprised, then, to
 learn that occasionally even the physician takes the part of the illness
 he is battling against. He does not have to restrict himself to the role
 of the fanatic warrior for health in all situations of life. He knows
 that the world contains not only neurotic misery, but also real,
 incurable suffering. He knows that necessity may even require a human
 being to sacrifice his health, and he learns that by this sacrifice on
 the part of one individual untold wretchedness may be spared for many
 others. So if we say that the neurotic escapes the conflict _by taking
 refuge in illness_, we must admit that in some cases this escape is
 justifiable, and the physician who has diagnosed the state of affairs
 will retire silently and tactfully.
 
 But let us not consider these special cases in our further discussion.
 In average cases the ego, by having recourse to neurosis, obtains a
 certain inner _advantage from the disease_. Under certain conditions of
 life, there may also be derived a tangible external advantage, more or
 less valuable in reality. Let me direct your attention to the most
 frequent occurrences of this sort. Women who are brutally treated and
 mercilessly exploited by their husbands almost always adopt the evasion
 of the neurosis, provided that their predisposition permits this. This
 usually follows when the woman is too cowardly or too virtuous to seek
 secret solace in the arms of another, or when she dare not separate from
 her husband in the face of all opposition, when she has no prospect of
 maintaining herself or of finding a better husband and especially when
 her sexual emotions still bind her to this brutal man. Her illness
 becomes a weapon in her struggle with him, one that she can use for
 self-protection and misuse for purposes of vengeance. She probably dare
 not complain of her marriage, but she can complain of her illness. The
 doctor becomes her assistant. She forces her inconsiderate husband to
 spare her, to attend to her wishes, to permit her absence from the house
 and thus free her from the oppressions of her married life. Wherever
 such external or accidental gain through illness is considerable and
 can find no substitute in fact, you can prophesy that the possibility of
 influencing neurosis through therapy is very slight.
 
 You will tell me that what I have said about the advantage gained from
 the disease speaks entirely for the hypothesis I have rejected, namely,
 that the ego itself wills and creates the neurosis. Just a moment! It
 probably does not mean more than that the ego passively suffers the
 neurosis to exist, which it is unable to prevent anyway. It makes the
 most of the neurosis, if anything can be made of it at all. This is only
 one side of the question, the advantageous side. The ego is willing to
 endure the advantages of the neurosis, but there are not only
 advantages. As a rule it soon appears that the ego has made a poor deal
 in accepting the neurosis. It has paid too high a price for the
 mitigation of the conflict; and the sensations of suffering which the
 symptoms bring with them are perhaps every bit as bad as the agonies of
 conflict, usually they cause even greater discomfort. The ego wants to
 rid itself of the pain of the symptoms without relinquishing the gain of
 illness, and that is impossible. Thus the ego is discovered as by no
 means so active as it had thought itself to be, and this we want to keep
 in mind.
 
 If you were to come into contact with neurotics as a physician, you
 would soon cease to expect that those who complain most woefully of
 their illness are the ones who will oppose its therapy with the least
 resistance or who will welcome any help. On the contrary, you would
 readily understand that everything contributing to the advantage derived
 from the disease will strengthen the resistance to the suppression and
 heighten the difficulty of the therapy. We must also add another and
 later advantage to the gain of illness which is born with the symptom.
 If a psychic organization, such as this illness, has persisted for a
 long time, it finally behaves as an independent unit, it expresses
 something like self-preservation, attains a kind of _modus vivendi_
 between itself and other parts of psychic life, even those that are
 fundamentally hostile to it. And occasions will probably arise where it
 can prove again to be both useful and valuable, by which it will attain
 a _secondary function_, which gives strength to its existence. Instead
 of an illustration from pathology take a striking example from everyday
 life. An efficient workman who earns his living is crippled for his
 occupation by some disaster; his work is over for him. After a while,
 however, he receives a small accident insurance, and learns to exploit
 his injury by begging. His new existence, though most undesirable, is
 based upon the very thing that robbed him of his former maintenance. If
 you could cure his defect, he would be without a means of subsistence,
 he would have no livelihood. The question would arise: Is he capable of
 resuming his former work? That which corresponds to such secondary
 exploitation of illness in neurosis we may add to the primary benefit
 derived therefrom and may term it a _secondary_ advantage of disease.
 
 In general I should like to warn you not to underestimate the practical
 significance of the advantage from illness and yet not to be too much
 impressed by it theoretically. Aside from the previously recognized
 exceptions, I am always reminded of Oberlaender's pictures on "the
 intelligence of animals" which appeared in the _Fliegende Blaetter_. An
 Arab is riding a camel on a narrow path cut through a steep mountain
 side. At a turn of the trail he is suddenly confronted by a lion who
 makes ready to spring. He sees no way out, on one side the precipice, on
 the other the abyss; retreat and flight--both are impossible; he gives
 himself up as lost. Not so the camel. He leaps into the abyss with his
 rider--and the lion is left in the lurch. The help of neurosis is as a
 rule no kinder to the rider. It may be due to the fact that the
 settlement of the conflict through symptom development is nevertheless
 an automatic process, not able to meet the demands of life, and for
 whose sake man renounces the use of his best and loftiest powers. If it
 were possible to choose, it were indeed best to perish in an honorable
 struggle with destiny.
 
 I still owe you further explanation as to why, in my presentation of the
 theory of neurosis, I did not proceed from ordinary nervousness as a
 starting point. You may assume that, had I done this, the proof of the
 sexual origin of neurosis would have been more difficult for me, and so
 I refrained. There you are mistaken. In transference neurosis we must
 work at interpretations of the symptoms to arrive at this conclusion. In
 the ordinary forms of the so-called true neuroses, however, the
 etiological significance of sexual life is a crude fact open to
 observation. I discovered it twenty years ago when I asked myself one
 day why we regularly barred out questions concerning sexual activity in
 examining nervous patients. At that time I sacrificed my popularity
 among my patients to my investigations, yet after a brief effort I could
 state that no neurosis, no true neurosis at least, is present with a
 normal sexual life. Of course, this statement passes too lightly over
 the individual differences, it is unclear through the vagueness with
 which it uses the term "normal," but even to-day it retains its value
 for purposes of rough orientation. At that time I reached the point of
 drawing comparisons between certain forms of nervousness and sexual
 abnormalities, and I do not doubt that I could repeat the same
 observations now, if similar material were at my disposal. I frequently
 noticed that a man who contented himself with incomplete sexual
 gratification, with manual ononism, for instance, would suffer from a
 true neurosis, and that this neurosis would promptly give way to another
 form, if another sexual regime no less harmful were substituted. From
 the change in the condition of the patient I was able to guess the
 change in the mode of his sexual life. At that time I learned to hold
 obstinately to my conjectures until I had overcome the patient's
 prevarications and had forced him to confirm my suppositions. To be
 sure, then he preferred to consult other physicians who did not inquire
 so insistently into his sexual life.
 
 At that time it did not escape my notice that the origin of the disease
 could not always be traced back to sexual life; sexual abnormality would
 cause the illness in one person, while another would fall ill because he
 had lost his fortune or had suffered an exhausting organic disease. We
 gained insight into this variation by means of the interrelations
 between the ego and the libido, and the more profound our insight
 became, the more satisfactory were the results. A person begins to
 suffer from neurosis when his ego has lost the capacity of accommodating
 the libido. The stronger the ego, the easier the solution of the
 problem; a weakening of the ego from any cause whatsoever has the same
 effect as a superlative increase of the claims of the libido. There are
 other and more intimate relations between the ego and the libido which I
 shall not discuss, as we are not concerned with them here. To us it is
 of enlightening significance that in every case, regardless of the way
 in which the illness was caused, the symptoms of neurosis were opposed
 by the libido and thus gave evidence for its abnormal use.
 
 Now, however, I want to draw your attention to the difference between
 the symptoms of the true neuroses and the psychoneuroses, the first
 group of which, the transference neurosis, has occupied us considerably.
 In both cases the symptoms proceed from the libido. They are accordingly
 abnormal uses of it, substitutes for gratification. But the symptoms of
 the true neurosis--such as pressure in the head, sensations of pain,
 irritability of an organ, weakening or inhibition of a function--these
 have no meaning, no psychic significance. They are manifested not only
 in the body, as for instance hysteric symptoms, but are in themselves
 physical processes whose creation is devoid of all the complicated
 psychic mechanism with which we have become acquainted. They really
 embody the character that has so long been attributed to the
 psychoneurotic symptom. But how can they then correspond to uses of the
 libido, which we have come to know as a psychological force? That is
 quite simple. Let me recall one of the very first objections that was
 made to psychoanalysis. It was stated that psychoanalysis was concerned
 with a purely psychological theory of neurotic manifestations; that this
 was a hopeless outlook since psychological theories could never explain
 illness. The objectors chose to forget that the sexual function is
 neither purely psychic nor merely somatic. It influences physical as
 well as psychic life. In the symptoms of the psychoneuroses we have
 recognized the expression of a disturbance in psychic processes. And so
 we shall not be surprised to discover that the true neuroses are the
 direct somatic consequences of sexual disturbances.
 
 The medical clinic gives us a valuable suggestion (observed by many
 research workers) for the comprehension of the true neuroses. In all the
 details of their symptomatology, and as well in their characteristic
 power to influence all organic systems and all functions, the true
 neuroses reveal a marked similarity to the conditions of those diseases
 which originate through the chronic influence of foreign poisons and as
 well through their acute diminution; with conditions prevalent in
 intoxication and abstinence. The two groups of conditions are brought
 still closer together by the relation of intermediate conditions, which,
 following M. Basedowi, we have learned to attribute to the influence of
 toxic substances, but of toxins, however, which are not introduced into
 the body from without, but arise in its own metabolism. These analogies,
 I think, lead us directly to the consideration of these neuroses as
 disturbances in sexual metabolism. It may be that more sexual toxins are
 produced than the individual can dispose of, or that inner, even psychic
 conditions, stand in the way of the proper elaboration of these
 substances. The language of the people has always favored such
 assumptions as to the nature of sexual desires. It calls love an
 "intoxication"; it will have love-madness aroused through potions, and
 thus sees the motive force removed, as it were, to the outer world. For
 the rest, the phrase "sexual metabolism" or "chemism of sexuality" is a
 chapter-head without content. We know nothing about it and cannot even
 decide whether we are to assume two sexual substances, the male and the
 female, or, if there is only _one_ sexual toxin, which to consider the
 carrier of all the stimulating power of the libido. The structure of
 psychoanalysis that we have erected is really only a superstructure
 which at some future time must be placed upon its organic foundation;
 but what this is we do not know as yet.
 
 Psychoanalysis is characterized as a science, not by reason of the
 subject matter it handles but by the technique it employs. This can be
 employed in dealing with the history of civilization, the science of
 religion or mythology, as well as with the theory of neurosis, without
 altering its character. The revealing of the unconscious in psychic life
 is all it aims to accomplish. The problems of the true neuroses, whose
 symptoms probably originate in direct toxic damage, yield no point of
 attack to psychoanalysis. Psychoanalysis can do little for their
 elucidation, and must leave the task to biological-medical research.
 Perhaps you understand now why I did not choose to organize my material
 differently. If I had given to you an _Introduction to the Theory of the
 Neuroses_ as you wished, it would unquestionably have been correct to
 proceed from the simple forms of the true neuroses to those complex
 illnesses caused by a disturbance of the libido. In discussing the true
 neuroses I would have had to bring together the facts we have gleaned
 from various quarters and present what we think we know of them. Only
 later, under the psychoneuroses, would psychoanalysis have been
 discussed as the most important technical aid for insight into these
 conditions. I had, however, intended and announced _A General
 Introduction to Psychoanalysis_, and it seemed to me more important to
 give you an idea of psychoanalysis than to present certain positive
 facts about neuroses; and so I could not place the true neuroses into
 the foreground, for they prove sterile for the purposes of
 psychoanalysis. I believe that I have made the wiser choice for you,
 since psychoanalysis deserves the interest of every educated person
 because of its profound hypotheses and far-reaching connections. The
 theory of neurosis, on the other hand, is a chapter of medicine like any
 other.
 
 You are, however, justified in expecting some interest on our part in
 the true neuroses. Because of their intimate connection with
 psychoneuroses we find this decidedly necessary. I shall tell you then
 that we distinguish three pure forms of true neuroses: _neurasthenia_,
 _anxiety neurosis_ and _hypochondria_. Even this classification has not
 remained uncontradicted. The terms are all widely used, but their
 connotation is vague and uncertain. Besides, there are in this world of
 confusion physicians who object to any distinctions between
 manifestations, any emphasis of clinical detail, who do not even
 recognize the separation of true neuroses and psychoneuroses. I think
 they have gone too far and have not chosen the road which leads to
 progress. The types of neuroses we have mentioned occur occasionally in
 pure form; more often they are blended with one another or with a
 psychoneurotic condition. This need not discourage us to the extent of
 abandoning the task of distinction. Think of the difference between the
 study of minerals and that of ores in mineralogy. Minerals are described
 as individuals; frequently of course they occur as crystals, separated
 sharply from their surroundings. Ores consist of an aggregate of
 minerals which have coalesced not accidentally, but as a result of the
 conditions of their origin. We understand too little of the process of
 development of neuroses, to create anything similar to the study of
 ores. But we are surely working in the right direction when we isolate
 the known clinical factors, comparable to the separate minerals, from
 the great mass.
 
 A noteworthy connection between the symptoms of the true neuroses and
 the psychoneuroses adds a valuable contribution to our knowledge of
 symptom formation in the latter. The symptom in the true neuroses is
 frequently the nucleus and incipient stage of development of the
 psychoneurotic symptom. Such a connection is most easily observed
 between neurasthenia and the transference neuroses, which are termed
 conversion hysteria, between anxiety neurosis and anxiety hysteria, but
 also between hypochondria and paraphrenia (dementia praecox and
 paranoia), forms of neuroses of which we shall speak subsequently. Let
 us take as an illustration the hysteric headache or backache. Analysis
 shows that through elaboration and displacement this pain has become the
 gratification substitute for a whole series of libidinous phantasies or
 reminiscences. But once upon a time this pain was real, a direct sexual
 toxic symptom, the physical expression of libidinous excitation. We do
 not wish to assert, by any means, that all hysteric symptoms can be
 traced to such a nucleus, but it is true that this is frequently the
 case, and that all influences upon the body through libidinous
 excitation, whether normal or pathological, are especially significant
 for the symptom development in hysteria. They play the part of the grain
 of sand which the mollusc has enveloped in mother-of-pearl. In the same
 way passing signs of sexual excitation, which accompany the sexual act,
 are used by psychoneurosis as the most convenient and appropriate
 material for symptom formation.
 
 A similar procedure is of diagnostic and therapeutic interest
 especially. Persons who are disposed to be neurotic, without suffering
 from a flourishing neurosis, frequently set in motion the work of
 symptom development as the result of an abnormal physical change--often
 an inflammation or an injury. This development rapidly makes the symptom
 given by reality the representative of the unconscious phantasies that
 had been lurking for an opportunity to seize upon a means of expression.
 In such a case the physician will try different ways of therapy. Either
 he will try to do away with the organic basis without bothering about
 its noisy neurotic elaboration, or he will struggle with the neurosis
 brought out by the occasion, and ignore its organic cause. The result
 will justify now one, now the other method of procedure; no general laws
 can be laid down for such mixed cases.
 
 
 
 
 TWENTY-FIFTH LECTURE
 
 GENERAL THEORY OF THE NEUROSES
 
 _Fear and Anxiety_
 
 
 Probably you will term what I told you about ordinary nervousness in my
 last lecture most fragmentary and unsatisfactory information. I know
 this, and I think you were probably most surprised that I did not
 mention fear, which most nervous people complain of and describe as
 their greatest source of suffering. It can attain a terrible intensity
 which may result in the wildest enterprises. But I do not wish to fall
 short of your expectations in this matter. I intend, on the contrary, to
 treat the problem of the fear of nervous people with great accuracy and
 to discuss it with you at some length.
 
 Fear itself needs no introduction; everyone has at some time or other
 known this sensation or, more precisely, this effect. It seems to me
 that we never seriously inquired why the nervous suffered so much more
 and so much more intensely under this condition. Perhaps it was thought
 a matter of course; it is usual to confuse the words "nervous" and
 "anxious" as though they meant the same thing. That is unjustifiable;
 there are anxious people who are not nervous, and nervous people who
 suffer from many symptoms, but not from the tendency to anxiety.
 
 However that may be, it is certain that the problem of fear is the
 meeting point of many important questions, an enigma whose complete
 solution would cast a flood of light upon psychic life. I do not claim
 that I can furnish you with this complete solution, but you will
 certainly expect psychoanalysis to deal with this theme in a manner
 different from that of the schools of medicine. These schools seem to be
 interested primarily in the anatomical cause of the condition of fear.
 They say the medulla oblongata is irritated, and the patient learns that
 he is suffering from neurosis of the nervus vague. The medulla
 oblongata is a very serious and beautiful object. I remember exactly how
 much time and trouble I devoted to the study of it, years ago. But today
 I must say that I know of nothing more indifferent to me for the
 psychological comprehension of fear, than knowledge of the nerve passage
 through which these sensations must pass.
 
 One can talk about fear for a long time without even touching upon
 nervousness. You will understand me without more ado, when I term this
 fear _real_ fear in contrast to _neurotic_ fear. Real fear seems quite
 rational and comprehensible to us. We may testify that it is a reaction
 to the perception of external danger, viz., harm that is expected and
 foreseen. It is related to the flight reflex and may be regarded as an
 expression of the instinct of self-preservation. And so the occasions,
 viz., the objects and situations which arouse fear, will depend largely
 on our knowledge of and our feeling of power over the outer world. We
 deem it quite a matter of course that the savage fears a cannon or an
 eclipse of the sun, while the white man, who can handle the instrument
 and prophesy the phenomenon, does not fear these things. At other times
 superior knowledge promulgates fear, because it recognizes the danger
 earlier. The savage, for instance, will recoil before a footprint in the
 woods, meaningless to the uninstructed, which reveals to him the
 proximity of an animal of prey; the experienced sailor will notice a
 little cloud, which tells him of a coming hurricane, with terror, while
 to the passenger it seems insignificant.
 
 After further consideration, we must say to ourselves that the verdict
 on real fear, whether it be rational or purposeful, must be thoroughly
 revised. For the only purposeful behavior in the face of imminent danger
 would be the cool appraisal of one's own strength in comparison with the
 extent of the threatening danger, and then decide which would presage a
 happier ending: flight, defense, or possibly even attack. Under such a
 proceeding fear has absolutely no place; everything that happens would
 be consummated just as well and better without the development of fear.
 You know that if fear is too strong, it proves absolutely useless and
 paralyzes every action, even flight. Generally the reaction against
 danger consists in a mixture of fear and resistance. The frightened
 animal is afraid and flees. But the purposeful factor in such a case is
 not fear but flight.
 
 We are therefore tempted to claim that the development of fear is never
 purposeful. Perhaps closer examination will give us greater insight into
 the fear situation. The first factor is the expectancy of danger which
 expresses itself in heightened sensory attention and in motor tension.
 This expectancy is undoubtedly advantageous; its absence may be
 responsible for serious consequences. On the one hand, it gives rise to
 motor activity, primarily to flight, and on a higher plane to active
 defense; on the other hand, it gives rise to something which we consider
 the condition of fear. In so far as the development is still incipient,
 and is restricted to a mere signal, the more undisturbed the conversion
 of the readiness to be afraid into action the more purposeful the entire
 proceeding. The readiness to be afraid seems to be the purposeful
 aspect; evolution of fear itself, the element that defeats its own
 object.
 
 I avoid entering upon a discussion as to whether our language means the
 same or distinct things by the words anxiety, fear or fright. I think
 that anxiety is used in connection with a condition regardless of any
 objective, while fear is essentially directed toward an object. Fright,
 on the other hand, seems really to possess a special meaning, which
 emphasizes the effects of a danger which is precipitated without any
 expectance or readiness of fear. Thus we might say that anxiety protects
 man from fright.
 
 You have probably noticed the ambiguity and vagueness in the use of the
 word "anxiety." Generally one means a subjective condition, caused by
 the perception that an "evolution of fear" has been consummated. Such a
 condition may be called an emotion. What is an emotion in the dynamic
 sense? Certainly something very complex. An emotion, in the first place,
 includes indefinite motor innervations or discharges; secondly, definite
 sensations which moreover are of two kinds, the perception of motor
 activities that have already taken place, and the direct sensations of
 pleasure and pain, which give the effect of what we call its feeling
 tone. But I do not think that the true nature of the emotion has been
 fathomed by these enumerations. We have gained deeper insight into some
 emotions and realize that the thread which binds together such a complex
 as we have described is the repetition of a certain significant
 experience. This experience might be an early impression of a very
 general sort, which belongs to the antecedent history of the species
 rather than to that of the individual. To be more clear: the emotional
 condition has a structure similar to that of an hysterical attack; it is
 the upshot of a reminiscence. The hysteric attack, then, is comparable
 to a newly formed individual emotion, the normal emotion to an hysteria
 which has become a universal heritage.
 
 Do not assume that what I have said here about emotions is derived from
 normal psychology. On the contrary, these are conceptions that have
 grown up with and are at home only in psychoanalysis. What psychology
 has to say about emotions--the James-Lange theory, for instance--is
 absolutely incomprehensible for us psychoanalysts, and cannot be
 discussed. Of course, we do not consider our knowledge about emotions
 very certain; it is a preliminary attempt to become oriented in this
 obscure region. To continue: We believe we know the early impression
 which the emotion of fear repeats. We think it is birth itself which
 combines that complex of painful feelings, of a discharge of impulses,
 of physical sensations, which has become the prototype for the effect of
 danger to life, and is ever after repeated within us as a condition of
 fear. The tremendous heightening of irritability through the
 interruption of the circulation (internal respiration) was at the time
 the cause of the experience of fear; the first fear was therefore toxic.
 The name anxiety--angustial--narrowness, emphasizes the characteristic
 tightening of the breath, which was at the time a consequence of an
 actual situation and is henceforth repeated almost regularly in the
 emotion. We shall also recognize how significant it is that this first
 condition of fear appeared during the separation from the mother. Of
 course, we are convinced that the tendency to repetition of the first
 condition of fear has been so deeply ingrained in the organism through
 countless generations, that not a single individual can escape the
 emotion of fear; not even the mythical Macduff who was "cut out of his
 mother's womb," and therefore did not experience birth itself. We do not
 know the prototype of the condition of fear in the case of other
 mammals, and so we do not know the complex of emotions that in them is
 the equivalent of our fear.
 
 Perhaps it will interest you to hear how the idea that birth is the
 source and prototype of the emotion of fear, happened to occur to me.
 Speculation plays the smallest part in it; I borrowed it from the native
 train of thought of the people. Many years ago we were sitting around
 the dinner table--a number of young physicians--when an assistant in the
 obstetrical clinic told a jolly story of what had happened in the last
 examination for midwives. A candidate was asked what it implied if
 during delivery the foeces of the newborn was present in the discharge
 of waters, and she answered promptly "the child is afraid." She was
 laughed at and "flunked." But I silently took her part and began to
 suspect that the poor woman of the people had, with sound perception,
 revealed an important connection.
 
 Proceeding now to neurotic fear, what are its manifestations and
 conditions? There is much to be described. In the first place we find a
 general condition of anxiety, a condition of free-floating fear as it
 were, which is ready to attach itself to any appropriate idea, to
 influence judgment, to give rise to expectations, in fact to seize any
 opportunity to make itself felt. We call this condition "expectant fear"
 or "anxious expectation." Persons who suffer from this sort of fear
 always prophesy the most terrible of all possibilities, interpret every
 coincidence as an evil omen, and ascribe a dreadful meaning to all
 uncertainty. Many persons who cannot be termed ill show this tendency to
 anticipate disaster. We blame them for being over-anxious or
 pessimistic. A striking amount of expectant fear is characteristic of a
 nervous condition which I have named "anxiety neurosis," and which I
 group with the true neuroses.
 
 A second form of fear in contrast to the one we have just described is
 psychologically more circumscribed and bound up with certain objects or
 situations. It is the fear of the manifold and frequently very peculiar
 phobias. Stanley Hall, the distinguished American psychologist, has
 recently taken the trouble to present a whole series of these phobias in
 gorgeous Greek terminology. They sound like the enumeration of the ten
 Egyptian plagues, except that their number exceeds ten, by far. Just
 listen to all the things which may become the objects of contents of a
 phobia: Darkness, open air, open squares, cats, spiders, caterpillars,
 snakes, mice, thunder-storms, sharp points, blood, enclosed spaces,
 crowds, solitude, passing over a bridge, travel on land and sea, etc. A
 first attempt at orientation in this chaos leads readily to a division
 into three groups. Some of the fearful objects and situations have
 something gruesome for normal people too, a relation to danger, and so,
 though they are exaggerated in intensity, they do not seem
 incomprehensible to us. Most of us, for instance, experience a feeling
 of repulsion in the presence of a snake. One may say that snakephobia is
 common to all human beings, and Charles Darwin has described most
 impressively how he was unable to control his fear of a snake pointing
 for him, though he knew he was separated from it by a thick pane of
 glass. The second group consists of cases which still bear a relation to
 danger, but this is of a kind which we are disposed to belittle rather
 than to overestimate. Most of the situation-phobia belong here. We know
 that by taking a railroad journey we entail greater chance of disaster
 than by staying at home. A collision, for instance, may occur, or a ship
 sink, when as a rule we must drown; yet we do not think of these
 dangers, and free from fear we travel on train and boat. We cannot deny
 that if a bridge should collapse at the moment we are crossing it, we
 would fall into the river, but that is such a rare occurrence that we do
 not take the danger into account. Solitude too has its dangers and we
 avoid it under certain conditions; but it is by no means a matter of
 being unable to suffer it for a single moment. The same is true for the
 crowd, the enclosed space, the thunder-storm, etc. It is not at all the
 content but the intensity of these neurotic phobias that appears strange
 to us. The fear of the phobia cannot even be described. Sometimes we
 almost receive the impression that the neurotic is not really afraid of
 the same things and situations that can arouse fear in us, and which he
 calls by the same name.
 
 There remains a third group of phobias which is entirely unintelligible
 to us. When a strong, adult man is afraid to cross a street or a square
 of his own home town, when a healthy, well-developed woman becomes
 almost senseless with fear because a cat has brushed the hem of her
 dress or a mouse has scurried through the room--how are we to establish
 the relation to danger that obviously exists under the phobia? In these
 animal phobias it cannot possibly be a question of the heightening of
 common human antipathies. For, as an illustration of the antithesis,
 there are numerous persons who cannot pass a cat without calling and
 petting it. The mouse of which women are so much afraid, is at the same
 time a first class pet name. Many a girl who has been gratified to have
 her lover call her so, screams when she sees the cunning little creature
 itself. The behavior of the man who is afraid to cross the street or the
 square can only be explained by saying that he acts like a little child.
 A child is really taught to avoid a situation of this sort as dangerous,
 and our agoraphobist is actually relieved of his fear if some one goes
 with him across the square or street.
 
 The two forms of fear that have been described, free-floating fear and
 the fear which is bound up with phobias, are independent of one another.
 The one is by no means a higher development of the other; only in
 exceptional cases, almost by accident, do they occur simultaneously. The
 strongest condition of general anxiety need not manifest itself in
 phobias; and persons whose entire life is hemmed in by agoraphobia can
 be entirely free of pessimistic expectant fear. Some phobias, such as
 the fear of squares or of trains, are acquired only in later life, while
 others, the fear of darkness, storms and animals, exist from the very
 beginning. The former signify serious illness, the latter appear rather
 as peculiarities, moods. Yet whoever is burdened with fear of this
 second kind may be expected to harbor other and similar phobias. I must
 add that we group all these phobias under _anxiety hysteria_, and
 therefore regard it as a condition closely related to the well-known
 conversion hysteria.
 
 The third form of neurotic fear confronts us with an enigma; we loose
 sight entirely of the connection between fear and threatening danger.
 This anxiety occurs in hysteria, for instance, as the accompaniment of
 hysteric symptoms, or under certain conditions of excitement, where we
 would expect an emotional manifestation, but least of all of fear, or
 without reference to any known circumstance, unintelligible to us and to
 the patient. Neither far nor near can we discover a danger or a cause
 which might have been exaggerated to such significance. Through these
 spontaneous attacks we learn that the complex which we call the
 condition of anxiety can be resolved into its components. The whole
 attack may be represented by a single intensively developed symptom,
 such as a trembling, dizziness, palpitation of the heart, or tightening
 of breath; the general undertone by which we usually recognize fear may
 be utterly lacking or vague. And yet these conditions, which we
 describe as "anxiety equivalents," are comparable to anxiety in all its
 clinical and etiological relations.
 
 Two questions arise. Can we relate neurotic fear, in which danger plays
 so small a part or none at all, to real fear, which is always a reaction
 to danger? And what can we understand as the basis of neurotic fear? For
 the present we want to hold to our expectations: "Wherever there is
 fear, there must be a cause for it."
 
 Clinical observation yields several suggestions for the comprehension of
 neurotic fear, the significance of which I shall discuss with you.
 
 1. It is not difficult to determine that expectant fear or general
 anxiety is closely connected with certain processes in sexual life, let
 us say with certain types of libido. Utilization, the simplest and most
 instructive case of this kind, results when persons expose themselves to
 frustrated excitation, viz., if their sexual excitation does not meet
 with sufficient relief and is not brought to a satisfactory conclusion,
 in men, during the time of their engagement to marry, for instance, or
 in women whose husbands are not sufficiently potent or who, from
 caution, execute the sexual act in a shortened or mutilated form. Under
 these circumstances libidinous excitement disappears and anxiety takes
 its place, both in the form of expectant fear and in attacks and anxiety
 equivalents. The cautious interruption of the sexual act, when practiced
 as the customary sexual regime, so frequently causes the anxiety
 neurosis in men, and especially in women, that physicians are wise in
 such cases to examine primarily this etiology. On innumerable occasions
 we have learned that anxiety neurosis vanishes when the sexual misuse is
 abandoned.
 
 So far as I know, the connection between sexual restraint and conditions
 of anxiety is no longer questioned even by physicians who have nothing
 to do with psychoanalysis. But I can well imagine that they do not
 desist from reversing the connection and saying that these persons have
 exhibited a tendency to anxiety from the outset and therefore practice
 reserve in sexual matters. The behavior of women whose sexual conduct is
 passive, viz., is determined by the treatment of the husband,
 contradicts this supposition. The more temperamental, that is, the more
 disposed toward sexual intercourse and capable of gratification is the
 woman, the more will she react to the impotence of the man, or to the
 _coitus interruptus_, by anxiety manifestations. In anaesthetic or only
 slightly libidinous women, such misuse will not carry such consequences.
 
 Sexual abstinence, recommended so warmly by the physicians of to-day,
 has the same significance in the development of conditions of anxiety
 only when the libido, to which satisfactory relief is denied, is
 sufficiently strong and not for the most part accounted for by
 sublimation. The decision whether illness is to result always depends
 upon the quantitative factors. Even where character formation and not
 disease is concerned, we easily recognize that sexual constraint goes
 hand in hand with a certain anxiety, a certain caution, while
 fearlessness and bold daring arise from free gratification of sexual
 desires. However much these relations are altered by various influences
 of civilization, for the average human being it is true that anxiety and
 sexual constraint belong together.
 
 I have by no means mentioned all the observations that speak for the
 genetic relation of the libido to fear. The influence on the development
 of neurotic fear of certain phases of life, such as puberty and the
 period of menopause, when the production of libido is materially
 heightened, belongs here too. In some conditions of excitement we may
 observe the mixture of anxiety and libido and the final substitution of
 anxiety for libido. These facts give us a twofold impression, first that
 we are concerned with an accumulation of libido, which is diverted from
 its normal channel, second that we are working with somatic processes.
 Just how anxiety originates from the libido we do not know; we can only
 ascertain that the libido is in abeyance, and that we observe anxiety in
 its place.
 
 2. We glean a second hint from the analysis of the psychoneuroses,
 especially of hysteria. We have heard that in addition to the symptoms,
 fear frequently accompanies this condition; this, however, is free
 floating fear, which is manifested either as an attack or becomes a
 permanent condition. The patients cannot tell what they are afraid of
 and connect their fear, through an unmistakable secondary elaboration,
 with phobias nearest at hand; death, insanity, paralysis. When we
 analyze the situation which gave rise to the anxiety or to symptoms
 accompanied by it, we can generally tell which normal psychologic
 process has been omitted and has been replaced by the phenomenon of
 fear. Let me express it differently: we reconstruct the unconscious
 process as though it had not experienced suppression and had continued
 its way into consciousness uninterruptedly. Under these conditions as
 well this process would have been accompanied by an emotion, and we now
 learn with surprise that when suppression has occurred the emotion
 accompanying the normal process has been replaced by fear, regardless of
 its original quality. In hysteric conditions of fear, its unconscious
 correlative may be either an impulse of similar character, such as fear,
 shame, embarrassment or positive libidinous excitation, or hostile and
 aggressive emotion such as fury or rage. Fear then is the common
 currency for which all emotional impulses can be exchanged, provided
 that the idea with which it has been associated has been subject to
 suppression.
 
 3. Patients suffering from compulsive acts are remarkably devoid of
 fear. They yield us the data for our third point. If we try to hinder
 them in the performance of their compulsive acts, of their washing or
 their ceremonials, or if they themselves dare to give up one of their
 compulsions, they are seized with terrible fear that again exacts
 obedience to the compulsion. We understand that the compulsive act had
 veiled fear and had been performed only to avoid it. In compulsion
 neurosis then, fear, which would otherwise be present, is replaced by
 symptom development. Similar results are yielded by hysteria. Following
 the process of suppression we find the development, either of anxiety
 alone or of anxiety and symptom development, or finally a more complete
 symptom development and no anxiety. In an abstract sense, then, it would
 be correct to say that symptoms are formed only to evade development of
 fear, which otherwise could not be escaped. According to this
 conception, fear is seen to occupy the center of the stage in the
 problems of neurosis.
 
 Our observations on anxiety neuroses led to the conclusion that when the
 libido was diverted from its normal use and anxiety thus released, it
 occurred on the basis of somatic processes. The analyses of hysteria and
 compulsion neuroses furnish the correlative observations that similar
 diversion with similar results may also be the consequence of a
 constraint of psychic forces. Such then is our knowledge of the origin
 of neurotic fear; it still sounds rather vague. But as yet I know no
 path that would lead us further. The second task we have set ourselves
 is still more difficult to accomplish. It is the establishment of a
 connection between neurotic fear, which is misused libido, and real
 fear, which is a reaction to danger. You may believe that these things
 are quite distinct and yet we have no criterion for distinguishing the
 sensations of real and neurotic fear.
 
 The desired connection is brought about by presupposing the antithesis
 of the ego to libido that is so frequently claimed. We know that the
 development of fear is the ego's reaction to danger, the signal for
 preparation for flight, and from this we are led to believe that in
 neurotic fear the ego attempts to escape the claims of its libido, and
 treats this inner danger as though it came from without. Accordingly our
 expectation that where there is fear there must be something to be
 afraid of, is fulfilled. But the analogy admits of further application.
 Just as the attempt to flee external danger is relieved by standing
 one's ground, and by appropriate steps toward defense, so the
 development of neurotic fear is arrested as fast as the symptom
 develops, for by means of it the fear is held in check.
 
 Our difficulties in understanding now lie elsewhere. The fear, which
 represents flight of the ego before the libido, is supposed to have
 sprung from the libido itself. That is obscure and warns us not to
 forget that the libido of a person belongs fundamentally to him and
 cannot confront him as an external force. The localized dynamics of fear
 development are still unintelligible; we do not know what psychic
 energies are released or from what psychic systems they are derived. I
 cannot promise to solve this problem, but we still have two trails to
 follow which lead us to direct observations and analytic investigation
 which can aid our speculations. We turn to the origin of fear in the
 child, and to the source of neurotic fear which attaches itself to
 phobias.
 
 Fear in children is quite common and it is very hard to tell whether it
 is neurotic or real fear. Indeed, the value of this distinction is
 rendered questionable by the behavior of children. On the one hand we
 are not surprised that the child fears all strange persons, new
 situations and objects, and we explain this reaction very easily by his
 weakness and ignorance. We ascribe to the child a strong disposition to
 real fear and would consider it purposeful if this fear were in fact a
 heritage. Herein the child would only repeat the behavior of prehistoric
 man and of the primitive man of today who, on account of his ignorance
 and helplessness, fears everything that is new, and much that is
 familiar, all of which can no longer inspire us with fear. If the
 phobias of the child were at least partially such as might be attributed
 to that primeval period of human development, this would tally entirely
 with our expectations.
 
 On the other hand, we cannot overlook the fact that not all children are
 equally afraid, and that those very children who express particular
 timidity toward all possible objects and situations subsequently prove
 to be nervous. Thus the neurotic disposition reveals itself by a decided
 tendency to real fear; anxiety rather than nervousness appears to be
 primary. We therefore arrive at the conclusion that the child (and later
 the adult) fears the power of his libido because he is anxious in the
 face of everything. The derivation of anxiety from the libido is hence
 put aside. Any investigation of the conditions of real fear consistently
 leads to the conclusion that consciousness of one's own weakness and
 helplessness--inferiority, in the terminology of A. Adler--when it is
 able to persist from childhood to maturity, is the cause underlying the
 neuroses.
 
 This sounds so simple and convincing that it has a claim upon our
 attention. To be sure, it would result in our shifting the basis of
 nervousness. The persistence of the feeling of inferiority, and its
 prerequisite condition of anxiety and its subsequent development of
 symptoms, is so firmly established that it is rather the exceptional
 case, when health is the outcome, which requires an explanation. What
 can be learned from careful observation of the fear of children? The
 little child is primarily afraid of strange people; situations wax
 important only because they involve people, and objects become
 influential much later. But the child does not fear these strange
 persons because he attributes evil intentions to them, because he
 compares his weakness with their strength or recognizes them as
 dangerous to his existence, his safety and freedom from pain. Such a
 child, suspicious, afraid of the aggressive impulse which dominates the
 world, would prove a sad theoretic construction. The child is afraid of
 a stranger because he is adjusted to a dear, beloved person, his
 mother. His disappointment and longing are transformed into fear, his
 unemployed libido, which cannot yet be held suspended, is diverted by
 fear. It cannot be termed a coincidence that this situation, which is a
 typical example of all childish fear, is a repetition of the first
 condition of fear during birth, viz., separation from the mother.
 
 The first situation phobias of children are darkness and solitude; the
 former often persists throughout life; common to both is the absence of
 the dear nurse, the mother. I once heard a child, who was afraid of the
 dark, call into an adjoining room, "Auntie, talk to me, I am afraid."
 "But what good will that do you? You cannot see me!" Whereupon the child
 answered, "If someone speaks, it is brighter." The yearning felt in
 darkness is converted into the fear of darkness. Far from saying that
 neurotic fear is only a secondary, a special case of real fear, we
 observe in little children something that resembles the behavior of real
 fear and has in common with neurotic fear, this characteristic feature:
 origin from unemployed libido. The child seems to bring very little real
 fear into the world. In all situations which may later become the
 conditions of phobias, on elevations, narrow bridges across water, on
 railroad and boat trips, the child exhibits no fear. And the more
 ignorant he is, the less fear he feels. It would be most desirable to
 have a greater heritage of such life-preservative instincts; the task of
 supervision, which is to hinder him from exposing himself to one danger
 after another, would be lessened. In reality the child at first
 overestimates his powers and behaves fearlessly because he does not
 recognize dangers. He will run to the water's edge, mount the window
 sill, play with fire or with sharp utensils, in short, he will do
 everything that would harm him and alarm his guardians. The awakening of
 real fear is the result of education, since we may not permit him to
 pass through the instructive experience himself.
 
 If there are children who meet this education to fear half way, and who
 discover dangers of which they have not been warned, the explanation
 suffices that their constitution contains a greater measure of
 libidinous need or that they have been spoiled early through libidinous
 gratification. No wonder that those persons who are nervous in later
 life are recruited from the ranks of these children. We know that the
 creation of neurosis is made easy by the inability to endure a
 considerable amount of pent-up libido for any length of time. You see
 that here too we must do justice to the constitutional factor, whose
 rights we never wish to question. We fight shy of it only when others
 neglect all other claims for this, and introduce the constitutional
 factor where it does not belong according to the combined results of
 observation and analysis, or where it must be the last consideration.
 
 Let us extract the sum of our observations on the anxiety of children:
 Infantile fear has very little to do with real fear, but is closely
 related to the neurotic fear of adults. It originates in unemployed
 libido and replaces the object of love that is lacking by an external
 object or situation.
 
 Now you will be glad to hear that the analysis of phobias cannot teach
 much more that is new. The same thing occurs in them as in the fear of
 children; unemployed libido is constantly being converted into real fear
 and so a tiny external danger takes the place of the demands of the
 libido. This coincidence is not strange, for infantile phobias are not
 only the prototypes but the direct prerequisite and prelude to later
 phobias, which are grouped with the anxiety hysterias. Every hysteria
 phobia can be traced to childish fear of which it is a continuation,
 even if it has another content and must therefore receive a different
 name. The difference between the two conditions lies in their mechanism.
 In the adult the fact that the libido has momentarily become useless in
 the form of longing, is not sufficient to effect the transformation of
 fear into libido. He has long since learned to maintain such libido in a
 suspended state or to use it differently. But when the libido is part of
 a psychic impulse which has experienced suppression, similar conditions
 to those of the child, who cannot distinguish the conscious from the
 unconscious, are reestablished. The regression to infantile phobia is
 the bridge where the transformation of libido into fear is conveniently
 effected. We have, as you know, spoken a great deal about suppression,
 but we have always followed the fate of the conception that was to be
 suppressed, because this was easier to recognize and to present. We have
 always omitted from our consideration what happened to the emotion that
 clung to the suppressed idea; and only now we learn that whatever
 quality this emotion might have manifested under normal conditions, its
 fate is a transformation into fear. This transformation of emotion is by
 far the more important part of the suppression process. It is not so
 easy to discuss, because we cannot assert the existence of unconscious
 emotions in the same sense as unconscious ideas. With one difference, an
 idea remains the same whether it is conscious or unconscious; we can
 give an account of what corresponds to an unconscious idea. But an
 emotion is a release and must be judged differently from an idea.
 Without a deeper reflection and clarification of our hypotheses of
 psychic processes, we cannot tell what corresponds to its unconscious
 stage. We cannot undertake this here. But we want to retain the
 impression we have gained, that the development of anxiety is closely
 connected with the unconscious system.
 
 I said that the transformation into fear, rather a discharge in the form
 of fear, is the immediate fate of suppressed libido. Not the only or
 final fate, I must add. These neuroses are accompanied by processes that
 strive to restrain the development of fear, and succeed in various ways.
 In phobias, for instance, two phases of the neurotic process can be
 clearly distinguished. The first effects the suppression of libido and
 its transition to fear, which is joined to an external danger. The
 second consists in building up all those precautions and safety devices
 which are to prevent contact with this danger which is dealt with as an
 external fact. Suppression corresponds to the ego's flight from the
 libido, which it regards dangerous. The phobia is comparable to a
 fortification against outer danger, which is represented by the much
 feared libido. The weakness of the phobias' system of defense lies in
 the fact that the fort has been strengthened from without and has
 remained vulnerable within. The projection of peril from the libido into
 the environment is never very successful. In other neuroses, therefore,
 other systems of defense are used against the possibility of fear
 development. That is an interesting aspect of the psychology of
 neurosis. Unfortunately its study would lead us to digress too far, and
 presupposes a more thorough and special knowledge of the subject. I
 shall add only one thing more. I have already spoken to you of the
 counter siege by which the ego imprisons the suppression and which it
 must maintain permanently for the suppression to subsist. The task of
 this counter siege is to carry out diverse forms of defense against the
 fear development which follows the suppression.
 
 To return to the phobias, I may now say that you realize how
 insufficient it would be to explain only their content, to be interested
 only in knowing that this or that object or situation is made the
 subject of a phobia. The content of the phobia has about the same
 importance for it as the manifest dream facade has for the dream. With
 some necessary restrictions, we admit that among the contents of the
 phobias are some that are especially qualified to be objects of fear
 through phylogenetic inheritance, as Stanley Hall has emphasized. In
 harmony with this is the fact that many of these objects of fear can
 establish connections with danger only by symbolic relations.
 
 And so we are convinced of the central position that the problem of fear
 assumes in the questions of the neurotic psychology. We are deeply
 impressed with how closely the development of fear is interwoven with
 the fate of the libido and the unconscious system. There is only one
 disconnected point, one inconsistency in our hypothesis: the
 indisputable fact that real fear must be considered an expression of the
 ego's instincts of self-preservation.
 
 
 
 
 TWENTY-SIXTH LECTURE
 
 GENERAL THEORY OF THE NEUROSES
 
 _The Libido Theory and Narcism_
 
 
 Repeatedly in the past and more recently we have dealt with the
 distinction between the ego instincts and the sexual instincts. At
 first, suppression taught us that the two may be flatly opposed to each
 other, that in the struggle the sexual instincts suffer apparent defeat
 and are forced to obtain satisfaction by other regressive methods, and
 so find the compensation for defeat in their invulnerability. After that
 we learned that at the outset both have a different relation to the
 educator, Necessity, so that they do not develop in the same manner and
 do not enter into the same relationship with the principle of reality.
 We come to realize that the sexual instincts are much more closely
 allied to the emotional condition of fear than the ego instincts. This
 result appears incomplete only in one respect, which, however, is most
 important. For further evidence we shall mention the significant fact
 that non-satisfaction of hunger and thirst, the two most elementary
 instincts of self-preservation, never result in their reversal into
 anxiety, while the transformation of unsatisfied libido into fear is, as
 we have heard, one of the best known and most frequently observed
 phenomena.
 
 No one can contest our perfect justification in separating the ego from
 sexual instincts. It is affirmed by the existence of sexual desire,
 which is a very special activity of the individual. The only question
 is, what significance shall we give to this distinction, how decisive is
 it? The answer will depend upon the results of our observations; on how
 far the sexual instincts, in their psychological and somatic
 manifestations, behave differently from the others that are opposed to
 them; on how important are the consequences which result from these
 differences. We have, of course, no motive whatever for insisting upon
 a certain intangible difference in the character of the two groups of
 instincts. Both are only designations of the sources of energy of the
 individual. The discussion as to whether they are fundamentally of the
 same or of a different character, and if the same, when it was that they
 separated from one another, cannot profit by the conceptions, but must
 deal rather with the underlying biological facts. At present we know
 very little about this, and even if we knew more it would not be
 relevant to our analytic task.
 
 Obviously, we should gain slight profit if, following the example of
 Jung, we were to emphasize the original unity of all instincts, and were
 to call the energy expressed in all of them "libido." Since the sexual
 function cannot be eliminated from psychic life by any device, we are
 forced to speak of sexual and asexual libido. As in the past, we rightly
 retain the name libido for the instincts of sexual life.
 
 I believe, therefore, that the question, how far the justifiable
 distinction of the instincts of sex and of self-preservation may be
 carried, is of little importance for psychoanalysis; and psychoanalysis
 is moreover not competent to deal with it. From a biological standpoint
 there are, to be sure, various reasons for believing that this
 distinction is significant. Sexuality is the only function of the living
 organism which extends beyond the individual and sees to his kinship
 with the species. It is undeniable that its practice does not always
 benefit the individual as do his other performances. For the price of
 ecstatic pleasures it involves him in dangers which threaten his life
 and frequently cause death. Probably peculiar metabolic processes,
 different from all others, are required to maintain a part of the
 individual life for its progeny. The individual who places himself in
 the foreground and regards his sexuality as a means to his gratification
 is, from a biological point of view, only an episode in a series of
 generations, a transient appendage to a germ-plasm which is virtually
 endowed with immortality, just as though he were the temporary partner
 in a corporation which continues to persist after his death.
 
 For psychoanalytic explanation of neuroses, however, there is no need to
 enter upon these far-reaching implications. By separate observation of
 the sexual and the ego instincts, we have gained the key to the
 understanding of transference-neuroses. We were able to trace them back
 to the fundamental situation where the sexual instinct and the instinct
 of self-preservation had come in conflict with one another, or
 biologically although not so accurately, expressed where the part played
 by the ego, that of independent individuality, was opposed to the other,
 that of a link in a series of generations. Only human beings are capable
 of such conflict, and therefore, taken all in all, neurosis is the
 prerogative of man, and not of animals. The excessive development of his
 libido and the elaboration of a varied and complicated psychic life thus
 made possible, appear to have created the conditions prerequisite for
 conflict. It is clear that these conditions are also responsible for the
 great progress that man has made beyond his kinship with animals. The
 capacity for neurosis is really only the reverse side of his talents and
 gifts. But these are only speculations, which divert us from our task.
 
 Until now we worked with the impulse that we can distinguish the ego and
 the sexual instincts from one another by their manifestations. We could
 do this without difficulty in the transference neuroses. We called the
 accumulation of energy which the ego directed towards the object of its
 sexual striving libido and all others, which proceeded from the
 instincts of self-preservation, interest. We were able to achieve our
 first insight into the workings of psychic forces by observing the
 accumulation of the libido, its transformations and its final destiny.
 The transference neuroses furnished the best material for this. But the
 ego, composed from various organizations, their construction and
 functioning, remained hidden and we were led to believe that only the
 analysis of other neurotic disturbances would raise the veil.
 
 Very soon we began to extend these psychoanalytic conceptions to other
 conditions. As early as 1908, K. Abraham asserted, after a discussion
 with me, that the principal characteristic of dementia praecox (which
 may be considered one of the psychoses) is _that there is no libidinous
 occupation of objects_ (_The Psycho-sexual Differences between Hysteria
 and Dementia Praecox_). But then the question arose, what happens to the
 libido of the demented, which is diverted from its objects? Abraham did
 not hesitate to give the answer, "It is turned back upon the ego, and
 _this reflected turning back is the source of the megalomania_ in
 dementia praecox." This hallucination of greatness is exactly comparable
 to the well-known over-estimation of the objects habitual to lovers. So,
 for the first time, we gained an understanding of psychotic condition by
 comparing it with the normal course of love.
 
 These first interpretations of Abraham's have been maintained in
 psychoanalysis, and have become the basis of our attitude towards the
 psychoses. Slowly we familiarized ourselves with the idea that the
 libido, which we find attached to certain objects, which expresses a
 striving to attain gratification from these objects, may also forsake
 them and put in their place the person's own ego. Gradually these ideas
 were developed more and more consistently. The name for this placing of
 the libido--narcism--was borrowed from one of the perversions described
 by P. Naecke. In it the grown individual lavishes upon his own body all
 the affection usually devoted to some foreign sex object.
 
 We reflected that if such a fixation of libido on one's own body and
 person instead of on some external object exists, this cannot be an
 exceptional or trivial occurrence. It is much more probable that this
 narcism is the general and original condition, out of which the love for
 an object later develops, without however necessarily causing narcism to
 disappear. From the evolutionary history of object-libido we remembered
 that in the beginning many sex instincts seek auto-erotic gratification,
 and that this capacity for auto-eroticism forms the basis for the
 retardation of sexuality in its education to conformity with fact. And
 so, auto-eroticism was the sexual activity of the narcistic stage in the
 placing of the libido.
 
 To be brief: We represented the relation of the ego-libido to the
 object-libido in a way which I can explain by an analogy from zoology.
 Think of the simplest forms of life, which consist of a little lump of
 protoplasmic substance which is only slightly differentiated. They
 stretch out protrusions, known as pseudopia, into which the protoplasm
 flows. But they can withdraw these protrusions and assume their original
 shape. Now we compare the stretching out of these processes with the
 radiation of libido to the objects, while the central mass of libido can
 remain in the ego, and we assume that under normal conditions ego-libido
 can be changed into object-libido, and this can again be taken up into
 the ego, without any trouble.
 
 With the help of this representation we can now explain a great number
 of psychic conditions, or to express it more modestly, describe them, in
 the language of the libido theory; conditions that we must accredit to
 normal life, such as the psychic attitude during love, during organic
 sickness, during sleep. We assumed that the conditions of sleep rest
 upon withdrawal from the outer world and concentration upon the wish to
 sleep. The nocturnal psychic activity expressed in the dream we found in
 the service of a wish to sleep and, moreover, governed by wholly
 egoistic motives. Continuing in the sense of libido theory: sleep is a
 condition in which all occupations of objects, the libidinous as well as
 the egoistic, are given up, and are withdrawn into the ego. Does this
 not throw a new light upon recovery during sleep, and upon the nature of
 exhaustion in general? The picture of blissful isolation in the
 intra-uterine life, which the sleeper conjures up night after night,
 thus also completes the picture from the psychic side. In the sleeper
 the original condition of libido division is again restored, a condition
 of complete narcism in which libido and ego-interest are still united
 and live indistinguishably in the self-sufficient ego.
 
 We must observe two things: First, how can the conceptions of narcism
 and egoism be distinguished? I believe narcism is the libidinous
 complement of egoism. When we speak of egoism we mean only the benefits
 to the individual; if we speak of narcism we also take into account his
 libidinous satisfaction. As practical motives the two can be followed up
 separately to a considerable degree. One can be absolutely egoistic, and
 still have strong libidinous occupation of objects, in so far as the
 libidinous gratification by way of the object serves the needs of the
 ego. Egoism will then take care that the striving for the object results
 in no harm to the ego. One can be egoistic and at the same time
 excessively narcistic, i.e., have very slight need of an object. This
 need may be for direct sexual satisfaction or even for those higher
 desires, derived from need, which we are in the habit of calling love as
 opposed to sensuality. In all of these aspects, egoism is the
 self-evident, the constant, and narcism the variable element. The
 antithesis of egoism, _altruism_, is not the same as the conception of
 libidinous occupation of objects. Altruism differs from it by the
 absence of desire for sexual satisfaction. But in the state of being
 completely in love, altruism and libidinous occupation with an object
 clash. The sex object as a rule draws upon itself a part of the narcism
 of the ego. This is generally called "sexual over-estimation" of the
 object. If the altruistic transformation from egoism to the sex object
 is added, the sex object becomes all powerful; it has virtually sucked
 up the ego.
 
 I think you will find it a pleasant change if after the dry phantasy of
 science I present to you a poetic representation of the economic
 contrast between narcism and being in love. I take it from the
 _Westostliche Divans_ of Goethe:
 
     SULEIKA:
         Conqueror and serf and nation;
           They proclaim it joyously;
         Mankind's loftiest elation,
           Shines in personality.
         Life's enchantment lures and lingers,
           Of yourself is not afar,
         All may slip through passive fingers,
           If you tarry as you are.
 
     HATEM:
         Never could I be thus ravished,
           Other thoughts are in my mind,
         All the gladness earth has lavished
           In Suleika's charms I find.
         When I cherish her, then only
           Dearer to myself I grow,
         If she turned to leave me lonely
           I should lose the self I know.
         Hatem's happiness were over,--
           But his changeling soul would glide
         Into any favored lover
           Whom she fondles at her side.
 
 The second observation is supplementary to the dream theory. We cannot
 explain the origin of the dream unless we assume that the suppressed
 unconscious has achieved a certain independence of the ego. It does not
 conform to the wish for sleep and retains its hold on the energies that
 have seized it, even when all the occupations with objects dependent
 upon the ego have been released for the benefit of sleep. Not until then
 can we understand how this unconscious can take advantage of the
 nocturnal discontinuance or deposition of the censor, and can seize
 control of fragments left over from the day to fashion a forbidden dream
 wish from them. On the other hand, it is to the already existing
 connections with these supposed elements that these fragments owe a part
 of the resistance directed against the withdrawal of the libido, and
 controlled by the wish for sleep. We also wish to supplement our
 conception of dream formation with this trait of dynamic importance.
 
 Organic diseases, painful irritations, inflammation of the organs create
 a condition which clearly results in freeing the libido of its objects.
 The withdrawn libido again finds itself in the ego and occupies the
 diseased part of the part. We may even venture to assert that under
 these conditions the withdrawal of the libido from its objects is more
 conspicuous than the withdrawal of egoistic interest from the outside
 world. This seems to open the way to an understanding of hypochondria,
 where an organ occupies the ego in a similar way without being diseased,
 according to our conception. I shall resist the temptation of continuing
 along this line, or of discussing other situations which we can
 understand or represent through the assumption that the object libido
 travels to the ego. For I am eager to meet two objections, which I know
 are absorbing your attention. In the first place, you want to call me to
 account for my insistence upon distinguishing in sleep, in sickness and
 in similar situations between libido and interest, sexual instincts and
 ego instincts, since throughout the observations can be explained by
 assuming a single and uniform energy, which, freely mobile, occupies now
 the object, now the ego, and enters into the services of one or the
 other of these impulses. And, secondly, how can I venture to treat the
 freeing of libido from its object as the source of a pathological
 condition, since such transformation of object-libido into
 ego-libido--or more generally, ego-energy--belongs to the normal, daily
 and nightly repeated occurrences of psychic dynamics?
 
 The answer is: Your first objection sounds good. The discussion of the
 conditions of sleep, of sickness and of being in love would in
 themselves probably never have led to a distinction between ego-libido
 and object-libido, or between libido and interest. But you do not take
 into account the investigations from which we have set out, in the
 light of which we now regard the psychic situations under discussion.
 The necessity of distinguishing between libido and interest, that is,
 between sexual instincts and those of self-preservation, is forced upon
 us by our insight into the conflict out of which the transference
 neuroses emerge. We can no longer reckon without it. The assumption that
 object-libido can change into the ego-libido, in other words, that we
 must reckon with an ego-libido, appeared to us the only possible one
 wherewith to solve the riddle of the so-called narcistic neuroses--for
 instance, dementia praecox--or to justify the similarities and
 differences in a comparison of hysteria and compulsion. We now apply to
 sickness, sleep and love that which we found undeniably affirmed
 elsewhere. We may proceed with such applications as far as they will go.
 The only assertion that is not a direct refutation of our analytic
 experience is that libido remains libido whether it is directed towards
 objects or toward the ego itself, and is never transferred into egoistic
 interest, and vice-versa. But this assertion is of equal weight with the
 distinction of sex and ego instincts which we have already critically
 appraised, and which we will maintain from methodological motives until
 it may possibly be disproved.
 
 Your second objection, too, raises a justified question, but it points
 in a wrong direction. To be sure the retreat of object-libido into the
 ego is not purely pathogenic; we see that it occurs each time before
 going to sleep, only to be released again upon awaking. The little
 protoplasmic animal draws in its protrusions, only to send them out
 again on a later occasion. But it is quite another matter when a
 specific, very energetic process compels the withdrawal of libido from
 the object. The libido has become narcistic and cannot find its way back
 to the object, and this hindrance to the mobility of the libido
 certainly becomes pathogenic. It appears that an accumulation of
 narcistic libido cannot be borne beyond a certain point. We can imagine
 that the reason for occupation with the object is that the ego found it
 necessary to send out its libido in order not to become diseased because
 it was pent up. If it were our plan to go further into the subject of
 dementia praecox, I would show you that this process which frees the
 libido from the objects and bars the way back to them, is closely
 related to the process of suppression, and must be considered as its
 counterpart. But above all you would recognize familiar ground, for the
 conditions of these processes are practically identical, as far as we
 can now see, with those of suppression. The conflict appears to be the
 same, and to take place between the same forces. The reason for a result
 as different as, for instance, the result in hysteria, can be found only
 in a difference of dispositions. The vulnerable point in the libido
 development of these patients lies in another phase; the controlling
 fixation, which, as you will remember, permits the breach resulting in
 the formation of symptoms, is in another place probably in the stage of
 primitive narcism, to which dementia praecox returns in its final stage.
 It is noteworthy that for all the narcistic neuroses, we must assume
 fixation points of the libido which reach back into far earlier phases
 of development than in cases of hysteria or compulsion neuroses. But you
 have heard that the conceptions obtained in our study of transference
 neuroses are sufficient to orient us in the narcistic neuroses, which
 present far greater practical difficulties. The similarities are
 considerable; it is fundamentally the same field of observation. But you
 can easily imagine how hopeless the explanations of these conditions,
 which belong to psychiatry, appear to him who is not equipped for this
 task with an analytic knowledge of transference neuroses.
 
 The picture given by the symptoms of dementia praecox, which, moreover,
 is highly variable, is not exclusively determined by the symptoms. These
 result from forcing the libido away from the objects and accumulating it
 in the ego in the form of narcistic libido. A large space is occupied by
 other phenomena, which result from the impulses of the libido to regain
 the objects, and so show an attempt toward restitution and healing.
 These symptoms are in fact the more conspicuous, the more clamorous;
 they show an unquestionable similarity to those of hysteria, or less
 often to those of compulsion neurosis, and yet they are different in
 every respect. It appears that in dementia praecox the libido in its
 endeavor to return to the objects, i.e., to the images of the objects,
 really captures something, but only their shadows--I mean, the verbal
 images belonging to them. This is not the place to discuss this matter,
 but I believe that these reversed impulses of the libido have permitted
 us an insight into what really determines the difference between a
 conscious and an unconscious representation.
 
 I have now brought you into the field where we may expect the further
 progress of analytic work. Since we can now employ the conception of
 ego-libido, the narcistic neuroses have become accessible to us. We are
 confronted with the problem of finding a dynamic explanation of these
 conditions and at the same time of enlarging our knowledge of psychic
 life by an understanding of the ego. The ego psychology, which we strive
 to understand, must not be founded upon introspective data, but rather,
 as in the libido, upon analysis of the disturbances and decompositions
 of the ego. When this greater task is accomplished we shall probably
 disparage our previous knowledge of the fate of the libido which we
 gained from our study of the transference neuroses. But there is still
 much to be said in this matter. Narcistic neuroses can scarcely be
 approached by the same technique which served us in the transference
 neuroses. Soon you will hear why. After forging ahead a little in the
 study of narcistic neuroses we always seem to come to a wall which
 impedes progress. You know that in the transference neuroses we also
 encountered such barriers of resistance, but we were able to break them
 down piece by piece. In narcistic neuroses the resistance is
 insuperable; at best we are permitted to cast a curious glance over the
 wall to spy out what is taking place on the other side. Our technical
 methods must be replaced by others; we do not yet know whether or not we
 shall be able to find such a substitute. To be sure, even these patients
 furnish us with ample material. They do say many things, though not in
 answer to our questions, and for the time being we are forced to
 interpret these utterances through the understanding we have gained from
 the symptoms of transference neuroses. The coincidence is sufficiently
 great to assure us a good beginning. How far this technique will go,
 remains to be seen.
 
 There are additional difficulties that impede our progress. The
 narcistic conditions and the psychoses related to them can only be
 solved by observers who have schooled themselves in analytic study of
 transference neuroses. But our psychiatrists do not study psychoanalysis
 and we psychoanalysts see too few psychiatric cases. A race of
 psychiatrists that has gone through the school of psychoanalysis as a
 preparatory science most first grow up. The beginnings of this are now
 being made in America, where many leading psychiatrists explain the
 teachings of psychoanalysis to their students, and where many owners of
 sanatoriums and directors of institutes for the insane take pains to
 observe their patients in the light of these teachings. But even here we
 have occasionally been successful in casting a glance over the narcistic
 wall and I shall tell you a few things that we think we have discovered.
 
 The disease of paranoia, chronic systematic insanity, is given a very
 uncertain position by the attempts at classification of present-day
 psychiatry. There is no doubt of its close relationship to dementia
 praecox. I once was so bold as to propose that paranoia and dementia
 praecox could be classed together under the common name of paraphrenia.
 The types of paranoia are described according to their content as:
 megalomania, the mania of persecution, eroto mania, mania of jealousy,
 etc. From psychiatry we do not expect attempts at explanation. As an
 example of such an attempt, to be sure an antiquated and not entirely
 valid example, I might mention the attempt to develop one symptom
 directly out of another by means of an intellectual rationalization, as:
 the patient who primarily believes he is being persecuted draws the
 conclusion from this persecution that he must be an extraordinarily
 important personality and thus develops megalomania. In our analytical
 conception megalomania is the immediate outcome of exaggeration of the
 ego, which results from the drawing-in of libidinous occupation with
 objects, a secondary narcism as a recurrence of the originally early
 infantile form. In cases of the mania of persecution we have noticed a
 few things that lead us to follow a definite track. In the first place,
 we observed that in the great majority of cases the persecutor was of
 the same sex as the persecuted. This could still be explained in a
 harmless way, but in a few carefully studied cases it was clearly shown
 that the person of the same sex, who was most loved in normal times,
 became the persecutor after the malady set in. A further development is
 made possible by the fact that one loved person is replaced by another,
 according to familiar affinities, e.g., the father by the teacher or the
 superior. We concluded from such ever-increasing experiences, that
 paranoia persecutoria is the form in which the individual guards himself
 against a homosexual tendency that has become too powerful. The change
 from affection to hate, which notoriously may take the form of serious
 threats against the life of the loved and hated person, expresses the
 transformation of libidinous impulse into fear, which is a regularly
 recurring result of the process of suppression. As an illustration I
 shall cite the last case in which I made observations on this subject. A
 young physician had to be sent away from his home town because he had
 threatened the life of the son of a university professor, who up to that
 time had been his best friend. He ascribed truly devilish intentions to
 his erstwhile friend and credited him with power of a demon. He was to
 blame for all the misfortunes that had in recent years befallen the
 family of the patient, for all his personal and social ill-luck. But
 this was not enough. The wicked friend, and his father the professor,
 had been the cause of the war and had called the Russians into the land.
 He had forfeited his life a thousand times and our patient was convinced
 that with the death of the culprit all misfortune would come to an end.
 And yet his old affection for his friend was so great that it had
 paralyzed his hand when he had had the opportunity of shooting down the
 enemy at close quarters. In my short consultations with the patient, I
 discovered that the friendship between the two dated back to early
 school-life. Once at least the bonds of friendship had been
 over-stepped; a night spent together had been the occasion for complete
 sexual intercourse. Our patient never felt attracted to women, as would
 have been natural to his age or his charming personality. At one time he
 was engaged to a beautiful and distinguished young girl, but she broke
 off the engagement because she found so little affection in her fiance.
 Years later his malady broke out just at that moment when for the first
 time he had succeeded in giving complete gratification to a woman. When
 this woman embraced him, full of gratitude and devotion, he suddenly
 felt a strange pain which cut around his skull like a sharp incision.
 His later interpretation of this sensation was that an incision such as
 is used to expose a part of the brain had been performed upon him, and
 since his friend had become a pathological anatomist, he gradually came
 to the conclusion that he alone could have sent him this last woman as a
 temptation. From that time on his eyes were also opened to the other
 persecutions in which he was to be the victim of the intrigues of his
 former friend.
 
 But how about those cases where the persecutor is not of the same sex as
 the persecuted, where our explanation of a guard against homosexual
 libido is apparently contradicted? A short time ago I had occasion to
 investigate such a case and was able to glean corroboration from this
 apparent contradiction. A young girl thought she was followed by a man,
 with whom she had twice had intimate relations. She had, as a matter of
 fact, first laid these maniacal imputations at the door of a woman, whom
 we may consider as having played the part of a mother-substitute in her
 psychic life. Only after the second meeting did she progress to the
 point of diverting this maniacal idea from the woman and of transferring
 it to the man. The condition that the persecutor must be of the same sex
 was also originally maintained in this instance. In her claim before the
 lawyer and the physician, this patient did not mention this first stage
 of her mania, and this caused the appearance of a contradiction to our
 theory of paranoia.
 
 Homosexual choice of object is originally more natural to narcism than
 the heterosexual. If it is a matter of thwarting a strong and
 undesirable homosexual impulse, the way back to narcism is made
 especially easy. Until now I have had very little opportunity of
 speaking to you about the fundamental conditions of love-life, so far as
 we know them, and now I cannot make up for lost time. I only want to
 point out that the choice of an object, that progress in the development
 of the libido which comes after the narcistic stage, can proceed
 according to two different types--either according to the _narcistic_
 type, which puts a very similar personality in the place of the personal
 ego, or according to the _dependent_ type, which chooses those persons
 who have become valuable by satisfying needs of life other than as
 objects of the libido. We also accredit a strong fixation of the libido
 to the narcistic type of object-choice when there is a disposition
 toward manifest homosexuality.
 
 You will recall that in our first meeting of this semester I told you
 about the case of a woman who suffered from the mania of jealousy. Since
 we are so near the end you certainly will be glad to hear the
 psychoanalytic explanation of a maniacal idea. But I have less to say
 about it than you expect. The maniacal idea as well as the compulsion
 idea cannot be assailed by logical arguments or actual experience. This
 is explained by their relation to the unconscious, which is represented
 by the maniacal idea or the compulsion idea, and held down by whichever
 is effective. The difference between the two is based upon respective
 localization and dynamic relations of the two conditions.
 
 As in paranoia, so also in melancholia, of which, moreover, very
 different clinical forms are described. We have discovered a point of
 vantage which will yield us an insight into the inner structure of the
 condition. We realize that the self-accusations with which these
 melancholic patients torture themselves in the most pitiless way, really
 apply to another person, namely, the sex object which they have lost, or
 which through some fault has lost value for them. From this we may
 conclude that the melancholic has withdrawn his libido from the object.
 Through a process which we designate as "narcistic identification" the
 object is built up within the ego itself, is, so to say, projected upon
 the ego. Here I can give you only a descriptive representation, as yet
 without reference to the topical and dynamic relations. The personal ego
 is now treated in the same manner as the abandoned object, and suffers
 all the aggression and expressions of revenge which were planned for the
 object. Even the suicidal tendencies of melancholia are more
 comprehensible when we consider that this bitterness of the patient
 falls alike on the ego itself and on the object of its love and hate. In
 melancholia as well as in other narcistic conditions a feature of
 emotional life is strikingly shown which, since the time of Bleuler, we
 have been accustomed to designate as _ambivalence_. By this we mean that
 hostile and affectionate feelings are directed against one and the same
 person. I have, in the course of these discussions, unfortunately not
 been in a position to tell you more about this emotional ambivalence.
 
 We have, in addition to narcistic identification, an hysterical
 identification as well, which moreover has been known to us for a much
 longer time. I wish it were possible to determine clearly the difference
 between the two. Of the periodic and cyclic forms of melancholia I can
 tell you something that you will certainly be glad to hear, for it is
 possible, under favorable circumstances--I have twice had the
 experience--to prevent these emotional conditions (or their antitheses)
 by means of analytic treatment in the free intervals between the
 attacks. We learn that in melancholia as well as in mania, it is a
 matter of finding a special way for solving the conflict, the
 prerequisites for which entirely coincide with those of other neuroses.
 You can imagine how much there still is for psychoanalysis to learn in
 this field.
 
 I told you, too, that we hoped to gain a knowledge of the structure of
 the ego, and of the separate factors out of which it is built by means
 of the analysis of narcistic conditions. In one place we have already
 made a beginning. From the analysis of the maniacal delusion of being
 watched we concluded that in the ego there is really an agent which
 continually watches, criticizes and compares the other part of the ego
 and thus opposes it. We believe that the patient imparts to us a truth
 that is not yet sufficiently appreciated, when he complains that all his
 actions are spied upon and watched, all his thoughts recorded and
 criticized. He errs only in transferring this distressing force to
 something alien, outside of himself. He feels the dominance of a factor
 in his ego, which compares his actual ego and all of its activities to
 an _ideal ego_ that he has created in the course of his development. We
 also believe that the creation of this ideal ego took place with the
 purpose of again establishing that self-satisfaction which is bound up
 with the original infantile narcism, but which since then has
 experienced so many disturbances and disparagements. In this
 self-observing agent we recognize the ego-censor, the conscience; it is
 the same factor which at night exercises dream-censorship, and which
 creates the suppressions against inadmissible wish-impulses. Under
 analysis in the maniacal delusion of being watched it reveals its origin
 in the influence of parents, tutors and social environment and in the
 identification of the ego with certain of these model individuals.
 
 These are some of the conclusions which the application of
 psychoanalysis to narcistic conditions has yielded us. They are
 certainly all too few, and they often lack that accuracy which can only
 be acquired in a new field with the attainment of absolute familiarity.
 We owe them all to the exploitation of the conception of ego-libido or
 narcistic libido, by the aid of which we have extended to narcistic
 neuroses those observations which were confirmed in the transference
 neuroses. But now you will ask, is it possible for us to succeed in
 subordinating all the disturbances of narcistic conditions and the
 psychoses to the libido theory in such a way that in every case we
 recognize the libidinous factor of psychic life as the cause of the
 malady, and never make an abnormality in the functioning of the
 instincts of self-preservation answerable? Ladies and gentlemen, this
 conclusion does not seem urgent to me, and above all not ripe for
 decision. We can best leave it calmly to the progress of the science. I
 should not be surprised to find that the power to exert a pathogenic
 influence is really an exclusive prerogative of the libidinous impulses,
 and that the libido theory will celebrate its triumphs along the whole
 line from the simplest true neurosis to the most difficult psychotic
 derangement of the individual. For we know it to be a characteristic of
 the libido that it is continually struggling against subordinating
 itself to the realities of the world. But I consider it most probable
 that the ego instincts are indirectly swept along by the pathogenic
 excitations of the libido and forced into a functional disturbance.
 Moreover, I cannot see any defeat for our trend of investigation when we
 are confronted with the admission that in difficult psychoses the ego
 impulses themselves are fundamentally led astray; the future will teach
 us--or at least it will teach you. Let me return for one moment more to
 fear, in order to eliminate one last ambiguity that we have left. We
 have said that the relation between fear and the libido, which in other
 respects seems clearly defined, does not fit in with the assumption that
 in the face of danger real fear should become the expression of the
 instinct of self-preservation. This, however, can hardly be doubted. But
 suppose the emotion of fear is not contested by the egoistic ego
 impulse, but rather by the ego-libido? The condition of fear is in all
 cases purposeless and its lack of purpose is obvious when it reaches a
 higher level. It then disturbs the action, be it flight or defense,
 which alone is purposeful, and which serves the ends of
 self-preservation. If we accredit the emotional component of actual fear
 to the ego-libido, and the accompanying activity to the egoistic
 instinct to self-preservation, we have overcome every theoretical
 difficulty. Furthermore, you do not really believe that we flee
 _because_ we experience fear? On the contrary, we first are afraid _and
 then_ take to flight from the same motive that is awakened by the
 realization of danger. Men who have survived the endangering of their
 lives tell us that they were not at all afraid, they only acted. They
 turned the weapon against the wild animal, and that was in fact the most
 purposeful thing to do.
 
 
 
 
 TWENTY-SEVENTH LECTURE
 
 GENERAL THEORY OF THE NEUROSES
 
 _Transference_
 
 
 We are nearing the close of our discussions, and you probably cherish
 certain expectations, which shall not be disappointed. You think, I
 suppose, that I have not guided you through thick and thin of
 psychoanalytic subject matter to dismiss you without a word about
 therapy, which furnishes the only possibility of carrying on
 psychoanalysis. I cannot possibly omit this subject, for the observation
 of some of its aspects will teach you a new fact, without which the
 understanding of the diseases we have examined would be most incomplete.
 
 I know that you do not expect any guidance in the technique of
 practising analysis for therapeutic purposes. You wish to know only
 along what general lines psychoanalytic therapy works and approximately
 what it accomplishes. And you have an undeniable right to know this. I
 shall not actually tell you, however, but shall insist that you guess it
 yourselves.
 
 Only think! You know everything essential, from the conditions which
 precipitate the illness to all the factors at work within. Where is
 there room for therapeutic influence? In the first place, there is
 hereditary disposition; we do not speak of it often because it is
 strongly emphasized from another quarter, and we have nothing new to say
 about it. But do not think that we underestimate it. Just because we are
 therapeutists, we feel its power distinctly. At any rate, we cannot
 change it; it is a given fact which erects a barrier to our efforts. In
 the second place, there is the influence of the early experiences of
 childhood, which are in the habit of becoming sharply emphasized under
 analysis; they belong to the past and we cannot undo them. And then
 everything that we include in the term "actual forbearance"--misfortunes
 of life out of which privations of love arise, poverty, family discord,
 unfortunate choice in marriage, unfavorable social conditions and the
 severity of moral claims. These would certainly offer a foothold for
 very effectual therapy. But it would have to be the kind of therapy
 which, according to the Viennese folk-tale, Emperor Joseph practiced:
 the beneficial interference of a potentate, before whose will men bow
 and difficulties vanish. But who are we, to include such charity in the
 methods of our therapy? Poor as we are, powerless in society, forced to
 earn our living by practicing medicine, we are not even in a position to
 treat free of charge those patients who are unable to pay, as physicians
 who employ other methods of treatment can do. Our therapy is too long
 drawn-out, too extended for that. But perhaps you are still holding to
 one of the factors already mentioned, and think that you have found a
 factor through which our influence may be effective. If the restrictions
 of morality which are imposed by society have a share in the privation
 forced upon the patient, treatment might give him the courage, or
 possibly even the prescription itself, to cross these barriers, might
 tell him how gratification and health can be secured in the renunciation
 of that ideal which society has held up to us but often disregards. One
 grows healthy then, by giving one's sexuality full reign. Such analytic
 treatment, however, would be darkened by a shadow; it does not serve our
 recognized morality. The gain to the individual is a loss to society.
 
 But, ladies and gentlemen, who has misinformed you to this degree? It is
 inconceivable that the advice to give one's sexuality full reign can
 play a part in analytic therapy, if only from the circumstance we have
 ourselves described, that there is going on within the patient a bitter
 conflict between libidinous impulse and sexual suppression, between
 sensual and ascetic tendencies. This conflict is not abolished by giving
 one of these tendencies the victory over its opponent. We see that in
 the case of the nervous, asceticism has retained the upper hand. The
 consequence of this is that the suppressed sexual desire gains breathing
 space by the development of symptoms. If, on the other hand, we were to
 give the victory to sexuality, symptoms would have to replace the sexual
 suppression, which has been pushed aside. Neither of the two decisions
 can end the inner conflict, one part always remains unsatisfied. There
 are only a few cases wherein the conflict is so labile, that a factor
 such as the intervention of the physician could be decisive, and these
 cases really require no analytic treatment. Persons who can be so much
 influenced by a physician would have found some solution without him.
 You know that when an abstinent young man decides upon illegitimate
 sex-intercourse, or when an unsatisfied woman seeks compensation from
 another man, they have generally not waited for the permission of a
 physician, far less of an analyst, to do this.
 
 In studying the situation, one essential point is generally overlooked,
 that the pathogenic conflict of the neurotic must not be confused with
 normal struggles between psychic impulses of which all have their root
 in the same psychological soil. The neurotic struggle is a strife of
 forces, one of which has attained the level of the fore-conscious and
 the conscious, while the other has been held back in the unconscious
 stage. That is why the conflict can have no outcome; the struggling
 parties approach each other as little as in the well-known instance of
 the polar-bear and the whale. A real decision can be reached only if
 both meet on the same ground. To accomplish this is, I believe, the sole
 task of therapy.
 
 Moreover, I assure you that you are misinformed if you assume that
 advice and guidance in the affairs of life is an integral part of the
 analytic influence. On the contrary, we reject this role of the mentor
 as far as possible. Above all, we wish to attain independent decisions
 on the part of the patient. With this intention in mind, we require him
 to postpone all vital resolutions such as choice of a career, marriage
 or divorce, until the close of the treatment. You must confess that this
 is not what you had imagined. It is only in the case of certain very
 young or entirely helpless persons that we cannot insist upon the
 desired limitation. Here we must combine the function of physician and
 educator; we are well aware of the responsibility and behave with the
 necessary precaution.
 
 Judging from the zeal with which I defend myself against the accusation
 that analytic treatment urges the nervous person to give his sexuality
 full reign, you must not gather that we influence him for the benefit of
 conventional morality. We are just as far removed from that. We are no
 reformers, it is true, only observers, but we cannot help observing with
 critical eyes, and we have found it impossible to take the part of
 conventional sex morality, or to estimate highly the way in which
 society has tried to regulate the problems of sexual life in practice.
 We can prove to society mathematically that its code of ethics has
 exacted more sacrifices than is its worth, and that its procedure rests
 neither on veracity nor wisdom. We cannot spare our patients the task of
 listening to this criticism. We accustom them to weigh sexual matters,
 as well as others, without prejudice; and when, after the completion of
 the cure, they have become independent and choose some intermediate
 course between unrestrained sexuality and asceticism, our conscience is
 not burdened by the consequences. We tell ourselves: whoever has been
 successfully educated in being true to himself is permanently protected
 against the danger of immorality, even if his moral standard diverges
 from that of society. Let us, moreover, be careful not to overestimate
 the significance of the problem of abstinence with respect to its
 influence on neuroses. Only the minority of pathogenic situations of
 forbearance, with a subsequent condition of pent-up libido, can be
 resolved without more ado by such sexual intercourse as can be procured
 with little trouble.
 
 And so you cannot explain the therapeutic influence of psychoanalysis by
 saying that it simply recommends giving full sway to sexuality. You must
 seek another solution. I think that while I was refuting this
 supposition of yours, one of my remarks put you on the right track. Our
 usefulness consists in replacing the unconscious by the conscious, in
 translating the unconscious into the conscious. You are right; that is
 exactly it. By projecting the unconscious into the conscious, we do away
 with suppressions, we remove conditions of symptom formation and
 transform a pathogenic into a normal conflict which can be decided in
 some way or other. This is the only psychic change we produce in our
 patients; its extent is the extent of our helpfulness. Wherever no
 suppression and no analogous psychic process can be undone, there is no
 place for our therapy.
 
 We can express the aim of our efforts by various formulae of rendering
 the unconscious conscious, removing suppressions, filling out amnestic
 gaps--it all amounts to the same thing. But perhaps this admission does
 not satisfy you. You imagined that when a nervous person became cured
 something very different happened, that after having been subjected to
 the laborious process of psychoanalysis, he was transformed into a
 different human being. And now I tell you that the entire result is only
 that he has a little less of the unconscious, a little more of the
 conscious within him. Well, you probably underestimate the significance
 of such an inner change. The person cured of neurosis has really become
 another human being. Fundamentally, of course, he has remained the same.
 That is to say, he has only become what he might have been under the
 most favorable conditions. But that is saying a great deal. When you
 learn all that has to be done, the effort required to effect apparently
 so slight a change in psychic life, the significance of such a
 difference in the psychic realm will be credible to you.
 
 I shall digress for a moment to ask whether you know what is meant by a
 causal therapy? This name is given to the procedure which does not take
 the manifestations of disease for its point of departure, but seeks to
 remove the causes of disease. Is our psychoanalytical therapy causal or
 not? The answer is not simple, but perhaps it will give us the
 opportunity of convincing ourselves that this point of departure is
 comparatively fruitless. In so far as analytical therapy does not
 concern itself immediately with the removal of symptoms, it may be
 termed causal. Yet in another respect, you might say this would hardly
 follow. For we have followed the causal chain back far beyond the
 suppressions to the instinctive tendencies and their relative intensity
 as given by the constitution of the patient, and finally the nature of
 the digression in the abnormal process of its development. Assume for a
 moment that it were possible to influence these functions chemically, to
 increase or to decrease the quantity of the libido that happens to be
 present, to strengthen one impulse at the expense of another. This would
 be causal therapy in its true sense and our analysis would have
 furnished the indispensable preparatory work of reconnaissance. You know
 that there is as yet no possibility of so influencing the processes of
 the libido. Our psychic therapy interposes elsewhere, not exactly at
 those sources of the phenomena which have been disclosed to us, but
 sufficiently far beyond the symptoms, at an opening in the structure of
 the disease which has become accessible to us by means of peculiar
 conditions.
 
 What must we do in order to replace the unconscious by the conscious in
 our patient? At one time we thought this was quite simple, that all we
 had to do was to reconstruct the unconscious and then tell the patient
 about it. But we already know this was a shortsighted error. Our
 knowledge of the unconscious has not the same value as his; if we
 communicate our knowledge to him it will not stand _in place of_ the
 unconscious within him, but will exist _beside_ it, and only a very
 small change will have been effected. We must rather think of the
 unconscious as _localized_, and must seek it in memory at the point
 where it came into existence by means of a suppression. This suppression
 must be removed before the substitution of the conscious for the
 unconscious can be successfully effected. How can such a suppression be
 removed? Here our task enters a second phase. First to find the
 suppression, then to remove the resistance by which this suppression is
 maintained.
 
 How can we do away with resistance? In the same way--by reconstructing
 it and confronting the patient with it. For resistance arises from
 suppression, from the very suppression which we are trying to break up,
 or from an earlier one. It has been established by the counter-attack
 that was instigated to suppress the offensive impulse. And so now we do
 the very thing we intended at the outset: interpret, reconstruct,
 communicate--but now we do it in the right place. The counter-seizure of
 the idea or resistance is not part of the unconscious but of the ego,
 which is our fellow-worker. This holds true even if resistance is not
 conscious. We know that the difficulty arises from the ambiguity of the
 word "unconscious," which may connote either a phenomenon or a system.
 That seems very difficult, but it is only a repetition, isn't it? We
 were prepared for it a long time ago. We expect resistance to be
 relinquished, the counter-siege to collapse, when our interpretation has
 enabled the ego to recognize it. With what impulses are we able to work
 in such a case? In the first place, the patient's desire to become well,
 which has led him to accommodate himself to co-operate with us in the
 task of the cure; in the second place, the help of his intelligence,
 which is supported by the interpretation we offer him. There is no doubt
 that after we have made clear to him what he may expect, the patient's
 intelligence can identify resistances, and find their translation into
 the suppressions more readily. If I say to you, "Look up into the sky,
 you can see a balloon there," you will find it more readily than if I
 had just asked you to look up to see whether you could discover
 anything. And unless the student who for the first time works with a
 microscope is told by his teacher what he may look for, he will not see
 anything, even if it is present and quite visible.
 
 And now for the fact! In a large number of forms of nervous illness, in
 hysteria, conditions of anxiety and compulsion neuroses, one hypothesis
 is correct. By finding the suppression, revealing resistance,
 interpreting the thing suppressed, we really succeed in solving the
 problem, in overcoming resistance, in removing suppression, in
 transforming the unconscious into the conscious. While doing this we
 gain the clearest impression of the violent struggle that takes place in
 the patient's soul for the subjugation of resistance--a normal
 psychological struggle, in one psychic sphere between the motives that
 wish to maintain the counter-siege and those which are willing to give
 it up. The former are the old motives that at one time effected
 suppression; among the latter are those that have recently entered the
 conflict, to decide it, we trust, in the sense we favor. We have
 succeeded in reviving the old conflict of the suppression, in reopening
 the case that had already been decided. The new material we contribute
 consists in the first place of the warning, that the former solution of
 the conflict had led to illness, and the promise that another will pave
 the way to health; secondly, the powerful change of all conditions since
 the time of that first rejection. At that time the ego had been weak,
 infantile and may have had reason to denounce the claims of the libido
 as if they were dangerous. Today it is strong, experienced and is
 supported by the assistance of the physician. And so we may expect to
 guide the revived conflict to a better issue than a suppression, and in
 hysteria, fear and compulsion neuroses, as I have said before, success
 justifies our claims.
 
 There are other forms of illness, however, in which our therapeutic
 procedure never is successful, even though the causal conditions are
 similar. Though this may be characterized topically in a different way,
 in them there was also an original conflict between the ego and libido,
 which led to suppression. Here, too, it is possible to discover the
 occasions when suppressions occurred in the life of the patient. We
 employ the same procedure, are prepared to furnish the same promises,
 give the same kind of help. We again present to the patient the
 connections we expect him to discover, and we have in our favor the same
 interval in time between the treatment and these suppressions favoring a
 solution of the conflict; yet in spite of these conditions, we are not
 able to overcome the resistance, or to remove the suppression. These
 patients, suffering from paranoia, melancholia, and dementia praecox,
 remain untouched on the whole, and proof against psychoanalytic therapy.
 What is the reason for this? It is not lack of intelligence; we require,
 of course, a certain amount of intellectual ability in our patients; but
 those suffering from paranoia, for instance, who effect such subtle
 combinations of facts, certainly are not in want of it. Nor can we say
 that other motive forces are lacking. Patients suffering from
 melancholia, in contrast to those afflicted with paranoia, are
 profoundly conscious of being ill, of suffering greatly, but they are
 not more accessible. Here we are confronted with a fact we do not
 understand, which bids us doubt if we have really understood all the
 conditions of success in other neuroses.
 
 In the further consideration of our dealings with hysterical and
 compulsion neurotics we soon meet with a second fact, for which we were
 not at all prepared. After a while we notice that these patients behave
 toward us in a very peculiar way. We thought that we had accounted for
 all the motive forces that could come into play, that we had
 rationalized the relation between the patient and ourselves until it
 could be as readily surveyed as an example in arithmetic, and yet some
 force begins to make itself felt that we had not considered in our
 calculations. This unexpected something is highly variable. I shall
 first describe those of its manifestations which occur frequently and
 are easy to understand.
 
 We see our patient, who should be occupying himself only with finding a
 way out of his painful conflicts, become especially interested in the
 person of the physician. Everything connected with this person is more
 important to him than his own affairs and diverts him from his illness.
 Dealings with him are very pleasant for the time being. He is especially
 cordial, seeks to show his gratitude wherever he can, and manifests
 refinements and merits of character that we hardly had expected to
 find. The physician forms a very favorable opinion of the patient and
 praises the happy chance that permitted him to render assistance to so
 admirable a personality. If the physician has the opportunity of
 speaking to the relatives of the patient he hears with pleasure that
 this esteem is returned. At home the patient never tires of praising the
 physician, of prizing advantages which he constantly discovers. "He
 adores you, he trusts you blindly, everything you say is a revelation to
 him," the relatives say. Here and there one of the chorus observes more
 keenly and remarks, "It is a positive bore to hear him talk, he speaks
 only of you; you are his only subject of conversation."
 
 Let us hope that the physician is modest enough to ascribe the patient's
 estimation of his personality to the encouragement that has been offered
 him and to the widening of his intellectual horizon through the
 astounding and liberating revelations which the cure entails. Under
 these conditions analysis progressed splendidly. The patient understands
 every suggestion, he concentrates on the problems that the treatment
 requires him to solve, reminiscences and ideas flood his mind. The
 physician is surprised by the certainty and depth of these
 interpretations and notices with satisfaction how willingly the sick man
 receives the new psychological facts which are so hotly contested by the
 healthy persons in the world outside. An objective improvement in the
 condition of the patient, universally admitted, goes hand in hand with
 this harmonious relation of the physician to the patient under analysis.
 
 But we cannot always expect to have fair weather. There comes a day when
 the storm breaks. Difficulties turn up in the treatment. The patient
 asserts that he can think of nothing more. We are under the impression
 that he is no longer interested in the work, that he lightly passes over
 the injunction that, heedless of any critical impulse, he must say
 everything that comes to his mind. He behaves as though he were not
 under treatment, as though he had closed no agreement with the
 physician; he is clearly obsessed by something he does not wish to
 divulge. This is a situation which endangers the success of the
 treatment. We are distinctly confronted with a tremendous resistance.
 What can have happened?
 
 Provided we are able once more to clarify the situation, we recognize
 the cause of the disturbance to have been intense affectionate
 emotions, which the patient has transferred to the physician. This is
 certainly not justified either by the behavior of the physician or by
 the relations the treatment has created. The way in which this affection
 is manifested and the goals it strives for will depend on the personal
 affiliations of the two parties involved. When we have here a young girl
 and a man who is still young we receive the impression of normal love.
 We find it quite natural that a girl should fall in love with a man with
 whom she is alone a great deal, with whom she discusses intimate
 matters, who appears to her in the advantageous light of a beneficent
 adviser. In this we probably overlook the fact that in a neurotic girl
 we should rather presuppose a derangement in her capacity to love. The
 more the personal relations of physician and patient diverge from this
 hypothetical case, the more are we puzzled to find the same emotional
 relation over and over again. We can understand that a young woman,
 unhappy in her marriage, develops a serious passion for her physician,
 who is still free; that she is ready to seek divorce in order to belong
 to him, or even does not hesitate to enter into a secret love affair, in
 case the conventional obstacles loom too large. Similar things are known
 to occur outside of psychoanalysis. Under these circumstances, however,
 we are surprised to hear women and girls make remarks that reveal a
 certain attitude toward the problems of the cure. They always knew that
 love alone could cure them, and from the very beginning of their
 treatment they anticipated that this relationship would yield them what
 life had denied. This hope alone has spurred them on to exert themselves
 during the treatments, to overcome all the difficulties in communicating
 their disclosures. We add on our own account--"and to understand so
 easily everything that is generally most difficult to believe." But we
 are amazed by such a confession; it upsets our calculations completely.
 Can it be that we have omitted the most important factor from our
 hypothesis?
 
 And really, the more experience we gain, the less we can deny this
 correction, which shames our knowledge. The first few times we could
 still believe that the analytic cure had met with an accidental
 interruption, not inherent to its purpose. But when this affectionate
 relation between physician and patient occurs regularly in every new
 case, under the most unfavorable conditions and even under grotesque
 circumstances; when it occurs in the case of the elderly woman, and is
 directed toward the grey-beard, or to one in whom, according to our
 judgment, no seductive attractions exist, we must abandon the idea of an
 accidental interruption, and realize that we are dealing with a
 phenomenon which is closely interwoven with the nature of the illness.
 
 The new fact which we recognize unwillingly is termed _transference_. We
 mean a transference of emotions to the person of the physician, because
 we do not believe that the situation of the cure justifies the genesis
 of such feelings. We rather surmise that this readiness toward emotion
 originated elsewhere, that it was prepared within the patient, and that
 the opportunity given by analytic treatment caused it to be transferred
 to the person of the physician. Transference may occur as a stormy
 demand for love or in a more moderate form; in place of the desire to be
 his mistress, the young girl may wish to be adopted as the favored
 daughter of the old man, the libidinous desire may be toned down to a
 proposal of inseparable but ideal and platonic friendship. Some women
 understand how to sublimate the transference, how to modify it until it
 attains a kind of fitness for existence; others manifest it in its
 original, crude and generally impossible form. But fundamentally it is
 always the same and can never conceal that its origin is derived from
 the same source.
 
 Before we ask ourselves how we can accommodate this new fact, we must
 first complete its description. What happens in the case of male
 patients? Here we might hope to escape the troublesome infusion of sex
 difference and sex attraction. But the answer is pretty much the same as
 with women patients. The same relation to the physician, the same
 over-estimation of his qualities, the same abandon of interest toward
 his affairs, the same jealousy toward all those who are close to him.
 The sublimated forms of transference are more frequent in men, the
 direct sexual demand is rarer to the extent to which manifest
 homosexuality retreats before the methods by which these instinct
 components may be utilized. In his male patients more often than in his
 women patients, the physician observes a manifestation of transference
 which at first sight seems to contradict everything previously
 described: a hostile or _negative_ transference.
 
 In the first place, let us realize that the transference occurs in the
 patient at the very outset of the treatment and is, for a time, the
 strongest impetus to work. We do not feel it and need not heed it as
 long as it acts to the advantage of the analysis we are working out
 together. When it turns into resistance, however, we must pay attention
 to it. Then we discover that two contrasting conditions have changed
 their relation to the treatment. In the first place there is the
 development of an affectionate inclination, clearly revealing the signs
 of its origin in sexual desire which becomes so strong as to awaken an
 inner resistance against it. Secondly, there are the hostile instead of
 the tender impulses. The hostile feelings generally appear later than
 the affectionate impulses or succeed them. When they occur
 simultaneously they exemplify the ambivalence of emotions which exists
 in most of the intimate relations between all persons. The hostile
 feelings connote an emotional attachment just as do the affectionate
 impulses, just as defiance signifies dependence as well as does
 obedience, although the activities they call out are opposed. We cannot
 doubt but that the hostile feelings toward the physician deserve the
 name of transference, since the situation which the treatment creates
 certainly could not give sufficient cause for their origin. This
 necessary interpretation of negative transference assures us that we
 have not mistaken the positive or affectionate emotions that we have
 similarly named.
 
 The origin of this transference, the difficulties it causes us, the
 means of overcoming it, the use we finally extract from it--these
 matters must be dealt with in the technical instruction of
 psychoanalysis, and can only be touched upon here. It is out of the
 question to yield to those demands of the patient which take root from
 the transference, while it would be unkind to reject them brusquely or
 even indignantly. We overcome transference by proving to the patient
 that his feelings do not originate in the present situation, and are not
 intended for the person of the physician, but merely repeat what
 happened to him at some former time. In this way we force him to
 transform his repetition into a recollection. And so transference, which
 whether it be hostile or affectionate, seems in every case to be the
 greatest menace of the cure, really becomes its most effectual tool,
 which aids in opening the locked compartments of the psychic life. But I
 should like to tell you something which will help you to overcome the
 astonishment you must feel at this unexpected phenomenon. We must not
 forget that this illness of the patient which we have undertaken to
 analyze is not consummated or, as it were, congealed; rather it is
 something that continues its development like a living being. The
 beginning of the treatment does not end this development. When the cure,
 however, first has taken possession of the patient, the productivity of
 the illness in this new phase is concentrated entirely on one aspect:
 the relation of the patient to the physician. And so transference may be
 compared to the cambrium layer between the wood and the bark of a tree,
 from which the formation of new tissues and the growth of the trunk
 proceed at the same time. When the transference has once attained this
 significance the work upon the recollections of the patient recedes into
 the background. At that point it is correct to say that we are no longer
 concerned with the patient's former illness, but with a newly created,
 transformed neurosis, in place of the former. We followed up this new
 edition of an old condition from the very beginning, we saw it originate
 and grow; hence we understand it especially well, because we ourselves
 are the center of it, its object. All the symptoms of the patient have
 lost their original meaning and have adapted themselves to a new
 meaning, which is determined by its relation to transference. Or, only
 such symptoms as are capable of this transformation have persisted. The
 control of this new, artificial neurosis coincides with the removal of
 the illness for which treatment was sought in the first place, namely,
 with the solution of our therapeutic problem. The human being who, by
 means of his relations to the physician, has freed himself from the
 influences of suppressed impulses, becomes and stays free in his
 individual life, when the influence of the physician is subsequently
 removed.
 
 Transference has attained extraordinary significance, has become the
 centre of the cure, in the conditions of hysteria, anxiety and
 compulsion neuroses. Their conditions therefore are properly included
 under the term transference neuroses. Whoever in his analytic experience
 has come into contact with the existence of transference can no longer
 doubt the character of those suppressed impulses that express
 themselves in the symptoms of these neuroses and requires no stronger
 proof of their libidinous character. We may say that our conviction that
 the meaning of the symptoms is substituted libidinous gratification was
 finally confirmed by this explanation of transference.
 
 Now we have every reason to correct our former dynamic conception of the
 healing process, and to bring it into harmony with our new discernment.
 If the patient is to fight the normal conflict that our analysis has
 revealed against the suppressions, he requires a tremendous impetus to
 influence the desirable decision which will lead him back to health.
 Otherwise he might decide for a repetition of the former issue and allow
 those factors which have been admitted to consciousness to slip back
 again into suppression. The deciding vote in this conflict is not given
 by his intellectual penetration--which is neither strong nor free enough
 for such an achievement--but only by his relation to the physician.
 Inasmuch as his transference carries a positive sign, it invests the
 physician with authority and is converted into faith for his
 communications and conceptions. Without transference of this sort, or
 without a negative transfer, he would not even listen to the physician
 and to his arguments. Faith repeats the history of its own origin; it is
 a derivative of love and at first requires no arguments. When they are
 offered by a beloved person, arguments may later be admitted and
 subjected to critical reflection. Arguments without such support avail
 nothing, and never mean anything in life to most persons. Man's
 intellect is accessible only in so far as he is capable of libidinous
 occupation with an object, and accordingly we have good ground to
 recognize and to fear the limit of the patient's capacity for being
 influenced by even the best analytical technique, namely, the extent of
 his narcism.
 
 The capacity for directing libidinous occupation with objects towards
 persons as well must also be accorded to all normal persons. The
 inclination to transference on the part of the neurotic we have
 mentioned, is only an extraordinary heightening of this common
 characteristic. It would be strange indeed if a human trait so
 wide-spread and significant had never been noticed and turned to
 account. But that has been done. Bernheim, with unerring perspicacity,
 based his theory of hypnotic manifestations on the statement that all
 persons are open to suggestion in some way or other. Suggestibility in
 his sense is nothing more than an inclination to transference, bounded
 so narrowly that there is no room for any negative transfer. But
 Bernheim could never define suggestion or its origin. For him it was a
 fundamental fact, and he could never tell us anything regarding its
 origin. He did not recognize the dependence of suggestibility upon
 sexuality and the activity of the libido. We, on the other hand, must
 realize that we have excluded hypnosis from our technique of neurosis
 only to rediscover suggestion in the shape of transference.
 
 But now I shall pause and let you put in a word. I see that an objection
 is looming so large within you that if it were not voiced you would be
 unable to listen to me. "So at last you confess that like the
 hypnotists, you work with the aid of suggestion. That is what we have
 been thinking for a long time. But why choose the detour over
 reminiscences of the past, revealing of the unconscious, interpretation
 and retranslation of distortions, the tremendous expenditure of time and
 money, if the only efficacious thing is suggestion? Why do you not use
 suggestion directly against symptoms, as the others do, the honest
 hypnotists? And if, furthermore, you offer the excuse that by going your
 way you have made numerous psychological discoveries which are not
 revealed by direct suggestion, who shall vouch for their accuracy? Are
 not they, too, a result of suggestion, that is to say, of unintentional
 suggestion? Can you not, in this realm also, thrust upon the patient
 whatever you wish and whatever you think is so?"
 
 Your objections are uncommonly interesting, and must be answered. But I
 cannot do it now for lack of time. Till the next time, then. You shall
 see, I shall be accountable to you. Today I shall only end what I have
 begun. I promised to explain, with the aid of the factor of
 transference, why our therapeutic efforts have not met with success in
 narcistic neuroses.
 
 This I can do in a few words and you will see how simply the riddle can
 be solved, how well everything harmonizes. Observation shows that
 persons suffering from narcistic neuroses have no capacity for
 transference, or only insufficient remains of it. They reject the
 physician not with hostility, but with indifference. That is why he
 cannot influence them. His words leave them cold, make no impression,
 and so the mechanism of the healing process, which we are able to set
 in motion elsewhere, the renewal of the pathogenic conflict and the
 overcoming of the resistance to the suppression, cannot be reproduced in
 them. They remain as they are. Frequently they are known to attempt a
 cure on their own account, and pathological results have ensued. We are
 powerless before them.
 
 On the basis of our clinical impressions of these patients, we asserted
 that in their case libidinous occupation with objects must have been
 abandoned, and object-libido must have been transformed into ego-libido.
 On the strength of this characteristic we had separated it from the
 first group of neurotics (hysteria, anxiety and compulsion neuroses).
 Their behavior under attempts at therapy confirms this supposition. They
 show no neurosis. They, therefore, are inaccessible to our efforts and
 we cannot cure them.
 
 
 
 
 TWENTY-EIGHTH LECTURE
 
 GENERAL THEORY OF THE NEUROSES
 
 _Analytical Therapy_
 
 
 You know our subject for today. You asked me why we do not make use of
 direct suggestion in psychoanalytic therapy, when we admit that our
 influence depends substantially upon transference, i.e., suggestion, for
 you have come to doubt whether or not we can answer for the objectivity
 of our psychological discoveries in the face of such a predominance of
 suggestion. I promised to give you a comprehensive answer.
 
 Direct suggestion is suggestion directed against the expression of the
 symptoms, a struggle between your authority and the motives of the
 disease. You pay no attention during this process to the motives, but
 only demand of the patient that he suppress their expression in
 symptoms. So it makes no difference in principle whether you hypnotize
 the patient or not. Bernheim, with his usual perspicacity, asserted that
 suggestion is the essential phenomenon underlying hypnotism, that
 hypnotism itself is already a result of suggestion, is a suggested
 condition. Bernheim was especially fond of practising suggestion upon a
 person in the waking state, and could achieve the same results as with
 suggestion under hypnosis.
 
 What shall I deal with first, the evidence of experience or theoretic
 considerations?
 
 Let us begin with our experiences. I was a pupil of Bernheim's, whom I
 sought out in Nancy in 1889, and whose book on suggestion I translated
 into German. For years I practised hypnotic treatment, at first by means
 of prohibitory suggestions alone, and later by this method in
 combination with investigation of the patient after the manner of
 Breuer. So I can speak from experience about the results of hypnotic or
 suggestive therapy. If we judge Bernheim's method according to the old
 doctor's password that an ideal therapy must be rapid, reliable and not
 unpleasant for the patient, we find it fulfills at least two of these
 requirements. It can be carried out much more rapidly, indescribably
 more rapidly than the analytic method, and it brings the patient neither
 trouble nor discomfort. In the long run it becomes monotonous for the
 physician, since each case is exactly the same; continually forbidding
 the existence of the most diverse symptoms under the same ceremonial,
 without being able to grasp anything of their meaning or their
 significance. It is second-rate work, not scientific activity, and
 reminiscent of magic, conjuring and hocus-pocus; yet in the face of the
 interest of the patient this cannot be considered. The third requisite,
 however, was lacking. The procedure was in no way reliable. It might
 succeed in one case, and fail with the next; sometimes much was
 accomplished, at other times little, one knew not why. Worse than this
 capriciousness of the technique was the lack of permanency of the
 results. After a short time, when the patient was again heard from, the
 old malady had reappeared, or it had been replaced by a new malady. We
 could start in again to hypnotize. At the same time we had been warned
 by those who were experienced that by frequent repetitions of hypnotism
 we would deprive the patient of his self-reliance and accustom him to
 this therapy as though it were a narcotic. Granted that we did
 occasionally succeed as well as one could wish; with slight trouble we
 achieved complete and permanent results. But the conditions for such a
 favorable outcome remained unknown. I have had it happen that an
 aggravated condition which I had succeeded in clearing up completely by
 a short hypnotic treatment returned unchanged when the patient became
 angry and arbitrarily developed ill feeling against me. After a
 reconciliation I was able to remove the malady anew and with even
 greater thoroughness, yet when she became hostile to me a second time it
 returned again. Another time a patient whom I had repeatedly helped
 through nervous conditions by hypnosis, during the treatment of an
 especially stubborn attack, suddenly threw her arms around my neck. This
 made it necessary to consider the question, whether one wanted to or
 not, of the nature and source of the suggestive authority.
 
 So much for experience. It shows us that in renouncing direct suggestion
 we have given up nothing that is not replaceable. Now let us add a few
 further considerations. The practice of hypnotic therapy demands only a
 slight amount of work of the patient as well as of the physician. This
 therapy fits in perfectly with the estimation of neuroses to which the
 majority of physicians subscribe. The physician says to the neurotic,
 "There is nothing the matter with you; you are only nervous, and so I
 can blow away all your difficulties with a few words in a few minutes."
 But it is contrary to our dynamic conceptions that we should be able to
 move a great weight by an inconsiderable force, by attacking it directly
 and without the aid of appropriate preparations. So far as conditions
 are comparable, experience shows us that this performance does not
 succeed with the neurotic. But I know this argument is not unassailable;
 there are also "redeeming features."
 
 In the light of the knowledge we have gained from psychoanalysis we can
 describe the difference between hypnotic and psychoanalytic suggestion
 as follows: Hypnotic therapy seeks to hide something in psychic life,
 and to gloss it over; analytic therapy seeks to lay it bare and to
 remove it. The first method works cosmetically, the other surgically.
 The first uses suggestion in order to prevent the appearance of the
 symptoms, it strengthens suppression, but leaves unchanged all other
 processes that have led to symptom development. Analytic therapy attacks
 the illness closer to its sources, namely in the conflicts out of which
 the symptoms have emerged, it makes use of suggestion to change the
 solution of these conflicts. Hypnotic therapy leaves the patient
 inactive and unchanged, and therefore without resistance to every new
 occasion for disease. Analytic treatment places upon the physician, as
 well as upon the patient, a difficult responsibility; the inner
 resistance of the patient must be abolished. The psychic life of the
 patient is permanently changed by overcoming these resistances, it is
 lifted upon a higher plane of development and remains protected against
 new possibilities of disease. The work of overcoming resistance is the
 fundamental task of the analytic cure. The patient, however, must take
 it on himself to accomplish this, while the physician, with the aid of
 suggestion, makes it possible for him to do so. The suggestion works in
 the nature of an _education_. We are therefore justified in saying that
 analytic treatment is a sort of _after-education_.
 
 I hope I have made it clear to you wherein our technique of using
 suggestion differs therapeutically from the only use possible in
 hypnotic therapy. With your knowledge of the relation between suggestion
 and transference you will readily understand the capriciousness of
 hypnotic therapy which attracted our attention, and you will see why, on
 the other hand, analytic suggestion can be relied upon to its limits. In
 hypnosis we depend on the condition of the patient's capacity for
 transference, yet we are unable to exert any influence on this capacity.
 The transference of the subject may be negative, or, as is most
 frequent, ambivalent; the patient may have protected himself against
 suggestion by very special adjustments, yet we are unable to learn
 anything concerning them. In psychoanalysis we work with the
 transference itself, we do away with the forces opposing it, prepare the
 instrument with which we are to work. So it becomes possible to derive
 entirely new uses from the power of suggestion; we are able to control
 it, the patient does not work himself into any state of mind he pleases,
 but in so far as we are able to influence him at all, we can guide the
 suggestion.
 
 Now you will say, regardless of whether we call the driving force of our
 analysis transference or suggestion, there is still the danger that
 through our influence on the patient the objective certainty of our
 discoveries becomes doubtful. That which becomes a benefit to therapy
 works harm to the investigation. This objection is most often raised
 against psychoanalysis, and it must be admitted that even if it does not
 hit the mark, it cannot be waved aside as stupid. But if it were
 justified, psychoanalysis would be nothing more than an extraordinarily
 well disguised and especially workable kind of treatment by suggestion,
 and we may lay little weight upon all its assertions concerning the
 influences of life, psychic dynamics, and the unconscious. This is in
 fact the opinion held by our opponents; we are supposed especially to
 have "balked into" the patients everything that supports the importance
 of sexual experiences, and often the experiences themselves, after the
 combinations themselves have grown up in our degenerate imaginations. We
 can refute these attacks most easily by calling on the evidence of
 experience rather than by resorting to theory. Anyone who has himself
 performed a psychoanalysis has been able to convince himself innumerable
 times that it is impossible thus to suggest anything to the patient.
 There is no difficulty, of course, in making the patient a disciple of
 any one theory, and thus causing him to share the possible error of the
 physician. With respect to this he behaves just like any other person,
 like a student, but he has influenced only his intelligence, not his
 disease. The solving of his conflicts and the overcoming of his
 resistances succeeds only if we have aroused in him representations of
 such expectations as can agree with reality. What was inapplicable in
 the assumptions of the physician falls away during the course of the
 analysis; it must be withdrawn and replaced by something more nearly
 correct. By employing a careful technique we seek to prevent the
 occurrence of temporary results arising out of suggestion, yet there is
 no harm if such temporary results occur, for we are never satisfied with
 early successes. We do not consider the analysis finished until all the
 obscurities of the case are cleared up, all amnestic gaps filled out and
 the occasions which originally called out the suppressions discovered.
 We see in results that are achieved too quickly a hindrance rather than
 a furtherance of analytic work and repeatedly we undo these results
 again by purposely breaking up the transference upon which they rest.
 Fundamentally it is this feature which distinguishes analytical
 treatment from the purely suggestive technique and frees analytic
 results from the suspicion of having been suggested. Under every other
 suggestive treatment the transference itself is most carefully upheld
 and the influence left unquestioned; in analytic treatment, however, the
 transference becomes the subject of treatment and is subject to
 criticism in whatever form it may appear. At the end of an analytic cure
 the transference itself must be abolished; therefore the effect of the
 treatment, whether positive or negative, must be founded not upon
 suggestion but upon the overcoming of inner resistances, upon the inner
 change achieved in the patient, which the aid of suggestion has made
 possible.
 
 Presumably the creation of the separate suggestions is counteracted, in
 the course of the cure, by our being continually forced to attack
 resistances which have the ability to change themselves into negative
 (hostile) transferences. Furthermore, let me call your attention to the
 fact that a large number of results of analysis, otherwise perhaps
 subject to the suspicion that they are products of suggestion, can be
 confirmed from other unquestionable sources. As authoritative witnesses
 in this case we refer to the testimony of dements and paranoiacs, who
 are, naturally far removed from any suspicion of suggestive influence.
 Whatever these patients can tell us about symbolic translations and
 phantasies which have forced their way into their consciousness agrees
 faithfully with the results of our investigations upon the unconscious
 of transference-neurotics, and this gives added weight to the objective
 correctness of our interpretations which are so often doubted. I believe
 you will not go wrong if you give your confidence to analysis with
 reference to these factors.
 
 We now want to complete our statement concerning the mechanism of
 healing, by including it within the formulae of the libido theory. The
 neurotic is incapable both of enjoyment and work; first, because his
 libido is not directed toward any real object, and second because he
 must use up a great deal of his former energy to keep his libido
 suppressed and to arm himself against its attacks. He would become well
 if there could be an end to the conflict between his ego and his libido,
 and if his ego could again have the libido at its disposal. The task of
 therapy, therefore, consists of freeing the libido from its present
 bonds, which have estranged it from the ego, and furthermore to bring it
 once more into the service of the ego. Where is the libido of the
 neurotics? It is easy to find; it is bound to the symptoms which at that
 time furnish it with the only available substitute satisfaction. We have
 to become master of the symptoms, and abolish them, which is of course
 exactly what the patient asks us to do. To abolish the symptoms it
 becomes necessary to go back to their origin, to renew the conflict out
 of which they emerged, but this time with the help of motive forces that
 were originally not available, to guide it toward a new solution. This
 revision of the process of suppression can be accomplished only in part
 by following the traces in memory of the occurrences which led to the
 suppression. The decisive part of the cure is accomplished by means of
 the relationship to the physician, the transference, by means of which
 new editions of the old conflict are created. Under this situation the
 patient would like to behave as he had behaved originally, but by
 summoning all his available psychic power we compel him to reach a
 different decision. Transference, then, becomes the battlefield on which
 all the contending forces are to meet.
 
 The full strength of the libido, as well as the entire resistance
 against it, is concentrated in this relationship to the physician; so it
 is inevitable that the symptoms of the libido should be laid bare. In
 place of his original disturbance the patient manifests the artificially
 constructed disturbance of transference; in place of heterogeneous
 unreal objects for the libido you now have only the person of the
 physician, a single object, which, however, is also fantastic. The new
 struggle over this object is, however, raised to the highest psychic
 level with the aid of the physician's suggestions, and proceeds as a
 normal psychic conflict. By avoiding a new suppression the estrangement
 between the ego and the libido comes to an end, the psychic unity of the
 personality is restored. When the libido again becomes detached from the
 temporary object of the physician it cannot return to its former
 objects, but is now at the disposal of the ego. The forces we have
 overcome in the task of therapy are on the one hand the aversion of the
 ego for certain directions of the libido, which had expressed itself as
 a tendency to suppression, and on the other hand the tenacity of the
 libido, which is loathe to leave an object which it has once occupied.
 
 Accordingly the work of therapy falls into two phases: first, all the
 libido is forced from the symptoms into the transference, and
 concentrated there; secondly, the struggle over this new object is
 carried on and the libido set free. The decisive change for the better
 in this renewed conflict is the throwing out of the suppression, so that
 the libido cannot this time again escape the ego by fleeing into the
 unconscious. This is accomplished by the change in the ego under the
 influence of the physician's suggestion. In the course of the work of
 interpretation, which translates unconscious into conscious, the ego
 grows at the expense of the unconscious; it learns forgiveness toward
 the libido, and becomes inclined to permit some sort of satisfaction for
 it. The ego's timidity in the face of the demands of the libido is now
 lessened by the prospect of occupying some of the libido through
 sublimation. The more the processes of the treatment correspond to this
 theoretic description the greater will be the success of psychoanalytic
 therapy. It is limited by the lack of mobility of the libido, which can
 stand in the way of releasing its objects, and by the obstinate narcism
 which will not permit the object-transference to effect more than just
 so much. Perhaps we shall obtain further light on the dynamics of the
 healing process by the remark that we are able to gather up the entire
 libido which has become withdrawn from the control of the ego by drawing
 a part of it to ourselves in the process of transference.
 
 It is to be remembered that we cannot reach a direct conclusion as to
 the disposition of the libido during the disease from the distributions
 of the libido which are effected during and because of the treatment.
 Assuming that we have succeeded in curing the case by means of the
 creation and destruction of a strong father-transference to the
 physician, it would be wrong to conclude that the patient had previously
 suffered from a similar and unconscious attachment of his libido to his
 father. The father-transference is merely the battlefield upon which we
 were able to overcome the libido; the patient's libido had been
 concentrated here from its other positions. The battlefield need not
 necessarily have coincided with the most important fortresses of the
 enemy. Defense of the hostile capital need not take place before its
 very gates. Not until we have again destroyed the transference can we
 begin to reconstruct the distribution of the libido that existed during
 the illness.
 
 From the standpoint of the libido theory we might say a last word in
 regard to the dream. The dreams of neurotics, as well as their errors
 and haphazard thoughts, help us in finding the meaning of the symptoms
 and in discovering the disposition of the libido. In the form of the
 wish fulfillment they show us what wish impulses have been suppressed,
 and to what objects the libido, withdrawn from the ego, has been
 attached. That is why interpretation of dreams plays a large role in
 psychoanalytic treatment, and is in many cases, for a long time, the
 most important means with which we work. We already know that the
 condition of sleep itself carries with it a certain abatement of
 suppressions. Because of this lessening of the pressure upon it, it
 becomes possible for the suppressed impulse to create in the dream a
 much clearer expression than the symptom can furnish during the day. So
 dream-study is the easiest approach to a knowledge of the libidinous
 suppressed unconscious which has been withdrawn from the ego.
 
 Dreams of neurotics differ in no essential point from the dreams of
 normal persons; you might even say they cannot be distinguished. It
 would be unreasonable to explain the dreams of the nervous in any way
 which could not be applied to the dreams of the normal. So we must say
 the difference between neurosis and health applies only during the day,
 and does not continue in dream life. We find it necessary to attribute
 to the healthy numerous assumptions which have grown out of the
 connections between the dreams and the symptoms of the neurotic. We are
 not in a position to deny that even a healthy man possesses those
 factors in his psychic life which alone make possible the development of
 the dream and of the symptom as well. We must conclude, therefore, that
 the healthy have also made use of suppressions and are put to a certain
 amount of trouble to keep those impulses under control; the system of
 their unconscious, too, conceals impulses which are suppressed, yet are
 still possessed of energy, and _a part of their libido is also withdrawn
 from the control of their ego_. So the healthy man is virtually a
 neurotic, but dreams are apparently the only symptoms which he can
 manifest. Yet if we subject our waking hours to a more penetrating
 analysis we discover, of course, that they refute this appearance and
 that this seemingly healthy life is shot through with a number of
 trivial, practically unimportant symptom formations.
 
 The difference between nervous health and neurosis is entirely a
 practical one which is determined by the available capacity for
 enjoyment and accomplishment retained by the individual. It varies
 presumably with the relative proportion of the energy totals which have
 remained free and those which have been bound by suppressions, and is
 quantitative rather than qualitative. I do not have to remind you that
 this conception is the theoretical basis for the certainty that neuroses
 can be cured, despite their foundation in constitutional disposition.
 
 This is accordingly what we may make out of the identity between the
 dreams of the healthy and those of the neurotic for the definition of
 health. As regards the dream itself, we must note further that we cannot
 separate it from its relation to neurotic symptoms. We must recognize
 that it is not completely defined as a translation of thoughts into an
 archaic form of expression, that is, we must assume it discloses a
 disposition of libido and of object-occupations which have actually
 taken place.
 
 We have about come to the end. Perhaps you are disappointed that I have
 dealt only with theory in this chapter on psychoanalytic therapy, and
 have said nothing concerning the conditions under which the cure is
 undertaken, or of the successes which it achieves. But I shall omit
 both. I shall omit the first because I had intended no practical
 training in the practice of psychoanalysis, and I shall neglect the
 second for numerous reasons. At the beginning of our talks I emphasized
 the fact that under favorable circumstances we attain results which can
 be favorably compared with the happiest achievements in the field of
 internal therapy, and, I may add, these results could not have been
 otherwise achieved. If I were to say more I might be suspected of
 wishing to drown the voices of disparagement, which have become so loud,
 by advertising our claims. We psychoanalysts have repeatedly been
 threatened by our medical colleagues, even in open congresses, that the
 eyes of the suffering public must be opened to the worthlessness of this
 method of treatment by a statistical collection of analytic failures and
 injuries. But such a collection, aside from the biased, denunciatory
 character of its purpose, would hardly be able to give a correct picture
 of the therapeutic values of analysis. Analytic therapy is, as you know,
 still young; it took a long time to establish the technique, and this
 could be done only during the course of the work and under the influence
 of accumulating experience. As a result of the difficulties of
 instruction the physician who begins the practice of psychoanalysis is
 more dependent upon his capacity to develop on his own account than is
 the ordinary specialist, and the results he achieves in his first years
 can never be taken as indicative of the possibilities of analytic
 therapy.
 
 Many attempts at treatment failed in the early years of analysis because
 they were made on cases that were not at all suited to the procedure,
 and which today we exclude by our classification of symptoms. But this
 classification could be made only after practice. In the beginning we
 did not know that paranoia and dementia praecox are, in their fully
 developed phases, inaccessible, and we were justified in trying out our
 method on all kinds of conditions. Besides, the greatest number of
 failures in those first years were not due to the fault of the physician
 or because of unsuitable choice of subjects, but rather to the
 unpropitiousness of external conditions. We have hitherto spoken only of
 internal resistances, those of the patient, which are necessary and may
 be overcome. External resistances to psychoanalysis, due to the
 circumstances of the patient and his environment, have little
 theoretical interest, but are of great practical importance.
 Psychoanalytic treatment may be compared to a surgical operation, and
 has the right to be undertaken under circumstances favorable to its
 success. You know what precautions the surgeon is accustomed to take: a
 suitable room, good light, assistance, exclusion of relatives, etc. How
 many operations would be successful, do you think, if they had to be
 performed in the presence of all the members of the family, who would
 put their fingers into the field of operation and cry aloud at every cut
 of the knife? The interference of relatives in psychoanalytical
 treatment is a very great danger, a danger one does not know how to
 meet. We are armed against the internal resistances of the patient which
 we recognize as necessary, but how are we to protect ourselves against
 external resistance? It is impossible to approach the relatives of the
 patient with any sort of explanation, one cannot influence them to hold
 aloof from the whole affair, and one cannot get into league with them
 because we then run the danger of losing the confidence of the patient,
 who rightly demands that we in whom he confides take his part. Besides,
 those who know the rifts that are often formed in family life will not
 be surprised as analysts when they discover that the patient's nearest
 relatives are less interested in seeing him cured than in having him
 remain as he is. Where, as is so often the case, the neurosis is
 connected with conflicts with members of the family, the healthy member
 does not hesitate long in the choice between his own interest and that
 of the cure of the patient. It is not surprising if a husband looks with
 disfavor upon a treatment in which, as he may correctly suspect, the
 register of his sins is unrolled; nor are we surprised, and surely we
 cannot take the blame, when our efforts remain fruitless and are
 prematurely broken off because the resistance of the husband is added to
 that of the sick wife. We had only undertaken something which, under the
 existing circumstance, it was impossible to carry out.
 
 Instead of many cases, I shall tell you of just one in which, because of
 professional precautions, I was destined to play a sad role. Many years
 ago I treated a young girl who for a long time was afraid to go on the
 street, or to remain at home alone. The patient hesitatingly admitted
 that her phantasy had been caused by accidentally observing affectionate
 relations between her mother and a well-to-do friend of the family. But
 she was so clumsy--or perhaps so sly--as to give her mother a hint of
 what had been discussed during the analysis, and changed her behavior
 toward her mother, insisting that no one but her mother should protect
 her against the fear of being alone, and anxiously barring the way when
 her mother wished to leave the house. The mother had previously been
 very nervous herself, but had been cured years before in a hydropathic
 sanatorium. Let us say, in that institution she made the acquaintance of
 the man with whom she was to enter upon the relationship which was able
 to satisfy her in every respect. Becoming suspicious of the stormy
 demands of the girl, the mother _suddenly_ realized the meaning of her
 daughter's fear. She must have made herself sick to imprison her mother
 and to rob her of the freedom she needed to maintain relations with her
 lover. Immediately the mother made an end to the harmful treatment. The
 girl was put into a sanatorium for the nervous and exhibited for many
 years as "a poor victim of psychoanalysis." For just as long a period I
 was pursued by evil slander, due to the unfavorable outcome of this
 case. I maintained silence because I thought myself bound by the rules
 of professional discretion. Years later I learned from a colleague who
 had visited the institution, and had seen the agoraphobic girl there,
 that the relationship between the mother and the wealthy friend of the
 family was known all over town, and apparently connived at by the
 husband and father. It was to this "secret" that our treatment had been
 sacrificed.
 
 In the years before the war, when the influx of patients from all parts
 made me independent of the favor or disfavor of my native city, I
 followed the rule of not treating anyone who was not _sui juris_, was
 not independent of all other persons in his essential relations of life.
 Every psychoanalyst cannot do this. You may conclude from my warning
 against the relatives of patients that for purposes of psychoanalysis we
 should take the patients away from their families, and should limit this
 therapy to the inmates of sanatoriums. I should not agree with you in
 this; it is much more beneficial for the patients, if they are not in a
 stage of great exhaustion, to continue in the same circumstances under
 which they must master the tasks set for them during the treatment. But
 the relatives ought not to counteract this advantage by their behavior,
 and above all, they should not antagonize and oppose the endeavors of
 the physician. But how are we to contend against these influences which
 are so inaccessible to us! You see how much the prospects of a treatment
 are determined by the social surroundings and the cultural conditions of
 a family.
 
 This offers a sad outlook indeed for the effectiveness of psychoanalysis
 as a therapy, even if we can explain the great majority of our failures
 by putting the blame on such disturbing external factors! Friends of
 analysis have advised us to counterbalance such a collection of failures
 by means of a statistical compilation on our part of our successful
 cases. Yet I could not try myself to do this. I tried to explain that
 statistics would be worthless if the collected cases were not
 comparable, and in fact, the various neuroses which we have undertaken
 to treat could, as a matter of fact, hardly be compared on the same
 basis, since they differed in many fundamental respects. Besides, the
 period of time over which we could report was too short to permit us to
 judge the permanency of our cures, and concerning certain cases we could
 not have given any information whatever. They related to persons who had
 kept their ailments, as well as their treatment, secret, and whose cure
 must necessarily be kept secret as well. The strongest hindrance,
 however, lay in the knowledge that men behave most irrationally in
 matters of therapy, and that we have no prospect of attaining anything
 by an appeal to reason. A therapeutic novelty is received either with
 frenzied enthusiasm, as was the case when Koch first made public his
 tuberculin against tuberculosis, or it is treated with abysmal distrust,
 as was the really blessed vaccination of Jenner, which even today
 retains implacable opponents. There was a very obvious prejudice against
 psychoanalysis. When we had cured a very difficult case we would hear it
 said: "That is no proof, he would have become well by himself in all
 this time." Yet when a patient who had already gone through four cycles
 of depression and mania came into my care during a temporary cessation
 in the melancholia, and three weeks later found herself in the
 beginnings of a new attack, all the members of the family as well as the
 high medical authorities called into consultation, were convinced that
 the new attack could only be the result of the attempted analysis.
 Against prejudice we are powerless; you see it again in the prejudices
 that one group of warring nations has developed against the other. The
 most sensible thing for us to do is to wait and allow time to wear it
 away. Some day the same persons think quite differently about the same
 things than before. Why they formerly thought otherwise remains the dark
 secret.
 
 It may be possible that the prejudice against psychoanalysis is already
 on the wane. The continual spread of psychoanalytic doctrine, the
 increase of the number of physicians in many lands who treat
 analytically, seems to vouch for it. When I was a young physician I was
 caught in just such a storm of outraged feeling of the medical
 profession toward hypnosis, treatment by suggestion, which today is
 contrasted with psychoanalysis by "sober" men. Hypnotism did not,
 however, as a therapeutic agent, live up to its promises; we
 psychoanalysts may call ourselves its rightful heirs, and we have not
 forgotten the large amount of encouragement and theoretical explanation
 we owe to it. The injuries blamed upon psychoanalysis are limited
 essentially to temporary aggravation of the conflict when the analysis
 is clumsily handled, or when it is broken off unfinished. You have heard
 our justification for our form of treatment, and you can form your own
 opinion as to whether or not our endeavors are likely to lead to lasting
 injury. Misuse of psychoanalysis is possible in various ways; above all,
 transference is a dangerous remedy in the hands of an unconscientious
 physician. But no professional method of procedure is protected from
 misuse; a knife that is not sharp is of no use in effecting a cure.
 
 I have thus reached the end, ladies and gentlemen. It is more than the
 customary formal speech when I admit that I am myself keenly depressed
 over the many faults in the lectures I have just delivered. First of
 all, I am sorry that I have so often promised to return to a subject
 only slightly touched upon at the time, and then found that the context
 has not made it possible to keep my word. I have undertaken to inform
 you concerning an unfinished thing, still in the process of development,
 and my brief exposition itself was an incomplete thing. Often I
 presented the evidence and then did not myself draw the conclusion. But
 I could not endeavor to make you masters of the subject. I tried only to
 give you some explanation and stimulation.
 
 
 END
 
 
 
 
 INDEX
 
 
 Abel, C., 195
 
 Abel, R., 148
 
 Abraham, K., 284, 358
 
 Abstinence, 299
 
 Accidental and symptomatic acts, 42
 
 Accumulated and combined errors, 37
 
 Adler, A., 203, 330, 351
 
 Agoraphobia, 227, 233
 
 Alexander, dream of, 65
 
 Altruism, 360
 
 Ambivalence, 369
 
 Amnesia, 244;
   childhood, 168;
   hysterical, 245;
   infantile, 245;
   of the neurotic, 244
 
 Analyses of dreams, 94, 95, 96, 97, 98, 153
 
 Analysis, experimental, dream for, 93
 
 Analytical therapy, 372, 388
 
 Andreas, Lou, 272
 
 Anxiety, 340, 342;
   dream, 183;
   equivalents, 347;
   form of neurotic fear, 346;
   hysteria, 233, 259, 316, 346;
   hysteria, resistance in, 250;
   neurosis, 338, 344, 347
 
 Anxious expectation, 344
 
 Archaic remnants and infantilism in the dream, 167
 
 Art, and the neurosis, 326
 
 Association experiment, 86;
   free, 84
 
 Auto-eroticism, 359
 
 
 Back, George, 108
 
 Basedowi, M., 336
 
 Beheading symbol, 231
 
 Bernheim, 81, 240, 385, 388
 
 Binet, 302
 
 Binz, 66
 
 Birth of the hero, myths, 182
 
 Birth, the source of fear, 343;
   symbols of, 132;
   theories of children, 274
 
 Bleuler, 86, 369
 
 Bloch, Ivan, 265
 
 Boelsche, W., 307
 
 Breuer, J., 221, 232, 241, 242, 253, 254, 388
 
 Breughel, P., 263
 
 
 Castration complex, 175
 
 Censor, dream, 110
 
 Charcot, 119
 
 Child, sexual life of, 268, 281
 
 Childhood amnesia, 168;
   dreams of, 101;
   egoism in, 171;
   experiences, phantasy in, 319;
   loss of memory for, 168;
   prophylaxis, 317
 
 Children, fear in, 350;
   sexual curiosity of, 274
 
 Children's dreams, 102;
   theories of birth, 274
 
 Choice of an object, 368
 
 Clinical problem, 244
 
 Common elements of dreams, 67, 69, 75
 
 Complex, castration, 175;
   family, 285;
   Oedipus, 174, 285;
   parent, 289
 
 Compulsion neurosis, 222, 227, 259, 261, 267, 298, 326;
   fear in, 349;
   manifestations of, 222
 
 Compulsion neurotics, resistance in, 250, 251;
   symptoms, analysis of, 224
 
 Compulsive activity, meaning of, 239;
   acts, 223;
   washing as, 233
 
 Condensation, 142
 
 Conflict, role of, in neurosis, 302, 305
 
 Conscious, definition of, 90
 
 Conversion-hysteria, 259, 339
 
 Criticism of dream, 194;
   of psychoanalysis, reasons for, 246
 
 
 Darwin, Charles, 247, 345
 
 Day dreams, 76, 105, 324
 
 Death in dreams, 133;
   wishes, 169
 
 Definition of psychoanalysis, 1
 
 Delusion, 216
 
 Dementia praecox, 339, 358, 363
 
 Development and regression, theories of, 294
 
 Diderot, 292
 
 Difficulties of psychoanalysis, 2, 5
 
 Disease, secondary advantage of, 334
 
 Disguise-memories, 168
 
 Displacement, 114, 144
 
 Dream, the, 63;
   of Alexander, 65;
   anxiety, 183;
   approaches to study of, 82;
   archaic remnants and infantilism in the, 167;
   censor, 110;
   character of, 69;
   criticism of, 194;
   day, 76, 105;
   definition of, 67, 68;
   difficulties and preliminary approach to, 63;
   distortion in, 101, 110, 183;
   doubtful points concerning, 194;
   for experimental analysis, 93;
   hypothesis and technique of interpretation of, 78;
   infantile, 183;
   interpretation, rules to be observed in, 91, 92;
   manifest and latent content of, 90, 96;
   of a prisoner, 109;
   the reaction to sleep-disturbing stimuli, 70;
   stimuli in, 71, 73;
   symbolism in, 122
 
 Dreams analysed, 94, 95, 96, 97, 98, 153;
   of childhood, 101;
   children's, 102;
   children's, elements of, 101-5;
   common elements of, 67, 69, 75;
   death in, 133;
   elaboration in, 74;
   examples of, 111;
   experimentally induced in, 71;
   of neurotics, 395;
   typical, 234;
   visual forms in, 75;
   wish fulfillment, 107;
   dream-work, 141;
   processes of, 142
 
 Du prel, 108
 
 
 Ego, development of, 304;
   impulses, 303;
   instincts, 356;
   psychology, 365;
   regressions, 310
 
 Egoism, 360;
   in childhood, 171
 
 Elements of children's dreams, 101, 102, 103, 104, 105
 
 Erogenous zones, 271
 
 Erotomania, 366
 
 Errors, accumulated and combined, 37;
   forgetting names, 34;
   forgetting projects, 34;
   losing and mislaying objects, 36;
   misreading, 51;
   proved by further developments, 39;
   psychology of, 10, 23;
   repeated, 37;
   slips of the pen, 49;
   of the tongue, 16, 18;
   expectant fear, 344
 
 
 Fact, principle of, 309
 
 Family-complex, 289
 
 Fear, 340, 342;
   in children, 350;
   in compulsion neurosis, 349;
   expectant, 344;
   in hysteria, 348;
   of the manifold, 344;
   neurotic, 341;
   anxiety, form of, 346;
   clinical observations on, 347;
   origin of, 350;
   and real fear, connection between, 350;
   real, 341;
   and neurotic fear, connection between, 350
 
 Fechner, G. T., 69
 
 Federn, P., 127
 
 Ferenczi, 304
 
 Fetichism, 302
 
 Fetichists, 264
 
 Fixation of the instinct, 295;
   traumatic, 236
 
 Flaubert, G., 263
 
 Fliess, W., 277
 
 Fontaine, Th., 324
 
 Fore-conscious, 256
 
 Forgetting, defense against unpleasant recollections, 56;
   impressions and experiences, 56;
   names, 34, 55;
   plans, 52;
   projects, 34;
   proper names, 87
 
 Free association, 84;
   name analysis by, 85
 
 Free-floating fear, 344
 
 Fright, 342
 
 
 Hall, Stanley, 344, 355
 
 Hildebrand, 71
 
 Hoffman, 321
 
 Homosexualists, 266
 
 Homosexuality, 263
 
 Hypnosis, 253, 386;
   psycho-therapy by, 253
 
 Hypnotic and psychoanalytic suggestion, difference between, 390
 
 Hypnotism, 81, 388
 
 Hypochondria, 338, 339, 362
 
 Hysteria, 233, 245, 246, 261, 266, 297;
   anxiety, 233, 316;
   conversion, 339;
   fear in, 348
 
 Hysterical amnesias, 245;
   backache, 339;
   headache, 339;
   identification, 369;
   vomiting, 233
 
 
 Illness as a defense, 332
 
 Imago, 139
 
 Incest, 176, 290
 
 Infantile amnesias, 245;
   dream, 183;
   fear, 353;
   neurosis, 316;
   sexuality, 272, 279
 
 Infantilism in the dream, archaic remnants and, 167
 
 Inferiority, 351
 
 Inhibition, 294
 
 Instinct, fixation of, 295
 
 Intellectual resistances, 251
 
 Introversion, 325
 
 Inversions, 149, 263
 
 
 James-Lange theory of emotion, 343
 
 Janet, P., 221
 
 Jealousy, obsession of, 216
 
 Jenner, 400
 
 Jung, C. J., 86, 232, 325, 357
 
 
 Koch, 400
 
 Krauss, F. S., 134
 
 
 Latent dream content, 90, 98
 
 Leuret, 221
 
 Levy, L., 133
 
 Libido, 116, 270;
   development of, 277, 282;
   fixation, 300;
   regressions of, 297;
   theory, the, 356
 
 Lichtenberg, 27
 
 Lindner, 271
 
 Losing and mislaying objects, 36, 57
 
 Loss of memory for childhood, 168
 
 
 Maeder, A., 39, 202
 
 Mania of persecution, 366;
   of jealousy, 366
 
 Manifest dream content, 90, 96
 
 Masochists, 264
 
 Maury, 66, 71
 
 Mayer, 16
 
 Mechanism of the tongue slip, 46
 
 Megalomania, 366
 
 Melancholia, 369
 
 Memory gaps, 244;
   loss of, for childhood, 168
 
 Meringer, 16
 
 Misreading, 51
 
 Mistakes, general observations on, 57
 
 Myths, birth of the hero, 132
 
 
 Name analysis by free association, 85
 
 Naecke, P., 359
 
 Narcism, 359, 360
 
 Narcistic identification, 369;
   neuroses, 298, 365;
   and transference, 386
 
 Negative transference, 383
 
 Nervousness, fear and, 340;
   ordinary, 328
 
 Nestroy, 305
 
 Neurasthenia, 338, 339
 
 Neurosis, anxiety, 344;
   art and, 326;
   common experiences in history of, 321;
   compulsion, 222;
   determining factor in, 321;
   development of symptoms of, 311;
   etiology of, 296;
   general theory of, 294;
   infantile, 316;
   narcistic, 298;
   schematic representation of cause of, 315;
   spontaneous, 237;
   symptoms of, 317;
   traumatic, 237;
   true, difference between the symptoms of, and the psychoneurosis, 336
 
 Neurotic fear, anxiety form of, 346;
   clinical observations on, 347;
   manifestations of, 344;
   origin of, 350;
   and real fear, connection between, 350
 
 Neurotic manifestations, psychoanalytic conception of, 211;
   symptoms, evolution of, 244;
   meaning of, 221;
   objections to interpretations of, 260
 
 Neurotics, dreams of, 395
 
 Nordenskjold, Otto, 107
 
 
 Oberlaender, 334
 
 Object, choice of, 368
 
 Obsession of jealousy, 216
 
 Oedipus complex, 174, 285
 
 Onanism, 272, 274
 
 Organic pleasure, 280
 
 
 Paranoia, 266, 339, 366
 
 Paraphrenia, 339, 366
 
 Parent-complex, 289
 
 Pathological ritual, 228
 
 Patricide, 290
 
 Perverse, 263;
   sexuality, 268, 279
 
 Perversions, sex, 175, 278
 
 Pfister, 199
 
 Phantasies, primal, 323
 
 Phantasy in childhood experiences, 319;
   in children, 322
 
 Phobias, 344;
   analysis of, 353;
   situation, in children, 352
 
 Pleasure, principle of, 309
 
 Pleasure-striving, 116
 
 Pre-genital sexual organization, 283
 
 Primal phantasies, 323
 
 Principle of fact, 309;
   of pleasure, 309
 
 Psychiatry, psychoanalysis and, 209;
   therapeutics of, 220
 
 Psychic flight from unpleasantness, 55;
   process, meaning of, 23;
   definition of, 7;
   in sleeping and waking, differences between, 69
 
 Psychoanalysis, definition of, 1;
   difficulties of, 2, 5;
   and psychiatry, 209;
   purpose of, 6;
   reasons for criticism of, 246;
   therapeutics of, 220
 
 Psychoanalytic conception of neurotic manifestations, 211;
   suggestion, hypnotic and difference between, 390
 
 Psychology of errors, 10
 
 Psychoneurosis,
   difference between the symptoms of the true neurosis and, 336;
   true neurosis and, connection between symptoms of, 338
 
 Psychotherapy by hypnosis, 253
 
 Purpose of psychoanalysis, 6
 
 
 Rank, O., 21, 108, 132, 139, 154, 175, 292
 
 Reaction-formations, 326
 
 Regression, 295, 296;
   of Libido, 297;
   theories of development and, 294
 
 Reik, Th., 290
 
 Repression, 255
 
 Reproduction, 269;
   sexuality and, 277
 
 Resistance, 92, 248;
   in anxiety hysteria, 250;
   in compulsion neurotics, 250, 251;
   external, 398;
   forms taken by, 250;
   internal, 398;
   intellectual, 251;
   in narcistic neurosis, 365
 
 Ritual, pathological, 228;
   sleep, 227
 
 Roux, 314
 
 
 Sachs, Hanns, 139, 173
 
 Sadistico-anal sexual organization, 283
 
 Sadists, 264
 
 Scherner, K. A., 124
 
 Schirmer, 74
 
 Schwind, 109
 
 Secondary treatment, 151
 
 Sex symbols, 126
 
 Sex, the third, 263
 
 Sexual curiosity of children, 274;
   definition of concept, 262;
   development, 284;
   instincts, 356;
   life of the child, 268, 281;
   life of man, 262;
   organizations, 277, 283;
   perversions, 175, 278
 
 Sexuality, perverse, 268;
   and reproduction, 277
 
 Siebault, 81
 
 Silberer, V., 203
 
 Situation-phobia, 345;
   phobias in children, 352
 
 Sleep, definition of, 67;
   ritual, 227
 
 Slips of the tongue, 16;
   effects of, 18;
   explanation of, 25, 46;
   general observations on, 48;
   of the pen, 49
 
 Sperber, H., 138
 
 Spontaneous neuroses, 237
 
 Stekel, W., 203
 
 Struwelpeter, 321
 
 Sublimation, 8, 300
 
 Substitute names, 87
 
 Suggestibility, 386
 
 Suggestion, 386, 388
 
 Suppression, 46, 248, 256, 259, 296, 298
 
 Symbol, 123;
   beheading, 231
 
 Symbolism in the dream, 122;
   in every day life, 130
 
 Symbols, 125, 126;
   of birth, 132;
   sex, 126
 
 Symptomatic acts, accidental and, 42
 
 Symptom-development, 259;
   interpretation, 259;
   purpose of, 258, 259
 
 Symptoms, individual, 232, 234;
   meaning of, 221;
   of neurosis, development of, 311;
   neurotic, evolution of, 244;
   objections to interpretations of, 260;
   significance of phantasy for the development of, 324;
   typical, 233
 
 System of the unconscious, fore-conscious and the conscious, 255-257
 
 
 Technique in dream interpretation, 82
 
 Therapy, analytical, 372
 
 Therapeutics of psychiatry, 220;
   of psychoanalysis, 220
 
 Third sex, 263
 
 Tongue slip, mechanism of, 46, 49
 
 Topophobia, 233
 
 Transference, 25, 372, 379;
   narcistic neuroses and, 386;
   neuroses, 259, 339, 384
 
 Translation of thoughts into visual images, 145
 
 Traumatic fixation, 236;
   neuroses, 237
 
 Trenck, 108
 
 True neuroses, 338;
   and psychoneuroses, connection between symptoms of, 338;
   symptoms of, 336
 
 Typical symptoms, 234
 
 
 Unconscious, the, 236, 255;
   definition of, 90;
   psychological processes, 240
 
 
 Vold, J. Mourly, 66, 127
 
 Vomiting, hysterical, 233
 
 von Bruecke, 295
 
 
 Wallace, 247
 
 Washing, a compulsive act, 233
 
 Wishes, death, 169
 
 Wish fulfillment, 180;
   in dreams, 104, 107;
   negative, 261;
   positive, 261
 
 Wundt school, 86
 
 
 Zola, Emile, 224
 
 Zurich school, 86
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 The following typographical errors have been corrected by the etext
 transcriber:
 
 Resistance and Supression=>Resistance and Suppression
 
 Dark Ages faithfully perserved things=>Dark Ages faithfully preserved
 things
 
 the dream anaylsis=>the dream analysis
 
 reocgnize=>recognize
 
 crimes commited=>crimes committed
 
 embryo in the amnotic fluid=>embryo in the amniotic fluid
 
 Sublim Porte=>Sublime Porte
 
 remote of these thoughs=>remote of these thoughts
 
 uncomfortabe=>uncomfortable
 
 archiac or regressive mode=>archaic or regressive mode
 
 capitalist and the entrepeneur=>capitalist and the entrepreneur
 
 By means of two selected illlustrations=>By means of two selected
 illustrations
 
 and did not yet want to a prophet=>and did not yet want to be a prophet
 
 fundamenal difference=>fundamental difference
 
 psychlogical=>psychological
 
 sexual substitute-satsifaction=>sexual substitute-satisfaction
 
 carry on psychonalaysis=>carry on psychoanalysis
 
 with manual anonism=>with manual ononism
 
 the educator, Nesessity=>the educator, Necessity
 
 has been succssfully=>has been successfully
 
 The physician forms a very favorable opinon=>The physician forms a very
 favorable opinion
 
 affctionate=>affectionate
 
 destroyed the transfrence=>destroyed the transference
 
 read "Agamemnon" for "angenomen,"=>read "Agamemnon" for "angenommen,"
 
 "Angenomen" is a verb, meaning "to accept."=>"Angenommen" is a verb,
 meaning "to accept."
 
 misprints, which are of ocurse to be considered as errors of the
 typesetter.=>misprints, which are of course to be considered as errors
 of the typesetter.
 
 "Rueckhaltos" means "unreservedly."=>"Rueckhaltlos" means "unreservedly."
 
 Struuelpeter=>Struwelpeter
 
 Struwwelpeter=>Struwelpeter
 
 Oberlander, 334=>Oberlaender, 334
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 
 FOOTNOTES:
 
 [1] "Fehl-leistungen."
 
 [2] In the German, the correct announcement is, "Connetable schickt sein
 Schwert zurueck." The novice, as a result of the suggestion, announced
 instead that "Komfortabel schickt sein Pferd zurueck."
 
 [3] "Aufstossen" instead of "anstossen."
 
 [4] "Begleit-digen" compounded of "begleiten" and "beleidigen."
 
 [5] "Briefkasten" instead of "Bruetkasten."
 
 [6] "Geneigt" instead of "geeignet."
 
 [7] "Versuchungen" instead of "Versuche."
 
 [8] "Aufgepatzt" instead of "aufgeputzt."
 
 [9] "Angenommen" is a verb, meaning "to accept."
 
 [10] The young man here said "aufzustossen" instead of "anzustossen."
 
 [11] Prof. Freud here gives the two examples, quite untranslatable, of
 "apopos" instead of "apropos," and "eischeiszwaibehen" instead of
 "eiweiszscheibehen."
 
 [12] From C. G. Jung.
 
 [13] From A. A. Brill.
 
 [14] From B. Dattner.
 
 [15] So also in the writings of A. Maeder (French), A. A. Brill
 (English) J. Staerke (Dutch) and others.
 
 [16] From R. Reitler.
 
 [17] In the German Reichstag, November, 1908. "Rueckhaltlos" means
 "unreservedly." "Rueckgratlos" means "without backbone."
 
 [18] "Zum Vorschein bringen," means to bring to light. "Schweinereien"
 means filthiness or obscurity. The telescoping of the two ideas,
 resulting in the word "Vorschwein," plainly reveals the speaker's
 opinion of the affair.
 
 [19] The lady meant to say "Nach Hause," "to reach home." The word
 "Hose" means "drawers." The preservating content of her hesitancy is
 hereby revealed.
 
 [20] The German reads, "bei meinen Versuchen an Mausen," which, through
 the slip of the pen, resulted in "bei meinen Versuchen an Menschen."
 
 [21] "Angenommen" is a verb, meaning "to accept."
 
 [22] Josef Breuer, in the years 1880-1882. Cf. also my lectures on
 psychoanalysis, delivered in the United States in 1909.
 
 [23] The reader will recall the example: "things were re-filled."
 
 [24] From the sublime to the ridiculous is but a narrow passage.
 
 [25] Yes, the passage from Calais.
 
 [26] "Vorzug." "Vom Bett hervorziehen."
 
 [27] "Schraenkt sich ein."
 
 [28] In Germany tickets may be bought before the day of the performance
 only upon additional payment, over and above the regular cost of the
 ticket. This is called "Vorverkaufsgebuehr."
 
 [29] See frontispiece
 
 [30] "steigen."
 
 [31] "den Frauen nachsteigen," and "ein alter Steiger."
 
 [32] "besitzen," to straddle.
 
 [33] While revising these pages I chanced upon a newspaper article that
 I quote here as an unexpected supplement to the above lines.
 
 THE PUNISHMENT OF GOD
 
 A BROKEN ARM FOR BROKEN FAITH
 
 Mrs. Anna M. the wife of a soldier in the reserve accused Mrs.
 Clementine C. of being untrue to her husband. The accusation reads that
 Mrs. C. had carried on an illicit relationship with Karl M. while her
 own husband was on the battlefield, from which he even sent her 70
 Kronen a month. Mrs. C. had received _quite a lot of money_ from the
 husband of the plaintiff, while she and her children had to live in
 _hunger_ and in misery. Friends of her husband had told her that Mrs. C.
 had visited inns with M. and had caroused there until late at night. The
 accused had even asked the husband of the plaintiff before several
 infantrymen whether he would not soon get a divorce from his "old woman"
 and live with her. Mrs. C.'s housekeeper had also repeatedly seen the
 husband of the plaintiff in her (Mrs. C.'s) apartment, in complete
 negligee.
 
 Yesterday Mrs. C. _denied_ before a judge in Leopoldstadt that she even
 knew M; there could be no question of intimate relation between them.
 
 The witness, Albertine M., however, testified that Mrs. C. had kissed
 the husband of the plaintiff and that she had surprised them at it.
 
 When M. was called as a witness in an earlier proceeding he had denied
 any intimate relation to the accused. Yesterday the judge received a
 _letter_ in which the witness retracts the statement he made in the
 first proceeding and _admits_ that he had carried on a love affair with
 Mrs. C., until last June. He says that he only denied this relationship
 in the former proceeding for the sake of the accused because before the
 proceeding she had come to him and begged on her knees that he should
 save her and not confess. "To-day," wrote the witness, "I felt impelled
 to make a full confession to the court, since I have _broken my left
 arm_ and this appears to me as the _punishment of God_ for my
 transgression."
 
 The judge maintained the penal offense had already become null and void,
 whereupon the plaintiff withdrew her accusation and the liberation of
 the accused followed.
 
 [34] This highly technical concept is explained in _The Interpretation
 of Dreams_, Chap. VII, Sec. (b) pp. 422 et seq.
 
 [35] The principal street of Vienna.
 
 [36] I do not mention another obvious interpretation of this "3" in the
 case of this childless woman, because it is not material to this
 analysis.
 
 [37] Compare S. Freud, _Totem and Taboo_, 1913.
 
 [38] E. Toulouse, Emile Zola--_Enquete medico-psychologique_, Paris,
 1896.
 
 [39] There are fagots and fagots.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 End of the Project Gutenberg EBook of A General Introduction to

 
 
 
 Produced by Chuck Greif and the Online Distributed
 Proofreading Team at http://www.pgdp.net (This book was
 produced from scanned images of public domain material
 from the Google Print project.)
 
 
 
 
 
 
 TOTEM AND TABOO
 
 BY DR. S. FREUD
 
 
 _New Books on Psycho-Analysis._
 
 _WHAT IS PSYCHO-ANALYSIS?_ By I. H. CORIAT.
 3_s._ 6_d._ net.
 
 _THE PSYCHOLOGY OF THE UNCONSCIOUS._ By
 Dr. C. G. J<small>UNG</small>. 21_s._ net.
 
 _THE PSYCHO-ANALYTIC METHOD._ By PROF. O.
 PFISTER. 21_s._ net.
 
 _MANS UNCONSCIOUS CONFLICT._ By Dr. W. LAY.
 7_s._ 6_d._ net.
 
 _THE CHILDS UNCONSCIOUS MIND._ By Dr. W.
 LAY. 7_s._ 6_d._ net.
 
 _MENTAL CONFLICTS AND MISCONDUCT._ By W.
 HEALY. 10_s._ 6_d._ net.
 
 _PSYCHOLOGY OF SPECIAL ABILITIES AND DISABILITIES._
 By A. F. B<small>RONNER</SMALL>. 10_s._ 6_d._ net.
 
 _THE NEUROTIC CONSTITUTION._ By Dr. ALFRED
 ADLER.
 
 _THE PSYCHOLOGY OF THE FUTURE._ By EMILE
 BOINAC.
 
 _PSYCHOLOGY OF THE NORMAL AND SUBNORMAL._
 By H. H. G<small>ODDARD</small>.
 
 KEGAN PAUL, TRENCH, TRUBNER & CO., LTD.,
 London.
 
 
 
 
 TOTEM AND TABOO
 
 RESEMBLANCES BETWEEN THE PSYCHIC
 LIVES OF SAVAGES AND NEUROTICS
 
 BY
 
 PROFESSOR SIGMUND FREUD, L<small>l</small>.D.
 
 Authorized English Translation,
 with Introduction by
 
 A. A. BRILL, Ph.B., M.D.
 
 Asst. Prof. of Psychiatry, N.Y. Post-Graduate Medical
 School; Lecturer in Psychoanalysis and Abnormal
 Psychology, New York University;
 former Chief of Clinic of Psychiatry,
 Columbia University
 
 [Illustration: colophon]
 
 LONDON
 
 GEORGE ROUTLEDGE & SONS, LIMITED
 
 1919
 
 _Printed in Great Britain
 by_ Butler & Tanner.
 
 _Frome and London_
 
 
 
 
 AUTHORS PREFACE
 
 
 The essays treated here appeared under the subtitle of this book in the
 first numbers of the periodical _Imago_ edited by me. They represent my
 first efforts to apply view-points and results of psychoanalysis to
 unexplained problems of racial psychology. In method this book contrasts
 with that of W. Wundt and the works of the Zurich Psychoanalytic School.
 The former tries to accomplish the same object through assumptions and
 procedures from non-analytic psychology, while the latter follow the
 opposite course and strive to settle problems of individual psychology
 by referring to material of racial psychology[1]. I am pleased to say
 that the first stimulus for my own works came from these two sources.
 
 I am fully aware of the shortcomings in these essays. I shall not touch
 upon those which are characteristic of first efforts at investigation.
 The others, however, demand a word of explanation. The four essays
 which are here collected will be of interest to a wide circle of
 educated people, but they can only be thoroughly understood and judged
 by those who are really acquainted with psychoanalysis as such. It is
 hoped that they may serve as a bond between students of ethnology,
 philology, folklore and of the allied sciences, and psychoanalysts; they
 cannot, however, supply both groups the entire requisites for such
 co-operation. They will not furnish the former with sufficient insight
 into the new psychological technique, nor will the psychoanalysts
 acquire through them an adequate command over the material to be
 elaborated. Both groups will have to content themselves with whatever
 attention they can stimulate here and there and with the hope that
 frequent meetings between them will not remain unproductive for science.
 
 The two principal themes, totem and taboo, which give the name to this
 small book are not treated alike here. The problem of taboo is presented
 more exhaustively, and the effort to solve it is approached with perfect
 confidence. The investigation of totemism may be modestly expressed as:
 This is all that psychoanalytic study can contribute at present to the
 elucidation of the problem of totemism. This difference in the
 treatment of the two subjects is due to the fact that taboo still exists
 in our midst. To be sure, it is negatively conceived and directed to
 different contents, but according to its psychological nature, it is
 still nothing else than Kants Categorical Imperative, which tends to
 act compulsively and rejects all conscious motivations. On the other
 hand, totemism is a religio-social institution which is alien to our
 present feelings; it has long been abandoned and replaced by new forms.
 In the religions, morals, and customs of the civilized races of to-day
 it has left only slight traces, and even among those races where it is
 still retained, it has had to undergo great changes. The social and
 material progress of the history of mankind could obviously change taboo
 much less than totemism.
 
 In this book the attempt is ventured to find the original meaning of
 totemism through its infantile traces, that is, through the indications
 in which it reappears in the development of our own children. The close
 connection between totem and taboo indicates the further paths to the
 hypothesis maintained here. And although this hypothesis leads to
 somewhat improbable conclusions, there is no reason for rejecting the
 possibility that it comes more or less near to the reality which is so
 hard to reconstruct.
 
 
 
 
 CONTENTS
 
 
 CHAP.      PAGE
 
 I THE SAVAGES DREAD OF INCEST      1
 
 II TABOO AND THE AMBIVALENCE OF EMOTIONS      30
 
 III ANIMISM, MAGIC AND THE OMNIPOTENCE OF
 THOUGHT      125
 
 IV THE INFANTILE RECURRENCE OF TOTEMISM      166
 
 
 
 
 TRANSLATORS INTRODUCTION
 
 
 When one reviews the history of psychoanalysis[2] one finds that it had
 its inception in the study of morbid mental states. Beginning with the
 observation of hysteria and the other neuroses[3] Professor Freud
 gradually extended his investigations to normal psychology and evolved
 new concepts and new methods of study. The neurotic symptoms were no
 longer imaginary troubles the nature of which one could not grasp, but
 were conceived as mental and emotional maladjustments to ones
 environment. The stamp of degeneracy impressed upon neurotics by other
 schools of medicine was altogether eradicated. Deeper investigation
 showed conclusively that a person might become neurotic if subjected to
 certain environments, and that there was no definite dividing line
 between normal and abnormal. The hysterical symptoms, obsessions,
 doubts, phobias, as well as hallucinations of the insane, show the same
 mechanisms as those similar psychic structures which one constantly
 encounters in normal persons in the form of mistakes in talking,
 reading, writing, forgetting[4], dreams and wit. The dream, always
 highly valued by the populace, and as much despised by the educated
 classes, has a definite structure and meaning when subjected to
 analysis. Professor Freuds monumental work, _The Interpretation of
 Dreams_[5], marked a new epoch in the history of mental science. One
 might use the same words in reference to his profound analysis of
 wit[6].
 
 Faulty psychic actions, dreams and wit are products of the unconscious
 mental activity, and like neurotic or psychotic manifestations represent
 efforts at adjustment to ones environment. The slip of the tongue shows
 that on account of unconscious inhibitions the individual concerned is
 unable to express his true thoughts; the dream is a distorted or plain
 expression of those wishes which are prohibited in the waking states,
 and the witticism, owing to its veiled or indirect way of expression,
 enables the individual to obtain pleasure from forbidden sources. But
 whereas dreams, witticisms, and faulty actions give evidences of inner
 conflicts which the individual overcomes, the neurotic or psychotic
 symptom is the result of a failure and represents a morbid adjustment.
 
 The aforementioned psychic formations are therefore nothing but
 manifestations of the struggle with reality, the constant effort to
 adjust ones primitive feelings to the demands of civilization. In spite
 of all later development the individual retains all his infantile
 psychic structures. Nothing is lost; the infantile wishes and primitive
 impulses can always be demonstrated in the grown-up and on occasion can
 be brought back to the surface. In his dreams the normal person is
 constantly reviving his childhood, and the neurotic or psychotic
 individual merges back into a sort of psychic infantilism through his
 morbid productions. The unconscious mental activity which is made up of
 repressed infantile material for ever tries to express itself. Whenever
 the individual finds it impossible to dominate the difficulties of the
 world of reality there is a regression to the infantile, and psychic
 disturbances ensue which are conceived as peculiar thoughts and acts.
 Thus the civilized adult is the result of his childhood or the sum total
 of his early impressions; psychoanalysis thus confirms the old saying:
 The child is father to the man.
 
 It is at this point in the development of psychoanalysis that the paths
 gradually broadened until they finally culminated in this work. There
 were many indications that the childhood of the individual showed a
 marked resemblance to the primitive history or the childhood of races.
 The knowledge gained from dream analysis and phantasies[7], when applied
 to the productions of racial phantasies, like myths and fairy tales,
 seemed to indicate that the first impulse to form myths was due to the
 same emotional strivings which produced dreams, fancies and symptoms[8].
 Further study in this direction has thrown much light on our great
 cultural institutions, such as religion, morality, law and philosophy,
 all of which Professor Freud has modestly formulated in this volume and
 thus initiated a new epoch in the study of racial psychology.
 
 I take great pleasure in acknowledging my indebtedness to Mr Alfred B.
 Kuttner for the invaluable assistance he rendered in the translation of
 this work.
 
 A. A. B<small>RILL</small>.
 
 
 
 
 TOTEM AND TABOO
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER I
 
 THE SAVAGES DREAD OF INCEST
 
 
 Primitive man is known to us by the stages of development through which
 he has passed: that is, through the inanimate monuments and implements
 which he has left behind for us, through our knowledge of his art, his
 religion and his attitude towards life, which we have received either
 directly or through the medium of legends, myths and fairy tales; and
 through the remnants of his ways of thinking that survive in our own
 manners and customs. Moreover, in a certain sense he is still our
 contemporary: there are people whom we still consider more closely
 related to primitive man than to ourselves, in whom we therefore
 recognize the direct descendants and representatives of earlier man. We
 can thus judge the so-called savage and semi-savage races; their psychic
 life assumes a peculiar interest for us, for we can recognize in their
 psychic life a well-preserved, early stage of our own development.
 
 If this assumption is correct, a comparison of the Psychology of
 Primitive Races as taught by folklore, with the psychology of the
 neurotic as it has become known through psychoanalysis will reveal
 numerous points of correspondence and throw new light on subjects that
 are more or less familiar to us.
 
 For outer as well as for inner reasons, I am choosing for this
 comparison those tribes which have been described by ethnographists as
 being most backward and wretched: the aborigines of the youngest
 continent, namely Australia, whose fauna has also preserved for us so
 much that is archaic and no longer to be found elsewhere.
 
 The aborigines of Australia are looked upon as a peculiar race which
 shows neither physical nor linguistic relationship with its nearest
 neighbours, the Melanesian, Polynesian and Malayan races. They do not
 build houses or permanent huts; they do not cultivate the soil or keep
 any domestic animals except dogs; and they do not even know the art of
 pottery. They live exclusively on the flesh of all sorts of animals
 which they kill in the chase, and on the roots which they dig. Kings or
 chieftains are unknown among them, and all communal affairs are decided
 by the elders in assembly. It is quite doubtful whether they evince any
 traces of religion in the form of worship of higher beings. The tribes
 living in the interior who have to contend with the greatest
 vicissitudes of life owing to a scarcity of water, seem in every way
 more primitive than those who live near the coast.
 
 We surely would not expect that these poor naked cannibals should be
 moral in their sex life according to our ideas, or that they should have
 imposed a high degree of restriction upon their sexual impulses. And yet
 we learn that they have considered it their duty to exercise the most
 searching care and the most painful rigour in guarding against
 incestuous sexual relations. In fact their whole social organization
 seems to serve this object or to have been brought into relation with
 its attainment.
 
 Among the Australians the system of _Totemism_ takes the place of all
 religious and social institutions. Australian tribes are divided into
 smaller _septs_ or clans, each taking the name of its _totem_. Now what
 is a totem? As a rule it is an animal, either edible and harmless, or
 dangerous and feared; more rarely the totem is a plant or a force of
 nature (rain, water), which stands in a peculiar relation to the whole
 clan. The totem is first of all the tribal ancestor of the clan, as well
 as its tutelary spirit and protector; it sends oracles and, though
 otherwise dangerous, the totem knows and spares its children. The
 members of a totem are therefore under a sacred obligation not to kill
 (destroy) their totem, to abstain from eating its meat or from any other
 enjoyment of it. Any violation of these prohibitions is automatically
 punished. The character of a totem is inherent not only in a single
 animal or a single being but in all the members of the species. From
 time to time festivals are held at which the members of a totem
 represent or imitate, in ceremonial dances, the movements and
 characteristics of their totems.
 
 The totem is hereditary either through the maternal or the paternal
 line; (maternal transmission probably always preceded and was only later
 supplanted by the paternal). The attachment to a totem is the foundation
 of all the social obligations of an Australian: it extends on the one
 hand beyond the tribal relationship, and on the other hand it supersedes
 consanguineous relationship[9].
 
 The totem is not limited to district or to locality; the members of a
 totem may live separated from one another and on friendly terms with
 adherents of other totems[10].
 
 And now, finally, we must consider that peculiarity of the totemic
 system which attracts the interest of the psychoanalyst. Almost
 everywhere the totem prevails there also exists the law that _the
 members of the same totem are not allowed to enter into sexual relations
 with each other; that is, that they cannot marry each other_. This
 represents the _exogamy_ which is associated with the totem.
 
 This sternly maintained prohibition is very remarkable. There is nothing
 to account for it in anything that we have hitherto learned from the
 conception of the totem or from any of its attributes; that is, we do
 not understand how it happened to enter the system of totemism. We are
 therefore not astonished if some investigators simply assume that at
 first exogamy--both as to its origin and to its meaning--had nothing to
 do with totemism, but that it was added to it at some time without any
 deeper association, when marriage restrictions proved necessary. However
 that may be, the association of totemism and exogamy exists, and proves
 to be very strong.
 
 Let us elucidate the meaning of this prohibition through further
 discussion.
 
 (_a_) The violation of the prohibition is not left to what is, so to
 speak, an automatic punishment, as is the case with other violations of
 the prohibitions of the totem (e.g., not to kill the totem animal), but
 is most energetically avenged by the whole tribe as if it were a
 question of warding off a danger that threatens the community as a whole
 or a guilt that weighs upon all. A few sentences from Frazers book[11]
 will show how seriously such trespasses are treated by these savages
 who, according to our standard are otherwise very immoral.
 
 In Australia the regular penalty for sexual intercourse with a person
 of a forbidden clan is death. It matters not whether the woman is of the
 same local group or has been captured in war from another tribe; a man
 of the wrong clan who uses her as his wife is hunted down and killed by
 his clansmen, and so is the woman; though in some cases, if they succeed
 in eluding capture for a certain time, the offence may be condoned. In
 the Ta-Ta-thi tribe, New South Wales, in the rare cases which occur, the
 man is killed, but the woman is only beaten or speared, or both, till
 she is nearly dead; the reason given for not actually killing her being
 that she was probably coerced. Even in casual amours the clan
 prohibitions are strictly observed; any violations of these prohibitions
 are regarded with the utmost abhorrence and are punished by death
 (Howitt).
 
 (_b_) As the same severe punishment is also meted out for temporary love
 affairs which have not resulted in childbirth, the assumption of other
 motives, perhaps of a practical nature, becomes improbable.
 
 (_c_) As the totem is hereditary and is not changed by marriage, the
 results of the prohibition, for instance in the case of maternal
 heredity, are easily perceived. If, for example, the man belongs to a
 clan with the totem of the Kangaroo and marries a woman of the Emu
 totem, the children, both boys and girls, are all Emu. According to the
 totem law incestuous relations with his mother and his sister, who are
 Emu like himself, are therefore made impossible for a son of this
 marriage[12].
 
 (_d_) But we need only a reminder to realize that the exogamy connected
 with the totem accomplishes more; that is, aims at more than the
 prevention of incest with the mother or the sisters. It also makes it
 impossible for the man to have sexual union with all the women of his
 own group, with a number of females, therefore, who are not
 consanguineously related to him, by treating all these women like blood
 relations. The psychological justification for this extraordinary
 restriction, which far exceeds anything comparable to it among civilized
 races, is not, at first, evident. All we seem to understand is that the
 rle of the totem (the animal) as ancestor is taken very seriously.
 Everybody descended from the same totem is consanguineous; that is, of
 one family; and in this family the most distant grades of relationship
 are recognized as an absolute obstacle to sexual union.
 
 Thus these savages reveal to us an unusually high grade of incest dread
 or incest sensitiveness, combined with the peculiarity, which we do not
 very well understand, of substituting the totem relationship for the
 real blood relationship. But we must not exaggerate this contradiction
 too much, and let us bear in mind that the totem prohibitions include
 real incest as a special case.
 
 In what manner the substitution of the totem group for the actual family
 has come about remains a riddle, the solution of which is perhaps bound
 up with the explanation of the totem itself. Of course it must be
 remembered that with a certain freedom of sexual intercourse, extending
 beyond the limitations of matrimony, the blood relationship, and with it
 also the prevention of incest, becomes so uncertain that we cannot
 dispense with some other basis for the prohibition. It is therefore not
 superfluous to note that the customs of Australians recognize social
 conditions and festive occasions at which the exclusive conjugal right
 of a man to a woman is violated.
 
 The linguistic customs of these tribes, as well as of most totem races,
 reveals a peculiarity which undoubtedly is pertinent in this connection.
 For the designations of relationship of which they make use do not take
 into consideration the relationship between two individuals, but between
 an individual and his group; they belong, according to the expression of
 L. H. Morgan, to the classifying system. That means that a man calls
 not only his begetter father but also every other man who, according
 to the tribal regulations, might have married his mother and thus become
 his father; he calls mother not only the woman who bore him but also
 every other woman who might have become his mother without violation of
 the tribal laws; he calls brothers and sisters not only the children
 of his real parents, but also the children of all the persons named who
 stand in the parental group relation with him, and so on. The kinship
 names which two Australians give each other do not, therefore,
 necessarily point to a blood relationship between them, as they would
 have to according to the custom of our language; they signify much more
 the social than the physical relations. An approach to this classifying
 system is perhaps to be found in our nursery, when the child is induced
 to greet every male and female friend of the parents as uncle and
 aunt, or it may be found in a transferred sense when we speak of
 Brothers in Apollo, or Sisters in Christ.
 
 The explanation of this linguistic custom, which seems so strange to us,
 is simple if looked upon as a remnant and indication of those marriage
 institutions which the Rev. L. Fison has called group marriage,
 characterized by a number of men exercising conjugal rights over a
 number of women. The children of this group marriage would then rightly
 look upon each other as brothers and sisters although not born of the
 same mother, and would take all the men of the group for their fathers.
 
 Although a number of authors, as, for instance, B. Westermarck in his
 _History of Human Marriage_[13], oppose the conclusions which others
 have drawn from the existence of group-relationship names, the best
 authorities on the Australian savages are agreed that the classificatory
 relationship names must be considered as survivals from the period of
 group marriages. And, according to Spencer and Gillen[14], a certain
 form of group marriage can be established as still existing to-day among
 the tribes of the Urabunna and the Dieri. Group marriage therefore
 preceded individual marriage among these races, and did not disappear
 without leaving distinct traces in language and custom.
 
 But if we replace individual marriage, we can then grasp the apparent
 excess of cases of incest shunning which we have met among these same
 races. The totem exogamy, or prohibition of sexual intercourse between
 members of the same clan, seemed the most appropriate means for the
 prevention of group incest; and this totem exogamy then became fixed and
 long survived its original motivation.
 
 Although we believe we understand the motives of the marriage
 restrictions among the Australian savages, we have still to learn that
 the actual conditions reveal a still more bewildering complication. For
 there are only few tribes in Australia which show no other prohibition
 besides the totem barrier. Most of them are so organized that they fall
 into two divisions which have been called marriage classes, or
 phratries. Each of these marriage groups is exogamous and includes a
 majority of totem groups. Usually each marriage group is again divided
 into two subclasses (subphratries), and the whole tribe is therefore
 divided into four classes; the subclasses thus standing between the
 phratries and the totem groups.
 
 The typical and very often intricate scheme of organization of an
 Australian tribe therefore looks as follows:
 
 [Illustration]
 
 The twelve totem groups are brought under four subclasses and two main
 classes. All the divisions are exogamous[15]. The subclass c forms an
 exogamous unit with e, and the subclass d with f. The success or the
 tendency of these arrangements is quite obvious; they serve as a further
 restriction on the marriage choice and on sexual freedom. If there were
 only these twelve totem groups--assuming the same number of people in
 each group--every member of a group would have 11/12 of all the women of
 the tribe to choose from. The existence of the two phratries reduces
 this number to 6/12 or 1/2; a man of the totem [Greek:  alpha] can only
 marry a woman from the groups 1 to 6. With the introduction of the two
 subclassess the selection sinks to 3/12 or 1/4; a man of the totem
 [Greek:  alpha] must limit his marriage choice to a woman of the totems
 4, 5, 6.
 
 The historical relations of the marriage classes--of which there are
 found as many as eight in some tribes--are quite unexplained. We only
 see that these arrangements seek to attain the same object as the totem
 exogamy, and even strive for more. But whereas the totem exogamy makes
 the impression of a sacred statute which sprang into existence, no one
 knows how, and is therefore a custom, the complicated institutions of
 the marriage classes, with their sub-divisions and the conditions
 attached to them, seem to spring from legislation with a definite aim in
 view. They have perhaps taken up afresh the task of incest prohibition
 because the influence of the totem was on the wane. And while the totem
 system is, as we know, the basis of all other social obligations and
 moral restrictions of the tribe, the importance of the phratries
 generally ceases when the regulation of the marriage choice at which
 they aimed has been accomplished.
 
 In the further development of the classification of the marriage system
 there seems to be a tendency to go beyond the prevention of natural and
 group incest, and to prohibit marriage between more distant group
 relations, in a manner similar to the Catholic church, which extended
 the marriage prohibitions always in force for brother and sisters, to
 cousins, and invented for them the grades of spiritual kinship[16].
 
 It would hardly serve our purpose to go into the extraordinarily
 intricate and unsettled discussion concerning the origin and
 significance of the marriage classes, or to go more deeply into their
 relation to totemism. It is sufficient for our purposes to point out the
 great care expended by the Australians as well as by other savage people
 to prevent incest[17]. We must say that these savages are even more
 sensitive to incest than we, perhaps because they are more subject to
 temptations than we are, and hence require more extensive protection
 against it.
 
 But the incest dread of these races does not content itself with the
 creation of the institutions described, which, in the main, seem to be
 directed against group incest. We must add a series of customs which
 watch over the individual behaviour to near relatives in our sense,
 which are maintained with almost religious severity and of whose object
 there can hardly be any doubt. These customs or custom prohibitions may
 be called avoidances. They spread far beyond the Australian totem
 races. But here again I must ask the reader to be content with a
 fragmentary excerpt from the abundant material.
 
 Such restrictive prohibitions are directed in Melanesia against the
 relations of boys with their mothers and sisters. Thus, for instance, on
 Lepers Island, one of the New Hebrides, the boy leaves his maternal home
 at a fixed age and moves to the clubhouse, where he there regularly
 sleeps and takes his meals. He may still visit his home to ask for food;
 but if his sister is at home he must go away before he has eaten; if no
 sister is about he may sit down to eat near the door. If brother and
 sister meet by chance in the open, she must run away or turn aside and
 conceal herself. If the boy recognizes certain footprints in the sand as
 his sisters he is not to follow them, nor is she to follow his. He
 will not even mention her name and will guard against using any current
 word if it forms part of her name. This avoidance, which begins with the
 ceremony of puberty, is strictly observed for life. The reserve between
 mother and son increases with age and generally is more obligatory on
 the mothers side. If she brings him something to eat she does not give
 it to him herself but puts it down before him, nor does she address him
 in the familiar manner of mother and son, but uses the formal address.
 Similar customs obtain in New Caledonia. If brother and sister meet, she
 flees into the bush and he passes by without turning his head toward
 her[18].
 
 On the Gazella Peninsula in New Britain a sister, beginning with her
 marriage, may no longer speak with her brother, nor does she utter his
 name but designates him by means of a circumlocution[19].
 
 In New Mecklenburg some cousins are subject to such restrictions, which
 also apply to brothers and sisters. They may neither approach each
 other, shake hands, nor give each other presents, though they may talk
 to each other at a distance of several paces. The penalty for incest
 with a sister is death through hanging[20].
 
 These rules of avoidance are especially severe in the Fiji Islands where
 they concern not only consanguineous sisters but group sisters as well.
 
 To hear that these savages hold sacred orgies in which persons of just
 these forbidden degrees of kinship seek sexual union would seem still
 more peculiar to us, if we did not prefer to make use of this
 contradiction to explain the prohibition instead of being astonished at
 it[21].
 
 Among the Battas of Sumatra these laws of avoidance affect all near
 relationships. For instance, it would be most offensive for a Battan to
 accompany his own sister to an evening party. A brother will feel most
 uncomfortable in the company of his sister even when other persons are
 also present. If either comes into the house, the other prefers to
 leave. Nor will a father remain alone in the house with his daughter any
 more than the mother with her son. The Dutch missionary who reported
 these customs added that unfortunately he had to consider them well
 founded. It is assumed without question by these races that a man and a
 woman left alone together will indulge in the most extreme intimacy,
 and as they expect all kinds of punishments and evil consequences from
 consanguineous intercourse they do quite right to avoid all temptations
 by means of such prohibitions[22].
 
 Among the Barongos in Delagoa Bay, in Africa, the most rigorous
 precautions are directed, curiously enough, against the sister-in-law,
 the wife of the brother of ones own wife. If a man meets this person
 who is so dangerous to him, he carefully avoids her. He does not dare to
 eat out of the same dish with her; he speaks only timidly to her, does
 not dare to enter her hut, and greets her only with a trembling
 voice[23].
 
 Among the Akamba (or Wakamba) in British East Africa, a law of avoidance
 is in force which one would have expected to encounter more frequently.
 A girl must carefully avoid her own father between the time of her
 puberty and her marriage. She hides herself if she meets him on the
 street and never attempts to sit down next to him, behaving in this way
 right up to her engagement. But after her marriage no further obstacle
 is put in the way of her social intercourse with her father[24].
 
 The most widespread and strictest avoidance, which is perhaps the most
 interesting one for civilized races is that which restricts the social
 relations between a man and his mother-in-law. It is quite general in
 Australia, but it is also in force among the Melanesian, Polynesian and
 Negro races of Africa as far as the traces of totemism and group
 relationship reach, and probably further still. Among some of these
 races similar prohibitions exist against the harmless social intercourse
 of a wife with her father-in-law, but these are by far not so constant
 or so serious. In a few cases both parents-in-law become objects of
 avoidance.
 
 As we are less interested in the ethnographic dissemination than in the
 substance and the purpose of the mother-in-law avoidance, I will here
 also limit myself to a few examples.
 
 On the Banks Island these prohibitions are very severe and painfully
 exact. A man will avoid the proximity of his mother-in-law as she avoids
 his. If they meet by chance on a path, the woman steps aside and turns
 her back until he is passed, or he does the same.
 
 In Vanna Lava (Port Patterson) a man will not even walk behind his
 mother-in-law along the beach until the rising tide has washed away the
 trace of her footsteps. But they may talk to each other at a certain
 distance. It is quite out of the question that he should ever pronounce
 the name of his mother-in-law, or she his[25].
 
 On the Solomon Islands, beginning with his marriage, a man must neither
 see nor speak with his mother-in-law. If he meets her he acts as if he
 did not know her and runs away as fast as he can in order to hide
 himself[26].
 
 Among the Zulu Kaffirs custom demands that a man should be ashamed of
 his mother-in-law and that he should do everything to avoid her company.
 He does not enter a hut in which she is, and when they meet he or she
 goes aside, she perhaps hiding behind a bush while he holds his shield
 before his face. If they cannot avoid each other and the woman has
 nothing with which to cover herself, she at least binds a bunch of grass
 around her head in order to satisfy the ceremonial requirements.
 Communication between them must either be made through a third person or
 else they may shout at each other at a considerable distance if they
 have some barrier between them as, for instance, the enclosure of a
 kraal. Neither may utter the others name[27].
 
 Among the Basogas, a negro tribe living in the region of the Nile
 sources, a man may talk to his mother-in-law only if she is in another
 room of the house and is not visible to him. Moreover, this race
 abominates incest to such an extent as not to let it go unpunished even
 among domestic animals[28].
 
 Whereas all observers have interpreted the purpose and meaning of the
 avoidances between near relatives as protective measures against incest,
 different interpretations have been given for those prohibitions which
 concern the relationship with the mother-in-law. It was quite
 incomprehensible why all these races should manifest such great fear of
 temptation on the part of the man for an elderly woman, old enough to be
 his mother[29].
 
 The same objection was also raised against the conception of Fison who
 called attention to the fact that certain marriage class systems show a
 gap in that they make marriage between a man and his mother-in-law
 theoretically not impossible and that a special guarantee was therefore
 necessary to guard against this possibility.
 
 Sir J. Lubbock, in his book _The Origin of Civilization_, traces back
 the behaviour of the mother-in-law toward the son-in-law to the former
 marriage by capture. As long as the capture of women actually took
 place, the indignation of the parents was probably serious enough. When
 nothing but symbols of this form of marriage survived, the indignation
 of the parents was also symbolized and this custom continued after its
 origin had been forgotten. Crawley has found it easy to show how little
 this tentative explanation agrees with the details of actual
 observation.
 
 E. B. Tylor thinks that the treatment of the son-in-law on the part of
 the mother-in-law is nothing more than a form of cutting on the part
 of the womans family. The man counts as a stranger, and this continues
 until the first child is born. But even if no account is taken of cases
 in which this last condition does not remove the prohibition, this
 explanation is subject to the objection that it does not throw any light
 on the custom dealing with the relation between mother-in-law and
 son-in-law, thus overlooking the sexual factor, and that it does not
 take into account the almost sacred loathing which finds expression in
 the laws of avoidance[30].
 
 A Zulu woman who was asked about the basis for this prohibition showed
 great delicacy of feeling in her answer: It is not right that he
 should see the breasts which nursed his wife.[31]
 
 It is known that also among civilized races the relation of son-in-law
 and mother-in-law belongs to one of the most difficult sides of family
 organization. Although laws of avoidance no longer exist in the society
 of the white races of Europe and America, much quarrelling and
 displeasure would often be avoided if they did exist and did not have to
 be re-established by individuals. Many a European will see an act of
 high wisdom in the laws of avoidance which savage races have established
 to preclude any understanding between two persons who have become so
 closely related. There is hardly any doubt that there is something in
 the psychological situation of mother-in-law and son-in-law which
 furthers hostilities between them and renders living together difficult.
 The fact that the witticisms of civilized races show such a preference
 for this very mother-in-law theme seems to me to point to the fact that
 the emotional relations between mother-in-law and son-in-law are
 controlled by components which stand in sharp contrast to each other. I
 mean that the relation is really ambivalent, that is, it is composed
 of conflicting feelings of tenderness and hostility.
 
 A certain part of these feelings is evident. The mother-in-law is
 unwilling to give up the possession of her daughter; she distrusts the
 stranger to whom her daughter has been delivered, and shows a tendency
 to maintain the dominating position, to which she became accustomed at
 home. On the part of the man, there is the determination not to subject
 himself any longer to any foreign will, his jealousy of all persons who
 preceded him in the possession of his wifes tenderness, and, last but
 not least, his aversion to being disturbed in his illusion of sexual
 over-valuation. As a rule such a disturbance emanates for the most part
 from his mother-in-law who reminds him of her daughter through so many
 common traits but who lacks all the charm of youth, such as beauty and
 that psychic spontaneity which makes his wife precious to him.
 
 The knowledge of hidden psychic feelings which psychoanalytic
 investigation of individuals has given us, makes it possible to add
 other motives to the above. Where the psycho-sexual needs of the woman
 are to be satisfied in marriage and family life, there is always the
 danger of dissatisfaction through the premature termination of the
 conjugal relation, and the monotony in the wifes emotional life. The
 ageing mother protects herself against this by living through the lives
 of her children, by identifying herself with them and making their
 emotional experiences her own. Parents are said to remain young with
 their children, and this is, in fact, one of the most valuable psychic
 benefits which parents derive from their children. Childlessness thus
 eliminates one of the best means to endure the necessary resignation
 imposed upon the individual through marriage. This emotional
 indentification with the daughter may easily go so far with the mother
 that she also falls in love with the man her daughter loves, which
 leads, in extreme cases, to severe forms of neurotic ailments on account
 of the violent psychic resistance against this emotional predisposition.
 At all events the tendency to such infatuation is very frequent with the
 mother-in-law, and either this infatuation itself or the tendency
 opposed to it joins the conflict of contending forces in the psyche of
 the mother-in-law. Very often it is just this harsh and sadistic
 component of the love emotion which is turned against the son-in-law in
 order better to suppress the forbidden tender feelings.
 
 The relation of the husband to his mother-in-law is complicated through
 similar feelings which, however, spring from other sources. The path of
 object selection has normally led him to his love object through the
 image of his mother and perhaps of his sister; in consequence of the
 incest barriers his preference for these two beloved persons of his
 childhood has been deflected and he is then able to find their image in
 strange objects. He now sees the mother-in-law taking the place of his
 own mother and of his sisters mother, and there develops a tendency to
 return to the primitive selection, against which everything in him
 resists. His incest dread demands that he should not be reminded of the
 genealogy of his love selection; the actuality of his mother-in-law,
 whom he had not known all his life like his mother so that her picture
 can be preserved unchanged in his unconscious, facilitates this
 rejection. An added mixture of irritability and animosity in his
 feelings leads us to suspect that the mother-in-law actually represents
 an incest temptation for the son-in-law, just as it not infrequently
 happens that a man falls in love with his subsequent mother-in-law
 before his inclination is transferred to her daughter.
 
 I see no objection to the assumption that it is just this incestuous
 factor of the relationship which motivates the avoidance between son-and
 mother-in-law among savages. Among the explanations for the avoidances
 which these primitive races observe so strictly, we would therefore give
 preference to the opinion originally expressed by Fison, who sees
 nothing in these regulations but a protection against possible incest.
 This would also hold good for all the other avoidances between those
 related by blood or by marriage. There is only one difference, namely,
 in the first case the incest is direct, so that the purpose of the
 prevention might be conscious; in the other case, which includes the
 mother-in-law relation, the incest would be a phantasy temptation
 brought about by unconscious intermediary links.
 
 We have had little opportunity in this exposition to show that the facts
 of folk-psychology can be seen in a new light through the application of
 the psychoanalytic point of view, for the incest dread of savages has
 long been known as such, and is in need of no further interpretation.
 What we can add to the further appreciation of incest dread is the
 statement that it is a subtle infantile trait and is in striking
 agreement with the psychic life of the neurotic. Psychoanalysis has
 taught us that the first object selection of the boy is of an incestuous
 nature and that it is directed to the forbidden objects, the mother and
 the sister; pyschoanalysis has taught us also the methods through which
 the maturing individual frees himself from these incestuous attractions.
 The neurotic, however, regularly presents to us a piece of psychic
 infantilism; he has either not been able to free himself from the
 childlike conditions of psychosexuality, or else he has returned to them
 (inhibited development and regression). Hence the incestuous fixations
 of the libido still play or again are playing the main rle in his
 unconscious psychic life. We have gone so far as to declare that the
 relation to the parents instigated by incestuous longings is the central
 complex of the neurosis. This discovery of the significance of incest
 for the neurosis naturally meets with the most general incredulity on
 the part of the grown-up, normal man; a similar rejection will also meet
 the researches of Otto Rank, which show in even larger scope to what
 extent the incest theme stands in the centre of poetical interest and
 how it forms the material of poetry in countless variations and
 distortions. We are forced to believe that such a rejection is above all
 the product of mans deep aversion to his former incest wishes which
 have since succumbed to repression. It is therefore of importance to us
 to be able to show that mans incest wishes, which later are destined to
 become unconscious, are still felt to be dangerous by savage races who
 consider them worthy of the most severe defensive measures.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II
 
 TABOO AND THE AMBIVALENCE OF EMOTIONS
 
 
 1
 
 Taboo is a Polynesian word, the translation of which provides
 difficulties for us because we no longer possess the idea which it
 connotes. It was still current with the ancient Romans: their word
 sacer was the same as the taboo of the Polynesians. The [Greek:  hagos]
 of the Greeks and the Kodaush of the Hebrews must also have signified
 the same thing which the Polynesians express through their word taboo
 and what many races in America, Africa (Madagascar), North and Central
 Asia express through analogous designations.
 
 For us the meaning of taboo branches off into two opposite directions.
 On the one hand it means to us sacred, consecrated: but on the other
 hand it means, uncanny, dangerous, forbidden, and unclean. The opposite
 for taboo is designated in Polynesian by the word _noa_ and signifies
 something ordinary and generally accessible. Thus something like the
 concept of reserve inheres in taboo; taboo expresses itself essentially
 in prohibitions and restrictions. Our combination of holy dread would
 often express the meaning of taboo.
 
 The taboo restrictions are different from religious or moral
 prohibitions. They are not traced to a commandment of a god but really
 they themselves impose their own prohibitions; they are differentiated
 from moral prohibitions by failing to be included in a system which
 declares abstinences in general to be necessary and gives reasons for
 this necessity. The taboo prohibitions lack all justification and are of
 unknown origin. Though incomprehensible to us they are taken as a matter
 of course by those who are under their dominance.
 
 Wundt[32] calls taboo the oldest unwritten code of law of humanity. It
 is generally assumed that taboo is older than the gods and goes back to
 the pre-religious age.
 
 As we are in need of an impartial presentation of the subject of taboo
 before subjecting it to psychoanalytic consideration I shall now cite an
 excerpt from the article _Taboo_ in the _Encyclopedia Britannica_
 written by the anthropologist Northcote W. Thomas[33]:
 
 Properly speaking taboo includes only (a) the sacred (or unclean)
 character of persons or things, (b) the kind of prohibition which
 results from this character, and (c) the sanctity (or uncleanliness)
 which results from a violation of the prohibition. The converse of taboo
 in Polynesia is noa and allied forms which mean general or common
 ...
 
 Various classes of taboo in the wider sense may be distinguished: 1.
 natural or direct, the result of mana mysterious (power) inherent in a
 person or thing; 2. communicated or indirect, equally the result of
 mana but (_a_) acquired or (_b_) imposed by a priest, chief or other
 person; 3. intermediate, where both factors are present, as in the
 appropriation of a wife to her husband. The term taboo is also applied
 to ritual prohibitions of a different nature; but its use in these
 senses is better avoided. It might be argued that the term should be
 extended to embrace cases in which the sanction of the prohibition is
 the creation of a god or spirit, i.e., to religious interdictions as
 distinguished from magical, but there is neither automatic action nor
 contagion in such a case, and a better term for it is religious
 interdiction.
 
 The objects of the taboo are many: 1. direct taboos aim at (_a_)
 protection of important persons--chiefs, priests, etc.--and things
 against harm; (_b_) safeguarding of the weak--women children and common
 people generally--from the powerful mana (magical influence) of chiefs
 and priests; (_c_) providing against the dangers incurred by handling or
 coming in contact with corpses, by eating certain food, etc.; (_d_)
 guarding the chief acts of life--births, initiation, marriage and sexual
 functions--against interference; (_e_) securing human beings against the
 wrath or power of gods and spirits[34]; (_f_) securing unborn infants
 and young children who stand in a specially sympathetic relation with
 their parents, from the consequence of certain actions, and more
 especially from the communication of qualities supposed to be derived
 from certain foods. 2. Taboos are imposed in order to secure against
 thieves the property of an individual, his fields, tools, etc.
 
 Other parts of the article may be summarized as follows. Originally the
 punishment for the violation of a taboo was probably left to an inner,
 automatic arrangement. The violated taboo avenged itself. Wherever the
 taboo was related to ideas of gods and demons an automatic punishment
 was expected from the power of the godhead. In other cases, probably as
 a result of a further development of the idea, society took over the
 punishment of the offender, whose action has endangered his companions.
 Thus mans first systems of punishment are also connected with taboo.
 
 The violation of a taboo makes the offender himself taboo. The author
 goes on to say that certain dangers resulting from the violation of a
 taboo may be exercised through acts of penance and ceremonies of
 purification.
 
 A peculiar power inherent in persons and ghosts, which can be
 transmitted from them to inanimate objects is regarded as the source of
 the taboo. This part of the article reads as follows: Persons or things
 which are regarded as taboo may be compared to objects charged with
 electricity; they are the seat of tremendous power which is
 transmissible by contact, and may be liberated with destructive effect
 if the organisms which provoke its discharge are too weak to resist it;
 the result of a violation of a taboo depends partly on the strength of
 the magical influence inherent in the taboo object or person, partly on
 the strength of the opposing mana of the violator of the taboo. Thus,
 kings and chiefs are possessed of great power, and it is death for their
 subjects to address them directly; but a minister or other person of
 greater _mana_ than common, can approach them unharmed, and can in turn
 be approached by their inferiors without risk.... So, too, indirect
 taboos depend for their strength on the mana of him who opposes them; if
 it is a chief or a priest, they are more powerful than those imposed by
 a common person.
 
 The fact that a taboo is transmissible has surely given rise to the
 effort of removing it through expiatory ceremonies.
 
 The author states that there are permanent and temporary taboos. The
 former comprise priests and chiefs as well as the dead and everything
 that has belonged to them. Temporary taboos attach themselves to certain
 conditions such as menstruation and child-bed, the status of the warrior
 before and after the expedition, the activities of fishing and of the
 chase, and similar activities. A general taboo may also be imposed upon
 a large district like an ecclesiastical interdict, and may then last for
 years.
 
 If I judge my readers impressions correctly, I dare say that after
 hearing all that was said about taboo they are far from knowing what to
 understand by it and where to store it in their minds. This is surely
 due to the insufficient information I have given and to the omission of
 all discussions concerning the relation of taboo to superstition, to
 belief in the soul, and to religion. On the other hand I fear that a
 more detailed description of what is known about taboo would be still
 more confusing; I can therefore assure the reader that the state of
 affairs is really far from clear. We may say, however, that we deal with
 a series of restrictions which these primitive races impose upon
 themselves; this and that is forbidden without any apparent reason; nor
 does it occur to them to question this matter, for they subject
 themselves to these restrictions as a matter of course and are convinced
 that any transgression will be punished automatically in the most severe
 manner. There are reliable reports that innocent transgressions of such
 prohibitions have actually been punished automatically. For instance,
 the innocent offender who had eaten from a forbidden animal became
 deeply depressed, expected his death and then actually died. The
 prohibitions mostly concern matters which are capable of enjoyment such
 as freedom of movement and unrestrained intercourse; in some cases they
 appear very ingenious, evidently representing abstinences and
 renunciations; in other cases their content is quite incomprehensible,
 they seem to concern themselves with trifles and give the impression of
 ceremonials. Something like a theory seems to underlie all these
 prohibitions, it seems as if these prohibitions are necessary because
 some persons and objects possess a dangerous power which is transmitted
 by contact with the object so charged, almost like a contagion. The
 quantity of this dangerous property is also taken into consideration.
 Some persons or things have more of it than others and the danger is
 precisely in accordance with the charge. The most peculiar part of it is
 that any one who has violated such a prohibition assumes the nature of
 the forbidden object as if he had absorbed the whole dangerous charge.
 This power is inherent in all persons who are more or less prominent,
 such as kings, priests and the newly born, in all exceptional physical
 states such as menstruation, puberty and birth, in everything sinister
 like illness and death and in everything connected with these conditions
 by virtue of contagion or dissemination.
 
 However, the term taboo includes all persons, localities, objects and
 temporary conditions which are carriers or sources of this mysterious
 attribute. The prohibition derived from this attribute is also
 designated as taboo, and lastly taboo, in the literal sense, includes
 everything that is sacred, above the ordinary, and at the same time
 dangerous, unclean and mysterious.
 
 Both this word and the system corresponding to it express a fragment of
 psychic life which really is not comprehensible to us. And indeed it
 would seem that no understanding of it could be possible without
 entering into the study of the belief in spirits and demons which is so
 characteristic of these low grades of culture.
 
 Now why should we take any interest at all in the riddle of taboo? Not
 only, I think, because every psychological problem is well worth the
 effort of investigation for its own sake, but for other reasons as well.
 It may be surmised that the taboo of Polynesian savages is after all not
 so remote from us as we were at first inclined to believe; the moral and
 customary prohibitions which we ourselves obey may have some essential
 relation to this primitive taboo the explanation of which may in the end
 throw light upon the dark origin of our own categorical imperative.
 
 We are therefore inclined to listen with keen expectations when an
 investigator like W. Wundt gives his interpretation of taboo, especially
 as he promises to go back to the very roots of the taboo concepts[35].
 
 Wundt states that the idea of taboo includes all customs which express
 dread of particular objects connected with cultic ideas or of actions
 having reference to them[36].
 
 On another occasion he says: In accordance with the general sense of
 the word we understand by taboo every prohibition laid down in customs
 or manners or in expressly formulated laws, not to touch an object or to
 take it for ones own use, or to make use of certain proscribed
 words.... Accordingly there would not be a single race or stage of
 culture which had escaped the injurious effects of taboo.
 
 Wundt then shows why he finds it more practical to study the nature of
 taboo in the primitive states of Australian savages rather than in the
 higher culture of the Polynesian races. In the case of the Australians
 he divides taboo prohibitions into three classes according as they
 concern animals, persons or other objects. The animal taboo, which
 consists essentially of the taboo against killing and eating, forms the
 nucleus of Totemism[37]. The taboo of the second class, which has human
 beings for its object, is of an essentially different nature. To begin
 with it is restricted to conditions which bring about an unusual
 situation in life for the person tabooed. Thus young men at the feast of
 initiation, women during menstruation and immediately after delivery,
 newly born children, the deceased and especially the dead, are all
 taboo. The constantly used property of any person, such as his clothes,
 tools and weapons, is permanently taboo for everybody else. In
 Australia the new name which a youth receives at his initiation into
 manhood becomes part of his most personal property, it is taboo and must
 be kept secret. The taboos of the third class, which apply to trees,
 plants, houses and localities, are more variable and seem only to follow
 the rule that anything which for any reason arouses dread or is
 mysterious, becomes subject to taboo.
 
 Wundt himself has to acknowledge that the changes which taboo undergoes
 in the richer culture of the Polynesians and in the Malayan Archipelago
 are not very profound. The greater social differentiation of these races
 manifests itself in the fact that chiefs, kings and priests exercise an
 especially effective taboo and are themselves exposed to the strongest
 taboo compulsion.
 
 But the real sources of taboo lie deeper than in the interests of the
 privileged classes: They begin where the most primitive and at the same
 time the most enduring human impulses have their origin, namely, _in the
 fear of the effect of demonic powers_[38]. The taboo, which originally
 was nothing more than the objectified fear of the demonic power thought
 to be concealed in the tabooed object, forbids the irritation of this
 power and demands the placation of the demon whenever the taboo has been
 knowingly or unknowingly violated.
 
 The taboo then gradually became an autonomous power which has detached
 itself from demonism. It becomes the compulsion of custom and tradition
 and finally of the law. But the commandment concealed behind taboo
 prohibitions which differ materially according to place and time, had
 originally the meaning: Beware of the wrath of the demons.
 
 Wundt therefore teaches that taboo is the expression and evolution of
 the belief of primitive races in demonic powers, and that later taboo
 has dissociated itself from this origin and has remained a power simply
 because it was one by virtue of a kind of a psychic persistence and in
 this manner it became the root of our customs and laws. As little as one
 can object to the first part of this statement I feel, however, that I
 am only voicing the impression of many of my readers if I call Wundts
 explanation disappointing. Wundts explanation is far from going back to
 the sources of taboo concepts or to their deepest roots. For neither
 fear nor demons can be accepted in psychology as finalities defying any
 further deduction. It would be different if demons really existed; but
 we know that, like gods, they are only the product of the psychic
 powers of man; they have been created from and out of something.
 
 Wundt also expresses a number of important though not altogether clear
 opinions about the double meaning of taboo. According to him the
 division between _sacred_ and _unclean_ does not yet exist in the first
 primitive stages of taboo. For this reason these conceptions entirely
 lack the significance which they could only acquire later on when they
 came to be contrasted. The animal, person or place on which there is a
 taboo is demonic, that is, not sacred, and therefore not yet, in the
 later sense, unclean. The expression taboo is particularly suitable for
 this undifferentiated and intermediate meaning of the demonic, in the
 sense of something which may not be touched, since it emphasizes a
 characteristic which finally adheres both to what is sacred and to the
 unclean, namely, the dread of contact. But the fact that this important
 characteristic is permanently held in common points to the existence of
 an original agreement here between these two spheres which gave way to a
 differentiation only as the result of further conditions through which
 both finally developed into opposites.
 
 The belief associated with the original taboo, according to which a
 demonic power concealed in the object avenges the touching of it or its
 forbidden use by bewitching the offender was still an entirely
 objectified fear. This had not yet separated into the two forms which it
 assumed at a more developed stage, namely, awe and aversion.
 
 How did this separation come about? According to Wundt, this was done
 through the transference of taboo prohibitions from the sphere of demons
 to that of theistic conceptions. The antithesis of sacred and unclean
 coincides with the succession of two mythological stages the first of
 which did not entirely disappear when the second was reached but
 continued in a state of greatly lowered esteem which gradually turned
 into contempt. It is a general law in mythology that a preceding stage,
 just because it has been overcome and pushed back by a higher stage,
 maintains itself next to it in a debased form so that the objects of its
 veneration become objects of aversion[39].
 
 Wundts further elucidations refer to the relation of taboo to
 lustration and sacrifice.
 
 
 2
 
 He who approaches the problem of taboo from the field of psychoanalysis,
 which is concerned with the study of the unconscious part of the
 individuals psychic life, needs but a moments reflection to realize
 that these phenomena are by no means foreign to him. He knows people who
 have individually created such taboo prohibitions for themselves, which
 they follow as strictly as savages observe the taboos common to their
 tribe or society. If he were not accustomed to call these individuals
 compulsion neurotics he would find the term taboo disease quite
 appropriate for their malady. Psychoanalytic investigation has taught
 him the clinical etiology and the essential part of the psychological
 mechanism of this compulsion disease, so that he cannot resist applying
 what he has learnt there to explain corresponding manifestations in folk
 psychology.
 
 There is one warning to which we shall have to give heed in making this
 attempt. The similarity between taboo and compulsion disease may be
 purely superficial, holding good only for the manifestations of both
 without extending into their deeper characteristics. Nature loves to use
 identical forms in the most widely different biological connections, as,
 for instance, for coral stems and plants and even for certain crystals
 or for the formation of certain chemical precipitates. It would
 certainly be both premature and unprofitable to base conclusions
 relating to inner relationships upon the correspondence of merely
 mechanical conditions. We shall bear this warning in mind without,
 however, giving up our intended comparison on account of the possibility
 of such confusions.
 
 The first and most striking correspondence between the compulsion
 prohibitions of neurotics and taboo lies in the fact that the origin of
 these prohibitions is just as unmotivated and enigmatic. They have
 appeared at some time or other and must now be retained on account of an
 unconquerable anxiety. An external threat of punishment is superfluous,
 because an inner certainty (a conscience) exists that violation will be
 followed by unbearable disaster. The very most that compulsion patients
 can tell us is the vague premonition that some person of their
 environment will suffer harm if they should violate the prohibition. Of
 what the harm is to consist is not known, and this inadequate
 information is more likely to be obtained during the later discussions
 of the expiatory and defensive actions than when the prohibitions
 themselves are being discussed.
 
 As in the case of taboo the nucleus of the neurotic prohibition is the
 act of touching, whence we derive the name touching phobia or _dlire
 de toucher_. The prohibition extends not only to direct contact with the
 body but also to the figurative use of the phrase as to come into
 contact or be in touch with some one or something. Anything that
 leads the thoughts to what is prohibited and thus calls forth mental
 contact is just as much prohibited as immediate bodily contact; this
 same extension is also found in taboo.
 
 Some prohibitions are easily understood from their purpose but others
 strike us as incomprehensible, foolish and senseless. We designate such
 commands as ceremonials and we find that taboo customs show the same
 variations.
 
 Obsessive prohibitions possess an extraordinary capacity for
 displacement; they make use of almost any form of connection to extend
 from one object to another and then in turn make this new object
 impossible, as one of my patients aptly puts it. This impossibility
 finally lays an embargo upon the whole world. The compulsion neurotics
 act as if the impossible persons and things were the carriers of a
 dangerous contagion which is ready to displace itself through contact to
 all neighbouring things. We have already emphasized the same
 characteristics of contagion and transference in the description of
 taboo prohibitions. We also know that any one who has violated a taboo
 by touching something which is taboo becomes taboo himself, and no one
 may come into contact with him.
 
 I shall put side by side two examples of transference or, to use a
 better term, displacement, one from the life of the Maori, and the
 other from my observation of a woman suffering from a compulsion
 neurosis:
 
 For a similar reason a Maori chief would not blow on a fire with his
 mouth; for his sacred breath would communicate its sanctity to the fire,
 which would pass it on to the meat in the pot, which would pass it on to
 the man who ate the meat which was in the pot, which stood on the fire,
 which was breathed on by the chief; so that the eater, infected by the
 chiefs breath conveyed through these intermediaries, would surely
 die[40].
 
 My patient demanded that a utensil which her husband had purchased and
 brought home should be removed lest it make the place where she lives
 impossible. For she has heard that this object was bought in a store
 which is situated, let us say, in Stag Street. But as the word stag is
 the name of a friend now in a distant city, whom she has known in her
 youth under her maiden name and whom she now finds impossible, that is
 taboo, the object bought in Vienna is just as taboo as this friend with
 whom she does not want to come into contact.
 
 Compulsion prohibitions, like taboo prohibitions, entail the most
 extraordinary renunciations and restrictions of life, but a part of
 these can be removed by carrying out certain acts which now also must be
 done because they have acquired a compulsive character (obsessive acts);
 there is no doubt that these acts are in the nature of penances,
 expiations, defence reactions, and purifications. The most common of
 these obsessive acts is washing with water (washing obsession). A part
 of the taboo prohibitions can also be replaced in this way, that is to
 say, their violation can be made good through such a ceremonial, and
 here too lustration through water is the preferred way.
 
 Let us now summarize the points in which the correspondence between
 taboo customs and the symptoms of compulsion neurosis are most clearly
 manifested: 1. In the lack of motivation of the commandments, 2. in
 their enforcement through an inner need, 3. in their capacity of
 displacement and in the danger of contagion from what is prohibited, 4.
 and in the causation of ceremonial actions and commandments which
 emanate from the forbidden.
 
 However, psychoanalysis has made us familiar with the clinical history
 as well as the psychic mechanism of compulsion neurosis. Thus the
 history of a typical case of touching phobia reads as follows: In the
 very beginning, during the early period of childhood, the person
 manifested a strong pleasure in touching himself, the object of which
 was much more specialized than one would be inclined to suspect.
 Presently the carrying out of this very pleasurable act of touching was
 opposed by a prohibition from without[41]. The prohibition was accepted
 because it was supported by strong inner forces[42]; it proved to be
 stronger than the impulse which wanted to manifest itself through this
 act of touching. But due to the primitive psychic constitution of the
 child this prohibition did not succeed in abolishing the impulse. Its
 only success lay in repressing the impulse (the pleasure of touching)
 and banishing it into the unconscious. Both the prohibition and the
 impulse remained; the impulse because it had only been repressed and not
 abolished, the prohibition, because if it had ceased the impulse would
 have broken through into consciousness and would have been carried out.
 An unsolved situation, a psychic fixation, had thus been created and now
 everything else emanated from the continued conflict between prohibition
 and impulse.
 
 The main characteristic of the psychic constellation which has thus gone
 under fixation lies in what one might call the ambivalent behaviour[43]
 of the individual to the object, or rather to an action regarding it.
 The individual constantly wants to carry out this action (the act of
 touching), he sees in it the highest pleasure, but he may not carry it
 out, and he even abominates it. The opposition between these two streams
 cannot be easily adjusted because--there is no other way to express
 it--they are so localized in the psychic life that they cannot meet. The
 prohibition becomes fully conscious, while the surviving pleasure of
 touching remains unconscious, the person knowing nothing about it. If
 this psychological factor did not exist the ambivalence could neither
 maintain itself so long nor lead to such subsequent manifestations.
 
 In the clinical history of the case we have emphasized the appearance of
 the prohibition in early childhood as the determining factor; but for
 the further elaboration of the neurosis this rle is played by the
 repression which appears at this age. On account of the repression which
 has taken place, which is connected with forgetting (amnesia), the
 motivation of the prohibition that has become conscious remains unknown,
 and all attempts to unravel it intellectually must fail, as the point of
 attack cannot be found. The prohibition owes its strength--its
 compulsive character--to its association with its unknown counterpart,
 the hidden and unabated pleasure, that is to say, to an inner need into
 which conscious insight is lacking. The transferability and reproductive
 power of the prohibition reflect a process which harmonizes with the
 unconscious pleasure and is very much facilitated through the
 psychological determinants of the unconscious. The pleasure of the
 impulse constantly undergoes displacement in order to escape the
 blocking which it encounters and seeks to acquire surrogates for the
 forbidden in the form of substitutive objects and actions. For the same
 reason the prohibition also wanders and spreads to the new aims of the
 proscribed impulse. Every new advance of the repressed libido is
 answered by the prohibition with a new severity. The mutual inhibition
 of these two contending forces creates a need for discharge and for
 lessening the existing tension, in which we may recognize the motivation
 for the compulsive acts. In the neurosis there are distinctly acts of
 compromise which on the one hand may be regarded as proofs of remorse
 and efforts to expiate and similar actions; but on the other hand they
 are at the same time substitutive actions which recompense the impulse
 for what has been forbidden. It is a law of neurotic diseases that these
 obsessive acts serve the impulse more and more and come nearer and
 nearer to the original and forbidden act.
 
 We may now make the attempt to study taboo as if it were of the same
 nature as the compulsive prohibitions of our patients. It must naturally
 be clearly understood that many of the taboo prohibitions which we shall
 study are already secondary, displaced and distorted, so that we shall
 have to be satisfied if we can shed some light upon the earliest and
 most important taboo prohibitions. We must also remember that the
 differences in the situation of the savage and of the neurotic may be
 important enough to exclude complete correspondence and prevent a point
 by point transfer from one to the other such as would be possible if we
 were dealing with exact copies.
 
 First of all it must be said that it is useless to question savages as
 to the real motivation of their prohibitions or as to the genesis of
 taboo. According to our assumption they must be incapable of telling us
 anything about it since this motivation is unconscious to them. But
 following the model of the compulsive prohibition we shall construct the
 history of taboo as follows: Taboos are very ancient prohibitions which
 at one time were forced upon a generation of primitive people from
 without, that is, they probably were forcibly impressed upon them by an
 earlier generation. These prohibitions concerned actions for which there
 existed a strong desire. The prohibitions maintained themselves from
 generation to generation, perhaps only as the result of a tradition set
 up by paternal and social authority. But in later generations they have
 perhaps already become organized as a piece of inherited psychic
 property. Whether there are such innate ideas or whether these have
 brought about the fixation of the taboo by themselves or by co-operating
 with education no one could decide in the particular case in question.
 The persistence of taboo teaches, however, one thing, namely, that the
 original pleasure to do the forbidden still continues among taboo races.
 They therefore assume an _ambivalent attitude_ toward their taboo
 prohibitions; in their unconscious they would like nothing better than
 to transgress them but they are also afraid to do it; they are afraid
 just because they would like to transgress, and the fear is stronger
 than the pleasure. But in every individual of the race the desire for it
 is unconscious, just as in the neurotic.
 
 The oldest and most important taboo prohibitions are the two basic laws
 of _totemism_: namely not to kill the totem animal, and to avoid sexual
 intercourse with totem companions of the other sex.
 
 It would therefore seem that these must have been the oldest and
 strongest desires of mankind. We cannot understand this and therefore we
 cannot use these examples to test our assumptions as long as the meaning
 and the origin of the totemic system is so wholly unknown to us. But the
 very wording of these taboos and the fact that they occur together will
 remind any one who knows the results of the psychoanalytic investigation
 of individuals, of something quite definite which psychoanalysts call
 the central point of the infantile wish life and the nucleus of the
 later neurosis[44].
 
 All other varieties of taboo phenomena which have led to the attempted
 classifications noted above become unified if we sum them up in the
 following sentence. The basis of taboo is a forbidden action for which
 there exists a strong inclination in the unconscious.
 
 We know, without understanding it, that whoever does what is prohibited
 and violates the taboo, becomes himself taboo. But how can we connect
 this fact with the other, namely that the taboo adheres not only to
 persons who have done what is prohibited but also to persons who are in
 exceptional circumstances, to these circumstances themselves, and to
 impersonal things? What can this dangerous attribute be which always
 remains the same under all these different conditions? Only one thing,
 namely, the propensity to arouse the ambivalence of man and to tempt him
 to violate the prohibition.
 
 An individual who has violated a taboo becomes himself taboo because he
 has the dangerous property of tempting others to follow his example. He
 arouses envy; why should he be allowed to do what is prohibited to
 others? He is therefore really _contagious_, in so far as every example
 incites to imitation and therefore he himself must be avoided.
 
 But a person may become permanently or temporarily taboo without having
 violated any taboos, for the simple reason that he is in a condition
 which has the property of inciting the forbidden desires of others and
 of awakening the ambivalent conflict in them. Most of the exceptional
 positions and conditions have this character and possess this dangerous
 power. The king or chieftain rouses envy of his prerogatives; everybody
 would perhaps like to be king. The dead, the newly born, and women when
 they are incapacitated all act as incitements on account of their
 peculiar helplessness, while the individual who has just reached sexual
 maturity tempts through the promise of a new pleasure. Therefore all
 these persons and all these conditions are taboo, for one must not yield
 to the temptations which they offer.
 
 Now, too, we understand why the forces inherent in the mana of various
 persons can neutralize one another so that the mana of one individual
 can partly cancel that of the other. The taboo of a king is too strong
 for his subject because the social difference between them is too great.
 But a minister, for example, can become the harmless mediator between
 them. Translated from the language of taboo into the language of normal
 psychology this means: the subject who shrinks from the tremendous
 temptation which contact with the king creates for him can brook the
 intercourse of an official, whom he does not have to envy so much and
 whose position perhaps seems attainable to him. The minister, on his
 part, can moderate his envy of the king by taking into consideration the
 power that has been granted to him. Thus smaller differences in the
 magic power that lead to temptation are less to be feared than
 exceptionally big differences.
 
 It is equally clear how the violation of certain taboo prohibitions
 becomes a social danger which must be punished or expiated by all the
 members of society lest it harm them all. This danger really exists if
 we substitute the known impulses for the unconscious desires. It
 consists in the possibility of imitation, as a result of which society
 would soon be dissolved. If the others did not punish the violation they
 would perforce become aware that they want to imitate the evil doer.
 
 Though the secret meaning of a taboo prohibition cannot possibly be of
 so special a nature as in the case of a neurosis, we must not be
 astonished to find that touching plays a similar rle in taboo
 prohibition as in the _dlire de toucher_. To touch is the beginning of
 every act of possession, of every attempt to make use of a person or
 thing.
 
 We have interpreted the power of contagion which inheres in the taboo as
 the property of leading into temptation, and of inciting to imitation.
 This does not seem to be in accord with the fact that the contagiousness
 of the taboo is above all manifested in the transference to objects
 which thus themselves become carriers of the taboo.
 
 This transferability of the taboo reflects what is found in the
 neurosis, namely, the constant tendency of the unconscious impulse to
 become displaced through associative channels upon new objects. Our
 attention is thus drawn to the fact that the dangerous magic power of
 the mana corresponds to two real faculties, the capacity of reminding
 man of his forbidden wishes, and the apparently more important one of
 tempting him to violate the prohibition in the service of these wishes.
 Both functions reunite into one, however, if we assume it to be in
 accord with a primitive psychic life that with the awakening of a memory
 of a forbidden action there should also be combined the awakening of the
 tendency to carry out the action. Memory and temptation then again
 coincide. We must also admit that if the example of a person who has
 violated a prohibition leads another to the same action, the
 disobedience of the prohibition has been transmitted like a contagion,
 just as the taboo is transferred from a person to an object, and from
 this to another.
 
 If the violation of a taboo can be condoned through expiation or
 penance, which means, of course, a _renunciation_ of a possession or a
 liberty, we have the proof that the observance of a taboo regulation was
 itself a renunciation of something really wished for. The omission of
 one renunciation is cancelled through a renunciation at some other
 point. This would lead us to conclude that, as far as taboo ceremonials
 are concerned, penance is more primitive than purification.
 
 Let us now summarize what understanding we have gained of taboo through
 its comparison with the compulsive prohibition of the neurotic. Taboo
 is a very primitive prohibition imposed from without (by an authority)
 and directed against the strongest desires of man. The desire to violate
 it continues in the unconscious; persons who obey the taboo have an
 ambivalent feeling toward what is affected by the taboo. The magic power
 attributed to taboo goes back to its ability to lead man into
 temptation; it behaves like a contagion, because the example is
 contagious, and because the prohibited desire becomes displacing in the
 unconscious upon something else. The expiation for the violation of a
 taboo through a renunciation proves that a renunciation is at the basis
 of the observance of the taboo.
 
 
 3
 
 We may ask what we have gained from the comparison of taboo with
 compulsion neurosis and what value can be claimed for the interpretation
 we have given on the basis of this comparison? Our intrepretation is
 evidently of no value unless it affords an advantage not to be had in
 any other way and unless it affords a better understanding of taboo than
 was otherwise possible. We might claim that we have already given proof
 of its usefulness in what has been said above; but we shall have to try
 to strengthen our proof by continuing the explanation of taboo
 prohibitions and customs in detail.
 
 But we can avail ourselves of another method. We can shape our
 investigation so as to ascertain whether a part of the assumptions which
 we have transferred from the neurosis to the taboo, or the conclusions
 at which we have thereby arrived can be demonstrated directly in the
 phenomena of taboo. We must decide, however, what we want to look for.
 The assertion concerning the genesis of taboo, namely, that it was
 derived from a primitive prohibition which was once imposed from
 without, cannot, of course, be proved. We shall therefore seek to
 confirm those psychological conditions for taboo with which we have
 become acquainted in the case of compulsion neurosis. How did we gain
 our knowledge of these psychological factors in the case of neurosis?
 Through the analytical study of the symptoms, especially the compulsive
 actions, the defence reactions and the obsessive commands. These
 mechanisms gave every indication of having been derived from
 _ambivalent_ impulses or tendencies, they either represented
 simultaneously the wish and counter-wish or they served preponderantly
 one of the two contrary tendencies. If we should now succeed in showing
 that ambivalence, i.e., the sway of contrary tendencies, exists also in
 the case of taboo regulations or if we should find among taboo
 mechanisms some which like neurotic obsessions give simultaneous
 expression to both currents, we would have established what is
 practically the most important point in the psychological correspondence
 between taboo and compulsion neurosis.
 
 We have already mentioned that the two fundamental taboo prohibitions
 are inaccessible to our analysis because they belong to totemism;
 another part of the taboo rules is of secondary origin and cannot be
 used for our purpose. For among these races taboo has become the general
 form of law giving and has helped to promote social tendencies which are
 certainly younger; than taboo itself, as for instance, the taboos
 imposed by chiefs and priests to insure their property and privileges.
 But there still remains a large group of laws which we may undertake to
 investigate. Among these I lay stress on those taboos which are attached
 (_a_) to enemies, (_b_) to chiefs, and (_c_) to the dead; the material
 for our investigation is taken from the excellent collection of J. G.
 Frazer in his great work, _The Golden Bough_[45].
 
 
 (_A_) THE TREATMENT OF ENEMIES
 
 Inclined as we may have been to ascribe to savage and semi-savage races
 uninhibited and remorseless cruelty towards their enemies, it is of
 great interest to us to learn that with them, too, the killing of a
 person compels the observation of a series of rules which are associated
 with taboo customs. These rules are easily brought under four groups;
 they demand 1. reconciliation with the slain enemy, 2. restrictions, 3.
 acts of expiation, and purifications of the manslayer, and 4. certain
 ceremonial rites. The incomplete reports do not allow us to decide with
 certainty how general or how isolated such taboo customs may be among
 these races, but this is a matter of indifference as far as our interest
 in these occurrences is concerned. Still, it may be assumed that we are
 dealing with widespread customs and not with isolated peculiarities.
 
 The reconciliation customs practised on the island of Timor, after a
 victorious band of warriors has returned with the severed heads of the
 vanquished enemy, are especially significant because the leader of the
 expedition is subject to heavy additional restrictions. At the solemn
 entry of the victors, sacrifices are made to conciliate the souls of the
 enemy; otherwise one would have to expect harm to come to the victors.
 A dance is given and a song is sung in which the slain enemy is mourned
 and his forgiveness is implored: Be not angry, they say because your
 head is here with us; had we been less lucky, our heads might have been
 exposed in your village. We have offered the sacrifice to appease you.
 Your spirit may now rest and leave us at peace. Why were you our enemy?
 Would it not have been better that we should remain friends? Then your
 blood would not have been spilt and your head would not have been cut
 off[46].
 
 Similar customs are found among the Palu in Celebes; the Gallas
 sacrifice to the spirits of their dead enemies before they return to
 their home villages[47].
 
 Other races have found methods of making friends, guardians and
 protectors out of their former enemies after they are dead. This
 consists in the tender treatment of the severed heads, of which many
 wild tribes of Borneo boast. When the See-Dayaks of Sarawak bring home a
 head from a war expedition, they treat it for months with the greatest
 kindness and courtesy and address it with the most endearing names in
 their language. The best morsels from their meals are put into its
 mouth, together with titbits and cigars. The dead enemy is repeatedly
 entreated to hate his former friends and to bestow his love upon his new
 hosts because he has now become one of them. It would be a great mistake
 to think that any derision is attached to this treatment, horrible
 though it may seem to us[48].
 
 Observers have been struck by the mourning for the enemy after he is
 slain and scalped, among several of the wild tribe of North America.
 When a Choctaw had killed an enemy he began a months mourning during
 which he submitted himself to serious restrictions. The Dakota Indians
 mourned in the same way. One authority mentions that the Osaga Indians
 after mourning for their own dead mourned for their foes as if they had
 been friends[49].
 
 Before proceeding to the other classes of taboo customs for the
 treatment of enemies, we must define our position in regard to a
 pertinent objection. Both Frazer as well as other authorities may well
 be quoted against us to show that the motive for these rules of
 reconciliation is quite simple and has nothing to do with ambivalence.
 These races are dominated by a superstitious fear of the spirits of the
 slain, a fear which was also familiar to classical antiquity, and which
 the great British dramatist brought upon the stage in the hallucinations
 of Macbeth and Richard the Third. From this superstition all the
 reconciliation rules as well as the restrictions and expiations which we
 shall discuss later can be logically deduced; moreover, the ceremonies
 included in the fourth group also argue for this interpretation, since
 the only explanation of which they admit is the effort to drive away the
 spirits of the slain which pursue the manslayers[50]. Besides, the
 savages themselves directly admit their fear for the spirits of their
 slain foes and trace back the taboo customs under discussion to this
 fear.
 
 This objection is certainly pertinent and if it were adequate as well we
 would gladly spare ourselves the trouble of our attempt to find a
 further explanation. We postpone the consideration of this objection
 until later and for the present merely contrast it to the interpretation
 derived from our previous discussion of taboo. All these rules of taboo
 lead us to conclude that other impulses besides those that are merely
 hostile find expression in the behaviour towards enemies. We see in them
 manifestations of repentance, of regard for the enemy, and of a bad
 conscience for having slain him. It seems that the commandment, Thou
 shalt not slay, which could not be violated without punishment, existed
 also among these savages, long before any legislation was received from
 the hands of a god.
 
 We now return to the remaining classes of taboo rules. The
 _restrictions_ laid upon the victorious manslayer are unusually frequent
 and are mostly of a serious nature. In Timor (compare the reconciliation
 customs mentioned above) the leader of the expedition cannot return to
 his house under any circumstances. A special hut is erected for him in
 which he spends two months engaged in the observance of various rules of
 purification. During this period he may not see his wife or nourish
 himself; another person must put his food in his mouth.[51] Among some
 Dayak tribes warriors returning from a successful expedition must remain
 sequestered for several days and abstain from certain foods; they may
 not touch iron and must remain away from their wives. In Logea, an
 island near New Guinea, men who have killed an enemy or have taken part
 in the killing, lock themselves up in their houses for a week. They
 avoid every intercourse with their wives and friends, they do not touch
 their victuals with their hands and live on nothing but vegetable foods
 which are cooked for them in special dishes. As a reason for this last
 restriction it is alleged that they must smell the blood of the slain,
 otherwise they would sicken and die. Among the Toaripi-or
 Motumotu-tribes in New Guinea a manslayer must not approach his wife and
 must not touch his food with his fingers. A second person must feed him
 with special food. This continues until the next new moon.
 
 I avoid the complete enumeration of all the cases of restrictions of the
 victorious slayer mentioned by Frazer, and emphasize only such cases in
 which the character of taboo is especially noticeable or where the
 restriction appears in connection with expiation, purification and
 ceremonial.
 
 Among the Monumbos in German New Guinea a man who has killed an enemy in
 combat becomes unclean, the same word being employed which is applied
 to women during menstruation or confinement. For a considerable period
 he is not allowed to leave the mens club-house, while the inhabitants
 of his village gather about him and celebrate his victory with songs and
 dances. He must not touch any one, not even his wife and children; if he
 did so they would be afflicted with boils. He finally becomes clean
 through washing and other ceremonies.
 
 Among the Natchez in North America young warriors who had procured their
 first scalp were bound for six months to the observance of certain
 renunciations. They were not allowed to sleep with their wives or to eat
 meat, and received only fish and maize pudding as nourishment. When a
 Choctaw had killed and scalped an enemy he began a period of mourning
 for one month, during which he was not allowed to comb his hair. When
 his head itched he was not allowed to scratch it with his hand but used
 a small stick for this purpose.
 
 After a Pima Indian had killed an Apache he had to submit himself to
 severe ceremonies of purification and expiation. During a fasting period
 of sixteen days he was not allowed to touch meat or salt, to look at a
 fire or to speak to any one. He lived alone in the woods, where he was
 waited upon by an old woman who brought him a small allowance of food;
 he often bathed in the nearest river, and carried a lump of clay on his
 head as a sign of mourning. On the seventeenth day there took place a
 public ceremony through which he and his weapons were solemnly purified.
 As the Pima Indians took the manslayer taboo much more seriously than
 their enemies and, unlike them, did not postpone expiation and
 purification until the end of the expedition, their prowess in war
 suffered very much through their moral severity or what might be called
 their piety. In spite of their extraordinary bravery they proved to be
 unsatisfactory allies to the Americans in their wars against the
 Apaches.
 
 The detail and variations of these expiatory and purifying ceremonies
 after the killing of an enemy would be most interesting for purposes of
 a more searching study, but I need not enumerate any more of them here
 because they cannot furnish us with any new points of view. I might
 mention that the temporary or permanent isolation of the professional
 executioner, which was maintained up to our time, is a case in point.
 The position of the free-holder in medival society really conveys a
 good idea of the taboo of savages[52].
 
 The current explanation of all these rules of reconciliation,
 restriction, expiation and purification, combines two principles,
 namely, the extension of the taboo of the dead to everything that has
 come into contact with him, and the fear of the spirit of the slain. In
 what combination these two elements are to explain the ceremonial,
 whether they are to be considered as of equal value or whether one of
 them is primary and the other secondary, and which one, is nowhere
 stated, nor would this be an easy matter to decide. In contradistinction
 to all this we emphasize the unity which our interpretation gains by
 deducing all these rules from the ambivalence of the emotion of savages
 towards their enemies.
 
 
 (_B_) THE TABOO OF RULERS
 
 The behaviour of primitive races towards their chiefs, kings, and
 priests, is controlled by two principles which seem rather to supplement
 than to contradict each other. They must both be guarded and be guarded
 against[53].
 
 Both objects are accomplished through innumerable rules of taboo. Why
 one must guard against rulers is already known to us; because they are
 the bearers of that mysterious and dangerous magic power which
 communicates itself by contact, like an electric charge, bringing death
 and destruction to any one not protected by a similar charge. All direct
 or indirect contact with this dangerous sacredness is therefore avoided,
 and where it cannot be avoided a ceremonial has been found to ward off
 the dreaded consequences. The Nubas in East Africa, for instance,
 believe that they must die if they enter the house of their
 priest-king, but that they escape this danger if, on entering, they bare
 the left shoulder and induce the king to touch it with his hand. Thus we
 have the remarkable case of the kings touch becoming the healing and
 protective measure against the very dangers that arise from contact with
 the king; but it is probably a question of the healing power of the
 intentional touching on the kings part in contradistinction to the
 danger of touching him, in other words, of the opposition between
 passivity and activity towards the king.
 
 Where the healing power of the royal touch is concerned we do not have
 to look for examples among savages. In comparatively recent times the
 kings of England exercised this power upon scrofula, whence it was
 called The Kings Evil. Neither Queen Elizabeth nor any of her
 successors renounced this part of the royal prerogative. Charles I is
 said to have healed a hundred sufferers at one time, in the year 1633.
 Under his dissolute son Charles II, after the great English revolution
 had passed, royal healings of scrofula attained their greatest vogue.
 
 This king is said to have touched close to a hundred thousand victims of
 scrofula in the course of his reign. The crush of those seeking to be
 cured used to be so great that on one occasion six or seven patients
 suffered death by suffocation instead of being healed. The sceptical
 king of Orange, William III, who became king of England after the
 banishment of the Stuarts, refused to exercise the spell; on the one
 occasion when he consented to practise the touch, he did so with words:
 May God give you better health and more sense[54].
 
 The following account will bear witness to the terrible effect of
 touching by virtue of which a person, even though unintentionally,
 becomes active against his king or against what belongs to him. A chief
 of high rank and great holiness in New Zealand happened to leave the
 remains of his meal by the roadside. A young slave came along, a strong
 healthy fellow, who saw what was left over and started to eat it. Hardly
 had he finished when a horrified spectator informed him of his offence
 in eating the meal of the chief. The man had been a strong, brave
 warrior, but as soon as he heard this he collapsed and was afflicted by
 terrible convulsions, from which he died towards sunset of the following
 day[55]. A Maori woman ate a certain fruit and then learned that it came
 from a place on which there was a taboo. She cried out that the spirit
 of the chief whom she had thus offended would surely kill her. This
 incident occurred in the afternoon, and on the next day at twelve
 oclock she was dead[56]. The tinder box of a Maori chief once cost
 several persons their lives. The chief had lost it, and those who found
 it used it to light their pipes. When they learned whose property the
 tinder box was they all died of fright[57].
 
 It is hardly astonishing that the need was felt to isolate dangerous
 persons like chiefs and priests, by building a wall around them which
 made them inaccessible to others. We surmise that this wall, which
 originally was constructed out of taboo rules, still exists to-day in
 the form of court ceremony.
 
 But probably the greater part of this taboo of the rulers cannot be
 traced back to the need of guarding against them. The other point of
 view in the treatment of privileged persons, the need of guarding them
 from dangers with which they are threatened, has had a distinct share in
 the creation of taboo and therefore of the origin of court etiquette.
 
 The necessity of guarding the king from every conceivable danger arises
 from his great importance for the weal and woe of his subjects. Strictly
 speaking, he is a person who regulates the course of the world; his
 people have to thank him not only for rain and sunshine, which allow the
 fruits of the earth to grow, but also for the wind which brings the
 ships to their shores and for the solid ground on which they set their
 feet[58].
 
 These savage kings are endowed with a wealth of power and an ability to
 bestow happiness which only gods possess; certainly in later stages of
 civilization none but the most servile courtiers would play the
 hypocrite to the extent of crediting their sovereigns with the
 possession of attributes similar to these.
 
 It seems like an obvious contradiction that persons of such perfection
 of power should themselves require the greatest care to guard them
 against threatening dangers, but this is not the only contradiction
 revealed in the treatment of royal persons on the part of savages. These
 races consider it necessary to watch over their kings to see that they
 use their powers in the right way; they are by no means sure of their
 good intentions or of their conscientiousness. A strain of mistrust is
 mingled with the motivation of the taboo rules for the king. The idea
 that early kingdoms are despotisms, says Frazer[59], in which the
 people exist only for the sovereign, is wholly inapplicable to the
 monarchies we are considering. On the contrary, the sovereign in them
 exists only for his subjects: his life is only valuable so long as he
 discharges the duties of his position by ordering the course of nature
 for his peoples benefit. So soon as he fails to do so, the care, the
 devotion, the religious homage which they had hitherto lavished on him
 cease and are changed into hatred and contempt; he is ignominiously
 dismissed and may be thankful if he escapes with his life. Worshipped as
 a god one day, he is killed as a criminal the next. But in this changed
 behaviour of the people there is nothing capricious or inconsistent. On
 the contrary, their conduct is quite consistent. If their king is their
 god he is or should be, also their preserver; and if he will not
 preserve them he must make room for another who will. So long, however,
 as he answers their expectations, there is no limit to the care which
 they take of him, and which they compel him to take of himself. A king
 of this sort lives hedged in by ceremonious etiquette, a network of
 prohibitions and observances, of which the intention is not to
 contribute to his dignity, much less to his comfort, but to restrain him
 from conduct which, by disturbing the harmony of nature, might involve
 himself, his people, and the universe in one common catastrophe. Far
 from adding to his comfort, these observances, by trammelling his every
 act, annihilate his freedom and often render the very life, which it is
 their object to preserve, a burden and sorrow to him.
 
 One of the most glaring examples of thus fettering and paralysing a holy
 ruler through taboo ceremonial seems to have been reached in the life
 routine of the Mikado of Japan, as it existed in earlier centuries. A
 description which is now over two hundred years old[60] relates: He
 thinks that it would be very prejudicial to his dignity and holiness to
 touch the ground with his feet; for this reason when he intends to go
 anywhere, he must be carried thither on mens shoulders. Much less will
 they suffer that he should expose his sacred person to the open air, and
 the sun is not thought worthy to shine on his head. There is such a
 holiness ascribed to all the parts of his body that he dares to cut off
 neither his hair, nor his beard, nor his nails. However, lest he should
 grow too dirty, they may clean him in the night when he is asleep;
 because they say that what is taken from his body at that time, hath
 been stolen from him, and that such a theft does not prejudice his
 holiness or dignity. In ancient times, he was obliged to sit on the
 throne for some hours every morning, with the imperial crown on his
 head; but to sit altogether like a statue without stirring either hands
 or feet, head or eyes, nor indeed any part of his body, because by this
 means it was thought that he could preserve peace and tranquillity in
 his empire; for if unfortunately, he turned himself on one side or
 other, or if he looked a good while towards any part of his dominion, it
 was apprehended that war, famine, fire or some other great misfortune
 was near at hand to desolate the country.
 
 Some of the taboos to which barbarian kings are subject vividly recall
 the restrictions placed on murderers. On Shark Point at Cape Padron in
 Lower Guinea (West Africa), a priest-king called Kukulu lives alone in a
 woods. He is not allowed to touch a woman or to leave his house and
 cannot even rise out of his chair, in which he must sleep in a sitting
 position. If he should lie down the wind would cease and shipping would
 be disturbed. It is his function to keep storms in check, and in
 general, to see to an even, healthy condition of the atmosphere[61]. The
 more powerful a king of Loango is, says Bastian, the more taboos he must
 observe. The heir to the throne is also bound to them from childhood on;
 they accumulate about him while he is growing up, and by the time of
 his accession he is suffocated by them.
 
 Our interest in the matter does not require us to take up more space to
 describe more fully the taboos that cling to royal and priestly dignity.
 We merely add that restrictions as to freedom of movement and diet play
 the main rle among them. But two examples of taboo ceremonial taken
 from civilized nations, and therefore from much higher stages of
 culture, will indicate to what an extent association with these
 privileged persons tends to preserve ancient customs.
 
 The Flamen _Dialis_, the high-priest of Jupiter in Rome, had to observe
 an extraordinarily large number of taboo rules. He was not allowed to
 ride, to see a horse or an armed man, to wear a ring that was not
 broken, to have a knot in his garments, to touch wheat flour or leaven,
 or even to mention by name a goat, a dog, raw meat, beans and ivy; his
 hair could only be cut by a free man and with a bronze knife, his hair
 combings and nail parings had to be buried under a lucky tree; he could
 not touch the dead, go into the open with bare head, and similar
 prohibitions. His wife, the Flaminica, also had her own prohibitions:
 she was not allowed to ascend more than three steps on a certain kind of
 stairs and on certain holidays she could not comb her hair; the leather
 for her shoes could not be taken from any animal that had died a
 natural death but only from one that had been slaughtered or sacrificed;
 when she heard thunder she was unclean until she had made an expiatory
 sacrifice[62].
 
 The old kings of Ireland were subject to a series of very curious
 restrictions, the observance of which was expected to bring every
 blessing to the country while their violation entailed every form of
 evil. The complete description of these taboos is given in the _Book of
 Rights_, of which the oldest manuscript copies bear the dates 1890 and
 1418. The prohibitions are very detailed and concern certain activities
 at specified places and times; in some cities, for instance, the king
 cannot stay on a certain day of the week, while at some specified hour
 this or that river may not be crossed, or again there is a plane on
 which he cannot camp a full nine days, etc.[63]
 
 Among many savage races the severity of the taboo restrictions for the
 priest-kings has had results of historic importance which are especially
 interesting from our point of view. The honour of being a priest-king
 ceased to be desirable; the person in line for the succession often used
 every means to escape it. Thus in Combodscha, where there is a fire and
 water king, it is often necessary to use force to compel the successor
 to accept the honour. On Niue or Savage Island, a coral island in the
 Pacific Ocean, monarchy actually came to an end because nobody was
 willing to undertake the responsible and dangerous office. In some parts
 of West Africa a general council is held after the death of the king to
 determine upon the successor. The man on whom the choice falls is
 seized, tied and kept in custody in the fetish house until he has
 declared himself willing to accept the crown. Sometimes the presumptive
 successor to the throne finds ways and means to avoid the intended
 honour; thus it is related of a certain chief that he used to go armed
 day and night and resist by force every attempt to place him on the
 throne[64]. Among the negroes of Sierra Leone the resistance against
 accepting the kingly honour was so great that most of the tribes were
 compelled to make strangers their kings.
 
 Frazer makes these conditions responsible for the fact that in the
 development of history a separation of the original priest-kingship into
 a spiritual and a secular power finally took place. Kings, crushed by
 the burden of their holiness, became incapable of exercising their power
 over real things and had to leave this to inferior but executive persons
 who were willing to renounce the honours of royal dignity. From these
 there grew up the secular rulers, while the spiritual over-lordship,
 which was now of no practical importance, was left to the former taboo
 kings. It is well known to what extent this hypothesis finds
 confirmation in the history of old Japan.
 
 A survey of the picture of the relations of primitive peoples to their
 rulers gives rise to the expectation that our advance from description
 to psychoanalytic understanding will not be difficult. These relations
 are of an involved nature and are not free from contradictions. Rulers
 are granted great privileges which are practically cancelled by taboo
 prohibitions in regard to other privileges. They are privileged persons,
 they can do or enjoy what is withheld from the rest through taboo. But
 in contrast to this freedom they are restricted by other taboos which do
 not affect the ordinary individual. Here, therefore, is the first
 contrast, which amounts almost to a contradiction, between an excess of
 freedom and an excess of restriction as applied to the same persons.
 They are credited with extraordinary magic powers, and contact with
 their person or their property is therefore feared, while on the other
 hand the most beneficial effect is expected from these contacts. This
 seems to be a second and an especially glaring contradiction; but we
 have already learned that it is only apparent. The kings touch,
 exercised by him with benevolent intention, heals and protects; it is
 only when a common man touches the king or his royal effects that the
 contact becomes dangerous, and this is probably because the act may
 recall aggressive tendencies. Another contradiction which is not so
 easily solved is expressed in the fact that great power over the
 processes of nature is ascribed to the ruler and yet the obligation is
 felt to guard him with especial care against threatening dangers, as if
 his own power, which can do so much, were incapable of accomplishing
 this. A further difficulty in the relation arises because there is no
 confidence that the ruler will use his tremendous power to the advantage
 of his subjects as well as for his own protection; he is therefore
 distrusted and surveillance over him is considered to be justified. The
 taboo etiquette, to which the life of the king is subject,
 simultaneously serves all these objects of exercising a tutelage over
 the king, of guarding him against dangers and of guarding his subjects
 against danger which he brings to them.
 
 We are inclined to give the following explanation of the complicated and
 contradictory relation of the primitive peoples to their rulers. Through
 superstition as well as through other motives, various tendencies find
 expression in the treatment of kings, each of which is developed to the
 extreme without regard to the other. As a result of this, contradictions
 arise at which the intellect of savages takes no more offence than a
 highly civilized person would as long as it is only a question of
 religious matters or of loyalty.
 
 That would be so far so good; but the psychoanalytic technique may
 enable us to penetrate more deeply into the matter and to add something
 about the nature of these various tendencies. If we subject the facts as
 stated to analysis, just as if they formed the symptoms of a neurosis,
 our first attention would be directed to the excess of anxious worry
 which is said to be the cause of the taboo ceremonial. The occurrence of
 such excessive tenderness is very common in the neurosis and especially
 in the compulsion neurosis upon which we are drawing primarily for our
 comparison. We now thoroughly understand the origin of this tenderness.
 It occurs wherever, besides the predominant tenderness, there exists a
 contrary but unconscious stream of hostility, that is to say, wherever
 the typical case of an ambivalent affective attitude is realized. The
 hostility is then cried down by an excessive increase of tenderness
 which is expressed as anxiety and becomes compulsive because otherwise
 it would not suffice for its task of keeping the unconscious opposition
 in a state of repression. Every psychoanalyst knows how infallibly this
 anxious excess of tenderness can be resolved even under the most
 improbable circumstances, as for instance, when it appears between
 mother and child, or in the case of affectionate married people. Applied
 to the treatment of privileged persons this theory of an ambivalent
 feeling would reveal that their veneration, their very deification, is
 opposed in the unconscious by an intense hostile tendency, so that, as
 we had expected, the situation of an ambivalent feeling is here
 realized. The distrust which certainly seems to contribute to the
 motivation of the royal taboo, would be another direct manifestation of
 the same unconscious hostility. Indeed the ultimate issues of this
 conflict show such a diversity among different races that we would not
 be at a loss for examples in which the proof of such hostility would be
 much easier. We learn from Frazer[65] that the savage Timmes of Sierra
 Leone reserve the right to administer a beating to their elected king on
 the evening before his coronation, and that they make use of this
 constitutional right with such thoroughness that the unhappy ruler
 sometimes does not long survive his accession to the throne; for this
 reason the leaders of the race have made it a rule to elect some man
 against whom they have a particular grudge. Nevertheless, even in such
 glaring cases the hostility is not acknowledged as such, but is
 expressed as if it were a ceremonial.
 
 Another trait in the attitude of primitive races towards their rulers
 recalls a mechanism which is universally present in mental disturbances,
 and is openly revealed in the so-called delusions of persecution. Here
 the importance of a particular person is extraordinarily heightened and
 his omnipotence is raised to the improbable in order to make it easier
 to attribute to him the responsibility for everything painful which
 happens to the patient. Savages really do not act differently towards
 their rulers when they ascribe to them power over rain and shine, wind
 and weather, and then dethrone or kill them because nature has
 disappointed their expectation of a good hunt or a ripe harvest. The
 prototype which the paranoiac reconstructs in his persecution mania, is
 found in the relation of the child to its father. Such omnipotence is
 regularly attributed to the father in the imagination of the son, and
 distrust of the father has been shown to be intimately connected with
 the highest esteem for him. When a paranoiac names a person of his
 acquaintance as his persecutor, he thereby elevates him to the
 paternal succession and brings him under conditions which enable him to
 make him responsible for all the misfortune which he experiences. Thus
 this second analogy between the savage and the neurotic may allow us to
 surmise how much in the relation of the savage to his ruler arises from
 the infantile attitude of the child to its father.
 
 But the strongest support for our point of view, which seeks to compare
 taboo prohibitions with neurotic symptoms, is to be found in the taboo
 ceremonial itself, the significance of which for the status of kinship
 has already been the subject of our previous discussion. This ceremonial
 unmistakably reveals its double meaning and its origin from ambivalent
 tendencies if only we are willing to assume that the effects it produces
 are those which it intended from the very beginning. It not only
 distinguishes kings and elevates them above all ordinary mortals, but it
 also makes their life a torture and an unbearable burden and forces them
 into a thraldom which is far worse than that of their subjects. It would
 thus be the correct counterpart to the compulsive action of the
 neurosis, in which the suppressed impulse and the impulse which
 suppresses it meet in mutual and simultaneous satisfaction. The
 compulsive action is nominally a protection against the forbidden
 action; but we would say that actually it is a repetition of what is
 forbidden. The word nominally is here applied to the conscious whereas
 the word actually applies to the unconscious instance of the psychic
 life. Thus also the taboo ceremonial of kings is nominally an expression
 of the highest veneration and a means of guarding them; actually it is
 the punishment for their elevation, the revenge which their subjects
 take upon them. The experiences which Cervantes makes Sancho Panza
 undergo as governor on his island have evidently made him recognize this
 interpretation of courtly ceremonial as the only correct one. It is very
 possible that this point would be corroborated if we could induce kings
 and rulers of to-day to express themselves on this point.
 
 Why the emotional attitude towards rulers should contain such a strong
 unconscious share of hostility is a very interesting problem which,
 however, exceeds the scope of this book. We have already referred to the
 infantile father-complex; we may add that an investigation of the early
 history of kingship would bring the decisive explanations. Frazer has an
 impressive discussion of the theory that the first kings were strangers
 who, after a short reign, were destined to be sacrificed at solemn
 festivals as representatives of the deity; but Frazer himself does not
 consider his facts altogether convincing[66]. Christian myths are said
 to have been still influenced by the after-effects of this evolution of
 kings.
 
 
 (_C_) THE TABOO OF THE DEAD
 
 We know that the dead are mighty rulers: we may be surprised to learn
 that they are regarded as enemies.
 
 Among most primitive people the taboo of the dead displays, if we may
 keep to our infection analogy, a peculiar virulence. It manifests itself
 in the first place, in the consequences which result from contact with
 the dead, and in the treatment of the mourners for the dead. Among the
 Maori any one who had touched a corpse or who had taken part in its
 interment, became extremely unclean and was almost cut off from
 intercourse with his fellow beings; he was, as we say, boycotted. He
 could not enter a house, or approach persons or objects without
 infecting them with the same properties. He could not even touch his
 food with his own hands, which were now unclean and therefore quite
 useless to him. His food was put on the ground and he had no alternative
 except to seize it as best he could, with his lips and teeth, while he
 held his hands behind on his back. Occasionally he could be fed by
 another person who helped him to his food with outstretched arms so as
 not to touch the unfortunate one himself, but this assistant was then in
 turn subjected to almost equally oppressive restrictions. Almost every
 village contained some altogether disreputable individual, ostracized by
 society, whose wretched existence depended upon peoples charity. This
 creature alone was allowed within arms length of a person who had
 fulfilled the last duty towards the deceased. But as soon as the period
 of segregation was over and the person rendered unclean through the
 corpse could again mingle with his fellow-beings, all the dishes which
 he had used during the dangerous period were broken and all his clothing
 was thrown away.
 
 The taboo customs after bodily contact with the dead are the same all
 over Polynesia, in Melanesia, and in a part of Africa; their most
 constant feature is the prohibition against handling ones food and the
 consequent necessity of being fed by somebody else. It is noteworthy
 that in Polynesia, or perhaps only in Hawaii[67], priest-kings were
 subject to the same restrictions during the exercise of holy functons.
 In the taboo of the dead on the Island of Tonga the abatement and
 gradual abolition of the prohibitions through the individuals own
 taboo power are clearly shown. A person who touched the corpse of a dead
 chieftain was unclean for ten months; but if he was himself a chief, he
 was unclean for only three, four, or five months, according to the rank
 of the deceased; if it was the corpse of the idolized head-chief even
 the greatest chiefs became taboo for ten months. These savages are so
 certain that any one who violates these taboo rules must become
 seriously ill and die, that according to the opinion of an observer,
 they have never yet dared to convince themselves of the contrary[68].
 
 The taboo restrictions imposed upon persons whose contact with the dead
 is to be understood in the transferred sense, namely the mourning
 relatives such as widows and widowers, are essentially the same as those
 mentioned above, but they are of greater interest for the point we are
 trying to make. In the rules hitherto mentioned we see only the typical
 expression of the virulence and power of diffusion of the taboo; in
 those about to be cited we catch a gleam of the motives, including both
 the ostensible ones and those which may be regarded as the underlying
 and genuine motives.
 
 Among the Shuswap in British-Columbia widows and widowers have to
 remain segregated during their period of mourning; they must not use
 their hands to touch the body or the head and all utensils used by them
 must not be used by any one else. No hunter will want to approach the
 hut in which such mourners live, for that would bring misfortune; if the
 shadow of one of the mourners should fall on him he would become ill.
 The mourners sleep on thorn bushes, with which they also surround their
 beds. This last precaution is meant to keep off the spirit of the
 deceased; plainer still is the reported custom of other North American
 tribes where the widow, after the death of her husband, has to wear a
 kind of trousers of dried grass in order to make herself inaccessible to
 the approach of the spirit. Thus it is quite obvious that touching in
 the transferred sense is after all understood only as bodily contact,
 since the spirit of the deceased does not leave his kin and does not
 desist from hovering about them, during the period of mourning.
 
 Among the Agutainos, who live on Palawan, one of the Philippine Islands,
 a widow may not leave her hut for the first seven or eight days after
 her husbands death, except at night, when she need not expect
 encounters. Whoever sees her is in danger of immediate death and
 therefore she herself warns others of her approach by hitting the trees
 with a wooden stick with every step she takes; these trees all wither.
 Another observation explains the nature of the danger inherent in a
 widow. In the district of Mekeo, British New Guinea, a widower forfeits
 all civil rights and lives like an outlaw. He may not tend a garden, or
 show himself in public, or enter the village or go on the street. He
 slinks about like an animal, in the high grass or in the bushes, and
 must hide in a thicket if he sees anybody, especially a woman,
 approaching. This last hint makes it easy for us to trace back the
 danger of the widower or widow to the danger of temptation. The husband
 who has lost his wife must evade the desire for a substitute; the widow
 has to contend with the same wish, and beside this, she may arouse the
 desire of other men because she is without a master. Every such
 satisfaction through a substitute runs contrary to the intention of
 mourning and would cause the anger of the spirit to flare up[69].
 
 One of the most surprising, but at the same time one of the most
 instructive taboo customs of mourning among primitive races is the
 prohibition against pronouncing the _name_ of the deceased. This is
 very widespread, and has been subjected to many modifications with
 important consequences.
 
 Aside from the Australians and the Polynesians, who usually show us
 taboo customs in their best state of preservation, we also find this
 prohibition among races so far apart and unrelated to each other as the
 Samojedes in Siberia and the Todas in South India, the Mongolians of
 Tartary and the Tuaregs of the Sahara, the Aino of Japan and the Akamba
 and Nandi in Central Africa, the Tinguanes in the Philippines and the
 inhabitants of the Nikobari Islands and of Madagascar and Borneo[70].
 Among some of these races the prohibition and its consequences hold good
 only for the period of mourning while in others it remains permanent;
 but in all cases it seems to diminish with the lapse of time after the
 death.
 
 The avoidance of the name of the deceased is as a rule kept up with
 extraordinary severity. Thus, among many South American tribes, it is
 considered the gravest insult to the survivors to pronounce the name of
 the deceased in their presence, and the penalty set for it is no less
 than that for the slaying itself[71]. At first it is not easy to guess
 why the mention of the name should be so abominated, but the dangers
 associated with it have called into being a whole series of interesting
 and important expedients to avoid this. Thus the Masai in Africa have
 hit upon the evasion of changing the name of the deceased immediately
 upon his death; he may now be mentioned without dread by this new name,
 while all the prohibitions remain attached to the old name. It seems to
 be assumed that the ghost does not know his new name and will not find
 it out. The Australian tribes on Adelaide and Encounter Bay are so
 consistently cautious that when a death occurs almost every person who
 has the same name as the deceased or a very similar one, exchanges it
 for another. Sometimes by a further extension of the same idea as seen
 among several tribes in Victoria and in North America all the relatives
 of the deceased change their names regardless of whether their names
 resemble the name of the deceased in sound. Among the Guaycuru in
 Paraguay the chief used to give new names to all the members of the
 tribe, on such sad occasions, which they then remembered as if they had
 always had them[72].
 
 Furthermore, if the deceased had the same name as an animal or object,
 etc., some of the races just enumerated thought it necessary to give
 these animals and objects new names, in order not to be reminded of the
 deceased when they mentioned them. Through this there must have resulted
 a never ceasing change of vocabulary, which caused a good deal of
 difficulty for the missionaries, especially where the interdiction upon
 a name was permanent. In the seven years which the missionary
 Dobrizhofer spent among the Abipons in Paraguay, the name for jaguar was
 changed three times and the words for crocodile, thorns and animal
 slaughter underwent a similar fate[73]. But the dread of pronouncing a
 name which has belonged to a deceased person extends also to the mention
 of everything in which the deceased had any part, and a further
 important result of this process of suppression is that these races have
 no tradition or any historical reminiscences, so that we encounter the
 greatest difficulties in investigating their past history. Among a
 number of these primitive races compensating customs have also been
 established in order to re-awaken the names of the deceased after a long
 period of mourning; they are bestowed upon children who were regarded as
 reincarnations of the dead.
 
 The strangeness of this taboo on names diminishes if we bear in mind
 that the savage looks upon his name as an essential part and an
 important possession of his personality, and that he ascribes the full
 significance of things to words. Our children do the same, as I have
 shown elsewhere, and therefore they are never satisfied with accepting a
 meaningless verbal similarity, but consistently conclude that when two
 things have identical names a deeper correspondence between them must
 exist. Numerous peculiarities of normal behaviour may lead civilized man
 to conclude that he too is not yet as far removed as he thinks from
 attributing the importance of things to mere names and feeling that his
 name has become peculiarly identified with his person. This is
 corroborated by psychoanalytic experiences, where there is much occasion
 to point out the importance of names in unconscious thought
 activity[74]. As was to be expected, the compulsion neurotics behave
 just like savages in regard to names. They show the full complex
 sensitiveness towards the utterance and hearing of special words (as do
 also other neurotics) and derive a good many, often serious, inhibitions
 from their treatment of their own name. One of these taboo patients whom
 I knew, had adopted the avoidance of writing down her name for fear that
 it might get into somebodys hands who thus would come into possession
 of a piece of her personality. In her frenzied faithfulness, which she
 needed to protect herself against the temptations of her phantasy, she
 had created for herself the commandment, not to give away anything of
 her personality. To this belonged first of all her name, then by
 further application her hand-writing, so that she finally gave up
 writing.
 
 Thus it no longer seems strange to us that savages should consider a
 dead persons name as a part of his personality and that it should be
 subjected to the same taboo as the deceased. Calling a dead person by
 name can also be traced back to contact with him, so that we can turn
 our attention to the more inclusive problem of why this contact is
 visited with such a severe taboo.
 
 The nearest explanation would point to the natural horror which a corpse
 inspires, especially in view of the changes so soon noticeable after
 death. Mourning for a dead person must also be considered as a
 sufficient motive for everything which has reference to him. But horror
 of the corpse evidently does not cover all the details of taboo rules,
 and mourning can never explain to us why the mention of the dead is a
 severe insult to his survivors. On the contrary, mourning loves to
 preoccupy itself with the deceased, to elaborate his memory, and
 preserve it for the longest possible time. Something besides mourning
 must be made responsible for the peculiarities of taboo customs,
 something which evidently serves a different purpose. It is this very
 taboo on names which reveals this still unknown motive, and if the
 customs did not tell us about it we would find it out from the
 statements of the mourning savages themselves.
 
 For they do not conceal the fact that they fear the presence and the
 return of the spirit of a dead person; they practise a host of
 ceremonies to keep him off and banish him[75]. They look upon the
 mention of his name as a conjuration which must result in his immediate
 presence[76]. They therefore consistently do everything to avoid
 conjuring and awakening a dead person. They disguise themselves in order
 that the spirit may not recognize them[77], they distort either his name
 or their own, and become infuriated when a ruthless stranger incites the
 spirit against his survivors by mentioning his name. We can hardly avoid
 the conclusion that they suffer, according to Wundts expression, from
 the fear of his soul now turned into a demon,[78].
 
 With this understanding we approach Wundts conception who, as we have
 heard, sees the nature of taboo in the fear of demons.
 
 The assumption which this theory makes, namely, that immediately after
 death the beloved member of a family becomes a demon, from whom the
 survivors have nothing but hostility to expect, so that they must
 protect themselves by every means from his evil desires, is so peculiar
 that our first impulse is not to believe it. Yet almost all competent
 authors agree as to this interpretation of primitive races.
 Westermarck[79], who, in my opinion, gives altogether too little
 consideration to taboo, makes this statement: On the whole facts lead
 me to conclude that the dead are more frequently regarded as enemies
 than as friends and that Jevons and Grant Allen are wrong in their
 assertion that it was formerly believed that the malevolence of the dead
 was as a rule directed only against strangers, while they were
 paternally concerned about the life and welfare of their descendants
 and the members of their clan.
 
 R. Kleinpaul has written an impressive book in which he makes use of the
 remnants of the old belief in souls among civilized races to show the
 relation between the living and the dead[80]. According to him too, this
 relation culminates in the conviction that the dead, thirsting for
 blood, draw the living after them. The living did not feel themselves
 safe from the persecutions of the dead until a body of water had been
 put between them. That is why it was preferred to bury the dead on
 islands or to bring them to the other side of a river: the expressions
 here and beyond originated in this way. Later moderation has
 restricted the malevolence of the dead to those categories where a
 peculiar right to feel rancour had to be admitted, such as the murdered
 who pursue their murderer as evil spirits, and those who, like brides,
 had died with their longings unsatisfied. Kleinpaul believes that
 originally, however, the dead were all vampires, who bore ill-will to
 the living, and strove to harm them and deprive them of life. It was the
 corpse that first furnished the conception of an evil spirit.
 
 The hypothesis that those whom we love best turn into demons after
 death obviously allows us to put a further question. What prompted
 primitive races to ascribe such a change of sentiment to the beloved
 dead? Why did they make demons out of them? According to Westermarck
 this question is easily answered[81]. As death is usually considered
 the worst calamity that can overtake man, it is believed that the
 deceased are very dissatisfied with their lot. Primitive races believe
 that death comes only through being slain, whether by violence or by
 magic, and this is considered already sufficient reason for the soul to
 be vindictive and irritable. The soul presumably envies the living and
 longs for the company of its former kin; we can therefore understand
 that the soul should seek to kill with them diseases in order to be
 re-united with them....
 
  ...A further explanation of the malevolence ascribed to souls lies in
 the instinctive fear of them, which is itself the result of the fear of
 death.
 
 Our study of psychoneurotic disturbances points to a more comprehensive
 explanation, which includes that of Westermarck.
 
 When a wife loses her husband, or a daughter her mother, it not
 infrequently happens that the survivor is afflicted with tormenting
 scruples, called obsessive reproaches which raises the question
 whether she herself has not been guilty through carelessness or neglect,
 of the death of the beloved person. No recalling of the care with which
 she nursed the invalid, or direct refutation of the asserted guilt can
 put an end to the torture, which is the pathological expression of
 mourning and which in time slowly subsides. Psychoanalytic investigation
 of such cases has made us acquainted with the secret mainsprings of this
 affliction. We have ascertained that these obsessive reproaches are in a
 certain sense justified and therefore are immune to refutation or
 objections. Not that the mourner has really been guilty of the death or
 that she has really been careless, as the obsessive reproach asserts;
 but still there was something in her, a wish of which she herself was
 unaware, which was not displeased with the fact that death came, and
 which would have brought it about sooner had it been strong enough. The
 reproach now reacts against this unconscious wish after the death of the
 beloved person. Such hostility, hidden in the unconscious behind tender
 love, exists in almost all cases of intensive emotional allegiance to a
 particular person, indeed it represents the classic case, the prototype
 of the ambivalence of human emotions. There is always more or less of
 this ambivalence in everybodys disposition; normally it is not strong
 enough to give rise to the obsessive reproaches we have described. But
 where there is abundant predisposition for it, it manifests itself in
 the relation to those we love most, precisely where you would least
 expect it. The disposition to compulsion neurosis which we have so often
 taken for comparison with taboo problems, is distinguished by a
 particularly high degree of this original ambivalence of emotions.
 
 We now know how to explain the supposed demonism of recently departed
 souls and the necessity of being protected against their hostility
 through taboo rules. By assuming a similar high degree of ambivalence in
 the emotional life of primitive races such as psychoanalysis ascribes to
 persons suffering from compulsion neurosis, it becomes comprehensible
 that the same kind of reaction against the hostility latent in the
 unconscious behind the obsessive reproaches of the neurotic should also
 be necessary here after the painful loss has occurred. But this
 hostility which is painfully felt in the unconscious in the form of
 satisfaction with the demise, experiences a different fate in the case
 of primitive man: the defence against it is accomplished by displacement
 upon the object of hostility, namely the dead. We call this defence
 process, frequent both in normal and diseased psychic life, a
 _projection_. The survivor will deny that he has ever entertained
 hostile impulses toward the beloved dead; but now the soul of the
 deceased entertains them and will try to give vent to them during the
 entire period of mourning. In spite of the successful defence through
 projection, the punitive and remorseful character of this emotional
 reaction manifests itself in being afraid, in self-imposed renunciations
 and in subjection to restrictions which are partly disguised as
 protective measures against the hostile demon. Thus we find again that
 taboo has grown out of the soil of an ambivalent emotional attitude. The
 taboo of the dead also originates from the opposition between the
 conscious grief and the unconscious satisfaction at death. If this is
 the origin of the resentment of spirits it is self-evident that just the
 nearest and formerly most beloved survivors have to fear it most.
 
 As in neurotic symptoms, the taboo regulations also evince opposite
 feelings. Their restrictive character expresses mourning, while they
 also betray very clearly what they are trying to conceal, namely, the
 hostility towards the dead, which is now motivated as self-defence. We
 have learnt to understand part of the taboo regulations as temptation
 fears. A dead person is defenceless, which must act as an incitement to
 satisfy hostile desires entertained against him; this temptation has to
 be opposed by the prohibition.
 
 But Westermarck is right in not admitting any difference in the savages
 conception between those who have died by violence and those who have
 died a natural death. As will be shown later[82], in the unconscious
 mode of thinking even a natural death is perceived as murder; the person
 was killed by evil wishes. Any one interested in the origin and meaning
 of dreams dealing with the death of dear relatives such as parents and
 brothers and sisters will find that the same feeling of ambivalence is
 responsible for the fact that the dreamer, the child, and the savage all
 have the same attitude towards the dead[83].
 
 A little while ago we challenged Wundts conception, who explains the
 nature of taboo through the fear of demons, and yet we have just agreed
 with the explanation which traces back the taboo of the dead to a fear
 of the soul of the dead after it has turned into a demon. This seems
 like a contradiction, but it will not be difficult for us to explain it.
 It is true that we have accepted the idea of demons, but we know that
 this assumption is not something final which psychology cannot resolve
 into further elements. We have, as it were, exposed the demons by
 recognizing them as mere projections of hostile feelings which the
 survivor entertains towards the dead.
 
 The double feeling--tenderness and hostility--against the deceased,
 which we consider well founded, endeavours to assert itself at the time
 of bereavement as mourning and satisfaction. A conflict must ensue
 between these contrary feelings, and as one of them, namely the
 hostility, is altogether or for the greater part unconscious, the
 conflict cannot result in a conscious difference in the form of
 hostility or tenderness as, for instance, when we forgive an injury
 inflicted upon us by some one we love. The process usually adjusts
 itself through a special psychic mechanism, which is designated in
 psychoanalysis as _projection_. This unknown hostility, of which we are
 ignorant and of which we do not wish to know, is projected from our
 inner perception into the outer world and is thereby detached from our
 own person and attributed to the other. Not we, the survivors, rejoice
 because we are rid of the deceased, on the contrary, we mourn for him;
 but now, curiously enough, he has become an evil demon who would rejoice
 in our misfortune and who seeks our death. The survivors must now defend
 themselves against this evil enemy; they are freed from inner
 oppression, but they have only succeeded in exchanging it for an
 affliction from without.
 
 It is not to be denied that this process of projection, which turns the
 dead into malevolent enemies, finds some support in the real hostilities
 of the dead which the survivors remember and with which they really can
 reproach the dead. These hostilities are harshness, the desire to
 dominate, injustice, and whatever else forms the background of even the
 most tender relations between men. But the process cannot be so simple
 that this factor alone could explain the origin of demons by projection.
 The offences of the dead certainly motivate in part the hostility of the
 survivors, but they would have been ineffective if they had not given
 rise to this hostility and the occasion of death would surely be the
 least suitable occasion for awakening the memory of the reproaches which
 justly could have been brought against the deceased. We cannot dispense
 with the unconscious hostility as the constant and really impelling
 motive. This hostile tendency towards those nearest and dearest could
 remain latent during their lifetime, that is to say, it could avoid
 betraying itself to consciousness either directly or indirectly through
 any substitutive formation. However, when the person who was
 simultaneously loved and hated died, this was no longer possible, and
 the conflict became acute. The mourning originating from the enhanced
 tenderness, became on the one hand more intolerant of the latent
 hostility, while on the other hand it could not tolerate that the latter
 should not give origin to a feeling of pure gratification. Thus there
 came about the repression of the unconscious hostility through
 projection, and the formation of the ceremonial in which fear of
 punishment by demons finds expression. With the termination of the
 period of mourning, the conflict also loses its acuteness so that the
 taboo of the dead can be abated or sink into oblivion.
 
 
 4
 
 Having thus explained the basis on which the very instructive taboo of
 the dead has grown up, we must not miss the opportunity of adding a few
 observations which may become important for the understanding of taboo
 in general.
 
 The projection of unconscious hostility upon demons in the taboo of the
 dead is only a single example from a whole series of processes to which
 we must grant the greatest influence in the formation of primitive
 psychic life. In the foregoing case the mechanism of projection is used
 to settle an emotional conflict; it serves the same purpose in a large
 number of psychic situations which lead to neuroses. But projection is
 not specially created for the purpose of defence, it also comes into
 being where there are no conflicts. The projection of inner perceptions
 to the outside is a primitive mechanism which, for instance, also
 influences our sense-perceptions, so that it normally has the greatest
 share in shaping our outer world. Under conditions that have not yet
 been sufficiently determined even inner perceptions of ideational and
 emotional processes are projected outwardly, like sense perceptions, and
 are used to shape the outer world, whereas they ought to remain in the
 inner world. This is perhaps genetically connected with the fact that
 the function of attention was originally directed not towards the inner
 world, but to the stimuli streaming in from the outer world, and only
 received reports of pleasure and pain from the endopsychic processes.
 Only with the development of the language of abstract thought through
 the association of sensory remnants of word representations with inner
 processes, did the latter gradually become capable of perception. Before
 this took place primitive man had developed a picture of the outer world
 through the outward projection of inner perceptions, which we, with our
 reinforced conscious perception, must now translate back into
 psychology.
 
 The projection of their own evil impulses upon demons is only a part of
 what has become the world system (Weltanschauung) of primitive man
 which we shall discuss later as animism. We shall then have to
 ascertain the psychological nature of such a system formation and the
 points of support which we shall find in the analysis of these system
 formations will again bring us face to face with the neurosis. For the
 present we merely wish to suggest that the secondary elaboration of
 the dream content is the prototype of all these system formations[84].
 And let us not forget that beginning at the stage of system formation
 there are two origins for every act judged by consciousness, namely the
 systematic, and the real but unconscious origin[85].
 
 Wundt[86] remarks that among the influences which myth everywhere
 ascribes to demons the evil ones preponderate, so that according to the
 religions of races evil demons are evidently older than good demons.
 Now it is quite possible that the whole conception of demons was derived
 from the extremely important relation to the dead. In the further course
 of human development the ambivalence inherent in this relation then
 manifested itself by allowing two altogether contrary psychic formations
 to issue from the same root, namely, the fear of demons and of
 _ghosts_, and the reverence for ancestors[87]. Nothing testifies so much
 to the influence of mourning on the origin of belief in demons as the
 fact that demons were always taken to be the spirits of persons not long
 dead. Mourning has a very distinct psychic task to perform, namely, to
 detach the memories and expectations of the survivors from the dead.
 When this work is accomplished the grief, and with it the remorse and
 reproach, lessens, and therefore also the fear of the demon. But the
 very spirits which at first were feared as demons now serve a friendlier
 purpose; they are revered as ancestors and appealed to for help in times
 of distress.
 
 If we survey the relation of survivors to the dead through the course of
 the ages, it is very evident that the ambivalent feeling has
 extraordinarily abated. We now find it easy to suppress whatever
 unconscious hostility towards the dead there may still exist without any
 special psychic effort on our part. Where formerly satisfied hate and
 painful tenderness struggled with each other, we now find piety, which
 appears like a cicatrice and demands: _De mortuis nil nisi_ _bene_.
 Only neurotics still blur the mourning for the loss of their dear ones
 with attacks of compulsive reproaches which psychoanalysis reveals as
 the old ambivalent emotional feeling. How this change was brought about,
 and to what extent constitutional changes and real improvement of
 familiar relations share in causing the abatement of the ambivalent
 feeling, need not be discussed here. But this example would lead us to
 assume _that the psychic impulses of primitive man possessed a higher
 degree of ambivalence than is found at present among civilized human
 beings. With the decline of this ambivalence the taboo, as the
 compromise symptom of the ambivalent conflict, also slowly disappeared._
 Neurotics who are compelled to reproduce this conflict, together with
 the taboo resulting from it, may be said to have brought with them an
 atavistic remnant in the form of an archaic constitution the
 compensation of which in the interest of cultural demands entails the
 most prodigious psychic efforts on their part.
 
 At this point we may recall the confusing information which Wundt
 offered us about the double meaning of the word taboo, namely, holy and
 unclean (see above). It was supposed that originally the word taboo did
 not yet mean holy and unclean but signified something demonic, something
 which may not be touched, thus emphasizing a characteristic common to
 both extremes of the later conception; this persistent common trait
 proves, however, that an original correspondence existed between what
 was holy and what was unclean, which only later became differentiated.
 
 In contrast to this, our discussion readily shows that the double
 meaning in question belonged to the word taboo from the very beginning
 and that it serves to designate a definite ambivalence as well as
 everything which has come into existence on the basis of this
 ambivalence. Taboo is itself an ambivalent word and by way of supplement
 we may add that the established meaning of this word might of itself
 have allowed us to guess what we have found as the result of extensive
 investigation, namely, that the taboo prohibition is to be explained as
 the result of an emotional ambivalence. A study of the oldest languages
 has taught us that at one time there were many such words which included
 their own contrasts so that they were in a certain sense ambivalent,
 though perhaps not exactly in the same sense as the word taboo[88].
 Slight vocal modifications of this primitive word containing two
 opposite meanings later served to create a separate linguistic
 expression for the two opposites originally united in one word.
 
 The word taboo has had a different fate; with the diminished importance
 of the ambivalence which it connotes it has itself disappeared, or
 rather, the words analogous to it have vanished from the vocabulary. In
 a later connection I hope to be able to show that a tangible historic
 change is probably concealed behind the fate of this conception; that
 the word at first was associated with definite human relations which
 were characterized by great emotional ambivalence from which it expanded
 to other analogous relations.
 
 Unless we are mistaken, the understanding of taboo also throws light
 upon the nature and origin of _conscience_. Without stretching ideas we
 can speak of a taboo conscience and a taboo sense of guilt after the
 violation of a taboo. Taboo conscience is probably the oldest form in
 which we meet the phenomenon of conscience.
 
 For what is conscience? According to linguistic testimony it belongs
 to what we know most surely; in some languages its meaning is hardly to
 be distinguished from consciousness.
 
 Conscience is the inner perception of objections to definite wish
 impulses that exist in us; but the emphasis is put upon the fact that
 this rejection does not have to depend on anything else, that it is
 sure of itself. This becomes even plainer in the case of a guilty
 conscience, where we become aware of the inner condemnation of such acts
 which realized some of our definite wish impulses. Confirmation seems
 superfluous here; whoever has a conscience must feel in himself the
 justification of the condemnation, and the reproach for the accomplished
 action. But this same character is evinced by the attitude of savages
 towards taboo. Taboo is a command of conscience, the violation of which
 causes a terrible sense of guilt which is as self-evident as its origin
 is unknown[89].
 
 It is therefore probable that conscience also originates on the basis of
 an ambivalent feeling from quite definite human relations which contain
 this ambivalence. It probably originates under conditions which are in
 force both for taboo and the compulsion neurosis, that is, one component
 of the two contrasting feelings is unconscious and is kept repressed by
 the compulsive domination of the other component. This is confirmed by
 many things which we have learned from our analysis of neurosis. In the
 first place the character of compulsion neurotics shows a predominant
 trait of painful conscientiousness which is a symptom of reaction
 against the temptation which lurks in the unconscious, and which
 develops into the highest degrees of guilty conscience as their illness
 grows worse. Indeed, one may venture the assertion that if the origin of
 guilty conscience could not be discovered through compulsion neurotic
 patients, there would be no prospect of ever discovering it. This task
 is successfully solved in the case of the individual neurotic, and we
 are confident of finding a similar solution in the case of races.
 
 In the second place we cannot help noticing that the sense of guilt
 contains much of the nature of anxiety; without hesitation it may be
 described as conscience phobia. But fear points to unconscious
 sources. The psychology of the neuroses taught us that when wish
 feelings undergo repression their libido becomes transformed into
 anxiety. In addition we must bear in mind that the sense of guilt also
 contains something unknown and unconscious, namely the motivation for
 the rejection. The character of anxiety in the sense of guilt
 corresponds to this unknown quantity.
 
 If taboo expresses itself mainly in prohibitions it may well be
 considered self-evident, without remote proof from the analogy with
 neurosis that it is based on a positive, desireful impulse. For what
 nobody desires to do does not have to be forbidden, and certainly
 whatever is expressly forbidden must be an object of desire. If we
 applied this plausible theory to primitive races we would have to
 conclude that among their strongest temptations were desires to kill
 their kings and priests, to commit incest, to abuse their dead and the
 like. That is not very probable. And if we should apply the same theory
 to those cases in which we ourselves seem to hear the voice of
 conscience most clearly we would arouse the greatest contradiction. For
 there we would assert with the utmost certainty that we did not feel the
 slightest temptation to violate any of these commandments, as for
 example, the commandment: Thou shalt not kill, and that we felt nothing
 but repugnance at the very idea.
 
 But if we grant the testimony of our conscience the importance it
 claims, then the prohibition--the taboo as well as our moral
 prohibitions--becomes superfluous, while the existence of a conscience,
 in turn, remains unexplained and the connection between conscience,
 taboo and neurosis disappears. The net result of this would then be our
 present state of understanding unless we view the problem
 psychoanalytically.
 
 But if we take into account the following results of psychoanalysis, our
 understanding of the problem is greatly advanced. The analysis of
 dreams of normal individuals has shown that our own temptation to kill
 others is stronger and more frequent than we had suspected and that it
 produces psychic effects even where it does not reveal itself to our
 consciousness. And when we have learnt that the obsessive rules of
 certain neurotics are nothing but measures of self-reassurance and
 self-punishment erected against the reinforced impulse to commit murder,
 we can return with fresh appreciation to our previous hypothesis that
 every prohibition must conceal a desire. We can then assume that this
 desire to murder actually exists and that the taboo as well as the moral
 prohibition are psychologically by no means superfluous but are, on the
 contrary, explained and justified through our ambivalent attitude
 towards the impulse to slay.
 
 The nature of this ambivalent relation so often emphasized as
 fundamental, namely, that the positive underlying desire is unconscious,
 opens the possibility of showing further connections and explaining
 further problems. The pyschic processes in the unconscious are not
 entirely identical with those known to us from our conscious psychic
 life, but have the benefit of certain notable liberties of which the
 latter are deprived. An unconscious impulse need not have originated
 where we find it expressed, it can spring from an entirely different
 place and may originally have referred to other persons and relations,
 but through the mechanism of _displacement_, it reaches the point where
 it comes to our notice. Thanks to the indestructibility of unconscious
 processes and their inaccessibility to correction, the impulse may be
 saved over from earlier times to which it was adapted to later periods
 and conditions in which its manifestations must necessarily seem
 foreign. These are all only hints, but a careful elaboration of them
 would show how important they may become for the understanding of the
 development of civilization.
 
 In closing these discussions we do not want to neglect to make an
 observation that will be of use for later investigations. Even if we
 insist upon the essential similarity between taboo and moral
 prohibitions we do not dispute that a psychological difference must
 exist between them. A change in the relations of the fundamental
 ambivalence can be the only reason why the prohibition no longer appears
 in the form of a taboo.
 
 In the analytical consideration of taboo phenomena we have hitherto
 allowed ourselves to be guided by their demonstrable agreements with
 compulsion neurosis; but as taboo is not a neurosis but a social
 creation we are also confronted with the task of showing wherein lies
 the essential difference between the neurosis and a product of culture
 like the taboo.
 
 Here again I will take a single fact as my starting point. Primitive
 races fear a punishment for the violation of a taboo, usually a serious
 disease or death. This punishment threatens only him who has been guilty
 of the violation. It is different with the compulsion neurosis. If the
 patient wants to do something that is forbidden to him he does not fear
 punishment for himself, but for another person. This person is usually
 indefinite, but, by means of analysis, is easily recognized as some one
 very near and dear to the patient. The neurotic therefore acts as if he
 were altruistic, while primitive man seems egotistical. Only if
 retribution fails to overtake the taboo violator spontaneously does a
 collective feeling awaken among savages that they are all threatened
 through the sacrilege, and they hasten to inflict the omitted punishment
 themselves. It is easy for us to explain the mechanism of this
 solidarity. It is a question of fear of the contagious example, the
 temptation to imitate, that is to say, of the capacity of the taboo to
 infect. If some one has succeeded in satisfying the repressed desire,
 the same desire must manifest itself in all his companions; hence, in
 order to keep down this temptation, this envied individual must be
 despoiled of the fruit of his daring. Not infrequently the punishment
 gives the executors themselves an opportunity to commit the same
 sacrilegious act by justifying it as an expiation. This is really one of
 the fundamentals of the human code of punishment which rightly presumes
 the same forbidden impulses in the criminal and in the members of
 society who avenge his offence.
 
 Psychoanalysis here confirms what the pious were wont to say, that we
 are all miserable sinners. How then shall we explain the unexpected
 nobility of the neurosis which fears nothing for itself and everything
 for the beloved person? Psychoanalytic investigation shows that this
 nobility is not primary. Originally, that is to say at the beginning of
 the disease, the threat of punishment pertained to ones own person; in
 every case the fear was for ones own life; the fear of death being only
 later displaced upon another beloved person. The process is somewhat
 complicated but we have a complete grasp of it. An evil impulse--a death
 wish--towards the beloved person is always at the basis of the formation
 of a prohibition. This is repressed through a prohibition, and the
 prohibition is connected with a certain act which by displacement
 usually substitutes the hostile for the beloved person, and the
 execution of this act is threatened with the penalty of death. But the
 process goes further and the original wish for the death of the beloved
 other person is then replaced by fear for his death. The tender
 altruistic trait of the neurosis therefore merely _compensates_ for the
 opposite attitude of brutal egotism which is at the basis of it. If we
 designate as social those emotional impulses which are determined
 through regard for another person who is not taken as a sexual object,
 we can emphasize the withdrawal of these social factors as an essential
 feature of the neurosis, which is later disguised through
 overcompensation.
 
 Without lingering over the origin of these social impulses and their
 relation to other fundamental impulses of man, we will bring out the
 second main characteristic of the neurosis by means of another example.
 The form in which taboo manifests itself has the greatest similarity to
 the touching phobia of neurotics, the _Dlire de toucher_. As a matter
 of fact this neurosis is regularly concerned with the prohibition of
 sexual touching and psychoanalysis has quite generally shown that the
 motive power which is deflected and displaced in the neurosis is of
 sexual origin. In taboo the forbidden contact has evidently not only
 sexual significance but rather the more, general one of attack, of
 acquisition and of personal assertion. If it is prohibited to touch the
 chief or something that was in contact with him it means that an
 inhibition should be imposed upon the same impulse which on other
 occasions expresses itself in suspicious surveillance of the chief and
 even in physical ill-treatment of him before his coronation (see above).
 _Thus the preponderance of sexual components of the impulse over the
 social components is the determining factor of the neurosis._ But the
 social impulses themselves came into being through the union of
 egotistical and erotic components into special entities.
 
 From this single example of a comparison between taboo and compulsion
 neurosis it is already possible to guess the relation between individual
 forms of the neurosis and the creations of culture, and in what respect
 the study of the psychology of the neurosis is important for the
 understanding of the development of culture.
 
 In one way the neuroses show a striking and far-reaching correspondence
 with the great social productions of art, religion and philosophy, while
 again they seem like distortions of them. We may say that hysteria is a
 caricature of an artistic creation, a compulsion neurosis, a caricature
 of a religion, and a paranoic delusion, a caricature of a philosophic
 system. In the last analysis this deviation goes back to the fact that
 the neuroses are asocial formations; they seek to accomplish by private
 means what arose in society through collective labour. In analysing the
 impulse of the neuroses one learns that motive powers of sexual origin
 exercise the determining influence in them, while the corresponding
 cultural creations rest upon social impulses and on such as have issued
 from the combination of egotistical and sexual components. It seems that
 the sexual need is not capable of uniting men in the same way as the
 demands of self preservation; sexual satisfaction is in the first place
 the private concern of the individual.
 
 Genetically the asocial nature of the neurosis springs from its original
 tendency to flee from a dissatisfying reality to a more pleasurable
 world of phantasy. This real world which neurotics shun is dominated by
 the society of human beings and by the institutions created by them; the
 estrangement from reality is at the same time a withdrawal from human
 companionship.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III
 
 ANIMISM, MAGIC AND THE OMNIPOTENCE OF THOUGHT
 
 
 1
 
 It is a necessary defect of studies which seek to apply the point of
 view of psychoanalysis to the mental sciences that they cannot do
 justice to either subject. They therefore confine themselves to the rle
 of incentives and make suggestions to the expert which he should take
 into consideration in his work. This defect will make itself felt most
 strongly in an essay such as this which tries to treat of the enormous
 sphere called animism[90].
 
 Animism in the narrower sense is the theory of psychic concepts, and in
 the wider sense, of spiritual beings in general. Animatism, the
 animation theory of seemingly inanimate nature, is a further
 subdivision which also includes animatism and animism. The name animism,
 formerly applied to a definite philosophic system, seems to have
 acquired its present meaning through E. B. Tylor[91].
 
 What led to the formulation of these names is the insight into the very
 remarkable conceptions of nature and the world of those primitive races
 known to us from history and from our own times. These races populate
 the world with a multitude of spiritual beings which are benevolent or
 malevolent to them, and attribute the causation of natural processes to
 these spirits and demons; they also consider that not only animals and
 plants, but inanimate things as well are animated by them. A third and
 perhaps the most important part of this primitive nature philosophy
 seems far less striking to us because we ourselves are not yet far
 enough removed from it, though we have greatly limited the existence of
 spirits and to-day explain the processes of nature by the assumption of
 impersonal physical forces. For primitive people believe in a similar
 animation of human individuals as well. Human beings have souls which
 can leave their habitation and enter into other beings; these souls are
 the bearers of spiritual activities and are, to a certain extent,
 independent of the bodies. Originally souls were thought of as being
 very similar to individuals; only in the course of a long evolution did
 they lose their material character and attain a high degree of
 spiritualization[92].
 
 Most authors incline to the assumption that these soul conceptions are
 the original nucleus of the animistic system, that spirits merely
 correspond to souls that have become independent, and that the souls of
 animals, plants and things were formed after the analogy of human souls.
 
 How did primitive people come to the peculiarly dualistic fundamental
 conceptions on which this animistic system rests? Through the
 observation, it is thought, of the phenomena of sleep (with dreams) and
 death which resemble sleep, and through the effort to explain these
 conditions, which affect each individual so intimately. Above all, the
 problem of death must have become the starting point of the formation of
 the theory. To primitive man the continuation of
 life--immortality--would be self-evident. The conception of death is
 something accepted later, and only with hesitation, for even to us it is
 still devoid of content and unrealizable. Very likely discussions have
 taken place over the part which may have been played by other
 observations and experiences in the formation of the fundamental
 animistic conceptions such as dream imagery, shadows and reflections,
 but these have led to no conclusion[93].
 
 If primitive man reacted to the phenomena that stimulated his reflection
 with the formation of conceptions of the soul, and then transferred
 these to objects of the outer world, his attitude will be judged to be
 quite natural and in no way mysterious. In view of the fact that
 animistic conceptions have been shown to be similar among the most
 varied races and in all periods, Wundt states that these are the
 necessary psychological product of the myth-forming consciousness, and
 primitive animism may be looked upon as the spiritual expression of
 mans natural state in so far as this is at all accessible to our
 observation[94]. Hume has already justified the animation of the
 inanimate in his _Natural History of Religions_, where he said: There
 is a universal tendency among mankind to conceive all beings like
 themselves and to transfer to every object those qualities with which
 they are familiarly acquainted and of which they are intimately
 conscious[95].
 
 Animism is a system of thought, it gives not only the explanation of a
 single phenomenon, but makes it possible to comprehend the totality of
 the world from one point, as a continuity. Writers maintain that in the
 course of time three such systems of thought, three great world systems
 came into being: the animistic (mythological), the religious, and the
 scientific. Of these animism, the first system is perhaps the most
 consistent and the most exhaustive, and the one which explains the
 nature of the world in its entirety. This first world system, of mankind
 is now a psychological theory. It would go beyond our scope to show how
 much of it can still be demonstrated in the life of to-day, either as a
 worthless survival in the form of superstition, or in living form, as
 the foundation of our language, our belief, and our philosophy.
 
 It is in reference to the successive stages of these three world systems
 that we say that animism in itself was not yet a religion but contained
 the prerequisites from which religions were later formed. It is also
 evident that myths are based upon animistic foundations, but the
 detailed relation of myths to animism seem unexplained in some essential
 points.
 
 
 2
 
 Our psychoanalytic work will begin at a different point. It must not be
 assumed that mankind came to create its first world system through a
 purely speculative thirst for knowledge. The practical need of mastering
 the world must have contributed to this effort. We are therefore not
 astonished to learn that something else went hand in hand with the
 animistic system, namely the elaboration of directions for making
 oneself master of men, animals and things, as well as of their spirits.
 S. Reinach[96] wants to call these directions, which are known under the
 names of sorcery and magic, the strategy of animism; With Mauss and
 Hubert, I should prefer to compare them to a technique[97].
 
 Can the conceptions of sorcery and magic be separated? It can be done if
 we are willing on our own authority to put ourselves above the vagaries
 of linguistic usage. Then sorcery is essentially the art of influencing
 spirits by treating them like people under the same circumstances, that
 is to say by appeasing them, reconciling them, making them more
 favourably disposed to one, by intimidating them, by depriving them of
 their power and by making them subject to ones will; all that is
 accomplished through the same methods that have been found effective
 with living people. Magic, however, is something else; it does not
 essentially concern itself with spirits, and uses special means, not
 the ordinary psychological method. We can easily guess that magic is the
 earlier and the more important part of animistic technique, for among
 the means with which spirits are to be treated there are also found the
 magic kind[98], and magic is also applied where spiritualization of
 nature has not yet, as it seems to us, been accomplished.
 
 Magic must serve the most varied purposes. It must subject the processes
 of nature to the will of man, protect the individual against enemies and
 dangers, and give him the power to injure his enemies. But the
 principles on whose assumptions the magic activity is based, or rather
 the principle of magic, is so evident that it was recognized by all
 authors. If we may take the opinion of E. B. Tylor at its face value it
 can be most tersely expressed in his words: mistaking an ideal
 connection for a real one. We shall explain this characteristic in the
 case of two groups of magic acts.
 
 One of the most widespread magic procedures for injuring an enemy
 consists of making an effigy of him out of any kind of material. The
 likeness counts for little, in fact any object may be named as his
 image. Whatever is subsequently done to this image will also happen to
 the hated prototype; thus if the effigy has been injured in any place he
 will be afflicted by a disease in the corresponding part of the body.
 This same magic technique, instead of being used for private enmity can
 also be employed for pious purposes and can thus be used to aid the gods
 against evil demons. I quote Frazer[99]: Every night when the sun-god
 Ra in ancient Egypt sank to his home in the glowing west he was assailed
 by hosts of demons under the leadership of the archfiend Apepi. All
 night long he fought them, and sometimes by day the powers of darkness
 sent up clouds even into the blue Egyptian sky to obscure his light and
 weaken his power. To aid the sun-god in this daily struggle, a ceremony
 was daily performed in his temple at Thebes. A figure of his foe Apepi,
 represented as a crocodile with a hideous face or a serpent with many
 coils, was made of wax, and on it the demons name was written in green
 ink. Wrapt in a papyrus case, on which another likeness of Apepi had
 been drawn in green ink, the figure was then tied up with black hair,
 spat upon, hacked with a stone knife and cast on the ground. There the
 priest trod on it with his left foot again and again, and then burned it
 in a fire made of a certain plant or grass. When Apepi himself had thus
 been effectively disposed of, waxen effigies of each of his principle
 demons, and of their fathers, mothers, and children, were made and burnt
 in the same way. The service accompanied by the recitation of certain
 prescribed spells, was repeated not merely morning, noon and night, but
 whenever a storm was raging or heavy rain had set in, or black clouds
 were stealing across the sky to hide the suns bright disk. The fiends
 of darkness, clouds and rain, felt the injury inflicted on their images
 as if it had been done to themselves; they passed away, at least for a
 time, and the beneficent sun-god shone out triumphant once more[100].
 
 There is a great mass of magic actions which show a similar motivation,
 but I shall lay stress upon only two, which have always played a great
 rle among primitive races and which have been partly preserved in the
 myths and cults of higher stages of evolution: the art of causing rain
 and fruitfulness by magic. Rain is produced by magic means, by imitating
 it, and perhaps also by imitating the clouds and storm which produce it.
 It looks as if they wanted to play rain. The Ainos of Japan, for
 instance, make rain by pouring out water through a big sieve, while
 others fit out a big bowl with sails and oars as if it were a ship,
 which is then dragged about the village and gardens. But the
 fruitfulness of the soil was assured by magic means by showing it the
 spectacle of human sexual intercourse. To cite one out of many examples;
 in some part of Java, the peasants used to go out into the fields at
 night for sexual intercourse when the rice was about to blossom in order
 to stimulate the rice to fruitfulness through their example[101]. At the
 same time it was feared that proscribed incestuous relationships would
 stimulate the soil to grow weeds and render it unfruitful[102].
 
 Certain negative rules, that is to say magic precautions, must be put
 into this first group. If some of the inhabitants of a Dayak village had
 set out on a hunt for wild-boars, those remaining behind were in the
 meantime not permitted to touch either oil or water with their hands, as
 such acts would soften the hunters fingers and would let the quarry
 slip through their hands[103]. Or when a Gilyak hunter was pursuing game
 in the woods, his children were forbidden to make drawings on wood or in
 the sand, as the paths in the thick woods might become as intertwined as
 the lines of the drawing and the hunter would not find his way
 home[104].
 
 The fact that in these as in a great many other examples of magic
 influence, distance plays no part, telepathy is taken as a matter of
 course--will cause us no difficulties in grasping the peculiarity of
 magic.
 
 There is no doubt about what is considered the effective force in all
 these examples. It is the _similarity_ between the performed action and
 the expected happening. Frazer therefore calls this kind of magic
 _imitative_ or _homopathic_. If I want it to rain I only have to
 produce something that looks like rain or recalls rain. In a later phase
 of cultural development, instead of these magic conjurations of rain,
 processions are arranged to a house of god, in order to supplicate the
 saint who dwells there to send rain. Finally also this religious
 technique will be given up and instead an effort will be made to find
 out what would influence the atmosphere to produce rain.
 
 In another group of magic actions the principle of similarity is no
 longer involved, but in its stead there is another principle the nature
 of which is well brought out in the following examples.
 
 Another method may be used to injure an enemy. You possess yourself of
 his hair, his nails, anything that he has discarded, or even a part of
 his clothing, and do something hostile to these things. This is just as
 effective as if you had dominated the person himself, and anything that
 you do to the things that belong to him must happen to him too.
 According to the conception of primitive men a name is an essential part
 of a personality; if therefore you know the name of a person or a spirit
 you have acquired a certain power over its bearer. This explains the
 remarkable precautions and restrictions in the use of names which we
 have touched upon in the essay on taboo[105]. In these examples
 similarity is evidently replaced by relationship.
 
 The cannibalism of primitive races derives its more sublime motivation
 in a similar manner. By absorbing parts of the body of a person through
 the act of eating we also come to possess the properties which belonged
 to that person. From this there follow precautions and restrictions as
 to diet under special circumstances. Thus a pregnant woman will avoid
 eating the meat of certain animals because their undesirable properties,
 for example, cowardice, might thus be transferred to the child she is
 nourishing. It makes no difference to the magic influence whether the
 connection is already abolished or whether it had consisted of only one
 very important contact. Thus, for instance, the belief in a magic bond
 which links the fate of a wound with the weapon which caused it can be
 followed unchanged through thousands of years. If a Melanesian gets
 possession of the bow by which he was wounded he will carefully keep it
 in a cool place in order thus to keep down the inflammation of the
 wound. But if the bow has remained in the possession of the enemy it
 will certainly be kept in close proximity to a fire in order that the
 wound may burn and become thoroughly inflamed. Pliny, in his _Natural
 History_, <small>XXVIII</small>, advises spitting on the hand which has caused the
 injury if one regrets having injured some one; the pain of the injured
 person will then immediately be eased. Francis Bacon, in his _Natural
 History_, mentions the generally accredited belief that putting a salve
 on the weapon which has made a wound will cause this wound to heal of
 itself. It is said that even to-day English peasants follow this
 prescription, and that if they have cut themselves with a scythe they
 will from that moment on carefully keep the instrument clean in order
 that the wound may not fester. In June, 1902, a local English weekly
 reported that a woman called Matilde Henry of Norwich accidentally ran
 an iron nail into the sole of her foot. Without having the wound
 examined or even taking off her stocking she bade her daughter to oil
 the nail thoroughly in the expectation that then nothing could happen to
 her. She died a few days later of tetanus[106] in consequence of
 postponed antisepsis.
 
 The examples from this last group illustrate Frazers distinction
 between _contagious_ magic and _imitative_ magic. What is considered as
 effective in these examples is no longer the similarity, but the
 association in space, the contiguity, or at least the imagined
 contiguity, or the memory of its existence. But since similarity and
 contiguity are the two essential principles of the processes of
 association of ideas, it must be concluded that the dominance of
 associations of ideas really explains all the madness of the rules of
 magic. We can see how true Tylors quoted characteristic of magic:
 mistaking an ideal connection for a real one, proves to be. The same
 may be said of Frazers idea, who has expressed it in almost the same
 terms: men mistook the order of their ideas for the order of nature,
 and hence imagined that the control which they have, or seem to have,
 over their thoughts, permitted them to have a corresponding control over
 things[107].
 
 It will at first seem strange that this illuminating explanation of
 magic could have been rejected by some authors as unsatisfactory[108].
 But on closer consideration we must sustain the objection that the
 association theory of magic merely explains the paths that magic
 travels, and not its essential nature, that is, it does not explain the
 misunderstanding which bids it put psychological laws in place of
 natural ones. We are apparently in need here of a dynamic factor; but
 while the search for this leads the critics of Frazers theory astray,
 it will be easy to give a satisfactory explanation of magic by carrying
 its association theory further and by entering more deeply into it.
 
 First let us examine the simpler and more important case of imitative
 magic. According to Frazer this may be practised by itself, whereas
 contagious magic as a rule presupposes the imitative[109]. The motives
 which impel one to exercise magic are easily recognized; they are the
 wishes of men. We need only assume that primitive man had great
 confidence in the power of his wishes. At bottom everything which he
 accomplished by magic means must have been done solely because he wanted
 it. Thus in the beginning only his wish is accentuated.
 
 In the case of the child which finds itself under analogous psychic
 conditions, without being as yet capable of motor activity, we have
 elsewhere advocated the assumption that it at first really satisfies
 its wishes by means of hallucinations, in that it creates the satisfying
 situation through centrifugal excitements of its sensory organs[110].
 The adult primitive man knows another way. A motor impulse, the will,
 clings to his wish and this will which later will change the face of the
 earth in the service of wish fulfilment is now used to represent the
 gratification so that one may experience it, as it were, through motor
 hallucination. Such a _representation_ of the gratified wish is
 altogether comparable to the _play_ of children, where it replaces the
 purely sensory technique of gratification. If play and imitative
 representation suffice for the child and for primitive man, it must not
 be taken as a sign of modesty, in our sense, or of resignation due to
 the realization of their impotence, on the contrary; it is the very
 obvious result of the excessive valuation of their wish, of the will
 which depends upon the wish and of the paths the wish takes. In time the
 psychic accent is displaced from the motives of the magic act to its
 means, namely to the act itself. Perhaps it would be more correct to say
 that primitive man does not become aware of the over-valuation of his
 psychic acts until it becomes evident to him through the means
 employed. It would also seem as if it were the magic act itself which
 compels the fulfilment of the wish by virtue of its similarity to the
 object desired. At the stage of animistic thinking there is as yet no
 way of demonstrating objectively the true state of affairs, but this
 becomes possible at later stages when, though such procedures are still
 practised, the psychic phenomenon of scepticism already manifests itself
 as a tendency to repression. At that stage men will acknowledge that the
 conjuration of spirits avails nothing unless accompanied by belief, and
 that the magic effect of prayer fails if there is no piety behind
 it[111].
 
 The possibility of a contagious magic which depends upon contiguous
 association will then show us that the psychic valuation of the wish and
 the will has been extended to all psychic acts which the will can
 command. We may say that at present there is a general over-valuation of
 all psychic processes, that is to say there is an attitude towards the
 world which according to our understanding of the relation of reality to
 thought must appear like an over-estimation of the latter. Objects as
 such are over-shadowed by the ideas representing them; what takes place
 in the latter must also happen to the former, and the relations which
 exist between ideas are also postulated as to things. As thought does
 not recognize distances and easily brings together in one act of
 consciousness things spatially and temporally far removed, the magic
 world also puts itself above spatial distance by telepathy, and treats a
 past association as if it were a present one. In the animistic age the
 reflection of the inner world must obscure that other picture of the
 world which we believe we recognize.
 
 Let us also point out that the two principles of association, similarity
 and contiguity, meet in the higher unity of contact. Association by
 contiguity is contact in the direct sense, and association by similarity
 is contact in the transferred sense. Another identity in the psychic
 process which has not yet been grasped by us is probably concealed in
 the use of the same word for both kinds of associations. It is the same
 range of the concept of contact which we have found in the analysis of
 taboo[112].
 
 In summing up we may now say that the principle which controls magic,
 and the technique of the animistic method of thought, is Omnipotence of
 Thought.
 
 
 3
 
 I have adopted the term Omnipotence of Thought from a highly
 intelligent man, a former sufferer from compulsion neurosis, who, after
 being cured through psychoanalytic treatment, was able to demonstrate
 his efficiency and good sense[113]. He had coined this phrase to
 designate all those peculiar and uncanny occurrences which seemed to
 pursue him just as they pursue others afflicted with his malady. Thus if
 he happened to think of a person, he was actually confronted with this
 person as if he had conjured him up; if he inquired suddenly about the
 state of health of an acquaintance whom he had long missed he was sure
 to hear that this acquaintance had just died, so that he could believe
 that the deceased had drawn his attention to himself by telepathic
 means; if he uttered a half meant imprecation against a stranger, he
 could expect to have him die soon thereafter and burden him with the
 responsibility for his death. He was able to explain most of these cases
 in the course of the treatment, he could tell how the illusion had
 originated, and what he himself had contributed towards furthering his
 superstitious expectations[114]. All compulsion neurotics are
 superstitious in this manner and often against their better judgment.
 
 The existence of omnipotence of thought is most clearly seen in
 compulsion neurosis, where the results of this primitive method of
 thought are most often found or met in consciousness. But we must guard
 against seeing in this a distinguishing characteristic of this neurosis,
 for analytic investigation reveals the same mechanism in the other
 neuroses. In every one of the neuroses it is not the reality of the
 experience but the reality of the thought which forms the basis for the
 symptom formation. Neurotics live in a special world in which, as I have
 elsewhere expressed it, only the neurotic standard of currency counts,
 that is to say, only things intensively thought of or affectively
 conceived are effective with them, regardless of whether these things
 are in harmony with outer reality. The hysteric repeats in his attacks
 and fixates through his symptoms, occurrences which have taken place
 only in his phantasy, though in the last analysis they go back to real
 events or have been built up from them. The neurotics guilty conscience
 is just as incomprehensible if traced to real misdeeds. A compulsion
 neurotic may be oppressed by a sense of guilt which is appropriate to a
 wholesale murderer, while at the same time he acts towards his fellow
 beings in a most considerate and scrupulous manner, a behaviour which he
 evinced since his childhood. And yet his sense of guilt is justified; it
 is based upon intensive and frequent death wishes which unconsciously
 manifest themselves towards his fellow beings. It is motivated from the
 point of view of unconscious thoughts, but not of intentional acts. Thus
 the omnipotence of thought, the over-estimation of psychic processes as
 opposed to reality, proves to be of unlimited effect in the neurotics
 affective life and in all that emanates from it. But if we subject him
 to psychoanalytic treatment, which makes his unconscious thoughts
 conscious to him he refuses to believe that thoughts are free and is
 always afraid to express evil wishes lest they be fulfilled in
 consequence of his utterance. But through this attitude as well as
 through the superstition which plays an active part in his life he
 reveals to us how close he stands to the savage who believes he can
 change the outer world by a mere thought of his.
 
 The primary obsessive actions of these neurotics are really altogether
 of a magical nature. If not magic they are at least anti-magic and are
 destined to ward off the expectation of evil with which the neurosis is
 wont to begin. Whenever I was able to pierce these secrets it turned out
 that the content of this expectation of evil was death. According to
 Schopenhauer the problem of death stands at the beginning of every
 philosophy; we have heard that the formation of the soul conception and
 of the belief in demons which characterize animism, are also traced back
 to the impression which death makes upon man. It is hard to decide
 whether these first compulsive and protective actions follow the
 principle of similarity, or of contrast, for under the conditions of the
 neurosis they are usually distorted through displacement upon some
 trifle, upon some action which in itself is quite insignificant[115].
 The protective formul of the compulsion neurosis also have a
 counterpart in the incantations of magic. But the evolution of
 compulsive actions may be described by pointing out how these actions
 begin as a spell against evil wishes which are very remote from anything
 sexual, only to end up as a substitute for forbidden sexual activity,
 which they imitate as faithfully as possible.
 
 If we accept the evolution of mans conceptions of the universe
 mentioned above, according to which the _animistic_ phase is
 _succeeded_ by the _religious_, and this in turn by the _scientific_, we
 have no difficulty in following the fortunes of the omnipotence of
 thought through all these phases. In the animistic stage man ascribes
 omnipotence to himself; in the religious he has ceded it to the gods,
 but without seriously giving it up, for he reserves to himself the right
 to control the gods by influencing them in some way or other in the
 interest of his wishes. In the scientific attitude towards life there is
 no longer any room for mans omnipotence; he has acknowledged his
 smallness and has submitted to death as to all other natural necessities
 in a spirit of resignation. Nevertheless, in our reliance upon the power
 of the human spirit which copes with the laws of reality, there still
 lives on a fragment of this primitive belief in the omnipotence of
 thought.
 
 In retracing the development of libidinous impulses in the individual
 from its mature form back to its first beginnings in childhood, we at
 first found an important distinction which is stated in the _Three
 Contributions to the Theory of Sex_[116]. The manifestations of sexual
 impulses can be recognized from the beginning, but at first they are not
 yet directed to any outer object. Each individual component of the
 sexual impulse works for a gain in pleasure and finds its gratification
 in its own body. This stage is called _autoerotism_ and is distinguished
 from the stage of object selection.
 
 In the course of further study it proved to be practical and really
 necessary to insert a third stage between these two or, if one prefers,
 to divide the first stage of autoerotism into two. In this intermediary
 stage, the importance of which increases the more we investigate it, the
 sexual impulses which formerly were separate, have already formed into a
 unit and have also found an object; but this object is not external and
 foreign to the individual, but is his own ego, which is formed at this
 period. This new stage is called _narcism_, in view of the pathological
 fixation of this condition which may be observed later on. The
 individual acts as if he were in love with himself; for the purposes of
 our analysis the ego impulses and the libidinous wishes cannot yet be
 separated from each other.
 
 Although this narcistic stage, in which the hitherto dissociated sexual
 impulses combine into a unity and take the ego as their object, cannot
 as yet be sharply differentiated, we can already surmise that the
 narcistic organization is never altogether given up again. To a certain
 extent man remains narcistic, even after he had found outer subjects for
 his libido, and the objects on which he bestows it represent, as it
 were, emanations of the libido which remain with his ego and which can
 be withdrawn into it. The state of being in love, so remarkable
 psychologically, and the normal prototype of the psychoses, corresponds
 to the highest stage of these emanations, in contrast to the state of
 self-love.
 
 This high estimation of psychic acts found among primitives and
 neurotics, which we feel to be an overestimation, may now appropriately
 be brought into relation to narcism, and interpreted as an essential
 part of it. We would say that among primitive people thinking is still
 highly sexualized and that this accounts for the belief in the
 omnipotence of thought, the unshaken confidence in the capacity to
 dominate the world and the inaccessibility to the obvious facts which
 could enlighten man as to his real place in the world. In the case of
 neurotics a considerable part of this primitive attitude had remained as
 a constitutional factor, while on the other hand the sexual repression
 occurring in them has brought about a new sexualization of the processes
 of thought. In both cases, whether we deal with an original libidinous
 investment of thought or whether the same process has been accomplished
 regressively, the psychic results are the same, namely, intellectual
 narcism and omnipotence of thought[117].
 
 If we may take the now established omnipotence of thought among
 primitive races as a proof of their narcism, we may venture to compare
 the various evolutionary stages of mans conception of the universe with
 the stages of the libidinous evolution of the individual. We find that
 the animistic phase corresponds in time as well as in content with
 narcism, the religious phase corresponds to that stage of object finding
 which is characterized by dependence on the parents, while the
 scientific stage has its full counterpart in the individuals stage of
 maturity where, having renounced the pleasure principle and having
 adapted himself to reality, he seeks his object in the outer world[118].
 
 Only in one field has the omnipotence of thought been retained in our
 own civilization, namely in art. In art alone it still happens that man,
 consumed by his wishes, produces something similar to the gratification
 of these wishes, and this playing, thanks to artistic illusion, calls
 forth effects as if it were something real. We rightly speak of the
 magic of art and compare the artist with a magician. But this comparison
 is perhaps more important than it claims to be. Art, which certainly did
 not begin as art for arts sake, originally served tendencies which
 to-day have for the greater part ceased to exist. Among these we may
 suspect various magic intentions[119].
 
 
 4
 
 Animism, the first conception of the world which man succeeded in
 evolving, was therefore psychological. It did not yet require any
 science to establish it, for science sets in only after we have realized
 that we do not know the world and that we must therefore seek means of
 getting to know it. But animism was natural and self-evident to
 primitive man; he knew how the things of the world were constituted, and
 as man conceived himself to be. We are therefore prepared to find that
 primitive man transferred the structural relations of his own psyche to
 the outer world[120], and on the other hand we may make the attempt to
 transfer back into the human soul what animism teaches about the nature
 of things.
 
 Magic, the technique of animism, clearly and unmistakably shows the
 tendency of forcing the laws of psychic life upon the reality of things,
 under conditions where spirits did not yet have to play any rle, and
 could still be taken as objects of magic treatment. The assumptions of
 magic are therefore of older origin than the spirit theory, which forms
 the nucleus of animism. Our psychoanalytic view here coincides with a
 theory of R. R. Marett, according to which animism is preceded by a
 pre-animistic stage the nature of which is best indicated by the name
 Animatism (the theory of general animation). We have practically no
 further knowledge of pre-animism, as no race has yet been found without
 conceptions of spirits[121].
 
 While magic still retains the full omnipotence of ideas, animism has
 ceded part of this omnipotence to spirits and thus has started on the
 way to form a religion. Now what could have moved primitive man to this
 first act of renunciation? It could hardly have been an insight into the
 incorrectness of his assumptions, for he continued to retain the magic
 technique.
 
 As pointed out elsewhere, spirits and demons were nothing but the
 projection of primitive mans emotional impulses[122]; he personified
 the things he endowed with effects, populated the world with them and
 then rediscovered his inner psychic processes outside himself, quite
 like the ingenious paranoiac Schreber, who found the fixations and
 detachments of his libido reflected in the fates of the God-rays which
 he invented[123].
 
 As on a former occasion[124], we want to avoid the problem as to the
 origin of the tendency to project psychic processes into the outer
 world. It is fair to assume, however, that this tendency becomes
 stronger where the projection into the outer world offers psychic
 relief. Such a state of affairs can with certainty be expected if the
 impulses struggling for omnipotence have come into conflict with each
 other, for then they evidently cannot all become omnipotent. The morbid
 process in paranoia actually uses the mechanism of projection to solve
 such conflicts which arise in the psychic life. However, it so happens
 that the model case of such a conflict between two parts of an
 antithesis is the ambivalent attitude which we have analysed in detail
 in the situation of the mourner at the death of one dear to him. Such a
 case appeals to us especially fitted to motivate the creation of
 projection formations. Here again we are in agreement with those authors
 who declare that evil spirits were the first born among spirits, and
 find the origin of soul conceptions in the impression which death makes
 upon the survivors. We differ from them only in not putting the
 intellectual problem which death imposes upon the living into the
 foreground, instead of which we transfer the force which stimulates
 inquiry to the conflict of feelings into which this situation plunges
 the survivor.
 
 The first theoretical accomplishment of man, the creation of spirits
 would therefore spring from the same source as the first moral
 restrictions to which he subjects himself, namely, the rules of taboo.
 But the fact that they have the same source should not prejudice us in
 favour of a simultaneous origin. If it really were the situation of the
 survivor confronted by the dead which first caused primitive man to
 reflect, so that he was compelled to surrender some of his omnipotence
 to spirits and to sacrifice a part of the free will of his actions,
 these cultural creations would be a first recognition of the [Greek:
  anagk], which opposes mans narcism. Primitive man would bow to the
 superior power of death with the same gesture with which he seems to
 deny it.
 
 If we have the courage to follow our assumptions further, we may ask
 what essential part of our psychological structure is reflected and
 reviewed in the projection formation of souls and spirits. It is then
 difficult to dispute that the primitive conception of the soul, though
 still far removed from the later and wholly immaterial soul,
 nevertheless shares its nature and therefore looks upon a person or a
 thing as a duality, over the two elements of which the known properties
 and changes of the whole are distributed. This origin duality, we have
 borrowed the term from Herbert Spencer[125], is already identical with
 the dualism which manifests itself in our customary separation of spirit
 from body, and whose indestructible linguistic manifestations we
 recognize, for instance, in the description of a person who faints or
 raves as one who is beside himself.[126]
 
 The thing which we, just like primitive man, project in outer reality,
 can hardly be anything else than the recognition of a state in which a
 given thing is present to the senses and to consciousness, next to which
 another state exists in which the thing is _latent_, but can reappear,
 that is to say, the co-existence of perception and memory, or, to
 generalize it, the existence of unconscious psychic processes next to
 conscious ones[127]. It might be said that in the last analysis the
 spirit of a person or thing is the faculty of remembering and
 representing the object, after he or it was withdrawn from conscious
 perception.
 
 Of course we must not expect from either the primitive or the current
 conception of the soul that its line of demarcation from other parts
 should be as marked as that which contemporary science draws between
 conscious and unconscious psychic activity. The animistic soul, on the
 contrary, unites determinants from both sides. Its flightiness and
 mobility, its faculty of leaving the body, of permanently or temporarily
 taking possession of another body, all these are characteristics which
 remind us unmistakably of the nature of consciousness. But the way in
 which it keeps itself concealed behind the personal appearance reminds
 us of the unconscious; to-day we no longer ascribe its unchangeableness
 and indestructibility to conscious but to unconscious processes and look
 upon these as the real bearers of psychic activity.
 
 We said before that animism is a system of thought, the first complete
 theory of the world; we now want to draw certain inferences through
 psychoanalytic interpretation of such a system. Our everyday experience
 is capable of constantly showing us the main characteristics of the
 system. We dream during the night and have learnt to interpret the
 dream in the daytime. The dream can, without being untrue to its nature,
 appear confused and incoherent; but on the other hand it can also
 imitate the order of impressions of an experience, infer one occurrence
 from another, and refer one part of its contents to another. The dream
 succeeds more or less in this, but hardly ever succeeds so completely
 that an absurdity or a gap in the structure does not appear somewhere.
 If we subject the dream to interpretation we find that this unstable and
 irregular order of its components is quite unimportant for our
 understanding of it. The essential part of the dream are the dream
 thoughts, which have, to be sure, a significant, coherent, order. But
 their order is quite different from that which we remember from the
 manifest content of the dream. The coherence of the dream thoughts has
 been abolished and may either remain altogether lost or can be replaced
 by the new coherence of the dream content. Besides the condensation of
 the dream elements there is almost regularly a re-grouping of the same
 which is more or less independent of the former order. We say in
 conclusion, that what the dream-work has made out of the material of the
 dream thoughts has been subjected to a new influence, the so-called
 secondary elaboration, the object of which evidently is to do away with
 the incoherence and incomprehensibility caused by the dream-work, in
 favour of a new meaning. This new meaning which has been brought about
 by the secondary elaboration is no longer the meaning of the dream
 thoughts.
 
 The secondary elaboration of the product of the dream-work is an
 excellent example of the nature and the pretensions of a system. An
 intellectual function in us demands the unification, coherence and
 comprehensibility of everything perceived and thought of, and does not
 hesitate to construct a false connexion if, as a result of special
 circumstances, it cannot grasp the right one. We know such system
 formation not only from the dream, but also from phobias, from
 compulsive thinking and from the types of delusions. The system
 formation is most ingenious in delusional states (paranoia) and
 dominates the clinical picture, but it also must not be overlooked in
 other forms of neuropsychoses. In every case we can show that a
 re-arrangement of the psychic material takes place, which may often be
 quite violent, provided it seems comprehensible from the point of view
 of the system. The best indication that a system has been formed then
 lies in the fact that each result of it can be shown to have at least
 two motivations one of which springs from the assumptions of the system
 and is therefore eventually delusional,--and a hidden one which,
 however, we must recognize as the real and effective motivation.
 
 An example from a neurosis may serve as illustration. In the chapter on
 taboo I mentioned a patient whose compulsive prohibitions correspond
 very neatly to the taboo of the Maori.[128] The neurosis of this woman
 was directed against her husband and culminated in the defence against
 the unconscious wish for his death. But her manifest systematic phobia
 concerned the mention of death in general, in which her husband was
 altogether eliminated and never became the object of conscious
 solicitude. One day she heard her husband give an order to have his dull
 razors taken to a certain shop to have them sharpened. Impelled by a
 peculiar unrest she went to the shop herself, and on her return from
 this reconnoitre she asked her husband to lay the razors aside for good
 because she had discovered that there was a warehouse of coffins and
 funeral accessories next to the shop he mentioned. She claimed that he
 had intentionally brought the razors into permanent relation with the
 idea of death. This was then the systematic motivation of the
 prohibition, but we may be sure that the patient would have brought home
 the prohibition relating to the razors even if she had not discovered
 this warehouse in the neighbourhood. For it would have been sufficient
 if on her way to the shop she had met a hearse, a person in mourning, or
 somebody carrying a wreath. The net of determinants was spread out far
 enough to catch the prey in any case, it was simply a question whether
 she should pull it in or not. It could be established with certainty
 that she did not mobilize the determinants of the prohibition in other
 circumstances. She would then have said it had been one of her better
 days. The real reason for the prohibition of the razor was, of course,
 as we can easily guess, her resistance against a pleasurably
 accentuated idea that her husband might cut his throat with the
 sharpened razors.
 
 In much the same way a motor inhibition, an abasia or an agoraphobia,
 becomes perfected and detailed if the symptom once succeeds in
 representing an unconscious wish and of imposing a defence against it.
 All the patients remaining unconscious phantasies and effective
 reminiscences strive for symptomatic expression through this outlet,
 when once it has been opened, and range themselves appropriately in the
 new order within the sphere of the disturbance of gait. It would
 therefore be a futile and really foolish way to begin to try to
 understand the symptomatic structure, and the details of, let us say, an
 agoraphobia, in terms of its basic assumptions. For the whole logic and
 strictness of connexion is only apparent. Sharper observation can
 reveal, as in the formation of the faade in the dream, the greatest
 inconsistency and arbitrariness in the symptom formation. The details of
 such a systematic phobia take their real motivation from concealed
 determinants which must have nothing to do with the inhibition in gait;
 it is for this reason that the form of such a phobia varies so and is so
 contradictory in different people.
 
 If we now attempt to retrace the system of animism with which we are
 concerned, we may conclude from our insight into other psychological
 systems that superstition need not be the only and actual motivation
 of such a single rule or custom even among primitive races, and that we
 are not relieved of the obligation of seeking for concealed motives.
 Under the dominance of an animistic system it is absolutely essential
 that each rule and activity should receive a systematic motivation which
 we to-day call superstitious. But superstition, like anxiety,
 dreams, and demons, is one of the preliminaries of psychology which
 have been dissipated by psychoanalytic investigation. If we get behind
 these structures, which like a screen conceal understanding, we realize
 that the psychic life and the cultural level of savages have hitherto
 been inadequately appreciated.
 
 If we regard the repression of impulses as a measure of the level of
 culture attained, we must admit that under the animistic system too,
 progress and evolution have taken place, which unjustly have been
 under-estimated on account of their superstitious motivation. If we hear
 that the warriors of a savage tribe impose the greatest chastity and
 cleanliness upon themselves as soon as they go upon the war-path[129],
 the obvious explanation is that they dispose of their refuse in order
 that the enemy may not come into possession of this part of their person
 in order to harm them by magical means, and we may surmise analogous
 superstitious motivations for their abstinence. Nevertheless the fact
 remains that the impulse is renounced and we probably understand the
 case better if we assume that the savage warrior imposes such
 restrictions upon himself in compensation, because he is on the point of
 allowing himself the full satisfaction of cruel and hostile impulses
 otherwise forbidden. The same holds good for the numerous cases of
 sexual restriction while he is preoccupied with difficult or responsible
 tasks[130]. Even if the basis of these prohibitions can be referred to
 some association with magic, the fundamental conception of gaining
 greater strength by foregoing gratification of desires nevertheless
 remains unmistakable, and besides the magic rationalization of the
 prohibition, one must not neglect its hygienic root. When the men of a
 savage tribe go away to hunt, fish, make war, or collect valuable
 plants, the women at home are in the meantime subjected to numerous
 oppressive restrictions which, according to the savages themselves,
 exert a sympathetic effect upon the success of the far away expedition.
 But it does not require much acumen to guess that this element acting
 at a distance is nothing but a thought of home, the longing of the
 absent, and that these disguises conceal the sound psychological insight
 that the men will do their best only if they are fully assured of the
 whereabouts of their guarded women. On other occasions the thought is
 directly expressed without magic motivation that the conjugal infidelity
 of the wife thwarts the absent husbands efforts.
 
 The countless taboo rules to which the women of savages are subject
 during their menstrual periods are motivated by the superstitious dread
 of blood which in all probability actually determines it. But it would
 be wrong to overlook the possibility that this blood dread also serves
 sthetic and hygienic purposes which in every case have to be covered by
 magic motivations.
 
 We are probably not mistaken in assuming that such attempted
 explanations expose us to the reproach of attributing a most improbable
 delicacy of psychic activities to contemporary savages.
 
 But I think that we may easily make the same mistake with the psychology
 of these races who have remained at the animistic stage that we made
 with the psychic life of the child, which we adults understood no better
 and whose richness and fineness of feeling we have therefore so greatly
 undervalued.
 
 I want to consider another group of hitherto unexplained taboo rules
 because they admit of an explanation with which the psychoanalyst is
 familiar. Under certain conditions it is forbidden to many savage races
 to keep in the house sharp weapons and instruments for cutting[131].
 Frazer sites a German superstition that a knife must not be left lying
 with the edge pointing upward because God and the angels might injure
 themselves with it. May we not recognize in this taboo a premonition of
 certain symptomatic actions[132] for which the sharp weapon might be
 used by unconscious evil impulses?
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV
 
 THE INFANTILE RECURRENCE OF TOTEMISM
 
 
 The reader need not fear that psychoanalysis, which first revealed the
 regular over-determination of psychic acts and formations, will be
 tempted to derive anything so complicated as religion from a single
 source. If it necessarily seeks, as in duty bound, to gain recognition
 for one of the sources of this institution, it by no means claims
 exclusiveness for this source or even first rank among the concurring
 factors. Only a synthesis from various fields of research can decide
 what relative importance in the genesis of religion is to be assigned to
 the mechanism which we are to discuss; but such a task exceeds the means
 as well as the intentions of the psychoanalyst.
 
 
 1
 
 The first chapter of this book made us acquainted with the conception of
 totemism. We heard that totemism is a system which takes the place of
 religion among certain primitive races in Australia, America, and
 Africa, and furnishes the basis of social organization. We know that in
 1869 the Scotchman MacLennan attracted general interest to the phenomena
 of totemism, which until then had been considered merely as curiosities,
 by his conjecture that a large number of customs and usages in various
 old as well as modern societies were to be taken as remnants of a
 totemic epoch. Science has since then fully recognized this significance
 of totemism. I quote a passage from the _Elements of the Psychology of
 Races_ by W. Wundt (1912), as the latest utterance on this
 question[133]: Taking all this together it becomes highly probable that
 a totemic culture was at one time the preliminary stage of every later
 evolution as well as a transition stage between the state of primitive
 man and the age of gods and heroes.
 
 It is necessary for the purposes of this chapter to go more deeply into
 the nature of totemism. For reasons that will be evident later I here
 give preference to an outline by S. Reinach, who in the year 1900
 sketched the following _Code du Totmisme_ in twelve articles, like a
 catechism of the totemic religion[134]:
 
 1. Certain animals must not be killed or eaten, but men bring up
 individual animals of these species and take care of them.
 
 2. An animal that dies accidentally is mourned and buried with the same
 honours as a member of the tribe.
 
 3. The prohibition as to eating sometimes refers only to a certain part
 of the animal.
 
 4. If pressure of necessity compels the killing of an animal usually
 spared, it is done with excuses to the animal and the attempt is made to
 mitigate the violation of the taboo, namely the killing, through various
 tricks and evasions.
 
 5. If the animal is sacrificed by ritual, it is solemnly mourned.
 
 6. At specified solemn occasions, like religious ceremonies, the skins
 of certain animals are donned. Where totemism still exists, these are
 totem animals.
 
 7. Tribes and individuals assume the names of totem animals.
 
 8. Many tribes use pictures of animals as coats of arms and decorate
 their weapons with them; the men paint animal pictures on their bodies
 or have them tattooed.
 
 9. If the totem is one of the feared and dangerous animals it is assumed
 that the animal will spare the members of the tribe named after it.
 
 10. The totem animal protects and warns the members of the tribe.
 
 11. The totem animal foretells the future to those faithful to it and
 serves as their leader.
 
 12. The members of a totem tribe often believe that they are connected
 with the totem animal by the bond of common origin.
 
 The value of this catechism of the totem religion can be more
 appreciated if one bears in mind that Reinach has here also incorporated
 all the signs and clews which lead to the conclusion that the totemic
 system had once existed. The peculiar attitude of this author to the
 problem is shown by the fact that to some extent he neglects the
 essential traits of totemism, and we shall see that of the two main
 tenets of the totemistic catechism he has forced one into the background
 and completely lost sight of the other.
 
 In order to get a more correct picture of the characteristics of
 totemism we turn to an author who has devoted four volumes to the theme,
 combining the most complete collection of the observations in question
 with the most thorough discussion of the problems they raise. We shall
 remain indebted to J. G. Frazer, the author of _Totemism and
 Exogamy_[135], for the pleasure and information he affords, even though
 psychoanalytic investigation may lead us to results which differ widely
 from his[136].
 
 A totem, wrote Frazer in his first essay[137], is a class of material
 objects which a savage regards with superstitious respect, believing
 that there exists between him and every member of the class an intimate
 and altogether special relation. The connexion between a person and his
 totem is mutually beneficent; the totem protects the man and the man
 shows his respect for the totem in various ways, by not killing it if it
 be an animal, and not cutting or gathering it if it be a plant. As
 distinguished from a fetich, a totem is never an isolated individual but
 always a class of objects, generally a species of animals or of plants,
 more rarely a class of inanimate natural objects, very rarely a class of
 artificial objects.
 
 At least three kinds of totem can be distinguished:
 
 1. The tribal totem which a whole tribe shares and which is hereditary
 from generation to generation,
 
 2. The sex totem which belongs to all the masculine or feminine members
 of a tribe to the exclusion of the opposite sex, and
 
 3. The individual totem which belongs to the individual and does not
 descend to his successors.
 
 The last two kinds of totem are comparatively of little importance
 compared to the tribal totem. Unless we are mistaken they are recent
 formations and of little importance as far as the nature of the taboo is
 concerned.
 
 The tribal totem (clan totem) is the object of veneration of a group of
 men and women who take their name from the totem and consider themselves
 consanguineous offspring of a common ancestor, and who are firmly
 associated with each other through common obligations towards each other
 as well as by the belief in their totem.
 
 Totemism is a religious as well as a social system. On its religious
 side it consists of the relations of mutual respect and consideration
 between a person and his totem, and on its social side it is composed of
 obligations of the members of the clan towards each other and towards
 other tribes. In the later history of totemism these two sides show a
 tendency to part company; the social system often survives the religious
 and conversely remnants of totemism remain in the religion of countries
 in which the social system based upon totemism had disappeared. In the
 present state of our ignorance about the origin of totemism we cannot
 say with certainty how these two sides were originally combined. But
 there is on the whole a strong probability that in the beginning the two
 sides of totemism were indistinguishable from each other. In other
 words, the further we go back the clearer it becomes that a member of a
 tribe looks upon himself as being of the same genus as his totem and
 makes no distinction between his attitude towards the totem and his
 attitude towards his tribal companions.
 
 In the special description of totemism as a religious system, Frazer
 lays stress on the fact that the members of a tribe assume the name of
 their totem and also as a _rule believe that they are descended from
 it._ It is due to this belief that they do not hunt the totem animal or
 kill or eat it, and that they deny themselves every other use of the
 totem if it is not an animal. The prohibitions against killing or eating
 the totem are not the only taboos affecting it; sometimes it is also
 forbidden to touch it and even to look at it; in a number of cases the
 totem must not be called by its right name. Violation of the taboo
 prohibitions which protect the totem is punished automatically by
 serious disease or death[138].
 
 Specimens of the totem animals are sometimes raised by the clan and
 taken care of in captivity[139]. A totem animal found dead is mourned
 and buried like a member of the clan. If a totem animal had to be killed
 it was done with a prescribed ritual of excuses and ceremonies of
 expiation.
 
 The tribe expected protection and forbearance from its totem. If it was
 a dangerous animal (a beast of prey or a poisonous snake), it was
 assumed that it would not harm, and where this assumption did not come
 true the person attacked was expelled from the tribe. Frazer thinks that
 oaths were originally ordeals, many tests as to descent and genuineness
 being in this way left to the decision of the totem. The totem helps in
 case of illness and gives the tribe premonitions and warnings. The
 appearance of the totem animal near a house was often looked upon as an
 announcement of death. The totem had come to get its relative[140].
 
 A member of a clan seeks to emphasize his relationship to the totem in
 various significant ways; he imitates an exterior similarity by dressing
 himself in the skin of the totem animal, by having the picture of it
 tattooed upon himself, and in other ways. On the solemn occasions of
 birth, initiation into manhood or funeral obsequies this identification
 with the totem is carried out in deeds and words. Dances in which all
 the members of the tribe disguise themselves as their totem and act like
 it, serve various magic and religious purposes. Finally there are the
 ceremonies at which the totem animal is killed in a solemn manner[141].
 
 The social side of totemism is primarily expressed in a sternly
 observed commandment and in a tremendous restriction. The members of a
 totem clan are brothers and sisters, pledged to help and protect each
 other; if a member of the clan is slain by a stranger the whole tribe of
 the slayer must answer for the murder and the clan of the slain man
 shows its solidarity in the demand for expiation for the blood that has
 been shed. The ties of the totem are stronger than our ideas of family
 ties, with which they do not altogether coincide, since the transfer of
 the totem takes place as a rule through maternal inheritance, paternal
 inheritance possibly not counting at all in the beginning.
 
 But the corresponding taboo restriction consists in the prohibition
 against members of the same clan marrying each other or having any kind
 of sexual intercourse whatsoever with each other. This is the famous and
 enigmatic _exogamy_ connexion with totemism. We have devoted the whole
 first chapter of this book to it, and therefore need only mention here
 that this exogamy springs from the intensified incest dread of primitive
 races, that it becomes entirely comprehensible as a security against
 incest in group marriages, and that at first it accomplishes the
 avoidance of incest for the younger generation and only in the course
 of further development becomes a hindrance to the older generation as
 well[142].
 
 To this presentation of totemism by Frazer, one of the earliest in the
 literature on the subject, I will now add a few excerpts from one of the
 latest summaries. In the _Elements of the Psychology of Races_, which
 appeared in 1912, W. Wundt says[143]: The totem animal is considered
 the ancestral animal. Totem is therefore both a group name and a birth
 name and in the latter aspect this name has at the same time a
 mythological meaning. But all these uses of the conception play into
 each other and the particular meanings may recede so that in some cases
 the totems have become almost a mere nomenclature of the tribal
 divisions, while in others the idea of the descent or else the cultic
 meaning of the totem remains in the foreground.... The conception of the
 totem determines the _tribal_ arrangement and the _tribal organization_.
 These norms and their establishment in the belief and feelings of the
 members of the tribe account for the fact that originally the totem
 animal was certainly not considered merely a name for a group division
 but that it usually was considered the progenitor of the corresponding
 division.... This accounted for the fact that these animal ancestors
 enjoyed a cult.... This animal cult expresses itself primarily in the
 attitude towards the totem animal, quite aside from special ceremonies
 and ceremonial festivities: not only each individual animal but every
 representative of the same species was to a certain degree a sanctified
 animal; the member of the totem was forbidden to eat the flesh of the
 totem animal or he was allowed to eat it only under special
 circumstances. This is in accord with the significant contradictory
 phenomenon found in this connexion, namely, that under certain
 conditions there was a kind of ceremonial consumption of the totem
 flesh....
 
  ...But the most important social side of this totemic tribal
 arrangement consists in the fact that it was connected with certain
 rules of conduct for the relations of the groups with each other. The
 most important of these were the rules of conjugal relations. This
 tribal division is thus connected with an important phenomenon which
 first made its appearance in the totemic age, namely with exogamy.
 
 If we wish to arrive at the characteristics of the original totemism by
 sifting through everything that may correspond to later development or
 decline, we find the following essential facts: _The totems were
 originally only animals and were considered the ancestors of single
 tribes. The totem was hereditary only through the female line; it was
 forbidden to kill the totem_ (or to eat it, which under primitive
 conditions amounts to the same thing); _members of a totem were
 forbidden to have sexual intercourse with each other_[144].
 
 It may now seem strange to us that in the _Code du totmisme_ which
 Reinach has drawn up the one principal taboo, namely exogamy, does not
 appear at all while the assumption of the second taboo, namely the
 descent from the totem animal, is only casually mentioned. Yet Reinach
 is an author to whose work in this field we owe much and I have chosen
 his presentation in order to prepare us for the differences of opinion
 among the authors, which will now occupy our attention.
 
 
 2
 
 The more convinced we became that totemism had regularly formed a phase
 of every culture, the more urgent became the necessity of arriving at an
 understanding of it and of casting light upon the riddle of its nature.
 To be sure, everything about totemism is in the nature of a riddle; the
 decisive questions are the origin of the totem, the motivation of
 exogamy (or rather of the incest taboo which it represents) and the
 relation between the two, the totem organization and the incest
 prohibition. The understanding should be at once historical and
 psychological; it should inform us under what conditions this peculiar
 institution developed and to what psychic needs of man it has given
 expression.
 
 The reader will certainly be astonished to hear from how many different
 points of view the answer to these questions has been attempted and how
 far the opinions of expert investigators vary. Almost everything that
 might be asserted in general about totemism is doubtful; even the above
 statement of it, taken from an article by Frazer in 1887, cannot escape
 the criticism that it expresses an arbitrary preference of the author
 and would be challenged to-day by Frazer himself, who has repeatedly
 changed his view on the subject[145].
 
 It is quite obvious that the nature of totemism and exogamy could be
 most readily grasped if we could get into closer touch with the origin
 of both institutions. But in judging the state of affairs we must not
 forget the remark of Andrew Lang, that even primitive races have not
 preserved these original forms and the conditions of their origin, so
 that we are altogether dependent upon hypotheses to take the place of
 the observation we lack[146]. Among the attempted explanations some seem
 inadequate from the very beginning in the judgment of the psychologist.
 They are altogether too rational and do not take into consideration the
 effective character of what they are to explain. Others rest on
 assumptions which observation fails to verify; while still others appeal
 to facts which could better be subjected to another interpretation. The
 refutation of these various opinions as a rule hardly presents any
 difficulties; the authors are, as usual, stronger in the criticism which
 they practice on each other than in their own work. The final result as
 regards most of the points treated is a _non liquet_. It is therefore
 not surprising that most of the new literature on the subject, which we
 have largely omitted here, shows the unmistakable effort to reject a
 general solution of totemic problems as unfeasible. (See, for instance,
 B. Goldenweiser in the _Journal of American Folklore_ <small>XXIII</small>, 1910.
 Reviewed in the _Brittanica Year Book_, 1913.) I have taken the liberty
 of disregarding the chronological order in stating these contradictory
 hypotheses.
 
 
 (_a_) THE ORIGIN OF TOTEMISM
 
 The question of the origin of totemism can also be formulated as
 follows: How did primitive people come to select the names of animals,
 plants and inanimate objects for themselves and their tribes?[147]
 
 The Scotchman, MacLennan, who discovered totemism and exogamy for
 science[148], refrained from publishing his views of the origin of
 totemism. According to a communication of Andrew Lang[149] he was for a
 time inclined to trace totemism back to the custom of tattooing. I shall
 divide the accepted theories of the derivation of totemism into three
 groups, ([Greek:  a]) nominalistic, ([Greek:  b]) sociological, ([Greek:
  g]) psychological.
 
 
 ([Greek:  a]) _The Nominalistic Theories_
 
 The information about these theories will justify their summation under
 the headings I have used.
 
 Garcilaso de La Vega, a descendant of the Peruvian Inkas, who wrote the
 history of his race in the seventeenth century, is already said to have
 traced back what was known to him about totemic phenomena to the need of
 the tribes to differentiate themselves from each other by means of
 names[150]. The same idea appears centuries later in the _Ethnology_ of
 A. K. Keane where totems are said to be derived from heraldic badges
 through which individuals, families and tribes wanted to differentiate
 themselves[151].
 
 Max Mller expresses the same opinion about the meaning of the totem in
 his _Contributions to the Science of Mythology_[152]. A totem is said to
 be, 1. a mark of the clan, 2. a clan name, 3. the name of the ancestor
 of the clan, 4. the name of the object which the clan reveres. J. Pikler
 wrote later, in 1899, that men needed a permanent name for communities
 and individuals that could be preserved in writing.... Thus totemism
 arises, not from a religious, but from a prosaic everyday need of
 mankind. The giving of names, which is the essence of totemism, is a
 result of the technique of primitive writing. The totem is of the nature
 of an easily represented writing symbol. But if savages first bore the
 name of an animal they deduced the idea of relationship from this
 animal[153].
 
 Herbert Spencer[154], also, thought that the origin of totemism was to
 be found in the giving of names. The attributes of certain individuals,
 he showed, had brought about their being named after animals so that
 they had come to have names of honour or nicknames which continued in
 their descendants. As a result of the indefiniteness and
 incomprehensibility of primitive languages, these names are said to have
 been taken by later generations as proof of their descent from the
 animals themselves. Totemism would thus be the result of a mistaken
 reverence for ancestors.
 
 Lord Avebury (better known under his former name, Sir John Lubbock) has
 expressed himself quite similarly about the origin of totemism, though
 without emphasizing the misunderstanding. If we want to explain the
 veneration of animals we must not forget how often human names are
 borrowed from animals. The children and followers of a man who was
 called bear or lion naturally made this their ancestral name. In this
 way it came about that the animal itself came to be respected and
 finally venerated.
 
 Fison has advanced what seems an irrefutable objection to such a
 derivation of the totem name from the names of individuals[155]. He
 shows from conditions in Australia that the totem is always the mark of
 a group of people and never of an individual. But if it were otherwise,
 if the totem was originally the name of a single individual, it could
 never, with the system of maternal inheritance, descend to his children.
 
 The theories thus far stated are evidently inadequate. They may explain
 how animal names came to be applied to primitive tribes but they can
 never explain the importance attached to the giving of names which
 constitutes the totemic system. The most noteworthy theory of this
 group has been developed by Andrew Lang in his books, _Social Origins_,
 1903, and _The Secret of the Totem_, 1905. This theory still makes
 naming the centre of the problem, but it uses two interesting
 psychological factors and thus may claim to have contributed to the
 final solution of the riddle of totemism.
 
 Andrew Lang holds that it does not make any difference how clans
 acquired their animal names. It might be assumed that one day they awoke
 to the consciousness that they had them without being able to account
 from where they came. _The origin of these names had been forgotten._ In
 that case they would seek to acquire more information by pondering over
 their names, and with their conviction of the importance of names they
 necessarily came to all the ideas that are contained in the totemic
 system. For primitive men, as for savages of to-day and even for our
 children[156], a name is not indifferent and conventional as it seems to
 us, but is something important and essential. A mans name is one of the
 main constituents of his person and perhaps a part of his psyche. The
 fact that they had the same names as animals must have led primitive men
 to assume a secret and important bond between their persons and the
 particular animal species. What other bond than consanguinity could it
 be? But if the similarity of names once led to this assumption it could
 also account directly for all the totemic prohibitions of the blood
 taboo, including exogamy.
 
 No more than these three things--a group animal name of unknown origin;
 belief in a transcendental connexion between all bearers, human and
 bestial, of the same name; and belief in the blood superstitions--were
 needed to give rise to all the totemic creeds and practices, including
 exogamy (_Secret of the Totem_, p. 126).
 
 Langs explanation extends over two periods. It derives the totemic
 system of psychological necessity from the totem names, on the
 assumption that the origin of the naming has been forgotten. The other
 part of the theory now seeks to clear up the origin of these names. We
 shall see that it bears an entirely different stamp.
 
 This other part of the Lang theory is not markedly different from those
 which I have called nominalistic. The practical need of
 differentiation compelled the individual tribes to assume names and
 therefore they tolerated the names which every tribe ascribed to the
 other. This naming from without is the peculiarity of Langs
 construction. The fact that the names which thus originated were
 borrowed from animals is not further remarkable and need not have been
 felt by primitive men as abuse or derision. Besides, Lang has cited
 numerous cases from later epochs of history in which names given from
 without that were first meant to be derisive were accepted by those
 nicknamed and voluntarily borne (The Guises, Whigs and Tories). The
 assumption that the origin of these names was forgotten in the course of
 time connects this second part of the Lang theory with the first one
 just mentioned.
 
 
 ([Greek:  b]) _The Sociological Theories_
 
 S. Reinach, who successfully traced the relics of the totemic system in
 the cult and customs of later periods, though attaching from the very
 beginning only slight value to the factor of descent from the totem
 animal, once made the casual remark that totemism seemed to him to be
 nothing but _une hypertrophie de linstinct social_.[157]
 
 The same interpretation seems to permeate the new work of E. Durkheim,
 _Les Formes lmentaires de la Vie Religieuse; Le Systme Totmique en
 Australie_, 1912. The totem is the visible representative of the social
 religion of these races. It embodies the community, which is the real
 object of veneration.
 
 Other authors have sought a more intimate reason for the share which
 social impulses have played in the formation of totemic institutions.
 Thus A. C. Haddon has assumed that every primitive tribe originally
 lived on a particular plant or animal species and perhaps also traded
 with this food and exchanged it with other tribes. It then was
 inevitable that a tribe should become known to other tribes by the name
 of the animal which played such weighty rle with it. At the same time
 this tribe would develop a special familiarity with this animal, and a
 kind of interest for it which, however, was based upon the psychic
 motive of mans most elementary and pressing need, namely, hunger[158].
 
 The objections against this most rational of all the totem theories are
 that such a state of the food supply is never found among primitive men
 and probably never existed. Savages are the more omnivorous the lower
 they stand in the social scale. Besides, it is incomprehensible how such
 an exclusive diet could have developed an almost religious relation to
 the totem, culminating in an absolute abstention from the referred food.
 
 The first of the three theories about the origin of totemism which
 Frazer stated was a psychological one. We shall report it elsewhere.
 
 Frazers second theory, which we will discuss here, originated under the
 influence of an important publication by two investigators of the
 inhabitants of Central Australia[159].
 
 Spencer and Gillen describe a series of peculiar institutions, customs,
 and opinions of a group of tribes, the so-called Arunta nation, and
 Frazer subscribes to their opinion that these peculiarities are to be
 looked upon as characteristics of a primary state and that they can
 explain the first and real meaning of totemism.
 
 In the Arunta tribe itself (a part of the Arunta nation) these
 peculiarities are as follows:
 
 1. They have the division into totem clans but the totem is not
 hereditary but is individually determined (as will be shown later).
 
 2. The totem clans are not exogamous, and the marriage restrictions are
 brought about by a highly developed division into marriage classes which
 have nothing to do with the totems.
 
 3. The function of the totem clan consists of carrying out a ceremony
 which in a subtle magic manner brings about an increase of the edible
 totem. (This ceremony is called _Intichiuma_.)
 
 4. The Aruntas have a peculiar theory about conception and re-birth.
 They assume that the spirits of the dead who belonged to their totem
 wait for their re-birth in definite localities and penetrate into the
 bodies of the women who pass such a spot. When a child is born the
 mother states at which spirit abode she thinks she conceived her child.
 This determines the totem of the child. It is further assumed that the
 spirits (of the dead as well as of the re-born) are bound to peculiar
 stone amulets, called _Churinga_, which are found in these places.
 
 Two factors seem to have induced Frazer to believe that the oldest form
 of totemism had been found in the institution of the Aruntas. In the
 first place the existence of certain myths which assert that the
 ancestors of the Aruntas always lived on their totem animal, and that
 they married no other women except those of their own totem. Secondly,
 the apparent disregard of the sexual act in their theory of conception.
 People who have not yet realized that conception was the result of the
 sexual act might well be considered the most backward and primitive
 people living to-day.
 
 Frazer, in having recourse to the _Intichiuma_ ceremony to explain
 totemism, suddenly saw the totemic system in a totally different light
 as a thoroughly practical organization for accomplishing the most
 natural needs of man. (Compare Haddon above[160].) The system was simply
 an extraordinary piece of co-operative magic. Primitive men formed
 what might be called a magic production and consumption club. Each totem
 clan undertook to see to the cleanliness of a certain article of food.
 If it were a question of inedible totems like harmful animals, rain,
 wind, or similar objects, it was the duty of the totem clan to dominate
 this part of nature and to ward off its injuriousness. The efforts of
 each clan were for the good of all the others. As the clan could not eat
 its totem or could eat only a very little of it, it furnished this
 valuable product for the rest and was in turn furnished with what these
 had to take care of as their social totem duty. In the light of this
 interpretation furnished by the _Intichiuma_ ceremony, it appeared to
 Frazer as if the prohibition against eating the totem had misled
 observers to neglect the more important side of the relation, namely the
 commandment to supply as much as possible of the edible totem for the
 needs of others.
 
 Frazer accepted the tradition of the Aruntas that each totem clan had
 originally lived on its totem without any restriction. It then became
 difficult to understand the evolution that followed through which
 savages were satisfied to ensure the totem for others while they
 themselves abstained from eating it. He then assumed that this
 restriction was by no means the result of a kind of religious respect,
 but came about through the observation that no animal devoured its own
 kind, so that this break in the identification with the totem was
 injurious to the power which savages sought to acquire over the totem.
 Or else it resulted from the endeavour to make the being favourably
 disposed by sparing it. Frazer did not conceal the difficulties of this
 explanation from himself[161], nor did he dare to indicate in what way
 the habit of marrying within the totem, which the myths of the Aruntas
 proclaimed, was converted into exogamy.
 
 Frazers theory based on the _Intichiuma_, stands or falls with the
 recognition of the primitive nature of the Arunta institutions. But it
 seems impossible to hold to this in the fact of the objections advanced
 by Durkheim[162] and Lang[163]. The Aruntas seem on the contrary to be
 the most developed of the Australian tribes and to represent rather a
 dissolution stage of totemism than its beginning. The myths that made
 such an impression on Frazer because they emphasize, in contrast to
 prevailing institutions of to-day, that the Aruntas are free to eat the
 totem and to marry within it, easily explain themselves to us as wish
 phantasies, which are projected into the past, like the myths of the
 Golden Age.
 
 
 ([Greek:  g]) _The Psychological Theories_
 
 Frazers first psychological theories, formed before his acquaintance
 with the observations of Spencer and Gillen, were based upon the belief
 in an outward soul[164]. The totem was meant to represent a safe place
 of refuge where the soul is deposited in order to avoid the dangers
 which threaten it. After primitive man had housed his soul in his totem
 he himself became invulnerable and he naturally took care himself not to
 harm the bearer of his soul. But as he did not know which individual of
 the species in question was the bearer of his soul he was concerned in
 sparing the whole species. Frazer himself later gave up this derivation
 of totemism from the belief in souls.
 
 When he became acquainted with the observations of Spencer and Gillen
 he set up the other social theory which has just been stated, but he
 himself then saw that the motive from which he had derived totemism was
 altogether too rational and that he had assumed a social organization
 for it which was altogether too complicated to be called primitive[165].
 The magic co-operative companies now appeared to him rather as the fruit
 than as the germ of totemism. He sought a simpler factor for the
 derivation of totemism in the shape of a primitive superstition behind
 these forms. He then found this original factor in the remarkable
 conception theory of the Aruntas.
 
 As already stated, the Aruntas establish no connexion between conception
 and the sexual act. If a woman feels herself to be a mother it means
 that at that moment one of the spirits from the nearest spirit abode who
 has been watching for a re-birth, has penetrated into her body and is
 born as her child. This child has the same totem as all the spirits that
 lurk in that particular locality. But if we are willing to go back a
 step further and assume that the woman originally believed that the
 animal, plant, stone, or other object which occupied her fancy at the
 moment when she first felt herself pregnant had really penetrated into
 her and was being born through her in human form, then the identity of a
 human being with his totem would really be founded on the belief of the
 mother, and all the other totem commandments (with the exception of
 exogamy) could easily be derived from this belief. Men would refuse to
 eat the particular animal or plant because it would be just like eating
 themselves. But occasionally they would be impelled to eat some of their
 totem in a ceremonial manner because they could thus strengthen their
 identification with the totem, which is the essential part of totemism.
 W. H. R. Rivers observations among the inhabitants of the Bank Islands
 seemed to prove mens direct identification with their totems on the
 basis of such a conception theory[166].
 
 The ultimate sources of totemism would then be the ignorance of savages
 as to the process of procreation among human beings and animals;
 especially their ignorance as to the rle which the male plays in
 fertilization. This ignorance must be facilitated by the long interval
 which is interposed between the fertilizing act and the birth of the
 child or the sensation of the childs first movements. Totemism is
 therefore a creation of the feminine mind and not of the masculine. The
 sick fancies of the pregnant woman are the roots of it. Anything indeed
 that struck a woman at that mysterious moment of her life when she first
 knows herself to be a mother might easily be identified by her with the
 child in her womb. Such maternal fancies, so natural and seemingly so
 universal, appear to be the root of totemism[167].
 
 The main objection to this third theory of Frazers is the same which
 has already been advanced against his second, sociological theory. The
 Aruntas seem to be far removed from the beginnings of totemism. Their
 denial of fatherhood does not apparently rest upon primitive ignorance;
 in many cases they even have paternal inheritance. They seem to have
 sacrificed fatherhood to a kind of a speculation which strives to honour
 the ancestral spirits[168]. Though they raise the myth of immaculate
 conception through a spirit to a general theory of conception, we cannot
 for that reason credit them with ignorance as to the conditions of
 procreation any more than we could the old races who lived during the
 rise of the Christian myths.
 
 Another psychological theory of the origin of totemism has been
 formulated by the Dutch writer, G. A. Wilcken. It establishes a
 connexion between totemism and the migration of souls. The animal into
 which, according to general belief, the souls of the dead passed, became
 a blood relative, an ancestor, and was revered as such. But the belief
 in the souls migration to animals is more readily derived from totemism
 than inversely[169].
 
 Still another theory of totemism is advanced by the excellent American
 ethnologists, Franz Boas, Hill-Tout, and others. It is based on
 observations of totemic Indian tribes and asserts that the totem is
 originally the guardian spirit of an ancestor who has acquired it
 through a dream and handed it on to his descendants. We have already
 heard the difficulties which the derivation of totemism through
 inheritance from a single individual offers; besides, the Australian
 observations seem by no means to support the tracing back of the totem
 to the guardian spirit[170].
 
 Two facts have become decisive for the last of the psychological
 theories as stated by Wundt; in the first place, that the original and
 most widely known totem object was an animal, and secondly, that the
 earliest totem animals corresponded to animals which had a soul[171].
 Such animals as birds, snakes, lizards, mice are fitted by their extreme
 mobility, their flight through the air, and by other characteristics
 which arouse surprise and fear, to become the bearers of souls which
 leave their bodies. The totem animal is a descendant of the animal
 transformations of the spirit-soul. Thus with Wundt totemism is directly
 connected with the belief in souls or with animism.
 
 
 (b) and (c) THE ORIGIN OF EXOGAMY AND ITS RELATION TO TOTEMISM
 
 I have put forth the theories of totemism with considerable detail and
 yet I am afraid that I have not made them clear enough on account of the
 condensation that was constantly necessary. In the interest of the
 reader I am taking the liberty of further condensing the other questions
 that arise. The discussions about the exogamy of totem races become
 especially complicated and untractable, one might even say confused, on
 account of the nature of the material used. Fortunately the object of
 this treatise permits me to limit myself to pointing out several
 guide-posts and referring to the frequently quoted writings of experts
 in the field for a more thorough pursuit of the subject.
 
 The attitude of an author to the problems of exogamy is of course not
 independent of the stand he has taken toward one or the other of the
 totem theories. Some of these explanations of totemism lack all
 connexion with exogamy so that the two institutions are entirely
 separated. Thus we find here two opposing views, one of which clings to
 the original likelihood that exogamy is an essential part of the totemic
 system while the other disputes such a connection and believes in an
 accidental combination of these two traits of the most ancient cultures.
 In his later works Frazer has emphatically stood for this latter point
 of view.
 
 I must request the reader to bear constantly in mind that the two
 institutions of totemism and exogamy are fundamentally distinct in
 origin and nature though they have accidentally crossed and blended in
 many tribes. (_Totemism and Exogamy_ I, Preface XII.)
 
 He warns directly against the opposite view as being a source of endless
 difficulties and misunderstandings. In contrast to this, many authors
 have found a way of conceiving exogamy as a necessary consequence of the
 basic views on totemism. Durkheim[172] has shown in his writings how
 the taboo, which is attached to the totem, must have entailed the
 prohibition against putting a woman of the same totem to sexual uses.
 The totem is of the same blood as the human being and for this reason
 the blood bann (in reference to defloration and menstruation) forbids
 sexual intercourse with a woman of the same totem[173]. Andrew Lang, who
 here agrees with Durkheim, goes so far as to believe that the blood
 taboo was not necessary to bring about the prohibition in regard to the
 women of the same tribe[174]. The general totem taboo which, for
 instance, forbids any one to sit in the shadow of the totem tree, would
 have sufficed. Andrew Lang also contends for another derivation of
 exogamy (see below) and leaves it in doubt how these two explanations
 are related to each other.
 
 As regards the temporal relations, the majority of authors subscribe to
 the opinion that totemism is the older institution and that exogamy came
 later[175].
 
 Among the theories which seek to explain exogamy independently of
 totemism only a few need be mentioned in so far as they illustrate
 different attitudes of the authors towards the problem of incest.
 
 MacLennan[176] had ingeniously guessed that exogamy resulted from the
 remnants of customs pointing to earlier forms of female rape. He assumed
 that it was the general custom in ancient times to procure women from
 strange tribes so that marriage with a woman from the same tribe
 gradually became improper because it was unusual. He sought the motive
 for the exogamous habit in the scarcity of women among these tribes,
 which had resulted from the custom of killing most female children at
 birth. We are not concerned here with investigation whether actual
 conditions corroborate MacLennans assumptions. We are more interested
 in the argument that these premises still leave it unexplained why the
 male members of the tribe should have made these few women of their
 blood inaccessible to themselves, as well as in the manner in which the
 incest problem is here entirely neglected[177].
 
 Other writers have on the contrary assumed, and evidently with more
 right, that exogamy is to be interpreted as an institution for the
 prevention of incest[178].
 
 If we survey the gradually increasing complication of Australian
 marriage restrictions we can hardly help agreeing with the opinion of
 Morgan Frazer, Hewitt and Baldwin Spencer[179], that these institutions
 bear the stamp of deliberate design, as Frazer puts it, and that they
 were meant to do what they have actually accomplished. In no other way
 does it seem possible to explain in all its details a system at once so
 complex and so regular[180].
 
 It is of interest to point out that the first restrictions which the
 introduction of marriage classes brought about affected the sexual
 freedom of the younger generation, in other words, incest between
 brothers and sisters and between sons and mothers, while incest between
 father and daughter was only abrogated by more sweeping measures.
 
 However, to trace back exogamous sexual restrictions to legal intentions
 does not add anything to the understanding of the motive which created
 these institutions. From what source, in the final analysis, springs the
 dread of incest which must be recognized as the root of exogamy? It
 evidently does not suffice to appeal to an instinctive aversion against
 sexual intercourse with blood relatives, that is to say, to the fact of
 incest dread, in order to explain the dread of incest, if social
 experience shows that, in spite of this instinct, incest is not a rare
 occurrence even in our society, and if the experience of history can
 acquaint us with cases in which incestuous marriage of privileged
 persons was made the rule.
 
 Westermarck[181] advanced the following to explain the dread of incest:
 that an innate aversion against sexual intercourse exists between
 persons who live together from childhood and that this feeling, since
 such persons are as a rule consanguineous, finds a natural expression in
 custom and law through the abhorrence of sexual intercourse between
 those closely related. Though Havelock Ellis disputed the instinctive
 character of this aversion in the _Studies in the Psychology of Sex_, he
 otherwise supported the same explanation in its essentials by declaring:
 The normal absence of the manifestation of the pairing instinct where
 brothers and sisters or boys and girls living together from childhood
 are concerned, is a purely negative phenomenon due to the fact that
 under these circumstances the antecedent conditions for arousing the
 mating instinct must be entirely lacking.... For persons who have grown
 up together from childhood habit has dulled the sensual attraction of
 seeing, hearing and touching and has led it into a channel of quiet
 attachment, robbing it of its power to call forth the necessary
 erethistic excitement required to produce sexual tumescence.
 
 It seems to me very remarkable that Westermarck looks upon this innate
 aversion to sexual intercourse with persons with whom we have shared
 childhood as being at the same time a psychic representative of the
 biological fact that inbreeding means injury to the species. Such a
 biological instinct would hardly go so far astray in its psychological
 manifestation as to affect the companions of home and hearth which in
 this respect are quite harmless, instead of the blood relatives which
 alone are injurious to procreation. And I cannot resist citing the
 excellent criticism which Frazer opposes to Westermarcks assertion.
 Frazer finds it incomprehensible that sexual sensibility to-day is not
 at all opposed to sexual intercourse with companions of the hearth and
 home while the dread of incest, which is said to be nothing but an
 offshoot of this reluctance, has nowadays grown to be so overpowering.
 But other remarks of Frazers go deeper and I set them down here in
 unabbreviated form because they are in essential agreement with the
 arguments developed in my chapter on taboo.
 
 It is not easy to see why any deep human instinct should need
 reinforcement through law. There is no law commanding men to eat and
 drink, or forbidding them to put their hands in the fire. Men eat and
 drink and keep their hands out of the fire instinctively, for fear of
 natural, not legal penalties, which would be entailed by violence done
 to these instincts. The law only forbids men to do what their instincts
 incline them to do; what nature itself prohibits and punishes it would
 be superfluous for the law to prohibit and punish. Accordingly we may
 always safely assume that crimes forbidden by law are crimes which many
 men have a natural propensity to commit. If there were no such
 propensity there would be no such crimes, and if no such crimes were
 committed, what need to forbid them? Instead of assuming therefore, from
 the legal prohibition of incest, that there is a natural aversion to
 incest we ought rather to assume that there is a natural instinct in
 favour of it, and that if the law represses it, it does so because
 civilized men have come to the conclusion that the satisfaction of these
 natural instincts is detrimental to the general interests of
 society[182].
 
 To this valuable argument of Frazers I can add that the experiences of
 psychoanalysis make the assumption of such an innate aversion to
 incestuous relations altogether impossible. They have taught, on the
 contrary, that the first sexual impulses of the young are regularly of
 an incestuous nature and that such repressed impulses play a rle which
 can hardly be overestimated as the motive power of later neuroses.
 
 The interpretation of incest dread as an innate instinct must therefore
 be abandoned. The same holds true of another derivation of the incest
 prohibition which counts many supporters, namely the assumption that
 primitive races very soon observed the dangers with which inbreeding
 threatened their race and that they therefore had decreed the incest
 prohibition with a conscious purpose. The objections to this attempted
 explanation crowd upon each other[183]. Not only must the prohibition of
 incest be older than all breeding of domestic animals from which men
 could derive experience of the effect of inbreeding upon the
 characteristics of the breed, but the harmful consequences of inbreeding
 are not established beyond all doubt even to-day and in man they can be
 shown only with difficulty. Besides, everything that we know about
 contemporaneous savages makes it very improbable that the thoughts of
 their far-removed ancestors should already have been occupied with
 preventing injury to their later descendants. It sounds almost
 ridiculous to attribute hygienic and eugenic motives such as have hardly
 yet found consideration in our culture, to these children of the race
 who lived without thought of the morrow[184].
 
 And finally it must be pointed out that a prohibition against inbreeding
 as an element weakening to the race, which is imposed from practical
 hygienic motives, seems quite inadequate to explain the deep abhorrence
 which our society feels against incest. This dread of incest, as I have
 shown elsewhere[185], seems to be even more active and stronger among
 primitive races living to-day than among the civilized.
 
 In inquiring into the origin of incest dread it could be expected that
 here also there is the choice between possible explanations of a
 sociological, biological, and psychological nature in which the
 psychological motives might have to be considered as representative of
 biological forces. Still, in the end, one is compelled to subscribe to
 Frazers resigned statement, namely, that we do not know the origin of
 incest dread and do not even know how to guess at it. None of the
 solutions of the riddle thus far advanced seems satisfactory to us[186].
 
 I must mention another attempt to explain the origin of incest dread
 which is of an entirely different nature from those considered up to
 now. It might be called an historic explanation.
 
 This attempt is associated with a hypothesis of Charles Darwin about the
 primal social state of man. From the habits of the higher apes Darwin
 concluded that man, too, lived originally in small hordes in which the
 jealousy of the oldest and strongest male prevented sexual promiscuity.
 We may indeed conclude from what we know of the jealousy of all male
 quadrupeds, armed, as many of them are, with special weapons for
 battling with their rivals, that promiscuous intercourse in a state of
 nature is extremely improbable.... If we therefore look back far enough
 into the stream of time and judging from the social habits of man as he
 now exists, the most probable view is that he originally lived in small
 communities, each with a single wife, or if powerful with several, whom
 he jealously defended against all other men. Or he may not have been a
 social animal and yet have lived with several wives, like the gorilla;
 for all the natives agree that only the adult male is seen in a band;
 when the young male grows up a contest takes place for mastery, and the
 strongest, by killing and driving out the others, establishes himself as
 the head of the community (Dr Savage in the Boston _Journal of Natural
 History_, Vol. V, 1845-7). The younger males being thus driven out and
 wandering about would also, when at last successful in finding a
 partner, prevent too close breeding within the limits of the same
 family[187].
 
 Atkinson[188] seems to have been the first to recognize that these
 conditions of the Darwinian primal horde would in practice bring about
 the exogamy of the young men. Each one of those driven away could found
 a similar horde in which, thanks to jealousy of the chief, the same
 prohibition as to sexual intercourse obtained, and in the course of time
 these conditions would have brought about the rule which is now known as
 law: no sexual intercourse with the members of the horde. After the
 advent of totemism the rule would have changed into a different form: no
 sexual intercourse within the totem.
 
 Andrew Lang[189] declared himself in agreement with this explanation of
 exogamy. But in the same book he advocates the other theory of Durkheim
 which explains exogamy as a consequence of the totem laws. It is not
 altogether easy to combine the two interpretations; in the first case
 exogamy would have existed before totemism; in the second case it would
 be a consequence of it[190].
 
 
 3
 
 Into this darkness psychoanalytic experience throws one single ray of
 light.
 
 The relation of the child to animals has much in common with that of
 primitive man. The child does not yet show any trace of the pride which
 afterwards moves the adult civilized man to set a sharp dividing line
 between his own nature and that of all other animals. The child
 unhesitatingly attributes full equality to animals; he probably feels
 himself more closely related to the animal than to the undoubtedly
 mysterious adult, in the freedom with which he acknowledges his needs.
 
 Not infrequently a curious disturbance manifests itself in this
 excellent understanding between child and animal. The child suddenly
 begins to fear a certain animal species and to protect himself against
 seeing or touching any individual of this species. There results the
 clinical picture of _animal phobia_, which is one of the most frequent
 among the psychoneurotic diseases of this age and perhaps the earliest
 form of such an ailment. The phobia is as a rule in regard to animals
 for which the child has until then shown the liveliest interest and has
 nothing to do with the individual animal. In cities the choice of
 animals which can become the object of phobia is not great. They are
 horses, dogs, cats, more seldom birds, and strikingly often very small
 animals like bugs and butterflies. Sometimes animals which are known to
 the child only from picture books and fairy stories become objects of
 the senseless and inordinate anxiety which is manifested with these
 phobias; it is seldom possible to learn the manner in which such an
 unusual choice of anxiety has been brought about. I am indebted to Dr
 Karl Abraham for the report of a case in which the child itself
 explained its fear of wasps by saying that the colour and the stripes of
 the body of the wasp had made it think of the tiger of which, from all
 that it had heard, it might well be afraid.
 
 The animal phobias have not yet been made the object of careful
 analytical investigation, although they very much merit it. The
 difficulties of analysing children of so tender an age have probably
 been the motive of such neglect. It cannot therefore be asserted that
 the general meaning of these illnesses is known, and I myself do not
 think that it would turn out to be the same in all cases. But a number
 of such phobias directed against larger animals have proved accessible
 to analysis and have thus betrayed their secret to the investigator. In
 every case it was the same: the fear at bottom was of the father, if the
 children examined were boys, and was merely displaced upon the animal.
 
 Every one of any experience in psychoanalysis has undoubtedly seen such
 cases and has received the same impression from them. But I can refer to
 only a few detailed reports on the subject. This is an accident of the
 literature of such cases, from which the conclusion should not be drawn
 that our general assertion is based on merely scattered observation. For
 instance I mention an author, M. Wulff of Odessa, who has very
 intelligently occupied himself with the neuroses of childhood. He tells,
 in relating the history of an illness, that a nine year old boy suffered
 from a dog phobia at the age of four. When he saw a dog running by on
 the street he wept and cried: Dear dog, dont touch me, I will be
 good. By being good he meant not to play violin any more (to
 practise onanism)[A].
 
 The same author later sums up as follows: His dog phobia is really his
 fear of the father displaced upon the dog, for his peculiar expression:
 Dog, I will be good--that is to say, I will not masturbate--really
 refers to the father who has forbidden masturbation. He then adds
 something in a note which fully agrees with my experience and at the
 same time bears witness to the abundance of such experiences: such
 phobias (of horses, dogs, cats, chickens and other domestic animals)
 are, I think, at least as prevalent as _pavor nocturnus_ in childhood,
 and usually reveal themselves in the analysis as a displacement of fear
 from one of the parents to animals. I am not prepared to assert that the
 wide-spread mouse and rat phobia has the same mechanism.
 
 I reported the Analysis of the Phobia of a five-year-old Boy[191]
 which the father of the little patient had put at my disposal. It was a
 fear of horses as a result of which the boy refused to go on the street.
 He expressed his apprehension that the horse would come into the room
 and bite him. It proves that this was meant to be the punishment for his
 wish that the horse should fall over (die). After assurances had
 relieved the boy of his fear of his father, it proved that he was
 fighting against wishes whose content was the absence (departure or
 death) of the father. He indicated only too plainly that he felt the
 father to be his rival for the favour of the mother, upon whom his
 budding sexual wishes were by dark premonitions directed. He therefore
 had the typical attitude of the male child to its parents which we call
 the Oedipus complex in which we recognize the central complex of the
 neuroses in general. Through the analysis, of little John we have
 learnt a fact which is very valuable in relation to totemism, namely,
 that under such conditions the child displaces a part of its feelings
 from the father upon some animal.
 
 Analysis showed the paths of association, both significant and
 accidental in content, along which such a displacement took place. It
 also allowed one to guess the motives for the displacement. The hate
 which resulted from the rivalry for the mother could not permeate the
 boys psychic life without being inhibited; he had to contend with the
 tenderness and admiration which he had felt for his father from the
 beginning, so that the child assumed a double or ambivalent emotional
 attitude towards the father and relieved himself of this ambivalent
 conflict by displacing his hostile and anxious feelings upon a
 substitute for the father. The displacement could not, however, relieve
 the conflict by bringing about a smooth division between the tender and
 the hostile feelings. On the contrary, the conflict was continued in
 reference to the object to which displacement has been made and to which
 also the ambivalence spreads. There was no doubt that little John had
 not only fear, but respect and interest for horses. As soon as his fear
 was moderated he identified himself with the feared animal; he jumped
 around like a horse, and now it was he who bit the father[192]. In
 another stage of solution of the phobia he did not scruple to identify
 his parents with other large animals[193].
 
 We may venture the impression that certain traits of totemism return as
 a negative expression in these animal phobias of children. But we are
 indebted to S. Ferenczi for a beautiful individual observation of what
 must be called a case of positive totemism in the child[194]. It is true
 that with the little Arpd, whom Ferenczi reports, the totemic interests
 do not awaken in direct connexion with the Oedipus complex, but on the
 basis of a narcistic premise, namely, the fear of castration. But
 whoever looks attentively through the history of little John will also
 find there abundant proof that the father was admired as the possessor
 of large genitals and was feared as threatening the childs own
 genitals. In the Oedipus as well as in the castration complex the father
 plays the same rle of feared opponent to the infantile sexual
 interests. Castration and its substitute through blinding is the
 punishment he threatens[195].
 
 When little Arpd was two and a half years old he once tried, while at a
 summer resort, to urinate into the chicken coop, and on this occasion a
 chicken bit his penis or snapped at it. When he returned to the same
 place a year later he became a chicken himself, was interested only in
 the chicken coop and in everything that occurred there, and gave up
 human speech for cackling and crowing. During the period of
 observation, at the age of five, he spoke again, but his speech was
 exclusively about chickens and other fowl. He played with no other toy
 and sang only songs in which there was something about poultry. His
 behaviour towards his totem animal was subtly ambivalent, expressing
 itself in immoderate hating and loving. He loved best to play killing
 chickens. The slaughtering of poultry was quite a festival for him. He
 could dance around the animals bodies for hours at a time in a state of
 intense excitement[196]. But then he kissed and stroked the slaughtered
 animal, and cleaned and caressed the chicken effigies which he himself
 had ill-used.
 
 Arpd himself saw to it that the meaning of his curious activity could
 not remain hidden. At times he translated his wishes from the totemic
 method, of expression back into that of everyday life. Now I am small,
 now I am a chicken. When I get bigger I shall be a fowl. When I am
 bigger still, I shall be a cock. On another occasion he suddenly
 expressed the wish to eat a potted mother (by analogy, potted fowl).
 He was very free with open threats of castration against others, just as
 he himself had received them on account of onanistic preoccupation with
 his penis.
 
 According to Ferenczi there was no doubt as to the source of his
 interest in the activities of the chicken yard: The continual sexual
 activity between cock and hen, the laying of eggs and the creeping out
 of the young brood[197] satisfied his sexual curiosity which really was
 directed towards human family life. His object wishes have been formed
 on the model of chicken life when we find him saying to a woman
 neighbour: I am going to marry you and your sister and my three cousins
 and the cook; no, instead of the cook Ill marry my mother.
 
 We shall be able to complete our consideration of these observations
 later; at present we will only point out two traits that show a valuable
 correspondence with totemism: the complete identification with the totem
 animal[198], and the ambivalent affective attitude towards it. In view
 of these observations we consider ourselves justified in substituting
 the father for the totem animal in the males formula of totemism. We
 then notice that in doing so we have taken no new or especially daring
 step. For primitive men say it themselves and, as far as the totemic
 system is still in effect to-day, the totem is called ancestor and
 primal father. We have only taken literally an expression of these races
 which ethnologists did not know what to do with and were therefore
 inclined to put it into the background. Psychoanalysis warns us, on the
 contrary, to emphasize this very point and to connect it with the
 attempt to explain totemism[199].
 
 The first result of our substitution is very remarkable. If the totem
 animal is the father, then the two main commandments of totemism, the
 two taboo rules which constitute its nucleus,--not to kill the totem
 animal and not to use a woman belonging to the same totem for sexual
 purposes,--agree in content with the two crimes of Oedipus, who slew his
 father and took his mother to wife, and also with the childs two primal
 wishes whose insufficient repression or whose re-awakening forms the
 nucleus of perhaps all neuroses. If this similarity is more than a
 deceptive play of accident it would perforce make it possible for us to
 shed light upon the origin of totemism in prehistoric times. In other
 words, we should succeed in making it probable that the totemic system
 resulted from the conditions underlying the Oedipus complex, just as the
 animal phobia of little John and the poultry perversion of little
 Arpd resulted from it. In order to trace this possibility we shall in
 what follows study a peculiarity of the totemic system or, as we may
 say, of the totemic religion, which until now could hardly be brought
 into the discussion.
 
 
 4
 
 W. Robertson Smith, who died in 1894, was a physicist, philologist,
 Bible critic, and archologist, a many-sided as well as keen and
 free-thinking man, expressed the assumption in his work, _The Religion
 of the Semites_[200], published in 1889, that a peculiar ceremony, the
 so-called _totem feast_, had, from the very beginning, formed an
 integral part of the totemic system. For the support of this supposition
 he had at his disposal at that time only a single description of such an
 act from the year 500 <small>A.D.</small>; he knew, however, how to give a high degree
 of probability to his assumption through his analysis of the nature of
 sacrifice among the old Semites. As sacrifice assumes a godlike person
 we are dealing here with an inference from a higher phase of religious
 rite to its lowest phase in totemism.
 
 I shall now cite from Robertson Smiths excellent book[201] those
 statements about the origin and meaning of the sacrificial right which
 are of great interest to us; I shall omit the only too numerous tempting
 details as well as the parts dealing with all later developments. In
 such an excerpt it is quite impossible to give the reader any sense of
 the lucidity or of the argumentative force of the original.
 
 Robertson Smith shows that sacrifice at the altar was the essential part
 of the rite of old religions. It plays the same rle in all religions,
 so that its origin must be traced back to very general causes whose
 effects were everywhere the same.
 
 But the sacrifice--the holy action [Greek:  katezog] (sacrificium
 [Greek:  ieronrgia])--originally meant something different from what
 later times understood by it: the offering to the deity in order to
 reconcile him or to incline him to be favourable. The profane use of the
 word was afterwards derived from the secondary sense of self-denial. As
 is demonstrated the first sacrifice was nothing else than an act of
 social fellowship between the deity and his worshipper.
 
 Things to eat and drink were brought as sacrifice; man offered to his
 god the same things as those on which he himself lived, flesh, cereals,
 fruits, wine and oil. Only in regard to sacrificial flesh did there
 exist restrictions and exceptions. The god partakes of the animal
 sacrifices with his worshippers while the vegetable sacrifices are left
 to him alone. There is no doubt that animal sacrifices are older and at
 one time were the only forms of sacrifice. The vegetable sacrifices
 resulted from the offering of the first-fruits and correspond to a
 tribute to the lord of the soil and the land. But animal sacrifice is
 older than agriculture.
 
 Linguistic survivals make it certain that the part of the sacrifice
 destined for the god was looked upon as his real food. This conception
 became offensive with the progressive dematerialization of the deity,
 and was avoided by offering the deity only the liquid part of the meal.
 Later the use of fire, which made the sacrificial flesh ascend in smoke
 from the altar, made it possible to prepare human food in such a way
 that it was more suitable for the deity. The drink sacrifice was
 originally the blood of the sacrificed animals; wine was used later as a
 substitute for the blood. Primitive man looked upon wine as the blood
 of the grape, as our poets still call it.
 
 The oldest form of sacrifice, older than the use of fire and the
 knowledge of agriculture, was therefore the sacrifice of animals, whose
 flesh and blood the god and his worshippers ate together. It was
 essential that both participants should receive their shares of the
 meal.
 
 Such a sacrifice was a public ceremony, the celebration of a whole clan.
 As a matter of fact all religion was a public affair; religious duty was
 a part of the social obligation. Sacrifice and festival go together
 among all races; each sacrifice entails a holiday and no holiday can be
 celebrated without a sacrifice. The sacrificial festival was an occasion
 for joyously transcending ones own interests and emphasizing social
 community and community with god.
 
 The ethical power of the public sacrificial feast was based upon primal
 conceptions of the meaning of eating and drinking in common. To eat and
 drink with some one was at the same time a symbol and a confirmation of
 social community and of the assumption of mutual obligations; the
 sacrificial eating gave direct expression to the fact that the god and
 his worshippers are communicants, thus confirming all their other
 relations. Customs that to-day still are in force among the Arabs of the
 desert prove that the binding force resulting from the common meal is
 not a religious factor but that the subsequent mutual obligations are
 due to the act of eating itself. Whoever has shared the smallest bite
 with such a Bedouin, or has taken a swallow of his milk, need not fear
 him any longer as an enemy, but may be sure of his protection and help.
 Not indeed, forever, strictly speaking this lasts only while it may be
 assumed that the food partaken remains in the body. So realistically is
 the bond of union conceived; it requires repetition to strengthen it and
 make it endure.
 
 But why is this binding power ascribed to eating and drinking in common?
 In the most primitive societies there is only one unconditional and
 never failing bond, that of kinship. The members of a community stand by
 each other jointly and severally, a kin is a group of persons whose life
 is so bound into a physical unity that they can be considered as parts
 of a common life. In case of the murder of one of this kin they
 therefore do not say: the blood of so and so has been spilt, but our
 blood has been spilt. The Hebraic phrase by which the tribal relation is
 acknowledged is: Thou art my bone and my flesh. Kinship therefore
 signifies having part in a general substance. It is natural then that it
 is based not only upon the fact that we are a part of the substance of
 our mother who has borne us, and whose milk nourished us, but also that
 the food eaten later through which the body is renewed, can acquire and
 strengthen kinship. If one shared a meal with ones god the conviction
 was thus expressed that one was of the same substance as he; no meal was
 therefore partaken with any one recognized as a stranger.
 
 The sacrificial repast was therefore originally a feast of the kin,
 following the rule that only those of kin could eat together. In our
 society the meal unites the members of the family; but the sacrificial
 repast has nothing to do with the family. Kinship is older than family
 life; the oldest families known to us regularly comprised persons who
 belonged to various bonds of kinship. The men married women of strange
 clans and the children inherited the clan of the mother; there was no
 kinship between the man and the rest of the members of the family. In
 such a family there was no common meal. Even to-day savages eat apart
 and alone, and the religious prohibitions of totemism as to eating often
 make it impossible for them to eat with their wives and children.
 
 Let us now turn to the sacrificial animal. There was, as we have heard,
 no meeting of the kin without animal sacrifice, but, and this is
 significant, no animal was slaughtered except for such a solemn
 occasion. Without any hesitation the people ate fruits, game and the
 milk of domestic animals, but religious scruples made it impossible for
 the individual to kill a domestic animal for his own use. There is not
 the least doubt, says Robertson Smith, that every sacrifice was
 originally a clan sacrifice, and that the _killing of a sacrificial
 animal_ originally belonged to those acts which were _forbidden to the
 individual and were only justified if the whole kin assumed the
 responsibility_. Primitive men had only one class of actions, which were
 thus characterized, namely, actions which touched the holiness of the
 kins common blood. A life which no individual might take and which
 could be sacrificed only through the consent and participation of all
 the members of the clan was on the same plane as the life of a member of
 the kin. The rule that every guest of the sacrificial repast must
 partake of the flesh of the sacrificial animal, had the same meaning as
 the rule that the execution of a guilty member of the kin must be
 performed by the whole kin. In other words: the sacrificial animal was
 treated like one of kin; _the sacrificing community, its god, and the
 sacrificial animal were of the same blood_, and the members of a clan.
 
 On the basis of much evidence Robertson Smith identifies the sacrificial
 animal with the old totem animal. In a later age there were two kinds of
 sacrifices, those of domestic animals which usually were also eaten, and
 the unusual sacrifice of animals which were forbidden as being unclean.
 Further investigation then shows that these unclean animals were holy
 and that they were sacrificed to the gods to whom they were holy, that
 these animals were originally identified with the gods themselves and
 that at the sacrifice the worshippers in some way emphasized their blood
 relationship to the god and to the animal. But this difference between
 usual and mystic sacrifices does not hold good for still earlier
 times. Originally all animals were holy, their meat was forbidden and
 might be eaten only on solemn occasions, with the participation of the
 whole kin. The slaughter of the animal amounted to the spilling of the
 kins blood and had to be done with the same precautions and assurances
 against reproach.
 
 The taming of domestic animals and the rise of cattle-breeding seems
 everywhere to have put an end to the pure and rigorous totemism of
 earliest times[202]. But such holiness as still clung to domestic
 animals in what was now a pastoral religion, is sufficiently distinct
 for us to recognize its totemic character. Even in late classical times
 the rite in several localities prescribed flight for the sacrificer
 after the sacrifice, as if to escape revenge. In Greece the idea must
 once have been general that the killing of an ox was really a crime. At
 the Athenian festival of the Bouphonia a formal trial, to which all the
 participants were summoned, was instituted after the sacrifice. Finally
 it was agreed to put the blame for the murder upon the knife, which was
 then cast into the sea.
 
 In spite of the dread which protects the life of the animal as being of
 kin, it became necessary to kill it from time to time in solemn
 conclave, and to divide its flesh and blood among the members of the
 clan. The motive which commands this act reveals the deepest meaning of
 the essence of sacrifice. We have heard that in later times every eating
 in common, the participation in the same substance which entered into
 their bodies, established a holy bond between the communicants; in
 oldest time this meaning seemed to be attached only to participation in
 the substance of a holy sacrifice. _The holy mystery of the sacrificial
 death was justified in that only in this way could the holy bond be
 established which united the participants with each other and with their
 god[203]._
 
 This bond was nothing else than the life of the sacrificial animal which
 lived on its flesh and blood and was shared by all the participants by
 means of the sacrificial feast. Such an idea was the basis of all the
 _blood bonds_ through which men in still later times became pledged to
 each other. The thoroughly realistic conception of consanguinity as an
 identity of substance makes comprehensible the necessity of renewing it
 from time to time through the physical process of the sacrificial
 repast.
 
 We will now stop quoting from Robertson Smiths train of thought in
 order to give a condensed summary of what is essential in it. When the
 idea of private property came into existence sacrifice was conceived as
 a gift to the deity, as a transfer from the property of man to that of
 the god. But this interpretation left all the peculiarities of the
 sacrificial ritual unexplained. In oldest times the sacrificial animal
 itself had been holy and its life inviolate; it could be taken only in
 the presence of the god, with the whole tribe taking part and sharing
 the guilt in order to furnish the holy substance through the eating of
 which the members of the clan assured themselves of their material
 identity with each other and with the deity. The sacrifice was a
 sacrament, and the sacrificial animal itself was one of the kin. In
 reality it was the old totem animal, the primitive god himself through
 the slaying and eating of whom the members of the clan revived and
 assured their similarity with the god.
 
 From this analysis of the nature of sacrifice Robertson Smith drew the
 conclusion that the periodic killing and eating of the totem before the
 period when the _anthropomorphic deities were venerated_ was an
 important part of totem religion. The ceremonial of such a totem feast
 was preserved for us, he thought, in the description of a sacrifice in
 later times. Saint Nilus tells of a sacrificial custom of the Bedouins
 in the desert of Sinai towards the end of the fourth century <small>A.D.</small> The
 victim, a camel, was bound and laid upon a rough altar of stones; the
 leader of the tribe made the participants walk three times around the
 altar to the accompaniment of song, inflicted the first wound upon the
 animal and greedily drank the spurting blood; then the whole community
 threw itself upon the sacrifice, cut off pieces of the palpitating flesh
 with their swords and ate them raw in such haste that in a short
 interval between the rise of the morning star, for whom this sacrifice
 was meant, and its fading before the rays of the sun, the whole
 sacrificial animal, flesh, skin, bones, and entrails, were devoured.
 According to every testimony this barbarous rite, which speaks of great
 antiquity, was not a rare custom but the general original form of the
 totem sacrifice, which in later times underwent the most varied
 modifications.
 
 Many authors have refused to grant any weight to this conception of the
 totem feast because it could not be strengthened by direct observation
 at the stage of totemism. Robertson Smith himself has referred to
 examples in which the sacramental meaning of sacrifices seems certain,
 such as the human sacrifices of the Aztecs and others which recall the
 conditions of the totem feast, the bear sacrifices of the bear tribe of
 the _Ouataouaks_ in America, and the bear festival of the Ainus in
 Japan. Frazer has given a full account of these and similar cases in the
 two divisions of his great work that have last appeared[204]. An Indian
 tribe in California which reveres the buzzard, a large bird of prey,
 kills it once a year with solemn ceremony, whereupon the bird is mourned
 and its skin and feathers preserved. The Zuni Indians in New Mexico do
 the same thing with their holy turtle.
 
 In the _Intichiuma_ ceremonies of Central Australian tribes a trait has
 been observed which fits in excellently with the assumptions of
 Robertson Smith. Every tribe that practises magic for the increase of
 its totem, which it cannot eat itself, is bound to eat a part of its
 totem at the ceremony before it can be touched by the other tribes.
 According to Frazer the best example of the sacramental consumption of
 the otherwise forbidden totem is to be found among the Bini in West
 Africa, in connexion with the burial ceremony of this tribe[205].
 
 But we shall follow Robertson Smith in the assumption that the
 sacramental killing and the common consumption of the otherwise
 forbidden totem animal was an important trait of the totem
 religion[206].
 
 
 5
 
 Let us now envisage the scene of such a totem meal and let us embellish
 it further with a few probable features which could not be adequately
 considered before. Thus we have the clan, which on a solemn occasion
 kills its totem in a cruel manner and eats it raw, blood, flesh, and
 bones. At the same time the members of the clan disguised in imitation
 of the totem, mimic it in sound and movement as if they wanted to
 emphasize their common identity. There is also the conscious realization
 that an action is being carried out which is forbidden to each
 individual and which can only be justified through the participation of
 all, so that no one is allowed to exclude himself from the killing and
 the feast. After the act is accomplished the murdered animal is bewailed
 and lamented. The death lamentation is compulsive, being enforced by the
 fear of a threatening retribution, and its main purpose is, as Robertson
 Smith remarks on an analogous occasion, to exculpate oneself from
 responsibility for the slaying[207].
 
 But after this mourning there follows loud festival gaiety accompanied
 by the unchaining of every impulse and the permission of every
 gratification. Here we find an easy insight into the nature of the
 _holiday_.
 
 A holiday is permitted, or rather a prescribed excess, a solemn
 violation of a prohibition. People do not commit the excesses which at
 all times have characterized holidays, as a result of an order to be in
 a holiday mood, but because in the very nature of a holiday there is
 excess; the holiday mood is brought about by the release of what is
 otherwise forbidden.
 
 But what has mourning over the death of the totem animal to do with the
 introduction of this holiday spirit? If men are happy over the slaying
 of the totem, which is otherwise forbidden to them, why do they also
 mourn it?
 
 We have heard that members of a clan become holy through the consumption
 of the totem and thereby also strengthen their identification with it
 and with each other. The fact that they have absorbed the holy life with
 which the substance of the totem is charged may explain the holiday mood
 and everything that results from it.
 
 Psychoanalysis has revealed to us that the totem animal is really a
 substitute for the father, and this really explains the contradiction
 that it is usually forbidden to kill the totem animal, that the killing
 of it results in a holiday and that the animal is killed and yet
 mourned. The ambivalent emotional attitude which to-day still marks the
 father complex in our children and so often continues into adult life
 also extended to the father substitute of the totem animal.
 
 But if we associate the translation of the totem as given by
 psychoanalysis, with the totem feast and the Darwinian hypothesis about
 the primal state of human society, a deeper understanding becomes
 possible and a hypothesis is offered which may seem fantastic but which
 has the advantage of establishing an unexpected unity among a series of
 hitherto separated phenomena.
 
 The Darwinian conception of the primal horde does not, of course, allow
 for the beginning of totemism. There is only a violent, jealous father
 who keeps all the females for himself and drives away the growing sons.
 This primal state of society has nowhere been observed. The most
 primitive organization we know, which to-day is still in force with
 certain tribes, is _associations of men_ consisting of members with
 equal rights, subject to the restrictions of the totemic system, and
 founded on matriarchy, or descent through the mother[208]. Can the one
 have resulted from the other, and how was this possible?
 
 By basing our argument upon the celebration of the totem we are in a
 position to give an answer: One day[209] the expelled brothers joined
 forces, slew and ate the father, and thus put an end to the father
 horde. Together they dared and accomplished what would have remained
 impossible for them singly. Perhaps some advance in culture, like the
 use of a new weapon, had given them the feeling of superiority. Of
 course these cannibalistic savages ate their victim. This violent primal
 father had surely been the envied and feared model for each of the
 brothers. Now they accomplished their identification with him by
 devouring him and each acquired a part of his strength. The totem feast,
 which is perhaps mankinds first celebration, would be the repetition
 and commemoration of this memorable, criminal act with which so many
 things began, social organization, moral restrictions and
 religion[210].
 
 In order to find these results acceptable, quite aside from our
 supposition, we need only assume that the group of brothers banded
 together were dominated by the same contradictory feelings towards the
 father which we can demonstrate as the content of ambivalence of the
 father complex in all our children and in neurotics. They hated the
 father who stood so powerfully in the way of their sexual demands and
 their desire for power, but they also loved and admired him. After they
 had satisfied their hate by his removal and had carried out their wish
 for identification with him, the suppressed tender impulses had to
 assert themselves[211]. This took place in the form of remorse, a sense
 of guilt was formed which coincided here with the remorse generally
 felt. The dead now became stronger than the living had been, even as we
 observe it to-day in the destinies of men. What the fathers presence
 had formerly prevented they themselves now prohibited in the psychic
 situation of subsequent obedience, which we know so well from
 psychoanalysis. They undid their deed by declaring that the killing of
 the father substitute, the totem, was not allowed, and renounced the
 fruits of their deed by denying themselves the liberated women. Thus
 they created the two fundamental taboos of totemism out of the _sense of
 guilt of the son_, and for this very reason these had to correspond with
 the two repressed wishes of the Oedipus complex. Whoever disobeyed
 became guilty of the two only crimes which troubled primitive
 society[212].
 
 The two taboos of totemism with which the morality of man begins are
 psychologically not of equal value. One of them, the sparing of the
 totem animal, rests entirely upon emotional motives; the father had been
 removed and nothing in reality could make up for this. But the other,
 the incest prohibition, had, besides, a strong practical foundation.
 Sexual need does not unite men; it separates them. Though the brothers
 had joined forces in order to overcome the father, each was the others
 rival among the women. Each one wanted to have them all to himself like
 the father, and in the fight of each against the other the new
 organization would have perished. For there was no longer any one
 stronger than all the rest who could have successfully assumed the rle
 of the father. Thus there was nothing left for the brothers, if they
 wanted to live together, but to erect the incest prohibition--perhaps
 after many difficult experiences--through which they all equally
 renounced the women whom they desired, and on account of whom they had
 removed the father in the first place. Thus they saved the organization
 which had made them strong and which could be based upon the homo-sexual
 feelings and activities which probably manifested themselves among them
 during the time of their banishment. Perhaps this situation also formed
 the germ of the institution of the mother right discovered by Bachofen,
 which was then abrogated by the patriarchal family arrangement.
 
 On the other hand the claim of totemism to be considered the first
 attempt at a religion is connected with the other taboo which protects
 the life of the totem animal. The feelings of the sons found a natural
 and appropriate substitute for the father in the animal, but their
 compulsory treatment of it expressed more than the need of showing
 remorse. The surrogate for the father was perhaps used in the attempt
 to assuage the burning sense of guilt, and to bring about a kind of
 reconciliation with the father. The totemic system was a kind of
 agreement with the father in which the latter granted everything that
 the childs phantasy could expect from him, protection, care, and
 forbearance, in return for which the pledge was given to honour his
 life, that is to say, not to repeat the act against the totem through
 which the real father had perished. Totemism also contained an attempt
 at justification, If the father had treated us like the totem we should
 never have been tempted to kill him. Thus totemism helped to gloss over
 the real state of affairs and to make one forget the event to which it
 owed its origin.
 
 In this connexion some features were formed which henceforth determined
 the character of every religion. The totem religion had issued from the
 sense of guilt of the sons as an attempt to palliate this feeling and to
 conciliate the injured father through subsequent obedience. All later
 religions prove to be attempts to solve the same problem, varying only
 in accordance with the stage of culture in which they are attempted and
 according to the paths which they take; they are all, however, reactions
 aiming at the same great event with which culture began and which ever
 since has not let mankind come to rest.
 
 There is still another characteristic faithfully preserved in religion
 which already appeared in totemism at this time. The ambivalent strain
 was probably too great to be adjusted by any arrangement, or else the
 psychological conditions are entirely unfavourable to any kind of
 settlement of these contradictory feelings. It is certainly noticeable
 that the ambivalence attached to the father complex also continues in
 totemism and in religions in general. The religion of totemism included
 not only manifestations of remorse and attempts at reconciliation, but
 also serves to commemorate the triumph over the father. The
 gratification obtained thereby creates the commemorative celebration of
 the totem feast at which the restrictions of subsequent obedience are
 suspended, and makes it a duty to repeat the crime of parricide through
 the sacrifice of the totem animal as often as the benefits of this deed,
 namely, the appropriation of the fathers properties, threaten to
 disappear as a result of the changed influences of life. We shall not be
 surprised to find that a part of the sons defiance also reappears,
 often in the most remarkable disguises and inversions, in the formation
 of later religions.
 
 If thus far we have followed, in religion and moral precepts--but little
 differentiated in totemism--the consequences of the tender impulses
 towards the father as they are changed into remorse, we must not
 overlook the fact that for the most part the tendencies which have
 impelled to parricide have retained the victory. The social and
 fraternal feelings on which this great change is based, henceforth for
 long periods exercises the greatest influence upon the development of
 society. They find expression in the sanctification of the common blood
 and in the emphasis upon the solidarity of life within the clan. In thus
 ensuring each others lives the brothers express the fact that no one of
 them is to be treated by the other as they all treated the father. They
 preclude a repetition of the fate of the father. The socially
 established prohibition against fratricide is now added to the
 prohibition against killing the totem, which is based on religious
 grounds. It will still be a long time before the commandment discards
 the restriction to members of the tribe and assumes the simple
 phraseology: Thou shalt not kill. At first the _brother clan_ has taken
 the place of the _father horde_ and was guaranteed by the blood bond.
 Society is now based on complicity in the common crime, religion on the
 sense of guilt and the consequent remorse, while morality is based
 partly on the necessities of society and partly on the expiation which
 this sense of guilt demands.
 
 Thus psychoanalysis, contrary to the newer conceptions of the totemic
 system and more in accord with older conceptions, bids us argue for an
 intimate connexion between totemism and exogamy as well as for their
 simultaneous origin.
 
 
 6
 
 I am under the influence of many strong motives which restrain me from
 the attempt to discuss the further development of religions from their
 beginning in totemism up to their present state. I shall follow out only
 two threads as I see them appearing in the weft with especial
 distinctness: the motive of the totem sacrifice and the relation of the
 son to the father[213].
 
 Robertson Smith has shown us that the old totem feast returns in the
 original form of sacrifice. The meaning of the rite is the same:
 sanctification through participation in the common meal. The sense of
 guilt, which can only be allayed through the solidarity of all the
 participants, has also been retained. In addition to this there is the
 tribal deity in whose supposed presence the sacrifice takes place, who
 takes part in the meal like a member of the tribe, and with whom
 identification is effected by the act of eating the sacrifice. How does
 the god come into this situation which originally was foreign to him?
 
 The answer might be that the idea of god had meanwhile appeared,--no one
 knows whence--and had dominated the whole religious life, and that the
 totem feast, like everything else that wished to survive, had been
 forced to fit itself into the new system. However, psychoanalytic
 investigation of the individual teaches with especial emphasis that god
 is in every case modelled after the father and that our personal
 relation to god is dependent upon our relation to our physical,
 fluctuating and changing with him, and that god at bottom is nothing but
 an exalted father. Here also, as in the case of totemism, psychoanalysis
 advises us to believe the faithful, who call god father just as they
 called the totem their ancestor. If psychoanalysis deserves any
 consideration at all, then the share of the father in the idea of a god
 must be very important, quite aside from all the other origins and
 meanings of god upon which psychoanalysis can throw no light. But then
 the father would be represented twice in primitive sacrifice, first as
 god, and secondly as the totem-animalsacrifice, and we must ask, with
 all due regard for the limited number of solutions which psychoanalysis
 offers, whether this is possible and what the meaning of it may be.
 
 We know that there are a number of relations of the god to the holy
 animal (the totem and the sacrificial animal): 1. Usually one animal is
 sacred to every god, sometimes even several animals. 2. In certain,
 especially holy, sacrifices, the so-called mystical sacrifices, the
 very animal which had been sanctified through the god was sacrificed to
 him[214]. 3. The god was often revered in the form of an animal, or from
 another point of view, animals enjoyed a godlike reverence long after
 the period of totemism. 4. In myths the god is frequently transformed
 into an animal, often into the animal that is sacred to him. From this
 the assumption was obvious that the god himself was the animal, and that
 he had evolved from the totem animal at a later stage of religious
 feeling. But the reflection that the totem itself is nothing but a
 substitute for the father relieves us of all further discussion. Thus
 the totem may have been the first form of the father substitute and the
 god a later one in which the father regained his human form. Such a new
 creation from the root of all religious evolution, namely, the longing
 for the father, might become possible if in the course of time an
 essential change had taken place in the relation to the father and
 perhaps also to the animal.
 
 Such changes are easily divined even if we disregard the beginning of a
 psychic estrangement from the animal as well as the disintegration of
 totemism through animal domestication[215]. The situation created by the
 removal of the father contained an element which in the course of time
 must have brought about an extraordinary increase of longing for the
 father. For the brothers who had joined forces to kill the father had
 each been animated by the wish to become like the father and had given
 expression to this wish by incorporating parts of the substitute for him
 in the totem feast. In consequence of the pressure which the bonds of
 the brother clan exercised upon each member, this wish had to remain
 unfulfilled. No one could or was allowed to attain the fathers
 perfection of power, which was the thing they had all sought. Thus the
 bitter feeling against the father which had incited to the deed could
 subside in the course of time, while the longing for him grew, and an
 ideal could arise having as a content the fullness of power and the
 freedom from restriction of the conquered primal father, as well as the
 willingness to subject themselves to him. The original democratic
 equality of each member of the tribe could no longer be retained on
 account of the interference of cultural changes; in consequence of which
 there arose a tendency to revive the old father ideal in the creation of
 gods through the veneration of those individuals who had distinguished
 themselves above the rest. That a man should become a god and that a god
 should die, which to-day seems to us an outrageous presumption, was
 still by no means offensive to the conceptions of classical
 antiquity[216]. But the deification of the murdered father from whom the
 tribe now derived its origin, was a much more serious attempt at
 expiation than the former covenant with the totem.
 
 In this evolution I am at a loss to indicate the place of the great
 maternal deities who perhaps everywhere preceded the paternal deities.
 But it seems certain that the change in the relation to the father was
 not restricted to religion but logically extended to the other side of
 human life influenced by the removal of the father, namely, the social
 organization. With the institution of paternal deities the fatherless
 society gradually changed into a patriarchal one. The family was a
 reconstruction of the former primal horde and also restored a great part
 of their former rights to the fathers. Now there were patriarchs again
 but the social achievements of the brother clan had not been given up
 and the actual difference between the new family patriarchs and the
 unrestricted primal father was great enough to ensure the continuation
 of the religious need, the preservation of the unsatisfied longing for
 the father.
 
 The father therefore really appears twice in the scene of sacrifice
 before the tribal god, once as the god and again as the
 totem-sacrificial-animal. But in attempting to understand this situation
 we must beware of interpretations which superficially seek to translate
 it as an allegory, and which forget the historical stages in the
 process. The twofold presence of the father corresponds to the two
 successive meanings of the scene. The ambivalent attitude towards the
 father as well as the victory of the sons tender emotional feelings
 over his hostile ones, have here found plastic expression. The scene of
 vanquishing the father, his greatest degradation, furnishes here the
 material to represent his highest triumph. The meaning which sacrifice
 has quite generally acquired is found in the fact that in the very same
 action which continues the memory of this misdeed it offers satisfaction
 to the father for the ignominy put upon him.
 
 In the further development the animal loses its sacredness and the
 sacrifice its relation to the celebration of the totem; the rite becomes
 a simple offering to the deity, a self-deprivation in favour of the god.
 God himself is now so exalted above man that he can be communicated with
 only through a priest as intermediary. At the same time the social order
 produces godlike kings who transfer the patriarchal system to the state.
 It must be said that the revenge of the deposed and reinstated father
 has been very cruel; it culminated in the dominance of authority. The
 subjugated sons have used the new relation to disburden themselves still
 more of their sense of guilt. Sacrifice, as it is now constituted, is
 entirely beyond their responsibility. God himself has demanded and
 ordained it. Myths in which the god himself kills the animal that is
 sacred to him, which he himself really is, belong to this phase. This is
 the greatest possible denial of the great misdeed with which society and
 the sense of guilt began. There is an unmistakable second meaning in
 this sacrificial demonstration. It expresses satisfaction at the fact
 that the earlier father substitute has been abandoned in favour of the
 higher conception of god. The superficial allegorical translation of the
 scene here roughly corresponds with its psychoanalytic interpretation by
 saying that god is represented as overcoming the animal part of his
 nature[217].
 
 But it would be erroneous to believe that in this period of renewed
 patriarchal authority the hostile impulses which belong to the father
 complex had entirely subsided. On the contrary, the first phases in the
 domination of the two new substitutive formations for the father, those
 of gods and kings, plainly show the most energetic expression of that
 ambivalence which is characteristic of religion.
 
 In his great work, _The Golden Bough_, Frazer has expressed the
 conjecture that the first kings of the Latin tribes were strangers who
 played the part of a deity and were solemnly sacrificed in this rle on
 specified holidays. The yearly sacrifice (self-sacrifice is a variant)
 of a god seems to have been an important feature of Semitic religions.
 The ceremony of human sacrifice in various parts of the inhabited world
 makes it certain that these human beings ended their lives as
 representatives of the deity. This sacrificial custom can still be
 traced in later times in the substitution of an inanimate imitation
 (doll) for the living person. The theanthropic god sacrifice into which
 unfortunately I cannot enter with the same thoroughness with which the
 animal sacrifice has been treated throws the clearest light upon the
 meaning of the older forms of sacrifice. It acknowledges with
 unsurpassable candour that the object of the sacrificial action has
 always been the same, being identical with what is now revered as a god,
 namely with the father. The question as to the relation of animal to
 human sacrifice can now be easily solved. The original animal sacrifice
 was already a substitute for a human sacrifice, for the solemn killing
 of the father, and when the father substitute regained its human form,
 the animal substitute could also be retransformed into a human
 sacrifice.
 
 Thus the memory of that first great act of sacrifice had proved to be
 indestructible despite all attempts to forget it, and just at the
 moment when men strove to get as far away as possible from its motives,
 the undistorted repetition of it had to appear in the form of the god
 sacrifice. I need not fully indicate here the developments of religious
 thought which made this return possible in the form of rationalizations.
 Robertson Smith who is, of course, far removed from the idea of tracing
 sacrifice back to this great event of mans primal history, says that
 the ceremony of the festivals in which the old Semites celebrated the
 death of a deity were interpreted as a commemoration of a mythical
 tragedy and that the attendant lament was not characterized by
 spontaneous sympathy, but displayed a compulsive character, something
 that was imposed by the fear of a divine wrath[218]. We are in a
 position to acknowledge that this interpretation was correct, the
 feelings of the celebrants being well explained by the basic situation.
 
 We may now accept it as a fact that in the further development of
 religions these two inciting factors, the sons sense of guilt and his
 defiance, were never again extinguished. Every attempted solution of the
 religious problem and every kind of reconciliation of the two opposing
 psychic forces gradually falls to the ground, probably under the
 combined influence of cultural changes, historical events, and inner
 psychic transformations.
 
 The endeavour of the son to put himself in place of the father god,
 appeared with greater and greater distinctness. With the introduction of
 agriculture the importance of the son in the patriarchal family
 increased. He was emboldened to give new expression to his incestuous
 libido which found symbolic satisfaction in labouring over mother earth.
 There came into existence figures of gods like Attis, Adonis, Tammuz,
 and others, spirits of vegetation as well as youthful divinities who
 enjoyed the favours of maternal deities and committed incest with the
 mother in defiance of the father. But the sense of guilt which was not
 allayed through these creations, was expressed in myths which visited
 these youthful lovers of the maternal goddesses with short life and
 punishment through castration or through the wrath of the father god
 appearing in animal form. Adonis was killed by the boar, the sacred
 animal of Aphrodite; Attis, the lover of Kybele, died of
 castration[219]. The lamentation for these gods and the joy at their
 resurrection have gone over into the ritual of another son which
 divinity was destined to survive long.
 
 When Christianity began its entry into the ancient world it met with the
 competition of the religion of Mithras and for a long time it was
 doubtful which deity was to be the victor.
 
 The bright figure of the youthful Persian god has eluded our
 understanding. Perhaps we may conclude from the illustrations of Mithras
 slaying the steers that he represented the son who carried out the
 sacrifice of the father by himself and thus released the brothers from
 their oppressing complicity in the deed. There was another way of
 allaying this sense of guilt and this is the one that Christ took. He
 sacrificed his own life and thereby redeemed the brothers from primal
 sin.
 
 The theory of primal sin is of Orphic origin; it was preserved in the
 mysteries and thence penetrated into the philosophic schools of Greek
 antiquity[220]. Men were the descendants of Titans, who had killed and
 dismembered the young Dionysos-Zagreus; the weight of this crime
 oppressed them. A fragment of Anaximander says that the unity of the
 world was destroyed by a primordial crime and everything that issued
 from it must carry on the punishment for this crime[221]. Although the
 features of banding together, killing, and dismembering as expressed in
 the deed of the Titans very clearly recall the totem sacrifice described
 by St Nilus--as also many other myths of antiquity, for example, the
 death of Orpheus himself--we are nevertheless disturbed here by the
 variation according to which a youthful god was murdered.
 
 In the Christian myth mans original sin is undoubtedly an offence
 against God the Father, and if Christ redeems mankind from the weight of
 original sin by sacrificing his own life, he forces us to the conclusion
 that this sin was murder. According to the law of retaliation which is
 deeply rooted in human feeling, a murder can be atoned only by the
 sacrifice of another life; the self-sacrifice points to a
 blood-guilt[222]. And if this sacrifice of ones own life brings about
 a reconciliation with god, the father, then the crime which must be
 expiated can only have been the murder of the father.
 
 Thus in the Christian doctrine mankind most unreservedly acknowledges
 the guilty deed of primordial times because it now has found the most
 complete expiation for this deed in the sacrificial death of the son.
 The reconciliation with the father is the more thorough because
 simultaneously with this sacrifice there follows the complete
 renunciation of woman, for whose sake mankind rebelled against the
 father. But now also the psychological fatality of ambivalence demands
 its rights. In the same deed which offers the greatest possible
 expiation to the father, the son also attains the goal of his wishes
 against the father. He becomes a god himself beside or rather in place
 of his father. The religion of the son succeeds the religion of the
 father. As a sign of this substitution the old totem feast is revived
 again in the form of communion in which the band of brothers now eats
 the flesh and blood of the son and no longer that of the father, the
 sons thereby identifying themselves with him and becoming holy
 themselves. Thus through the ages we see the identity of the totem
 feast with the animal sacrifice, the theanthropic human sacrifice, and
 the Christian eucharist, and in all these solemn occasions we recognize
 the after-effects of that crime which so oppressed men but of which they
 must have been so proud. At bottom, however, the Christian communion is
 a new setting aside of the father, a repetition of the crime that must
 be expiated. We see how well justified is Frazers dictum that the
 Christian communion has absorbed within itself a sacrament which is
 doubtless far older than Christianity[223].
 
 
 7
 
 A process like the removal of the primal father by the band of brothers
 must have left ineradicable traces in the history of mankind and must
 have expressed itself the more frequently in numerous substitutive
 formations the less it itself was to be remembered.[224] I am avoiding
 the temptation of pointing out these traces in mythology, where they are
 not hard to find, and am turning to another field in following a hint of
 S. Reinach in his suggestive treatment of the death of Orpheus[225].
 
 There is a situation in the history of Greek art which is strikingly
 familiar even if profoundly divergent, to the scene of a totem feast
 discovered by Robertson Smith. It is the situation of the oldest Greek
 tragedy. A group of persons, all of the same name and dressed in the
 same way, surround a single figure upon whose words and actions they are
 dependent, to represent the chorus and the original single impersonator
 of the hero. Later developments created a second and a third actor in
 order to represent opponents in playing, and off-shoots of the hero, but
 the character of the hero as well as his relation to the chorus remains
 unchanged. The hero of the tragedy had to suffer; this is to-day still
 the essential content of a tragedy. He had taken upon himself the
 so-called tragic guilt, which is not always easy to explain; it is
 often not a guilt in the ordinary sense. Almost always it consisted of a
 rebellion against a divine or human authority and the chorus accompanied
 the hero with their sympathies, trying to restrain and warn him, and
 lamented his fate after he had met with what was considered fitting
 punishment for his daring attempt.
 
 But why did the hero of the tragedy have to suffer, and what was the
 meaning of his tragic guilt? We will cut short the discussion by a
 prompt answer. He had to suffer because he was the primal father, the
 hero of that primordial tragedy the repetition of which here serves a
 certain tendency, and the tragic guilt is the guilt which he had to take
 upon himself in order to free the chorus of theirs. The scene upon the
 stage came into being through purposive distortion of the historical
 scene or, one is tempted to say, it was the result of refined hypocrisy.
 Actually, in the old situation, it was the members of the chorus
 themselves who had caused the suffering of the hero; here, on the other
 hand, they exhaust themselves in sympathy and regret, and the hero
 himself is to blame for his suffering. The crime foisted upon him,
 namely, presumption and rebellion against a great authority, is the same
 as that which in the past oppressed the colleagues of the chorus,
 namely, the band of brothers. Thus the tragic hero, though still against
 his will, is made the redeemer of the chorus.
 
 When one bears in mind the suffering of the divine goat Dionysos in the
 performance of the Greek tragedy and the lament of the retinue of goats
 who identified themselves with him, one can easily understand how the
 almost extinct drama was reviewed in the Middle Ages in the Passion of
 Christ.
 
 In closing this study, which has been carried out in extremely condensed
 form, I want to state the conclusion that the beginnings of religion,
 ethics, society, and art meet in the Oedipus complex. This is in entire
 accord with the findings of psychoanalysis, namely, that the nucleus of
 all neuroses as far as our present knowledge of them goes is the Oedipus
 complex. It comes as a great surprise to me that these problems of
 racial psychology can also be solved through a single concrete instance,
 such as the relation to the father. Perhaps another psychological
 problem must be included here. We have so frequently had occasion to
 show the ambivalence of emotions in its real sense, that is to say the
 coincidence of love and hate towards the same object, at the root of
 important cultural formations. We know nothing about the origin of this
 ambivalence. It may be assumed to be a fundamental phenomenon of our
 emotional life. But the other possibility seems to me also worthy of
 consideration: that ambivalence, originally foreign to our emotional
 life was acquired by mankind from the father complex[226], where
 psychoanalytic investigation of the individual to-day still reveals the
 strongest expression of it[227].
 
 Before closing we must take into account that the remarkable convergence
 reached in these illustrations, pointing to a single inclusive relation,
 ought not to blind us to the uncertainties of our assumptions and to the
 difficulties of our conclusions. Of these difficulties I will point out
 only two which must have forced themselves upon many readers.
 
 In the first place it can hardly have escaped any one that we base
 everything upon the assumption of a psyche of the mass in which psychic
 processes occur as in the psychic life of the individual. Moreover, we
 let the sense of guilt for a deed survive for thousands of years,
 remaining effective in generations which could not have known anything
 of this deed. We allow an emotional process such as might have arisen
 among generations of sons that had been ill-treated by their fathers, to
 continue to new generations which had escaped such treatment by the very
 removal of the father. These seem indeed to be weighty objections and
 any other explanation which can avoid such assumptions would seem to
 merit preference.
 
 But further consideration shows that we ourselves do not have to carry
 the whole responsibility for such daring. Without the assumption of a
 mass psyche, or a continuity in the emotional life of mankind which
 permits us to disregard the interruptions of psychic acts through the
 transgression of individuals, social psychology could not exist at all.
 If psychic processes of one generation did not continue in the next, if
 each had to acquire its attitude towards life afresh, there would be no
 progress in this field and almost no development. We are now confronted
 by two new questions: how much can be attributed to this psychic
 continuity within the series of generations, and what ways and means
 does a generation use to transfer its psychic states to the next
 generation? I do not claim that these problems have been sufficiently
 explained or that direct communication and tradition, of which one
 immediately thinks, are adequate for the task. Social psychology is in
 general little concerned with the manner in which the required
 continuity in the psychic life of succeeding generations is established.
 A part of the task seems to be performed by the inheritance of psychic
 dispositions which, however, need certain incentives in the individual
 life in order to become effective. This may be the meaning of the poets
 words: Strive to possess yourself of what you have inherited from your
 ancestors. The problem would appear more difficult if we could admit
 that there are psychic impulses which can be so completely suppressed
 that they leave no traces whatsoever behind them. But that does not
 exist. The greatest suppression must leave room for distorted
 substitutions and their resulting reactions. But in that case we may
 assume that no generation is capable of concealing its more important
 psychic processes from the next. For psychoanalysis has taught us that
 in his unconscious psychic activity every person possesses an apparatus
 which enables him to interpret the reactions of others, that is to say,
 to straighten out the distortions which the other person has affected in
 the expression of his feelings. By this method of unconscious
 understanding of all customs, ceremonies, and laws which the original
 relation to the primal father had left behind, later generations may
 also have succeeded in taking over this legacy of feelings.
 
 There is another objection which the analytic method of thought itself
 might raise.
 
 We have interpreted the first rules of morality and moral restrictions
 of primitive society as reactions to a deed which gave the authors of it
 the conception of crime. They regretted this deed and decided that it
 should not be repeated and that its execution must bring no gain. This
 creative sense of guilt has not become extinct with us. We find its
 asocial effects in neurotics producing new rules of morality and
 continued restrictions, in expiation for misdeeds committed, or as
 precautions against misdeeds to be committed[228]. But when we examine
 these neurotics for the deeds which have called forth such reactions, we
 are disappointed. We do not find deeds, but only impulses and feelings
 which sought evil but which were restrained from carrying it out. Only
 psychic realities and not actual ones are at the basis of the neurotics
 sense of guilt. It is characteristic of the neurosis to put a psychic
 reality above an actual one and to react as seriously to thoughts as the
 normal person reacts only towards realities.
 
 May it not be true that the case was somewhat the same with primitive
 men? We are justified in ascribing to them an extraordinary
 over-valuation of their psychic acts as a partial manifestation of their
 narcistic organization[229]. According to this the mere impulses of
 hostility towards the father and the existence of the wish phantasy to
 kill and devour him may have sufficed to bring about the moral reaction
 which has created totemism and taboo. We should thus escape the
 necessity of tracing back the beginning of our cultural possession, of
 which we rightly are so proud, to a horrible crime which wounds all our
 feelings. The causal connexion, which stretches from that beginning to
 the present time, would not be impaired, for the psychic reality would
 be of sufficient importance to account for all those consequences. It
 may be agreed that a change has really taken place in the form of
 society from the father horde to the brother clan. This is a strong
 argument, but it is not conclusive. The change might have been
 accomplished in a less violent manner and still have conditioned the
 appearance of the moral reaction. As long as the pressure of the primal
 father was felt the hostile feelings against him were justified and
 repentance at these feelings had to wait for another opportunity. Of as
 little validity is the second objection, that everything derived from
 the ambivalent relation to the father, namely taboos, and rules of
 sacrifice, is characterized by the highest seriousness and by complete
 reality. The ceremonials and inhibitions of compulsion neurotics exhibit
 this characteristic too and yet they go back to a merely psychic
 reality, to resolution and not to execution. We must beware of
 introducing the contempt for what is merely thought or wished which
 characterizes our sober world where there are only material values, into
 the world of primitive man and the neurotic, which is full of inner
 riches only.
 
 We face a decision here which is really not easy. But let us begin by
 acknowledging that the difference which may seem fundamental to others
 does not, in our judgment, touch the most important part of the subject.
 If wishes and impulses have the full value of fact for primitive man, it
 is for us to follow such a conception intelligently instead of
 correcting it according to our standard. But in that case we must
 scrutinize more closely the prototype of the neurosis itself which is
 responsible for having raised this doubt. It is not true that compulsion
 neurotics, who to-day are under the pressure of over-morality, defend
 themselves only against the psychic reality of temptations and punish
 themselves for impulses which they have only felt. A piece of historic
 reality is also involved; in their childhood these persons had nothing
 but evil impulses and as far as their childish impotence permitted they
 put them into action. Each of these over-good persons had a period of
 badness in his childhood, and a perverse phase as a fore-runner and a
 premise of the latter over morality. The analogy between primitive men
 and neurotics is therefore much more fundamentally established if we
 assume that with the former, too, the psychic reality, concerning whose
 structure there is no doubt, originally coincided with the actual
 reality, and that primitive men really did what according to all
 testimony they intended to do.
 
 But we must not let our judgment about primitive men be influenced too
 far by the analogy with neurotics. Differences must also be taken into
 account. Of course the sharp division between thinking and doing as we
 draw it does not exist either with savages or with neurotics. But the
 neurotic is above all inhibited in his actions; with him the thought is
 a complete substitute for the deed. Primitive man is not inhibited, the
 thought is directly converted into the deed, the deed is for him so to
 speak rather a substitute for the thought, and for that reason I think
 we may well assume in the case we are discussing, though without
 vouching for the absolute certainty of the decision, that In the
 beginning was the deed.
 
 THE END
 
 _Printed in Great Britain by_ Butler & Tanner, _Frome and London_
 
 
 FOOTNOTES:
 
 [1] Jung: _Wandlungen and Symbole der Libido_ (Transformations and
 Symbols of the Libido) translated by Dr. Beatrice Hinkle under the title
 _The Psychology of the Unconscious_, and _Principles of Psychoanalysis,
 Nervous and Mental Diseases_.
 
 [2] _The History of the Psychoanalytic Movement_, translated by A. A.
 Brill.
 
 [3] _Selected Papers on Hysteria and other Psychoneuroses_, translated
 by A. A. Brill.
 
 [4] _The Psychopathology of Everyday Life_, translated by A. A. Brill.
 
 [5] Translated by A. A. Brill.
 
 [6] _Wit and Its Relations to the Unconscious_, translated by A. A.
 Brill.
 
 [7] Freud: _Leonardo Da Vinci_, translated by A. A. Brill.
 
 [8] Cf. the works of Abraham, Spielrein, Jung, and Rank.
 
 [9] Frazer, _Totemism and Exogamy_, Vol. I, p. 53. The totem bond is
 stronger than the bond of blood or family in the modern sense.
 
 [10] This very brief extract of the totemic system cannot be left
 without some elucidation and without discussing its limitations. The
 name Totem or Totam was first learned from the North American Indians by
 the Englishman, J. Long, in 1791. The subject has gradually acquired
 great scientific interest and has called forth a copious literature. I
 refer especially to _Totemism and Exogamy_ by J. G. Frazer, 4 vols.,
 1910, and the books and articles of Andrew Lang (_The Secret of Totem_,
 1905). The credit for having recognized the significance of totemism for
 the ancient history of man belongs to the Scotchman, J. Ferguson
 MacLennan (_Fortnightly Review_, 1869-70). Exterior to Australia,
 totemic institutions were found and are still observed among North
 American Indians, as well as among the races of the Polynesian Islands
 group, in East India, and in a large part of Africa. Many traces and
 survivals otherwise hard to interpret lead to the conclusion that
 totemism also once existed among the aboriginal Aryan and Semitic races
 of Europe, so that many investigators are inclined to recognize in
 totemism a necessary phase of human development through which every race
 has passed.
 
 How then did prehistoric man come to acquire a totem; that is, how did
 he come to make his descent from this or that animal foundation of his
 social duties and, as we shall hear, of his sexual restrictions as well?
 Many different theories have been advanced to explain this, a review of
 which the reader may find in Wundts _Voelkerpsychologie_ (Vol. II:
 _Mythus und Religion_).
 
 I promise soon to make the problem of totemism a subject of special
 study in which an effort will be made to solve it by applying the
 psychoanalytic method. (Cf. The fourth chapter of this work.)
 
 Not only is the theory of totemism controversial, but the very facts
 concerning it are hardly to be expressed in such general statements as
 were attempted above. There is hardly an assertion to which one would
 not have to add exceptions and contradictions. But it must not be
 forgotten that even the most primitive and conservative races are, in a
 certain sense, old, and have a long period behind them during which
 whatsoever was aboriginal with them has undergone much development and
 distortion. Thus among those races who still evince it, we find totemism
 to-day in the most manifold states of decay and disintegration; we
 observe that fragments of it have passed over to other social and
 religious institutions; or it may exist in fixed forms but far removed
 from its original nature. The difficulty then consists in the fact that
 it is not altogether easy to decide what in the actual conditions is to
 be taken as a faithful copy of the significant past and what is to be
 considered as a secondary distortion of it.
 
 [11] Frazer, _l.c._, p. 54.
 
 [12] But the father, who is a Kangaroo, is free--at least under this
 prohibition--to commit incest with his daughters, who are Emu. In the
 case of paternal inheritance of the totem the father would be Kangaroo
 as well as the children; then incest with the daughters would be
 forbidden to the father and incest with the mother would be left open to
 the son. These consequences of the totem prohibition seem to indicate
 that the maternal inheritance is older than the paternal one, for there
 are grounds for assuming that the totem prohibitions are directed first
 of all against the incestuous desires of the son.
 
 [13] Second edition, 1902.
 
 [14] _The Native Tribes of Central Australia_ (London, 1899).
 
 [15] The number of totems is arbitrarily chosen.
 
 [16] Article _Totemism_ in _Encyclopedia Britannica_, eleventh edition,
 1911 (A. Lang).
 
 [17] Storfer has recently drawn special attention to this point in his
 monograph: _Parricide as a Special Case._ _Papers on Applied Psychic
 Investigation_, No. 12 (Vienna, 1911).
 
 [18] R. H. Codrington, _The Melanesians_, also Frazer _Totemism and
 Exogamy_, Vol. I, p. 77.
 
 [19] Frazer, _l.c._, II, p. 124, according to Kleintischen: _The
 Inhabitants of the Coast of the Gazelle Peninsula_.
 
 [20] Frazer, _l.c._, II, p. 131, according to P. G. Peckel in
 _Anthropes_, 1908.
 
 [21] Frazer, _l.c._, II, p. 147, according to the Rev. L. Fison.
 
 [22] Frazer, _l.c._, II. p. 189.
 
 [23] Frazer, _l.c._, II, p. 388, according to Junod.
 
 [24] Frazer, _l.c._, II, p. 424.
 
 [25] Frazer, _l.c._, II, p. 76.
 
 [26] Frazer, _l.c._, II, p. 113, according to C. Ribbe: _Two Years among
 the Cannibals of the Solomon Islands_, 1905.
 
 [27] Frazer, _l.c._, II, p. 385.
 
 [28] Frazer, _l.c._, II, p. 461.
 
 [29] _v._ Crawley: _The Mystic Rose_ (London, 1902), p. 405.
 
 [30] Crawley, _l.c._, p. 407.
 
 [31] Crawley, _l.c._, p. 401, according to Leslie: _Among the Zulus and
 Amatongas_, 1875.
 
 [32] _Voelkerpsychologie_, II. Band: _Mythus und Religion_, 1906, II, p.
 308.
 
 [33] Eleventh Edition; this article also gives the most important
 references.
 
 [34] This application of the taboo can be omitted as not originally
 belonging in this connection.
 
 [35] _Voelkerpsychologie_, Vol. II: _Religion und Mythus_, p. 300.
 
 [36] _l.c._, p. 237.
 
 [37] Comp. Chapter I.
 
 [38] _l.c._, p. 307.
 
 [39] _l.c._, p. 313.
 
 [40] Frazer, _The Golden Bough_, II: _Taboo and the Perils of the Soul_,
 1911, p. 136.
 
 [41] Both the pleasure and the prohibition referred to touching ones
 own genitals.
 
 [42] The relation to beloved persons who impose the prohibition.
 
 [43] To use an excellent term coined by Bleuler.
 
 [44] See Chapter IV; _Totemism, etc._
 
 [45] Third Edition, Part II: _Taboo and the Perils of the Soul_, 1911.
 
 [46] Frazer, _l.c._, p. 166.
 
 [47] Paulitschke, _Ethnography of North-east Africa_.
 
 [48] Frazer, _Adonis, Attis, Osiris_, p. 248, 1907. According to Hugh
 Low, _Sarawak_ (London, 1848).
 
 [49] J. O. Dorsay, see Frazer, _Taboo_, etc., p. 181.
 
 [50] Frazer, _Taboo_, pp. 166-174. These ceremonies consist of hitting
 shields, shouting, bellowing and making noises with various instruments,
 etc.
 
 [51] Frazer, _Taboo_, p. 166, according to S. Mueller, _Reisen en
 Onderzoekingen in den Indischen Archipel_. (Amsterdam, 1857).
 
 [52] For these examples see Frazer, _Taboo_, p. 165-170, Manslayers
 Tabooed.
 
 [53] Frazer, _Taboo_, p. 132. He must not only be guarded, he must also
 be guarded against.
 
 [54] Frazer, _The Magic Art_, I, p. 368.
 
 [55] _Old New Zealand_, by a Pakeha Maori (London, 1884), see Frazer,
 _Taboo_, p. 135.
 
 [56] W. Brown, _New Zealand and Its Aborigines_ (London, 1845) _Frazer_,
 _l.c._
 
 [57] _Frazer_, _l.c._
 
 [58] Frazer, _Taboo_. _The Burden of Royalty_, p. 7.
 
 [59] _l.c._, p. 7.
 
 [60] Kaempfer, _History of Japan_, see in Frazer, _l.c._, p. 3.
 
 [61] Bastian, _The German Expedition to the Coast of Loango_ (Jena
 1874), cited by Frazer, _l.c._, p. 5.
 
 [62] Frazer, _l.c._, p. 13.
 
 [63] Frazer, _l.c._, p. 11.
 
 [64] A. Bastian, _The German Expedition on the Coast of Lonago_, cited
 by Frazer, _l.c._, p. 18.
 
 [65] _l.c._, p. 18. According to Zwefel et Monstier, _Voyage aux Sources
 du Niger_, 1880.
 
 [66] Frazer, _The Magic Art and the Evolution of Kings_, 2 vols., 1911
 (_The Golden Bough_).
 
 [67] Frazer, _Taboo_, p. 148, etc.
 
 [68] W. Mariner, _The Natives of the Tonga Islands_, 1818; see _Frazer_,
 _l.c._, p. 140.
 
 [69] The same patient whose impossibilities I have correlated with
 taboo (see above, p. 47) acknowledged that she always became indignant
 when she met anybody on the street who was dressed in mourning. Such
 people should be forbidden to go out! she said.
 
 [70] Frazer, _l.c._, p. 353.
 
 [71] Frazer, _l.c._, p. 352, etc.
 
 [72] Frazer, _l.c._, p. 357, according to an old Spanish observer 1732.
 
 [73] Frazer, _l.c._, p. 360.
 
 [74] Stekel, _Abraham_.
 
 [75] Frazer, _l.c._, p. 353, cites the Tuaregs of the Sahara as an
 example of such an acknowledgment.
 
 [76] Perhaps this condition is to be added: as long as any part of his
 physical remains exist. Frazer, _l.c._, p. 372.
 
 [77] _On the Nikobar Islands_, Frazer, _l.c._, p. 382.
 
 [78] Wundt, _Religion and Myth_, Vol. II, p. 49.
 
 [79] _The Origin and Development of Moral Conceptions_, see section
 entitled Attitude Towards the Dead, Vol. II, p. 424. Both the notes
 and the text show an abundance of corroborating, and often very
 characteristic testimony, e.g., the Maori believed that the nearest and
 most beloved relatives changed their nature after death and bore
 ill-will even to their former favourites. The Austral negroes believe
 that every dead person is for a long time malevolent; the closer the
 relationship the greater the fear. The Central Eskimos are dominated by
 the idea that the dead come to rest very late and that at first they are
 to be feared as mischievous spirits who frequently hover about the
 village to spread illness, death and other evils. (Boas.)
 
 [80] R. Kleinpaul: _The Living and the Dead in Folklore, Religion and
 Myth_, 1898.
 
 [81] _l.c._, p. 426.
 
 [82] Cf. Chap. III.
 
 [83] Freud, _The Interpretation of Dreams_.
 
 [84] Freud, _The Interpretation of Dreams_.
 
 [85] The projection creations of primitive man resemble the
 personifications through which the poet projects his warring impulses
 out of himself, as separated individuals.
 
 [86] _Myth and Religion_, p. 129.
 
 [87] In the psychoanalysis of neurotic persons who suffer, or have
 suffered, in their childhood from the fear of ghosts, it is often not
 difficult to expose these ghosts as the parents. Compare also in this
 connection the communication of P. Haeberlin, _Sexual Ghosts_ (_Sexual
 Problems_, Feb. 1912), where it is a question of another erotically
 accentuated person, but where the father was dead.
 
 [88] Compare my article on Abels _Gegensinn der Urworte_ in the
 _Jahrbuch fr Psychoanalytische und Psychopathologische Forschungen_,
 Bd. II, 1910.
 
 [89] It is an interesting parallel that the sense of guilt resulting
 from the violation of a taboo is in no way diminished if the violation
 took place unwittingly (see examples above), and that even in the Greek
 myth the guilt of Oedipus is not cancelled by the fact that it was
 incurred without his knowledge and will and even against them.
 
 [90] The necessary crowding of the material also compels us to dispense
 with a thorough bibliography. Instead of this the reader is referred to
 the well-known works of Herbert Spencer, J. G. Frazer, A. Lang, E. B.
 Tylor and W. Wundt, from which all the statements concerning animism and
 magic are taken. The independence of the author can manifest itself only
 in the choice of the material and of opinions.
 
 [91] E. B. Tylor, _Primitive Culture_, Vol. I, p. 425, fourth ed., 1903.
 W. Wundt, _Myth and Religion_, Vol. II, p. 173, 1906.
 
 [92] Wundt _l.c._, Chapter IV: _Die Seelenvorstellungen_.
 
 [93] Compare, besides Wundt and H. Spencer and the instructive article
 in the _Encyclopedia Britannica_, 1911 (_Animism, Mythology_, and so
 forth).
 
 [94] _l.c._, p. 154.
 
 [95] See Tylor, _Primitive Culture_, Vol. I, p. 477.
 
 [96] _Cultes, Mythes et Religions_, T. II: _Introduction_, p. XV, 1909.
 
 [97] _Anne Sociologique_, Seventh Vol, 1904.
 
 [98] To frighten away a ghost with noise and cries is a form of pure
 sorcery; to force him to do something by taking his name is to employ
 magic against him.
 
 [99] _The Magic Art_, II. p. 67.
 
 [100] The Biblical prohibition against making an image of anything
 living hardly sprang from any fundamental rejection of plastic art, but
 was probably meant to deprive magic, which the Hebraic religion
 proscribed, of one of its instruments. Frazer, _l.c._, p. 87, note.
 
 [101] _The Magic Art_, II, p. 98.
 
 [102] An echo of this is to be found in the _Oedipus Rex_ of Sophocles.
 
 [103] _The Magic Art_, p. 120.
 
 [104] _l.c._, p. 122.
 
 [105] See preceding chapter, p. 92.
 
 [106] Frazer, _The Magic Art_, pp. 201-3.
 
 [107] _The Magic Art_, p. 420.
 
 [108] Compare the article _Magic_ (N. T. W.), in the _Encyclopedia
 Britannica_, 11th Ed.
 
 [109] _l.c._, p. 54.
 
 [110] Formulation of two principles of psychic activity, _Jahrb. fr
 Psychoanalyt. Forschungen_, Vol. III, 1912, p. 2.
 
 [111] The King in _Hamlet_ (Act III, Scene 4):
 
     My words fly up, my thoughts remain below,
      Words without thoughts never to heaven go.
 
 
 [112] Compare Chapter II.
 
 [113] Remarks upon a case of Compulsion Neurosis, _Jahrb. fr
 Psychoanalyt. und Psychopath. Forschungen_, Vol. I, 1909.
 
 [114] We seem to attribute the character of the uncanny to all such
 impressions which seek to confirm the omnipotence of thought and the
 animistic method of thought in general, though our judgment has long
 rejected it.
 
 [115] The following discussions will yield a further motive for this
 displacement upon a trivial action.
 
 [116] _Monograph Series_, 1916.
 
 [117] It is almost an axiom with writers on this subject that a sort of
 Solipsism or Berkleianism (as Professor Sully terms it as he finds it
 in the child) operates in the savage to make him refuse to recognize
 death as a fact.--Marett, _Pre-animistic Religion, Folklore_, Vol. XI,
 1900, p. 178.
 
 [118] We merely wish to indicate here that the original narcism of the
 child is decisive for the interpretation of its character development
 and that it precludes the assumption of a primitive feeling of
 inferiority for the child.
 
 [119] S. Reinach, _LArt et la Magie_, in the collection _Cultes, Mythes
 et Religions_, Vol. I, pp. 125-136. Reinach thinks that the primitive
 artists who have left us the scratched or painted animal pictures in the
 caves of France did not want to arouse pleasure, but to conjure
 things. He explains this by showing that these drawings are in the
 darkest and most inaccessible part of the caves and that representations
 of feared beasts of prey are absent. Les modernes parlent souvent, par
 hyperbole, de la magie du pinceau ou du ciseau dun grand artiste et, en
 gnral, de la magie de lart. Entendu en sense propre, qui est celui
 dune constrainte mystique exerce par la volont de lhomme sur
 dautres volonts ou sur les choses, cette expression nest plus
 admissible; mais nous avons vu quelle tait autrefois rigouresement,
 vraie, du moins dans lopinion des artistes (p. 136).
 
 [120] Recognized through so-called endopsychic perceptions.
 
 [121] R. R. Marett, _Pre-animistic Religion, Folklore_, Vol. XI, No. 2,
 1900.--Comp. Wundt, _Myth and Religion_, Vol. II, p. 171.
 
 [122] We assume that in this early narcistic stage feelings from
 libidinous and other sources of excitement are perhaps still
 indistinguishably combined with each other.
 
 [123] Schreber, _Denkwrdigkeiten eines Nervenkranken_, 1903.--Freud,
 Psychoanalytic Observations concerning an autobiographically described
 case of Paranoia, _Jahrbuch fr Psychoanalyt. Forsch._ Vol. III, 1911.
 
 [124] Compare the latest communication about the Schreber case, p. 59.
 
 [125] _Principles of Sociology_, Vol. I.
 
 [126] _l.c._, p. 179.
 
 [127] Compare my short paper: _A Note on the Unconscious in
 Psychoanalysis_, in the _Proceedings of the Society for Psychical
 Research_, Part LXVI, Vol. XXVI, 1912.
 
 [128] p. 26.
 
 [129] Frazer, _Taboo and the Perils of the Soul_, p. 158
 
 [130] Frazer, _l.c._, p. 200.
 
 [131] Frazer, _l.c._, p. 237.
 
 [132] Freud, _Psychopathology of Everyday Life_, p. 215, trans. by A. A.
 Brill.
 
 [133] p. 139.
 
 [134] _Revue Scientifique_, October, 1900, reprinted in the four volume
 work of the author, _Cultes, Mythes et Religions_, 1908, Tome I, p. 17.
 
 [135] 1910.
 
 [136] But it may be well to show the reader beforehand how difficult it
 is to establish the facts in this field.
 
 In the first place those who collect the observations are not identical
 with those who digest and discuss them; the first are travellers and
 missionaries, while the others are scientific men who perhaps have never
 seen the objects of their research.--It is not easy to establish an
 understanding with savages. Not all the observers were familiar with the
 languages but had to use the assistance of interpreters or else had to
 communicate with the people they questioned in the auxiliary language of
 pidgin-English. Savages are not communicative about the most intimate
 affairs of their culture and unburden themselves only to those
 foreigners who have passed many years in their midst. From various
 motives they often give wrong or misleading information, (Compare
 Frazer, _The Beginnings of Religion and Totemism Among the Australian
 Aborigines_; _Fortnightly Review_, 1905; _Totemism and Exogamy_, Vol. I,
 p. 150).--It must not be forgotten that primitive races are not young
 races but really are as old as the most civilized, and that we have no
 right to expect that they have preserved their original ideas and
 institutions for our information without any evolution or distortion. It
 is certain, on the contrary, that far-reaching changes in all directions
 have taken place among primitive races, so that we can never
 unhesitatingly decide which of their present conditions and opinions
 have preserved the original past, having remained petrified, as it were,
 and which represent a distortion and change of the original. It is due
 to this that one meets the many disputes among authors as to what
 proportion of the peculiarities of a primitive culture is to be taken as
 a primary, and what as a later and secondary manifestation. To establish
 the original conditions, therefore, always remains a matter of
 construction. Finally, it is not easy to adapt oneself to the ways of
 thinking of primitive races. For like children, we easily misunderstand
 them, and are always inclined to interpret their acts and feelings
 according to our own psychic constellations.
 
 [137] _Totemism_ (Edinburgh, 1887), reprinted in the first volume of his
 great study, _Totemism and Exogamy_.
 
 [138] Compare the chapter on Taboo.
 
 [139] Just as to-day we still have the wolves in a cage at the steps of
 the Capitol in Rome and the bears in the pit at Berne.
 
 [140] Like the legend of the white woman in many noble families.
 
 [141] _l.c._, p. 35.--See the discussion of sacrifice further on.
 
 [142] See Chapter I.
 
 [143] p. 116.
 
 [144] The conclusion which Frazer draws about totemism in his second
 work on the subject (_The Origin of Totemism; Fortnightly Review_, 1899)
 agrees with this text: Thus, totemism has commonly been treated as a
 primitive system both of religion and of society. As a system of
 religion it embraces the mystic union of the savage with his totem; as a
 system of society it comprises the relations in which men and women of
 the same totem stand to each other and to the members of other totemic
 groups. And corresponding to these two sides of the system are two
 rough-and-ready tests or canons of totemism: first, the rule that a man
 may not kill or eat his totem animal or plant, and second, the rule that
 he may not marry or cohabit with a woman of the same totem (p. 101).
 Frazer then adds something which takes us into the midst of the
 discussion about totemism: Whether the two sides--the religious and the
 social--have always coexisted or are essentially independent, is a
 question which has been variously answered.
 
 [145] In connexion with such a change of opinion Frazer made this
 excellent statement: That my conclusions on these difficult questions
 are final, I am not so foolish as to pretend. I have changed my views
 repeatedly, and I am resolved to change them again with every change of
 the evidence, for like a chameleon the inquirer should shift his colours
 with the shifting colours of the ground he treads. Preface to Vol. I,
 _Totemism and Exogamy_, 1910.
 
 [146] By the nature of the case, as the origin of totemism lies far
 beyond our powers of historical examination or of experiment, we must
 have recourse as regards this matter, to conjecture, Andrew Lang,
 _Secret of the Totem_, p. 27.--Nowhere do we see absolutely primitive
 man, and a totemic system in the making, p. 29.
 
 [147] At first probably only animals.
 
 [148] _The Worship of Animals and Plants_ (_Fortnightly Review_,
 1869-1870). _Primitive Marriage_, 1865; both works reprinted in _Studies
 in Ancient History_, 1876; second edition, 1886.
 
 [149] _The Secret of the Totem_, 1905, p. 34.
 
 [150] _Ibid._
 
 [151] _Ibid._
 
 [152] According to Andrew Lang.
 
 [153] Pikler and Soml, _The Origin of Totemism_, 1901. The authors
 rightly call their attempt at explanation a Contribution to the
 materialistic theory of History.
 
 [154] _The Origin of Animal Worship_ (_Fortnightly Review_, 1870).
 _Principles of Psychology_, Vol. I,  169 to 176.
 
 [155] _Kamilaroi and Kurmai_, p. 165, 1880 (Lang, _Secret of the Totem_,
 etc.).
 
 [156] See the chapter on Taboo, p. 96.
 
 [157] _l.c._, Vol. I, p. 41.
 
 [158] _Address to the Anthropological Section, British Association_,
 Belfast, 1902. According to Frazer, _l.c._, Vol. IV, p. 50.
 
 [159] _The Native Tribes of Central Australia_, by Baldwin Spencer and
 H. J. Gillen, London, 1891.
 
 [160] There is nothing vague or mystical about it, nothing of that
 metaphysical haze which some writers love to conjure up over the
 humblest beginnings of human speculation but which is utterly foreign to
 the simple, sensuous, and concrete modes of the savage. (_Totemism and
 Exogamy_, I., p. 117.)
 
 [161] _l.c._, p. 120.
 
 [162] _Lanne Sociologique_, Vol. I, V, VIII, and elsewhere. See
 especially the chapter, _Sur le Totmisme_, Vol. V, 1901.
 
 [163] _Social Origins and the Secret of the Totem._
 
 [164] _The Golden Bough_, II, p. 332.
 
 [165] It is unlikely that a community of savages should deliberately
 parcel out the realm of nature into provinces, assign each province to a
 particular band of magicians, and bid all the bands to work their magic
 and weave their spells for the common good. _Totemism and Exogamy_,
 Vol. IV, p. 57.
 
 [166] _Totemism and Exogamy_, Vol. II, p. 89, and IV, p. 59.
 
 [167] _Totemism and Exogamy_, Vol. IV, p. 63.
 
 [168] That belief is a philosophy far from primitive, Andrew Lang,
 _Secret of the Totem_, p. 192.
 
 [169] Frazer, _Totemism and Exogamy_, Vol. IV, p. 45.
 
 [170] Frazer, _l.c._, p. 48.
 
 [171] Wundt, _Elemente der Vlker-Psychologie_, p. 190.
 
 [172] _Lanne Sociologique_, 1898-1904.
 
 [173] See Frazers _Criticism of Durkheim, Totemism and Exogamy_, p.
 101.
 
 [174] _Secret_, etc., p. 125.
 
 [175] See Frazer, _l.c._, Vol. IV, p. 75: The totemic clan is a totally
 different social organism from the exogamous class, and we have good
 grounds for thinking that it is far older.
 
 [176] _Primitive Marriage_, 1865.
 
 [177] Frazer, _l.c._, p. 73 to 92.
 
 [178] Compare Chapter I.
 
 [179] Morgan, _Ancient Society_, 1877.--Frazer, _Totemism and Exogamy_,
 Vol. IV, p. 105.
 
 [180] Frazer, _l.c._, p. 106.
 
 [181] _Origin and Development of Moral Conceptions_, Vol. II: Marriage
 (1909). See also there the authors defence against familiar objections.
 
 [182] _l.c._, p. 97.
 
 [183] Compare Durkheim, _La Prohibition de lInceste_ (_Lanne
 Sociologique_, I, 1896-7).
 
 [184] Charles Darwin says about savages: They are not likely to reflect
 on distant evils to their progeny.
 
 [185] See Chapter I.
 
 [186] Thus the ultimate origin of exogamy and with it the law of
 incest--since exogamy was devised to prevent incest--remains a problem
 nearly as dark as ever.--_Totemism and Exogamy_, I, p. 165.
 
 [187] _The Origin of Man_, Vol. II, Chap. 20, pp. 603-4.
 
 [188] _Primal Law_, London, 1903 (with Andrew Lang, _Social Origins_).
 
 [189] _Secret of the Totem_, pp. 114, 143.
 
 [190] If it be granted that exogamy existed in practice, on the lines
 of Mr. Darwins theory, before the totem beliefs lent to the practice a
 _sacred_ sanction, our task is relatively easy. The first practical rule
 would be that of the jealous sire: No males to touch the females in my
 camp, with expulsion of adolescent sons. _In efflux of time that rule,
 becoming habitual_, would be, No marriages within the local group.
 Next let the local groups receive names such as Emus, Crows, Opossums,
 Snipes, and the rule becomes, No marriage within the local group of
 animal name; no Snipe to marry a Snipe. But, if the primal groups were
 not exogamous they would become so as soon as totemic myths and taboos
 were developed out of the animal, vegetable, and other names of small
 local groups.--_Secret of the Totem_, p. 143. (The italics above are
 mine).--In his last expression on the subject (_Folklore_, December,
 1911), Andrew Lang states, however, that he has given up the derivation
 of exogamy out of the general totemic taboo.
 
 [A] M. Wulff, _Contributions to Infantile Sexuality_, _Zentralbl. f.
 Psychoanalyze_, 1912, II, No. I, p. 15.
 
 [191] _Little Hans_, trans. by A. A. Brill (Moffat, Yard & Co., N.Y.).
 
 [192] _l.c._, p. 41.
 
 [193] The Phantasy of the Giraffe, _l.c._, p. 30.
 
 [194] S. Ferenczi, _Contributions to Psychoanalysis_, p. 204, translated
 by Ernest Jones (Badger, Boston, 1916).
 
 [195] Compare the communications of Reitler, Ferenczi, Rank, and Eder
 about the substitution of blindness in the Oedipus myth for castration.
 _Intern. Zeitschrift f. rtzl. Psychoanalyze_, 1913, I, No. 2.
 
 [196] Ferenczi, _l.c._, p. 209.
 
 [197] Ferenczi, _l.c._, p. 212.
 
 [198] Frazer finds that the essence of totemism is in this
 identification: Totemism is an identification of a man with his totem.
 _Totemism and Exogamy_, IV, p. 5.
 
 [199] I am indebted to Otto Rank for the report of a case of dog phobia
 in an intelligent young man whose explanation of how he acquired his
 ailment sounds remarkably like the totem theory of the Aruntas mentioned
 above. He had heard from his father that his mother at one time during
 her pregnancy had been frightened by a dog.
 
 [200] _The Religion of the Semites_, Second Edition, London, 1907.
 
 [201] _The Religion of the Semites_, Second Edition, London, 1907.
 
 [202] The inference is that the domestication to which totemism leads
 (when there are any animals capable of domestication) is fatal to
 totemism. Jevons, _Introduction to the History of Religion_, 1911,
 fifth edition, p. 120.
 
 [203] _l.c._, p. 313.
 
 [204] _The Golden Bough_, Part V; _Spirits of the Corn and of the Wild_,
 1912, in the chapters: Eating the God and Killing the Divine Animal.
 
 [205] Frazer, _Totem and Exogamy_, Vol. II, p. 590.
 
 [206] I am not ignorant of the objections to this theory of sacrifice as
 expressed by Marillier, Hubert, Mauss and others, but they have not
 essentially impaired the theories of Robertson Smith.
 
 [207] _Religion of the Semites_, 2nd Edition, 1907, p. 412.
 
 [208] For a recent contribution compare _The Whole House of the
 Chilkat_, by G. T. Emmons (_American Museum Journal_, Vol. XVI, No. 7.)
 [Translator].
 
 [209] The reader will avoid the erroneous impression which this
 exposition may call forth by taking into consideration the concluding
 sentence of the subsequent chapter.
 
 [210] The seemingly monstrous assumption that the tyrannical father was
 overcome and slain by a combination of the expelled sons has also been
 accepted by Atkinson as a direct result of the conditions of the
 Darwinian primal horde. A youthful band of brothers living together in
 forced celibacy, or at most in polyandrous relation with some single
 female captive. A horde as yet weak in their impubescence they are, but
 they would, when strength was gained with time, inevitably wrench by
 combined attacks, renewed again and again, both wife and life from the
 paternal tyrant (_Primal Law_, pp. 220-1). Atkinson, who spent his life
 in New Caledonia and had unusual opportunities to study the natives,
 also refers to the fact that the conditions of the primal horde which
 Darwin assumes can easily be observed among herds of wild cattle and
 horses and regularly lead to the killing of the father animal. He then
 assumes further that a disintegration of the horde took place after the
 removal of the father through embittered fighting among the victorious
 sons, which thus precluded the origin of a new organization of society;
 An ever recurring violent succession to the solitary paternal tyrant by
 sons, whose parricidal hands were so soon again clenched in fratricidal
 strife (p. 228). Atkinson, who did not have the suggestions of
 psychoanalysis at his command and did not know the studies of Robertson
 Smith, finds a less violent transition from the primal horde to the next
 social stage in which many men live together in peaceful accord. He
 attributes it to maternal love that at first only the youngest sons and
 later others too remain in the horde, who in return for this toleration
 acknowledge the sexual prerogative of the father by the restraint which
 they practise towards the mother and towards their sisters.
 
 So much for the very remarkable theory of Atkinson, its essential
 correspondence with the theory here expounded, and its point of
 departure which makes it necessary to relinquish so much else.
 
 I must ascribe the indefiniteness, the disregard of time interval, and
 the crowding of the material in the above exposition to a restraint
 which the nature of the subject demands. It would be just as meaningless
 to strive for exactness in this material as it would be unfair to demand
 certainty here.
 
 [211] This new emotional attitude must also have been responsible for
 the fact that the deed could not bring full satisfaction to any of the
 perpetrators. In a certain sense it had been in vain. For none of the
 sons could carry out his original wish of taking the place of the
 father. But failure is, as we know, much more favourable to moral
 reaction than success.
 
 [212] Murder and incest, or offences of like kind against the sacred
 law of blood are in primitive society the only crimes of which the
 community as such takes cognizance ... _Religion of the Semites_, p.
 419.
 
 [213] Compare _Transformations and Symbols of the Libido_, by C. G.
 Jung, in which some dissenting points of view are represented.
 
 [214] Robertson Smith, _Religion of the Semites_, Second Edition, 1907.
 
 [215] See above, p. 128.
 
 [216] To us moderns, for whom the breach which divides the human and
 divine has deepened into an impassable gulf, such mimicry may appear
 impious, but it was otherwise with the ancients. To their thinking gods
 and men were akin, for many families traced their descent from a
 divinity, and the deification of a man probably seemed as little
 extraordinary to them as the canonization of a saint seems to a modern
 Catholic. Frazer, _The Golden Bough_, I; _The Magic Art and the
 Evolution of Kings_, II, p. 177.
 
 [217] It is known that the overcoming of one generation of gods by
 another in mythology represents the historical process of the
 substitution of one religious system by another, either as the result of
 conquest by a strange race or by means of a psychological development.
 In the latter case the myth approaches the functional phenomena in H.
 Silberers sense. That the god who kills the animal is a symbol of the
 libido, as asserted by C. G. Jung (_l.c._), presupposes a different
 conception of the libido from that hitherto held, and at any rate seems
 to me questionable.
 
 [218] _Religion of the Semites_, pp. 412-413. The mourning is not a
 spontaneous expression of sympathy with the divine tragedy, but
 obligatory and enforced by fear of supernatural anger. And a chief
 object of the mourners is _to disclaim responsibility for the gods
 death_--a point which has already come before us in connexion with
 theanthropic sacrifices, such as the ox-murder at Athens.
 
 [219] The fear of castration plays an extraordinarily big rle in
 disturbing the relations to the father in the case of our youthful
 neurotics. In Ferenczis excellent study we have seen how the boy
 recognized his totem in the animal which snaps at his little penis. When
 children learn about ritual circumcision they identify it with
 castration. To my knowledge the parallel in the psychology of races to
 this attitude of our children has not yet been drawn. The circumcision
 which was so frequent in primordial times among primitive races belongs
 to the period of initiation in which its meaning is to be found; it has
 only secondarily been relegated to an earlier time of life. It is very
 interesting that among primitive men circumcision is combined with or
 replaced by the cutting off of the hair and the drawing of teeth, and
 that our children, who cannot know anything about this, really treat
 these two operations as equivalents to castration when they display
 their fear of them.
 
 [220] Reinach, _Cultes, Mythes, et Religions_, II, p. 75.
 
 [221] Une sorte de pch proethnique, _l.c._, p. 76.
 
 [222] The suicidal impulses of our neurotics regularly prove to be
 self-punishments for death wishes directed against others.
 
 [223] _Eating the God_, p. 51.... Nobody familiar with the literature on
 this subject will assume that the tracing back of the Christian
 communion to the totem feast is an idea of the author of this book.
 
 [224] Ariel in _The Tempest_:
 
     Full fathom five thy father lies;
     Of his bones are coral made;
     Those are pearls that were his eyes;
     Nothing of him that doth fade
     But doth suffer a sea-change
     Into something rich and strange....
 
 
 [225] La Mort dOrphe, _Cultes, Mythes, et Religions_, Vol. II, p. 100.
 
 [226] That is to say, the parent complex.
 
 [227] I am used to being misunderstood and therefore do not think it
 superfluous to state clearly that in giving these deductions I am by no
 means oblivious of the complex nature of the phenomena which give rise
 to them; the only claim made is that a new factor has been added to the
 already known or still unrecognized origins of religion, morality, and
 society, which was furnished through psychoanalytic experience. The
 synthesis of the whole explanation must be left to another. But it is in
 the nature of this new contribution that it could play none other than
 the central rle in such a synthesis, although it will be necessary to
 overcome great affective resistances before such importance will be
 conceded to it.
 
 [228] Compare Chapter II.
 
 [229] See Chapter III.
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 Typographical errors corrected by the etext transcriber:
 
 new pyschological technique=> new psychological technique {pg vi}
 
 the pyschoanalysts=> the psychoanalysts {pg vi}
 
 subjetced to analysis=> subjected to analysis {pg x}
 
 profound anaylsis=> profound analysis {pg x}
 
 Similiar customs=> Similar customs {pg 17}
 
 made us familar=> made us familiar {pg 48}
 
 expiate and similiar=> expiate and similar {pg 51}
 
 anxious excesss=> anxious excess {pg 84}
 
 originally the world taboo=> originally the world taboo {pg 112}
 
 susperstitious motivation=> susperstitious motivation {pg 162}
 
 exerce par la volunt=> exerce par la volont {pg 151}
 
 
        *       *       *       *       *
 
 
 
 
 
